“This was not the dream.”
-Last Words of Jaus Avandaer
0-1
Prologue:
Hunger
SOUL ONLINE
IGNITING THAUMIC CYCLER
WARNING: THAUMIC CYCLER OUTPUT MINIMAL - 1 THAUM
INITIALIZING RESURRECTION - 1%
RESTORING MEMORY–WARNING! MEMORY SEQUENCE CORRUPTED
REVERTING TO CORE MEMORY; INITIALIZING REBUILD
The flesh of his brother was the sweetest he had ever tasted.
For two months he hid in the Underhive. The deconstructor swarms ruled here now. Not the Low Masters. Not his brothers. Like locusts, they had flayed all matter they deemed hostile. The great halls and grand tunnels of rune-scribed bone peeled from existence. Now, he hid within an unfamiliar nest of metal. The swarms had replaced organic matter they ate with cold metal: a total usurpation of what was.
By the last days, he survived by feeding off mind-dead aratnids, devouring them palps, flesh, and all.
Above, the world shook as the war continued. Nuclear detonations lessened but did not stop. They never stopped.
In the winnowed dark, he sat, stewing in feelings he lacked the vocabulary to explain. Infantile rage bled into despondent sorrow. His Low Masters had planned. Plotted this for years. They created his kind, the ghouls, to serve as their instrument of vengeance. Expanded the Umbra to create a truly labyrinthine stronghold below their enemies.
And then, they waited. Schemed. Waited for the Guilds to fight amongst themselves as they had so many times before. When the day finally came, they rose and took the Warrens, beginning the uprising to liberate their homeland, to reclaim the stolen flame of their gods and rightful Heavens.
Numbering a billion strong, they flooded up from their staging points, emerging through the soil on towers of bone. It was to be a bloodletting, a reckoning long owed to the last true faithful of Noloth. In a tidal wave of savagery, fury, and bloodlust they rose to face the Guilds in what was to be the feast of flesh; a crusade for all that was holy.
They lasted three months. The Guilds massacred them for three more.
UNABLE TO UPLOAD LATEST INSTANCE OF OPTIMAL ONTOLOGY
RESURRECTION PAUSED - 12%
REVERTING TO PRIOR ONTOLOGICAL ITERATION - 22%
ONTOLOGICAL REVERSION - 66%
ACCELERATING MEMORY
Beneath the slope of the tower, he caught the scent of fresh blood and souring flesh. The taste was familiar. Intimate. He knew it to be close to his own. There, in a shallow artillery-made basin, another of his kind lay dead.
A gauss-flechette lay buried in the skull of his brother. Death must’ve come instantly. Yet, where the mind was dead, the blessed blood within their veins struggled on, the self-moving ichor of the corpse wrestling vainly against the tungsten shard, trying to dislodge it.
The ghoul sniffed the corpse of his brother. Still fresh. Still fresh. Praise the Hungers. Still fresh.
Hunger became him. Rationality was lost to him. He gave in.
Satiation, a delicacy unto itself.
Within his body, he felt the blood joining him like a growing ladder; the cells interlacing without difficulty. When he finished, he spoke prayers in honor of the Eight Hungers of Noloth.
There were no Acolytes to lead him in worship this time. No ghosts to whisper the words into his mind.
Alone. Still alone.
For the first time in his life, there was no one to command him. Nothing left to do. His kind had been created for a singular purpose. And they had failed. He knew of no choice beyond obedience. No life beyond slavery. Without a master to give him purpose, he simply sat and waited. Soon, hunger would spur his whims again.
Hunger could serve as his master.
REVERSION COMPLETE
REINSTALLING ONTOLOGY
REALIGNING MEMORIES - 74%
The days that followed came as a blur. He fed from all things. Corpses. Bugs. Roots. He walked countless leagues, avoiding the day and traveling at night. He fed from broken cloning vats in a relatively intact voidship, the taste of the weaponized bioforms revolting but filling. At some point, he found himself in the shadow of a gargantuan snake-like creature that displaced the war-choked clouds. It moved like an undulating scar slithering through the fabric of reality itself.
Here, even hunger faded. There was no greater comfort than pain dulled by numbness. To be in agony. To shed it and find deliverance. He had tried to live. Tried as best as he could. But as he had failed the Low Masters, so too did he fail his hunger.
Atop a bed of plascrete and silicon, the small ghoul whimpered and muttered a final wordless plea to his gods.
Tried. Fought. Lost. Struggled. Did my best.
I did not ask to be.
Upon a throne of ruin, he waited to die.
DAMAGED MEMORY SEQUENCE DETECTED
DELETING SEQUENCE
COGNITION INTEGRATED
RESUMING RESURRECTION - 65%
Ash settled upon him, binding him to the fading land. He sank deeper into the ruins, and deeper into his own mind. He dreamed, then. A delirium running half slumber and fever. Memories of his brothers were fleeting at best. He felt as if a dog among wolves while he lived among his kind. How similar they were all meant to be, but how simple he found them.
The dream changed. Beside the stilled swing of a playground stood a man beneath the light of the cold moon. A crown burned upon his head, shivering like a caged flame. From it came a ripple, an unseen resonance. Whispers licked over the ghoul’s mind as he felt the touch of an outside presence sinking into his cognition.
A shot of anomalous adrenaline rushed through him. His blood surged. The pain returned to him. As did the hunger. It burned. Everything burned. He woke, his delirium breaking. The man was still there. Closer now. Walking toward him with the broken cityscape behind his back.
No. Not a dream. Weak and feeble as the ghoul was, he still lived. The whispers in his mind grew louder as a ghost made itself known to him.
+Do you wish to live?+ the ghost asked. Its voice was placid. Serene. Unwounded by the world and all its pains.
“Yes,” the ghoul rasped. “Yes.”
The ghost slipped out of him, taking with them the gift of lucidity. Abandoned by strength, unconsciousness fell upon him like dirt on a coffin.
It was only when the first flow of blood splashed against his tongue that he woke again. It tasted rich. Deep and pure. Like a nu-dog, he lapped at the flow, slaking his thirst. He heard the pulsing heartbeat of another. It was so close to him. Weakly, he nursed himself on the man’s opened wrist, savoring the sweet flavor of blood.
The ghoul opened his eyes toward his savior.
Fresh amidst the caustic toxin hissing from the wastes, the scent of citrus spilled out from the man. His hair was dark as coal and his skin was like copper. There was nothing truly remarkable about him in terms of height or mass. Nor did he infuse his flesh with any unholy metals.
Kneeling down, the man’s eyes shone with an unnatural blueness. It was as if the clearest sky had decided to peer through him.
“You look hungry,” the man said, pulling a cube of tasteless meat from his coat.
Hunger. Food. Taste.
The feeding that came was frenzied. Blind. The substance went down barely chewed, and a warmth settled in place of cold empty thoughts.
He felt the man’s arms slide under him, lifting him as if he bore no weight. He gave no struggle, for there was no order to resist.
For the first time, he felt an invader touch him and inflict no violence.
He succumbed deeper into the man’s arms.
“Surprised to see any of you topside,” the man said, chuckling as if he found a diamond in the rough. “Suppose the Guilds had each other to contend with. Sloppy.” The man spoke the heretical tongue with a slow pace that seemed to come with age. But there was something deeper in it. “Do you have a name?”
RESURRECTION - 99%
BEGINNING ONTOLOGICAL ANCHORING
Name? He had known his brothers by scent and sound. Bestowed crude titles to some of them and the meaner masters, though he would never admit it. But names were for the chosen, and he was merely a thrall. A creature fortunate enough to serve the blessed.
He had no name. Shivering, he shook his head feebly, the meager act taxing him to his limit.
The man hummed. “Suppose we’ll have to fix that.” The light of the darkstar settled on them. As they emerged from the shade of the tower, weak breezes licked chills across the devastation, emerging as whistles through cracks in crevices, singing a constant trill to their egress from the ruins.
The man fixed him with a wry stare. “You got the look of someone who walked out of one of the Low Hells, consang, anyone ever tell you that?”
He thought about that. Only memories of vulgar violence answered his recollections. “No.”
“Well, you do,” the man continued. “Time upon time ago, before all this, before even the Fall, folks used to name their blood after ideas. Expressions meant to align them to the Heavens of certain gods. Probably why my kin were so mad when I took the name Walton. Like throwing the blessing back in their face.”
He looked down again, his face taking an inscrutable expression. “You’re a survivor, you know. Deserve a good name. One that’s worthy of you.”
“Worthy?"
“Tell you what,” the man said. “I’ll give naming you a shot. And, down the line, if you ever find a better name, you can do what I did. How does that sound?”
He didn’t know what to say. Mainly because no one had ever asked his opinion before. Unsure what to do, he just grunted.
“Calling you Survivor would be laying it mighty thick. But thankfully, the same meaning can belong to different words if you know enough tongues.” He cocked his head down, and, for the first time, smiled. “How about I call you…”
RESURRECTION - 100%
IMPLANTING NOUS
“The Heavens have fallen, and we have trapped ourselves beneath its rubble.
Such it was.
Such it still remains.
For all that we have sacrificed, defiled, and transgressed, I see now that meager hubris has tainted our rightful emancipation, and damned us more than the pantheons ever could.
How quick were we in the claiming of sovereignty over the corpses of our great abusers? How quick we were to fashion the instruments of our ascent from their blood, to clad our frailties using the chassis of their beings?
And how quick did we cast the weight of our chains down upon the others?
In these words, I can only offer you the ache of truth rather than the salvation you so deserve. For this, may I be damned to the deepest of hells. All I wish is for you, dear kindred, to know the truth of our transgression and beg your forgiveness.
We sought to create paradise.
But in practice with our avarice, we unleashed an apocalypse."
-Jaus Avandaer, Chains from Chains
1-1
Resurrection
Avo woke atop a mountain of rust and rot. His sore lungs filled with a whistling gasp. His mind was sheathed into his vessel as existence shuddered around him. His senses reeled from the muted depths of nothingness to overload in space of seconds. He was alive.
The pain flaring across his body made him wish he wasn’t.
ONTOLOGY REVERTED
RESURRECTION COMPLETED
MEMORY RESTORED
WARNING: MEMORY SEQUENCE MISSING, UNABLE TO LOCATE MEMORIES WITHIN THE SPAN OF [1 WEEK, 3 HOURS, 5 MINUTES]
THAUMIC MASS INSUFFICIENT - UNABLE TO SUSTAIN METAMIND
REVERTING TO ZERO BURN
Lines of cog-feed data dissolved from Avo’s perception as if they had never been. One by one, sensations greeted him, few of them pleasant. The shrill winds grated upon his ears and the stench of rust and rot snaked up his nostrils. A dim chasm of light shone down on him from far above, stabbing into his bleary eyes. Agony flared across every inch of his body.
He shuffled. His wounds flared. He stopped shuffling.
A strange pressure rested upon his chest. Looking down, the remains of a corpse lay spattered upon him, its blood seeping deep into his sodden undersuit. Sniffing, he could taste the bitter tinge of adrenaline flavoring the corpse’s flesh.
Tentatively, he licked a scoop of mangled meat from the body. It didn’t taste good, but it was enough to fuel his blood cells and spur his wounds to heal.
He ate what he could on his back using only his tongue, trying to move as little as possible. Sitting or standing was beyond him. He needed time for the haze in his skull to clear, for the static to fade from his limbs.
For a few minutes, he just lay there, getting reacquainted with his injuries, waiting for the world to stop spinning. Beneath him, a carpet of limbs shivered and shook. Avo sniffed. Corpses. He was resting on a pile of corpses.
Below, he felt a constant vibration. Engines screamed overhead, the noise funneled down from the edge of the pit. The sound was near deafening. Around him, the winds coiled and folded, bifurcating past him.
Through blurred eyes, he saw something else fall. It struck nearby, pulping a few of the corpses close to him. His sight cleared enough for him to see what it was: a burning aerovec. Looking up again, he finally noticed the industrial clamps pouring in more bodies and detritus into the great bowl he was laying in.
Where the hells was he? How did he get here?
Again, he looked up into the light. He seemed to be moving, but it could just be dizziness. Blinking, he tried to clear his eyes. Still too far. Didn’t help that his kind were nearsighted by the limits of their biology. Being grown and designed in dark and claustrophobic tunnels by woefully inept creators did that to a ghoul. Still, he had his smell and hearing—enough to give him some bearing on his situation.
There was also the question of why his cog-feed was malfunctioning. And what was this about “resurrection?” His Metamind—a cognition-augmenting smart construct made from the phantasmal matter of ghosts—seemed to be offline again. More importantly, however, resurrecting him was definitely not one of its functions. The phantasmic applications he had engrammed to his Metamind were only meant for interfacing with other minds or the Nether itself.
For him to be resurrected required something on the level of a phylactery at the least. Something that could anchor his being and pour his consciousness into a new-grown vessel without breaking his mind in the process. Being technically considered a piece of property instead of a citizen pushed obtaining a phylactery firmly out of his reach even if he had the imps to make the purchase. His social merit rating just didn’t reach that high.
As he tried to rise again, he heard two heartbeats pulsing above him, coming from just beyond the edge of the pit. Sniffing, he sorted through the various smells and found himself narrowing in on two contrasting musks. One smelled more akin to oil, while the other, alcohol. Both reeked of stale sweat.
“How’s the dig today?” came a phlegm-filled voice. A wet hack followed. Masked by the wailing engines, Avo almost couldn’t hear the slosh of pneumonia coating their lungs.
Another replied. They sounded younger, more nasally and girlish. “Same as yesterday, consang: shit, shit, and fucking shit. Nothing but stiffs and husks.”
The cougher laughed. “Shame about the ghoul, yeah? If it was alive we could have chained him to the wall. Farmed it for easy organs till the tumors took ‘em.”
The girl snorted. “Don’t have strong enough chains for a fucking ghoul, Preed. Go piss off and be a half-strand somewhere else. Busy here. Need to count the bodies.”

“Is that what you’re doing?”

“I need to pretend to count the bodies so I can lie to the boss later.”

“Sounds better.”

“Fuck off.”
He heard footsteps as they walked away. They were speaking somewhere outside the depression he was trapped in. More bodies piled down next to him. All of them were enwreathed in dissipating particulates, black motes accelerating the process of rot. Avo tilted his head at the sight and watched the shroud of darkness spread.
Strangely, they avoided him, as if his person alone was exempted from the touch of entropy.
Mentally, Avo tried to activate his Metamind. At his command, a ripple should have bloomed out from his mind in five sequences and the ghosts that formed the outer accretion of the halo would mask his surface thoughts with phantasmal matter. Yet, nothing came. His cog-feed showed no indication of booting. Not even a misfire of emotion from a badly sequenced chain of ghosts.
Something was wrong. He definitely “saw” running lines of cog-data flashing behind his eyes earlier. Something about his ontology and thaumic mass. The frustration mounted inside him. Ghosts didn’t just fail to activate. They were animated pieces of intellect bound to his will. It wasn’t like they could break like machines. They could fragment. Shattering into individual parts and pieces, but then the cog-fed shouldn’t have come on at all earlier.
Dread lodged itself deep in Avo’s mind just as a migraine overwhelmed his senses. All indications pointed to his Metamind being damaged or compromised in some form. Had he been ambushed in the real? Had his Nether-Alt been compromised? Seeing as he was laying in a pit of corpses, the evidence dragged him toward that dreaded likelihood that his identity had been discovered.
This led to other questions. Who and how?
Avo thought back to the last thing he could remember.
He had been finishing out a dive for Nine-Fox, smuggling pay data across a Guild checkpoint in the Nether. It was a milk run. The imps were due to be wired over to him in a few days. And then…
And then he couldn’t remember anything. How long had it been since he did his dive? And how did he get from there down to wherever this was?
No answers came to him. Not good, but he forced himself to accept reality. He was in a pit of corpses, probably far, far away from home, crippled by countless wounds. Avo grunted. As it goes. There was nothing he could do about the past. For now, he did what Walton had trained him to do: solve the problems he could first.
Ignoring the twisting pain inside him, he forced himself up against the rusted hull of the aerovec. The diamond-shaped vehicle was aged, gray paint mottling off its chassis as the black motes sheared its exterior away. Leaning himself against its frame, he took inventory of his injuries and fought through another wave of rising dizziness.
His translucent skin seemed to gleam in the gloam of darkness. Overhead, the slit of light darkened. Another dozen or so bodies rained down as a clamp opened up. How far up was it? Looking high, he tried gauging the jump to the ledge. Ten feet? Twenty maybe?
His night vision was something he got as a package with nearsightedness. With these attributes combined, he could see just well enough in the dark to perceive everything in a twenty-foot radius. Past that, he could sometimes guess when something was moving by the patterns of the blurs. If he could get his Metamind online and his cog-feed working again, there was an option to directly feed visual data around him into his mind, thus cutting his worthless eyes out of the equation.
That would alleviate some of his problems at the least.
His left arm throbbed, the familiar static of a phantom limb. Frowning in annoyance, he looked down and found only a budding nub growing from his shoulder. The pain was bone-gnawing. Like someone had ground his arm down to the socket with a power saw.
The rest of his body wasn’t much better. The columns of his vertebrae were slowly clicking back together as his blood cells nudged them back in place. It felt as if they had been hammered apart. A cluster of scabs ran to his armpit from his left ribplate. They flared with stabbing pain when he moved. Two incisions ran along his lower back. Something felt missing inside him. Avo directed his blood to do a count of what four primary organs his body needed.
Something was missing. Avo sighed. “They” took his kidneys. Whoever “they” were this time.
Aside from his brain and the haemophage cortex attached to it, his kidneys were the only organs his blood couldn’t mimic in function. Little wonder why he was feeling so sick. Toxins were probably poisoning his cells by the second.
Straining his metabolism further, he felt his insides spasm as his kidneys started regrowing as well.
Kidneys were one of the few things a self-employed ghoul could sell on a bi-weekly basis for imps. That being said, he never sold both of them at the same time. It was one of the few things that were always in demand in the Warrens. Ghoul organs were cheap and had a near-hundred percent acceptance rate even without bio-culturing after they sterilized the blood cells. Shame he couldn’t grow the organs faster without risking tumors. Could’ve sold them for easy imps.
Usually, organ farmers were more professional about it. He usually sold one every few weeks for the imps. It wasn’t much, but it blunted his living expenses and prevented the downgrading of his citizenship.
His legs were a mangle of oozing flaps. A few thick ropes of outer muscle had detached from his bone, jutting out from the clefts of his wounds. He ordered his blood cells down into his legs as well. Beneath his skin, his intact muscles twitched and tightened across him in layered eel-like strands. Considering their density, it would have taken substantial harm to have hewed him apart so deeply. It would have taken something like a mono-blade judging from his wounds.
More evidence that he had been tortured. Now that was a strange thing for him not to remember. Maybe they had edited his memories afterward. But why not just kill him then? Or harvest him for his ghost? More questions. No answers.
He could feel his hunger growing though. Just a byproduct of his cellular regeneration.
The nub on his arm sprouted lattices of self-mending tissue. Within, blood bubbled together to reconstitute the biomass that was lost. His hunger became a roar as his metabolism kicked into overdrive, his haemophage cortex burning through his recent intake to replace his spent cells.
By instinct and thought, his blood flowed. Their synaptic receptors allowed for direct correspondence with his mind. There weren’t many benefits to being a ghoul, but possessing synchro-sapient, self-propelling blood cells in the place of tertiary organs cost less than paying for medical insurance or maintaining the license to a Guild-owned nano-suite. At least until they started forming tumors inside him. Cancer treatments usually put a dent in his accounts.
Another burning spike of hunger radiated out from his gut as he felt his body slowly come back together. His senses sharpened. The air stank of rot and cold metal. He heard another thumping heartbeat pulsing nearby along with the other two. This one’s scent was sweetness clashing with sweat. They were further away than the others, though. Even less likely to notice him.
Onto more pressing concerns then: he wasn’t sure if he could make the climb upward in his current state. Two budding organs twitched inside him. His left arm extended itself, growing at a pace of inches per minute.
A sudden wave of fatigue washed through him. He needed to eat. Or he was going to starve.
Something splashed down behind him, ringing off the hood of the aerovec. A splatter of hot fluid dotted his hairless pate. Bouncing off the eroding chassis of the already rusted aerovec, the decapitated head of some woman rolled next to him, her face frozen in a death-rictus. Her blood-red lipstick stood out from the pale green sheen of her modded skin. The dissonant smile carved along her jowl did nothing to hide the horror lingering in her eyeless sockets.
A crude gang sigil was burned over her right eye. It resembled a rose that grew down into a lance at the roots. Avo remembered seeing that sign somewhere. Maybe he did a dive for the gang once. Reflexively, he tried summoning his Metamind again to call up its eidetic memory stores.
Nothing.
It didn’t respond. This time, he didn’t care, as he was too busy gnawing the skull clean of meat. She proved to be crunchier than he expected, but seeing as the head was the only thing that wasn’t rotten down in the pit, he wasn’t going to complain. He needed biomass to burn. She would suffice for now.
Mustering his strength, he staggered to his feet. Soon, after healing enough, the itching would begin.
Squinting up at the ledge again, he gauged the distance between him and the edge again. When his legs weren’t so mangled, he stood a bit over seven and a half feet. If he could fight through the pain, he could probably leap another six. Not enough.
He considered his options. Perhaps he could pile the mound of bodies into a corner? No. Too few, and they were dissolving too quickly around him. With the brittle corpses beneath already pulping and snapping beneath his weight, they wouldn’t hold. He would just sink into them, making pulp of their remains.
His eyes came to halt on the aerovec again. Avo tilted his head. It looked about twenty feet long. He grinned. It still looked solid enough to be workable.
Digging his claws into its weakened frame, he pulled up and pushed. His muscles coiled and sprung across his body, the taut strands on fire like twitching whips. A ton of metal, glass, and electronics toppled over a carpet of bodies with a squelch. Avo ignored the squishing beneath his digitigrade claws as he limped forward and repeated the action. The aerovec flipped again. More bodies came apart beneath the vehicle’s weight. He listened for the heartbeats of those above carefully. If he heard them, he'd go back to playing dead.
Considering how they were talking earlier, he doubted them to be friendly. Not that anyone particularly liked ghouls in this city.
The missing arm made shouldering the aerovec against the walls a struggle. Halfway through, something soft bounced off his chest through the cracked windshields.
He ignored it. Carefully, he braced the weight of the vehicle against himself, shrugging it higher and higher until he lodged it against a clump of bodies.
Looking down, he noticed what had struck him. A stuffed animal. Some kind of nu-dog that had the stock canine features, but with added spines along its back. A tinge of men’s cologne wafted from the toy.
Squeezing it, a holograph flickered from its center and began to play. The form of a human toddler manifested. She wore a synth-dress and had an orange bowl cut. He noted that her eyes were likely implants by the unnatural way they shone. Regardless, the holograph just looped her giggling and dancing.
Under the foot of the plushie, he found the name “Edda” signed like a chicken scratch. Written by a child’s hand, no doubt.
Beneath it, another line of writing followed. It was far more legible. “Daddy misses you every day.”
Mentally, he tried to scan the toy and see if his Cipher engram could trace anything else from the object's history. Nothing happened. Disappointment followed. Right. No Metamind. No phantasmic engrams. No functions.
He needed to see an Agnos if he managed to make it out of this. See if his Metamind was missing, out of power, or just fragged. More than what happened to him or who tortured him, he wanted to know what was going on with his smart construct. It was the last thing he inherited from his adopted father, Walton. He couldn’t accept it being broken. Wouldn’t accept it. He would get it working again, whatever the cost.
Inside, the beast growled in pleasure. Already, it was whispering to him to track the heartbeats. To climb out from this pit and sample some flesh. Avo sighed. Another problem to face without the Metamind. No Morality Module to suppress his psychopathy.
Shaking the tightness from his body, he listened for a moment. No footsteps. The heartbeats seemed to hold in place. Whoever the others were, they weren’t moving about. Slowly, he clambered onto the aerovec. It slid with each shift of weight. Its frame bent as he climbed. He felt it peeling off the wall with a screech.
Halfway between the pilot’s seat and the ledge, he leaped and caught himself with one hand. The claws on his feet buried into the wall as he cleaved his way up. As he crested his first threshold to freedom, he looked over the horizon.
His blood froze. Cold terror rose within him.
He was on a slow moving barge with four industrial grabbers. Over a nigh-endless chasm of trash and bodies, the ship sailed on currents of anomalous wind. As far as he could see, the landscape was an expanse of ever dissolving trash and waste. Massive portholes lined a gorge of ebony with an endless tide of sewage pouring free from each opening.
“Hells,” Avo muttered. Realization stabbed into him like a stake.
The dissolving motes he saw clinging to the bodies. The fact that he was in a barge filled with corpses. The narrow chasm of light that shone down upon him.
This was the Maw.
He had fallen farther down than he ever thought he could. Onward, the canyon sprawled out across the outer rings of New Vultun like a snaking labyrinth. He must’ve gotten picked out of the endless wastes below by the scavenger barge.
But how did he end up in the Maw in the first–
A heartbeat skipped a pulse close behind him. Avo spun, catching sight of a bald, fair-skinned girl. Floating gang hap-tats flickered across her face, playing an animated clash between a warg and a nu-bear. Her forehead was specially reserved for holo-ads selling a new type of chem for the dose-chasers. She towered far above him on a spreading walkway that went from bow to stern. A half-eaten sandwich tumbled from her hands, and bounced off the controls of her rig, mashed juice-beetles spilling through the grates at her feet.
Seated at the heart of a cheap industrial rig, she piloted the amplifier suit more than she wore it. Exposed metal ribs projected HUD overlays across her face. A cord ran from the inner spine of the rig into the back of her skull, neurally lacing mind to machine. From her spine emerged three different limbs. One for manipulation. One for drilling. One for scanning. Her legs spilled out four crab-like appendages.
For a beat, they just stared at each other. The corpse-barge poured more trash into the pit he just crawled out of. The girl twitched, blood draining from her face. Behind one of her control panels, he thought he caught sight of a holstered pistol‌. She looked at it as well.
Avo held up a slow hand. “Wait–”
One of her hands snapped out, groping wildly for the gun. He turned on instinct, unsure where to run. If he went right he’d get sucked through the six aero-engines. If the funneling winds didn’t denude his corpse, then he’d get to enjoy dying in the Maw below. He wondered what it would be like to be swallowed by tides of concentrated entropy. More than that, he wondered why the motes avoided him earlier. Toward the stern, he saw two more figures piloting their rigs toward him.
Not good. He spun. A burst of gunfire roared. Three-rounds. Hard impacts slammed against his shoulder, breaking skin but crumpling against the thickness of his layered muscle. It felt like being stung by a mantis-wasp. Still, he growled in pleasure, the beast slowly seizing hold of him.
They didn’t have enough firepower to kill him. How unfortunate for them.
Avo stumbled and winced. The girl’s hand was shaking wildly, her eyes looked bloodshot. No way she could have made the shot unassisted. Smart-gun. Faintly, he could feel the faint presence of a whispering ghost rippling from the gun. Cheap ghosts could make anything a smart-gun these days.
Metal limbs hammered down against ringing grates from behind. Ahead, the girl tugged the trigger again. A single shot rang out. The gun’s barrel burst. The bullet broke against his sternum, sending him staggering backward. Shaking his head, he saw the dolloping slag of the overheated weapon.
Bad piece of hardware. Must’ve been a cheap quick-fabbed piece of kit. Unfortunate.
Inside his chest, he felt his blood surge, and his senses sharpen. He could hear her heartbeat, her quick, hyperventilating gasps coming from her. Closer, he identified her sweet scent as a cheap perfume, making her smell like peaches despite the sweat she earned from her toil.
Desperately, she worked to fix her gun. Painfully, he fought the urge to tear her apart, to eat her.
Rationally, he knew he couldn’t blame her. He would have done the same in her place. Ghouls were dangerous. Ghouls were monsters. Ghouls were all the things the topsiders said and more. He cannibalized more than his share of other monsters to know that. But knowing wasn’t the same as feeling, and without his Metamind, his Morality Module wasn’t flooding his mind with the right emotions to suppress him.
That meant he wasn’t getting doses of suppressive emotion. Injections of humanity. For the first time in years, his bestial nature rose unchecked. His want for violence grew closer to a need.
He ran his tongue across his fangs. He flexed the claws of his right arm.
On mending legs, he made for her. Behind, her cohorts approached. They wouldn’t be fast enough. Right now, the only person that could save her from him was him.
For the first time in years, Avo faced the beast without the aid of his Metamind or adopted father. He didn’t know if he was strong enough to prevail.
I told you this would happen. The only laughable thing about this is how much you fucking gerents are surprised. Seems like immortality doesn’t prevent senility. You want an explanation?
Fine.
I’ll give you three. Apathy. Bitterness. Fatalism. What else do the FATELESS in the Warrens got? The entire sectors of the city are still no-go zones affected by countless Ruptures. This was something we pledged to fix immediately.
It’s been eighteen years!
They own nothing and rent everything from the Guilds, meaning that they functionally have no concrete value in the market. No freedom. Education is free, but considering the Undercroft is already ten billion lives over capacity, they won’t be making it up even if there were geniuses among them! They can’t even have any physical intimacy, for Jaus’ sake. Forget sex, a godsdamned kiss on the cheek will cause an outbreak of the rash. Then, they get to watch their block get glassed.
You know what, the hells with this. I resign. Fuck each and every one of you! I signed up with Ori-Thaum to serve a republic, to see that everyone is represented and supported. “Unity is Destiny?” My ass. We broke their homes and our promises. We’re goddamn bastards. Same as Highflame. Same as Voidwatch. Same as the No-Dragons and all the other “great” Guilds.
The next time you ask why the Warrens are filled with organ-smugglers, joy-fiends, gangers, snuffers, and scavengers, think to yourself how much they’re worth to us alive versus how much their Essence can fuel our Souls when dead.
We’re running on a necro-economy. And they know. They know but they can’t do anything about it.
There’s no difference between us and the gluttonous gods that used to rule us.
I quit. I quit. I quit.
-Chief Admin Revo I’Kurita’s “resignation” speech to the Court of Elders of Ori-Thaum
1-2
Scavengers
The girl was still fiddling with her broken gun when Avo pulled himself up the walkway. Scaffolded over the dozen or so scavenging pits built deep into the keel of the barge, the rusted railings of the crudely festooned walkways spilled across the top of the ship, its loosened bolts rattling to the breath of the wind. Encompassing two pits a row, all of the walkways were interconnected, segmenting the top of the ship into cubes until it finally trailed off at the prow, with holo-haptic interfaces for the industrial cranes lighting each intersection as a milestone, neon embers amidst the murk of the Maw.
Behind, Avo heard heavy metal limbs hammered against the grating and two other rising heart rates as he closed on Hap-Tat—a moniker he granted to the girl that shot him. He peeled her face from his mind–the act coming easily from his years of practice diving in the Nether. Dehumanizing the opposition into something akin to an object was common practice among most Necrojacks. Most in his profession did it to avoid traumatizing themselves when jacking into the memories of their victims. Avo was taught to do it because hurting people fed pleasure to his cruelty. An equally bad habit, considering he had a habit of fragging apart more of their minds than he needed to.
Avo loped in on all fours, his movements between a dash and a stagger. His muscles, though sore, felt functional. Down the narrow path, Hap-Tat's face quavered in the projected glow of her rig. Scintillating glints reflected off the piercings that dotted her right cheek like constellations. Her heart roared like rising war drums in his ears, spurring him onward. Desperately, she chucked the broken gun at him. He caught it, and, just as her rig’s drill whirred to life, he cast it back at her. Lagging, the drill lanced out too late to block the gun. It cracked against one of her HUD projection ribs, making Hap-Tat flinch. Her eyes snapped shut.
An unwise thing to do when a ghoul was close by.
Three-hundred and fifty pounds of ghoul slammed against a ton of rusted metal. The more rusted pieces of plasteel on her rig groaned and cracked on impact. Her response was sloppy. Unfocused. She flailed at him, mechanical arms snapping out, clamping only air as he slipped low. Ramshackle her rig might be, a glancing blow from it would be crippling. It was meant for scavenging; menial labor, not combat, but Avo knew what a fusion drill could do. At its highest intensity settings, it could strip titanium. Hard as the Low Masters made him in comparison to a flat, titanium he was not.
Put simply, if she plugged him with that drill, his flesh would do more than strip; his insides would spill.
On his side were momentum and agility. He smuggled himself under her left and drove into her at an angle. The rig toppled back, breaking the crane interface she was operating. Staggering, her rig’s crab-like legs gripped the walkway tight, trying to keep itself upright. Metal groaned. Servos wailed. He struck her again. This time, he lashed his remaining arm through the projection ribs, feeling a spine-shivering delight as his claws unzipped sinew and skidded off her bones. She screamed. He pressed. In the back of his head, he kept track of the other two heartbeats. They were approaching from the next pit over, their rigs clanking on at a leaden pace, coming at him from perpendicular paths. He needed to finish Hap-Tat now.
A mechanical whine sounded from above him as the articulated limb bearing her drill descended. On instinct, Avo twisted out of the way. Barely. A line of pain flared along his spine, The drill sliced a shallow avenue of pain down his back. Avo snarled. His thoughts slipped from him. The beast inside him took hold.
As the drill shot past him and punched through the grating beneath them, he wrenched the flat flaps of her projectors from their sparking joints, hoping to get at the screaming meat behind. A weak fist bounced off his jaw, showing him just how unaugmented she was. He responded by clamping his hand around her head and squeezing. Her skull felt so small between his claws. Like an oversized egg. In his grip, bone succumbed, fracturing. Her voice greeted him with a muffled cry, growing to choked screams as he clenched tighter.
“Mine, “ Avo hissed. With a vicious yank, he drew her halfway out of the rig. Her arms and legs snapped at the sockets. She cried out. Avo chuffed in annoyance. If she thought dislocations were bad, she should try losing an arm.
A choking wheeze filled her lungs. The other two were close now. Their heartbeats told him they were closing. Fifteen feet. Maybe less. He didn’t care. Hap-Tat’s safety harness clung tight to her torso and fought him. He’d deal with that later. Instead, he went for the metallic cord slotted to the datajack on the back of her head. Unhinging his jaw, he brought his fangs down on the cord. Plastic, metal, and micro-tech came apart in his mouth. With the connection severed, her rig went slack, its frame toppling against the bending rails. Spitting pieces of broken cord, Avo slashed through the harness and pulled his prize free. Hap-Tat weighed akin to a feather in his hand. In the darkness, he saw the tears rolling from her eyes, and heard the pleas spilling from her lips. Her heart was tearing itself apart from her at the pace it was beating. Avo grinned.
It was a pleasure to hurt and it would be a delight to feed. Saliva dripped from his mouth.
The arrival of the other two rigs broke his trance. As the beast looked away from its prey, the shifting of focus allowed the rational remnants of Avo to resume control. Blinking, he let out a hissing breath as he worked his excitement under control. He had gone too long without his Metamind suppressing the beast. Glaring at his two new adversaries, he did his best to ignore the writhing meat–enemy. The writhing enemy in his clutches.
He cast his glare upon the new arrivals standing ten feet away. A beat passed. No one moved. Hap-Tat whimpered. Avo wrestled himself. He didn’t need to drink from the sweet that was her blood. He didn’t need to take a sampling nibble from her adrenaline-bittered flesh…
“Please,” she whimpered, the circuitry of her haptic-tattoos malfunctioning. Error codes spilled over her forehead. Something had broken beneath her skin when he was crushing her skull earlier. “Please, I–I just got a…a nu-dog.”
He ate a cloned nu-dog before. Not nearly as good as humans. But that was by design. Ghouls were made to prey on humans. Baseliners. Flats like her. Nothing buzzed a ghoul's brain quite like human flesh. Just as nothing was quite as euphoric to them as violence. The weight of his impulses was heavier than the aerovec, heavier than the rig. Still, Avo fought it. He had to.
It's what Walton taught him to do.
“The beast has to win sometimes,” Walton had told him after catching him gorging on an aratnid nest. “Surrendering is human. But choice? Choice is divine. Fighting your body might just lead to failure. But mastering it, and choosing when to give in to it gives you choices. It’s not about repression. It’s about expression. Expression of free will against yourself. I think there’s true freedom to be found there.”
Avo snarled. Hap-Tat shuddered and clamped her eyes shut, unwilling to face the end. Instinct warred against rationality. Reason won. Barely. Closing his jaws with a repressed grunt, Avo considered the next best use for her.
Lifting Hap-Tat past the rails and dangling her over the pit, Avo turned to face the other two problems that he had yet to solve. They wore rigs bearing much of the same make and quality as Hap-Tats. They faced him, their heartbeats high with tension, their breaths misting the air thick in nervous respiration.
Avo sighed. Since he wasn’t trying to eat anyone presently, he might as well negotiate. Bargain. He had no idea where he was or how he was going to get back home. Not without his Metamind working anyhow. He’d leverage what he could from them for a start. See if they could get him back up to the surface. Or at least to the Warrens. Getting left here was a death sentence. Hells, it already had been if he wasn’t hallucinating about being resurrected earlier.
“Oh, gods, oh Jaus don’t let me die,” Hap-Tat muttered.
Avo frowned at her. Her lip quivered. “Speak. Speak to them,” he said.
She blinked. “You can talk?”
He shook her in the direction of her cohorts. “Speak. To. Them.”
“Fuck! Alright! Fuck!” She opened her mouth. What followed was nothing but silence while she did her best impression of a dead fish. Frustration bubbled inside him. He shook her like she was a defective toy, her broken limbs bouncing limply. “Fucking! What do you want me to say?”
Avo gritted his fangs. He hated this. He hated talking to people, interacting with them, trying to tell them what to do. Ghosts were so much simpler. Attached to his will, they just obeyed. If he still had his Metamind along with his engrams, he could just snatch the information he needed from her mind using his ghosts. He could have put her to sleep with a thought seeing that she lacked a Metamind of her own or any functional cognitive wards for that matter. Physical threats were so impractical in comparison.
“Location: which district are we close to? Ship name. Which Guild owns the ship? Get the captain. Want to talk to them. Need to borrow your ship’s locus. Make a call.”
The other two stared at him like ravens watching an owl. He studied them again and through narrowed eyes noticed the white stripes painted along the ribs of their rigs. A note of seniority perhaps. It was something that Hap-Tat didn’t have on her now disabled rig.
Hap-Tat continued to not speak. Avo glared. She withered beneath his gaze. “Which…which questions do you want me to ask first?”
He loosed his grip slightly. She began to slide.
“Fuck! Alright! Fuck! Godsdamned!”
She waved at her cohorts. “We’re at…we’re at…what’s the nearest dock?”
The other two didn’t say anything. One of them shuffled an inch backward. The other held firm, remaining in place. The one that didn’t move had a face covered in a mess of burns and budding tumors sealed in place by transparent implants. Avo decided this one was to be named Tumor Face.
Silencing Hap-Tat with a glare, Tumor Face spat. Turning her rig, she leaned out and sneered at her fellow officer. Whatever they were. “And you said this welp was nova at the gig?”
The other scavenger had green optical implants. Green Eyes. Avo kept things simple. Reduced them from being people. Make them like artificials in a Nether-Sim. Took the fun out of killing them. Somewhat.
Green Eyes’ glared at Avo, his expression like granite. “She’s got a good eye. Good at sorting trash. Not her fault we have a rotlick for a stowaway. Took her by surprise."
Tumor Face laughed with a nasally wheeze. “She let it tear her out from her rig, she did. Ain’t that some shit. If it were me I’d–”

“For Jaus sake, help me!” cried Hap-Tat.
Tumor Face waved her off. “Oh, relax, consang. It didn’t eat you, so it wants you alive.” For the first time, she sized Avo up. “Weird rotlick we got here. Calm too. Ain’t right.” Her eyes narrowed. “Hey, Kald?”

“Yeah?” Green Eyes said. Avo considered changing the name over to Kald, but decided against it. Would make the man too human in his eyes; too appealing to hurt.
“Wasn’t this the one you got the kidneys from earlier?”
Oh. Well, that explained who stole his kidneys. It was getting harder to not kill them now.
“Yeah.”
“Didn’t you say it was dead?”
“Yeah."
She made a vulgar gesture at him with her rig’s manipulator arm. “Does it look dead to you?”
“It was when I found it. Didn’t even move when the boss threw one of them refugees down the pit,” he chuckled. “Splattered all over him, she did.”
That explained why there was a corpse on him when he…resurrected. Another word caught his attention. Refugee. Shooting a glance down the side of the barge, he did his best to gauge its size. It had to be pretty large to have the twelve or so pits reserved for scavenging. Might be half a mile long. From where he stood, he couldn’t gauge how deep it was, but he guessed this vessel had to have a crew of three hundred at the least. So where were they? All he saw were three scavengers and no more. He supposed they were just here to sort for valuable finds while the ship did most of the harvesting. Still, he wondered where the drones were. The golems. Maw-diving ships were machine operated most of the time.
If this ship was primarily meant for people into New Vultun, however, then that made things different. That meant the bulk of its profits were below deck, in the form of the FATELESS–unsponsored refugees. People without the protection of the Guilds. There was plenty of currency to be made forcing them into easy labor, or converting them to back-alley organ farms. Even killing them, pawning their Essences off to local megablocks, or selling their ghosts could net a profit if there were enough of them. From what Avo could judge, this meant the bulk of the ship’s personnel and resources were below deck.
And suddenly, another switch flipped in his head. Walton’s ethics were always a bit…looser when it came to criminals, thugs, and tyrants. The first chains of his will began to buckle beneath the urges of the beast.
“How many?” Avo asked.
Tumor Face froze. “Jaus.” She said as if noticing him for the first time. She clearly hadn't been listening to him earlier. “Rotlick-fuck speaks too. Next, it’ll be doing math.”
“It’s already doing math,” Green Eyes deadpanned, “asking us how many toils we got.”
Toils. Another term for FATELESS refugees. Avo shot a look at Hap-Tat. She looked back and swallowed.
“Thousand,” Hap-Tat blurted. Across the walkways, her cohorts scoffed and mocked her weakness. “Less now. We’re sorry we threw one on you. The…the toil tried to run. She tried to break out!”
“Boss is going to black-haul the shit outta you for letting the rotlick get you, juvie,” Tumor Face said, laughing. "Moreso for being a lack."
More of the situation was revealed. The corpse splattered across him in the pit was a refugee. Their death preluded his resurrection by seconds. They had murdered someone who just wanted their freedom who was trying to escape. An alignment between his rational mind and the beast within was reached. He had a reason for violence now. When his bloodthirst began to rise again, he didn’t fight it. Not this time. This was a slave ship. Walton hated slavers. Took special care to break their minds. Even used some of them as practice during Avo’s education. The concept of choice and free will had been sacred to his adopted father, and to honor the man, it would’ve been ethically wrong for him not to kill these people.
He looked at Hap-Tat and ran his tongue across his fangs. The adrenaline was still rushing through her. If this went fast enough, bitter would still be in her flesh when he got to eating her.
“Thank you,” Avo said, letting out a relieved breath.
“What?” Hap-Tat asked.
Green Eyes titled his head.
Tumor Face frowned. “The fuck? Thank you?” She laughed, more confused than amused. “Why…why thank you?”
“Needed a reason,” Avo said.
“A reason?” Tumor Face asked.
Avo didn’t reply instead, he pulled Hap-Tat away from the edge and pulled her in front of him. She went still. Her eyes widened. Looking past her shoulder, he saw the other two scavengers, just watching, waiting for him to react.
She wasn’t that heavy. Tumor Face wasn’t that far. He could make the throw.
“You–you gonna let me go?” Hap-Tat whispered.
“Yeah,” Avo said, his grin spreading all the way to his ear-nubs. Technically, he wasn't lying.
She whimpered and let out a breath. “Oh, thank–”
Every strand of muscle across his body exploded with motion. With a primal snarl, he launched the girl from his grasp like a javelin. The sight of her sailing away, choking on her own screams was joyous to behold. Like a spear molded from the softness of flesh and unlaced bone, she broke against Tumor Face’s rig with a satisfying splat, ribs cracking, a lung popping.
Tumor Face stumbled back in surprise. Pure reflex made her shrug the mangled body of Hap-Tat over the railing. Green Eyes, the most focused of the three, stomped forward. Slow as he was, Avo felt an aura of danger about him. This one was good at mastering their fear and going forward. Part of Avo respected that. The rest wanted to know if the man would taste any different.

The thrumming vibration beneath Avo’s feet called his attention. Hap-Tat's drill. Climbing over Hap-Tat’s disabled rig, he found the drill dangling through a wound made in the melted grating. It had been left running when he severed the connection. Poor safety protocols, but useful for him. A feral smile spread across his face, his fangs barring from ear to ear. Hiding behind the rig, he listened for Green Eyes’ approach as he took hold of the drill’s connective articulations. Taking it in his hand he waited for the right moment to drop down onto the hull itself.
He intended to drive his new weapon into Green Eyes from below.
Somewhere behind Green Eyes, Tumor Face roared as she began stomping over. “Rotlicking half-strand fuck!”
The walkway creaked as Green Eyes approached. A bolt popped. Avo jumped, disappearing over the side just in time for his newest victim to smash past Hap-Tat’s disabled rig. Landing, Avo ignored the lancing pain traveling up his legs and limped below where Green Eyes was standing. Looking up, Avo saw the confusion splashed across Green Eyes’ face. His projectors were detecting nothing. Poor fool was looking in the wrong direction.
“Kald! Below!"
Tumor Face’s warning came far too late. Avo leaped, driving the drill up through the grating and into the underside of Green Eyes’ rig, feeling as it chewed through metal and meat. The wafting taste of exposed organs greeted Avo. Green Eyes screamed. Blood spilled. Avo opened his jaws wide and fed on the deluge running down from above. The drill spun twice more in the scavenger’s abdomen before fizzling and dying. Disappointing.
Green Eyes' fat boiled and popped between the edges of his wounds. Blood foamed in his mouth. He barely had time to struggle with the drill before Avo pulled back hard. Ghoul-muscle battled the unmaintained machine servos of his rig. Green Eyes’ body bore the burden of defeat. Bone snapping, flesh flaying, he came free from between the ribs in a welter of gore, his datajack snapping loose from the back of his skull. He landed nothing more than a brutalized pulp against the grating, his last breath a sobbing whimper. With a final violent tug, Avo drew his prize down through the gap he made in the walkway using the now useless drill.
Above, another rig-toppled, pilotless. Tumor Face stomped forward far too late, a wail of absolute despair tearing free from her throat. Avo didn’t hear it. He was too busy gorging himself on good meat. The man tasted divine; the sweetness of his lingering diabetes only added flavor. As he fed, however, Avo sensed something else. Something entirely different. He felt it more than he tasted it, but it was coming free from the corpse all the same. An unseen ripple–no, an echo poured into him. Impossibly, Avo heard Green Eyes whispering in the back of his mind, chanting muted prayers to a god unseen.
Suddenly, Avo felt himself ignite in an incandescent burst. The world expanded around him. Existence shivered momentarily. He saw himself as a chasm between a shroud of primordial fire, a world between him and where he was right now. His mind spun. His body felt hollow and heavy at the same time. It was as if he was both a conduit and an anchor at the same time. The moment passed as fast as it came. Suddenly, he was back in his own skin like nothing happened.
Then, data lines from his cog-feed flashed behind his perception, its system booting. A ghost-glitch? Didn't matter, the Metamind was working! A ripple of phantasmal matter bloomed out and expanded into a five-ringed halo. A paltry wisp of a ghost spilled out from the center and swirled into a thin spread along the outer accretion of his mind, unshaped and unsequenced. Avo laughed with genuine joy.
His Metamind working again, he awaited to hear the voice of Walton greet–
SOUL ONLINE
IGNITING THAUMIC CYCLER - 2 THAUM/c
THAUMIC CYCLER ONLINE...
METAMIND ONLINE - [1] GHOST ACTIVE
[0] PHANTASMICS ENGRAMMED
WARNING: INSUFFICIENT THAUMIC MASS
UNABLE TO MANIFEST LIMINAL FRAME
[0] HEAVENS GRAFTED
[1] HELLS GRAFTED: (FIRST CIRCLE)
Even as the world around Avo came alight with new color and clarity, he frowned. The single ghost he just claimed was already fine-tuning his perception, feeding his mind with visual data to counter his nearsightedness. In the narrow lane far above the Maw where the lights of the city spilled in, Avo sensed the countless sequences of ghosts spreading across the entirety of New Vultun in a grand skein beyond the surface of existence. Avo didn't have enough ghosts to reach it yet, but he could hear the Nether calling to him.
He ignored it.
This wasn’t his Metamind. It didn’t sound like Walton. It didn’t have any of his engrams. It sounded like him. How could it sound like him? He never had his mind cloned–
A howl of rage interrupted his thoughts. “Rotlick!” Tumor Face leaped over a railing and dented the ground in a rough landing. He noticed the thin wisp that was her ghost oozing out surface thoughts from the center of her mind. Her emotions bled angry clumps of thoughtstuff as she made for him. Yet, as she approached, he found himself wondering why there seemed to be a rippling echo inside her core as well.
ESSENCE DETECTED - [1]
The words flashed in his mind and were spoken to him through a voice copied from his own. Essence? Avo frowned. Souls burned Essence to make thaums. Why was this Metamind detecting Essence? Why was it telling him it had a Soul online? He wasn't anywhere near a megablock right now. He couldn't be linked to any of the reactors.
Tumor Face thundered close, her shadow creeping over him as he shook off his new questions. If she didn't snuff him, he could take his time to figure out what his situation was after. Mull it over with the meal that was her corpse. Right now, he was still starving and found the hunger in him ran deeper than before.
Letting the beast inside him slip the leash once more, he met his new prey mid-charge, seeking more than mere meat.
FATELESS: An unregistered civilian; an individual who has yet to earn Guild sponsorship via merit or lottery.
FATE: A metaphysical system in the NETHER used by the Guilds for tracking and indexing citizens.
-The New Vultun Standard Dictionary
1-3
FATELESS
Tumor Face tried her best. Her best wasn’t enough. Avo empathized.
With a surplus of rage and a scarcity of capability, she came at him, the bulk of her rig hammering the ground like she was heavy cavalry from a historical memory-sim. Blind with aggression, she thrust herself into the jaws of the beast. What little of him was capable of emulating the human emotion of respect commended her.
The bulk of his mind, still riding high on bloodlust, set itself upon the task of her exsanguination. In his hand, a last gouged pap of flesh claimed from the remains of Green Eyes dribbled as she came. Avo squeezed it. Blood ran through the crenulations of his claws. It would do.
With a mental command, Avo tried engaging his trajectory calculator. A flashing “null” response in the back of his mind reminded him he had one ghost and no phantasmic engrams. He would have to do this manually.
The alloyed appendages of her rig reared as she approached. Just in time to catch a splatter of gore across her projection ribs. Blood dotted her face and blurred her eyes. She swung, three limbs cleaving a mangled gorge through the metal walkway above, severing it halfway through. She would have hewn Avo shoulder to hip if he remained before her. Carried by blindness, anguish, and momentum, her crab-like legs sparked along the metal deck, internal machinery overworked, jamming and hissing. Behind, Avo stalked her like the predator he was designed to be, the scratched grooves her skid marks left in the hull serving as nice grips for his claws even as the barge suddenly descended.
She came to a violent halt after grinding several more feet. They were near the edge now. The flaring engines emanated a corona of unnatural light, casting her in shadow. The rig’s arms slashed out wildly. Avo dove low, between her legs. Tumor Face was still blind, still missing when he tore into her, claws spread, lower jaws unhinging as he prepared to feast.
Her pilot’s harness was a small canopy, just big enough to fit a flat of her size. The rig itself lacked the mass or capability to seal her properly beneath a layer of shielding. Cheap as it was, her life was likely even cheaper. There was plenty of labor to go by in these depths and not much material to support it with. Her life was worth more to the city lost than it was preserved.
Avo tore up into the softness of her belly, a waterfall of red filling his eyes. The scent of intestinal fluid and the taste of rust mingled. He chipped his incisor fangs on laced bones reinforced by cheap titanium and worked on her sinews instead. Through the near-thuds of her heart, he could hear her screams, the sound muffled by the blood filling his ears. He reared back and tore out from her innards, sinew, and gristle between his fangs. He emerged baptized. Invigorated.
Yet, even as a savaged ruin, Tumor Face gasped on, clinging to life as she grasped for him, eyes still burning with hate. Beyond the nest of the projection ribs, the rig was lurching, unable to discern signals from a mind so embroiled by pain and hate. She decided she didn’t need the machine. With a defiant squeal, shrill with outrage and pain, she slammed her skull against his. Avo felt the thud shudder through his bones. Spent, she sank against him and spat strands of blood and disrespect across his cheek.
“Fuckin’...half-strand bastard.” Mustering what little remained in her, she lifted her head and glared at him, staring him down even as she died. She was more a ghoul than he at this point; body broken, mangled, but still fighting; spirit burning on with the embers of hate and loathing; actions purposeful, but futile. He took hold of her by her head.
So close, the phantasmal aura that his cog-feed painted her with had cast her in a holy sheen of light. “Best you could do,” he said. He didn’t know if the comfort was for her, or spoken to his past self, her body an altar, a confessional. All he knew was that this was a torturous truth that bound the both of them. “All you could do.”
She looked at him, hate unfading. Jaws clenched, she didn’t see what he was trying to convey. There was no shared understanding. Perhaps at this moment, the inverse was true: he was more human than she by merit of philosophical gnosis and life better provided for by an adopted father.
The moment passed with the next beat of her heart; the wafting pungence of her exposed innards calling to Avo. He pulled her head back. She tried to reach from the haptic controls projected from one of the ribs. The reach became a spasm as her neck folded between his teeth. His fangs glided through her unaugmented softness with ease.
Flats made for easy feeding.
Her suffering didn’t last. His jaws, wide as a serpent’s, had closed around her neck. Skin and muscle parted. The bite found its halt against her columns of spine. Didn’t matter. He pulled free, a mound of flesh coming with him. Succulent. Her head folded forward. When he finished with her trachea, he continued with her eyes. The eyes were always his favorite.
In the periphery of his awareness, he felt the echo he sensed within her earlier. It poured into him as it did from Green Eyes. Inside, he felt a flash again, like a radiant star bereft of heat. Static interfaces formed and faded in the back of his mind. In the corner of his cog-feed, two lines of information flashed and faded.
THAUMIC CYCLER - 3 thaum/c
GHOSTS - [2]
MEMORY ARTIFACTS DETECTED - INITIATE AUTO-SEQUENCING?
Avo ignored that for now. Necrothurgy took time. Hours and days at the least to sift through all the contents and traumas that could compose a useful phantasmic. Ultimately, sequencing ghosts was both psychological artistry and metaphysical engineering; a practice usually done while the body was unconscious. Despite all his present mental vulnerability, unless existence was willing to loan him eight hours of time to make some wards, he needed to push on without.
He still didn’t fully understand what was happening to him, but right then, he didn’t care. He basked in the joy of the kill, feeling his haemophagic cells breaking down the biomass he just subsumed, converting all that was Tumor Face into material for sustenance and repair.
His blood. The crowning achievement of the Low Masters’ thaumaturgy. A colony self-moving, pseudo-sapient organism unto itself. It ensured that a ghoul fed with maximum efficiency. It also allowed for the infection and conversion of any living creature with enough organic tissue and brain matter.
Ghoulification, people called it. It was how the numbers of his kind swelled from mere dozens to billions in the span of years. It was how they were able to sustain themselves without the need for food or rest for extended periods. Just a shame they were created at a time when the flesh had long since been usurped by alloy and technology.
He finished with the rest of Tumor Faces' corpse in minutes. While feeding, he willed his healing to accelerate as his hunger waned. The worst of the beast had been slaked. Rationality and thought remained.
And so came the feeling of shame.
Looking at the bodies of the two scavengers, it was like a veil lifted, fierce joy replaced by dawning disgust at what he had done. Walton would not have condoned this senseless murder, slavers though they were. That was self-delusion. Their admission of immorality simply gave him justification for violence.
The truth was he just wanted to eat them.
To make matters worse, he had no idea the layout of the barge, and now he was left with–
A heartbeat pulled his attention. Avo heard strained gasps wheezing out from a collapsed lung. Wiping the viscera dangling from his jaws, he found Hap-Tat crawling along the deck of the ship. Her legs were bent at awkward angles, and a trail of blood dripped from the rails she was cast against before she fell.
The memory of tossing her into Green Eyes to knock him off balance returned to him. It seemed so pragmatic then. Now, the act had struck him as pointless. Something merely to satiate his desire to hurt, to maul.
For the first time in years, Avo was glad of his adopted father’s death. Avo had chosen his surrender, as Walton had taught him, but without his Metamind adjusted to inject doses of shame, horror, or revulsion at the psychopathy, he felt like an addict surrendering to old desires
He followed Hap-Tat, unsure of what he was going to do. A series of cracks shuddered through his legs. The mending of his lower body was almost complete. His gait was less stagger and more stride now, claws tinking against the deck with each step.
At the sound of his coming, her heartbeat quickened. She shot a look of terror over her shoulder and whimpered. “No,” she sobbed, “No, Jaus--fuck, please no!” She wiggled her way across the ground, limbs useless, body quivering. A pool of waste spilled out from her. She seemed a mocking mirror to how he had woken in the pit.
He passed her with ease and came to a stop beside her. Her open wounds still smelled delightfully bitter with adrenaline, but he pulled his focus away from that. Flicking his mind through his cog-feed, he tried to scan her for injuries, but nothing came up. The memories he had weren't usable yet; they needed sequencing. For now, all he had was a perception-enhancing overlay and two ghosts of unrefined rawness.
That was going to be a problem. He couldn’t remember a time when his mind didn’t have a metaphysical fortress shielding it from incursions. Not since Walton decided to take him up the first Tier.
Avo looked up at the chasm above him again. The light was mocking him. The skein of the Nether itself was mocking him, far beyond the reach of his two ghosts. This Metamind wasn’t his. Didn’t matter if it was built from a copy of his mind or not. His Metamind was created as an echo of Walton. The last thing he had of Walton. And now it was missing, lost somewhere in the continent-wide expanse of New Vultun.
Trying to hunt a metaphysical construct down would be like picking out an individual air current in a hurricane. Didn’t matter. He would find it, whatever the costs. But first, he had to climb out of the Maw.
A soft sputter came from Hap-Tat again. Right. He was trying to review her wounds. No engram for it. He had to rely on his paltry guesswork and experience, but from how her organs were filling up with fluid, he doubted she had long.
Didn’t mean it, he had wanted to say. He decided against it. He did mean it. Would mean it again when the throes of hunger returned. Biting back a hiss of frustration, he remembered what Walton had told him about using the truth, embracing it even if it hurt.
“I…regret,” Avo said, straining from the effort of this farce. It felt absurd. “That this happened.” It wasn’t an apology. Even now, he wasn’t sorry that he had mortally wounded her, and butchered the other two scavengers. All he was really sorry about was the fact that Walton wouldn’t have approved. That he had failed to master himself; surrendered to the beast at the first chance.
Across the stretch of the barge’s deck, the withering winds of the Maw whistled. Alone, the ghoul faced the girl he was going to kill and continued. “Didn’t want to do this. Hunger…” he trailed off. Hunger was just an impulse. He made the choice. “Everyone chooses. Everyone lies to themselves. Truth is ugly. Truth is I want to hurt you. Truth is I want to eat you. Tried to fight it. I did. I lost.”
Again, he wasn’t sure if this was for her or him. It was always easier for him to speak to the dead. To sort and sequence memories from ghosts, turn them into vessels for him to use. Perhaps it was a thing of power. That he could only express the truth when he couldn’t be hurt.
He saw a tear spill free from her left eye. Along her forehead, the error codes of the implanted ads continued pulsing. “I don’t want to die here…”
He sniffed. He could smell her encroaching death. It was evident in the blood loss. She didn’t have any regenerative implants, biostasis mods, and she definitely didn’t make near enough imps to afford a phylactery to house her consciousness. She was poor. She was weak. She was going to die. And New Vultun would grow all the stronger for it.
“You will,” Avo said. She cried softly at his words. “I’m…sorry.” He considered how to make things better for them. At least a bit. “Debt slaves: the FATELESS. Where are they?”
Through her sobs, she laughed incredulously. “F-fuck you, rotlick.”
“Need to set them free,” Avo said. “Get them out. Make your death mean something.”
Her face froze. She looked at him again. “I don’t…understand.”
He knew how she felt. “Don’t either. Trying to learn still. Want to do the right thing. Help me. Please. Don’t just want you to be just another murder.”
He locked gazes with her. She swallowed. “Hurts,” she whispered. “I’m scared.”
A flash of annoyance rose inside him. This was useless. He should kill her and just– he repressed the urge. He tried to remember how he would feel if he still had a secondhand morality inducer. Shame. Guilt. Horror at killing. Violence was dissonant for humans. Shredded their psychology. He imagined what would shred his sanity.
Hunger. Well. That wasn’t very useful.
“I know,” he said. Awkwardly, he reached down and took her soft hand into his, careful not to flense her with his cleaver-like claws. “Fear. Won’t last. The slaves? Where are they?”
She swallowed. “They’re below. Three levels down in the phase-pens. Signed premium contracts to be smuggled through the borders.” Distance filled her gaze. Peeking at her leg, he wondered how it would taste if he just took one bite. The injuries were deep. He could taste the marrow. He swallowed back his hunger. She was dying slowly, and the taste was delectable.
No. Bad. This was bad. He needed to remember how it felt to regret.
“I dreamed of making it up, you know,” she said, wheezing softly. “Wanted to see the…the Tiers. The real New Vultun. Be happy for once.” For the first time, she laughed. “Kinda fucking figured. I just…” Her lips thinned. “The door on the stern shouldn’t be locked. Look, it hurts real bad but…if you want to eat me…okay. Just don’t turn me. Saw…saw it happen to my…my ma. I can’t…I can’t.”
Avo understood. The haemophage was a twin-edged sword. It subverted as much as it converted. Let it bleed into a living host with a prefrontal lobe and you’d have yourself a nest of ghoullings in minutes.
"Won’t do that,” Avo said. He thought about squeezing her hand, but her bones were soft. Unaugmented. Her heart was beginning to slow. The echo rippling within her coupled with the yolk of her ghost’s surface thoughts called to him. “Want me to kill you now?” He said it as a favor. Her face cracked, breaking into pure anguish and horror at the coming end.
“Oh…oh Jaus,” she sobbed. “Yes. Fuck! Do it, do it before I–”
He pulled free of her hand and took her by the throat. He squeezed like he intended to kill her instead of crushing her skull for torture. Her neck folded between his claws. Her body spasmed as she wheezed a final time, blood welling free from her eyes and mouth.
Without metal, without enhancements, the flesh of a flat was frail. Too frail for this new age. Baseline humanity was marching down the plank of extinction. Avo wondered if the flats were the adversary that the Low Masters had created his kind to face instead of the beings of alloy and fire that actually dwelled above. Clearly, they did not know the enemy.
Hap-Tat’s echo flowed up his arm and sank into the simmering flame inside him. Again, it sparked, carrying no heat, only brightness. A flash of another place manifested around him momentarily. Reality stuttered. His cog-feed lagged and momentarily rebooted. He felt better. Heavier. Like he was the anchor of something alien, something that just didn’t belong here.
It was like he had weight beyond his body–an unseen mass growing and budding like a watered seed.
Avo decided the new sensation would go down better with a helping of flesh.
THAUMIC CYCLER - 4 thaum/c
GHOSTS - [3]
MEMORY ARTIFACTS DETECTED - INITIATE AUTO-SEQUENC–
After he was done, he commanded the Metamind to stop asking him if he wanted an auto-sequence. Auto-sequenced ghosts were terrible. Unoptimized for what he needed. Not to mention it was slower than just doing it himself. His cognition required special designs to enhance. And there was the other thing that kept repeating. Thaumic Cycler. Strange. He had four…thaums? Wait, why did he have thaums inside him? That belonged in a thaumaturgic reactor core–
A loud ethereal call echoed through the ship, washing into his mind and startling him from his contemplation. +Guild specters detected: Exorcists. Three hundred thousand feet and closing. All scavengers, de-rig and proceed below deck. All hands return to central warding chambers and take your depressants. We dive in two.+
They were going down into the Maw to avoid detection. The Guilds really didn’t like scavengers digging around in their sections of the Maw. Avo wasn’t fully sure why, but he stopped thinking of the Guilds as logical institutions long ago. All he knew now was that if he didn’t get below deck, he would be alone up here as the lightless depths of the Maw ate him away.
He made for the stern immediately. The barge should have a door there. Somewhere he could go down.
He killed three people already. Ate them. Felt good doing it, but it was wrong. Wrong in the way only Walton could explain. Wrong in the way of treating people as resources to be consumed. What Avo could understand was that saving a thousand lives granted him a major surplus in ethic-economics than killing three scavengers. Morally, it was harder to conceptualize, so he didn’t bother.
The barge was an old one. It was shaped as a curved bow with twelve engines attached along its sides. The twelve pits across its length half-filled with refuse and bodies were fed by scooping claws that reached far down into the endless wastes of the Maw. A single multi-faceted diamond horn rose from the tip of the ship, spearing up into the air as it beamed threads of ghosts up into the Nether.
A locus-projector. It was probably connected to the ship's main systems. To have it exposed like this spoke of poor design. Or, more likely, that it had been installed on the ship afterward. The grime staining the ship’s hull ran thick between his prehensile claws. Greasy. Seeing as the terrestrial Guilds stopped using mundane matter as infrastructural materials centuries ago, the barge must’ve dated even before the Godsfall.
Jaus. He was sailing on a relic.
The hatch leading down to the bowels of the ship emerged on a small semi-circular outcropping. It also looked like a new addition to the vessel. The bolts and burns around its edges made Avo guess it was constructed recently. On the left and right of the hatch, layers of tarp and plascrete covered what might have been missile silos or some kind of launch platforms. Avo didn’t know enough about ships to judge.
Suddenly, footsteps rattled out from behind the hatch. Above it, a green light flashed. The hatch lifted with a hiss. A gaunt, sharp-chinned man emerged rolling his left shoulder. Both of his arms were cheap implants: three-fingered with visible hydraulics. His neck was layered in ad-tats. One was a MemCode for a joy dealer. Avo couldn’t imagine the man getting enough imps to justify renting out space on his body for advertisements.
“Kald! The boss said…” His eyes bulged when he saw Avo. They stayed bulged even after Avo opened his throat. Rational dismay clashed with euphoria. Another life belonged to Avo. He could not deny the savage delight it brought him. He told himself it had been necessary, but ‌he could have just as easily taken the man hostage.
Blood and circuitry splattered against the walls. Red spilled out between the man’s titanium fingers as he sank down against the side of the door, dying quietly. Avo felt the man’s ghost and echo sink into him again, drawn inexorably like stars seeping into a black hole. Interesting. It was like he was a center of gravity.
THAUMIC CYCLER: 5 thaum/c
GHOSTS - [4]
Picking up the body, Avo threw it off the side of the ship and watched as it smeared into spraying mist as it got sucked through the engines. He blinked. He killed that one without even thinking. It was all reflex: too easy. He needed his Metamind sequenced. He needed a morality injector.
The walkway down into the guts of the ship was narrow and cramped. It was not built for a ghoul nearing eight feet in height. His arms kept bouncing off things. The UV lights cooked his sensitive crown.
Reverberating heartbeats and footsteps came from all around him. The reek of body odor mixed with cheap lab-grown meats filled the air. There were over a dozen people down in this section alone. Narrow walkways spilled out in three ways. Avo made his way left, toward where he could sense the fewest gathered personnel.
He tried to carry himself lightly, walking on the tips of his claws. He was a digitigrade. Designed for sprinting and gripping, prehensile claws on both ends. His mass didn’t help his subtlety. Still, the hum of the ship masked his approach.
Past a sparking, busted security scanner, Avo peeked into a room and found four of the crew sitting in the corner, dull expressions of bliss on their faces. Empty vials and injector guns were scattered on the floor. A fluorescent glow stained the sheets of one of the four bunk beds protruding from the walls.
These people were joyfiends. Addicts. Easy prey.
Avo took a step in. The crew barely reacted. One laughed.
“Hey, consangs, that one looks…looks like a ghoul.”
Avo froze. Like a ghoul. Still just a ghoul. Biting down, Avo mustered the fullness of his will and turned away. He had killed four people scant minutes after waking up from his supposed death. They didn’t need to die. But they would taste so good. Kill three and leave one alive? He could infect the last one and let the infestation distract and destabilize the ship while he freed the slaves.
But what would he do if he ate them? What would he do if he found the slaves after? Could he stop himself? Wouldn’t they be easy prey as well?
“You are what you do.” That was what Walton had told him. “Never too late to make a different choice.”
It was with that thought held firmly in his mind that he overcame the beast for the first time without the aid of his Metamind. That, and the fact that he recently feasted. Now, he was here to save the helpless. To balance his earlier transgression. Feeding his vices now would see him collapse later.
Avo chose. And against his screaming urges, he backed out of the room but froze when he heard footsteps down the hall behind him. Just one. Good. Perfect opportunity. Avo slipped into the room and waited.
“Yous right,” another one of the crew chuckled. She was an over-muscled woman with steel spines sticking out of her head instead of hair. “It is a ghoul.” They all laughed as if his presence was the best thing to happen to them. Bliss did that to a mind.
Shadows lengthened around the corner. The steps drew closer. A whistling tune came with it. A stout, bald man sauntered down the walkway, an orb-shaped drone hovering behind him. In a burst of violence, Avo dashed the drone against the wall with a vicious backhand before snatching the man off his feet and dragging him into the room.
Throwing the man against one of the beds, Avo leaned and whispered: “Scream. I’ll open your throat. Blink if you understand.” This proved to be hard as the man had what looked to be cheap-chrome blinkers for eyes. They flashed between red, yellow, and green. Avo sighed. The fool had traffic lights implanted. “Nod if you understand.”
The man nodded.
Avo thought of his plan. “How many on the ship.”
“Three-hundred and thirty crew,” the man croaked, terror staining his voice. “Plus the captain.”
Fewer now, but the man didn’t need to know that. “Phase-pens?”
Red eyes looked at him confused. “Two levels below. Why–”
Avo barred his fangs. The man remembered who was asking the questions. “Take me down. No. Control center first.” He needed to take the ship. If he could seize the ship he could seal the doors. Take control of its locus and channel its store of ghosts to null the minds of the crew without a fight.
The man led Avo out quietly, his pace gripped with tension. Aside from the man’s eyes, he was practically a flat. Probably not that far removed from being a refugee or a newcomer to the city himself. Most natives in New Vultun had something in them that wasn’t natural. Most snuffers were mostly inorganic due to their profession. The Guilders had no need for chrome. With their bioware and nanoware, they were already postmortals walking amongst apes. The fact that they held the monopolies on Souls and had most of the Godclads under their employ meant that they didn’t just have favor with the metaphorical deck, they essentially owned it.
Still, this boded well for Avo. A shipful of flats and lesser-chromers meant he was unlikely to run into someone with military-grade Titanskin or an Accelero. If he ran into someone like that, it wasn’t a question if he could win, but how much of his corpse they’d leave behind.
Most of the crew were in their rooms or gathered in other chambers to avoid the worst of the Maw’s radiative entropy. Avo had no idea how much the titanium shielding of the ship would help them, but something told him they wouldn’t be enough. Scavenging was bad for longevity.
In his periphery, he noticed a dim flame burning, piercing into his attention through the walls. Avo frowned. Shutting off his cog-feed for a moment, he watched as it faded. He activated his cog-feed again and caught Traffic-Sight by his scruff.
Avo pointed in the vague direction of the flicker. “What’s that way?”
“Reactor room,” the man said. “I can–”
“No. Keep going.” He would study the reactor later when he had the time. Something about it called to him. Called to his hunger. Inexplicably, he wanted to know its taste. Right now, he needed control.
It took a few more turns before he found himself finally descending down an incline. The door leading to the bridge was a layer of rusted steel. It looked dissonant beneath the green tarp and insulating foil that seemed to plaster the walls of the interior. Still, as Traffic-Sight approached, the door hissed open.
On the other side, a mountain of a woman in a coat made of melted slats was glaring down at a bloodied man on his knees. His face was mangled and swollen. His lower lip was clenched in her left hand, gloved in gleaming scale. He reeked of pain and torture. She stood over him, a tower of indifference radiating rank annoyance.
Unnoticed, Avo gripped his hostage in warning and watched.
Her face was a patchwork of cyberware and scars. Her jaw was a thing of chrome running far up the right side of her face. Acid burns marred what little flesh there was on the other side. Both her eyes glinted like coals in the dark. As her coat drew back, Avo noticed that her legs looked akin to industrial pistons.
The captain certainly made an impression. Even unintentionally.
In the background of the narrow chamber, numerous holo-feeds were projected on a concave screen, lighting the dimness of the room in a glower of blue. The largest feed showed a few of the crew holding knives to the necks of two women. Twins. They shared features with the man currently kneeling before the captain.
The captain sighed. Her lungs bellowed air in gales of breath. “Again, Mr. Streklov, the eldest or the youngest? We signed a debt contract for two. I currently count three people in your family. I might be a no-good useless drunk piece of shit long past her heyday, but I can still do arithme–” She paused as a wind blew in through the hatch leading into the bridge. Frowning, she noticed Avo and Traffic-Sight and tilted her head.
“Engineer Yully,” she said, “are you aware that there’s a ghoul standing behind you.”
“Hostage,” Avo explained.
The woman nodded. Like this was an everyday occurrence to her. She had probably seen weirder. This was New Vultun after all. “Right. Ghouls talk. They can do that. Just don’t remember any of them taking hostages…” She frowned. Sighing, she casually pointed her palm at the man–Streklov’s–face. A flash of light speared out. A clean beam cored an open wound into the man’s head. His daughters screamed. The captain cut the feed with a wave of her hand.
Still, the echo and the ghost spilled over into Avo, sinking into him like before.
THAUMIC CYCLER: 6 THAUM/c
GHOSTS - [5]
METAMIND ADJUSTMENTS RECOMMENDED - FOUNDATIONAL STRUCTURE REACHING CAPACITY
“There,” the captain said. “Debt contract absolved. On to the next issue.” She looked Avo up and down. “You can understand Standard, yes?”
Avo grunted. “Perfectly.” As if she didn’t hear him speaking it earlier.
“Right,” she said. “Just had to make sure. I had a bit too much to drink earlier. Was afraid I hallucinated you into existence.”
Avo wanted to tear into her. No. Needed a better means of attacking her. He didn’t know the depth of her implants and her capabilities. The lack of properly built ghosts meant he couldn't scry her either. Instead, he repeated one of his old tricks. With a sudden thrust, he launched Traffic-Sight at her and darted at an angle. The man collided with her and bounced off. The captain sighed, unaffected. Avo closed in, claws open–
He made it two steps before a twin-layered halo rippled over out from her mind. Avo’s eyes widened. Over the crown of her halo, a phantasmal sigil ignited into a symbol of a sword. Like a constellation, the memories of her ghosts erupted from the center of her halo, flooding over his senses. This, then, was the difference between a poorly sequenced collection of ghosts and a factory-setting Metamind.
A tidal wave of trauma swept into him unimpeded. Without properly made wards, he had no counter. No defense. At the whims of her will, pain exploded across his nerve centers as her ghosts usurped his mental functions. Avo gasped, toppling as her ghosts burrowed deeper, tearing through his surface thoughts, and rendering his mind porous. Hard to cling to.
WARN-
His cog-feed sputtered out. A flood of madness poured into his mind. He descended into a maelstrom of dreams, of chaos. Memories of being beaten and tortured overwhelmed his senses. It remained for a while until his mind was dulled enough to recede like waves returning to the ocean. A curtain of darkness remained over his eyes; a miasma of static parted him from his senses.
Through a narrow pinprick of awareness, he felt his body spasming against the ground. He tried to stand. His body wasn’t listening. The captain was actively intercepting snatching his thoughts before they could travel across his body.
“Is it dead?” he heard Traffic-Sight ask through the darkness.
“No,” the captain said. “That would be a waste. It’s a talking ghoul. Don’t see that shit every day.”
Frantic footsteps rattled down the hall from whence Avo came. “Captain–captain!”
"Yes, yes, I know. Ghoul on the ship.”
“Kald, Tagma, and Jessa are all dead. Li-ying’s missing.”
A beat followed. The captain sighed. “I think I can deduce why. Yully. Get the crew on high alert. See if he’s…infected anyone. Ms. Katha, take him down to the pens. Put him across the product and link him to the locus. Dose him with nightmares. He won’t stay out otherwise. Fucking rotlicks.”
“The pens?” the unfamiliar voice asked.
“Yes, the pens. So we can sell it later.” The captain scoffed. “It’s already killed three of mine. Might as well spin a profit from it somehow.”
“I just thought–”
“Chuck it in the Maw?” the captain laughed. “Why? So its death can be nice and painless. No. When we get back to Mazza’s Junction we’ll offload it with the FATELESS.” At the sound of that, the beast within him exploded. It raged against the ghosts latched to his mind. It raged uselessly.
A curtain of discord descended over his thoughts. His mind was drowned in a whirlwind of confusion, his senses flaking away from his awareness. He thought he was being pulled upward by something before he dreamed of a screaming saw slicing into the side of his abdomen. Next, he saw butterflies spill out from his wounds before the intestines he shouldn’t have had turned into serpents and sank their fangs into his eyes.
Then, came the final memory. He was falling into a burning house as he choked on smoke. The haze grew thick. So thick that they were all that remained of his thoughts. A growing fog ate away at him, drowning him in darkness.
It’s impossible to shut the snuff market down. Wouldn’t matter if we had enough Liminal Frames to field a thousand more of us. Too much ground to cover; too easy for the syndicates to cut their losses and run the black.
What we can do is keep this from happening to any Guild-sponsored citizens. Won’t be hard to track them using their FATE markers.
The Warrens belong to the syndicates and the ghouls. They want to rule over that festering pit, let them have it. We do what we can with what we save.
-Internal Paladin Memo, “The Growing Problem of Snuff Vicarities”
2-1
The Crucible
A ghost usurps both your mind and senses when it takes root inside you. A parasite of cognition, a weaponized ghost made thinking akin to clutching water in a clenched fist. Discordant fragments of secondhand memory spiraled over Avo’s awareness like a typhoon, trapping him in a cage of dreams.
Lucid, but contained, Avo waited for control to be returned to him. There really wasn’t much else to do. Flesh and will matter little without a properly sequenced Metamind to channel them through. This, he knew from experience: being a Necrojack, he dove through his share of minds.
With that being said, the nightmare loop they knotted into his mind to keep his consciousness partially suppressed was slapdash at best. Missing details. Unloaded figures. Placeholders for clothing and infrastructure from all the wrong eras. Even if he wasn’t a Necro, this was an obvious mem-sim.
Within the nightmare, he had been cast into the body of a priest and made to kneel before a burning church. Before him, the blurred contours of snarling soldiers were throwing the rest of his flock one after another into the conflagration. Their laughter was warped. Discordant. The dream reached its end when they finally grabbed him and fed him to the flames as well, the heat swallowed his flesh, boiling him from the inside.
Then, the memory looped, taking him back to the start again.
A traumatizing memory for a human mind, perhaps, but Avo had felt the flaying glare of a fusion lance. Had to pull himself loose from the skin of his melted brothers as Guilder golems rained eldritch fire upon them. Before a scalding heat so vicious that every breath speckled simmered flakes from his lungs, the church fire was but a sauna.
Besides, there was another reason he wasn’t impressed. The entire design was not chaotic enough to be a naturally occurring dream and not consistent enough to be remotely well-made. Avo felt more insulted than traumatized. It boiled his blood to see his craft so demeaned by the hands of a pretender. Even more that he fell victim to a phantasmal assault so poorly designed. Alas, preparation and knowledge were key when diving against another Necrojack. And when he was storming his way blindly onto the bridge, unequipped and improvising, he experienced the old Kosgan adage.
“Better to be a middling practitioner than not at all.”
The nightmare looped again, starting anew. The heat of the flames stung weaker than the barbs of humiliation. When this was over, if he was still alive, he would find that captain, and he would demonstrate to her how to properly knot a nightmare into a mind.
For anything between seconds to hours, Avo waited, counting the mistakes of badly interlaced memory artifacts, sneering quietly at the sloppy build.
Sometime after his two-hundred-and-eighth loop, the nightmare dissolved mid-way through. A pulse of cog-data flowed through his mind. His Metamind activated as his senses burst into being. Snapping back up into his flesh from deep within his hijacked mind, Avo blinked as spots cleared from his sight. Cog-banding. That’s what it was called when a consciousness was pulled out of the body and released like a bowstring. The sudden lurch was dissonant in the best of cases and inflicted psychosis in the worst.
POSSESSOR DETACHED
SYSTEMS CLEARING
SCANNING COGNITION…
REVIEW COMPLETE: COGNITION STABLE
The physical world hit him all at once.
The comforting cold was the first thing he adjusted to. Near-freezing, but not quite. The chill was a hissing breath against his skin, pouring through his flesh and stiffening his numbed strands of eel-like muscles. A low mechanical whine sounded from behind as he felt himself being lowered. He tried moving, but his body refused to obey. A strange weight was lodged in his back. Directing his blood, he felt at a series of needle-like mechanisms were drilled into his spine.
A sudden flash pierced Avo’s eyes as he stifled a growl. Blinking the spots from his vision, he noted the four tube-shaped projectors brightening in front of him. In the narrow coffin that contained him, he felt packed. Claustrophobic. The feeling brought memories of his infancy back to him; the sensation of squeezing through crevices while hiding from his older brothers, desperate to avoid becoming prey.
Grainy light spilled forth from the projectors. Motes of light fused to become a static-sheened reflection of his body. A dozen spilling lines of data connected to different places in his body in the display, identifying near-healed wounds and his half-grown left arm.
Lines of description filled the top right of the hap-screen. SUBJECT CLASSIFICATION: GHOUL; STATUS: Alive; HEIGHT: 7’7’’ WEIGHT: 389lbs
Pulling back, it became something of a mirror. Avo felt dismayed at his haggardness.
His current outer fangs had gone unpulled for some time; the four of them were each as long as a stiletto. His five tertiary rows of inner teeth were also itching. He needed to grind them down again. Beneath his translucent murky-pale skin, the countless layers of slithering, sinuous muscles coating his ligaments, bones, and major organs twitched. He hung hunched and stiff beneath a red glaring light. The great length of his right arm caused it to brush the bottom of this pod, even while suspended.
Light glinted off his obsidian-hued scleras. The narrow chasms of yellow that were his pupils shrank, attuning themselves to the dimness. He looked the same as he ever did: long ovular skull; jutting fangs poking out from a lipless mouth that ran up to the small nubs that were his ears, and two pinpricks instead of a nose.
He was made to be a monster from a child’s nightmares. Towering, Gaunt. Predatory. Just how the Low Masters desired it.
The interface froze. A number was assigned to him.
Fourteen.
“Good evening, contestant!” A cheerful voice crackled to life. “Please per-per-perform a vocalization.”
Avo frowned. The words weren’t projected directly into his mind and ghosts didn’t tend to stutter with static pops when delivering information. That told him he was dealing with a coldtech interface–something entirely natural and unpowered by thaumaturgy or metaphysics. Technology in its purest, dullest form.
Out of simple curiosity and obstinance, Avo stayed quiet.
The voice repeated the question twice more before it flashed red.
“Please answer,” the voice repeated, with just as much cheer as before, “or we will be forced to list you as absent and liquidate–”
“Not dead,” Avo said, his voice a hoarse rasp. When was the last time he spoke? How long had they kept his mind nulled? What was he even stuck in? Seemed like every time he woke, he found more questions waiting for him.
“Thank you for your confirmation.” replied the voice. Its response came a full second late and started another cycle of waiting. A spinning icon had manifested over his reflection. Avo hated coldtech. The beast told him to claw at the walls. To tear the projectors from where they were festooned and force his way through the weak metal. Functionally, the needles implanted into his spine left him paralyzed. The beast was an impotent thing, its rage worthless, its strength unexpressed. The rational part of him laughed and mocked the creature he was. How rare to see the monster immobilized so. The bulk of him simmered in frustration.
“Location?” Avo asked, trying to expedite the machine’s response time. “Where am I?”
The machine ignored him. Another thing ghosts didn’t do. Ghosts always responded because they were conduits to a living will and were anchored to the Metamind that commanded them. They were the very definition of malleable, bending and changing with every thought, capable of being tuned into cognitive-affecting constructs via the resequencing of memories.
Not coldtech though. Coldtech rigidly did what it was programmed. Pre-planted dialogue paths of ones and zeros. Avo always found it too inflexible.
“Thank you for your confirmation. You are now listed as Fourteen among the survivors. Confirm?”
“Survivors?” Avo asked.
Once again, the machine ignored him. “Please state any and all experiences, skills, and abilities you believe might benefit you in a life-or-death situation.”
Vague. Ominous. Demanding. Somehow, Avo felt that whatever he was talking to was probably coded for customer service. “Elaborate?”
It did. By repeating the question.
Avo fought the urge to growl, to rage. Instead, he thought back to Walton. Yes. Walton would know what to do. Walton would accept the situation. Always accept the situation. Accept, understand, and then alter the situation.
“Ghoul.” He looked in the mirror. That was self-evident. The machine, however, continued to buffer, as if wanting more. Avo rolled his eyes. “Licensed Necrojack.” Licensed, but without a properly functioning tool. It was the same thing as being a marksman with a disassembled gun, if a gun barrel needed to be resmelted to fit the unusual nature of his neurology.
“Confirmed. You have a one-in-eighteen percent chance of survival. Would you like to make a bid? All imps will be transferred to you upon your ascent into the Warrens, should you survive.”
Avo’s unease grew. The beast within purred with delight. Beneath his feet, he felt the clicking of delicate machinery. Something was opening up. Avo remained silent. Without his old Metamind, he was effectively destitute. Nothing to bet with and no place for the imps to go after.
“Thank you for your participation FOURTEEN. We hope you enjoy the festivities.”
Avo frowned. He had a bad feeling about this. He thought to ask the bot what it meant but decided against it. Limited answering parameters. Waste of time. He steeled himself in ringing silence as unease bubbled up from inside him.
The projectors flashed and went dark. A low hiss whistled out from beneath him. Avo wanted to look down, but with the bolts in his spine, his head wouldn’t bend.
He didn’t think that getting kidnapped would offer so many more questions, no answers, and more problems coming by the minute.
A series of clicks and snaps sounded. Whistling trails of warm air rose from beneath him reeking of stinging disinfectant and the fading taste of blood. But the blood smelled wrong. Polluted somehow. Like there had been something added to the mixture.
Drills whined as servos and motors thrummed behind him. Without warning, the weight caging his spine retracted. A series of cracks rattled up his spinal column. He drew in a breath he didn’t know he was holding. Twisting his neck, he relished the ability to loosen his bones and stretch his muscles.
Better. Reaching over, he rubbed the growing nub on his left arm. It was past the elbow now. A few more hours and a few thousand more calories and he’d get his arm back. Kidneys too, if he really accelerated it. Didn’t want to risk the cancers though.
A crackle went through his pod again. “Please brace for ejection.”
Avo froze at the statement. Ejection? Avo’s freed neck craned down and saw thin lines of light spreading at his feet. The familiar sound of a maglock disengaging snapped.
The “floor” gave way beneath him with a shunting noise. Gravity took him. Light speared into his eyes, blunting his sight, but not yet bright enough to blind him entirely. The drop was a short one, fortunately. He slammed feet-first into what felt like plascrete. It smelled like it too.
The cold in the room was at the freezing point; the thin sheen of ice he stood on demanded that he dig his prehensile claws in for traction. The loud roar of a thruster singed his scalp and deafened him. Through squinted eyes, he saw his pod fly up and disappear into an alcove.
Stumbling to find a wall or a corner, Avo blinked spots from his eyes as he heard additional thrusters echoing down from all around him. It sounded like he was in a tunnel. Flowing wind washed over him from several directions. The air was scrubbed. Stale. Familiar somehow.
A whisper slithered over his mind, intruding into his thoughts. A taunt. +They brought us a ghoulie to play with this time.+ The ghost bore a voice most shrill and girlish. A lingering sneer could be felt in her pronunciation. +Going to enjoy breaking you, paler. Going to watch you die good.+
Turning, Avo braced himself for another phantasmal assault. It wouldn’t matter much, but if he was ready, it should at least protect him from deeper cognitive damage.
A roar of gunfire distant rumbled. Avo went stiff. Faintly, he heard footsteps pattering down from his right.
+Attention!+ a loud, monotone voice announced in a pulsing wave of near-tangible thought. +Survivor: Fifty-Seven has been liquidated. Hunter: NuDogNuDay228 has drawn first blood.+ Through his cog-feed he watched as a massive phantasmal wave composed of ghost-carried thoughts washed through matter, bringing with it a building static of secondhand excitement.
Voices chittered in the back of his mind. Bets were traded. Insults were cast and laughter followed. A reticule directed him to look up. A hundred miles above, past countless walls, his cog-feed located a massive nexus of ghosts interlaced into a chain around what looked to be a star formed of living minds. He figured that was a locus. A big one to keep the local Nether stable. But why would they need such a massive construct. It didn’t make sense unless–
Suddenly, Avo realized where he was and to whom he had been sold. Truthfully, he should have figured it out sooner. The machine calling him a survivor should have given it away.
Another voice washed over him. The waves were splashing down from the locus above. +Go-oood evening, viewers and contestants,+ the new voice was youthful. Girlish. Practiced. Familiar. He knew this voice. Heard it before during several of his dives. +Thank you! Thank you for streaming in on an Ursday evening! Another hard day of work in the biggest of the big! Another night of fun that you won’t find anywhere else! As always, I’m your girl, Little Vicious, delivering you the play-by-play for all your violent delights!”
A roar of pure desire flooded the atmosphere. The weight of a near-billion viewers was hard to hide, especially in the Nether. That answered why they needed a locus so large that he could detect its signature from here. The crushing weight of radiated emotion from poorly tuned ghosts spilled over into reality on a tidal wave of descending consciousnesses. They were all here to feed the same urge.
There weren’t many emotions that burned similarly in a human and a ghoul, but bloodlust was one of them.
“It’s going to be a messy one tonight, consangs. Three hundred survivors, some volunteers–others volunteered–against our players. Fan favorites like Visekeles, Gravemarrow, Slaughterman, and R3surr3t are here tonight, so stay synced and keep your wards up. Wouldn’t want the Exorcists to be knocking on your doors in the middle of tonight’s Crucible!+
Why did I volunteer for the Crucible? Because I didn’t want to give the rest of my natural lifespan as some organ farm or debt enforcer to the Syndicates. Why should I submit to the customs of a slave when I have the prowess of a master?
I came from Wan Nan. You know what that means in Standard? “Ten-Thousand Woes.” As in the land of ten thousand woes. Being hunted by some golem jocks was practically a relief compared to the Thousand Plains? Have you seen a Fallen Heaven, sister? Lived in one? It’s not something you can face. Not as a mortal, anyway.
Did I like the Crucible?
I loved it.
It even got me into the circuits. And don’t lie to yourself, the city loves it too. No secondhand thrill like dancing down the edge of the blade, a billion watchers cheering you on, screaming for you to fall.
In the end, we all do what we can to climb the Tiers right? I wanted to see the Arks. Swim up that neon waterfall of the Inner Ring. Go from koi to god. I wanted. I chose. I prevailed. And that’s the only truth anyone needs in New Vultun.
Winner takes all. How’s it been; how it'll be.
-Paladin Interview of Ying Yang Wei, “Stormsparrow” Former Refugee and Freelance Godclad
2-2
Hunted
The Crucibles. Something between a live-stream snuff vicarity, short-form improv torture theatre, and immigration control. Out of the frying pan of the Maw and into the fire.
New Vultun had an interesting way of welcoming him back into its arms.
From the overwhelming doses of secondhand emotion flooding the Nether, the bloodlust of the spectators was almost tangible. Human emotion, primal and thick oozed over his mind like gauze. He had tasted this flavor in his time as a Necrojack far too many times. Crucibles, after all, were great environments for smuggling mem-data. With a concentration of ghosts that was somewhere north of enormous, the sheer information capacity that any lurking Guilder Exorcists had to sift through to hunt down their quarry was too staggering. A single mind blessed by proper education and intellectual brilliance was already quite the ocean.
Link it to a parapsychic network through streams of ghosts? The scale went from oceanic to cosmic.
Stretch that out across the continent and you had a network built on self-supporting anarchy where the Nether was concerned. The Guilds could have tried to suppress it all they wanted. Short of twisting existence back in time via a universe-sized Soul, the freedom of information was here to stay. Jaus Avandaer made sure of that.
The host continued, her shrill voice projecting cherubic glee with an undercurrent of savagery hinted beneath. +Today, we bring you a new and harrowing tale of survival! Three hundred survivors have been dropped across the Low Umbra of the Underways. Three hundred contestants of all clades, cultures, and capabilities. And three hundred they will remain if they can muster the skill to survive an hour or make it to the checkpoint. But if not…+
Avo could practically hear the announcers' coquettish shrug of indifference. His eyes had adjusted well enough to see the wall he rested against for support. It gleamed, the surface an endless spread of purple hexagonal cells that layered over each other in studded pieces. Nanoduranium laminate. Something that Voidwatch’s deconstructor swarms installed after clearing the Underways.
His Metamind spun. Filtering the patterns of his memory, his cog-feed played a recollection through his mind’s eye. He remembered running from the ever-devouring swarm, watching his more foolhardy brothers dissolve before the tide at a molecular level. How he managed to evade them for those months he would never fully know. The recollection came in stuttered and broken fragments. Much of what he had was lost to stress and age, recorded long before he even had his first Metamind burned into his mind.
From one perspective, Avo was home. That perspective wasn’t his. He left this place before the end of his infancy. The Low Masters were long dead. His kind was broken. The dream of restoring Old Noloth was lost. He belonged to New Vultun now. He belonged to Walton.
Looking to his right, he found himself down a narrow tunnel. Veins of light shrouded the width and height lane he was in. It was like being in the belly of a vast serpent, jaws wide enough to swallow a small building some five stories high and twice again as wide.
+Anyway,+ Little Vicious said. +For all you squires out there that don’t know the way things roll, here’s the jab. Spectating’s free but playing’s gonna cost skin or imps. Interface with one of our mods to pull up our rentable sheathes for you to cast yourselves into. Don’t worry about insurance. We got that covered.+ She giggled. +For those of you that crave that edge-on-edge though, cast us a vicarity showing your most recent kill. Consider it an…audition. We’ll try you out and sign you up. Who knows? You might just be the next Stormsparrow.+
Wasn’t a bad pitch. Down here, even beneath the Warrens, brutality was the way of things. There wasn’t enough room above, so room had to be made. An empty spot in the city was another slot in the lottery. So it went all the way up to the Arks. Still, the audience ate it up with a chorus of excitement and glee. There would be a few hundred thousand sign-ups before the end of the day and from those, the Syndicates would pick the best among the twisted to be their hitters. What could Avo say? New Vultun was a city built on absolutes and extremes. Coming second just got you dead. Winning, on the other hand, just might net you a chance at claiming eternity. Winning let you be a legend, something more than mortal.
A Godclad.
+Anyway, let’s get the blood flowing and the bodies rolling!+ Avo felt the weight of Little Vicious’ focus wash over him–and likely every other survivor as well. +City’s gonna eat well tonight! Let the Crucible begin!+
The bellowing of the initiation horn roared through his mind and deafened his thoughts. Shrugging off the disorientation, Avo fled like a scuttling aratnid, seeking the comforting shield that was darkness. Sliding unevenly along near-frictionless flooring, he took in his surroundings as best as he could. The paths led forward and back. Forward ran up, a slight incline curving him to another level. Back led down and probably into the Maw again. Didn’t want to go back there.
Up and forward it was. Around him, the walls drained away heat and scent from the air through nano-vents. The air tasted clean. Too clean. Voidwatch air scrubbers were second to none.
A cry echoed from ahead. For a second, the smell of chrome and perfume graced him. The scrubbers killed the trail in seconds. Didn’t matter. He was heading up. He had enough dives through these Crucibles to know that these games were built to be slaughterhouses. Lacking an Incognito phantasmic or probably ghost-jammer, anyone could scry his thoughts out and mark his mem-print down within minutes from miles beyond sight.
Stealth was impossible. He needed to move. Take the gambit–
A sudden weight plunged into the depths of Avo’s skull. He grunted at the discomfort of a second consciousness weighing down on his. External emotions and surface thoughts leaked into his own. Whoever was piggybacking his consciousness had linked to him with a very, very poorly sequenced series of ghosts. Studying the strand of ghosts cycling between him and the locus, Avo sneered. The fool forgot to layer the ghosts over their own mind properly, the sequences were all intertwined. They had no respect for the craft; Necrothurgy was meant to be sublime, not sloppy.
+Hey, hey, consang, check it out. I’m inside a ghoul.+ The snorting laugh that rattled in the back of his mind was obnoxious. The fact that he was being piggybacked by what he could only assume was a juvie made his skin crawl. Avo hated juveniles. +Consang, look, look, I’m inside–like, the joke is it sounds like I’m fucking the ghoul–not literally, sis, I don’t actually want to trigger an outbreak of wombrash.”
Contemplating the merits of giving himself a concussion, Avo decided that he rather regrettably needed the fullness of his faculties to survive this. Again, he regretted that he didn’t have the time for a nap to shape his ghosts into function. It would have allowed him to dispel the link at the very least instead of being an open door to every deviant in the city.
As he climbed to the top of the tunnel, the path ahead broke off into one that curved left while another shot right. Through the right, an opening led out into what looked like a factory. Inside, he saw and heard the rumble of working machinery. Industrial lighting. This close, not even the scrubbers could suppress the smell of the dead.
+Wait–wait, shut up, man, the ghoul’s trying to think. Oh, shit! What’s it gonna choose? What’s it gonna choose? Go right. Go into the plant, rotlick. Come on! Go fight some shit. Don’t be a half-strand!+
Sadly, the idiot was probably right. The contestants who try to run the clock out by circling the outside usually get picked off easily and early. The Crucible was entertainment, and no one liked “half-strands” who didn’t want to die. Self-preservation and avoidance made for low viewership numbers. Crucibles were not games of stealth. Again. No hiding from the ghosts without the proper phantasmic engrammed. Definitely no hiding for him now that he had a watcher leeching from his consciousness. Even if they left, he was certain someone else would inevitably jump in.
No. The best chance is to ride the periphery of the chaos. Be close enough to the danger where everyone was distracted by the ongoing killings to hide that he was in fact, apart from it.
Stepping past the threshold, Avo immediately found himself inside what looked to be the lowest level of a factory. A wight manufacturing plant to be exact. Something meant to recycle corpses into undead servants.
Before him, thousands upon thousands of implanted, modified, and restitched corpses hung festooned from top to bottom of four slowly spinning cylinders of immense dimensions. This factory must’ve been centuries old considering the rust on the metal and the groaning servos. Still, it worked, transferring more and more bodies upward to transition them to the next stage of mass-industrialized undeath.
Stepping out onto the plasteel walkways cupping the walls of the plant, Avo studied the cylinders as they rotated the bodies upward through a narrow gap. He must be on the bottom. Where all the bodies are dumped and where the salvageable ones get sorted. Above was where they would be sorted toward different functions. Avo had a wight back in his hab-cell in the Undercroft. It cleaned the apartment pretty well. Did most of his orders too. Guess it probably came from a place like this.
Home. Cell. Safety. Life. He missed it. Missed his old Metamind. Missed being able to control himself. Hated being at the mercy of the beast. Hated feeling like a ghoul. He wanted to go back–needed to get back before this month’s tax came due. But he probably needed to locate where his old Metamind was before that seeing as it contained his FATE-ident and other documentation items.
The bodies kept spinning upward. He noticed that all of them were missing scalps. The micro-locus implanted inside the skull in place of a working brain proved to be the most expensive part of the entire package. Without a locus simulating the functions of thought or something like a cloned mind, there was nothing to anchor the ghosts.
Avo was about to proceed when he heard the scream. Heavy feet scuffled along laminate flooring, the steps echoing from the tunnels behind him. A sudden slip. A gasp. A loud crash of fumbling bodies and a crack. Someone wailed. A child.
The stench of blood and sweat struck Avo. The air scrubbers didn’t reach far enough into the factory to halt it.
+Oh! Oh, shit! That’s–that smells fucking terrible! Stop sniffing you fucking dipshit, I can taste it too! Not everyone has your blood-piss fetish! Fucking rotlicks, man.+ Avo ignored his piggybacker and shot a quick look down the tunnel.
Some feet away, he saw them: a child dragging an unmoving man, his form face down against the wall. The language the child spoke and pleaded in was rapid, unceasing, and lyrical. And completely alien to Avo’s ears. Could be anything from Sangshanese to Yeshti. Without his old Omni-Lingua phantasmic, he couldn’t tell.
A smear of blood trailed down the wall, to where the man lay. The sweat, meanwhile, was mainly coming from the child. The little one continued to pull at the downed man desperately. In the overlay of Avo’s cog-feed, both of their minds sizzled raw like naked yolk on a skillet. Within their cores, he saw the echoing ripples as well.
Then, just past them, Avo caught sight of a signature of thought-stuff and echoes rising from far beyond. It was slow approaching, rising from far down the tunnel. This time, Avo smelled more than just blood and sweat. This time, he smelled the sting of chrome.
A new noise intruded on the scene. The wail of something slicing through the laminate. Focusing his hearing, Avo caught the unmistakable hum of a frequency blade. Heels clicked up the tunnel, the footsteps of the hunter proceeding at a leisurely stroll: no hurry; all certitude.
+Hunter!+ cheered the piggybacker. +Here we go!+
A spray of thoughts washed over Avo’s. Intrusive excitement and bloodlust stained his mind.
+Two-hundred and fifteen survivors remaining!+ Little Vicious declared. +New Vultun's a thirsty city tonight! Am I right or am I right?+
Well, that was fast. Avo expected the slaughter to happen, just not so soon, and without any fanfare. How far apart had everyone been scattered? It didn’t matter. The Low Umbra was once a sprawl of tombs half as wide as the city itself. The others could have been anywhere. He needed to leave before he got added as a death statistic.
Avo wanted to turn and walk away. That was the smart thing to do. Climb up the factory. Get out of this mess. Just flee through into the processing wings and take a chance there. Instead, he just found himself fixated on the boy pulling at the unconscious man, trying to get him up. Avo had killed four people earlier. Failed to save the slaves. Got his mind nulled and sold into a Crucible himself.
Walton would not have been pleased.
Sensibly, he should flee. Leave them behind. They were dead weight, entirely devoid of any obvious implants or mods. Avo couldn’t remember the last time he saw a pure flat in New Vultun. Even the probable indentures he ate back on the barge had ad-tats and some bone lacing.
Instinctively, he wanted to eat both the boy and the man. They would be easy meat to swallow, and he needed the energy. And deeper still, the beast wanted to hear the man scream while he ate the boy. Imprinted cruelty was hard to repress.
Ultimately, however, it came down to a simple question. A question Avo often asked himself when he didn’t know what to do next.
What would Walton do?
Avo knew the answer, and for the millionth time, wished that man’s standards had been ‌a bit lower.
He re-entered the tunnels much to the hollering glee of his passenger. He kept the distant thoughtstuff of the approaching hunter in the corner of his eye and gauged them to be approximately fifty feet away. Interestingly, the hunter seemed to lack a Metamind as well, seeing as their surface thoughts were flooding out unsequenced into the Nether, spilling and fragmenting constantly like a dissolving puddle.
Thankfully, the bend of the tunnel blocked them from sight so at least they couldn't just shoot him.
As Avo’s shadow fell over the child, he watched the little flat freeze and turn to stare at him. The beast inside wanted to eat the boy. He strained against the urge. Not a child. Never a child. A child couldn’t choose. And choice was sacred. Those who couldn’t choose were off-limits. Walton’s rules.
Bright, deep green eyes blinked at him on a face that was dark as coal. Tears and snot marred the boy’s chubby cheeks and round chin. His skin held an almost rubbery texture to it; a porous quality that seemed to adjust based on body temperature. Not so flat after all then. Or perhaps the child just belonged to one of the various minority clades that came pre-modified by the gods before the fall.
The boy looked up at Avo, wilting in fear at a monster made manifest. Avo stared at the boy like one would an exotic snack. The beast inside him fanned the flames of his urges. He wanted to know what it felt like biting into that skin, the taste of the flesh beneath. Darker yet, he wanted to see if the boy would fight him if provoked. That would be amusing.
Wasting no time, Avo took a look at the nonfatal cut along the man’s midriff, considered the strong heartbeat in his chest, and noticed the bulging on his head. Assumption: a fall had rendered him unconscious. Which meant Avo was now trying to save a clumsy fool and his child.
+...Eat the kid! Eat the little fucking slip! Come on! Eat him!+ Avo went back to ignoring the freeloader in his mind. Of course they wanted to encourage him.
Another sound came from deeper down the tunnel. The boy’s eyes widened in terror. Avo frowned.
“Lit-tle bo-oy. Come back. I just want to show you my kn-ife,” The sing-song voice came from below the curve of the tunnel’s path. The boy reached out muttering something. He clung to Avo’s undersuit pleas on his quivering lips. Avo didn’t need to understand him to know that he was begging for his life.
Avo bit back a sigh. He was going to do something stupid. He was going to do something very Walton. “Get off.”
The boy blinked. Avo tried not to growl. If he was going to save the man, he needed the boy out of the way. As he reached down, the boy shouted defiance and, to Avo’s disbelief, bit him. Soft teeth gummed against leathery ghoul-skin. The boy blinked. A dull amusement bubbled in Avo.
Shaking the child off, he lightly backhanded the boy across the jaw, the child’s modded skin absorbing the impact evenly. Like a collapsing deck of cards, the child flopped off his father and onto his side, eyes watering in shock and pain.
Fixing the boy with a glare, Avo held a clawed finger up to his lips before bringing it down across his throat. The boy stayed silent, by fear or understanding. Reaching down, Avo threw the father over his shoulder with casual ease. Lacking implants and being close to baseline meant that man felt like a feather, despite Avo having only one arm. The man would need a two-thousand more pounds of mass before Avo started feeling the strain.
Motioning for the boy to follow, Avo comforted himself knowing that if he was about to get run down by some horrific monstrosity, at least he’d die protecting an idiot and his loyal offspring. Somewhere, the impossibly idealized image Avo had of his adopted father would look upon him with pride.
Somehow, that was enough.
The boy chittered something at him, motioning behind them.
“Asking the monster you just met to fight the monster you’re running from?” Avo said. The boy just repeated the same noises. Avo missed having an Omni-Lingua. Or even a cheap ThoughtScanner sequence for his ghosts to pattern.
The boy followed, chattering while the hunter drew closer, their heels clinking louder with each step upward. Avo had no idea what he was dealing with. For all he knew, he could be facing someone with a military-grade Accelero implant and would find himself dead in microseconds.
The boy made more noise. Avo got the bulk of what he was saying already. Help us! Help us! Avo leaned the father a few feet away from the tunnel’s entrance and left him, impossible to miss. The walkway was barely large enough to fit the three of them, anyway.
“Wait here,” Avo said. The boy just repeated the same noises. Avo pretended that was a yes.
Phantasmal noise crackled in the back of his head again. +Yo, consang? I think this ghoul’s helping the kid. No. I’m not shitting you sis! Come over.+
Looking out across the plant, Avo considered his options. The chamber ran on for a near-mile. Machinery and rust lined the walls. Bodies still poured out from chutes built into the four corners of the room, piling on conveyor treads still served by spherical grime-coated drones. The drop from the walkway was a good eighty feet. Survivable for him but not the other two. Even he would probably sprain something. Walkways led down from both the right and left, but he didn’t want to test his luck in a sprinting match.
Whoever his hunter was, he gave them good odds of having some kind of reflex booster. If it was anything above civilian grade, he was going to be slower than them. Pair that with a frequency blade, and he would put good imps on the hunter peeling him apart before he could blink if this was to be a straight fight. He needed to approach this from a different angle, much to the whining bloodlust of the beast.
His nature demanded that he throw himself against his adversary with fangs bared and fury flowing free. His desire for self-preservation offered better options: flee or ambush.
Looking at the chamber and the lack of cover, fleeing was going to be hard without catching a flechette to the back. His goal was to get on the cylinders and ride it topside. Couldn’t do that with someone chasing him–
Avo noticed how well the gaps on the walkway fit the curving talons of his prehensible feet. There was also the missing railing on the sides to consider. Avo grinned to himself.
Ambush it was then.
Avo spun around and studied the boy.
“Cry,” Avo said, doing his best to mimic tear trails with a single hand. The boy stared at him confused. “Cry–Crying. Water from eyes! The thing humans do.” A sniffle came. A sob. Avo let out a breath of relief. Thank Jaus for little miracles.
Stepping over the edge of the walkway, Avo dropped down to dangle off the side before looping his claws through the gaps in the walkway. Bringing his feet up, he clambered into position upside down as he positioned himself near the inner wall, where it was harder to spot him.
+Oh–oh! Fuck, man! Consang! Come here! No seriously! Cast into the ghoul, man! The ghoul is doing some strategist shit! I’m not fucking with you! I’m not. Just do it.+
Another voice manifested in the back of Avo’s skull. This one was nasally, but just as juvenile. +I swear, if you’re doing this to make me blow my imps–why the fuck are we upside down?+
+Ghoul-guy is about to do an ambush. About to do some ambush-shit. Grettin’ ready to flip upways and fuck a hunter in their exposed a-a-ass.”
Avo gritted his fangs. Looking down, he counted a good fall. “Going to drop headfirst. Splatter myself. Don't want to hear either of you talking."
+Whoa!+ the nasally one said. +It speaks Standard real good too!”
+Smartest ghoul,+ the other one agreed. +Like saying, the–the cleanest ass.+
They laughed in the back of his head, snorting with immature glee. Letting go and falling headfirst to his death had never been so tempting.
The rattling sound of someone stepping onto the walkway drew his focus. Finally. Time to see who was to become prey.
A thin, twitching hunter emerged above him, her body littered with so many implants and ad-tats that she was more metal than meat.
As she stepped into the light, Avo knew that he had made the right choice. Ghouls were monsters compared to flats; could tear through dozens with ease. For someone with the right implants? Ghouls just belonged in the corner of a snuffer’s HUD with the rest of the kill-tally.
Today, though?
Today he intended to make her part of his.
The flesh is slavery. The flesh deceives. The flesh fails.
Replaced by metal, our weaknesses are purged. Crowned by ghosts, our minds are made pure. Through the thaum, our mortality ascends to divinity.
Reject what is. Seize what you can be. Take the flame and seek the highest path. Such is apotheosis. Such is the dream of Jaus.
-Book of the New Alloy, Verse I, Apotheosis I
2-3
The Ascent
The huntress twitched with every step, her movements blurred twitches of motion bereft of steadiness or pace. Typical symptoms of neurachem overdose. She probably had a street grafter jailbreak her civilian-grade implant for an extra kick.
Her midsection was a thin spine of metal, lengthening and shortening with her whims. It made her look almost serpent-like with how elongated she was. Four different frequency blades extended from her titanium-laced spine, gripped by arms of fibrous gold. Her two organic arms clutched a holo-decorated twin-barreled submachine gun close to her chest.
Through the slits of the walkway, Avo couldn’t make out if her eyes were also augmented. Breath held, even stilling his blood, he waited for her to notice him, for one of her blades to pierce down and cast him into oblivion.
She never noticed. The blow never came. The fullness of her focus remained on the father and his boy.
She strode menacingly over to the weeping child. Avo trailed her quietly from below, doing his best to time his moments to the rattling footsteps.
A loud thrum sang out from one of her blades. She lifted it over her head in a mocking salute to the boy. “Brave little soldier. Protecting his father. How valorous.” She ran a copper-tipped tongue over her blade. Sparks of electricity leaped between the blade and implant. Chatters of anxiety and excitement tinged the atmosphere; some whispering ghosts brayed for her to butcher the boy, and others pleaded for his life to be spared.
The boy quivered, tears coming free and loud, drowning out even the building murmurs of ghosts. The father remained out of it, too disoriented to be of any use, even as he groaned and came around.
Good. Avo hoped that this huntress was a sadist. That boy cried loud. It would keep her distracted long enough for his mad plan to work.
Avo had sampled both ends of being ambushed. Having a bead on your prey while they remained unaware was essential. But what followed had to be fast and thorough. If not, if your target was still standing, you might just find yourself greeting the Big Nothing at the hands of a 5-ton brawler who was endoweaved with hyper-muscles.
The huntress’ blade rose. The boy winced back, clutching his father tight. She laughed. Cheap thrills, to derive such terror from a child. Avo wondered what broke her so much she acted like one of his kind. This torment was something a ghoul might inflict for amusement before making the kill.
He turned away from her at an angle and held on with his prehensile talons as he reached for the edge. Her blade rose high. Her eyes dilated. Her breath quickened; the rasp in her gasp betrayed the unsheathing of her ecstasy.
Avo shot up and reached over the edge before locking his fingers around her ankle. With a jerk, he tore the huntress from her feet. Momentarily surprised, she flailed as he crumbled her balance. Two shots rang out from her gun as she tumbled. As she bounced against the walkway, her blades lashed out in surprise. Beneath her, metal flayed. A bloodied flap opened across Avo’s left thigh as a stray slash hewed through. Sparks scattered. Avo snarled as he dragged her toward the edge.
+Oh, ho ho, what’s this!+ Little Vicious said, her haunting voice drifting in from everywhere. +Visekeles had found some easy meat. But look below her. Number Fourteen is—is that a ghoul?+ The announcer sounded taken aback. Maybe even annoyed. +Why…uh, Number Fourteen is determined to make a fight for his–its life.+
For all the surprise he had on his side, she was still reacting several times faster than he. Her limbs blurred. His snarl broke into a screech of pain, something lancing deep into his flesh, severing muscle and kissing bone. She wasn’t half off the edge when one of her blades struck clean, skewering into his shoulder. His hand slacked from the damage. She tumbled free of his grasp. Another series of blurs. Avo watched his blood splurt free from his chest before he even felt the cold lines of pain even begin to ebb. She tore into him faster than he could perceive, his life only spared by the growing gulf of space between them as she fell toward the factory floor.
An inch closer and her blades would have inflicted mortal wounds.
Half a millisecond into her descent, she counterattacked. Her body twisted unnaturally, submachine gun roaring the song of auto-kinetic fire. Tungsten-tipped rounds stung and burst against Avo’s skin in splashes. Micro-frag munitions. Thundering pain erupted across his muscles. Something in his sternum fractured. Alone, the shots were an annoyance, but the damage was building fast. Another round struck his head. His brain rattled, near-concussed from the force.
Whatever self-mastery Avo had snapped like a rusted chain. The beast took hold. He launched himself off the bottom of the walkway. It was an action born of hunger and madness, but he needed to kill her now. He would never claim initiative again if he didn’t, and if he let her regain the momentum with her speed, he doubted that he would survive a second when she wasn't unbalanced.
A spike of thrill and excitement surged into him as the ghosts haunting him spilled waste emotion over into his mind. They were whooping. Cheering the fight on.
+Su-i-cide! Su-i-cide!+ someone chanted.
Near four hundred pounds of ghoul greeted chromed flesh in a ringing clash. His elbow crumpled the cheap subdermals she called armor, snapping her head back. Avo felt something break against his arm. She hadn’t been expecting that. And he hadn’t been expecting such fragility from her. She should have put more imps into making herself survivable as well.
Ghouls weren’t particularly strong in New Vultun. Not when your average ganger with a ten thousand imp loan could afford to get carbon nanotubes lined over their muscles. But he had the mass. And they were in freefall. The only thing he really had to do was land on top of her.
Seeing how her flesh folded before his blow, he was curious to see the color of her insides when they struck the ground.
Yet, for someone with a reflex booster, the fall was more than enough time to retaliate. Violence flowed between them. Pain was traded for pain. For every blow he dealt her, she struck him five times. He bit into her, his claws digging into the back of her head. Pain exploded down near his ribplates, hammering impacts breaking against his bruising muscles like a jackhammer. Broken fragments spilled off his sloughing skin, plucked free from the meat beneath by the grip of air. Her blades slashed out blindly. Gorges of wounds split open across his back, flapping with the wind’s drag. Inch by inch, she was working through his muscle toward his spine.
Avo bit harder and felt his fangs crack, depressing cheap armor. Visekeles screamed. The clicking of her gun sounded beautiful. Locked in a fatal embrace, he bore down on her. The ground rose, a speeding anvil rising to meet the hammer that was Avo. The huntress? In the end, she was just glass trapped between.
They shattered the ground in a deafening crash. A wave of pain tore through him. The insides of Visekeles smeared him in a spray of warm splatters. Her taste lingered on his tongue even as he tumbled off of her and met his halt against a crumpling console. Numbness spiked through his body. Hurt oozed from every pore.
Swallowing back mouthfuls of blood, Avo lay there, his broken body a miasma of injuries. Yet, he felt euphoric with triumph. Not far from him, Visekeles greeted him as a mangled heap–a near puddle. He could see her clearly now. Crushed glass spilled out from half-caved eye sockets. Remnants of her optical implants. Her soft insides oozed and welled through rents of metal, squeezed free from the pressure of the impact.
She was trying to mouth something at him. One of her frequency blades twitched. The arm holding it sparked and sizzled. “N-not…fair.” Blood and coolant came free from her lips. She laid back and exhaled one final time.
+I–what–no!+ Little Vicious said, her voice filled more with dismay and horror than surprise. +I…I mean…congratulations to Number Fourteen for triumphing over Visekeles!+ As the crowds cheered, Avo felt a foreign presence brush over his mind, speaking to him directly. +She was one of my best earners, rotlick. She had potential. Star potential! You–you ruined that for me. I–I’m gonna–oh, you’ll find out. You’ll find out.+
Delirious with pain, Avo wanted to laugh, but groaning took priority. Difference between him and chromers: his flesh could mend, but metal was just bricked. Mustering what strength he had left, he clawed over to her remains, tongue already lapping at the pool of Visekeles’ blood from the dust-stained ground, nourishing himself with each swallow.
Sweeping his cells through his body, he mended his muscles and straightened his bones. Hurt, but not fatal. As long as he had biomass to burn and his skull was intact, he could keep going. Still, he felt like a giant had just stepped on him. Pulling himself over to the dead huntress with a half-crawl, half-stumble, he found a nice open wound and fed.
The mood staining the world around him was raucous for some and silent for others. Shock flooded the air. In the back of his mind, he heard his piggybackers chattering. He half-listened while he fed.
+Fuck, yeah! Fucking ghoulguy kicked her ass!+ his first passenger cried.
The nasally one snorted. +Ghoul’s a pussy. If it was me, I’d get up on that walkway and stand the half-strand down.+
+Shut up. I saw you run from a ‘ratnid. You ain’t gonna stand down shit for fuck.+
+“Fuck you!+
His passengers argued. Avo regretted not getting a concussion during the fight. He did his best to tune the noise out from his focus. Again, he missed having a sequenced Metamind. Could’ve used that to dispel intrusive ghosts and ward off his mind from the public.
THAUMIC CYCLER: 7 THAUM/c
GHOSTS - [6]
Right. He just absorbed another ghost. And echoing thing. Thaum. However that worked. Because this was something he could do now. He was too hungry and hurt to think. Right now, he concentrated on moving the new biomass to plug up all the leaks in his tissue to replace the damage. He wished he could eat Visekeles’ eyes. Eyes tasted good–why did everyone replace their eyes?
At least she wasn’t overly armored on the inside. Made her more like an oyster than a crab he had to crack.
+I…it appears that Survivor Fourteen has defeated Visekeles!+ Static crackled over the back of his mind as Little Vicious repeated. +...someone find out who sold us that ghoul. This is a joke, right? And why’s he dressed? He didn’t eat the kid? That’s easy meat right there. Shit! Wrong lobby.+ Static returned.
Avo continued ignoring the commentary in favor of sucking up sinews like noodles. At some point, the boy and his father–now awake–were standing next to him. They looked upon him with a mix of fear, reverence, and respect. It took the better part of his will to just eat the huntress. This close, they smelled quite enticing.
Speaking in excited tones, the boy tugged on his father’s pantlegs as he pointed at Avo. The man winced and rubbed his head. They were going to talk to him. While he was eating. Avo didn’t want to talk with people while he was eating. He didn’t want to talk with people in general.
The man took a step closer. Avo steeled his will. The man looked quite plump. Probably wouldn’t be too gristly either.
“E-excuse me,” the father said in halting Standard, his face a pleasant smile. His voice was a baritone. Sounded practiced from years of oration. Avo wondered if his vocal cords would taste different from others he had eaten.
Slurping back what remained of Visekeles’ triceps, Avo fixed him with a glare. The man was approaching him, clearly unnerved by what he saw, but still coming forward. Strange. Refugee. Foreigner. Meat for the city. Easy meat. Avo shook his head and swallowed his meal, he forced himself to imagine the man as a blur. Same thing with the boy. They would continue to be “boy” and “father” for as long as they were with him.
No sense in remembering the likely casualties of this city after all.
The man cleared his throat. “My name–”
“Don’t care,” Avo said. “Probably be dead soon. Don’t need the boy’s name either.”
Whatever the man was about to say didn't matter. Avo flipped Visekeles over on her back. Her arms were crumpled. He had no idea where three of the blades broke off. The gun was broken and empty. No point in picking up the plasteel fragments. With a rough tug, he scavenged the remaining high-frequency blade free from an arm of mangled gold. It thrummed in his grasp.
Avo grinned.
The father swallowed, nervous at even addressing his strange savior. “I would just like thank–”
“Can you climb?”
“I–climb?”
“If not. You die.” Avo gestured toward the cylinder of bodies spinning upward. “Kill you now. Quicker death.” He pointed the vibrating blade at the father, its machete-like build ringing in his hand, the oscillator in the handle rumbling through the rubberized hilt. “We’re going up. Need to make a climb.”
“Up?” he gaped, looking at the corpses rigged along the cylinders. “Up with…them?”
Another weight spilled into his mind. Another passenger. Avo sighed. +Hey, guys, just dropped in, what’s the ghoul doing?+
+Going to make a climb,+ the nasally one said. +Fucking ghoulie surprisingly all nova and no wick. Fucking took out Visekeles.+
+Jaus. Visekeles? The Nu-Scarrowbur Slasher? The Razorgirl of Block Eighteen?+
+Yeah. Threw her off and splattered her. Fucking shows you what the ‘Clads and Regs were made of. If a ghoul managed to snuff a chromer like that, remember there used to be a couple o’ billion of them.+
His first mind-passenger snorted. +This paler’s something else. I remember the Uprising. Ghouls were stupid shits. All they knew was to charge. Tried running down tanks, drones, golems. Bloodbath. My pa jocked tac-nukes into them during the war. Said they kept coming. I think someone put some mods into this one. It talks fine. It’s not eating the kid or the father. Fucking, it ambushed Visekeles instead of throwing itself at her. Ghouls aren’t supposed to have impulse control. This one has more than most the half-strands on my block.+
Memories of an unending massacre taunted Avo. He remembered seeing the first impacts of the raining missiles. The suppressive tac-nukes gave off a yield of mere kilotons, but they had been enough to unmake thousands of his brothers in seconds. The flashes left sight wounds in his eyes for hours.
Avo ground down his inner fangs. He tried to ignore the commentary playing in the back of his mind. He didn't like the way they were speaking about him. Singling him out. Made him easier to flag for Guild-Exorcists when they did their bi-monthly hive-wide thought scans. He really didn’t need to find himself under audit if he made it out of this mess.
“Up,” Avo said, unable to wait any longer. “Get the boy. I’m leaving. Follow if you want.” He turned to leave. The man stuttered behind him. The boy said something. Avo didn’t care. Not really. Saving them had been virtuous enough.
Something told him that Walton might have handled that with a bit more tact. But practicality was more useful than courtesy in these situations. Besides, one “act of community” as the old man called it was more than enough.
If they still couldn’t survive, that was beyond his ability to mend. Charity came hard to him. And every moment he suffered their presence was another he had to fight the beast. Right now, the feeding from the huntress got him another hour. Tops.
After that, it was heads-or-tails if he was going to succumb.
Mantling onto a conveyor belt of bodies, Avo studied his surroundings more carefully. On the winds, he heard the phantasmal laughter of more spectators, the spill of leaking emotion–stray thoughts of outrage, of imps lost, and amusement gained.
The shadows seemed to undulate and bend around him. Phantasmics altered perception sometimes. Ghosts tended to ripple beneath the flesh of reality. Countless spectators had possessed objects all around him to get a better look at the action. Didn’t matter. He made for the cylinder.
The father and son followed him, muttering at each other in incomprehensible exchanges. Avo did his best to tune them out and forget they existed, and spent twice the effort ignoring the beast’s desire to eat them. They were probably going to die. They seemed like nice people, but New Vultun didn’t need any more of that.
It needed experts. Scientists. Thaumaturges. Agnoses. Engineers. Social Memeticians. Philosophers. All specialties were produced and sustained within the Upper Tiers.
As refugees, these two were on the back end of the lottery, and unless the boy could prove himself to be a genius among geniuses, they were going to be Soul-feed down the line. Labor was for Wights and Golems these days. No need for serfdom or slavery. Simply put, father and son were worth more dead than alive. Wasn’t much market value for being FATELESS.
+Ninety-five survivors remaining,+ a monotone voice declared. System admin. Avo winced. Tonight was a massacre. Survivors were getting slaughtered. That didn’t bode well for him. Once the other hunters ran out of prey, they were going to be concentrating on him.
Avo barely managed to kill one using surprise, and nearly broke himself in the process. Pain still throbbed through his body.
Crossing the collection of consoles and dormant machinery, Avo noticed missing and stripped motors hanging from the ceiling. Someone had come through here before. Either a previous Crucible or scavengers looking for cheap imps. Probably a good idea. If he could find a working power cell, maybe–
“Wait!” A sudden cry rattled Avo. Shooting the father with a brief glare, he confirmed there was nothing coming down from the walkway, nothing lurking in the dark. The heartbeat of the father was loud. Hammering like thunderous drums. The man needed exercise. “I have a question?”
“Keep moving,” Avo said, not wanting to talk.
“What is our plan?” asked the father-burden.
Avo suppressed a growl. “Up. Don’t die. Keep moving.”
“What if they see us? Catch up to us? What is your plan if–if one of them comes alive.”
Ah. He was afraid of the dormant corpses on the cylinders. Worried that a player might cast into one of them. A problem easily solved. “Corpses. Fragile. Break them.”
“What if we can’t.”
Avo shrugged. “You die. They eat the little one.”
A series of words were hurled at him in quick succession. Avo couldn’t understand much but knew what it sounded like when someone was cursing him.
“Why?” the father said again. “Why save us and ignore us?”
“Temporary onset of ethics.”
“What?”
As the conveyors approached the cylinder, hovering drones picked the more intact corpses up and planted them in empty three-clasp metal harnesses. Shoving a drone aside, Avo seized one of the festooned bodies by the neck and ripped it loose with a casual tug. Sloughing skin and decayed meat came apart like a wet sack of mulch. One of the metal clasps broke. Ignoring the gore, Avo finished peeling what remained of the corpse from the harness.
The iron clamps that held the body were usable as handholds, save for a few flaps of swaying skin left along its structure. But that was a plus for Avo. Could use that as insulation or to shield himself from getting cut.
Beside him, the man stood frozen. Slowly, the empty harness rose.
Ignore them. Ignore them. They’re going to die. Ignore them. You’ve done enough…
“What?” Avo asked.
The man looked at him with an expression that would fit better on a sick puppy.
“Something about the cylinder that fascinates?” Avo asked.
“N-no–it’s just,” he swallowed. “I–”
Avo growled and tore another corpse from its harness. And then another.
“Get on.”
The man hesitated.
“Get on. Or I’ll eat the boy.”
The man got on.
Finally, the secret to efficient communication between them was found: threats of violence. Truly, how could Avo have been so blind? He should have just abused the father into compliance earlier.
Squeamish at the dead matter coating the clamps, the man gripped onto the cleanest one he could find while holding his son with the other hand.
“Both hands,” Avo said, passing the frequency blade to one of his feet. He shot a look at his missing left arm. It had grown up to the wrist now. He was healing faster than he used to. Strange, but welcome in these trying times. Needed to check for tumors later. “Use both hands. Don’t know how far down. You fall, you stay. Not going back..”
“My son–”
“Isn’t armless,” Avo said. Jaus. They were going to die. They were going to die and here he was helping them.
Are you smiling across that Big Nothing you wanted to go to, Walton? Does the void let you feel pride in me?
Awkward whispers went between father and son. Avo heard every syllable and understood none of it. Gods, losing his old Metamind was worse than losing his left arm. Worse. It was like he was simple. Couldn’t think nearly as well. Deprived of his full capabilities.
With a functioning Metamind, he could at least ward his mind. Build some new phantasmics on the fly using a phantasmic that offered a dichotomous consciousness function. Reinstall a morality injector of some kind so he didn’t need to guess what he should and shouldn’t do. Make it harder for him to eat the boy.
He could hear the hot blood sloshing inside the child. It smelled delectable. Avo grunted in discomfort.
Right now, without his phantasmics, he was just fragile meat. Anomalous meat that infected and consumed any and all biomass to sustain itself, but still, just meat. No ability to affect his own design. No way to scout or scry. Always Reacting. Reacting. Reacting was how one eventually ended in the Big Nothing. Reacting got you dead.
“Thank you,” the father–the burden–said, ruining Avo’s thoughtful silence. Well, thoughtful anxiety. “T-thank you,” the father said again. Avo didn’t sigh. Not externally anyway. “I said–”
“Heard you,” Avo said.
“Oh. I just–”
“Want to thank me,” Avo replied. He scanned around him, checking if any players were feeling cute enough to cast themselves into one of the half-finished bodies around him. He doubted it. None of the dead had locuses or something that could pass for a mind. Ghosts didn’t affect matter on their own. Only cognition. “Yeah. I know. Don’t.”
Another blessed silence followed. Good thing possessor ghosts were banned for the Crucibles. Made the kills harder. More entertainment. He remembered that used to be a thing, up until the griefers decided to possess the contestants and make them all kill themselves in various ways to win bets or just for the giggles.
Syndicates put a ban on that pretty fast after views started dropping.
“Why do you do that?” the father asked.
Avo sighed. “Do what?”
“Help me and then ignore me,” the father said, with a small laugh. “You–you are like a cat, you know? You know cat?” The man almost reflexively tried to gesticulate what a cat was at him before he had to recommit to his grip.
“Know what a cat is,” Avo said. “Nu-cats litter the city.”
“Oh. My son likes cats.”
“Most of them are capable of eating children–”
“You’re doing it again!”
Avo gnashed his fangs together. It wasn’t because he was annoyed. It’s just a habit when his potential meals asked him too many questions. “Doing what?”
“You help and then you ignore. You are nice and then you are mean. You save my life and you strike me. You are between actions all the time.”
“Committed to my survival.”
“Then why do you keep helping us?”
“I told you. Impulse and stupidity.”
The father studied him. “The scripture of Artad speaks highly of the virtuous. Those who are willing to sacrifice and risk for another, be they kith or stranger.”
“Artad is dead.”
The father seemed indifferent to the barb. “Yes. For centuries. But still, the teachings survive. Without them, we, of Vaylos, would have never survived this journey. And my son and I would have never survived without you.”
“That how it is now?”
“What?”
“A god dies. Gets turned into philosophy?” Avo shook his head. “Was wrong about you. Have a future in this city. We’ll live and make it to the Warrens. Gonna find a Guilder. Any Guilder. Need someone to help them with rebranding.”
“Do they offer housing–”
Avo growled. He was actually annoyed this time. “Being facetious.”
The man smiled at him. “I know.”
Avo looked away from the now laughing man and contemplated opening his throat. See him laugh then. Bastard.
The father just kept chuckling. “Are your kind capable of laughter?”
“No,” Avo lied. “Low Masters carved it out of us.”
“Truly? How sad.”
“Don’t feel that much either.”
“What do you feel?”
“Hungry.”
“And what do you–”
A low whine pierced into Avo’s ears. The wind shifted along his right arm. Looking up past the ringed opening, Avo’s eyes dilated to pinpricks, trying to trace the source of the noise.
Little Vicious’ voice flicked over his mind again. +Hey, rotlick. I thought of something. Got a little fun for you to experience…but I'll let you find out for yourself.+ She cut out as soon as she cut in. Avo worried about her growing fixation with him. He didn’t want the host to be actively gunning for his death. Didn’t seem good for his short-term health.
A low whistle came from above. The father stopped laughing. Avo felt his right foot clench harder around his new blade. Another whistle. And another. The man went stiff beside him. The boy’s eyes were wide with terror. Something was coming. A low wail rose through the air now, the blaring noise akin to screaming engines.
Through the gap leading from the bottom of the factory to the processing wing, the frame of an aerial drone flicked and disappeared. Emotional waste spilled out from his wake. It was being piloted by someone using a ghost. Avo tasted the secondhand thoughts from the mind of the pilot. It reeked of glee and savage delight.
Another hunter. Or hunters.
Little Vicious’ voice cut into the public lobby again. +Alright, you bloodthirsty freaks, it’s been ten minutes and already we’ve dropped passed the big one-o-o ceiling. Looking like a real dicey night. Special mention to Number Fourteen. Looks like we found a ghoul with a heart of gold. Or maybe it's just full. Anyway, good work snuffing Visekeles. Didn’t think you had it in you. Still, if you wanna make it into the city proper, there's still a ways ahead of you yet. Keep your eyes open and remember: death can come at you from high and low.+
She giggled. Avo wanted to meet her in person so he could tear her throat out.
The father gawked. “What are those?”
“Drones,” Avo said.
“Drones?” the man asked, confused. Modern technology was clearly unknown to the man. The boy clung to his father tighter.
Avo grunted a bitter laugh. They'd understand soon enough.
Times change. War changes too. With this new epoch of innovation of Thaumaturgy and Coldtech, an arms race has begun, affecting levels both macro and micro.
With our advancements in phantasmic engrams and the ease of mass production using nano-fabrication, our forces would be better served by a legion of multi-platform pilots than wasting them as cannon meat.
Hence, we present to you, the X-1 Bodkin, our newest recon drone pattern. With complex loci allowing for long-distance possessions via ghosts, we believe that even with a dearth of proper training, a critical mass of these cheap expendable platforms piloted by an “immortal” militia of our citizenry will be more than enough to overload and overwhelm Highflame’s pre-cogged Planar Fortresses.
-Ori-Thaum Research and Development, X-1 Bodkin Development Log
2-4
Titanium Phantoms
Avo ignored the father’s questions as he clambered up the cylinder. If there were drones past the gap, he would force them to engage first. Too bad the submachine gun broke earlier. Could’ve really used that.
Rising out from the floor of the factory, Avo peeked through the gap leading into the assembly line proper. Countless conveyor belts and assembly drones latticed the area around him as if he was in a web of silicon, plastic, and metal. Massive reactors hummed at the very end of the cylinders, a grumbling turbine gasping as sparks rained down.
The interior of the factory’s assembly floor was as large as a megablock. It must’ve run on for a mile or two in width and length. Twice again that in height. It was as if he had climbed into an industrial forest. Chaos reigned around him, a symphony of working machines, whistling mechanisms, and sparking wires.
It was enough that he didn’t sense the first drone coming until it was too late.
The wind lashed Avo from behind. Whipping his head, he barely caught sight of a chrome-tipped arrowhead slamming into a festooned corpse a scant foot below him. Clamps and corpse harnesses buckled and broke. The exterior of the cylinder dented as the spinning mechanisms within the machine began to wail. Sparks flew below as warped plates of metal came free.
As the ringing subsided, Avo felt a series of stings dance across his right thigh. Something parted against the blade held in his right foot.
A chorus of engines sang from above. A second sortie came from below. Avo shifted his blood and pushed the metal shards out from his leg. Hunger itching, he mended the wound. Darting between a sprawl of machinery and vine-like assembly lines in this alloyed forest, Avo caught sight of five titanium-hulled drones circling around him from two different directions, wolves on the hunt, cleaving through the air like arrows in flight.
+Lucky ghoul,+ the nasally one said.
+Shit drone-jock,+ a new voice interjected. +I would’ve liquified the rotlick easy.+
+Yeah, sure you would…+
“You,” Avo snarled, trying to catch sight of the father. The man was huddled tight against a corpse now, his son clutching his chest tightly. “Wait till the gap passes. Then get off.”
The father blinked. “Get off?”
He’d figure it out. Avo pushed off a loosened metal slat. The engines were getting closer. He looked at the nearest assembly belt. Ten feet. Easy jump. Avo leaped.
He landed on the belt just in time to witness two more drones slam and detonate over where he just was. The structure of the cylinder began to scream. Groaning, its top half began to bend, the tearing metal opening the spinning turbine, now on fire.
Another suicide drone was approaching. The air was tinged with static thrill and excitement.
Still clinging to the crumbling hull of the cylindrical corpse elevator, Avo watched as the father pawed blindly through the smoke, coughing and choking, completely missing that he was now right near ground level and could disembark at any time.
Idiot.
Sense told Avo to just run. Hunger wanted Avo to at least snatch the boy so he would have an easy snack. The memory of Walton reminded him and compelled him to stay and do good. Avo wondered if saving the same two lives repeatedly made up for the four separate ones he ended earlier.
Sighing, he passed his frequency blade from foot to hand and jumped back down. The ringing song of the machete-shaped weapon was an impediment to his hearing this close to his ears. It made it harder for him to judge where the next drones were going to come from.
The cylinder broke and folded, its cheap metal core twisting as the father screamed. A deafening chorus followed as it plunged through countless worker drones and belts, rolling over on its side. Branches of assembly belts caught and broke under its collapse. Metal and flesh spilled free into the air.
The father and his son began to turn under with the spin. With no time to contemplate, Avo leaped back down, gravity drawing his veins back like a bowstring as he fell. He landed hard, claws denting cheap steel. Something clipped the back of his scalp. A deafening scream of wind tore past him, the deep cut beginning to well blood.
Drone. Close. Any closer and he’d be without a head.
As the drone speared passed him, he noted that one of its leftmost engines was sputtering with fire. Must’ve sucked in a piece of debris during its dive.
+Lucky fucking ghoulie!+
This time, the other ghost-riding freeloaders agreed.
Sprinting over with the rolling metal, Avo noticed the father scrambling up as best he could. The idiot was trying to run up a rolling cylinder. The boy, meanwhile, was content to scream and offer no help at all.
The father gripped onto an outcropping of metal, clambering upward blindly. His handhold cracked and broke. The father screamed and tumbled back. The boy, unprepared, slipped free from his shoulder, hands clawing at empty air, his cries raising an octave higher.
Avo launched himself from a run and dove after them. Something exploded behind him. If it was the cylinder’s machinery or another drone, he couldn’t tell. He was just glad he jumped.
Lashing out with reflex-guided instinct, Avo felt the claws of his feet dig into the tender flesh of father and son. Their screams synchronized as he felt himself dig into their shoulders. A primal thrill slithered up his spine as he felt the beast inside him stir.
His leap pulled them free from getting rolled over immediately, but Avo hadn’t thought that far afterward. Open air and a shortfall awaited. Scant feet behind, the cylinder continued its warpath, tearing through the assembly wing.
A disoriented worker drone hovered by, its cone-shaped propulsors searing Avo’s shoulder. The smell was delicious. Lashing out, he hooked his blade through its chassis. His shoulder jerked and tore at an angle. A dozen fibers of muscles snapped like overstretched strings, but enough remained for him to keep his grip.
The drone pulled him up into the air unevenly for a few feet before its engines gave out. A conveyor belt passed below. From the periphery of his sight, Avo watched the cylinder slam into another of its own kind. A cataclysmic blast sent a rain of spearing shrapnel into the air. Another turbine caught fire. A new rain of bodies fell, burning embers in the wind.
They came to a crashing halt over another belt. Avo tumbled, his grip on his burdens unyielding. The same couldn’t be said about his frequency blade. The shattering drone tore his weapon from his grasp and sent it sliding along the assembly belt. It ended up embedded in a muscular torso. Just a torso.
Pure adrenaline surged through him. It had him so deep in its hold that Avo didn’t realize that he was dragging the claws of his feet against naked scapulas. The father roared in pain. The son struggled, little hands prying against Avo’s claws.
Avo released them, the red of their insides coloring the paleness of his claws so nicely. The way they writhed pleased him. Hunger rose. Involuntarily, he tongued his fangs–no. Avo bit back the urge. He was trying to save them. He needed to save them. Eating them would defeat the purpose.
The boy whimpered, compressing his wound with a hand too small. Rivulets of delicious crimson ran through the cracks of his chubby fingers.
Avo pulled his gaze away. Another whine made him look over his shoulder. More drones. Not over yet. Not nearly.
“Make him silent,” Avo said, not even looking at the father.
Another whine made him look over his shoulder. Not over yet. Not nearly. A smoking drone spun overhead, its engines spraying plumes of fire as it shot past the belt. Avo watched as it crashed amidst the debris below. He tilted his head.
Was that the one that sucked in debris earlier? Avo watched as it met the ground in a sparking landing, flesh and half-implanted limbs smearing apart in its wake.
A sudden idea formed in Avo’s head. Something that might ensure his survival, and give him some patchwork functions for his Metamind. Drones had loci that allowed ghosts to interface with them, allowing a drone-jock to pilot the machine from leagues and leagues away. If he was fast enough, he could siphon some ghosts and their sequenced phantasmics from the wreckage. Download those engrams. Regain some cognitive augments he was currently missing.
He grinned, the feral expression startling the father.
+Why’s the ghoul looking at the drone like that?+
+He might want to ride it.+
+That’s insane–+
+Ride the drone, ghoulie. Go nova. Earn your ashes.+
Thrusters screamed out from the distance. Past danglings of several belts and tumbling figures, a glint of metal flashed through the smoke. Another drone was coming. One or several, he couldn’t tell.
He needed to make haste.
Reaching over, he tore his frequency blade free from the torso. Turning, Avo studied the father and son. Deep red was staining the grey of their ugly tattered ashcoats. The boy was still weeping. The man didn’t look far off himself.
Avo sighed. It was just pain. Why were they fixating on it?
“We need to move,” Avo said.
“What?” the father said, gawking like a startled fish. “Where?”
“Down. Probably.”
The father shot the smoldering wreckage below a disbelieving look. “No!”
“Yes,” Avo said. “Just jump. Aim for one of the belts.”
“What?”
Avo growled. Maybe a demonstration would help.
Stepping off the edge, Avo fell fifteen feet before bouncing off the rollers of the assembly lane. Worker drones scattered around him. Bodies came apart beneath his weight. Turning, he motioned for the father to follow. “Throw the boy. I’ll catch.”
+You ever play thunderball, ghoulie?+ a voice in his head joked. The other ghosts around him echoed distant laughter. Space itself rippled slightly around him. Avo frowned. Another passenger had leaped into his mind, distorting his perception. More and more were haunting him. Watching him. He didn’t like the attention.
Looking up, he found the father staring at him in disbelief. The boy meanwhile was sizing up the jump. “You...wish what of me?” the man yelled.
“Throw the boy,” Avo said. He could hear another drone coming. How many more were there? They were wasting time. “You jump after.”
“I–”
The boy went over the edge without hesitation. Good. At least one of them knew what was at stake. He caught the boy in a dipping catch with his left hand. Avo blinked. Huh. His left hand was back. He healed much faster this time. Throwing the boy onto the platform, Avo tested his fingers. Felt clean of tumors as well.
A string of curses and slurs followed. This time, Avo watched as the father jumped as well, arms outstretched. Avo frowned at the technique as the man came down screaming. The father bounced against a hovering drone first before bouncing against the edge. Avo caught the man using his left foot before he could fall.
“Supposed to land on the belt,” Avo said.
The man said nothing, too busy coughing and wheezing to even reply.
A flash of chrome pulled Avo’s attention skyward. Something shot up from below them. Something barely missed them. Through the billowing smoke filling the room, Avo watched as haze threaded around in a curving arc as the drone made for them again. It was far now, but that wouldn’t last. Subsonic as their speeds were, they were still faster than him and the other two sacks of meat by far.
No time to waste. Avo hopped from the edge of the belt into the sprawl of metal and bodies as he made for the drone. Behind, he heard the boy calling for him. He ignored them. He needed to deal with the latest drone and only had one real idea of how he was going to do that.
+What’s the ghoul doing?+
+I think he’s trying to scavenge the Bodkin? Or something. No idea.+
The drone–Bodkin as his passengers had been calling it–was more like a graphene-tipped fragmentation missile. But then again, all drones and golems could technically be used as smart missiles thanks to ghosts taking up almost no internal architecture and being unaffected by even the most extreme of g-forces.
Cracks ran over the triangular compartment where the drone’s “mind” was. The sound of the last drone drew closer. Avo hoped the locus wasn’t broken.
Using his frequency blade to slice open the top half of the drone’s hull, Avo peeled away layers of titanium graphene before he finally found it. Before his eyes, a fist-sized object comprised of artificial crystal gave off a scalding heat. Avo often wondered how Voidwatch could contain the human mind in such a small object. Them being the only Guild to possess nano-fabs probably had something to do with it.
He felt the ebbing presence of lingering ghosts in its system forming constellations of cog-data across the locus’ three shimmering facets. Each plane held an activate phantasmic engram, designed to enhance, manipulate, or interface with cognition in a certain manner.
A locus was not a proper substitute for a functioning, conscious mind, but it had enough memory and nano-processing capabilities that it served well enough as a metaphysical anchor to root ghosts in.
Reaching into the slot, Avo pulled out the locus and clenched it tightly in his fist. The pilot was no longer connected to it. Good. Without a proper mind attached to it, there shouldn’t be anyone to interrupt his looting. He could take its engrams into his mind and convert whatever ghosts it still had into workable phantasmics. A splash of data booted behind his eyes. Avo watched as new HUD overlays manifested in his mind’s eye, linking his consciousness to the damaged drone. It lasted only long enough for him to snatch whatever leftover ghosts and engrams were still present.
ESTABLISHING GHOST-LINK
LINKING…
LINK COMPLETE - HOST UNDETECTED
SIPHONING GHOSTS … [22]
GHOSTS - [28]
DOWNLOADING PHANTASMIC SEQUENCES…
DOWNLOADED
PHANTASMICS ACTIVE - [SPECTER]; [AUTO-SEANCE]; [OSARAI MEMGUARD]; [PHYS-SIM]
WARNING! GHOSTS OVERCLOCKING COG-CAPACITY - 144%
Avo checked the corner of his cog-feed and growled. His twenty eight ghosts weren't enough to sustain all the phantasmics. He needed to choose which he was going to activate now and which to switch over to later. He needed to get more ghosts. More importantly, he needed to sequence them to each other and link their memory artifacts. That would increase cog-capacity immensely.
TUNING SEQUENCE…
DEACTIVATING [SPECTER]
PHANTASMICS ACTIVE - [AUTO-SEANCE]; [OSARAI MEMGUARD]; [PHYS-SIM]
Constellations flared above the inch-thin metaphysical halo that was his Metamind. Most pleasingly, a latticework of connected memory-forged battlements fused around the borders of his halo, cycling the trauma of his ghosts into a chaotic flood to prevent unwanted entry. At once, his former guests were cut from his mind, ejected in spooling ejection of phantasmal matter back into the Nether. He would tune back into the public broadcast if he wanted to hear what they were saying. Right now though, he savored the peace that greeted his mind.
Atop his Metamind, a blazing hand clung to a misted spire by sinews of interlacing thought and will. More and more ghosts began flooding into the sequences to support his new augments.
New functions and interfaces manifested in his Metamind. The cog-load grew. Scanning through the functions he momentarily deactivated, Avo grunted in disgust. Too many phantasmics and not enough ghosts poached. He would have rather it be the other way around. The Osarai Memguard wasn’t exactly what he wanted for a sequenced mind-ward either. Too porous, too simple, and a half-century out of date.
The mind-ward was currently running at a flat twenty-five percent upkeep for his ghosts. It would spike if someone tried to intrude into his mind, but through skill and mentalism, the cost could be reduced. He'd examine the patterns of the other phantasmics later. Right now, he still had a Bodkin to brick.
Without hesitation, he slotted the locus back into his new drone and poured his mind into it.
Menus and interfaces manifested in his awareness, Avo mantled the drone. There was a certain risk in the action he was about to undertake. A high likelihood of death, but he didn’t have nearly enough ghosts to guide the machine from afar with his Ghost-Link. That would overclock his processing capacity exponentially and would have required him to have at least a few hundred ghosts to direct or be linked to a local nexus.
That meant he needed to keep close to the drone and stay close. He fought the urge to sigh. Looked like his old passengers were right: he was going for a ride.
The downed Bodkin was barely larger than he was, and the damage it sustained made it whistle and crack under his weight. Multiple damage reports from the drone screamed inside his skull so loud he could scarcely hear himself think. The drone’s hull integrity menu displayed catastrophic damage to the left engine. Whatever it sucked in must’ve completely shredded it.
With a thought, he routed resources from the damaged engine and shifted over to the others. Three thrusters roared to life as he felt the Bodkin’s power core begin its spin.
Beyond swaying belts dangling amidst the devastation, the last drone was descending on him, accelerating toward him like a spear cast by the gods. It was his good fortune that he was dealing with an old platform from two centuries ago instead of a modern war golem.
Avo commanded whatever capacity of ghosts he had left to calculate impact trajectories. His perception was twisted and restructured as ghosts ferried through his mind. Within the center of his mind, his Phys-Sim flashed. Lines of transparent blue bled into red; the calculations of the ever-changing velocities affecting his surrounding environment became known to him. Impact estimates were fed directly into his mind, warning him that his flesh had no capacity to survive direct contact with the incoming drone rapidly accelerating to Mach two.
He inquired his ghosts about possible options to avoid the drone, his mind plotting vectors of evasion. Each dissolved within seconds as intercepting lines threaded through them, pruning his paths. On foot or atop his new drone, he had no chance of fleeing the incoming threat. It had four functioning engines. He had two.
So, he moved on to what he didn’t want to do. Intercepting it instead. He commanded his ghost to plot a new course for a near-miss.
PHYS-SIM CALCULATING - 44%
Avo looked at his frequency blade. He looked back up at the impending drone. A feeling of absolute madness settled over him. Above his head, his previously scant halo rippled with new complexity, growing to take the structure of a crown. Peering down beyond the skin of reality, he tuned more of his perception to the wavelength of the Nether. It was better to use the incoming drone’s leaking thoughtstuff to track it. Less chaotic to sort through than the sheer sensory havoc that was spatial existence right now.
Reality faded. The space around him dissolved into a sea of impulses fed by spilling thoughts leaking from reaching ghosts. He could see countless tendrils reaching down from the great locus above, the small hydra-like heads of ghosts directed by the spectators lashing at the minds of the boy and his father. They were huddled together. Their thoughtstuff leaked without order, coming from them like pooling porridge, free to be sampled by any and all. It was a fascinating horror to behold them, then, realizing that they were as vulnerable in mind as they were in flesh.
In them, the denizens of the city were certain to find easy prey.
CALCULATING - 66%
A thousand spectating ghosts wisped around Avo in a spiral, their constructs like drifting tadpoles. They were leashed through nigh-transparent streams of thought, the faint contours of the minds that piloted them burned like embers within the ghosts. Leading down from the locus above in chains, the metaphor of the forest stayed. Instead of one being constructed of metal and matter, Avo stood amidst a grand willow of memories, the branches all bleeding over into each other.
Through the thick of the Nether, past the emotional residue of his surrounding ghosts, Avo found the massive corona of circling patterns directing the incoming drone. A chain of ghosts coiled around it like a knotted flagella as, from a distance of unknown miles, a pilot tugged the drone to its final destination using thought and will alone.
If Avo had enough ghosts to fuel his Possessor, he could have assailed it from afar. Tried to crack its sequence. Sadly, what he had was woefully inadequate for para-psionic combat. He needed to solve this physically.
The incoming Bodkin was within a hundred feet now. His Phys-Sim’s impact lanes flared red. Avo directed the drone he was standing by to rise. He let the ghost do the flying. His cog-cap spiked into the nineties. His halo swirled as his mind felt like it was starting to cook. Even with so much support, the sheer logistical overload was bleeding over into him. He needed to see this done fast.
All he needed to give were the commands.
CALCULATING -99%
A sudden golden path materialized in his mind. His possessed drone rigged itself to the rails of its new pre-determined path.
TRAJECTORY LOCKED
His cog-feed marked the incoming drone with a target reticule. A simulation pre-played in Avo’s head. It was a straight path to hit him. His drone needed to make up for a missing engine along with a compromised hull. The incoming Bodkin was too fast. No counter-impact would save him from the shrapnel either.
Instead, it would meet it head-on and deviate from its path at the last moment.
Avo snarled and pushed the remaining engines of the Bodkin to maximum thrust. He clung to the drone with his left hand and angled the frequency blade with his right. It would dodge. He would cut. And if this went right, his would be the only drone left.
The world blurred. Avo ordered his possessed drone onward. He dipped momentarily back into reality. Matter and sound flooded back into the world. The winds were screaming. The chorus of spectators held their breath. Avo sank his focus back over to the Nether.
On folding winds, he rode to meet his adversary, their titanium phantoms fated for a final clash.
The drone-jock’s mind coiled violently. The incoming Bodkin twisted up and curved down at an angle. Avo hissed. The trajectory dissolved. New paths manifested before him, unfinished in their calculations. Yet, the nature of his take hadn’t changed. He chose the vector that would put him in line with his incoming adversary.
The impact loomed.
The winds howled.
Avo’s drone dove.
Unthinking, he lashed up with his blade. Its singing vibration became muffled for a microsecond, meeting resistance. An inch overhead, engines screamed and sputtered past. Something splashed to his left and right. Shards of metal and flashing fires burst across Avo’s vision. The heat licked at him, close and intimate, the thrill of surviving on the edge like a drug. This was how the Low Masters made him. This was what drove his kind.
Roaring with savage laughter, Avo pumped his sword into the air as he spun to stare at the parting pieces spilling from his enemy’s bifurcated drone. It splashed and tore across the ground in a tumbling ball of fire. Here was a martial feat he wouldn’t soon be repeating. Avo grinned. He would have made quite the snuffer in another life.
+Dead fucking gods!+ a spectator cried out into the lobby. Avo had tuned in just in time to hear the uproar; he needed to get a glimpse into where the next threat was coming from.
+Holy shit. The ghoul just out-jousted a godsdamn recon drone.+
+Told you this one’s differe—+
Avo didn’t hear the last accolade he earned. Something sharp tore out his cheek at an angle, entering through the back of his skull. The world went white in one eye. Only then did the ringing sound of a gauss gun follow.
As a flash of light silhouetted the contours of an immense shadow in his peripheral vision, Avo noticed broken strings of cog-data and half-finished physics calculations trail out from his parting jaw. Most of the strings were dedicated to his spraying blood while a single slide vector highlighted in red due to already impacting his person marked the path of what he could only guess to be a mag-fired spike. The strings lasted a moment longer before they dissolved, his Metamind glitching with the sudden relocation of his brain matter.
Avo stumbled back, toppling from the drone. Who shot him? From where? He tried to reach up and check his wound. His arm wouldn’t raise. His thoughts grew sluggish. The ground drew close. The last droplets of coherence bled out of him as warning vectors flashed through his cog-feed as his Phys-Sim calculated an imminent impact between him and the ground. He didn’t care. Wasn’t enough brain matter left in his opened skull to care by this point.
Dying felt calming. Dying was easy. Dying came as a relief when felt his skull splatter apart against the ground.
But calming as death was, it wasn’t going to last.
VESSEL DECEASED - PRESERVING CONSCIOUSNESS
REVERTING TO LAST STABLE INSTANCE OF ONTOLOGY
Attention: Warheads are inbound. Technothaumic reactor operating at maximum efficiency. Memetic integrity at one hundred percent. There is no need for panic. Please stay indoors and stay put until the end of this broadcast. For residents who wish to view block war entertainment options, please cast into one of our loci.
Optical telemetry from our interceptor missiles and drones is available for public view. To participate in hostilities, please register with your local Guild official for militia training and certification.
If you are still experiencing emotional distress, we offer fantastic discounts toward phylactery options in the event of your untimely demise. Simply sync your Metamind with the memory-code displayed in the corner of your perception to sync to our mind-lobby. A representative will be with you shortly…
-Megablock PSA
2-5
Resurrection:
Block War
RESURRECTION - 10%
ENGAGING ANCHOR-MEMETICS - LOADING MEMORY
The first nuke went off in a blossom of light, unfurling a scar of brightness. Neon-soaked drizzle falling from the skies scythed at the blast, culling the radiation down to acceptable levels. Spreading shockwaves pulsed through the groaning exterior of the megablock, but failed to inflict any permanent damage.
Inside the block, in a cramped hab-cell, a second-hand Kosla-12 Nethernexus media system strained its ghosts at max capacity to stream that little war happening beyond the walls.
Basked in its glow, a man and his infant ghoulling watched, beholding war as entertainment. All the while, a splashing broadcast spread from cell to cell, up level to level on winds of thought.
The cube-shaped machine swallowed a good fourth of the space remaining in the room, its hovering crystal locus spinning hot. The geometry of the hab-cell melded into a blended flurry around the gleaming needle that was its artificial mind, composing thought and memory into viewable phantasmic constructs.
A static-stained overview of the battlefield was projected as a whirlpool in the center of the room. Countless other menus displayed “localized” perspectives pulled from the various patrolling Specters swimming beneath the flesh of existence. Theirs was a design of reaching thought, crackled and unclear, but cheaply offered for all to see. Avo was less interested in viewing their feeds, however. He found himself drawn more to the ghosts peering down through the eyes of surveillance drones in a sub-void defense grid.
This block war was essentially a knife fight. Separated by a meager avenue and a hypertube station, a mere four hundred feet stood between the two feuding megablocks. That made the distance of engagement near instant and the exchange of nukes constant. Across the hulls of both blocks, gauss launchers flashed while spreading chasms of radiance yawned. From kiloton to megaton, the blast yields climbed, but no damage lingered. Neither did the radiation.
Some sixty thousand feet above, thousands of drones tore the midnight firmament into lattices of fire and shrapnel. Avo didn’t get to see from those drones though. Those drones were offensive platforms piloted by professional jocks. Instruments that could phase forward through time and engage underwater, in the atmosphere, and in the stable-void.
The surveillance drones instead hung more like eyes in the sky, watching the pluming explosions cascade and dissolve from existence. Walton said they stayed that high up to avoid the electro-mag pulses and people “Ghostjacking” them somehow.
Avo didn’t fully understand how that worked. All he knew was that everyone had one of the crowns here. It was as if everyone was a Low Master in this Tier. But then again, they didn’t really treat each other that way.
RESURRECTION - 25%
Ghost-possessed missiles slammed down and detonated between the station. As with the blocks, the streets remained unblemished as did the crystalline glass plating the local hypertube. Such was the benefit of living in the Inner Rings of New Vultun, up the First Tier. Things here were forged from memetic matter, which meant the streets, tubes, and blocks were unbreakable so long as someone remembered their existence.
Hence, there were no attempts at interception for the warheads. Nukes were mostly used as suppressive weapons these days anyway. Something meant to delay the arrival of drones, mechs, or golems to an assault.
As another flash of light bloomed, the already blinding radiance grew painful to behold. Still, Avo refused to look away, his mind as ravenous as his body, taking in a world beyond his understanding.
“Bright,” hissed Avo, rubbing his eyes. Within the cramped confines of the hab-cell, it was like being inside a box with the sun. A month ago, he was below the city, waiting to die amidst the ashes, last thoughts tied to hunger and delirium.
Now, he mostly suffered bouts of confusion and wonderment. Of his brothers, only he had ascended the First Tier, but the Undercroft had been nothing like he’d imagined. Squinting through the blinding flash, he found himself drawn to another blast, this one expanding against the northwestern corner of their block. The ghosts reconstructed and scrubbed the visuals clean in real-time, the details as if seen through his own eyes.
Beside him, the Master–Avo reminded himself that the Not-Master wanted to be called Walton–laughed. “Use the visor. There’s a reason I told you to steal them from that Hellminer. Ah, here, let me.”
Through the blinding haze, Avo saw something reaching out for him. Sheer reflex made him flinch back. Huddle into himself. His mind screamed for him to prepare for a backhand. A whip. Or worse of all, a sad-stick. The Low Masters always used the sad-sticks on brothers who didn’t listen.
What he got were a few careful tugs. With a final pull, Avo felt a strap tighten over the back of his skull, the visor now fastened tightly across his sensitive eyes.
RESURRECTION - 45%
“Kid,” Walton said.
“Yes, Mast–Walton.”
“Remember what I told you yesterday after you tried to eat the neighbor’s nu-dog and I told you to stop?”
“Don't!” Avo said, doing his best to mimic Walton’s voice.
The man closed his eyes and his lips flattened into a rueful smile. “After that.”
“I won’t hit you,” Avo said. Speaking the invaders’ tongue–Kosgan Standard, as they called it–still felt wrong, but up in the Undercroft no one spoke Nolothic of the high or low dialects.
“Yeah: I’m still not going to hit you.” Walton chewed his lower lip in focus as he adjusted the visor’s leather straps. Despite the sweltering heat and leaking sewage dripping from the pipes within the walls, a tangerine scent wafted from the man. Even now, Avo wasn’t sure how he managed to keep the fragrance.
“There, done,” Walton fixed Avo with a wry grin. “You’re jumpier than a cat on nova, you know that?”
The statement made little sense to Avo. Despite having Standard imprinted into his mind by the Low Masters, the native speakers of the language had strange phases that were beyond his understanding.
“Nova powerful; cat’s heart explode,” Avo said, confusion contorting his face.
Walton shook his head and laughed quietly, his glowing eyes dimming as the latest recent nuclear assault ended. “It’s just a metaphor, consang.”
Turning his attention back to the battle, Avo found the devastation clearing. For a few seconds, the rain was the only thing that fell upon the street. Across the curve of the horizon, the burning trail of a voidship thrust through the flesh of the clouds and made for atmosphere. Avo counted this time. It had been an hour since the last launch. Voidwatch’s produce deliveries to the planetside were constant.
From the watching eyes of the drone, a pyramid-shaped aerovec with three engines along its bottom and sides surfed through the fading blooms of nuclear fire, making for Avo’s block. Walton had told him that the rain possessed the powers of a “Miracle” and that it carried with it the altered properties from the corpse of one of the old gods and worked by layering itself over reality. Walton called the corpse by another title.
Heaven.
RESURRECTION - 55%
The aerovec darted high. A cluster of micro-munitions tore into the air from across the block like flying daggers. The aerovec banked hard and dove. Something pulsed from the diving vehicle as it descended toward the top of Avo’s block, the space about it blurring, twisting. Avo suddenly found it hard to focus on the aerovec. His attention slid from it like soap, like something was injecting distractions straight into his mind.

Then, he suddenly couldn’t remember what he was looking at in the first place.
Avo blinked. Why was he staring at a holo-screen that showed nothing but urban sprawl? Three missiles shot past his sightlines and slammed down atop his block. Why was his block being bombed? Was that a–
The thought slipped from him again. Walton laughed. The man was looking at another screen now. It also looked empty. Avo grew confused; that feeling was quickly becoming as common as his urge to kill and hunt these days.
“What happen?” Avo asked, trying to make sense of his atrophied attention span.
“Well, they had to go Incog sometime,” No sigh came from Walton. No curse. Barely even a frown. Instead, the man just fixed Avo with a thoughtful look. “Activating the Incog too soon overtaxes their ghosts. Still a mite bit early in my opinion, but we’ll see.” The man shrugged. “Bad odds on their survival though. Came in too hard and fast. Came in alone. One Snuffer lance isn’t going to be enough to push past outer security. Not even close. Our surveillance drones also have their own ghosts. Enough to peer past the wards our visitors are throwing up, anyway...”
With a single thought, Walton’s Metamind rippled into sight. Atop it, the different phantasmics of his ghosts burned like serried icons on a floating wreath. The pattern of a concentric crown expanded from each of the icons and fused into a simmering tower that rose from the center of the Metamind’s ripple, hovering translucently over Walton’s head.
This spire shone brighter than all the other phantasmics. Avo knew what the construct was and shivered. It was more akin to a weapon than a tower. It shaped ghosts and fashioned their worst memories into attacks that tore at the mind.
Ghostjack, Walton had called it. Something to usurp the cognition of another entirely. Avo had seen the Low Masters wield it as well, using it to crack minds and alter memories. More than that, Avo had tasted its touch. Felt it lash him in his infancy. Mold him into compliance.
Conditioned dread burned inside Avo as Walton directed a chain of phantasmal matter to the Kosla-12. The machine spun faster, brighter, louder. More visual feeds expanded from it. More interestingly, however, Avo thought Walton was channeling his own consciousness into it as well. Using it as a conduit for his mind to travel.
RESURRECTION - 75%
Walton hummed quietly, a distracted look on his face. “The West Ash that used to sell this system got liquidated and absorbed in the last Guild Wars, you know. Belonged to Ashthrone before they got cut. Someone on the board pulled a switch over to Stormtree. Ironically, the Kosla series is much more popular now: no company, no Intellectual Right Infringement active. No legal justification for a Guild-deployed Necro to null you into a coma for copyright violation after it detects intellectual contraband from your surface thoughts.
The system of the Kosla-12 flickered and flashed. All of a sudden, the visual feeds were reduced to three. These didn’t look like drone feeds. Instead, these were the micro-cams lining the top of the block. Their quality was poor. The images cut in and out, their framerates choppy.
“The ghosts are doing their best to understand machine code,” Walton explained. “Their processors are…different from human minds, represent cognition all the same.”
“Cognition,” Avo said, murmuring the word without understanding. It was something to do with his thoughts. But also ghosts inside his thoughts. Confusion returned. Avo wished he was a ghost. That way, he could eat away his emotions like Walton could with his crown.
Avo wondered if confusion would taste good.
Through the cameras, the aerovec reappeared. Avo suddenly remembered what he was looking at.
“Snuffers,” Avo said, excitedly. Snuffers were the people who had metal inside themselves. Made them better at killing. Snuffing. Avo liked them. Avo wondered if they ate the bodies afterward as well.
Walton leaned in and nodded. “Looks like trying for speed instead of caution.” He sucked on his teeth, a faint sourness to his expression. “Not very professional. Unfortunate.”
A flash of drones zoomed over the top of their megablock. Five miles across and nine again wide, coated by plascrete and made indestructible by the memory of its habitants, Avo couldn’t understand how exactly the intruders were going to breach the exterior.
Avo tugged the corner of Walton’s coat. Walton smiled at him and tugged in the opposite direction. “I don’t speak fabric-pull, kid.”
Avo pointed at the screen. “What’s their plan?”
Walton tilted his head and considered it for a moment. The aerovec spun and opened on its side. An assortment of six figures disembarked. Their bodies were vague contours to Avo, shrouded by holographic distortions. He remembered a woman being able to do that with her coat. Walton told him it was for privacy.
Something flashed from over the horizon. The aerovec’s chassis blossomed into broken shards of metal. Shrapnel rained down on the six, but they continued on, one of them lugging what looked to be a large barrel even as more shots streaked toward them. Two of the six misted into smears of red before they even made three steps.
“Thirty seconds, “Walton said. “That’s about as much as they got before they all get–”
A loud detonation rumbled from within the building. Screams echoed through the halls. Overhead, the lights flickered.
“Oh,” Walton continued, an amused smile adorning his face, “a distraction. Suicide operation. Wasteful but interesting. Scrabbling a single lance atop a block isn’t what I call a sensible tactic, but seems like they took enough of block-sec’s attention for their main thrust inside. Too bad they missed their target.” He tilted his head at the feeds. “I’m going to ask someone a few questions before they die.”
With a thought, Walton untethered his ghosts from the camera. Avo gawked as Walton’s halo spun, a churn of ghosts pawing to get free from the interior of his Metamind. He shot Avo an inscrutable look.
“Avo,” he said. “I’m going to make a quick dive. Now. I’m not your master, so I don’t have the right to tell you to do anything. But I do want to ask you…if you would like to see the Nether with me?”

Something in Avo wanted to ask where they were going to go. Something greater just made him answer. “Yes.”
Walton smiled. The expression didn’t reach his eyes. A strand of phantasmal chains spilled out from his mind and shot into Avo’s. A flood of thoughts and memories burned across their minds like stars igniting in sequence across a dying galaxy.
Matter faded. Only ghosts remained. Up the vast branches of thought that composed the sophonts living in their block, Avo felt himself pulled upward by Walton. It was hard to describe what he was perceiving. Harder yet to give words to what he was feeling. It was like perfect disembodiment. He was adrift in an ocean that was pure ego; a still raft being pulled by a rocket across waters of remembrance.
Through his new awareness, he saw Walton then in the Nether for the first time, no longer a man but a bird of prey molded from smoke and oil. A single burning eye occupied the crown of its skull. Each of its feathers played a memory, the exterior lined like blades of trauma, the layers beneath, comfort and warmth.
Through the forest of sprouting minds that was the Nether, Walton rose, his attention narrowed to seek the gleam of minds, shrouded beneath a skin of ghosts. Avo felt his adopted father grin. The emotion was purer than any expression could muster.
In a near-instant, they closed on their quarry.
+Can’t run Incog forever,+ Walton said. +Ghost capacity has limits. The more minds that are aware of you, the more sequences are needed.+
As if to demonstrate this, spears of memory lashed out from Walton’s feathers, plunging into one of the shrouded minds. The swirling ghosts around them tried to fight back, but Walton’s spears transformed into jaws and bit down, severing them before they could form.
A chaotic deluge splashed through Avo’s thoughts now. A foreign cog-feed sputtered and flashed with warnings. It took him a moment to realize that he was looking out from the inside of a Snuffer’s mind.
Her face flashed through Avo’s perception: a pink-haired waif with twelve eyes grafted along the side of her right cheek. An icon displaying the condition of her body and mental stability frizzled and dissolved as Walton sank deeper into her consciousness. From a first-person perspective, Avo watched as the Snuffer’s chromed limbs seized while wailing sirens rang on in her mind.
+Ward breached! Ward breached! Ward breached!+
RESURRECTION - 99%
BEGINNING ONTOLOGICAL ANCHORING
Through her bloodshot eyes, Avo saw another lance of tungsten liquefy one of her companions. The last of them blinked out from his sight, blurring into a run before he too was cleaved in half by a shot too fast to perceive.
+Now, you see what happened here?+ Waltons asked. Avo nodded. Well, it felt like he nodded. +There are several things that went wrong here. The first is that this was clearly a suicide operation they attempted and they shouldn’t have done it. The second is not accounting for unsuppressed weapon emplacements beyond visual range.+ He paused. +The third is trying to kill me.+
A flash of surprise rose through Avo. +Kill you?+


Walton hummed. +The explosion earlier. I scried it with my mind. Before we moved in here, I rented two cells. This one. And another closer to ground level. A Snuffer team inside the block activated and tried going for us there right when the initial barrage of nukes was launched. They managed to make it to the hab-cell I was supposedly in. Unfortunately, their Necro wasn’t good enough to notice my ghost-triggered explosives. A shame.+
Avo’s mind was still whirling at all that had just been told to him. +Don’t understand…+
Walton chuckled. +Sometimes I don’t either. Like why someone would send a perfectly good lance of Snuffers to their deaths. It’s stupid. Meaningless. An insult.+
A speck of rage burned across Walton’s mind. Back in reality, Avo shivered.
+They weren’t ready for this,+ Walton said. +They’re new. The Snuffer I just nulled: her name is Kriggi Mevlo. I have her FATE-Skein. I have her local bank information, home address, transaction history, and the mem-code to her apartment. She lives in Little Huang Sha, Block F-14, Tower B, Room 24-5A.”
Like tearing a blade from the guts of an adversary, he wrenched his consciousness out of her mind. Suddenly, the world around them went black. They were back in the Nether now. Between Walton’s talons, withered strips of fragmenting ghosts peeled away from the screaming wisp that was Kriggi’s fading mind.
+Better this way,+ Walton said. +Spares her from getting her mind slaved to feed processing power to a mind-lobby. Her dreams might die, but they’ll be her dreams in the end.+
Avo couldn’t understand why Walton was offering so much mercy to a woman that was supposedly trying to kill them. She was an enemy. Prey. Something that could be eaten. This was pointless.
+No,+ Walton said, reading the thoughts directly from Avo’s mind. +She made a choice to attack the block, to try and come for us. That’s true. But this isn’t about her. This is about me and what choice I make. What world I want to see manifest. And right now, I want a world where fewer juvs grafted into over-auged bodies get thrown into the grinder because of me.+
Avo still didn’t understand. +Because of you?+
+She is here because she made a choice,+ Walton continued. His owl-like head stared off blankly at the massive coalescing trunk of minds spiraling up from their block. The Nether was a strange place. +We all make choices. Those choices pull us. Intertwine us. Bind us to each other. The pain in her life drove her into the embrace of implants and violence. My choice made me her target when I leaked details about how her employer was running an organ farm in the Warrens, deliberately selling tainted bioware to poison the choiceless that choose to buy from him. All to see them dead as fuel for his thaumaturgy as per the conditions of the contract.+
Walton shook his head. +Greed is an ugly thing, Avo. All vices are. They wear you. Make you choiceless. You should always fight them. Remain in control of yourself.+
+Choiceless?+ Avo asked. He barely understood the rest of what was said. It was like his mind were jaws, and what Walton presented was too much to swallow.
+Yes,+ Walton said. +The FATELESS. The ones in this city who cannot claim their dreams. Who are bound to the wills of others. Like you were. All choiceless. All without the means to decide on your own dreams.+
Avo considered that.
Walton continued. +Did the Low Masters ever give you the option to walk away? To live your own life? Did they ever offer you any kind of agency? Self-determination?+
The questions were beyond Avo’s understanding. Quietly, he chittered, his fangs grinding together as nervousness descended upon him. He wanted to hunt. He wanted to kill. Killing was a choice. Eating was a choice.
Walton shook his head. +Where does your slavery end, I wonder. In instinct? In conditioning? In habit?+ A thoughtful emotion flashed through Walton. +Avo…would you like to learn to be a Necrojack? Learn my art, as I know it?+
The offer was granted like a piece of candy. Something cheap. Easily offered. But Avo had spent his life fearing the halo, fearing the ghosts. He wasn’t worthy of its power. He wasn’t–
+Yes,+ Avo said. His admission surprised even himself. He wasn’t worthy. But he wanted to be. He wanted to know power–now more than ever as he bore witness to what a Necro could do. He wanted to know what it was like to be a master, rather than a ghoul. That struck a beat into his thoughts as well. When had he ever wanted anything that wasn’t in service of the Low Masters or his instinctive bloodthirst?
When had he wanted to be something else?
An incandescent smile spread through Walton’s being. +You know, I’m not sure if this is a choice either or just a reaction to a lifetime of powerlessness. Suppose we’ll find out together.+
RESURRECTION - 100%
IMPLANTING NOUS
The thing about chrome is that it lies to you. Some street punk going from meat to metal gets their wires twisted. Too much too fast. Starts getting wrong ideas about who they are now.
Accelero makes you think you’re the fastest thing in the world. Titanskin? Makes you think you’re invincible. Whistlers are just plain unfair, lets you kill without being in the same room. Put all these things together you…you start getting these flashes…moments of fuckin’ pure euphoria.
Makes you feel like a god.
Heh. That delusion lasts until the first time you go up against an actual ‘Clad. Hells, it lasts until you run up against a proper Necro. Don’t get me twisted, the chrome still makes you better than some flat meatbag, but there are levels to this game just like there are levels to this city.
Dead metal is just step number one. Qualifying round. Make it through that and maybe you might just bag yourself a Soul someday. Then, you’ll get to see how deep the big rabbit hole in the sky goes.
-Mem-Log of Vincentine “Ripperjack” Javvers, Head of the Scalpers Syndicate
2-6
Slaughterman
Avo breathed. The world around him screamed with echoing cheers and crackling flames. A tungsten flechette materialized an inch in front of his right eye. It clattered onto the soot-smeared ground before him, still wreathed in brain matter. His brain matter.
ONTOLOGY REVERTED
RESURRECTION COMPLETED
MEMORY RESTORED
SOUL ONLINE
IGNITING THAUMIC CYCLER: 7 THAUM/c
LOADING PHANTASMICS…
He should’ve been dead. He should’ve been.
Clawing his back up to his feet, Avo felt a pulse run through his mind, rejuvenating his senses. He was dreaming just now. Remembering. The hab-cell he lived in–the block war. That was seventeen years ago up in the Undercroft. Just a month after Walton took him in.
With a shudder, he wondered how the memory could have played. A Metamind doesn’t work when the actual brain it was laced to gets splattered. Resurrection should have been impossible for him. But here he was, coming back to life for the second time that day, no phylactery needed. He was running out of possibilities as to how.
Avo blinked. His cog-feed booted and began filtering data inside his mind. Stumbling away from where he lay, he saw the broken chassis of his drone plastered against the wall, hissing smoke. Bricked. He stepped in something slick. Avo looked down and found a smear of blood painting the trajectory of his death.
Must’ve been made by his body when he fell. Considering how fast he was going, the gore was quite insubstantial. Pieces of skull and brain matter coated the disfigured floor in a crimson drag. A flap of metal had kept part of his scalp as he slid against it. Overhead, broken assembly belts swayed like parts to an alloy willow. Drones rained down in fragments and pieces. Increments of gauss fire hammered out from above, flashing down through the looming dark from on high.
A figure fell, their trajectory immediately marked by his Phys-Sim for a certain collision. For a fraction of a second Avo saw them, he noted that they were dressed in the fashion of a Hellminer. Industrial limb transplants. Goggles. Implanted tubes ran from their necks into tanks on their back.
The figure pulped against the ground, a mangled mess along with the rest of the falling detritus.
Avo picked up his pace before something ended up landing on him. Another explosion flashed above. Seemed he wasn’t the only one that decided going up this was a good idea. He decided to try and spot any thought signatures that were still present. Maybe he could locate the father and the boy again that way. Or get eyes on the person who killed him. He’d like that. Sample their taste. See the flavor of their brain in return.
Navigating through the roiling smoke and ruins left by the collapsed cylinders, he diverted more cognitive capacity to scrubbing the thick-hot fumes that enwreathed him. Immediately, he heard his ghosts begin to wail. Overcapacity. He turned off his Phys-Sim momentarily to alleviate the load. He'd turn it back on again when he needed to engage someone from afar or calculate something.
Instantly, his vision refreshed and it was like the smoke around him never was. More helpfully, it allowed him to avoid running chest-first into a jutting pike.
Smears of oozing thoughtstuff caught his attention. From a distance, Avo could see two figures fleeing through a conveyor gate leading into another wing of the factory some fifty feet above.
The father and the son Avo guessed. At least they were alive. He had no idea how long he spent dead, but seeing as they only just getting out of this area, he must’ve been resurrected quick.
He was about to call out to them when a bright flash seared into his vision overhead. Avo winced and narrowed his eyes. The ghosts tried to adjust but the issue wasn’t with perception, but biology.
He needed starshades or goggles for his eyes to withstand high brightness. A thrust pack gunned its propulsors repeatedly through the air. A deafening voice boomed as wild laughter filled the room. As his sight cleared, Avo watched the vague bright-wreathed outline of an enormous being dash into the same conveyor gate as the father and son.
Hunter. One who was running the chrome build of a bruiser and had a powerful enough thrust pack to achieve lift despite weighing a few tons. Wonderful. Avo grinned. More of them to eat. To make matters more interesting, their thoughts were shaped into an opaque, opalescent dome, but lacked the ripple of a Metamind.
Probably just a ward then. Avo knew how to crack wards. And judging from how it wasn't cycling, he guessed it was probably really cheap; something he could make in an hour.
The hunter pried the gate wider and squeezed his way in. Machinery broke. Metal walls groaned, folding. The figure threw back his head and chuckled, his voice the sound of caustic thunder. All the while, the ghosts kept cheering his name.
+Slau-ter-man! Slau-ter-man! Slau-ter-man!+
“Run, flats! Run!” Slaughterman bellowed. Like a wolf descending into a rabbit’s den, the Slaughterman followed the boy and the father. The hunter drifted out of sight in the physical world while his mind faded into the jungle of thought and ghosts comprising the local Nether.
Avo shifted his perception deeper into the Nether, trying to keep track of his new prey. Logic told him this was the perfect opportunity to run. Let the boy and his father face their fate, that they were certain to die. But Walton would’ve tried to help them.
And the beast wouldn’t just leave perfectly good prey alone.
Ethics and desire joined forces. Good sense was overruled. All was wonderful in the world.
The overlay of the Nether grew thicker and brighter, instilling his environment with an etheric resonance. Pulsing ghosts of myriad designs leaking spills of emotion and surface thoughts crowded his vision. There were thousands of watchers in this room alone. They bore chimeric visages with parts of their pseudo-ontology shaped to resemble nu-birds, robots, warships, and even long-dead celebrities. Connected by dangling strands running far up to the massive locus above, their hosts took in the festivities through the eyes of their phantasmal constructs in the safety of their own habs.
It looked strange from the other side. Avo felt a strange sensation–how he should have been among the ghosts, delivering mem-drops or planting nightmares into other hosts for his dives. Rarely did he pay attention to the little people serving as his distractions, doing the surviving and dying while he made his imps.
Suppose it was the same experience that let him spot the hunter’s trail so easily. The ghosts were mostly tethered together. Their leaking thoughtstuff bubbled and dissolved. The hunter’s thoughts, however, left a trail: an oily vector that painted an arc through the open air and down through the crumpled gates. A leak in his wards. Unfortunate.
“Found you,” Avo whispered to himself. Faintly, he was aware of a tendril of ghostly matter leaking down from one of the ghosts above him. It stung out at him. And splashed across his active wards like water. The ghost itself spasmed back as an injection of concentrated trauma flooded it.
Suddenly, it fragmented into pieces. Avo chuffed a low laugh. The host cut the link out of reflex. Ejected the damaged ghosts from their Metamind.
OSARAI MEMGUARD - INTEGRITY HOLDING - 99%
DAMAGE REPORT: OUTER ACCRETION DAMAGE MINIMAL
FRAGGING DAMAGE
REPLACING MEMORY
INTEGRITY - 100%
Through the chamber, more ghosts turned their attention to his presence now. Instead of swirling down to latch onto his consciousness, they kept a distance from him. An example had been made. The rest were wary. Good. He was no more a vicarity to them; not a puppet of meat to perform and entertain for their amusement.
A small measure of freedom reclaimed via his skill. This was a display of expertise. This was what Walton would have wished him to show. Mastery and skill. Satisfaction rose within Avo, but still, the potential pleasure of a possible kill called to him. He tuned into the thoughtwaves of the public lobby as he went after the Slaughterman.
+Jaus! Fucking Jaus alive! The ghoulie is back up.+
+Holy shit,+ a particularly nasally voice gasped, +the ghoulie’s indestructible!+
+No, consang. Flechette just missed its brain. If a ghoul’s still got a brain it ain’t dead. Seen the Reg-sims? Some of the rotlicks kept getting up even after getting cooked by a fusion lance.+
+That’s trash, we all saw its thoughtstuff stop leak after the flechette. Felt it die we did.+
+Well, unless this ghoul’s able to get up from being dead, Slaughterman missed his kill-shot.+
+Pretty fucking gamma-move for Slaughterman to fucking miss a ghoul’s brain with fucking ghost-aimed gun. Weird fucking shit, consangs.+
+How fucking many fucking more fucking times are you fucking going to say fucking, Flamelover99?+
+How about as many times as I fucking want, you half-strand, sub-human, gamma-ware organ-producing sack of fucking waste.+
+WHAT THE FUCK! THIS IS GODSDAMNED SHIT! I BET IMPS ON IT BEING DEAD! A MONTH’S SALARY! IT DIED! I’M NOT GIVING IT BACK! YOU SAW IT DIE! I DON’T GIVE A SHIT! I WON THESE IMPS…+
Avo was about to mentally command his Metamind to tune out of the public lobby's resonance when another voice filtered in.
+It’s alive?+ Little Vicious’ voice was nearly all snarl now. +What the fu–ah!+ She caught herself before she could betray any more rage to the publicly-watching spectators. Sloppy. Avo always checked before switching thoughtwaves. +I–as some…viewers might have noticed, there has been an unexpected occurrence regarding the status of one of our contestants. Presently, Fourteen is alive. I…eh…those ghouls and their regeneration, am I right? Anyway, as a gesture…of goodwill, I, Little Vicious, apologize for this mistake and will…allow all winnings to stay…+
Her voice grew more strained with each word. Her rage, on the other hand, flooded the public lobby in a tide, staining the waves with increased agitation. All that hatred for him. Avo was flattered.
Crossing past a collapsed beltway, Avo heard the ringing of his lost frequency blade and found it lodged through a detached cylinder servo motor. It still thrummed well enough. That might give him a chance to finish Slaughterman quickly. The alternative he had planned was to use his Ghost-Link phantasmic. It was more a communicative phantasmic than a combat construct but he knew how to null a mind with it in a pinch. Problem was it eating up a few of his ghosts. That would affect his cog-cap.
Following the already dissolving thought trails, Avo climbed up the wall leading toward the damaged gate using rents and cracks as handholds. Ascending up to the exit where his quarry fled while chasing the father and the son, Avo stared at the damage left behind by the Slaughterman’s warpath. The hunter’s impact left a massive depression in the wall.
As expected: a few tons of weight at least.
+Twenty-eigh–hm, ghoul’s alive,+ Little Vicious cut in again. Her anger was gone now. Choked off. Someone in her staff plugged the leak. +Twenty nine survivors left! But only eight hunters have made it this far as well. We got some fighters on our hands. Not gonna lie, consangs, it’s been a red, juicy night tonight! Love to see it! Looks like New Vultun’s gonna be burning bright tomorrow.+
A chorus of agreements and exchanges of imps surged between the chains. How flattering it was to have your continued survival bet upon by social refuse. Made Avo feel like a real star.
Entering the gate, Avo noted saw the words “INDUSTRIAL” projected overhead as a hologram. The passage itself was damaged and twisted. Wights had been pasted into the wincing gears and the machinery of the belt beneath his feet groaned, jammed from biomass caking their parts. As if emerging from the shattered jaws of some dead leviathan, Avo peeked out into the next room.
A dome-shaped expanse lay in ruins. At its center, a massive ovaline machine some hundred feet tall lay toppled against a wall, compressing what looked to be a control station into crumpled plasteel. Someone had torn through here earlier. Desiccated bodies lay discarded in savaged piles lining the ground. Avo sniffed and tasted no blood. They had been exsanguinated. Months ago, judging from the rank smell. Whatever did this wasn’t the Slaughterman.
Seemed the local Syndicate running these games liked to reuse locations.
Dented imprints of heavy footfalls left a trail further into the chamber. The dents were recent; the scent of the father and the son was strong.
The tingling thrill inside Avo grew stronger. Even with a frequency blade and knowing how to use a Ghost-Link, his best chances lay within an active ambush. Slaughterman was chromed to the gills. More tank than person. Avo didn’t care. The hunter had killed him. Shot him down. Spilled his brains.
Avo wanted to even the score. His natural impulse made it hard to wait.
The Low Masters cut a lot of emotions out from their ghouls. Hatred wasn’t one of them.
Stepping off the belt, Avo circled in cautiously, listening more than he watched. A loud hammering came from behind the ovaline machine lying on its side. A black shell of thoughtstuff glowed through the blocking matter. He found Slaughterman. And past him, saw splashing sprays of thoughtstuff–minds naked with terror.
Father.
Boy.
Deactivating his Auto-Seance momentarily, Avo activated his Metamind’s new Specter function. Suddenly, the pattern of his ghosts changed. Phantasmics were useful that way. Fluid between software and hardware, they simply gave the Metamind new constructs to shape and wield, opening newer options for the mind.
The gates of his warded thought accretion extended in a thin phantasmal sinew. A new visual feed manifested within Avo’s mind.
SPECTER DEPLOYED - EXTENDING PERCEPTION [67] FEET
COG-CAP - 67%
Carefully, Avo guided the extension of his awareness over the corner. The ghosts were watching him silently now, some of them commenting in surprise about how a ghoul had a Metamind, or at his obvious experience in using a Specter. He ignored them and stayed focused for any lurking traps.
As he peeked around the fallen machine taking up the center of the room, he caught his first glimpse of the Slaughterman.
Steam fogged the air, hissing from the ribbed radiators lining the hunter’s shoulders. Flaps of synthetic plastic masquerading as tanned human leather clung to the hunter’s back like a cape made from human faces, the eyeless flaps of skin peeled off mid-scream. His body was all ebony lacquered over jagged edges, layered in interconnected plates of titanium. A dormant helix-shaped cannon floated over his right shoulder, connected by a magnetic link of some kind.
Slaughterman was closer to a light armor platform than he was even a chromer. Getting grafted into a cyberskeleton would do that. It was also stupid and wasteful in Avo’s option. If you wanted to be a vehicle, why not just get a Ghost-Link and jack into a vehicle? No need for surgery that way. But maybe Slaughterman was the type of half-strand who liked needing a team of grafters to dismantle his groin so that his flesh bits could piss.
Leisurely, the 3-ton hunter kicked at the sealed door between him and his prey, a small flickering icon marking the exit as “MAINTENANCE.” The thoughtstuff spilling from behind the doors gave away the father and son. The way their brainwaves were moving, they were beyond terrified. Still, they were alive, which means they technically performed better than Avo did.
He frowned. Now, there was an annoying thought.
He drew the Specter back, deactivated it, and reactivated his Ghost-Link and Phys-Sim instead. He was about to consider his angle of attack when a pulsing wave of thought washed over him.
PRIVATE LOBBY REQUEST INCOMING - HOST: LITTLE VICIOUS
PAIR THOUGHTWAVES?
Avo narrowed his eyes. The host personally communicating with a survivor? Now didn’t that seem a bit suspicious? Part of him wanted to ignore the summons and go about his violence, but his curiosity couldn’t be denied. He accepted and twinned the surface thoughts of his ghosts to the paired resonance.
Even deeper into the Nether he sank. The noise of the spectators and leaking emotions faded. Alone, he found himself looking up at Little Vicious, her face formed by the lengths of a coiling hydra, her eyes represented by the gleam of two miscolored scales. She loomed over the greyed-out room, her cog-cap derived entirely from massive threads spilling down from the locus that burned them like a star.
+So,+ Little Vicious’ said, tone flat. +What’s your deal?+
Avo didn’t say anything. He waited for her to keep talking. See if she would give away her game.
+I muted the other half-strands. They can’t hear us. I know you can understand me. I watched you manually jack that drone. Saw you download the ghosts and patterns the jock couldn’t get out into your Meta. You’re not the typical kind of ghoul we use to pad out the roster.+
Avo grunted a laugh. “Typical ghoul.”
As if his brothers had a personality beyond “kill” and “eat.” They were their urges. Aside from heeding the will of the Low Masters, there was nothing a ghoul lived for more than satisfying their impulses.
He wouldn't be any different without Walton.
+You aren’t,+ Little Vicious repeated. +And because you aren’t, I’m getting very, very upset with you fucking up my little stream here, so I’d like some explanations as to what’s going on.+
He stared at her and frowned. Oh. He understood what this was. She thought he was a plant of something. Maybe a highly modded ghoul deployed specifically to hurt her views. Or perhaps just a life-bored Guilder who sheathed their consciousness into a ghoul's body on a suicider-bender, trying to experience all the savage delights available before time ran out.
He waited a moment longer.
One of the snakes twitched where her lip should have been. +Fucking answer me!+ Little Vicious snarled. Oh. He must’ve hurt her betting pool something bad by not dying. +Why are you here?+
+Trying to survive,+ Avo replied. +That’s all.+
She scoffed. +Really? A ghoul with a Necrojack’s capabilities turns up in my godsdamned Crucible just ‘trying to survive?’ Fuck. You. You hear me? Fuck you! Give me an honest answer? Who are you?+
Except he didn’t have one to give. The paths ahead of him narrowed. Avo realized that no matter what he did from this point on, her attention would be on him. Fixed to him. And if she could, she would see him dead if only to regain control. Her rage told him that this had gone beyond being professional into the personal.
+Me?+ Avo said. +Someone who chooses. Choosing to survive. Choosing to leave. Didn’t want to be here. Wasn’t up to me. Cut me from the system. Let me go. I fade. Take those two. You won’t find us again.+
A wheeze between laughter and outrage sputtered from her mind. +You…arrogant…fuck! What the fuck was that? I asked you “who” and “why!” You give me a half-answer of cryptic shit about choosing? And then make demands? You gotta be a Guilder? This a suicider? You wearing that body on a suicide run? Busting up my show for fun? Are you with the Reg?+
The Reg? A Regular was here? Avo sighed. More questions. More confusion. This conversation started nowhere and was going nowhere. She wanted something to vent her anger at, but in honesty, he was about as in the dark as she was. He hadn’t a clue as to how he found himself in the Maw. Even less about how he was constantly coming back from the dead. Ultimately, he didn’t have any good answers to give her.
And besides, she was cutting into his feeding time.
+You trying to save the kid?+ Little Vicious asked, suddenly switching gears. +That was an easy meal that you skipped out on. Tell me, how hard was it? How bad was the fix calling to you in the body?+
Taunting him now. Trying to get a rise.
Avo stopped responding. There might’ve been a path where he could have persuaded her to release him. To trade something for his freedom. He didn’t have the skills and attributes for that path. What he knew how to do were kill and jack. Right now, he intended to do both and keep moving.
Something in the back of his mind told him that after this, every last asset Little Vicious could deploy would be on him. Right now, he didn’t care. Death was light on his shoulders and growing lighter yet. He didn’t know how many more times he could come back, but he was two lives for two deaths so far.
What else to do but play those odds further?
+Not enough,+ Avo replied. He changed his thoughtwaves and rose out from the lobby. The last sensation he felt was Little Vicious' erupting rage. Almost worth it. But now, he needed to work fast because, after that, every last hunter would soon be on him.
He needed to deal with Slaughterman, and fast.
A plan formed in his mind. Well, more like a series of interconnected hopes manifested from growing hunger. Reaching down, he plucked a loose piece of metal and threw it across the chamber as far as he could. It skipped a few times before bouncing against the wall. He was already mid-run by this point, preparing to leap.
Something mechanical was turning on the other side.
Jumping up, he mantled the side of the ovaline machine, climbing over it as the large printed letters spelling “DISPOSAL” glared at him. Ah. This machine was where the disqualified Wights were burned then.
Ascending to the top, he found himself a full ten feet above the still unaware Slaughterman. Its helix cannon was pointed at where the metal shard struck the wall, too late to fire upon Avo as he descended down, blade angled for a killing thrust.
Or so he thought.
The helix cannon snapped back into place. Avo’s eyes widened. Faster than both he or Slaughterman could react, the cannon fired on auto, flashing as a coruscating beam ignited the air. A pillar of heat sank through Avo’s gut and cored through the ceiling as well. He bellowed in agony. The cannon flashed twice more before he concluded his descent. Twice more, Avo screamed.
Blindly, he lashed down with the blade and felt a sudden pressure pass through his blow. The cannon suddenly stopped firing. The frequency blade sank an inch further into Slaughterman’s shoulder. The three implants acting as the hunter’s eyes flashed. Behind him, his thrust pack expanded in a corona of light. Slaughterman struck Avo like a tidal wave of metal, burrowing against a wall.
Inside, Avo felt his bones shatter, darkness creeping up from the corner of his eyes as the pain followed. Just in time for Slaughterman to swat the blade from his snapped wrist. Cold titanium fingers locked tight around Avo's neck, sinking deep as his vertebrate popped in a chorus.
Weakly, Avo lashed out, feet and arms ripping, his claws squealing uselessly against metal. Slaughterman laughed and slammed Avo against the wall. Once. Twice. The third and all the rest blurred into one big beating; a miasma of pain. The tidal wave that was Slaughterman became a tsunami of raining blows. Avo felt his muscles fray, his bones fracture.
Again and again, the hunter’s punches sank through him, the smacking sounds of the impacts wet with ripping skin and spilling blood, made even heavier by the timed bursts of his thrust pack.
A mouthful of bile and blood poured out between Avo's broken fangs. Titanium fingers thick as batons clenched him tight, holding him aloft. Bloodied and concussed, Avo found himself gazing up at the three glowing eyes of Slaughterman. The hunter’s nose was missing, his teeth were like monofilament chainsaws.
Avo chuckled even as he hacked up his insides. The hunter looked like a child glued too many razorblades to a melted doll’s face. It was absurd.
“Thought I killed you,” Slaughterman said. His voice was like the growl of an engine, more machine than human. “Could’ve sworn I saw you come apart on the ground. Neat trick with the drone though. Very impressive. For a ghoul.”
“Missed,” Avo said. He coughed. Three of his fangs fell out. The sheer force of the blows left the right side of his body paralyzed. Shuffling his blood into his spine, he found what was wrong: part of his lower columns was now embedded in his left ribplate. Not good. Sword missing. Time for the other option. “Bad…shot.”
Slaughterman laughed. “Suppose I am. But it wasn’t too bright of you to come after me. I–heh–you know you pissed off Vicious something fierce. She’s yelling in my brain now. Screaming for me to kill you. You did come close, though. I’ll give you that.” A thoughtful expression came over Slaughterman’s face. “How long does it take for you to heal spinal damage? Wait, don’t tell me.”
He slammed Avo against the wall again. Something slid out of place. Avo’s nerves came afire as a conflagration of agony. The sounds that came from him were tortured. Animalistic. Familiar. Pain was pain. Pain and its fleeting nature were what it meant to be a ghoul. Pain was focus.
Avo activated his Ghost-Link. Plan B.
Jacking a mind, at its base, was fundamentally simple. You were not attacking the will of an individual. That was a separate metaphysical construct altogether. No. You were altering memory and wielding trauma as a weapon. What most Ghost-Links did was connect minds together via ghosts. It was more a bridge than a weapons factory.
That being said, however, Avo had an option up his sleeve: one that he almost never used. The four initial ghosts he claimed on the barge were raw. Unsequenced. Untuned. The deepest memory imprinted on them was being murdered by Avo. Pain. Fear. Agony. Horror. All condensed together. Avo was too beaten to spoof the ever-shifting wards of ghosts that shielded Slaughterman. But he didn’t need to.
He just needed to plant the ghosts deep enough. In an instant, Avo condensed and amplified every ounce of trauma his Metamind could identify from the scavengers' ghosts and fused them together into a piercing bomb. Pushing it out using his Ghost-Link's connect function, he thrust his makeshift weapon into Slaughterman’s wards.
Immediately, he felt sinews of infectious thought bite back at him, trying to flood him with countermeasures. Also composed of trauma. The climbing memories infected his bomb first, increasing its damage potential. Avo grinned. Fool. He pushed the ghosts deeper using his Ghost-Link and then ejected them from his system.
GHOSTS EJECTED
GHOSTS - [24]
Immediately, the wards cracked. A fissure ran deep. Avo’s grin grew wider.
Slaughterman cried out, clutching his head with a wince. “Agh! That stung! How’d you–”
Suddenly, the opaque shell that was Slaughterman’s wards fissured as the bomb went off. Multiple expressions flashed over the hunter’s face. None of them were peaceful. A choked sound tore from his throat as he shook and spasmed.
In the Nether, Avo could see the blasted threads of Slaughterman’s mutilated thoughtstuff flowing free, dissolving spill by spill. There was still enough solidity at the center containing something of the man’s ego, but it too was beginning to collapse. Insanity, followed by catatonia, then, were the next steps.
“You–you—” Slaughterman gasped. He tried to close his fingers around Avo's neck. Break him. Something major was missing from his mind. He couldn't do it.
Avo laughed, still held against the wall by the hunter. Not how he wanted to win. Or imagined it. But still, he broke the Slaughterman. He broke–
The door leading to maintenance opened. Someone blinked out from the door like a streak of lightning to the chattering voice of the boy.
The top half of Slaughterman’s skull vanished at an angle. Blood splashed over Avo’s eyes, coating his tongue with flavor, and blinding his eyes with the splatter. Reaching up with his left hand, the chromed bruiser pressed his fingers into the softness of his brain tissue. The physical damage matched his cognitive ruination now. Fitting.
“Shit,” Slaughterman muttered as the last breath wheezed out from him. He toppled backward, his grip on Avo’s neck loosening. His body met the ground with a final thunderous tremor.
Sliding off the furrowed slope of the wall and flopping down to one side, Avo could do nothing but wait as the clinking of metal against metal slowly approached him.
From the corner of his right eye, he saw the pointed tip of his recovered frequency blade pointed low in a hand not his own. A low contralto voice greeted him.
“Huh. I don’t remember your kind ever wearing clothes.”
Implants don’t make a Regular. Weapons don’t make a Regular. Not even training makes a Regular.
Regulars are made through trauma. Through experience. Through fortitude. The kind of fortitude that no amount of cog-conditioning can replicate. The willingness to adapt to any kind of physical alteration made upon their vessels and the stability to bear extensive neuro-modifications.

Through these trials and tribulations, what is already raw steel can be shaped into a proper weapon.
To call them hammers would be too limited. To call them scalpels belies their capacity for damage. To call them soldiers betrays the purity of their service.
So, if you think you have what it takes to be war incarnate, focus here to stream your details to your nearest Highflame recruitment center…
-Highflame Nether Ad, “So You Wanna Be A Reg”
2-7
The Right Kind of Broken
His savior approached with the caution one might take treading toward a minefield. Fusing his spine back together using his cells, he waited for the prickling to spread through him and return the use of his limbs. He couldn’t even remember when Slaughterman broke him. He remembered drinking the hunter’s echo even less.
IGNITING THAUMIC CYCLER: 8 thaum/c
A scant foot across from him, the gargantuan hunter lay still, the contents of their half-mechanized brain spilling across the war-mottled ground. Avo didn’t receive a ghost this time. Wasn’t much of a ghost to claim seeing how ruptured his cognition was from the makeshift ghost bomb.
Transferring a slapdash explosive made from raw trauma was a desperation trick. Wouldn’t have worked against even remotely competent memory-wards. Thing about wards though: without a Metamind, they’re more a cage. Directly rigged to your base-mind, they’ll tear up your psychology and bleed protective memories into your own. Schizophrenia is a common byproduct. As is anxiety.
Cheap products always incurred hidden costs.
+Fuck,+ Little Vicious snarled, her voice cutting through the room. +I knew it! I knew you were with the fucking Reg! You’re a lucky half-strand, ghoulie. Lucky, lucky little shit. Put good imps on Slaughterman snuffing you. Good imps now lost. Oh, but this isn’t over. Not even close. See you soon ghoulie. You and her both.+
The public broadcast snapped into silence as he felt Little Vicious’ presence depart. Avo felt a growing tension replace her. This was the second time the host of this little playground of horrors mentioned a Regular. Eyes fixed on the frequency blade approaching him, he suddenly wondered if he was about to take another trip down resurrection street.
If he was dealing with a Reg right now, then his life was pretty close to forfeit. Saying a Reg didn’t like ghouls was like saying an exterminator took issue with aratnid infestations.
Shadows shifted across the floor. Avo looked up, momentarily distracted from his potential murderer. The father and his son emerged from their hiding place, bodies stale with sweat, heartbeats decelerating.
The Regular moved, cutting the two off in a sudden blink. It was like they were in one place, then another. A gust of wind splashed over Avo. They had moved faster than he could perceive. Had an Accelero Frame-flex implant the least.
Not even Visekeles seemed that fast earlier.
The boy chittered something at the Regular. They didn’t respond immediately. Instead, there was a shuffling noise as they walked over to stand over Avo. The Regular had mag-boosted running blade transplants instead of standard legs. Explained how they moved so fast. The edges of their “feet” were rimmed with gore and glinted with a simmering heat.
With a simple nudge, they flipped him over with a kick, uncaring how their bladed legs burned him. Avo didn’t mind much either. Not while he was already hissing from the agony ebbing through his back.
Staring up at the ceiling, the Reg’s face remained shrouded in brightness, so shrouded by the light that they stood a towering shadow, their holocoat projecting waterfalls of grey around their torso, masking their physical frame.
Slowly, with blade at the ready, they leaned down.
A rough-faced woman came into view. Her hair was knotted in a thick coiled braid that disappeared past her right shoulder. The shape of her face was hard; sharp cheeks matched with a square jaw. The jagged claw scars running down her eyes were probably more statement than injury. It didn’t take much to strip scars from tissue. Avo knew those scars too. They were the type one would get from a ghoul’s claws. Likely earned in close quarters down in the Underways. Down in a place like this. Somewhere far from artillery and air support, with things collapsing into a desperate melee.
Something about her told him she didn’t much care about the lack of support. It was in her eyes, the absence of softness or worry; no fear, only focus.
The holotags dangling from her neck swayed through the veil of her coat. The tag’s design drew him into the embrace of memory, prying him ever so slightly out of pain's grasp. They were marked with a many-eyed creature bearing eighteen burning wings and a serial number. The Highflame insignia. Definitely a Regular, then.
Still, what was an official Guild operator doing in the Crucible? The strength of her heartbeat interrupted that line of questioning. It pulsed once and then stayed silent. Across the length of seconds, it stayed quiet. Every sinew within his body was flooded with worry.
It was uncanny not being able to hear the heartbeat of a human. Something that made them feel like something more than prey.
Of course she had an enhanced circulatory system. Maybe even respirocytes in her blood instead of just an augmented pump. Maybe a full Nanosuite. Whatever she had boosting her systems, it was far superior to the cheap chrome so commonly used by the chaff in the Warrens. Strangely, her Metamind was a simple single-ringed halo compared to his. It had a spiraling set of intersecting wards that cycled through memories, switching them between layers of lanes.
Avo frowned. He knew that design. Ori-Thaum. Oruboro-class. Required twenty ghosts to run at baseline. Probably ate up ninety percent of her cog-cap.
That told him two things. First: she was definitely not a Necrojack. Second: her relationship with Highflame had to be something special. Ori-Thaum was the rival guild to their ambitions. Somehow, he couldn’t imagine the two sides mixing products, even if it was pragmatic.
As he studied her, so too did he notice her studying him. Her expression was cold and blank. Her molten-gold eyes glared down at him with an inscrutable intensity. The cold war of silence persisted between them. Neither wanted to give ground.
From her perspective, what was there to say to a monster, who ate the innocent in the name of the Low Masters. From his, what words did he have for an old killer, whose extermination squads massacred a billion of Avo’s kind as a lesser backdrop to a greater war? Between them, what was there to say to an old enemy, who doubtlessly lost allies and kin to each other during the Uprising?
Not much was the answer.
Avo still remembered the dreams he smuggled from former Regulars in the Nether, the canvas of their midnight delirium painting screeching hordes of ghouls feeding themselves into kill boxes held by drones, artillery, golems, and soldiers; flashes of claw breaking against hyper-auged soldiers shrouded in nano-armored combat-skins.
The ghouls were made to be expendable monsters.
The Regulars were made to be far more than mere soldiers.
They weren’t equals. Not even remotely.
“Why haven’t you shot me yet?” was what Avo wanted to ask the Reg. That required more sentiment than he possessed.
“Dead?” Avo asked instead, flicking his eyes at the mutilated corpse of Slaughterman.
Her expression didn’t change. This entire time, her eyes didn’t blink. “You already know.”
Yeah, he did. No heartbeat. No breath. Last spills of thoughtstuff mid-dissolution. No coming back from that.
He expected her to drive the blade through his skull now. Deliver him back into the embrace of death. Instead, she stared on, frozen in thought and indecision.
“Sword,” Avo said. “Mine. Want it back.”
Her lip twitched. An incredulous look flashed across her face.
If only their former masters could see them now.
As she ignored him, her body remained uncannily still as if a statue rather than a person. The only thing that gave away the frightful speed at which she operated was her eyes. They slashed across his body by the microseconds, the faint glow to them indicating that they were entirely artificial.
Hells. Not even her skin was normal, seeing as it left no scent.
She was a walking absence in the room. No taste. No fear. No smell. Nothing that indicated she was prey. The beast hated it. Avo hated it but found a measure of amusement as well. How fascinating it was to deal with someone who fell beyond the parameters of your biological design.
She turned, her movements impossibly precise, calculated. She angled the right half of her face to face the boy and the father standing next to the door while keeping Avo in her periphery.
“A ghoul saved you,” she said, the rasp in her voice sounding like a leftover from years of yelling. The father nodded, eyes wide. He shot Avo a grin. Avo stared at the ceiling, pretending to not know the man. He would have kept doing that even if he wasn’t paralyzed. “Tell me, consang: are you pissing down my back and claiming it's rain?”
The smile evaporated from the father’s face. “I…”
Her head whipped back over to Avo. The way she moved was almost snake-like. One place and another. No move-continuity. “Do you go by a name? Or still by master and number,” she said, switching to perfect High Nolothic. She spoke the tongue as clean and fluid as any Low Master did.
Avo scoffed. Martial elite indeed. Highflame sure poured a lot of investment into a single individual.
A deluge of memories drowned Avo’s mind in violence. He remembered the Regulars. Remembered how they purged his brothers, sending squads of six or fewer to clean out entire megablocks. Remembered how their guns shredded his ilk, never missing, every shot maiming, crippling, killing. Most of all, he remembered the hopelessness when it came to fighting them.
Master and number. He was number forty-forty. He was the forty-forth hatched from his bio-nest. As for the Low Master that owned him…Walton had taken those memories away. Said they served no need other than being shackles.
Another beat passed between them. “No,” Avo replied, speaking Standard. She didn’t look like she was going to kill him. He still expected her to. Maybe some part of him even wanted it. It would have been poetic. “Got a name: Avo.”
She just stared. “Why didn’t you eat the boy? The father. You saved them.” Still using High Nolothic. Did she want him to use his birth tongue? He wouldn’t. He rejected it. Same way he rejected the culture that birthed him.
“Diet,” Avo answered. “Don’t eat those who don’t give reasons. Don’t eat the choiceless.” She looked like she didn’t believe him. Didn’t matter. It was the truth. "Why spare me?”
Her lip twitched; a flash of amusement lingered in her eyes. She changed back to Standard. “Don’t get ahead of yourself, consang. Haven’t spared you yet. Just never met a ghoul that wasn’t a nudist.” Her eyes cut down toward his abdomen. “Your sacrum’s shattered, amongst other things. Ligaments are a mess. Kidneys look like paste too. Your brain looks fine, though. How long is it going to take you to heal?”
Avo grunted. “Three days. If I risk tumors.”
The Regular sucked on her teeth. “Don’t got that kinda time. You’re up or you're dead.” She studied him again and tilted the frequency blade at him. If she wanted to cut him, he probably wouldn’t even see death coming. “You got fight left in you?”
Avo barred his fangs. “Ghoul.”
She nodded. Her Metamind spun. Behind her eyes, a battle raged. Two choices lay before her. She could cut him down and move on. That was the simpler choice. The other, stranger choice probably led down the road to his survival.
“Necrojack,” Avo added. “Can jack minds. Was jacking a mind. Till you stole my kill.”
She shot a look at Slaughterman again. She tiled her head. “So. That’s what his twitching was about.” She frowned. “Speakin' of: how the hells did somethin’ like you become a Necrojack?”
Something like him. Avo sneered. “Ate the right brains.”
He knew better than to agitate her, but he couldn’t help himself. He was good at his craft. Walton made sure of it. Not everyone could implant or mod away all their deficiencies like a Guilder.
Her lips thinned as her irises came alight. She was scanning his injuries again. A thoughtful look came over her. “Yeah. You’re the right kind of broken for this.”
He didn’t know what she meant by that. Suppose it took a certain kind of person to be a Regular, a certain kind that didn’t have all their baseline thoughts in sequence. Whatever she was thinking, he’d take it over dying.
From beyond the obfuscating veil of her holocoat, she produced a single injectable. The tip of the needle glinted clean in the light, but what caught Avo’s attention was the tiny fetus of a canid floating in the proto-amniotic barrel.
“What’s that?” Avo asked.
“Woundhound,” the Regular said. “This’ll hurt.”
Story of his life. Avo wanted to shrug. He settled for growling when she forced the needle through his abdominal wall and speared it into the broken fragments of his partially mended spine. His blood bit at the intrusive needle on reflex, trying to disassemble it. Not fast enough. She pressed down on the plunger. The dog fetus slipped through the cleft of his wound.
Behind her, the father looked ill. The son’s eyes grew wide.
Inside, Avo felt something take a literal bite out of his injuries. It fed from him, licking up the pieces of his spine, replacing the damage with restorative healing. He felt nips tickle across his body, and other nicks and hurts drained from his body. Something lurched beneath his flesh. Avo shuddered. Twitched. The snout of a growling dog pushed through the walls of his stomach, his skin distending as the creature began to swim through his biomass like it was pawing free from the surface tension of a pond.
As the woundhound detached itself from Avo’s clinging sinews like he was a gateway made of watery flesh, a sense of euphoria spread through him. His prior agony had vacuumed empty of his vessel, replaced by wholeness. He felt his arms and legs again.
Shaking its red, ragged fur, the woundhound pulled itself loose from Avo, panting loudly. Avo gazed upon its form and found it to be comprised of his wounds; a mangled living effigy made of his injuries. Columns of broken spine and shards of bone swirled across its fur-like constellations. The lesser wounds also orbited in its wake.
It was a good seven feet across and wide. It nipped at the air and eyed Avo with a tilt of its head. He felt a faint connection to it as if he had fed it as a mental leash connecting it to his Metamind formed. Right now, he could feel its only desire: all it was waiting for was for him to tell it to go “fetch.”
After that, it would dive into the flesh of another, and square the debt of his wounds into a new vessel.
It sat next to Avo. Halted at the entrance to the maintenance hall, the father and the boy just stared, wonderment and horror blended across their faces, trying to comprehend how the dog came to be.
Living beyond the walls of New Vultun probably meant anomalies from Ruptures and Fallen Heavens was probably commonplace items for those two. But still, true thaumaturgy was still a deviant sight to behold for the eyes of merest mortals.
The Regular offered Avo her hand. The fingers were still flesh. Callous and natural, at least on the surface. The woundhound growled at her, inching up next to Avo. He sent it a thought and ordered it to heel. It whimpered. Her lip twitched. “Dog’s not going to be fast enough. Take your head off before you can sic it.”
She wasn’t lying. She killed Slaughterman faster than he could perceive. An alpha-grade reflex implant will do that: make you ten times as fast as a flat. Still meant she was four times faster than him. He doubted the dog would even touch her if he let it loose. His best advantage against her was still his skill in Necrotheurgy, but he needed more specialized phantasmics to deal with her wards. It wouldn’t be just smuggling a makeshift bomb into her mind via a communicative link.
Wordlessly, Avo took her hand. The beast inside him imagined whipping a claw across her throat, slitting her arteries, and slipping his tongue through the cleft of welling blood. His rational mind imagined the last sight he would actually behold would be his ascending body as his head toppled from his neck.
Stained with his warring desires, his woundhound growled. Avo bit back his urges and glared at the dog. It whimpered and went silent.
With a casual tug, she dragged him to his feet as if he weighed nothing. He rose, finding himself a foot taller than she, but her bulk considerably thicker. Just her forearms alone were thick with enhanced muscle. Unlike the slithering eel-like organs he had inside him, hers were like taut bowstrings. Through her skin, he could faintly smell the carbon of the nanofibers.
She clutched his hand tight. “Draus.”
“What?”
“My name. You’re taking point. Stay ahead of me. Don’t lag. Don’t do funny shit. You stay straight and narrow and maybe I won’t snuff you.” She slid his former frequency blade down past the veil of her coat. Then, she extended a hand again, offering him a curve-barreled pistol. It had a layer of lenses running down the center of the barrel, fused in place by a lattice of cheap plasteel. An auto-laser of some kind was his best guess. “Don’t bother turning that on me none either. Don’t got the stopping power. And you don’t got the pace.”
Avo frowned. Strange that she was giving the gun to him. It was built for her hands, so he could barely get his fingers around it. Still, it felt awkward in his grip. Like there was too much weight missing. “Never shot a gun before,” Avo said. “Nearsighted. Ghoul.”
She shrugged. “It shoots itself. Got a smart-aim system. Link your ghosts to it and point to where they tell you. Then squeeze. Don’t jerk.”
“Better with sword,” he said. “Why not just return my sword? You use gun.”
She snorted. “Functionally, you’re slow. Likely, you’ll just drop it again. Presently, you can’t take it from me.”
All good arguments.
Avo accepted the gun. The weapons detail began interfacing with his Possessor Phantasmic.
Mirrashard-0227 Auto-Laser Pistol
An ammo counter manifested in his mind’s eye. Twenty charges left. Currently tuned to burst fire. Chlorofusion cells were still operational. Generating one charge every five seconds. Useful.
Another frown graced her face. “Still haven’t told me how you got to be a Necro. How you got that Meta.”
“Don’t know,” Avo said, half lying. She didn’t need to know about Walton, and he didn’t know enough himself about the Metamind.
“Real box of mysteries, ain’t you?”
For her and him both. He didn’t even have any ideas about how he ended up in the Maw.
Her eyes went dark; no more scanning. She motioned him to head down the walkway from whence she came, past where the father and the boy were huddled. Avo shrugged and accepted. Better odds than facing all the hunters alone.
He crossed by the father and son and noted their uneasy expressions. They had no idea what to make of the Regular either. Probably didn’t know much about the Uprising. As they trailed behind, he felt his woundhound nudge them out of the way, snarling. Father and son obeyed. Faintly, he could feel the dog in his missing injuries, like it was anchored to his wounds. It felt strange, but anything was better than being crippled.
“Direction?” Avo asked.
“Getting out of here. Heading for an old corpse delivery station connecting up to one of the blocks. Need to get a mile and a half up before we beat the game, and enter the Warrens proper. That or we can kill the rest of the hunters.” The Regular shot the father and son a look. “Well, maybe we could do it. Puts them at risk though.”
Avo tried to hide his salivation. Part of him knew this to be unwise. He got lucky with one and nearly got snuffed by the other. Would’ve been his death if he didn’t get tricky with his Meta. Might’ve even still gotten killed if Draus didn’t come in when she did if Slaughterman managed to keep his mind together for another second.
Still. He couldn’t deny that he wanted this. He hadn’t fed from live prey in years. He missed the thrill. He missed the taste.
He noticed that his cog-feed was screaming again. Close to overcapacity again. He sighed. Ejecting those ghosts was a necessity but had left him with less to work with. He disabled the Ghost-Link and cast his consciousness forward as a Specter. It would prevent him from being ambushed within a fifty-foot radius.
Peeking back at her, he watched as her thoughtstuff was contained like a pallid nodule at the center of her oscillating wards. No other phantasmics to speak of. No active scouting on her end. Definitely not a Necro, that one. Relied more on getting things done in the material. He guessed her wards were good enough, but he expected something more robust for her mind. If he had his original phantasmics, he definitely could breach her mind.
“Specter?” she asked.
He grunted in acknowledgment.
“How many.”
“One. Only got fifteen ghosts for my cap.”
Twenty-two. But what she didn’t know was in his favor.
“One’s good. Just keep it ahead and around and not on me. You catch a scent or hear a sound I’m gonna ask you to make that ambush-screech your kind used during the war. Remember which one?”
He shot a look at her. Another uncomfortable silence. He hated how much better she was at weathering them than he. He knew which sound she wanted him to make. The noise had never left him. It came to him when he was sequencing his own nightmares, sometimes. Watching your brothers get massacred by fire and metal tended to engrave the memories pretty deep.
“Yeah.”
“Good. Keep going down maintenance. We’re gonna take a left somewhere up ahead, cut through this madhouse.”
Avo acquiesced. After all, what was there to say to an old enemy, made a companion of convenience through this game of death?
Insufficient.
That’s the word every Snuffer hates to hear.
Reflex isn’t a want. It’s a necessity. Don’t have an Accelero booster or a framejacker? You won’t see what kills you.
Durability is a necessity. Can’t survive shrapnel or concussives? You’re going to die the first moment a micro-missile hits you–and it will hit you.
Skill is a necessity. The one thing that separates the rusts from the gleamers. Gotta be able to use what you got and kill out of your weight class. Jaus knows you’ll be fighting off your back plenty of times.
You put all this together and you might burn brighter than most. New Vultun is a land of dreams, consangs, but there’s a hell of a lot more of you than there are opportunities.
At the end of the day, someone’s got to be the candle for others to be the flame.
-Quail Tavers, School of the Warrens, Page 14
2-8
Mem-Locked
Scrying through the warpath Draus left behind in maintenance made Avo realize he was walking next to a hurricane.
As far as he could stretch his mind to see, from this room to the ones that paralleled it, devastation marked the way. He counted seven dead in total. Seven heavily augmented hunters armed with weapons both exotic and practical, all doubtlessly lent toward the purpose of snuffing hapless survivors for entertainment. The same seven encountered a Reg in combat and were found wanting.
Now, only five pattered beneath the flickering lights in these cracked and dented halls. At its head, Avo found his hunger roused by the aroma of death. Smears of gore and stripped limbs lent the trail a macabre aesthetic. The words “no hope” scratched into the wall by what Avo guessed to be a previous batch of survivors only added to the effect. Mangled viscera oozed free from broken implants–the bodies that they were formerly attached to were unrecognizable, smeared across the area as something between a carcass and a scrap heap.
A low snarl filled Avo’s mind. An ambiance of whispered awe and other chains of spinning ghosts kept a respectful distance. A building surge of rage filled the air with heat and frustration. +She killed them too?+ Little Vicious whined. Her voice was on the verge of tears. +That’s—I paid—It’s not fair! You were supposed to die! You were all supposed to die! Die! Fucking die! This was supposed to be fun! You’re ruining it! She’s ruining it! Ruining my show!+
Avo shot Draus a look. The Regular shrugged. “Crashed better Crucibles. She ain’t special.”
+Fucking half-strand piece of shit!+ Little Vicious snarled. Avo’s foot slipped into the brain pulp of a dead hunter. The rest of their skull was caked against the twisted barrel of a shredded drone. +You…just you wait! I’ll get you! I’ll fucking get you both!+
The broadcast went dead. Avo shot Draus a look. “Do this for fun?”
“Just keep walkin’,” Draus said. She fixed her handiwork with casual disregard. They weren’t so different there. Well, she smelled different. Her blood, for instance, smelled entirely too novel.
Inside him, the beast hummed in delight. It watched her, waiting, preparing for the moment she would be struck down by weakness. Prime meat. It thirsted to hurt her. Eat her. He never managed to eat a Regular. Perhaps—
No. Avo repressed the beast. He had fed enough earlier. He still had enough energy to go. This was just instinct, just a blind urge. One that would get him killed if he gave into it. He fought down the shivers and kept his focus on his Specter. A bend came ahead. He peeked around it.
No one was there. No thoughtstuff either. Quiet. No damage. Looked like they were entering a peaceful stretch.
“Got more impulse control than most of your kind,” Draus said, from behind. He shot her a look over his shoulder. “How’d that come about?”
She noticed his twitching. Guessed how he must’ve been feeling from that. How naked it made him feel. He hated operating in the material for that reason. Harder to mask his nature, harder to contain it. He envied her holocoat, then. It shrouded her loadout from sight. It could’ve shrouded his quirks.
“Practice,” Avo said.
That drew a laugh from her, a raspy noise her throat was unused to making. “Practice, it says.”
Avo shot her a glare. Her laugh turned to a disbelieving chuckle. “Jaus. You ain’t lying. Story behind you grows stranger n’ stranger.”
Avo grunted. He left it at that and focused on scouting again. His single Specter extended out from him like a groping limb, feeling its way through space and matter. He had taken its design from the Bodkin earlier and could see data surging down his spinning ghosts through his cog-feed. With his limited operating power and unoptimized memory-cap, he could only shape his Specter fifty feet in one vector. If he wanted to adjust its functions, he would need to sleep. Mod the memory artifacts in his composition. Replace its central emotional impulsers.
He could probably squeeze out four times more distance from the Specter if he dropped his wards, but that would also leave him an open door for a rival Necro. Great way to get nulled. Besides, even though he hadn’t seen proper Necro after him so far, he had no desire to let the spectators dive into his mind again. Their presence made his mind feel like a hostel that serviced junkies exclusively.
Still, their little avatars flowed and reached around with their Specters as well, resonating similar wavelengths of thought on the public frequency, leaking spills of thoughtstuff through their unsecured wards. Their tendrils continued to wreathe the area tight like the limbs of a forest. Every three seconds, his cog-feed would ping with a link request from one of his “fans.”
He sighed. While peering ahead through his Specter, Avo frowned and realized that he had made a mistake. Right now, even if he noticed a threat, he would still be first in line to get shot.
But he didn’t have to be.
With an impatient gesture, he commanded his woundhound to take the lead, his thoughts bleeding over across its leash in a synaptic instant. It bounded up from behind the group, knocking the boy aside with a yelp. Aside from its eldritch physiology, the woundhound was just like any other nu-dog you could grow. Maybe a bit larger than most splices.
“Any mods for the woundhound?” Avo asked.
“Market standard,” Draus said. “Bunch of them came cheap from the No-Dragons a month ago. They shot me a discount after I helped them with a dragon-hunt.”
Standard woundhound. That was good enough. Unless someone had something else capable of healing him or his injuries nigh-instantly, the woundhound was here to stay, and no amount of gunfire was going to stop it from transferring his injuries to another.
“Many pardons,” father interjected from all the way in the back. Avo listened as the man’s footsteps squelched through the remains.
“M-many pardons?” the father said again, disgust evident in his voice. The boy was at the very back. Avo could smell the bile on the child’s breath; hear him heaving. Their constitution was embarrassing. How did these flats live? “I…do…do either of you know each other?”
“Know of her kind,” Avo said. “Regulars. Muscle for Highflame. Trained; modded; sworn to service.”
“Knew of his,” Draus said, her voice tinged with more than an ember of contempt. “Not near as many ghouls left as there were. But like tumor-roaches, they’re hard to burn out.”
“I…see," the father said. He really didn’t. “So, you two were…coworkers.”
Avo and Draus both snorted at that.
“Exterminators,” Avo said. “Coworkers with ‘ratnids?”
The father fell silent for a beat. “I…do not think so? What is…ratnid?”
Draus shook her head. “City’s gonna eat you alive, consang. That is if you survive the proverbial breakfast that was the Crucible at all.” She shook her head and shot the father a look of pity. “What called you to come to New Vultun?”
“Land of opportunity. Land of dreams! Reality is stable here. No Fallen Heavens. No need to fear.” At that, he fell silent. “I met with…people. Uh. Border crossing people. They had…things to help us cross without notice.”
He was talking about smugglers. They probably slapped him with a Possessor. Or some kind of trauma bomb. Nulled his senses before taking him. Whatever it was, the man managed to get himself and his son sold over by a Syndicate smuggler.
Avo grunted. “Lucky you’re a flat.”
“Flat?” the man asked.
“No augs. No mods. Just human. Almost baseline. Your skin. It’s adapted to heat. Would've made you good harvesting years ago. Now worthless.”
The father stared at him. “You are saying…that us being sold here was good fortune?”
Draus spat. “No fortune in you being here. Fortune's for citizens, consang. This here’s just the hand you got, and what you can play with. And even if you make it up into the city, you are a long, long way from being sponsored.”
The boy chittered something. The father spoke back. Draus laughed. Avo frowned. Did she understand them? Or maybe she had an Omni-Glot phantasmic running? He hated being cut out of a conversation. All Necros did. What you didn’t know usually killed you.
“Heh,” Draus said, interrupting the conversation between father and son, her drawl growing thick with amusement. “I peeked the boy looking at the bodies I left behind earlier. Bet the ghoul can taste the puke on his breath better'n me. Boy don’t have what it takes to be a Reg. Trust me. Too soft. Could try to be snuffer, but I recommend against that. Most of those types die before they hit thirty. You wanna see your boy last right?”
“I…yes,” the father said. With every exchange, his voice grew more sullen, more despairing.
“Keep burnin’, consang,” Draus said. “Between me and the ghoul, you might just see the light of day again. Do our damnedest to get you up into the city. Let you meet New Vultun proper. See the Arks at least.”
Another beat. “Thank you,” the father said. “May I ask another question?”
“Won’t snuff you for it,” Draus said.
“Why are you…here? Helping us?”
Draus breathed. It was like she was taking a drag from the air around her. “I know what it’s like outside the megacities. Seen the places without the Arks. We promised better. You deserved better.”
Was it guilt he heard in her voice? Or perhaps just a lingering desire to see things change?
“Guilder that still believes?” Avo asked, unable to keep the mockery out of his voice. “Rare as me, Reg.”
Draus sneered. “Can’t claim to be no Guilder, ghoul. Just someone–”
An ebb of thoughtstuff flashed in Avo’s periphery as he peered out from his Specter. Not eighty feet away, he noticed another, rival limb, teasing through the murk of the Nether. Like a branch of ice, it hung frozen mid-grope in his direction. For a beat, both Specters just hung there, their Necros peering at each other.
In a flash, Avo studied the build of his counterpart. Single Specter connected to a wisp-thin trail of ghosts. That didn’t indicate they had much cog-cap to bear. Good. Neither did he right now. His awareness affixed to their position, he studied their location in the material. His adversary was through the walls to his right.
Avo screeched, the sound coming quickly like the rasping of a blade. Draus shoved both father and son prone without a moment’s hesitation. Down against the grime of the floor, the two toppled.
Through his Specter, Avo watched as his counterpart slowly reeled back into the nest of spilling thoughtstuff that pervaded the Nether. If his Metamind was better tuned, he probably could have cast the frequency of his perception even further, expanding the net of his awareness more than they could him. Detect their thoughts first and maneuver. Right now, they were dagger to dagger. Unsurprising seeing as his new phantasmic was pilfered from a drone centuries out of date.
“How many,” Draus said, flicking the frequency blade out. Its hum filled the air, infusing the atmosphere with pregnant violence. A shudder ran through the walls. A light chorus of ringing came from the loosened bolts spinning from a warped vent. Something large was descending, grinding its way down beyond the threshold of these thin walls.
“One–” Avo said until several more probing Specters pushed down from above. Four from the look of it. He got a better look at them this time as they approached. Each one was paltry. Minimal in memory and sequence. Missing wards too. Avo barred his fangs in a grin. None of them were Necros either. No Necro would dive with their mind barred. The grin turned to a frown when he realized he had no way of taking advantage of the situation offensively. Not without a Ghostjack.
“Four,” he corrected. “Maybe five.”
“Maybe five?” Draus asked.
“First one pulled back. Might not be with new group. No wards. Minimal cog-caps. Going to push them. See what I can scry.”
Draus planted a hand on his shoulder. “Could be a trap.”
Avo nodded. “Could. One could. An entire group? Unlikely. Too many weak links. No one to plug. Could also have Necro in reserve. But makes no sense. I would have probed. Sensed those two,” Avo pointed to the father and son, huddled against the ground. “Nulled them first. Right now; no probe; no attack. Just scrying. More lack than trap, I think.”
“Jaus,” Draus whispered, “you actually sound like you know what you’re doin’.”
He grunted. Nothing to say about that. His brothers didn’t exactly earn him the best reputation in terms of intelligence or impulse control. Definitely not enough for most ghouls to be good Necros.
A moment’s consideration passed. The four Specters were holding still, staring at him. He guessed they were afraid of his wards. Fearing that he was a trap. Good. He could use this–
One of the Specters broke from the four, pushing forward. Avo felt the splash of its attention spill past him and Draus before washing over the father and the boy instead. Snarling, Avo drove his Specter into its approaching counterpart. The frequency of its perception tore back to him too late.
Its host tried to pull back. Avo speared his mind forward, using his wards as a makeshift weapon. Bracing, he plunged layers of weaponized trauma into his counterpart. His cog-cap spiked, wards overtaxed from the impact. He lost grip on his thoughts as the outer layer of his Metamind sawed into the softness of his enemy. Thoughtstuff snapped free like tendons and oozing fluid both. Avo’s wards cracked. Through his ruptured defenses, however, he gained accidental secondhand insight into his foes as frayed drips of thoughtstuff spilled in.
COG-CAPACITY OVERCLOCKING - 124%
WARNING: MEMORY DAMAGE INCURRED
DISABLING PHANTASMICS
RESTORING DAMAGED MEMORY SEQUENCES - 88%
Avo’s cog-feed flickered. Interfaces quavered in his mind’s eye, unstable from the impact. It had been a desperate action. One that he had been reluctant to do for fear of it overloading his limited systems.
However, pieces of foreign memory drifted over him like oil over water. Good news. Meant the fool that tried scrying the father and boy was certainly nulled.
Flashes of screaming echoed in Avo’s recollection, moments of someone toppling over on a platform of some kind. A massive elevator. They were foaming at the mouth. Twitching as their personal cog-feed flashed with crackling static and glitched, overloaded by damage. Beside him, four other hunters rushed over, holding him down, trying to stabilize him.
Between his newly gleaned glimpses from the comatose hunter and the other Specters pulling back, the situation grew clearer to Avo. They had seen the father and the boy. And he had seen them. No more hiding now.
“Nulled one,” Avo said. “They know where we are. Opposite is also true. They’re on an elevator. Large. Coming down. Past these walls. Eighty feet. Or less.”
“Elevator from the block above us,” Draus said. “Think I know what you’re talkin’ about.”
Before Avo could continue, another spray of perception washed out over them, narrowing on the father and the boy more like a targeting beam. Avo hissed as spectral reticles flashed over their heads. They were mem-locked; this happened when an exposed mind was scanned enough to have a long-term memory tagged and mapped in the Nether.
“Draus,” Avo said, pointing. There wasn’t the need. She saw it too.
She blurred. The frequency blade hummed. When next he saw her, she was already standing over the father and the boy, a clashing spark flashing along her blade as she cleaved a gauss-fired projectile. It had been slowed by passing through layers of wall, but still, Avo blinked.
The exit wounds on the walls were the size of Avo’s fist. Metal folded inward like curved petals, whorled by torque. Pieces of shrapnel split across Avo’s cheek, forcing him to duck with a hiss. Twice more did Draus parry, and twice more did impacts ring. Her speed was something else, but there was an economy of motion as well; the way she used the weapon was as much a part of her as her bones.
Then, through the widening rents in the wall, a final shot slipped through. Fast as her augs made her, projectiles were always faster.
The shot struck her, dead on against her chest.
There are four main tenets to any tactical engagement: force, mobility, survivability, and asymmetry.
All four concepts must be studied and mastered by the agent and applied to the variables of circumstance. Understanding how to wield and alter these concepts is the art of miracle-making.
The agent must be overwhelming where their foe is soft.
The agent must maneuver to deprive their foe of sustained force vectors.
The agent must survive to adapt and learn from their mistakes.
And the agent must always strive to claim--and reclaim--the angles of asymmetrical initiative, to be the sole possessor of applied force; strike far when the enemy is close; strike mind when the flesh is hard; strike unseen when their foes have dominion.
-Osjon Thousand, Death Pruning, Page 1
2-9
Angles of Attack
Between the shot and Draus' subdermals came a roar of thunder; a tungsten needle cast against alloy-infused flesh that knew nothing of fragility. She rose, a single leg sparking against the screaming matter beneath her feet, torn from her stand as if by the backhand of a giant. She struck the wall, and in her place, the metal groaned, curving to accommodate her launched mass.
+Yes!+ Little Vicious’ voice returned. A shrill, mocking chorus of laughter followed. The spectators were alive with excitement. Bloodshed was back on the menu and they wanted it now. +Thought I was just going to let you all walk out of here? Thought the game was over! It’s not! It’s never over! Not till I say it is!+
Draus pushed off her imprint and cracked her neck, grinning viciously as if she had just taken a punch instead of a gauss-projected projectile to the chest. Her holocoat glitched for a microsecond and reset, concealing her form beneath its wave-like veil anew. She spat a fresh globule of blood onto the ground and slipped back next to Avo.
“Sniper,” Draus said, sounding more annoyed than worried, but he could hear the spills of wind whistling through the tear in her left lung. On her tongue, he smelled her blood and sensed the clotting already beginning to set in. She was mending faster than he was. But still wounded. Still close enough to human. “Think they’re reloading. Four shots. Tungsten piercers. Heard the gun charging just now; old railgun I reckon. Probably a Valquist G-7.” She laughed. “Piece of shit’s been out of date since the Second Guild Wars.”
The blood dripping from her chin made him chitter involuntarily. She was hurt. Maybe he could tear into her now. Maybe. But the way she held that blade warned him otherwise. A hurt Reg was still a fighting Reg, and a fighting Reg could still snuff him easy.
Avo considered peeking through the exit wounds left in the walls and thought better. His cog-feed was still destabilized; loose debris of thoughtstuff mended slowly in his mind as if broken strands poured back into the shape of a chain. He was getting his phantasmics back, but he couldn't rely on them for now.
The remaining Specters of his foes were frozen in place, their hosts too terrified to push forward after the casualty he inflicted. This lull would not last. Panic was impermanent, and the minds of men were ever so skilled at forgetting.
Soon, one side had to push. Claim the momentum and claim the initiative. In this, Avo found his inner beast and his mind in alignment: four Specters did not mean four hunters. Those could have just been the scouts. He imagined himself and the Regular trying to hold the halls, but the memory of Slaughterman's shot punching through his skull worked at his patience like a saw. To a mag-thrown slug, he was as much glass as the father and his boy.
Survival came from killing rather than being killed right now.
The boy whimpered. The father choked out hushed words of compromised calm to him. They struck Avo as two crumbling bridges holding each other steady. With a thought, he directed his woundhound to shield them. The bulk of the dog's length curved, wrapping them in a protective wall. No shots followed. He kept the dog there anyway.
Through the public lobby, Little Vicious was ranting about her vengeance again. Details about her hunters were the best that imps could buy, of the people they've killed and other details regarding guns, orifices, and corpses. Street-squire talk. Avo heard it all before.
“Ghoul,” Draus said. She didn't bother looking at him, choosing to wipe another smear of blood from her lips. A click rattled from beneath her cloak. It sounded like the chambering of a round. "I'm thinkin' I got an idea of how to go about snuffing these half-strands. Going to do some delayed hammer-and-anvil. We're gonna push through--get close and bloody with them. You hungry?"
He responded with a low growl of pleasure. Truth be told, it was getting hard keeping his impulses in check while she bled that premium blood of hers. A distraction would be good. "Always. Plan?"
"I storm up first. Force some shock action on them. Draw their fire. You come in after with the hound and break their cohesion. Got enough cog-cap to pull that trick again?"
"No," Avo said. "Two minutes reconstruction. At least."
"Shame. Could've made it easier."
He shrugged. "Could make it quicker. Cast your ghosts over. I'll use your ward."
She stared at him in disbelief. “No.”
"You're not using it much," Avo said. "Better with me. Got the skill."
She looked at him, incredulous. "What are we? Consangs? No."
Avo growled. Pointless argument. "Fine. Wasting time. Need to push before they do. You ready?"
Draus grinned. "Never not." Her Metamind rippled. This close, he studied its design and realized it was closer to a bunker than a fortress, her mind layered under thick wards, parting her from intrusion.
Across its accretion, a phantasmal chain lashed out from her and began interlacing with his surface thoughts.
It was his turn to stare incredulously. He never guessed there would be a day when he had to sync minds with a Reg to survive. New Vultun was endless in its surprises.
GHOSTLINK REQUEST INCOMING - ACCEPT?
Avo accepted.
LINK CONFIRMED
SYNCING…
SYNCED
He felt his awareness widen. Multiple new windows opened up inside his mind. He could see through Draus’ eyes now, see her combat-tuned cog-feed highlighting things through the walls, predicting firing trajectories for her. Phys-Sim; Medi-Scan; a couple of wind and temperature recording icons. Not the best sequence he'd seen. Definitely not the quality he expected from a Reg, but still, more than workable against their current competition.
In the upper left corner of her perception, her DeepNav was a chaotic mess much like his. Syndicate Nether-jammers probably; interrupted long-distance mapping for all thoughtstuff not on its wavelength.
"Sure you can find the way out?" Avo asked.
"Yep," she said, rising to her feet. "It's through them now. Thought about making a climb up the stairs, but now we got ourselves an elevator. How nice." She shot a final look at him and loosened her shoulders. "I'll move in first. Give me five good seconds of engagement before you follow. Don't need you catching a stray shot and dyin' before making yourself useful."
He bared his fangs at her. He wasn’t military. His understanding of warfare amounted to doing what the Low Masters and his instincts told him. However, years of diving in the Nether and his tutelage under Walton had taught him that going into a situation unprepared and ignorant of the parameters was a great way of getting snuffed. He certainly wasn't stupid enough to run headfirst into a slaughterhouse. That was her job. He was just here for the main course after.
"Try not getting snuffed yourself," he said.
Draus grinned. “Know their heaviest don’t got enough kick to penetrate my subdermals. Know that they ain’t all that fast.”
“For you,” Avo muttered. Distantly, he heard the whine of a mag-charge building up. Time was almost up. Father and son were going to catch a shot soon. "Now or never Draus. Get going."
"Yeah," she said. "Was waiting for the half-strand to cycle up the shot. Make him waste it. Remember. I go in. Suppress. Draw fire. Five seconds. You follow. Hit them from behind. Run them down. They're street trash. We can snuff 'em."
Avo looked at the pistol she gave him earlier. He doubted its stopping power. Better than just his claws though. "Wish I had the sword."
“Depends on where you shoot ‘em,” Draus said, a vicious grin spreading across her face. “Cheer up, ghoulie. If we manage to snuff and not be snuffed, I’ll even let you eat a couple of them.” A spill of bitterness filled the link between them. “Hells. Your kind managed to do it to a few of mine. What’s a bunch of rusts?" She shot the father and his son a final look as well.
Draus lashed out with the blade. A series of cuts flashed as she cut a cube-shaped entry into the already-savaged wall. Looking past Avo, she addressed the father and his son. “Stay low. Hide in the corner. We'll be back."
And then, she was gone, a bolt of violence tearing out the makeshift entrance she made. Avo gave the father and the son a shrug. Through the opening, the sounds of gunfire and screaming began nigh-instantly. Slowly, he counted to five, holding back the beast inside as he studied the father and son. He started at them like a nu-cat resisting the urge to kill and eat two newborn aratnids.
“If I die–” Avo began.
“You want me to take my son and flee–”
"Find a nice, high place. Throw yourself off with your son. Both of you are worse than dead without the Reg. Or me.”
The father sagged. “Oh.”
“Yeah.” Through the link, he caught glimpses and flickers of chaos unfolding at a pace his mind couldn't keep up with. He didn’t have her reflex boosters. All he got was a blur of violence and combat. Violence and combat he was missing out on.
He gave them a final nod and dove in. Flashing gunfire and a series of explosions flashed through two more hewn walls and past the toppled tube of a ventilation scrubber. Through the path Draus left, he found himself charging into a grand chamber that reeked of rot and rust. Leashed to him by an invisible cord, the woundhound followed, its eldritch matter occupying the gulfs of his wounds. He could sense its excitement, its desire to dive into another vessel and ferry the hurt.
Who was he to deny it?
Dashing into a spire-sized silo, he found himself gripped in the frenzy of active combat. Blurred figures battled and traded fire from different positions. The chamber was built around a massive pillar that seemed to serve as some kind of spine for the platform. Four broad-edged ebony gears shone in different corners, built to move the grand elevator up and down through the Underways. In a way, it was like he was standing at the midriff of an inverted tower.
Smoke and dust filled the air. Someone had detonated a smoke grenade earlier for cover. Pulsing gunfire trailed through the haze. A brief lull spilled over into his mind from Draus’ perspective. She ran something through with her blade. A vague blur exploded right in front of her.
To his right, a blastwave tore out from the fog. Avo headed toward the fight, his inhibitions loosening. Time to play his part.
+Kill her! Kill her! Kill her!+ Little Vicious howled. The pureness of her rage boiled the silo through the Nether. She was so focused on Draus that she didn’t notice Avo enter. Neither did the rest of the hunters for that matter. They were in the thick of the fight, their guns flashing from all corners of the room, firing up and about blindly, tearing chunks out of the pillar and the walls more than they were landing on Draus.
A series of damage reports pulsed through her cog-feed and into his mind. Minimal damage. Subdermals withstood the impact. She was surviving--even thriving--for now. But not fully fighting back yet. He needed to turn the momentum back in their favor.
Trusting scent and sound more than his sight, Avo went after his quarry, keeping low. A slashing net of monofilament cleaved overhead. If it was any lower he'd only get to have half a scalp.
Multiple targeting reticles flashed into existence around him before breaking apart. Draus was trying to mem-lock and mark out his prey. Trying.
Failing.
Through her eyes, he found himself staring at the battlefield at a high angle. He realized then that she was running along the walls, sparks spraying beneath her as she strode. Extending her left wrist out from her coat, he watched as a spinning cluster of three micro-missiles snapped out with a series of whistles. Through the smoke, they struck two and bounced off another. Flashing blasts mixed with spattering flesh confirmed the kills.
A rocket then punched into the space where Draus was running, causing her to stumble and skid back down onto the platform, taking fire all the way. A series of impact reports flashed through her mind and into his. Yellow markings. Not penetration but growing concussions. Her half-healed lung flashed orange, and her wound reopened.
She barely coughed.
She'd live. Avo saw the flashing bursts of fragmentation light up to his left. He had them now.
The surviving hunters fired their ghost-guided guns wildly, their projectile-simulating phantasmics struggling to right their unpracticed marksmanship. They were far slower than Draus, but ghosts moved at the speed of thought. A few rounds impacted against her shell. More damage reports. That was the tyranny of harm. It was always easier to hurt and break than it was to maintain and protect.
Feeling sluggish, Avo finally brought his auto-laser to bear. The ghosts possessing the gun synced with his Metamind. Even through the haze, it began calculating the best angles of fire, locking onto the nearest thoughts it could detect. A swirl of phantasms guided his aim, coiling around a target through the haze. Avo jerked his finger back. A burst of three lancing beams slashed out. A warning flashed through his cog-feed telling of a forty-seven percent reduction in lethality due to the refraction caused by the smoke.
Didn't stop the gun from being lethal.
The shadow of a four-armed, four-gunned figure firing blindly into the sky came alight for an instant. A beam struck him right behind the ear. Fire spilled out from their skull. Their optics burst. Their head popped. With a hissing rasp, they slumped over, dead before hitting the ground. Even through the smog, Avo felt the dead hunter's echo and ghost tear free from their corpse, drawn into him by a metaphysical bridge forged by murder.
His wards flickered around his skull momentarily, reminding him how vulnerable he was, and how fortunate the hunters didn't have a proper Necro among their number. His cog-feed began flooding his mind with a flicker of something. New interfaces flashed and faded in the back of his mind. He ignored that for now.
THAUMIC CYCLER: 9 thaum/c
GHOSTS - [23]
+Fuckin’ rotlick!+ Little Vicious’ voice rose to a howling octave, throat tearing in disbelief. +Are you kidding me! Are you godsdamned kidding me! She probably killed thousands of your brothers and you’re helping her?+
Beneath his breath, Avo laughed. He had eaten hundreds of his own brothers in the months after his hatching. Dying wasn’t special for a ghoul; more feature than bug.
His laughter trailed off when a flash of something shone in his periphery. Someone was coming at him from the right, their gun glinting through the smoke. Avo dove. Hyper-accelerated needles filled the air where he was. Rolling on his back, Avo let the auto-aimer ghosts guide him as he fired more, jerking the trigger back.
A spike of anger speared down into Avo’s consciousness. Little Vicious' mind was practically hoarse with fury. +Holy fucking shit! How the hells did you miss him? He was right in front of you!+
Through the smoke, a crystalline-plated figure charged him. The beams of the auto-laser splashed uselessly against the translucent sparks of a hexagonal shield. The crystalline hunter’s third arm came up to shuck another cartridge into his shotgun. The spikes attached to the cartridge were the size of cleavers.
The hunter chambered a shot. Avo yanked back on his trigger until the ghosts inside his gun screamed that they were empty through his feed. Thirty seconds to recharge if he got out of the smoke. Pulling the shield aside, the hunter aimed at Avo, their twin-barreled shotgun the size of an old-style fire hydrant.
They grinned at him, metal teeth gleaming.
He grinned back, watching them unaware of his woundhound approaching from behind.
The eldritch dog splashed into the hunter as if they were a pond. They shuddered, and suddenly their back snapped at an angle. Their head snapped back, ringing loud as they inherited each of the blows he took from Slaughterman. Avo felt the leash between him and the woundhound dissolve. His wound debt had been transferred. The hunter bore his burdens now.
Scrambling over to the crippled, screaming hunter, Avo snatched the twin-barreled shotgun from the ground. “My back!” the hunter wailed. “I can’t feel–” Avo studied the shotgun. Anvil Mechanics: Multi-Alloy Reflex Weapon. The gun felt cold to his mind. No ghosts to interface with. He was going to have to fire this manually. He wondered what that would feel like.
He pressed the shotgun against the hunter’s head. They held up a hand. “Wait–”
Avo squeezed the trigger. The gun roared, the recoil nearly tearing it from Avo’s grasp and sending painful spasms through his shoulders. It wasn’t nearly as smooth as firing the auto-laser, but he liked the kick. Beneath him, the skull of the hunter was spread out in a fine spray. The platform itself was shredded clean through, internal machinery churning. One of Avo’s ears popped momentarily before healing.
Loud. Heavy. Powerful.
A shotgun was a beautiful thing.
THAUMIC CYCLER: 10 thaum/c
GHOSTS - [24]
+Worthless shit!+ Little Vicious roared. A sob mixed in with her shout. +Worthless! Worthless! Why won’t you both just die? Why are you ruining my show?+
Distractedly, Avo sensed the countless spectators turn their attention to Little Vicious embarrassing display. From them, rising emotions of mockery and scorn rippled out and fed her loathing. She screamed, like a child whose tantrum was reaching a point of eruption.
Avo laughed. He'd add more fuel to the fire in a moment, for now, he looked down at his new gun and clutched it tight. See the Reg take this one from him–
Something hooked through his shoulder, a tug of agony dragging him up in an arc. The world around him blurred. He spun, slamming hard against the platform, denting metal as he folded its shape with his right shoulder. He winced but clenched his guns tight, refusing to let go. The hook pulled on him again, whipping him up out of the smoke and dashing him against the walls. Across jutting plates of metal and hissing vents, he was dragged. Took less than a second for his chest to peel open into bouncing flaps. The hook yanked on him again, bringing him high into the air.
For a moment he saw everything: the tether impaling him, a flash of Draus running up the walls next to him, firing another missile from her wrist, and blood trailing from her ribs. Distantly, the head of a hunter kneeling atop one of the gears exploded in a bloom of meat and metal. The tether drew taut, snapping Avo back down.
He heard the reeving before even saw the flash of revolving teeth. He got to learn it was a chainsaw after it punched through his abdomen, already spinning. Avo screamed. The pig-masked hunter laughed, his fat lips opening wide, his spinal-mounted tether retracting from Avo's shoulder with a squelch.
+Yes!+ Little Vicious cheered.
Pig-Masked leaned in, cackling, mouth round. Just wide enough for Avo to shove his new shotgun through, breaking teeth and peeling gums. Tears suddenly filled Pig-Face’s eyes. The chainsaw stopped. The hunter blinked and reached for the gun. "Mhphfhh!"
Avo pulled the trigger and painted a new exit through the back of the man’s skull.
+No! No!+ Little Vicious screamed.
A deafening roar went up in the Nether, the bloodlust and thrill of the audience rising to a fever pitch as Little Vicious descended into a wailing tantrum. They cared not for who lived or who died. They cared only that there were people surviving and dying. Worked for Avo just fine.
THAUMIC CYCLER: 11 thaum/c
GHOSTS - [25]
Tearing himself loose from the chainsaw, Avo held his leaking midsection as best he could before he bled out. Pig-Mask was twitching still, his fat tongue and lower jaw mostly intact. Avo knelt down and tore into the tongue, taking a mid-battle spongy treat. He worked in another few mouthfuls of food to encourage his stomach to start healing and tried to get back into the fight. He considered taking the chainsaw with him but it looked too heavy. Especially since his insides were spilling everywhere.
Another flashing gun pulsed through the smoke. Avo aimed, hand shaking as he pulled the trigger on his shotgun again. It clicked. Empty. Avo sighed. The auto-laser hadn’t recharged yet either. The beast inside him told him to cast the guns aside and charge. Avo ignored it and stayed low. He didn't want to find out how many resurrections he still had left in him before he was off to the Big Empty for good.
A whistling sound tore through something. Avo heard a body drop. Stray staccatos of gunfire came from a corner of the room, ringing and bouncing against something. It managed half a dozen rounds before Draus got to him.
What she did to the last hunter happened too fast for Avo to perceive. From his side, he listened as metal wailed, bones broke, and flesh tore.
Silence became the room, its vigil was broken only by the humming drifting down from the silo.
"You still kickin’, Avo?" Draus asked. Was that the first time she called him by his name? He couldn’t remember.
"Called me by my name," Avo said. "What are we? Consangs?"
A beat. She snorted. "Not even close. You hurt?"
“Fine,” Avo said, spitting out a mouthful of blood. “Just need to eat.”
He didn’t wait for her to respond, choosing instead to crawl back over to Pig-Mask, the plumpest among the hunters. Biting into the mangled stump where Pig-Head’s skull used to be, Avo was delighted to find remnants of eye tissue. He purred, delighting in its sweet flavor. Draus stumbled up beside him.
After a few minutes of sating himself, he turned to look up at her.
Her holocoat was glitching a bit now from the damage. He could see her left arm had a projectile launcher built into the wrist. A hovering needle sank back into its chamber. Micro-missiles. He wondered how many more of those she had. He tried taking another peek at her overall kit but she cut their connection too quickly.
LINK LOST
Still didn’t trust him. She studied him blankly, probably wondering if he felt bold enough to go after her. He couldn’t deny it. At that moment, if she showed him any weakness, he very well might’ve. Between glitches of her coat, her exposed torso was welling with rapidly scabbing blood, filling the cracks of her ceramo-plated power vest with a waterfall of hardening red. Not invincible. Not nearly. He sniffled. Her wounds smelled sterile. She likely had a nanosuite working in her blood.
She spat out a piece of shrapnel. It found its way into her mouth somehow. “One of the bastards pulled a Vezumo Farewell. Blew themselves up all dramatic-like when I ran ‘em through.” She frowned. “Lost the cutter.”
Avo glared at her, disappointed. “Got hurt pretty bad for it. Lost it quick.”
“Served its need,” Draus said dryly.
Avo went back to nursing on Pig-Mask's neck stump. He didn’t really want to think right now. He just wanted to eat. Dimly, he found himself aware of the echoes and ghosts slowly washing toward him, as if he was an island of magnetism pulling at the tides.
THAUMIC CYCLER: 18 thaum/c
GHOSTS - [32]
Again, all the metaphysical spoils of the slaughter went to him. Inside, a weight was growing, swelling, expanding like a living chasm. The feeling was ineffable. It felt bright there. His cog-feed glitched as well, flickering as it began to take on an increased cog-cap. He had killed--what was it? Three?
Draus killed seven. Her efficiency was admirable. He wondered if the one he nulled earlier was among that number.
A splashing footstep came from behind. The boy was looking at Avo, face pale at the gore around them. The father had a faint taste of bile on his lips as well. Like son, like father. Both of them were pukers, it seemed.
Draus groaned at the sight of them. "Hey, genius." She gestured at the father to come over. The man barely reached her chin. He looked like a malnourished child standing before a copper giantess.
"Yes?" he asked.
She cuffed him lightly across the head. The force made him stumble regardless.
"What part of 'stay low, we'll be back' was hard to get?" Draus asked. She flicked her gaze across the other bodies, taking inventory of what to loot perhaps. "Bodies ain't secure. Shit. Ain't even sure they're all snuffed yet. Come walking up with the boy like that and you could've made this all pointless."
The boy shouted something at Draus. She rolled her eyes.
He shrugged.
“Suppose we should head up next,” Draus said. “March out this place before we get anyone else thrown at us."
Avo grunted, and stilled. In the corner of his eye, he noticed the boy, shivering, staring at him. The father’s lips were pursed tight, face swollen and pleading. Avo narrowed his eyes at the two. What did they want? Why were they looking at him like that? He looked down at the corpse he was eating and understood.
"Ah," he said. He plucked a loose piece of gristle he had been working on out from between his teeth. The beast still wanted to eat. And it would. Avo just decided that he would wait. Do it in the corner. No sense in hurting the boy, good as the cruelty might make him feel. Walton would have smiled on that little bit of control, at least. "Bad etiquette. For the boy to learn."
The father shot him a thankful nod.
A more concerning thought came when he realized he couldn’t hear Little Vicious’ yells or feel her rage anymore. She was gone. Missing in the Nether. He wanted to believe that she was done and finished. That her tantrum was thrown and this was the best she had. But New Vultun wasn't a city of wants. New Vultun was a city of takes. He needed to get his Metamind stable again and restore his phantasmics.
He needed to stay prepared for whatever was to come next.
Beneath the pillar, Draus reached out with her Metamind, interfacing with a blood-splattered console. "Goin' up. Close now. Real close." Her words were for the father and the son. For Avo, she offered but a look, her eyes still focused, still serious.
Yeah. She didn't believe this was done either. Not by a long shot.
With a groaning rumble, the gears spun to life and began to rise, taking the platform on its slow climb upward.
All golems are drones, but not all drones are golems.
The difference lies in their ontology. Drones are pure coldtech: nothing thaumaturgical about them. A reliable fusion reactor. No Soul. No Heavens.
Golems on the other hand, run on thaumic mass and have a Heaven grafted to their reactor. Some of the more sophisticated models have Soul engines, but most designs don’t have the luxury.
Souls are things of scarcity in a post-scarce world. Unless you're a Guilder, simple arithmetic means you got to work with what you got.
-Fallen Heaven: A Treatise on Thaumic Arms and Platforms
2-9
The Golem
There was something absurd about working together with a Reg.
Here he was, not attacking his old enemy, just sitting back while suckling strips of flesh off the neck stump of a pig-headed bruiser. Draus, on the other hand, indulged in another kind of cannibalism, casually looting and mutilating the dead for guns and lootable implants. She was watching him too. She didn’t try to hide it. Her face was on the border between discomfort, hatred, and confusion.
How did he feel about her? Same as he felt about anyone he couldn’t reliably kill. Frustration and hunger.
PHANTASMICS RESTORED
RUNNING: [GHOST-LINK]; [OSARAI MEMGUARD]; [PHYS-SIM]; [SPECTER]
INACTIVE: [AUTO-SEANCE]
His cog-feed stabilized and his phantasmics loaded. Studying the cognitive distribution flowing between his ghosts, he noted that one amongst the dead hunters must’ve had quite the remarkable memory capacity for him to suddenly be able to support another phantasmic. He would have to sequence that one out when he went to sleep later.
For now, he applied the knowledge that his cognitive defenses were back to his anxiety like a paltry balm. Good thing he was this deep in the Underways. Weren’t that many actual Necros down in Warrens either. Most the Metaminds he pilfered through were used secondhand by the hunters. Explained why some of the Metas were outright insane as well–thought-dissonance was fraying for both minds while synchronization enhanced thinking exponentially.
That made them usable by him. The fact that their wards and phantasmics looked to be counterfeit sequences put together worse than what he already had watered the gardens of his disappointment with another splash of warm piss.
They were going up now. The massive platform rumbled up to the waste recycling beneath a megablock. Or so Draus claimed. She said it was abandoned by the Guilds. Said whatever Syndicate running the district above them owned it now. Which meant that they could have been ascending to meet their death for all he knew.
Thin wisping strands slithered around him. The ghosts were drawing closer again. Through them, he tasted a budding excitement. They were whispering about the slaughter they just witnessed. Ghoul and Reg butchering hunters together. A clip of that was going to flush through the Nether lobbies across the city tomorrow. Left a bad taste in Avo’s mouth. Gaining any kind of notoriety was bad for him, especially considering what he was, and especially considering his trade.
It had been a good twenty minutes of climbing through the battle-warped interior of the elevator silo. The walls were scarred and pockmarked by gunfire and shrapnel; the last vestiges of bygone massacres. Avo wasn’t the first to ascend these paths. Not him. Not Draus. Definitely not the flats. But maybe, just maybe, they would be the ones to finish the ascent.
Would’ve been easier to delude himself with that hope if he knew what Little Vicious was doing. Something about the host’s absence caused a yawning pit to grow in his stomach. She didn’t sound like the reasonable kind. The kind to know when to cut her losses. She had taken his continued survival personally. Avo would bet his half-formed kidneys she’d make another run at them somehow.
He frowned. Didn’t she say there were only supposed to be ten or so hunters left? Well. That was a lie. But what did he expect? For the murderous host to a carnival of snuff to practice the virtue of truth?
+Fuck me, but that slaughter hit the spot,+ one of the spectators whispered in the public lobby. +Not every day you get saved by the Dread Draus herself. Mad fuckin’ half strand. Who the hells crashes Crucibles for fun?+
+We’re watching a Crucible for fun, dumbass.+
+Yeah, but she’s living it. Like I said: mad.+
+Pft. Fuckin’ Regs got a better health plan than we do. She dies, she gets her consciousness ported over to her backup sheathe. We die and that’s it. Donezo. Snuffed. Off to the Big Nothing or looped into a Soul to feed the Heavens for the rest of time.+
Chains of ghosts were circling the platform, but still keeping their distance. Wise. Avo had half a mind to null a few more of them to make a couple more examples but decided the amusement wasn’t worth the cost. He had more ghosts and an increased cog-cap, but the spectators had wards of their own. The best case was mutually assured damage. He needed to conserve what he had for when he needed it.
After finishing his meal, he spent some time going over the dead with Draus. She said that they were something of a “fire brigade.” Syndicate hired rapid-response units. Not really part of the festivities and held in reserve mainly for interfering variables like her or stream-raids from their rivals.
Not a word about why exactly she spent her time crashing Crucibles, though.
Between bouts of feeding, Avo peeked looks at the Regular, studying her. Earlier, he thought her implants to be advanced. Alphware even. And maybe for a time, the chrome she had was, but the fight earlier made him question the last time she went to the grafters for an upgrade.
She was fast. Plenty strong enough too, but this was nothing compared to what a Regular was supposed to be capable of. The way she fought was practiced and fluid, but ultimately too close to a “lesser” human for his suspicions. He wondered if her evident limitations came with not being her in combat-skin or this vessel just being a diminished sheathe for her to wear as recreation away from her prime body.
Avo frowned at the possibility of her having multiple sheathes. It was hard keeping a consciousness anchored after the destruction of the vessel. Took a lot of ghosts and phantasmics to keep the mind stable–egos tended to disintegrate and lose sanity without enough physical feedback. The number of imps it took to afford that kind of resurrection was somewhere north of owning multiple megablocks.
He stared at Draus again and found her pilfering a grenade from another corpse. Yeah. She didn’t strike him as the wealthy kind. Had all the wrong habits.
Not far, the boy emptied his stomach again. So did his father. Avo could smell the stink of an infected wound from a mile off. Their injuries–though comparatively minor–were raw, reddened with swelling, and bordered by a wall of growing pustules. Right. They were still living on one-point-oh immunes systems, and New Vultun had bombarded itself with enough viruses to kill a flat in seconds over the course of the last two Guild Wars.
Only reason the two weren’t dead yet was because Voidwatch constantly updated the nanoclouds above with new and improved vaccinations to be applied to the public via the nightly downpour.
If they lived to see the surface and made it to taste the midnight rains, they’d make it.
If.
Draus tossed an organic eye at him as she walked by. He caught it and sniffed at the organ, his apprehension and hunger doing battle. “Why?”
“‘Member your kind liking eyes. You different about that too?”
Avo scooped the eye into his mouth and savored it. The way it popped between his fangs was always satisfying. “No,” he said to her when he finished chewing. She gave him the faintest nod.
She had a railgun poking through her coat’s shoulder now, its length protruding from the holographic veil like an iceberg from water. It was probably what the hunters were firing at them earlier. He recalled the name. Valquist G-7. Indeed, he saw the lettering imprinted over the right barrel of the gun.
She handed him a few more bullets for his new shotgun. The drum holding his multi-alloy ammo was about as large as his fist and contained around twelve spikes. Strangely, it had a crude belt knotted around its exterior. Didn’t look like that came with the gun.
“Strap it on,” Draus said. Avo did just that. The weight of the bandolier hung from his shoulder awkwardly, but it was better than holding a bunch of loose bullets. “Be useful for reloading when you need to. Reckon you should keep doing what you were doing with it. It’s thick and sturdy enough to be a blunt instrument. Staying close also keeps you from missing.”
Avo grunted. “Like the recoil.” He noticed that Draus was still staring at him, her expression growing increasingly inscrutable. “Something to say?”
“Yeah,” Draus said, though the dryness in her drawl made her sound on edge. Uncertain. “You… uh…that trick with the Specter you pulled. Using your wards as a weapon. That wasn’t a normal tactic. Stranger thing is, I’ve seen it done more than once before in the field.”
Avo grunted. “Not a good idea. Unplanned. Desperate. Sloppy.”
“And the sign of someone who actually knows how to jack.” It really didn’t sound much like a compliment coming from her. She folded her arms. “You’re ain’t screaming and trying to kill everything that moves. You can talk, though you don’t cotton to using anything more than simple sentences. And, more’n that, you don’t really seem all that surprised about where you are and why you’re here neither.”
She leaned in closer, almost conspiratorially. “You weren’t spoofing my memories when you said you were a Jacker, were you?”
“No. Surprised you don’t know. Don’t learn this in Guilder academy, Dread Draus?”
Draus laughed, her war-stressed face wrinkling at the forehead. Avo glared. He wasn’t aware that he said something funny. “You’re a real sensitive sort for a ghoul, you know that?”
“Sensitive?” Well. That was new. No one called him sensitive before.
“Thin-skinned is what I’m calling you,” Draus said.
“No,” Avo said, correcting her. “Not thin-skinned. Just annoyed. Just tired.” He sighed. He hated small talk–whatever this was. He wanted to go back to waiting in silence on his own, watching her from a distance. Far enough that he could ward-bash her mind with a Specter if he had to. At this range, he wouldn’t even get a fraction of a second. "Conversation is pointless. Anything else?"
Draus shot him a flat stare. “Jaus, ghoulie, you sure do sound like my old team captain, know that? He liked telling me to piss off too."
“He also a Necro?”
“No. He was also a half-strand though,” Draus said. “He would–hells, he wouldn’t like you. Seeing as one of your Low Masters nulled him. Left him a drooling vegetable.”
Your Low Masters. The beast coiled inside him, tremoring with fury. No. Not his masters. Not for years. And not anymore. “Shame. Highflame couldn’t put his mind back together? Hm. No. Not one of their specialties. Ori-Thaum maybe. But they wouldn’t fix him. Not for Highflame.”
She bared her teeth at him, a mocking grin spreading over her features. “Like I said: thin-skinned.” But there was no amusement behind her eyes. Instead, a spark of something more vicious bled out from her glare. One of her fingers twitched. Even hurt as she was, Avo had little doubt she could pull him apart in seconds. She had three more guns hanging from her as compared to before. He thought he saw her take a knife from a body. Good sense told him to look away. Let it go.
The beast wanted its shot at her.
Here they were, ghoul and Regular raring to kill each other again. Now, the scene wasn’t so absurd. Now, it was just natural.
A forced laugh broke the tension. Both Avo and Draus spun to glare at the father, who was pointing at them. He forced himself to laugh, his son looking confused as well. Sweat rolled down the man’s forehead as he eyed Avo with that same knowing look he did earlier. The man might’ve been putting on an act. Avo wasn’t sure where he was going with this. Or maybe he finally cracked.
A pity. If he was truly insane maybe it wouldn’t be so bad if Avo ate him. Could that be considered a merciful action?
“It–it,” the father slapped his leg. He was no actor. It looked forced. Several hundred spectators were sarcastically making up worst-performance awards to bestow upon the man. “It is like he is a cat. And–and you are owner. You know? When you fed him eyes.”
Avo and Draus looked at each other.
“Cat,” Avo said, lamely.
“I ain’t the type to own a ghoul, consang,” Draus said, voice tinged with disgust. “Hells, I can’t think of someone who even wants–” She trailed off, eyes narrowing at Avo. “You know what, nevermind?”
Avo shrugged. “Was owned. Got adopted. Technically official property of Walton Wardcrafts LLC.” He still didn’t fully want to reveal the depths of his relationship with Walton, but something in him had come loose. He bit back a grimace of annoyance when he considered that her giving him some eyes she found might’ve been the cause for this minor revelation.
Draus’ head tilted in a brief nod before she froze. Her eyes snapped back over to him. “Adopted?”
Avo grunted.
She stared. “I mean…how the hells does that happen? Adopt a ghoul. What, they pick you off the Warrens after the war? Figured you’d make a good pet or something? Teach you to be a Necro for the fun of it?”
“He managed,” Avo said. Draus just kept staring at him. Apparently, it strained her mind to think of someone actually wanting a ghoul.
Her lip twitched in a momentary snarl of confusion. “Must’ve…been a special guy.”
“He was,” Avo said. “Didn’t matter to the rash.”
The undercurrent of building confusion went out of Draus. Suddenly, she was quiet. “Yeah. Know how that is. The rash. It, uh. Anyway. This Walton taught you how to be a Necro too, yeah.”
Avo shrugged. “It’s a trade. A good one. Taught the skill to me. Did dives together. Got paid. Usual story.”
“Usual story,” Draus said, shaking her head. “Maybe for a citizen. Hells. Maybe even for some of the FATELESS. You? You’re not…you’re not a person. Saw how the Low Masters adjusted your psychology. You ain’t supposed to be capable of this.”
“This?”
“Being calm for one,’ Draus said. “Or even thinkin’, really. Every ghoul I met, I had to kill. Every. Single. One. During the war. After. It didn’t make no difference. All a ghoul wants is to hurt. To brutalize. To eat. What’s left is given over to spreading their blood and making new nests. Then, I come down here on one of my runs and there you are…” she shook her head. She looked at the father and boy again. “Why didn’t you eat them?”
“Told you before: diet.”
“See. You being a smartass is part of why I didn’t take your head off earlier. Real novel to get from a ghoul. It’s also pretty godsdamned annoying when I want a straight answer.”
Avo mocking tried mimicking her facial twitches while she was contemplating the fact of his adoption earlier. She flicked a rude gesture at him. Worth it. “Not joke,” Avo said. “I have a diet.”
Draus leaned back, letting her arms fall back to her sides. Her posture shifted now, breaking from defensive to exasperated. “You gotta be shittin’ me,” Draus said with a sigh. “I…explain your diet.”
“Don’t eat choiceless. Feed from hubris instead.”
She stared at him. The pillar was beginning to make a groaning noise. The section they were passing was coated in rust. Sounded like no one had made it this far in a while. “Gonna have to be a bit clearer about that, ghoulie. I didn’t specialize in the study of no cannibalistic ethics.”
“People who hurt others. Liars. Murders. People who work in sales. Lawyers.”
Her staring intensified.
“Sales and lawyers were jokes,” Avo said.
“Ain’t that a shame,” Draus replied dryly. She rubbed the bridge of her nose and sighed, exasperated. “You’re a real fuckin’ weird one, ghoulie. Hard to tell a lot of things about you. Got nothing but more questions when it comes to you.”
He knew how that felt. Felt that way since he got resurrected. Twice. Too many questions. No answers in sight. How did he get to the Maw? Who killed him? And how was he coming back to life?
Draus’ lips pursed into a thin line as she was about to say something else.
Then, from beneath their feet, a dull shrieking rose, the sound loud enough to be heard past the platform despite being muffled. Draus went expressionless and looked down. Avo, contrarily, looked up. They weren’t far from the top. He could see the ceiling growing closer.
A curve of folded metal bent over along the edge. Avo realized those were the gates leading into the megablock. It looked like something inhumanly powerful had forced them open manually. Considering how mangled the alloy looked, he wondered just what could have crumpled a thirty-foot-high gateway like tin.
GHOSTLINK REQUEST INCOMING - ACCEPT?
LINK CONFIRMED
SYNCING…
SYNCED
Draus had connected to him and he accepted without hesitation this time. Through her eyes, he could see her cog-feed scanning down. One of her battle scanners had something bright marked. “Sixty feet to arrival,” she said, more for the father and the boy than Avo. “Get to the edge. Stay there and make for the door fast as we arrive. Got less than a minute of climb-time left. Get ready to run.”
The father nodded and pulled the boy over, out of the way
The screaming of steel grew louder. The brightness marked by her battle scanner drew closer. Something within Avo yearned to grasp for it, to take it into himself. The way the radiance shone gave off a slowly diminishing resonance. It didn’t look much like a fire, but a reflection that somehow possessed a metaphysical vibrancy.
Through the exit hole he made with his shotgun, the heavy scent of blood slithered up Avo’s nostrils; the types were mixed but the volume was intense. The only times he tasted so much intermixed blood together of such quantities was in illegal grafter clinics.
He cast his Specter down through the platform. Joined to his mind, Draus dove along with him. Slipping past the material world, he guided his perception five feet, then ten. For a moment, all there was around them were the floating ghosts and the vast nothingness before them. In their mind’s eye, it was like they were in the depths of the ocean, waiting for something colossal to appear.
Then, the faintest of phantasmal chains flashed. A thread of ghostly matter. A spill of flowing thought. Something was wrong. A single strand of thought didn’t manifest on its own. And Avo couldn’t recall seeing the Nether so silent in a spherical expanse before either. Then, he tasted the spill of thoughtstuff. A familiar rage greeted him, its taste only recently missing after boiling this very silo.
Little Vicious.
He began pulling back.
Draus turned to look at him. “Sit-rep?”
“Vicious,” Avo said. “It’s her. I’m pulling–”
GHOSTLINK LOST
A pulsing wave tore through the Nether, smashing down against his wards like a tidal wave and snapping his link with Draus. They both grimaced as a spike of pain throbbed through their skulls. Not far, both father and son cried out, their trains of thought viciously wrenched loose from their minds, surface thoughts scalped away by the waves of a hostile detonation.
Around them, the Spectators and ghosts were cast out like bodies in the riptide.
Someone just detonated a thoughtwave bomb. Someone was trying to suppress the Nether.
Someone was deliberately going above and beyond to counter him.
Avo hissed, trying to get the attention of the father and the son. They were sweating, clutching each other as they coughed and shivered. They turned, eyes blearily, confused as to where they were. Overhead, the ceiling descended. The folded gates held out its bent frame toward them, as if in a welcoming gesture.
Next to the central pillar of the elevator, a ten-foot lance of flowing red punched through countless feet of steel like there was nothing in its way.
Draus spun. Her wrists flashed. Her micro-munitions struck and splattered the lance, smearing it across the walls. In an instant, the red came back together and reformed into a spinning hyper-thin lattice of whips. The new constructs slashed out for them.
Avo ducked. He felt something chip an inch out his shoulder. Draus blinked, covering the father with her body. Just in time for one of the tendrils to slice a clean line deep through her lower back. Her holocoat fizzled and popped. Error codes were raining down along her body now. Still, she betrayed no pain, only turning to cup a hand to her wound.
Then, as fast as it came, the haemokinetic constructs sank back out from the new punctures it made through the platform.
The boy whimpered. The father muttered a choking prayer.
“Almost there,” Draus said. Her breathing was controlled. Smooth. Avo could smell her hurt better than even last time. “We arrive, we run like hell.”
“What is attacking us?” the father asked.
“Golem, I think,” Draus said. She gave a laugh of disbelief. “How the fuck do they got a golem? I don’t know–”
The platform beneath them thundered and bent as something heavy slammed into it. Avo stumbled. A shrill, haunting laugh filled the air.
+You didn’t think it would be that easy, did ya?+ Little Vicious returned, her voice booming loud, announcing the climatic moment to the evening's festivities. Something tore into the underside of the platform. Its alloy began to wail. The edges began to bend. Immediately, Avo heard a new name being chanted by the returning spectators.
+Golem! Golem! Golem!+
+You smashed up my show, Reg. That wasn’t polite. That was pretty fuckin’ mean, actually. You know how long it took for us to find the proper candidates for this event? You want to know what it took to prepare the venue? How many imps it cost?+ Little Vicious paused, taking in the jeers from some of the audience, decrying her as a cheater. She sneered with laughter. +Still nothing compared to what I’m gonna do to you and the ghoulie. This was my big night. My day off. And you fucked it. You two absolute half-strands fucked it. I’m gonna…oh, I’m gonna enjoy hurting the two of you!+
A surge of force bent the platform over from one of its edges, the impact sending Avo bouncing off a wall. Two new crimson appendages punched clean through where he stood, mauling the pillar, and tearing through it from below. A loud grinding crash rumbled. A gear was flung loose, descending toward Avo.
The platform screamed like it was dying, making the final few feet of its ascent just in time.
On his hands and feet, Avo scrambled toward the gate. Ahead, Draus was shepherding the two flats. And him. It struck him then that she could have run off at any time. She was more than fast enough.
+You shits better start running,+ Bubbling flows of blood flooded through the rents of the platform sawing it apart with hyper-thin lines of razor floss. Through the rents beneath him, Avo caught sight of his unseen pursuer. It resembled the chimeric union between a blood-forged serpent layered with countless groping arms and a spear-tipped spire. Stumbling past the crack, Avo heard his Metamind wailing in his stead. His cog-feed flickered, blunting the damage.
He just beheld something unnatural–a defiling of the natural order. Below, a thaumaturgically constructed behemoth coated in ever-flowing rivulets of blood was tearing through metal to get at him. A golem, something both machine and miracle–a weapon platform infused with the partial corpse of a god.
Without a beat, Avo sprinted after his group already fleeing past the lip of the gate in the megablock. Part of him wanted to stay. Fight. Drink the freely offered blood. As delicious as the thought was, his legs kept moving. The beast didn’t whine much about that. Not even it liked its odds against a god.
“Sangeist,” Draus said, spitting information as fast as she could deliver. “Stormtree golem. Its blood mimics the properties of the solid matter it deconstructs. Don’t let it close. It’ll tear us right up.”
Avo checked his phantasmics again and considered his options there. Little Vicious probably had far superior wards than the hunters she employed, but more than that, she was actively using the thoughtwave bomb to suppress him. Part of him was flattered. The rest of him was occupied with the fact that he couldn’t even pull a ward-bash on her now. No constructs he sent beyond the sanctuary of his wards would be stable anyway should the bomb go off again.
He wondered if there was any way he could have engaged even if he had his complete kit. Not easily, was his conclusion. He would’ve needed an opening. Some subterfuge. Maybe Walton could. But Avo wasn’t Walton. No one was Walton.
“I got point,” Draus said, trying to keep her footing as they fled deeper into the depths of the block. “Ghoul. Take the rear.” She shot a look at the father and the son. They were haggard. Sickened. Every step they took was a stumble. Behind, Avo watched as more spider-like limbs cleaved through the platform, cupping it in on itself as it twisted the pillar into a knarled knot with deliberate ease. “We’re close, consangs. Promise. You’ll be seein’ the city soon.”
“Nu Volton,” the boy tried to say, his breath coming labored as he bounced in the arms of his spriting father.
“Yeah, kid,” Draus said, rounding the corner as stacks of storage units came into sight. “New Vultun.”
The Sangeist assault golem distinguished itself quite remarkably in the Fourth Guild War when five Stormtree brigades, faced with encirclement by No-Dragon forces, pulled a fighting retreat out of the district of Nu-Scarrowbur.
Survivors of the battle claimed that the breakout would not have been possible if not for the Sangeist’s matter-mimicry capabilities. Indeed, official military sources also cited the golem’s capability to rapidly fabricate multi-megaton warheads from blood. This allowed it to suppress the No-Dragon’s swarm-pattern bioforms and saved the brigades from being overrun.
-The Fall of Nu-Scarrowbur: Annals of the Fourth Guild War, Page 888
2-11
Blood Metal
The storage level of the megablock was so cluttered it made the area a honeycomb formed from plasteel containers. Columns of stacked crates, boxes, and cargo modules partitioned the path into narrow avenues and claustrophobic alleys. A rain of stale coolant spilled down from the exposed pipes threading overhead, their lengths caked with fungal biomatter and rust.
This place was abandoned. Unwanted. Worse, this place had lost all order for its layout. Avo couldn’t tell which way they were supposed to flee. Casting out a Specter would be akin to allowing his consciousness to be pruned with the next thoughtwave blast. Blindly, he followed Draus.
Behind, the gates groaned as something enormous plunged through the walls. Thick barriers of plascrete outright shattered before the golem’s encroach. Avo chanced another glimpse at his foe. He caught sight of its crimson mass, its texture something that was blood and alloy both.
Through the toppling cascade of debris, it skittered after them, its shrouded form rearing eighty feet into the air. As the golem was enwreathed in a fog of dust, his Metamind didn’t quail at its presence this time. Still, he watched as the thoughtstuff of the ghosts around him quivered. Wards protected minds from insanity but the presence of a god still inflicted its strain.
It was like the mind knew that what it was beholding shouldn’t be, couldn’t be, but against all odds, still was. Only the bravest amongst the spectators were clinging close now. Getting one’s Specter splashed by a thoughtwave bomb was like asking for a seizure.
They pushed through a narrow gap where two containers were pulled to face each other. Draus had plucked the father off his feet by this point, holding him while he held the kid, dashing forward. Avo trailed a good twenty feet behind, muscles springing, legs pumping. He couldn’t help but laugh. Even unencumbered, he didn’t move near as fast as the Regular. The blades that were her legs blurred like slashing wheels, chipping gaps into plascrete flooring, giving him a path to follow even as she turned.
A deafening crash burst from behind. Something was bending, folding. A shadow sailed through the air, trailing down as it cast its presence over Avo. He whipped his head in a brief look over his shoulder.
He regretted the action almost immediately.
Two things assailed his attention at the very same time. The first was the twisted remnant of metal that used to be a ten-ton storage unit plunging down toward him like a javelin. The second was the golem–oh, gods the golem.
His Metamind screamed, warnings flashing behind his eyes as his wards were strained.
WARNING: COG-CAP AT 88%--
He deactivated the Specter. Couldn’t risk using that now anyway. The cog-cap dropped down to 55%. The flickering feed stabilized. Didn’t stop the presence of the golem from being branded into his mind.
Rivulets of blood flowed from a shrouded spheroid platform at its core, fusing around it to form a ribbed tower. At its precipice was a jutting wolf-like jaw with its teeth replaced with the palps of an arachnid instead. The light greeted its shell, basking it in a metallic sheen. Limbs of various shapes and designs spilled free from its structure. Massive hammer-shaped hands to swat containers; piercing legs to move its body along the ground; darting tendrils to steer its surging momentum.
It lumbered in their wake, a chimera between tide and titan, its bulk smashing through all that was in its path. Avo’s Phys-Sim clocked it going at thirty-five miles an hour–some inefficiencies with its mass and design.
Of course, its lack of speed mattered little considering the falling container dipping rigged to a red-colored trajector lane. His Phys-Sim screamed of an imminent impact.
Ahead, Draus spun, her arm snapping up to fire a burst of three missiles. A series of three blasts blossomed against the side of the container, knocking it free from its fated trajectory. Avo’s Phys-Sim went from red to blue again.
She fired again, this time at the golem. Where the micro missiles struck, the blood coagulated, hardening into slats of self-supporting, self-repairing armor. Where a thin layer of red was chipped away, more flowed to reinforce.
Little Vicious’ shrill laughter flooded the room in a deafening rumble. +Keep running! Make me work for this! Make me fuckin’ earn this!+ Distantly, spectators cheered and whooped with her, thrill building on thrill, coating the room with excitement.
A cone of crimson darts ripped out from the golem’s fluid shell. Jagged glints of red sprayed free into their air, alchemized into nanometer-thin darts. A rain of unaimed shards sheared through the rusted storage units all around Avo. He only managed to evade getting perforated himself thanks to his Phys-Sim’s estimates. Whatever her blood was mimicking right now, it was far more than mere steel.
“Avo! Duck!” Draus called.
He didn’t hesitate.
The Valquist G-7 was an old gun. A railgun when most modern arms were designed on a gauss standard. Didn’t stop it from ringing loud against the outer shell of the golem. Like a stone cast from a sling of ancient myth, the shot sailed and met interlocking cells of haemokinetic armor.
It struck. Some of the blood bent in and folded at an angle. The flechette skid off. Little Vicious laughed.
Draus cursed. “Shit. Didn’t penetrate. Keep going. Deeper into the stacks!”
Shouldering the rifle, she pulled the father and boy tight to her with both arms as she sprinted. Ahead was a winding set of stockades made by rusted overturned cargo crates. Lagging slightly, Avo followed. The last sight he caught of the golem before they rounded into the labyrinthine paths was its jaws splitting through the plascrete floor like scissors gliding through the fabric, bifurcating through the ground itself to get after them.
“Can’t outrun it,” Avo shouted. Draus didn’t reply. “Need to lose it instead!”
Draus led him on a turn left. Then right. Then left again. She pointed up. With a single bound, she cleared a full ten-foot leap. Annoyance filled Avo. The Low Masters had designed his kind to overrun and storm the Tiers. Yet, here was a Regular outside of her combat-skin, casually outperforming any of his capabilities.
Eight feet tall. Capable of moving a ton on his shoulders. Rapid cellular recomposition for survivability. Cellular infection vectors to remove the logistical need to recruit willing participants for a standing army. All these qualities made up a ghoul. And all were entirely worthless against a modern combatant. That was what it meant to be a ghoul. To be pre-made into obsolescence by masters of a long-conquered nation built on blood, slavery, and violence.
With a snarl of frustration, he jumped, the sounds of the golem closing in. Draus reached down and pulled him by an arm before he could finish mantling. His jaw opened wide before he caught himself. It took everything he had not to tear into her arm, to bite and take her hand. Old habits. Physical contact meant violence.
“Won’t outrun her,” Avo repeated. Behind, a stack of five crates came apart. A lashing blood-metal limb slid out, parting metal like an axe attached to a pendulum. Meanwhile, Avo could already hear the thundering hearts of the father and son, smell the exhaustion on their sweat, the fever burning above their brows.
They were mere humans in a city that had long left that behind. How fragile they were. Even softer than he.
“Not tryin’ to outrun it,” Draus said. “Just need to–”
Her left shoulder burst apart. Her coat veil began spewing out more error codes. Draus spat blood, the first true sign of alarm flashing through her eyes. Raw instinct took hold of Avo. He barreled into her, knocking her, the father, and the boy over.
Two more crackles followed. Avo’s Phys-Sim lined blue trajectories leading back to a distant stack of storage units and the control station of a crane attached to the roof of this level. More railguns. Snipers. This was another kill box.
In the public lobby, the distant cheering was approaching a deafening pitch. The violence and thrill of the engagement grew rapturous, some cheering for Little Vicious and her group to kill him and the Regular, some calling for them to keep fighting, to survive.
Another crate sailed past them, missing by an inch. The golem was coming for them, Little Vicious’ fury now mixed with nigh-psychotic laughter. They had seconds before the golem was on them again.
A choice had to be made. Simple calculus. They couldn’t pull a fighting retreat with the father and the boy. Draus couldn’t be weighted down. The answer was clear. Avo pulled the two from her.
“Kill sniper,” Avo said. “I’ll get these two. Stash them. Come back for you.”
Draus glared in annoyance at the tattered sinews still connecting her left arm with its shoulder and nodded. “Don’t eat ‘em. Or I’ll come for you after.”
“Try not to. No promises.”
She rolled off the side of the container and blurred out of sight. Must’ve fired her reflex implant again. Probably couldn’t go that fast earlier without turning the flats into misting gore. She was probably running an Accelero. Now there was an aug Avo would have wanted if his blood didn’t reject or subsume every bit of foreign matter placed in his body.
Grabbing the boy by the neck and pulling the man to his feet, Avo started running along the top of connected containers. Behind, the golem smashed through where they were standing. Stumbling, but not falling, Avo continued his sprint, dragging father and son along as he began to consider a plan.
+Where’re you going, ghoulie? There’s nowhere to run!+
Avo ignored her. A flash of electricity sparked above him. He looked up and called his ghosts to magnify his perception. A blurred simulation of a figure poking out from a cubic control station greeted him, their tri-barreled gun pointed directly at him while their thoughtstuff was vibrating with excitement.
That didn’t last.
Their skull snapped free of their neck as something punched through them at an angle. Draus. She made that shot one-handed. He could barely see that far.
The wind whistled. Five diamond-shaped drones dove down from behind. Avo sighed. Little Vicious really wanted him dead. He squinted his eyes and wondered if they were automated cleaner models or piloted assassins. A flash of light came from one. Pain spiked across his cheek. The left side of his face felt like a bouncing flap of meat as he sprinted.
Assassins. Of course.
They needed to get back down. Draus led them up so they could make a straight dash out from the storage room. As far as he could tell, that was all the way toward the center of the chamber where another large platform was affixed to another tower like the one in the silo. A new elevator leading up to the block’s lobby was his guess.
With the drones hunting them overhead, however, Avo felt that his odds of making the run was bad alone, let alone with two people in his care. He needed to adapt. Change the situation. Lose the golem, if only temporarily.
A trajectory-lane manifested ahead of him. Avo moved to the left, just in time for a haemokinetic spike to spear clean through the container ahead of him, Avo noted the open doors in a stack of containers ahead. His claws had torn the thinness of their material earlier.
A plan formed in his head. He turned to gauge the velocity of the golem. It was going fast.
Too fast to make a sudden stop.
Avo grinned.
The golem might have dominion over the domain of blood and matter, but it still couldn't beat physics. And the drones, as far as he could judge from the brief glances he got of their thoughtstuff, didn’t have any complex phantasmics capable of enhanced tracking. Old models. Just like everything else the Syndicates fielded.
“Follow,” Avo growled at the father. The man was gasping. Wheezing and whining about Artad or whatever dead god he worshipped.
Slipping two more lashing beams, Avo jumped into the darkness that lay behind the open cargo container, greeting its vast emptiness with a pleased hiss. Outside, the golem washed over the stacks they were running on like a tide of liquid metal, mangling and swallowing all in its path.
+Fuck! Fuck! Fuck!+ Little Vicious howled slurs and curses like a child, whipping tendrils lashing, biting deep into the ground to stop its charge. Inertia was a beautiful thing.
Next to Avo, the boy whimpered. The child was too tired to cry, too shocked to react. In the dark, a gnawing want bubbled up from Avo’s insides. He could kill the boy. Eat him. Kill the man. Trick the golem into smashing the box. Draus wouldn’t be able to tell. So close, their wounds tasted so sweet, their adrenaline staining their tired bodies so deliciously bitter.
The beast wanted. Avo wanted. But Walton wouldn’t have wanted. Walton would have chosen to live by his ethics. Walton would have inflicted his will on the world as much as he could, instead of having it be the other way around.
An act of mastery instead of slavery.
Avo was not Walton.
Putting down the boy, he flexed his claws. The father was asking him something. Pleading. Out beyond the lip of the container's entrance, the drones were descending again. The golem was still crashing through things from how things sounded.
Avo tore. His claws fell. He barely managed to pull himself away from pulling the child apart. Instead, he poured his frustration and his energy into clawing his way through the metal.
The boy inched away into his father's embrace. Avo felt his digits peel cheap and rusted steel, ignoring the shiver that ran up his spine as he mangled his way through inches of metal.
A beam cut along the side of his head. Another three went wide. Four cored holes gleamed through the other side of the container, allowing bars of light in. The boy screamed. The father whispered hushed nothings. Drones were blind-firing through the container.
Avo snarled and peeled a full sheet of metal open. “Down!” he said, pointing to the exit he made. The father obeyed, tumbling in just as Little Vicious’ voice crackled in the back of Avo’s mind.
+Still alive, rotlick? I’m gonna tear you out from that container? I’m going to make you watch as I hurt the boy–+
Avo grunted. He watched father and son jump down into the hole he made. A flash of light filled his periphery. He dove in after them, hissing in pain as a lancing heat cored through his left thigh. Sinking into the darkness of the container below, Avo wasted no time as he found the hinges on one of the doors and barreled into it, bursting out the opposite side from where he entered.
Light flooded his sight again as he found himself in a small clearing. Only an abandoned industrial rig lay abandoned near a holo-tagged column that rose up to impale the plascrete ceiling. A dormant mag-clamp swayed.
At any moment, Avo expected the golem to smash through the stacks behind him and bury him beneath a mountain of mass. Instead, he heard the ringing echo of a railgun. Little Vicious shouted out this time, her paltry wards leaking raw surprise. That was a problem with detonating a thoughtwave bomb–damaged your wards too if they weren’t properly secured.
Another crack. Was that Draus making another shot? This one struck something that wasn’t the golem. Whatever it was, it sounded like it burst apart, sparking.
Faintly, Avo heard the drones pulling away, the sound of their engines growing further on the winds.
Four engines. There were five drones. She got one.
+Fuckin’ Reg,+ Little Vicious snarled. +Godsdamn sow ruins fuckin’ every. Gonna cut her open. Make her watch in the mirror…+
More threats followed. Avo stopped listening. Staggering out from cover, Avo found himself lost as to where he was again. From what he could remember, they might’ve been closer to the leftmost corner, and escape lay in the middle.
“Lookin’ the wrong way,” Draus said from behind. Avo jumped, his claws flashing as he spun. He saw her then, and she looked as badly mangled as he. Flaps of cauterized meat oozed already scabbing blood on her face. Her rifle was shouldered but her left arm was gone. He could see the glinting plates of her subdermal armor through her open wounds. The first hints of exhaustion crept into her features.
For the first time since he met her, she felt fully human. Which meant the beast was screaming for him to eat her now, to savor Regular flesh while it was weakened. He would never have the chance again.
He chuffed and chittered, gnashing his fangs against each other.
Draus scoffed and shrugged. “Take your shot. I’d still bet on me.”
The worst thing about that was Avo agreed. As much as the beast wanted to hurt her, as bloodied and mauled as she was, he was still much, much slower and softer of flesh by far.
He swallowed back a mouthful of saliva. “Lose them?”
“For now,” Draus said. “Bomb nulled the chance of using all external phantasmics. They’ll track us down soon enough. Just got to get close enough for our thoughtstuff to show again. Soon as Vicious’ done throwin’ her fit, she’ll tune in and tune us out.”
“Should run,” Avo said. “Push for the middle.”
Draus laughed. “Yeah, no. They’ll cut us down like chaff. Got drones circling the skies, two snipers on overwatch, and a light assault golem that’ll keep on our asses like a nu-dog modded with enhanced scent-glands. Gotta drop it.”
She was insane. It was eighty feet long. It was heavy enough to barrel through stacks of containers weighing dozens of tons.
His beast wanted this fight. But his beast, like the Reg, was suicidal.
Avo still had a life to live, still had taxes to pay, and work he wanted to do.
He already died twice today. He wanted to live.
He wanted to live.
“Transfer phantasmic,” Avo said. “Will hide us.”
“Can you do it in thirty seconds?” she asked, tilting her head.
No. “Yes.”
She shook her head. “You’re a strange godsdamned ghoul, you know that? Barefaced lyin’? That’s somethin’ people do.”
So people kept telling him. “What then?”
“Split apart.” She shook her head. “Don’t know their full numbers. You and I can lead them off.”
“Then what?”
“We make contact.” She shot a glance at the father and son. “They hide.”
“Terrible plan.” Avo said.
“They’re drawn to entertainment. We’re good stock. We make good entertainment. Boy and his pa amount to hot piss on a summer’s day.”
Oh, Jaus and his eight, she was being serious. She actually wanted to do this.
“Yeah. Entertainment,” Avo said. “Entertainment for a moment. And no more. Golem. Four las-drones. Maybe three more hunters. You’re injured. I’m soft. Easy kills. Make it a minute.”
She smiled. The fact she was capable of such an expression gave him whiplash. “Bet you we’d make it two.”
It was then that Avo had a sudden epiphany about the Regular. Something he should have seen in her from the moment they met.
It wasn’t hate that she radiated toward him and the others. No. What stood the gulf between her and everyone else was neglect. She wasn’t afraid of him. She wasn’t afraid of anyone or anything. This whole thing seemed to bother her as a little more than a momentary annoyance.
“You don’t care if you die, do you?” Avo said.
She snorted. “Do you? You’re a–”
“Yes!” Avo snarled. “I care! I care!”
His admission struck the smile from her face before it could form.
Another impact. The sound of something scraping along the ground. The groaning of weight digging through plascrete sounded like the golem was smashing through different parts of the room, looking for them.
He should stay quiet. Keep as much as he could and find another way to run. But still, Avo couldn’t let it go. He needed the Regular to know–to admit he was a person too. He didn’t want to die again. He already lost enough. He already fell far enough; died enough.
“You afraid, ghoul?” she asked, genuinely curious.
“Yes,” Avo said. “Want to go home. Want to go back. Feed fishes. Find my Metamind. My Metamind. Not this one. Find who did this to me. Pay rent. Pay taxes. Watch soaps. Play sims. Live my life. My life! Is it much? No! Do I own much! No! But I was happy! Satisfied! Safe! Not hunted! And I belonged! To myself! Not slave! Not monster for Low Masters, or toy for Syndicate, or wager for Guilds! I was free! And I will not die here for them!”
Them. The father and the boy. The two flinched as he stabbed a claw toward them. Walton would’ve been so disappointed, but Avo wasn’t half the person his father was.
All he knew was that if the golem caught him, it would break him for its own amusement, to slake the thirst of its pilot. He had enough. Of Little Vicious and her games. Of the Tiers above that never cared about him. Of the Warrens below that hated him for what he was.
He just wanted to go home.
Draus’ stared wordlessly. The golem was growing closer, clattering limbs sounding its approach.
“Brother, sister,” the father said, approaching them, “please, we must–”
“You have a home?” Draus asked.
“Undercroft. Pendross’ Ravine. Block-12. Level 324, room 52-A. Next door is Guild-sanctioned Grafter. Belongs to No-Dragons. Her name: Auntie Peng. Specializes in bioware. Grew me some new fish last week. Salmon. Love salmon.” He thought. It felt like last week. He still couldn’t remember anything between then and now.
Draus blinked and let out a breath, looking away. “That’s great, Avo. Real good.” Slowly, awkwardly, strangely, she shrugged. “Get those two safe. I’ll get you two minutes at least. I’m still good enough for that much at least.”
Avo looked at the father and son and spun back around at her in disbelief. She was going to go to her death. Just like that? No arguing? No mockery? Avo shook his head. The father and son weren’t going to make it out in two minutes. Avo barely knew where they were going to go. And the only one among them that could fight worth a godsdamn had a death wish.
Before he could say anything, Draus blinked out of sight. She was gone again. He was staring at the rusted side of a container. A crude drawing of the megablock’s administrator was scratched into the side with the words “No Future” holo-tagged over them.
Avo growled and spun on the father and son. “Stay. Run toward middle.”
“What?” the man asked. Avo took him by the collar and snarled. “Run. Get to platform.”
Avo held out his Mirrashard. Wouldn’t work on the golem anyway.
“Keep the gun,” Avo said, handing the man the auto-laser. The father promptly swept the boy with the gun. Avo sighed. Idiot. “Take one of the side paths. Get toward middle. Circle the room or something. Don’t know.”
The father shook his head. “I don’t even how to–”
Avo decided to spell things out for him. “It's for you. For the boy. If something finds you.”
His words struck the father silent, much as a blow across the head would.
Avo continued. “If I and the Reg get snuffed, it's just you. And the boy. Need to do the right thing. They find you, they’ll play. You’re entertainment. The ones who play don’t care about children. You’re not a citizen. You’re not protected. Do the right thing. Only one who can. Spare the boy. He can’t choose. You have to.”
It occurred to Avo that this might’ve been the longest unbroken bit of dialogue he had with the father. And all of it about killing his son.
The father mustered a nod. “You’re going after–”
Avo grabbed the man by the jaw and clamped his mouth closed. “Get the boy. Start walking. No more sentiment. Go.”
Without waiting for the father to respond, Avo turned and began trailing Draus by her scent. Wasn’t particularly necessary considering that she hadn’t gotten far, but with irregular thoughtwave detonations, it was still hard to track people by their thoughtstuff.
“Two minutes,” Avo said to himself. He chuckled. “Three at least.”
It was suicide. He hated himself for doing this. Hated the idiot he had to keep alive and not eat. Hated not killing the boy and drinking from his flesh earlier. The boy waved as the father took him in his arms. Avo ignored him, instead focusing on how much he hated Draus and her suicidal inclinations.
Damned Reg was determined to discover how many times he could die before he stopped being able to come back.
Against his better judgment, Avo found himself walking toward certain danger, off to die alongside an old enemy.
Heavens can best be understood as metaphysical vessels for the gods. Something like a body, but also an entire plane unto itself, bridged to base-existence through Domains–forces like fire, materials like glass, or even feelings and concepts like sadness.
Something for the Heaven to emanate into reality.
Ultimately, the only true limitation is how vulgarly the Heaven bends reality, and if the Hell or Hells connected to the Heaven can drain enough Rend to ensure reality remains unruptured…
-Thaumaturgy: The Scaffolding of Reality
Ch 2. Heavens, Hells, and other Ontologics
2-12
Counterattack
It didn’t take Avo long to track Draus down via scent. The golem was still rampaging blindly, smashing through crates and crumpling stacks. Avo scoffed. A little bit of karma there. It could have tracked him via his thoughtstuff easily if it didn’t detonate the thoughtwave bomb earlier. Still, he knew the effects wouldn’t protect him for long.
Better to seize the initiative again just like they did earlier against the hunters in the silo.
Draus was scouting from the inside of a high-stacked storage unit. Clambering up from the two other units beneath it, he moved with quiet and caution, listening for the drones as they did another sweep. As he made it past the lip into the stack proper, open jaws greeted him, snapping out to claim his head.
Avo flinched back. Unnaturally pearlescent teeth froze an inch away from his face.
“No,” Draus hissed. Her woundhound whimpered and shuffled back into the darkness of the unit, letting him up. It was smaller than the one Avo had produced earlier. The wounds Draus had suffered were less severe. A floating arm, a punctured lung, and a good amount of blood swirled across its fur. It growled silently at him as if daring him to approach Draus.
Looking at the Regular, he noticed her dismembered limb had been returned to her. It was still wreathed in enhanced muscle, but he smelled the carbon fibers no longer.
“Woundhounds replace wounds,” Draus said. “Their myth don’t say nothing about metal.” She spat, as if annoyed. He would be too if one his arms was suddenly much weaker.
The thing about thaumaturgy is that it rooted itself in its own laws. Despite usurping reality, Avo knew that all gods needed some element or channel within reality to take shape; mythology to give itself a proper vessel. That’s why the Guilds imposed thought-bans on knowing the names and scriptures of gods for unlicensed personnel.
Through the other side of the storage unit, Avo realized she cut out a small vertical embrasure for her to peek out. It wasn’t particularly wide, but he guessed that was the point. She needed as small a window to functionally shoot from as she could while avoiding detection.
Out in the distance, Avo watched as the ichor-fueled golem stomped down on another container in a fit of rage. The container folded. Little Vicious roared something about cowards and her show being ruined. Nothing new there. She lashed at the mangled container beneath her with scything limbs of blood. Unactivated Wights spilled out in pulped pieces. Avo guessed those were undelivered units from the factory far below, meant to be taken up and distributed across the Warrens.
Back before this entire part of the city went under, anyway.
Shifting next to her, he spotted the drones as well. Four remaining as he had thought. Light drones that they were, they still had more than enough firepower to kill him should they sweep his head with one of their beams. Ghouls and concentrated light or fire didn’t do well. Hells, the suns could cook him if he stood out beneath the naked rays long enough.
They were circling the sky over the golem, casting their scans out across different containers in scrying sweeps. Problem was they were scanning the same area. As a group. He was lucky their pilots were idiots. They could have covered so much ground if only they scattered to different corners of the room.
“Thought you had a life to get back to?” Draus said.
“Better odds with you,” Avo said.
She fixed him with a brief glance. A quiet laugh escaped from her chest. “The Low Masters make you with a conscience or does this here merit belong to that father of yours?”
“Father,” Avo said. “Morality was hard. Didn’t work the same without phantasmic. Emotional simulator. Gave me ethics instead.” A bitterness burned inside him after saying that. “Haven’t been doing well there.”
“The ethics?” Draus asked
Avo grunted.
“Yeah. That don’t make you special.” Draus spat. “Just makes you a New Vultunite.”
A jingling sound drew his attention. Avo noticed Draus clenching her holotags in her fist, a mantra of silent names slipping from her lips. Outside, Little Vicious' outbursts grew more and more severe. Yet, with each savage exertion, the golem seemed to shrink. Avo blinked.
Was its eldritch brightness losing its luster? Seemed like it was getting smaller, its tower-like shape shrinking.
With a final mutter that ended halfway, Draus sighed and let the tag go. She had more to say. She just didn’t sound like she had the strength to say it.
“Prayer?” Avo asked. The Guilds banned worship, but how people viewed what was worship could be very interpretive. Hard to punish someone when they just claimed the act was psychological or pure traditional. It's one of the few bans that the Guilds unofficially gave up on enforcing. Too much bureaucratic capacity was required to achieve it manually and too hard to sequence if they wanted ghosts to do it auto.
Draus smiled then, and it struck him how the age in her eyes clashed with the youth of her features. Age had been blunted by those with the merit or imps to afford the treatments. Avo had little doubt that Draus had a few of these rejuvenating measures overriding her natural biology. Still, the mind filled. Memories grew. Psychological scars could not hide. They just got thicker.
“Names of dead friends,” Draus said, “Less holy. More meaningful. You got shit to get off your chest, now’s the time. Got less than five before the fight’s back on. Good odds that one or both of us greet the Big Nothing. Can’t piss you a gold thread to hide that.”
Avo tried to think of something. Something poignant. Walton would know what to say. Unfortunately, Walton was as dead as her friends, and sentimental wasn’t how Avo would describe himself.
He stuck to dry honesty. “If you die, going to eat your eyes. Never had Reg-meat.”
Draus’ smile broke into an incredulous guffaw. Her voice sounded battle-worn, but her laugh was true. Genuine. Humor was so very hard to achieve. Walton would have been proud. Avo kept going.
“Regs swear to serve citizens,” Avo said, breaking the tension before whatever came. “Technically, am owned by Walton’s Wardcrafting LLC. I’m citizen-adjacent. Demand service.”
“You’re a weird godsdamned ghoulie, Avo, you know that?” Draus said, wiping tears of mirth from her cheeks.
Avo didn’t laugh. The snort didn’t count. “Heard a few times.” For a moment, Avo forgot to remind himself to hate her. “Got a plan?”
“Got a vague notion of one, yeah,” Draus said. She pointed to the golem. “Golem’s a hard target. Tried punching through it with the railgun. Shot bounced right off. Didn’t even make penetration. It’s got at least seventy-five tons of blood alchemized around the command module. Started with ninety.”
“Losing mass?” Avo asked.
“Yep,” Draus drawled. “Stormtree never built a Soul into these here golems. Not worth it when they could just replicate the same Messenger-grade Heaven over and over. They’re built to be cheap. Expendable. Hells, I’m figurin’ some locals must’ve pulled it out from a gutter somewhere after it got abandoned. Surprised they managed to get it working. Probably siphoned some thaums off from techno-thaumic fusion reactor that’s still working somewhere. Keepin’ it charged between fights.”
Good to know. “How long tills its dry?”
“Couple more hours is my reckoning. From my reckoning, this thing ain’t nearly vulgar enough against the real to be a power-hogger.”
So died Avo’s dreams of outlasting the thing.
“Right now,” Draus continued, “battlefield is shaped to their advantage. They got eyes in the air with those drones. Couple of them tagged me. Minimal penetration, but still opened up my skin something bad. Means they’ll rip you right up, and we don’t want that.”
“You don’t?”
“I don’t.”
“Touched.”
“You don’t even know how ‘touched’ feels, ghoulie.”
“Will if I get a Morality Injector engrammed.”
She rolled her eyes. “Point is, we stick our head out, we don’t keep our heads much longer. Big Nothing’s waitin’ out there in the open. Make matters more interestin’, there are still at least two half-strands left to kill. Snuffed one on the crane. Got another after the half-strand took my arm. More precision fire came. Ended up breaking contact by stealing your trick. Punched through a few of the containers. Broke visual. Found you.”
That wasn’t good. Dealing with the drones and dealing with the golem after was one thing, but dealing with two more snipers, the drones feeding them overwatch, and an assault golem was something that required a full team to handle, not some underequipped Regular and a ghoul that couldn’t seem to die.
“Right now, here’s what I’m thinking: I drop the drones. No drones means no overwatch; makes it harder for them to track us through this maze. Turn the terrain on them. Got four flechettes left. Lost the micro-launcher with the arm. No more woundhound shots either.”
A small interface was pulsing over Draus’ railgun, its systems recommending that she replace both barrels, the battery, the locus, the trigger, and the stock. Way the gun’s integrity was lightning up, she would be lucky if it managed to even fire the four shots it had left.
“Four shots. Only good for drones. You do the 'counter-sniping.' And the golem.” But maybe that was what she wanted. She was faster between the two of them; more survivable.
A savage grin spread across Draus’ face. “Countin’ on it. That’s where you come in. You’re gonna flank ‘em. Take my woundhound with you a few stacks over and see where the shots are coming from. Snuff ‘em. Then, we regroup under that there crane if we’re both still alive.” She was motioning at a dangling mag-clamp. The one that he saw swaying earlier. “Got an idea ‘bout the golem.”
Avo didn’t know much about military tactics or strategies. It wasn’t his field of study; the closest he got was playing Stormjumper: Fallen Valor, and even then, he was jacking into the system to steal mem-data from other players or planting crawlers in the servers. There was wisdom in following Draus’ overall plan. She was undoubtedly his senior when it came to direct engagements.
However, he did need to recommend one specific change. “Drones,” he said. “Leave one flying for a second.”
She turned to study him, curious. “Why?”
“Force both snipers to link to it in the Nether. Make them easier to track. Or force them out if Vicious uses thoughtwave bomb again.” The public lobby was still empty. It had been a while since Little Vicious’ last detonation but no one wanted their minds to get caught in a tidal wave.
The hunters, though, might not have a choice: bad options for them either way.
A beat of silence followed. Draus stared. “Avo. Your brothers…they capable of this?”
Avo fought the urge to sigh. It was easier to wrestle down than the beast. Part of him still wanted to attack her, kill her even now. That part of him never went away. “This?”
“The thinkin’. Plannin’. Intelligence.”
It didn’t sound like she was mocking him this time. “No. No impulse control with them. All want. All desire. No long-term planning. Food above all. Pain above all. Good soldiers.”
“Good slaves,” Draus corrected with naked scorn. Whether that was for his kind or the Low Masters, he couldn’t tell. “Why’re you different?”
Avo had considered that before. Struggled with the question. Assumed one answer and left it aside for another. Some, he offered to Walton. Without the man, he would’ve been dead by now. Or a little more than a feral beast roaming the depths of these Warrens. Yet, even before, he survived when his brothers didn’t because his cowardice was greater than his desire to feed. Fear provoked a deviant choice. Or maybe it was the choice to live that fed the fear.
Ultimately, the answer, at its basest was a simple one. “Chose to be.”
“Chose to be,” Draus repeated, looking him up and down. She shook her head. “Well. For whatever it’s worth, I’m real glad you chose not to eat the boy or his pa. Real glad I didn’t kill you.”
“Also glad you didn’t kill me. Like living.” A faint twitch pulled at the edge of Avo’s lip. What was that she said to him earlier? “Hey, Draus?”
“Yeah.”
“Does this make us consangs? Can I have wards now?”
Draus sniggered. “Fuck you, rotlick.”
He had to do it.
The woundhound barked a low warning. The golem’s tantrum had reached a new pitch in intensity. In the distance, the golem drew out his sanguine mass into twin building-sized hands and smashed through another stack of five containers. +FUCKING COWARDS!+ Little Vicious screamed into the Nether. She was going mad with fury. Her tantrum was like a hurricane, lashing over every inch of the room.
With a wild swing, she cast one of the containers against the far side of the room. The plascrete wall burst apart in a shower of dust. The length of the container found itself embedded deep. The vibrations ran through the entire room.
Avo wondered if there would be anything left of him if the golem struck him. “Draus. Woundhound injector–”
“Told you: used up the last one,” Draus said. “Ain’t cheap.”
“Yeah,” Avo said. The container groaned, and slid out from the exit wound. The impact zone was larger than the area of his hab-cell in the Undercroft. His Phys-Sim clocked the toss at a hundred kilometers per hour. “Yeah.”
Draus cracked her neck. “You ready?”
Instinctively, Avo flicked a tongue over his fangs. “Ghoul. Always ready for violence.”
“Shit. Us Regs ain’t so different,” Draus said. “Happy huntin’, Avo.”
Avo shot Draus a final look before he made to leave. “Happy hunting. Draus.”
He felt her flick ownership of the woundhound over to him, the leash of her wounds inherited unto him now. Avo frowned. The dog panted at him. He didn’t even know woundhounds worked like that.
Descending down in a slow climb, Avo listened as the woundhound trailed after him. The metaphysical dog chuffed lightly when he turned to stare. They were dog-like enough–just the spiraling injuries that made up their bodies that were weird. That, and the ability to dive and move injuries across organic matter.
Carefully, he made it past a narrow gap between two stacks and found himself crouched next to an open storage unit door. Inside, ten unactivated Wights lay in two rows, five by five. They were dressed in maid outfits, though their makeup was long faded, and faces long rotten. Along the crown of their heads, Avo saw the holoprint of Necrodyne Dynamics still flickering.
A subsidiary of Ori-Thaum, he remembered them being. The Low Masters hated them.
Three shots rang out in quick succession, followed almost instantly by three impacts. Poking his head out, Avo lined the paths with his Phys-Sim. Three red lanes greeted him. He wondered if all the Regs were as good a shot as Draus–little wonder his brothers got massacred.
The last drone accelerated toward Draus’ position, diving low as it lanced its beam, slicing into her storage unit. He waited for the thoughtwave bomb to go off. Silence. The Nether remained unharmed. Three new Ghost-Links shot out across the room. The golem reached out first–it probably relied heavily on those drones for overwatch. The links from the snipers slipped out soon after, joining Little Vicious’ phantasmal chains like two rivers flowing into a delta.
The thoughtstuff of the snipers spilled out from five stacks over, their cog-caps running their cheap Metas hot. They were positioned inside one of the containers like Draus was. Right. He remembered a shot coming at him from that direction earlier while he was fleeing atop the stacks. Surprised they hadn’t changed positions yet.
A final shot rang out from Draus. The shot struck true, shredding drone, locus, and all. The connection broke apart. A primal howl filled the room. Little Vicious raged even harder, a billowing heat washing over his mind. Avo found it delightful.
Dashing around the side of the stacks, he made to flank the snipers, doing his best to avoid visual contact. A cacophonous impact thundered through his eardrums, popping the external layer from sheer volume. He still had a few layers of hearing left, though. The Low Masters were kind enough to take protective measures to ensure his hearing.
Rounding past the path with the forklift, Avo found himself clambering up several stacks toward the snipers’ nest. A flash of pulsing gauss fire flashed out from within a hollowed container.
+Where are you? Fucking Reg! Come out! Come out and fight you sow! You fucking sow-coward-fuck!+
Little Vicious sounded a far cry now from the sweet and coquettish host of the show that she started the night as. Good. The Crucible she was hosting had already killed him once and slaughtered two hundred more already. If he got the chance, he was eating her. She made a choice. She was fair prey.
The golem she was piloting tore into the stacks that were Draus’ last known location. The Regular was probably long gone and making for the crane at full surge. Meant he needed to work faster. Get his part done.
Peeking up quietly, Avo studied the position of the snipers again. Both their guns appeared to be pointing out from the same point. No spotter between them. Two gunners. Uncommon, but these weren’t soldiers, just over-chromed muscle. The woundhound growled, hungry to leave existence and see its duty done. It had its eye on the prey as well.
“Get the bigger one,” Avo told the hound, his mind already telling it what to do. It clambered up a stack and he followed. Together, they climbed, the two snipers still firing blindly, their shots threading through countless other storage units in rhythmic crackles, unaware of the encroaching threat.
The hound got atop the snipers’ container first. Avo was just a second behind. Their combined mass made the entire stack wobble. Below, he noticed the thoughtstuff of the hunter suddenly spike in fright.
“You feel that?” One of them asked the other out loud. Even muted somewhat by the metal, Avo could hear their heartbeats, and smell their sweat. He placed his shotgun right against the top of the container. He aimed, treating the yolk-like accretion of their thoughtstuff as targets, picking the one on the right for his first kill.
His gun roared. The thin sheet of metal between him and his prey burst apart beneath a wave of hyper-accelerated alloys. His arm snapped back along with the gun. Through the gap, the woundhound squeezed in, its mass funneling into the open rent as if it was a liquid.
Again, he blinked. Draus said these dogs were standard? Never knew they could do that.
A moment after, he felt himself draw in his new harvest, sown with a spray of his gun.
THAUMIC CYCLER: 19 thaum/c
GHOSTS - [33]
Plunging a claw into the rent, Avo peeled the metal back with all his might and entered. The sniper he shot had been bifurcated down the metal, their metallic spine cord the only thing distinguishable from the mush of their remains. The other sniper–sans an arm and coughing up blood–greeted Avo before he could even land.
He made a miscalculation. He should have stayed on top and fired again.
She slammed into him like a flashing blur, pinning him against the wall. The storage unit shifted. Avo felt gravity lurch as they tilted at an angle.
Half her face was denuded; caused by the spread of his shotgun. Her missing arm told him that the woundhound had got to her. The fact that her exposed skull was layered in a full inch of plasteel told Avo that her chrome must’ve cost her a fortune. Before he could react, something expanded beneath his chest, punching clean through his right pec. Avo screamed. She twisted and dragged her arm up. An implanted arm-spur had sliced him open, peeling his flesh like it was hot butter. Seizing her bouncing face-flap, he pulled. The butchered remains of her cheek snapped free between his claws. She screamed and pulled back, her spur coming free of his tissue.
He seized the momentum, unwilling to waste any more time. He rammed his shotgun into her neck, rooting her against the wall. Her eyes widened. He pulled the trigger. The roar of the gunshot within the confines of the container blew out three more layers of his eardrums. One layer left.
If he lost that one, he was going to need to wait a while before he could hear anything.
The sniper, meanwhile, looked less like a person and more like loose threads of sinew smeared along crenulated notches of metal. With a gasp of pain, he examined his wounds. She had opened him pretty badly. He could see part of his pec cut loose and lodged in the pale bone of his exposed sternum. He winced.
THAUMIC CYCLER: 20 thaum/c
GHOSTS - [34]
Suddenly, a sudden burst of force tore out of him. The bodies around him turned to motes of nothingness, while the metal of the container scattered into kaleidoscopic patterns. The weight in him had grown immense. Wide. Whispers snaked and chanted ineffable mantras from a place deeper than his bones. A flame spread out around him, sundering existence from matter, force, and space into naught but malleable concepts.
THAUMIC THRESHOLD REACHED
LIMINAL FRAME ONLINE
AVAILABLE ONTOLOGIC SLOTS - [1/2]
HEAVENS - [0]
HELLS - [1] - FIRST CIRCLE - DOMAIN (MATTER/ENTROPY)
SOVEREIGNTIES - [0]
NO GRAFTS DETECTED - DEFAULTING TO ZERO-BURN
The flames around him suddenly flashed out of existence. Gravity took hold of him as he tumbled down, landing in a deep depression. He found himself face-down in a smooth crater eight feet deep into the plastcrete floor. It was as if the space around him had been shorn from existence altogether.
A loud weight pounded against the ground, tearing him from his thoughts. Another. How long was he in that crater? Golem. The golem must’ve seen the fire spilling out from him. If it had been chasing Draus, it was now after him.
Crawling out from the rent, Avo winced as the hyper-sharpened ledge he reached for cut deep into his hand. Mantling over and stumbling into a wincing run, Avo looked up and made for the crane. From the corner of his eye, he saw a looming tide of red spearing its way through the stacks. It looked smaller, why did it–
Avo felt his foot splash into something sticky, the smell coppery. Like blood. He looked down, a pool of blood extending like a crimson carpet beneath his feet, spilling out from around the corner.
Twisting, he leaped for a stack, jumping to get off the ground. A sting weight punched clean through his calf and dragged him back down. In his periphery, he could see more blood flowing in from the intersection paths ahead and behind him.
The shadow of the golem rose over him, its reflection looming like a sword held high.
+Yeah,+ Little Vicious laughed. +I learn too. Fancy that. I think your Reg friend might call this an encirclement. Told you I’d get you, ghoulie.+
From the spread of blood around him, two more tendrils shot through him, pulling him down. Avo activated his Specter and cut every phantasmic aside from it and his wards. Using all his newly obtained phantasmal mass, he cracked his armored consciousness like a lashing whip into Little Vicious’ surface thoughts.
Spots exploded through his vision. His mind screamed as exploding spikes of pain were plunged deeper into his skull. Through ringing ears, he heard Little Vicious scream, her voice hoarse as some of her thoughtstuff spewed out an already mending crack in her wards.
+FUCKING GHOUL!+ She howled, her madness amplified by the sheer trauma he struck her with.
The blood across her golem quivered, the focus of its pilot scattered.
Avo’s cog-feed drifted in broken splashes of data and screaming ghosts, blinding and deafening him as he found himself splashing down into the blood. With a whimpering groan, he pulled himself to his feet, blind instinct guiding him while his fractured mind was slowly being fused back by his Metamind.
It was deleting pieces of damaged cognition and cloning backups in their place. It will work. Mend him soon.
He just remembered that he needed to get to the crane. Crane. Draus is at crane.
Behind, Little Vicious wailed, her broken voice sobbing with laughter. +R-run, ghoulie! Run!+
Avo did as she demanded. She didn't need to tell him twice.
Whatever plan Draus had for the golem, he hoped it was a good one.
In simplicity, thaums can be considered ontological mass–the metaphysical space or capacity a Soul can hold in existence. Indeed, it is the Soul that is the foundation on which our society rests today; the plucked hearts of our former gods powering their corpses which we wield and pilot.
Through its structure, Heavens and Hells can be made manifest, expressing their miracles and twisting the fabric of reality revisions, be it only evanescent.
It is with that in mind that all must beware of facing ontological inertia. For the expenditure of miracles is not eternal, and the weight of reality will revert even the greatest Soul fueling the most efficient of Heavens should there not be enough thaums.
So, keep an eye on how much you’re burning. Won’t do you much good if your golem suddenly goes empty halfway through a fight.
-Golems: Gods Upon the Machine, Chapter 4
2-13
The Monster and the Ghoul
Avo toppled left. The ground spiraled and spun. His steps were chasing the floor as it snaked away from him, moving to evade his touch. His skull met the side of a container in a ringing impact barely felt, for right then, the confines of his skull were already subsumed beneath a raging storm of clustering headaches that pried at his loose thoughts. Lumps of misshapen thoughtstuff bubbled out from his cracked Metamind.
A pillar of crimson punched deep into the ground next. Shards of plascrete splashed up, breaking against the roughness of his skin. Above, an enormous crimson mass loomed, its uneven shadow spilling over him as they both shook and fumbled between two ever-narrowing rows of intersecting stacks.
On instinct, Avo flopped his gun behind him and jerked its trigger, expecting to feel the kick of recoil. Nothing. He twitched his finger across the trigger twice again and gave up. He hadn’t reloaded. And now, he couldn’t even remember where the ammo was.
A dozen wire-thin threads of blood whipped through the air. Containers and storage units came slumped apart, unzipped by the sheer undiminishing sharpness of the haemokinetic constructs. Little Vicious giggled madly, the insanity of her voice diminishing by the second as her Metamind mended her broken mind as well, ejecting damaged memories like unspooling strands while replacing them with simulated mimicries.
A net lashed out at Avo. Too far overhead. An overturned cargo loader came apart in three separate pieces, spewing hydro-coolant.
+Almost got you, ghoulie!+ she cackled, her golem bumbling into a stack and knocking it over. It was as if she was drunk, but he was no better.
Ahead, Avo saw the crane swaying in the wind, its contours a vague blur to his nearsighted eyes. He couldn’t see Draus, but with his cog-feed broken, he couldn’t see much of anything at all past fifty feet. Everything was a blur, and his drilling migraines made it worse. Maybe she already left. Ran off to help the father and son after using him as bait.
That would be cruel. But it made sense. She was used to killing things like him. They were the ones she promised to protect.
A lurching groan came from the toppled stacks as the golem pushed off it, leaping. Its form ground momentarily against the ceiling; pipes speared down like javelin-like rains while flakes of paint served as snow. The golem struck the ground next to him in a deafening impact, carrying him off his feet, and throwing him into the air as force carried him with the rock and debris.
A rusted hinge bounced off Avo’s shoulder. The decomposed body of a Wight splattered against him. He struck a nearby column with a sudden lurch, his ribplates expanding like spiderwebs before the impact. Avo slumped down, wheezing, clutching his stomach. Every breath he took felt like he was forcing his insides through a grater.
As he lay there, desperately trying to remember which muscle groups to coordinate so he could stand, the golem staggered toward him, its tower-like body melting, drip by drip. Gazing upon its presence with his bare mind drew a tortured noise out of his chest. He choked. He hissed. Eyes rolling back, he shrank into himself, like a child before a descending belt.
Too small. How could something like him face that which feasted upon the flesh of reality?
Inside the golem, he saw the drifting cracks of a ripple slowly slide back together around an ovaline command module, a bobbing organ amidst crimson translucence. Shaking limbs inched out from its body, long and sharp. They were metal but shaped in extending branches by incremental spurts of blood.
A nest of thorns was being grown out from the golem’s very chest.
A crack shuddered through Avo’s mind. Consciousness surged back through him. Pain took a more comprehensible shape as the world stopped trying to dodge him. His cog-feed sputtered back into his awareness as he groaned, only noticing just now that he had been drooling like a dull animal.
As the golem’s existence planted its withing kiss upon his mind again, he felt its touch through the tattered fortifications of his Metamind. This time, the madness came with a degree of separation. His outer accretion of ghosts howled in despair as they diverted to take the brunt of the harm. It was like he was hiding in a basement born of his own psychological architecture as horror hammered his outer walls like artillery.
The golem was shrinking. That wasn’t a misjudgment earlier, even if it had diverted some mass to flank him. Still, to go from eighty feet to a mere seventy or so lent him no advantage, and what it did to defile the natural laws governing blood and matter tortured his perception, the sight of its being a fraying thing, something that all mortal minds on a cellular level knew to be unnatural.
Eldritch.
With a grunted shout, Avo pushed from the ground and made to run again. He needed to break the line of sight. Lose it before getting to the crane–
A harpoon of glistening red whipped out through his shoulder. A choked rasp squeezed free from Avo’s throat. Thrust out by the extending limb, Avo felt the back of his head crack against the cold, cracked face of the column. He fought it. Clawing and biting into the lash.
Little Vicious’ mind bled perverse joy as he saw her accretion take shape as well, the damage to her slowly coming undone. Her growing branches and briars spilled down the lash, snaking themselves through the clefts of Avo’s wounds.
Ghouls don’t scream so much as they screech. Something about their vocal cords and pitch. When the tendrils sank into him, they began to alchemize his blood, Little Vicious’ flaying touch spreading out even from within. In seconds, he felt his flesh turn from being merely broken to an altar of pain.
To lay agony upon agony, Little Vicious slammed him head-first against a nearby container; one already torn in the middle with frayed flaps of teeth-like metal awaiting him. Avo recognized it from the stacks she knocked over earlier. Desperately, he struggled, but she grasped him within, her haemokinetic blood clutching his skin like a glove.
+Call out to your friend, ghoulie? Call out to the Reg.+
Avo looked toward the crane and saw no sign of Draus. She was gone. Probably left him.
For the first time, he was glad about it.
“Why,” Avo said. “She told me. Ain’t…my cosang.”
Little Vicious huffed, annoyed but triumphant. +Fucking heartbreaking.+
She slammed him down against the flaps. Flaps dug through his flesh, digging up from just beneath his chest. He felt the skin of his torso peel against the rusted flaps as she drove. Inside, she worked on him as well, spreading more brambles of metal through his flesh. He drew his blood back away from her influence, but it was like wrestling against an infection.
She was cultivating a garden of thorns inside him. As curving roots slipped out from between the lips of his muscles, emerging like teeth from gums, darkness crept around the corners of his vision. Hunger ignited like an inferno in his gut as his biology boiled his metabolism away to keep him alive.
With a savage tug, she thrust him out the other side of the container. He felt one of his arms fold at the elbow. By then, he noted the breakage as a mere afterthought. Between moments of half-consciousness, Avo rose into the air, his limbs forced apart by a will not his own, spreading him like an asterisk.
Below, he saw rivers of red receding back from the pathways between the countless rows of containers, down from atop the stacks. Some didn’t make it. Some just became trails of blood, lost to the golem’s touch, its presence. It was shrinking again. She was burning through itself to kill him, a ghoul. How flattering. Avo couldn’t help but whimper a laugh. A weight felt fused to Avo’s right hand. The brambles had spread into his shotgun as well, fusing it to his fingers.
Down his chest, he saw a dozen haemokinetic hooks poking through his bandolier, his shells glinting beneath the droning lights of the room.
In the distance, he could faintly hear the cheering of ghosts. Spectators, watching from leagues and leagues away in the Nether, not daring to approach for fear of another thoughtwave detonation. Growing whispers rose between two struggling choruses, one to see him dead now, the other to see him released and spared.
Little Vicious did neither. Instead, she went about living up to her name. First, she cut the ligaments in his left leg. Then she went about slicing up the tendons in his right. Avo writhed, his body threaded through by her brambles. He heard her snort with laughter just as a spike burst out behind his left eye.
A howl of pure torment spilled out from his throat. His lungs were hoarse from shrieking. Two gripping limbs seized his neck and forced him to look up. Before him, the thick layer of red surrounding the golem’s command module parted in a chasm, revealing the machine to which all this thaumaturgy was anchored.
Eight open slots that expelled and cycled blood were built into its sides. The center of the machine had an ‘H” shaped hatch shrouded by gleaming chrome. The module hissed. The hatch expanded, and within its cockpit sat Little Vicious.
Never had Avo seen a more ghoul-like expression of violence on the face of a human. She studied his pain as if taking in a feast. Uneven trails of mascara marred her otherwise perfectly symmetrical features. Her skin was without blemish and her irises like rubies festooned over her sockets. A dress woven from synthsilk and lined with microelectronics played countless replays of all those who had died in the Crucible.
Some wore cruelty like a sleeve. She wore it like a shell of armor.
He was close enough to hear her heartbeat now, its rhythm coming fast. Excited.
“Ghoulie…ghoulie…ghoulie,” she said. “Did you really think you could get away from me?”
Avo tried spitting blood at her. If he could get some onto her skin maybe he could infest her with the haemophage. She was already acting like one of his brothers. Why not make her one as well? He opened his jaws and spat. The spurt of blood carried by drool landed a scant inch short of her face but stained the collar of her dress.
The glee faded from her eyes. Her lip twitched in a savage snarl. He watched as her mind reached out and linked with the golem again. It lowered him slowly next to the warped container again, his denuded tissue and gore still clinging to its jagged edges.
“Wait,” Avo muttered.
She drove him hard against the edges again, the jagged parts sinking into him, gouging away parts of his body. There’s a particular noise one’s skull makes when the rusted edge of a metal container glides past the flesh and sinks into parting bone. It’s a kind of noise that follows you into your nightmares.
Along the jagged edge of a container, she ground him over and over, the feeling of his skull coming loose in a sawed flap rattling down his spine. The chipping of his bone grew loud enough that he couldn’t even hear his own cries anymore.
For sometime between a moment or eternity, she worked him against the container, using him as a whetstone. By the time she was done, the sight was gone from his eyes. The winds whistled through the gaps where his right ribs were. Most of his skin hung from him more as an apron than anything else. From split sinews, the layers of his exposed muscles twitched.
Once again, she brought him back up to her, a tortured subject before a cruel queen. He could taste the hateful ire she held for him–a kind of hate she had no right to feel. Even blind, he could feel her scornful glare.
Speaking hurt. Thinking hurt. Being hurt.
Delirious, Avo sputtered blood from between his cracked fangs. And laughed. “You…must…feel…how I…look...” His words were a whisper. But the whisper was enough.
Her ire exploded into a supernova. Inside him, the threads of red squeezed. Something buckled inside. Something broke. A lung popped.
“No,” she snarled, her voice that of a child that just couldn’t accept losing. She wasn’t using her Metamind anymore. Had to yell at him personally. With her voice. So mad. Forever mad at not getting what she wanted. “You have no idea what I feel you…subhuman. You fucking cannibal.”
He drew in a half-choked breath as he coughed. His remaining cells tried their best to heal him. The burn of hunger was like a conflagration. He felt himself shrink, all nourishment draining away. He needed biomass. He needed to eat.
“Why?” he asked, his voice a near-whistle.
A wry grin spilled over her face. “Why what?” she asked. “Why am I doing this? Because it’s the only thing I’ll ever do that matters maybe? Or maybe it just relaxes me? Maybe I like it? The thrill? The stream? The attention? Basking as all these idiots watch the killing, staining the air with their emotions. Can you taste it, rotlick? They want to see you die. It excites them to see you die.”
The atmosphere around him grew near palpable with desire, but most of it was hers. The ghosts were still far away, keeping themselves safe. This was, and had always been, about her.
“I think the Reg left you,” Little Vicious said. “I’d call Dread Draus a cold fuckin’ sow, but then again, you’re a ghoul. Not sure your life was worth that much to her.”
Little Vicious might not have been lying about that at all. Somehow, as he was on death’s door again, Avo couldn’t find it in himself to blame her. Perhaps she did use him as bait to lead the golem away. Perhaps she was there waiting for him still, but pulled back when she saw the golem get him.
It didn’t matter now. He was too hurt, too tired to care–
Then, Avo heard it. The faint hum of something coming online. He felt a pull inside him, something tugging on the brambles, drawing him upward. Servos hummed as something above him moved.
Could that have been the crane?
Avo wondered if it was his mind going for a moment, but decided it didn’t matter. Even if he was deluding himself, it was nicer to delude himself into thinking Draus was trying to help him. He deserved that at the least. He wanted to go with the thought that at least someone would remember him as more than just a slavering monster when he went.
Even if he could come back again.
“Nuh-no,” Avo said, swallowing sour spit and bile. “D-don’t…care about…that.”
Little Vicious cocked her head. “Oh. You don’t? Well, then. While we’re here, I’ll listen: tell me what you do care about?”
Avo wanted to mock her. But frankly, pretending the torture wasn’t getting to him was bad enough. So, he gave it words and cast his hate right back at her.
“You,” Avo said.
Little Vicious threw her head back and laughed. “You care about me?”
“Want to know…why…you’re pathetic.”
Her laugh ended as abruptly as it started again. “What?” Her voice cracked, croaking in disbelief.
But gods was she so easy to rile…
Avo continued. “You. Pathetic. Nice clothes. Nice life. Even genes are bought. But still here. Down in the gutter. Killing those who can’t choose.” He swallowed back a mouthful of blood. “You. People like you. Like litter. Everywhere. Staining the city. Not unique. Not special. Nothing new. Seen you before. Seen you in the face of my brothers. Too stupid to live. Too hungry to just die. Seen you in the face of every joy-fiend. The dose. Never high enough. Seen you in the face of every Mid-Guilder. Just another cog. More lubricant than person. All impulse. No control. No choice.” Avo grinned at her. “Sub. Human. Like me. I greet you, sister.”
Fury exploded from her mind, the intensity too much for her ghosts to bear as they quailed. Her expression must’ve twisted into something of pure hate, pure rage. “You–You don’t fucking know anything!”
“Family’s made up of guilders. You have money. But always, you felt less. Less than your peers.” Avo was just guessing now, blood loss taking him on a final, feverish rant. “Lacked something they had. They fit. They enjoyed life. Seemed able to. You couldn’t. Family grew you. Grew you in the vat to be perfect. But still, here you are. With me.”
Overhead, he heard a hum growing closer. Little Vicious must’ve been too focused on him to notice. Avo was glad that his face had practically no skin left on it. Otherwise, she might’ve seen him smile.
The blood controlled by the golem was practically boiling. She puppeted him, pulling him closer using her blade-like grasp, actions made sloppy by her feelings. Tears spilled out from her eyes. He could smell the salt. Hear her choked sobs. Her hands were shaking. Faintly, he heard the rasp of a monoblade. Ah. She was pulling a knife, planning to end this personally for that slight.
Avo chuckled. How accurate he had been. And how predictable she had been. “Pathetic,” he muttered.
He heard her cry out with a snarl. A spark of surging electricity cracked above him, a sudden static spilling over his skin. Without warning, he was torn upward, the golem and Little Vicious soaring up with him. The branches inside him dissolved as Little Vicious screamed, losing the focus to maintain her construct. He heard her knife sail past him as her cockpit snapped shut.
Metal screamed and bolts broke. Little Vicious was roaring curses, trying to wrestle her golem back under control. Inadvertently, she cast him loose, releasing him into the air. Then, suddenly, there was nothing holding him anymore. Cut free from his torturous cage, Avo flopped and tumbled across the ground as above, golem greeted crane in a snapping clash.
Faintly, he could hear Little Vicious howling. For a moment that stretched on forever, he chuckled, content to lay on the cool ground as his mind began to unravel from hunger and pain. A rising percussion of footsteps approached.
Someone was standing over him. He could hear their heartbeat. Their blood smelled tasteless. Pure.
“Jaus,” he heard them whisper. Or did they? Was anyone there? Draus? Draus. “Avo? Oh, deep hells, what the fuck did she do to you.”
He tried to say something. All that came was a cough.
“Alright.” She picked him up as if he weighed nothing. Considering how much of himself he burned trying to stay alive, that might’ve been the case. Above, Little Vicious continued to struggle. It sounded as if it were cutting against the crane now. “Come on. Let’s get, consang.”
Avo grunted. It was getting hard to think. “Draus…”
“Yeah?”
I was worth coming back for? “Consangs?"
Draus laughed. She increased her pace. "Crane's fuel cell was fried. Had to rig a replacement from an aerovec I found in one of the units. Kept it in stasis. Real lucky.”
Now it was his turn to laugh. “Lucky…”
As he bounced to the rhythm of Draus' footsteps, he felt a flash of light spear back into his right eye. He blinked. His sight returned to him. Faster than it normally grew back. Of course, the first thing that greeted him was the golem sinking the jaws on its crown into the walls, taking a bite out of the plascrete. Suddenly, its flowing rivulets flashed red. No longer did the blood gleam metallic. Now, the flows grew thicker, mottled.
Like plascrete.
The golem descended from the crane then, unaffected by magnetism. Like an anvil, it struck hard, cracking and mending blood and plascrete both.
Avo sighed. “Draus. Run. Run faster…”
“Whatever you do, do not graft more Ontologics than your thaumic mass can bear. Do not. Are you hearing me? Do not. The system can’t support it. It’ll make your Heaven fall and have you start looping deaths until you manage to fix whatever’s causing the dysfunction in your Heaven.
Keep at least twenty thaums of mass between your maximum sustainable mass and what you have functionally equipped. It will allow you to make the necessary changes you need. Tweak your builds for survival.
Second thing is to keep an eye on your Rend. Don’t vent your Hell unless you need to; let it digest slowly or you will find yourself vulnerable during expulsion. Mortal.
Tempo, tempo, tempo.
Never overextend. Overusing your Heavens will also see you isolated and killed. Hells, worse yet, the enemy might force you into creating a Rupture by making you overload, see your cadre snuffed alongside your incompetent ass…"
-Santanado “Starsinger” Mondelles, Combat Instructor to Axtraxis Academy of Highflame
2-14
Heaveneater
For moments, Avo lost focus. The world grew distant around him. His sight and hearing went in cycles. His skin felt prickly. The agony of his wounds folded into numbness then back again. In bouts of delirium, he laughed and hissed in equal measure. If he had the strength or coordination, he would have tried biting Draus, if only to taste the sweetness of flesh one last time.
As she ran, he clung to her, to life. His blood spilled out from his brutalized body, leaving a trail behind him. He was jealous of the humans then. Even the flats.
At least they could pass out fully from the pain.
Here then was another benefit of his blood; a ghoul's cells served as an extension to their mind. Their haemophagic cells formed a hyper-conductive synaptic fluid that supported consciousness. The fact that Avo found himself drifting in and out of awareness meant his blood loss was somewhere north of severe.
For the third time that day, he was close to crossing over into the Big Nothing.
His arms dragged against the ground. They were too long. Each bounce ignited coiling pain in his left shoulder where his arm had torn free from the socket, dangling. Internally, he was almost out of metabolism to burn.
A crash sounded behind him. Struggling, he found himself barely able to look up. The world around him was a blur of motion. Draus was going fast. The golem behind them was still coming, still charging. It had adopted a tide-like structure to its lower half, sweeping forward and knocking all in its path aside like a tsunami of melted plascrete that carried a quavering, shrinking tower.
The golem had paid a price for this realignment of its alchemy. Going from metal to plascrete was a great transition. The matter and molecular structures were too different. The cost could be seen in the jetstreams of blood peeling around the sides of the golem-like wings. These jetstreams were not alchemized into plascrete. They were just mundane. Basic blood.
The god was shedding its flesh, waning in the struggle against reality. Getting slower.
Avo hacked a wet laugh. “Might…might live…after…” The words grew slippery. His thoughtstuff fogged his accretion like vapors, lacking any solidity. The world around him grew distant again.
A curtain of shadows descended. Chaotic rainfall down the windshield of his consciousness. The colors of the world bled from the canvas of his cog-feed. Sound droned away into silence. His senses sank into the abyss beneath his flesh.
For a beat, there was nothing. Pleasantly nothing. No thoughts. No awareness. No pain. Perhaps this was what it was like to die the final time. The Big Nothing. A place beyond any paradise or eternal torment. Just a final stop where everything was not.
Then, he felt the cold touch of metal press against his back. Beneath him, gears and servos groaned. Energy thrummed below him. He was rising, carried on a pedestal.
A small, warm hand caressed his face before something snatched it away.
Avo gasped, air wheezing through his collapsed lung. Awareness exploded out from the center of his mind. Draus was staring down at him, her face battered. Bruised. The wounds were new. When had she gotten them? Pain clung to his every sinew, every pore. With one hand, she was holding the boy back while the father watched. The child had been reaching for him, trying to touch him.
Slowly, it dawned on him that they were on the platform, that they were going up. Stacks were sinking below them as they ascended slowly. In the far distance, some twelve rows of overturned containers away, an ominous spire of red was still rushing toward them.
“Infectious,” Avo said. His word came as a choked gasp. Dead gods, he wanted to tear the boy apart. Eat him. Eat his father. “Infectious…to…”
Good that Draus pulled the boy back. They didn’t have the vaccine in them yet. His blood could convert anything that had a bit of brain, enough biomass, and insufficient immuno-defenses to overcome his cells into a ghoul-nest.
Same as the ghoul that sired him. Even now, he could remember eating out from his nest, the first to hatch from the long cold corpse of his host.
“Golem,” he said, trying to point with his working arm. He just didn’t have the strength. His left arm resembled a mangled clump of meat now. Better that he lost it entirely. Trying to heal it in its current state would undoubtedly leave him with tumors. He drew what blood was left out from the limb and let it die.
“You're hurt!” the father proclaimed. Avo wanted to strangle the man. He knew he was hurt. He could feel every bit of that hurt.
“Really,” Avo said, staring at the rapidly decaying clump he had for an arm, “this my blood?’
Draus laughed. “Don’t worry about her. She’s behind us. We’re gonna make it. We’re gonna make it.” Draus knelt down next to him. Strangely, it was as if her eyes were staring through him, seeing someone else in his stead. “It’s almost midnight. Just gotta get you outside. Out beneath the rain. You’ll live. You’ll live.”
With an uncertain look, she drew a small knife from beneath the glitching veil of her damaged holocoat. She pulled out a small knife and dragged it across her arm. Holding it above him, she drip-fed him a steady flow of blood, an odd look of consternation clouding her face. “How’s this for service, citizen.”
Avo didn’t speak. He was too busy lapping the flowing liquid. It poured down his throat, tasting thicker and more clotted than any he had ever sampled. Inside, his remaining cells met the nanosurgeons in open battle. Her internal augmentations were far superior to his biology, but en masse his cells could still overwhelm a nanomachine’s capacity to fend. When he finally broke her nanite defenders down enough, he thought he just might live off the nutritional richness in her blood alone instead of ever even needing to feel the touch of the midnight rains.
Every few seconds, she had to reopen her arm. She scabbed too quickly for it to stay a wound. He didn’t complain. As long as she was willing to bleed, he was willing to feed. Desperate to feed. For a few moments, he nursed, until she finally drew the knife away. Instinctively, he bit at her, snarling, wanting more.
She held him back with a single arm as he struggled to get at her. A wry smirk tugged at a corner of her lip. “Right, you had enough there, joy-fiend.”
Avo wrestled a modicum of control back from the beast. If he wasn’t such mangled effigy, he would have undoubtedly tried to eat her or go after the boy and his father.
“Wanted eyes,” he muttered.
“Still need ‘em, consang,” she said. “Besides. Don’t think you’d like the circuitry.”
Avo laid back and laughed. He hurt. Everything hurt.
Sinking his perception into the Nether, he could see a literal forest of Specters looking down at them, spectral chains coiling, like a bird’s nest in the Nether. Savaged as he was, he could hear the whispers. Violent arguments clashed between different spectators, their phantasmal sequences lashing out at each other. There was dismay in his survival; joy in his triumph; confusion as to why Draus hadn’t left him; mockery at Little Vicious’ failure.
A storm of secondhand thoughts leaked out, washing over his mind in a near-deafening echo.
Survived. He had survived. Avo laughed, his voice a low chuckle not of joy, but pale triumph. It looked like death wouldn’t claim him after–
A thoughtwave bomb opened a gouge between tides of thought. An open chasm of silence drowned every mind, scouring every Specter from sight.
A blankness hewed deep through Avo’s mind, his surface thoughts dismembered from him, with only his Metamind guarded that which lay deeper. Draus staggered much the same way, a momentary incomprehension flashing over her eyes as, for a fleeting moment, she forgot where she was.
To the side, the father and son cried out in unison, toppling over and clutching their heads.
And synchronized with their fall, the tower that was the golem crumbled in the distance, splashing down as if a geyser of blood frozen in the first of time, now released. Uncontrolled, it splashed down amidst the stacks, painting the ground red. The blood seeped out, the spill expanding.
Except, there was something wrong. Except, Avo saw a single trail already painted, leading out from ahead of the golem, headed right beneath their platform.
Through his cog-feed, Avo caught sight of a flash of thoughtstuff. “Dra–”
Pointed and red, something tore through the underside between him and Draus, curving limbs scything savagely.
Violence erupted.
The attack came fast. Faster than Avo could perceive. Faster than even Draus could trigger her reflex booster. A dozen flicking wires clipped and bit through her flesh at the same time a ten-foot palm slammed into her, flattening her into the pillar upon which the platform was climbing.
The elevator groaned as sparks sprayed from Draus' back, her armored vest scraping against aged bronze.
Avo tried to rise, but a stinging lance plunged through his gut. He howled. Something inside him tore with a sickening snap. In the corner of his eye, Draus fired her implant and blurred. With a titanic effort, she pushed past the hand and dove low as nano-thin spearheads guided on slicing wires lanced out for her.
Where once Draus was on defense, the initiative now shifted back to her.
The construct facing her was far too small to be called a tower, but it loomed all the same. Now scarcely twenty feet wide and half again as tall, Little Vicious’ golem greeted them in a diminished, but much quicker form.
Looking upon it, Avo suddenly realized what must’ve happened. Little Vicious must have abandoned the bulk of her golem’s blood at some point, choosing instead to puppet it from afar as a decoy while her true, far lighter form pushed forward using the momentary cover of a thoughtwave bomb.
Weaponless, weary, battered, and bloodied, Draus was still the one to make her approach first. Avo had no idea how she was going to punch through the shell of the golem but quickly realized that might not have been her plan at all.
Avo found himself in admiration of Draus’ mastery of distance as she moved and shifted, pulling the golem out of place and subtly circling it. She was faster than he could perceive most times, but still, it was a sight to behold. Little Vicious had all the advantage in force and durability, but it was squandered in the hands of a wailing, tantrum-throwing pilot.
Wide slashings and expanding phalanxes of spears jutted out from the golem. Each second she fought, the golem shrank, waning, burning through what little fire its miracle had left in it.
Again, Avo noticed that the metallic glint of the golem’s blood had returned. Foolish. She had alchemized back over to some kind of alloy. Must’ve decided plascrete couldn’t cut it.
For the next few heartbeats, the dance continued. Draus made a feint of holding in place to bait the golem over before vanishing in a blur or bobbing past it. Frustrated, Little Vicious cast her blood out in a flood, spreading her reach across the surface they were standing on: the same trick she used to trap Avo earlier.
But Draus knew her enemy. Had faced them during the war. Just as the blood began to pool, Draus blinked. A flashing echo of her presence pulsed beside the golem, followed by the crack of an echoing hook punching through the sound barrier. Layers of blood hardened reflexively, but the golem still had to shape a dozen hands from its frame to stop itself from tumbling over the edge.
At the sight, comprehension began to bloom in Avo’s mind–a new gnosis of violence. Focus, then, was also a danger unto itself. For in the limit of this golem, that which it devoted to harm was stripped from its ability to protect, and its offering of mass had left it vulnerable to momentum.
Right now, Draus had speed, and so she determined all engagements. Little Vicious, despite controlling everything else, had failed to pit force against force and was now facing a battle of position or attrition.
A battle she was certain to lose.
Which was likely why she did what she always did when things were going against her. In an act of low-cunning, she flipped the board, and, as she lumbered forward to face Draus, shaped a tendril from behind the golem and seized the boy by his nape.
The father cried out. Avo flopped over, body too broken to rise, unable to do anything but watch.
With a contemptuous fling, she cast the screaming child over the edge.
Just in time for Draus to blink over to catch him.
Just in place for a scything blade of red to claim both her legs.
Both Draus and the boy toppled, going down in a heap. Still, blinding fast, Draus shuffled along her back and fought from a shuffle as if she never lost her legs at all. Still, she wasn’t nearly fast enough to avoid what came next.
A flat slab extended from the golem and hammered down. +Fucking! Sow!+ Little Vicious’ seething malice had a tangible taste in the air. A tonnage of pass peeled from the increasingly unsteady golem, hammering down against Draus. Once. Twice. Thrice.
Avo heard something break inside Draus. He could smell the bleeding.
Still, the Reg rose, spraying blood out her nose in disrespect.
Little Vicious howled. +Fucking! Fall! Fall! Fuck you! Fall!+ She hammered Draus into the pillar next to Avo, a cleave trailing right after her. The blade sank slick through Draus shoulder and levered. Draus’ eye barely twitched as her shoulder popped. Another blade sawed out, the remaining mass of the golem descending hard.
Avo watched as the golem buried itself deep and wretched Draus’ arm free from its socket. Laughing with exhausted relief, Little Vicious threw Draus next to Avo. The Regular toppled. Her wounds were already scabbing, but she was wheezing, dazed, and broken.
Looking at her savaged state filled Avo with an injection of existential dread. She wasn’t invincible. He knew that. He knew that Regulars could die. But seeing how Draus was, how much she’d taken, and now seeing her like this…
It filled him with a reminder of mortality.
How fast did hope rise? And how quick was it to plunge?
He barely reacted when a spearing hook of blood metal skewered him and drew him up into the air like a lanced fish. With his back toward the platform and the shining lights of the megablock’s lobby glaring down at him from the encroaching gap above, Avo exhaled.
He checked his cog-feeds. Systems were still destabilized. Overloaded. A pity. He would’ve liked ward-bashing her one more time before he went.
He had nothing left.
Draus had nothing left.
So close. But not enough.
Surrounded on an island untouched by the anomalous blood, the father and son clung to each other, horror staining their faces. The man held his auto-laser with quavering hands. The gun was clicking. Empty. Avo hadn’t even noticed him fire it. And neither did Little Vicious for that matter.
Not until right then.
A thread lashed out from the surrounding pool and pierced through the father’s shoulder. Bone fragments burst and skin tore. The man toppled in a scream. The boy followed, clinging to his father, wailing.
Avo forced himself to forget their faces. There was no point in seeing them as people now. Death was here for them, and it wanted its fill.
Again, tendrils of blood began to spread like metal roots within Avo. The renewed pain worked animalistic cries of pain he thought himself beyond making. She worked him twice as intricately this time. His muscles screamed. He felt the unmistakable sensation of something drilling through his bones, sawing through the remainder of his tendons, piercing through what organs he had.
He realized then that she was growing what amounted to a tree inside him. A thing rooted to him by pain.
And halfway through the spreading of the branches, she stopped.
If Avo had the ability to weep, he would’ve. At that moment, he would have collapsed to his knees and proclaimed his abuser the patron saint of mercy for stopping the hurt.
But this wasn’t a culmination. No. Just punctuation; a lull before the next course.
Faintly, Avo heard Little Vicious laughing through the Nether. She sounded close. Felt close. She pulled him back and held him up next to her.
The golem wasn’t so large anymore at all. From its considerable mass of over eighty tons, he doubted she was operating with more than three right now. So thin were her defenses that he could practically reach out and touch the command module, its vents pumping and sparking, one pluming smoke and darkness into the blood from overwork.
+Thought I was just going to give up?+ Little Vicious said, her voice seething like a crackling fire. +All of you are going to die. All of you!+
The boy flinched as he pressed his palm to his father’s wound. The man’s breathing was labored. Tears flowed from his eyes. Terror emanated from his naked mind.
“Why?” the father cried, leaning against his son. “Why? Why? We just want to come to the city! We have done you no wrong? Committed no ill.”
Little Vicious scoffed. +Because you dying gets me views, half-strand!+ She was going to say something else but ended up laughing instead. When she next spoke, her words were tinged with pure cruelty. +Observe.+
A crudely-shaped pike punched through the boy's gut from behind, tearing him off the ground. Avo heard the father shrieking in despair, blood-formed limbs holding him against the ground while tilting his head up, forcing him to watch.
The boy’s face paled. He clutched at his chest as his eyes bulged. Redness poured from his mouth as he went stiff in shock. Three more haemokinetic hands forced the boy’s mouth open.
+What was that you called them,+ Little Vicious asked. +Choiceless?+ She chuckled. +Yeah. I…I like the term. It fits.+
Even through the pain, Avo knew what she was going to do. Was horrified by it. Had spent his entire life avoiding it. “No,” he pleaded, his voice barely a whisper. This wasn’t his choice. He didn’t want this. “Kill me. Kill me. Not this.”
He knew begging was wrong when he heard Little Vicious laugh. “It’s not up to you, consang.”
Held over the boy, Avo struggled with all that he had left, trying to escape before the inevitable. Below, he could hear the father roaring, straining. Draus pawed weakly toward the sound, crawling with her one remaining limb.
The boy stared up at Avo in horror, mouth open, weeping.
“Didn’t want this,” Avo said, trying to convey his regret. The beast hungered for the boy’s flesh yet, desperate for meat on the cusp of death. The rest of him loathed every second of this. He had struggled, fought so hard to keep his fate his own. All taken by a teenage psychopath who just wanted more eyes on her product. “Would’ve killed you. Spared you–”
Grasping limbs sank into the flesh of his back. Fingers pushed through his shoulder blades, dislodging his spine and mangling his flesh to bloody pap. The world disappeared into a miasma of agony. His blood poured free, raining down with his viscera into the boy’s open mouth.
Infecting him.
Cackling with laughter, Little Vicious watched her work. Her pointless work. The ghosts were gone. Her thoughtwave bomb had ensured that. A child was dying for her amusement alone. The boy spasmed in the grip of her fists, his body twitching. Gore-stained foam bubbled from his mouth as his eyes rolled back and his biomass began to grow sallow.
+Look at that,+ Little Vicious whispered. Avo realized she was recording the moment. Saving it for upload later. “Think of the views for this night.” She sniffled. +This perfect, perfect night. It’s all thanks to you, ghoulie. All thanks to you. Here: your reward.+
The limbs holding his insides tugged in opposite directions. Barely managing a final howl, Avo came apart in two. The light went out of his eye as the last sinews within his skull tore in twain.
For the third time, the jaws of death clamped down upon Avo.
But neither darkness nor memory greeted him this time. Instead, he felt the shaped blood that killed him descend with him into the throes of death.
Downward, he descended into the embrace of an inverted flame.
INITIALIZING RESURRECTION - 1%
ATTENTION - HEAVEN DETECTED [DOMAIN: BLOOD; MATTER]
DESIGNATION: SANGEIST
NO LIMINAL BOUNDARY DETECTED
EXTRACTING HEAVEN - INITIALIZING GRAFT - 1%
Do you know why the Guilds banned the old scriptures? Redacted the canons of the old pantheons? To stop us from building our own Heavens, consangs. They’re trying to keep us in the gutters.
This was not the dream.
We were promised more than these gutters. When Jaus joined the Eight and crowned this city with his Arks, he had a vision. A vision of existence shaped by a new order. An order where divinity was made to serve the people, not hoarded by the elites.
This was not the dream.
We are the people. And we are starving. I say I had enough. I’d say we had enough. It’s time to take back what they’ve been stealing from us, what they’ve been using our lives and labor to fuel.
This was not the dream.
They drink our lives. They fuel their machines! They think they can take the future from us and that we’ll just watch? Fuck them! Fuck that! Let’s build our own god. A new god. A true god. Let’s take it to these half-strands one final goddamn time.
This is the dream. This is the new promise. This is our holy war. This is the Last Apocalypse.
-Cas eld’Canduir, Rockstar, Cult Leader, Terrorist
2-15
Apotheosis
RESURRECTION - 10%
GRAFTING HEAVEN - 44%
REQUIRED THAUMS - [20 thaums/c]
REVIEWING MYTHOLOGY FOR PARADOXES….
WARNING: INSUFFICIENT THAUMIC MASS
[HELL: FIRST CIRCLE]
SIMULATING LIMINAL FRAME
No memory carried Avo out from the jaws of death this time. No lull in time was felt between the moment of his death and his consciousness’ transition to this nigh-infinite expanse of nothingness.
Around him burned an inverse flame, brightness funneling into his being, drawn to him like a star spilling into a singularity. It was like no flame he had ever beheld, for it burned with a pellucid shine. No heat poured from its presence. Instead, the flames ebbed outward in shimmering waves, each pulsing emanation simulating a hue of radiance, stretching as if establishing the borders of all existence.
Avo tried to move. No limb answered him. The absence of limbs or even flesh struck feedback from his mind. Somewhere between isolation and tranquility, he languished. He did not know if ghouls were beholden to the frailties of the human mind. He was molded to be psychotic by design, in knowing this, he wondered how much more deranged he could ever even truly get.
Perhaps this was hell. A place of perpetual torment that he was predestined for. But if that were to be true, then why was he bereft of hunger here? Why did the streams of his thought flow free? Unimpeded?
Yet, as he cast his perception downward, he found an actual Hell greeting him. A single concentric ring that ran as far as his fire could shine. Two blurred sigils took up opposite positions from each other as they spun slowly. He knew those sigils–had seen concentric chasms with this very same symbology built beneath techno-thaumic reactors.
They were meant to expel the wastage of miracles. He guessed that what he found serving near-nonexistent bedrock beneath him was shaped for the very same purpose.
Within the Hell’s gaping depths, a spiral of darkness swirled, draining down nigh-endlessly to an end Avo found himself unwilling to fathom. The Hell was a strange, flickering construct. Ethereal. As if it was missing something, something to fully anchor it before it could materialize. A counterweight of sorts.
Staring into it began to disquiet his mind. Avo felt a surge of emotionless dread. Only his consciousness was struggling. Straining.
He forced it to still.
Long-buried words from Walton returned to him. A lesson: the first lesson. Accept to adapt. Lies can be unraveled once you subsume them and assimilate the facts. Reality, however harsh, could be survived as long as one did not cleave themselves between the pulling tides of want and necessity.
Pouring all anxiety, all distractions from his mind, Avo thought not of his most recent murder. He ignored the ineffable ache he felt at being used by Little Vicious to infect the flesh of the boy. He also accepted that the primary thing he felt as the boy wailed in pain was hunger, however much the situation befouled the palette of his ethics.
Instead, he faced this small cage of brightness around him and realized he could feel all that existed around him. Suddenly, the metaphor of this place being a cage was wrong. This place–this plane of existence–was him. Or perhaps was simply laced to his consciousness that he could feel the mechanisms of this reality.
If his mind dreamed at the center of this machine, then the flames were akin to his nerves and memory both. As far as they could ripple, he tasted the emptiness around him. A moment passed. The brightness of his fire spilled out again, disturbing the tapestry of nonexistence.
As the ripple spun from him, he felt an eldritch serpent molded from gleaming mercury circling him just beyond the flames. Within it, he heard the echoing minds of those he had killed, drawn into his being. They were whispering to him. Praying to him. Worshipping him.
With each cycle, they would dissolve beneath the boiling incandescence of the flame. Yet, they would manifest anew when arriving where the serpent ate its own tail, returning as sure as the passing of seasons.
Even as the serpent coiled around him, he felt it not as a prison for his fire, but more a spine. A pillar. Something to provide structure and eternal sustenance. Between its flowing scales, he counted the echoes he had taken in.
Twenty. That was how many lives he had supped the succor of existence from. Some of them by his own hand. Some of them by encounter or happenstance. He heard their voices clear and crisp but tasted none of their personality, nor their memories. That seemed to exist beyond this place, the realm of cognition parted from the realm of raw belief, of quintessential, primal will.
This, then, was the deconstruction of their self-awareness, the totality of their capacity to believe, to be conscious, now all dedicated to fueling the incomprehensible engine that he was.
Cycling and renewing forever, looping back into existence as fast as they were expended.
Another tide of fire washed out from him. It rippled out in eight cascades. Eight. Through them, his control of this space was absolute. Entirely bound to his awareness, his will. The reason why he couldn’t move wasn’t that he was trapped. The reason he couldn’t move was that the entirety of this plane was part of him.
It was as if a metaphysical shell had been grafted upon his very being, or that his mind had been injected into a divine machine that went beyond the bounds of his comprehension.
RESURRECTION - 35%
GRAFTING HEAVEN - 100%
REVIEWED - MYTHOLOGY STABLE
AVAILABLE ONTOLOGIC SLOTS - [0/2]
HEAVEN GRAFTED - [SANGEIST]
DOMAIN: (BLOOD/MATTER)
THAUMIC REQUIREMENTS - 20 thaum/c
HELL DETECTED - [FIRST CIRCLE]
DOMAIN: (MATTER/ENTROPY)
THAUMIC REQUIREMENTS - 10 thaum/c
REND VENTS ONL–
WARNING: REND VENTS OFFLINE - INSUFFICIENT THAUMS
Through the shrouded ocean of emptiness, Avo felt a strange entity sink past the folds of his brightness. From darkness, it materialized. The motes of his fire not only brightened its shape but also gave it a secondhand awareness of his presence. It drifted toward him. Yet, when it finally approached him, Avo felt like an ember in a maelstrom, fighting to stay composed as a mutilated leviathan tore free from the womb that was the midnight sea.
This creature–the Sangeist as he had suddenly become aware–unveiled itself to him as a beautiful nightmare. Like a tower built by oozing scars and bleeding wounds, it sank over him, seeking to crown his flame, drawn to the gravity of his being.
Its apex rose like the jagged jaws of a hound clenched around a chaotic pattern. As it drank in his brightness, however, the pattern shot open to reveal a burning shard of alloy. Suddenly, he felt it glaring down at him. Caressing the strange pattern with his will, Avo felt a familiar sensation. This here was a piece of plasteel. This was what the golem had alchemized with its blood.
The pattern, then, must have represented its structure. Molecular, perhaps? Avo pushed that thought aside as the base of the tower revealed its inner design to him. Within the tower, pulsing veins pumped cells bearing the symbol of plasteel. It mirrored his biology, in a sense. No organs. No heart. Just the blood, moving to surges from his mind.
The tower enclosed itself around him. But Avo felt no fear. No worry. He was the only will in this place. The alien tower was merely a vessel long hollowed. By now, he knew what he was graced with; had seen others like it burning and spasming through the thinness of reality over certain districts.
This was a Heaven. The hollowed corpse of a god long stripped of its soul. This was the instrument of his demise.
And now, somehow, it belonged to him.
RESURRECTION - 66%
Tendrils of blood began sinking into him, clicking around his serpent as he felt his consciousness expand. His flames, once an omnidirectional ripple, flowed through his new ontology. Two sigils flashed into existence beside him, churning around him as they whispered their trueness to him.
DOMAIN OF (MATTER)
CANON: ALCHEMIZATION - THE MASTER OF THIS DOMAIN CAN NOW SUBSUME AND MIMIC THE STRUCTURE AND EFFECTS OF ONE PIECE OF PHYSICAL MATTER; ONLY ONE PIECE OF MATTER MAY BE MIMICKED AT A TIME UNLESS THE CANON IS ALTERED
HUBRIS: ONLY SOLID MATTER CAN BE SUPPED FROM. ANY ATTEMPTS TO MIMIC LIQUID OR GAS WILL RESULT IN THAUMIC BACKLASH
DOMAIN OF (BLOOD)
CANON: HAEMOKINESIS - THE MASTER OF THIS DOMAIN CAN NOW ACCELERATE AND MANIPULATE ALL BLOOD THEY ARE IN CONTACT WITH; SPEED AND FORCE OF THE BLOOD WILL MIRROR THE MASTER’S NATURAL LIMITS UNLESS THE CANON IS ALTERED
HUBRIS: ONLY UP TO EIGHTY TONS OF BLOOD CAN BE MANIPULATED AT ONCE
His will spread through the tower. No longer was he the faint ember beholding a leviathan. Now, he felt as if he was the titan itself, that which made the waves quaver.
Bones shaped from the light of his flame grew out from him, fusing into the structure of the tower as if a spine. His consciousness swelled. Feedback and senses returned to him. With a thought, he felt the interior shift as the layout of his new Heaven shifted, rooting over him. He peered out from slatted plates of crimson armor now. He could feel every drop of blood that comprised his metaphysical self for he was the blood, and he could channel the shape of the matter between his jaws, for matter existed to him as breath did for his lungs.
Eighty-tons.
Just like the golem.
Beneath the tower, he felt the spinning chasm of Hell he sensed earlier pulse momentarily and sputter. Disappointment filled above. The entropic chasm was spinning counter to the serpent bound to his Heaven now, but it wasn’t solid enough to manifest.
He lacked the thaumic mass–more sacrifices were needed for it to be grafted unto him.
All these sensations greeted him at once. He felt like a newborn festooned within the body of a giant. His quintessence flowed through every sinew, across every plate he could have, his fire forging trueness into the shape of his new frame.
So overwhelmed by all that was unfolding before him that he didn’t feel a rogue shard of memory snap free from the center of his awareness. What was that? How long had that been there?
Like a dagger, it plunged into the blood that formed his body, sinking deep before the shape of a man rose, breathing through the surface like a seed bearing the fruit of a ghost.
“Overwhelming, isn’t it,” A familiar voice greeted Avo even before the figure fully emerged from the hardened slats of crimson. Before Avo’s awareness was Walton, standing upon a turbulent sea of blood, he himself a facsimile of thaumaturgy and blood.
For a moment, Avo just watched on in confusion and disbelief. Walton was dead. He had died five years ago when all the cojoined Heavens of Love and Lust fell and wombrash consumed the city.
Still, here the man was, standing before him. Same face. Same coat. Same smell of citrus.
How did that smell linger, even here?
RESURRECTION - 85%
Walton? Avo asked. His mind rumbled like the voice of thunder here. His blood vibrated and shaped into letters in Standard. His control here was absolute. All-encompassing. Total.
Walton didn’t seem to notice.
“Avo, if you’re seeing me now, that means you’re dead. Like me. Good news is you won’t be dead for long. Better news is that you probably managed to get your first Heaven. Would be hard to simulate this memory I planted inside without a domain or two, I’d say.” The man shrugged sheepishly, the muted expression the closest he ever had to shame.
“I know it's a lot to...heh…take in, but I will be as I’ve always been with you, and tell you the truth: this is the beginning. This is as simple as things get. You’re now a Godclad of the First Sphere. The mundane will quail before you. The ones with power will want to feed from you. And…you might just lose yourself in all this.”
Avo didn’t understand. As was often the case when he spoke to Walton. Experience told him to wait. The memory of Walton played on. His father was always a mystery, but never obtuse. He always told Avo the objective. When something was withheld, it was for the sake of discipline or education.
This time would be no different.
“You might be trying to talk with me right now. Might not be. I don’t know the state you’re in, but I have faith that you are still unbroken. Still whole.” Walton gave a soft smile. “Your nature has given you a fortitude that most would envy. And, rightfully, I think my teachings have instilled in you the ethics needed for you to succeed.”
If Avo could whimper, he would’ve. Succeeding was not among the things he had been doing recently.
Walton rubbed his jaw and looked down. He was thinking of what next to say. “There are some things you don’t know about me. Some things that even I don’t know about me. But that’s not what matters right now. Right now, you need to know that this city, the ones who can’t choose, need you.”
Why? Why father?
“Right now, you need to go to the Easy Armistice at Light’s End. Depending on where you are right now, you’ll need to descend the Tier and go down to the Warrens.” His father pursed his lips and sighed. “I know that your…place of origin troubles you. But remember what I taught you. You are what you do. You are the choices you make. And you don’t need to be the same person tomorrow as you were yesterday.
“Once you get to the Easy Armistice, talk to Fredritch Three-Eye and tell him that you're with the Ninth Column, and that ‘the dream is broken.’ He’ll give you an engram containing…another itinerant of me. I…he’ll tell you more…but with this being said, there’s no going back now.” Walton shrugged his shoulders, the act almost mournful. “I didn’t want this for you. Wanted you to have a life. At least for a while.”
A million more questions swirled in Avo’s mind like a whirlwind. Ninth Column? Easy Armistice? Another iterant? He didn’t even know how he got cast down into the Maw? Was this Liminal Frame what allowed him to possess a Heaven? To come back from death? And how did Walton even know about any of this?
Just how dead was his father…
Avo’s mind screamed all those questions in unison at Walton. Around him, the red waves swept up in a grim reflection of the cataclysm brewing within. But Walton just stood, unbothered by the crashing waves of turbulence, and smiled as if there was nothing wrong.
“Avo. I might be gone. But the best of me still echoes in through you. I know you don’t feel it– can’t feel it, but I’m proud of you. Always have been proud of you. I chose you for this not as a punishment, but because I want you to be more. To see all the colors existence has to offer. And maybe change its course. You’re going to have to make some choices soon. Few of them easy. None of them are enviable. But you need to climb the Tiers. You need to ascend the Arks. You need to reach the Ladder and stop the Guilds. This utopia…this purgatory that they’ve made…it has to stop. Before they tear existence asunder, it has to stop.”
RESURRECTION - 99%
The inverted fire fused over Avo’s consciousness now, squeezing him down into himself as Walton began to dissolve.
Wait–wait!
“This was not the dream,” Walton said, an expression like steel even as he came apart. “I wish I could've seen--"
RESURRECTION - 100%
IMPLANTING NOUS
Avo felt his consciousness fold over the veil of his Heaven, surging forward into the light of existence, back to the place of his murder.
Want to know what happens when two Heavens clash?
A paradox. Paradox forms. And if there’s too much paradox, Rend backlash turns to thaumic overload, then someone’s Heaven falls and Ruptures reality.
If it's suicide you want, I got a dealer you can call. They got the stuff that will make your heart pop instead of killing everyone else.
-Captain Osjack Wells, Guest Lecturer at Axtraxis Academy of Highflame


2-16
Welcome to New Vultun
ONTOLOGY REVERTED
RESURRECTION COMPLETED
DOMAIN RESPAWN ENGAGED
PSYCHOLOGY BASELINES ESTABLISHED - REMOVING MEMORY STABILIZATION FEATURE
SOUL ONLINE
ENGAGING THAUMIC CYCLER: 20 THAUM/c
LOADING PHANTASMIC…
WARNING! TRAUMATIC OVERLOAD! NETHER UNSTABLE! NETHER UNSTABLE!
Existence stuttered. Reality screamed. As his senses crashed back into him in a muted rush, Avo felt a supernova bloom within him as he broke free from a puddle of blood, manifesting in reality. Around him, space itself quavered like a dimmed candle, his brightness usurping the natural laws and subverting them with the Heaven that was now grafted upon his being.
He knew what he was now. There was no way to deny it now. He had beheld this radiance nightly, gazing upon the blots of fused chimeric gods that dotted the naked flesh of the sky as they formed from ascending pillars of techno-thaumic energy.
He and those gods stood kindred in a way. But he was whole while they were merely puppets; a Godclad.
His Liminal Frame had exiled him from mortality now, returned him to life, and bound him to the deeper powers that dwelled with the metaphysical, the divine. This too must have been why his new Metamind sounded like him. Because the system had to be forked from his mind to prevent consciousness rejection.
With this known, a million more questions ignited inside him, but he cast all that aside as he found himself aware of the toppled cockpit, bobbling like a shell down a shallow pool. Inside, Avo felt the blood flowing inside Little Vicious, and could somehow see the rushing currents of red surging through her body as her heart screamed with fear.
Blind to all other desires, Avo strode past the father.
The man was soaked in red, weeping. In his arms, the boy spasmed and twitched, hemorrhaging from his orifices. His skin was sloughing off from his body as his muscles atrophied as sagged, his metabolism burning away to nothing. Impossibly, Avo also felt the haemophage eating away the child’s organs, breaking down all his mass and drawing it up to his prefrontal cortex. Soon, only a misshapen hive of flesh. Perhaps just enough to produce one ghoul.
It was only a matter of time now.
“A-Avo.” Draus. Her voice came from behind him, hoarse with pain. He would speak with her later. Now, he had a debt of pain to square–an act of cruelty to inflict.
Perhaps it spoke much of how base he was in that moment, so deep in his vicious intent that his mind and the beast hummed the same bloodthirsty thoughts.
He could detect no ghosts around him. The spectators were still afar, mostly peeled back around the locus above them, holding its exterior in the Nether as if standing in defensive formations, not daring to approach.
The golem, on the other hand, spewed broken drifts of thoughtstuff before him. Something sparked and smelled of melted microplastics, a flame rising in a slot on its backside. Currents of chaotic memories and emotions washed over him, bifurcating against his wards, a stream cleaved by a yielding crop of rocks.
He had been torn in half earlier. He had felt it. Draus and the father had undoubtedly seen it. Witnessed it with their own eyes and minds. Yet, there was no sign of his body anywhere. In fact, if it weren’t for the infection of the boy, it was as if all the pain Little Vicious had inflicted on Avo had never been.
Striding across a carpet of gore, Avo felt the blood he was in tactile contact with gravitating to his will, surging like a tide to his footsteps in by desire alone. Though his knowledge of thaumaturgy was lacking, his instincts guided his new capabilities. His momentum became the blood’s momentum. His strength became his blood's strength.
Reaching out into his domain of blood, felt his haptic senses widen, the pooled blood beneath his feet greeting his cognition like a newly implanted limb. Above the lights of the approaching level flickered, the platform wailing upward as its warped matter ground against the mechanical pillar. Below, in the reflection of the red, Avo beheld himself not in flesh, but as the burning avatar that was the Sangeist.
But then again, it was now as much a part of him as his thoughts were.
With a simple act of will, he shaped the blood beneath him. A new interface manifested through his cog-feed, feeding his mind with new reports. The structure of his Heaven greeted him, the cognitive menu dense with information and overwhelming to behold. Several menus were flashing red. He knew little of “Rend” or how it was supposed to affect him. All he knew was that it was bound to his Hell, and his Hell was currently nonexistent.
He needed more deaths before it could kick in.
From his shoulders, a thin helm of blood instinctively clasped over his face, coating the right and left of his head in armor shaped like a hound’s jaws. Above his rippling Metamind, a new pattern burned, its structure spinning the properties of plasteel into the blood.
Perfect.
Avo shaped all the blood he could control, mapping the design after his own clawed hand. Connected to him by wisp-thin threads, he controlled his new haemokinetic construct–a near ton of matter bearing the qualities of both blood and metal. Rearing it over the ejected cockpit of the golem, he brought it down.
And knocked.
The beast inside him wailed, unwilling to wait. But Avo didn’t want it to be easy. He didn’t want it to be just another killing.
No. The torture and pain she had inflicted on him aside, she had infected the boy using his blood. That was an act that fit his former masters. That was an act upon the choiceless. And for that, Avo thought he deserved to eat her eyes.
“Vicious,” Avo said, unable to contain the chuff of slavering excitement inside him. “Open the door.” He felt her blood rush through her body at twice the rate it did before. The knowledge pleased him, and like a joy-fiend building up to a buzz, an uncontrollable grin spread across his face.
Now he knew what it was like to be her. How intoxicating.
He was smiling. Genuinely, truly smiling. It must’ve clashed terribly with the sobbing cries of the father, but Avo didn’t care. He couldn’t. Without a Morality Injector and with hunger on his mind, all the sorrows in the world could wait till later. Now was a time to feast and indulge.
Her voice crackled from the golem, only one working speaker carrying her words. “You’re dead. You’re dead, you’re dead, you’re fucking dead!” What desperate words they were. What palpable fear she had. What flavor would her eyes taste?
“Was dead,” Avo said. He shaped his haemokinetic claw tips down to the thinnest he could muster and plunged it into the crenulations of the cockpit. Mangled titanium screamed against the unceasing force of his claw, bending, tearing, coming apart. Sparks and plates burst free from the machine. Glass and sensitive electronics cracked. Servos and hydraulics struggled and popped.
In Avo’s cog-feed, warnings flashed. At any other moment, he would have stopped. Not then. Not when he could hear Little Vicious’ screams spilling out as he peeled the shell away from her. Not when he could hear her twitching heart and smell her over-fragrant scent.
WARNING: THAUMS INSUFFICIENT TO MANIFEST HELL
REND CAPACITY: 21%.... 28%
The claw flicked. The exterior of the cockpit came free. Little Vicious rose in a blur, a flash of light spilling from her gun. Reflexively, Avo cocooned himself with his Heaven, his haemokinetic claw fusing over him like an aegis, lifting him into the air as he strode forward, piloting the tower as if it was an exo-rig. The sweetness of their swapped roles pleased him, but not nearly as much as her feebleness did.
The hyper-accelerated spikes of her sub-gauss cracked against his metaphysical armor, the blood splashing and bending instead of cracking. Never breaking, always mending.
REND CAPACITY: 33%... 37%
Three spikes bit into his shroud, traveling but an inch before he managed to congeal his grip and harden his shell. At once, his tower’s plates thickened. Yet, he found something new greeting him. In the back of his mind, a new interface flashed into existence, asking if he wanted to swap alchemical patterns. He felt the plasteel symbol burning at the top of his tower blink, a cycling symbol flashing over it. The spikes captured by his blood meanwhile were coming alight with new patterns, a new sigil sliding into his awareness.
Avo tasted their composition with his mind. Tungsten. He somehow knew that the spikes were tungsten. Guided more by instinct than understanding, he swallowed one with his blood and digested it into his being. Suddenly the new sigil for tungsten overwrote the plasteel. He felt his protective skin harden. Inside, his thaumic cycler spun faster as his Soul roared like an accelerating engine.
MATTER ALCHEMIZED
REND CAPACITY: 55%
Little Vicious’ last few shots broke against his new armor. Unfurling the blood across his back like a jagged wing, Avo watched as the host of this miserable carnival yanked on the trigger, hyperventilating. Snot was running free from her nose. Tears ran down her face. Finally, after a few more moments of pointless panic, the gun clattered from her grip and she sobbed.
“But you’re dead. But I killed you. It’s not fair. It’s not fair–”
Two branches of blood shot out from his frame, sinking into her shoulders. Her screams were not what he would call sweet, but they made him hunger all the same. Like she had inflicted upon him before, he slowly began to grow roots of tungsten–spreading it through her veins, around her muscles. He took special care to carve through her implants while avoiding her vitals and even began directing the flow of her blood, doing everything he could to prevent her from having an embolism.
He wanted her alive for now. He was going to use her and make things right before he fed.
Beaming with pride, Avo marched back over to where the father and the boy were, Little Vicious now spread wide in his grip like an asterisk, held above him on threads of blood like a banner of torment. Draus was with them now, having somehow crawled her way over to the father with but a single arm and internal bleeding. The right side of her face, formerly cracked, was now latticed with scabs. One of her eyes hung on cords of sinew and wire.
Yet, even in such a state, she betrayed no hint of pain. Instead, she looked upon Avo with stunned awe. She breathed, the sound a rasped hackle of disbelief. “I’ll be…godsdamned. You…you’re fuckin’ ‘Clad?”
REND CAPACITY: 59%
She, however, wasn’t who Avo was looking for. Instead, he made his way over to the grieving father and the dying boy, just as the platform ground to a halt. A vacant sprawl greeted them, the lobby of a long abandoned megablock. They were in the load section. Where aerobarges were supposed to park along the square slots of the platform to deliver goods down to the storage level below.
A grand hologram played in the center of the room from a still beaming trident-shaped project, casting grainy images of smiling children waving, a voidship rising, and the brightstar revealing its face as the planetary rings spun passed the point of dawn.
All the while, the audio played on repeat, greeting all newcomers rising past the ruins of the world into one of the few great bastions remaining in the galaxy. “Welcome to the City of Tiers! The City of Gods! The Crown of the World! Welcome to New Vultun!”
Dangling Little Vicious over the boy and his father, Avo laughed. “Look. I made it right. Didn’t let her get away. Look.” He lowered Little Vicious, his tungsten-sharp roots slicing through her as she drooped. An inhuman howl came free from her lungs.
“Stop!” Little Vicious cried. “Stop! Please! I’m sorry! Stop! Fuck! Fuck! I don’t want to die!”
But instead of laughing or nodding with satisfaction, the father just stared upon the tortured form of his tormentor, his face a vacant stare. His thoughtstuff unfolded, whipping out from his mind in loose, breaking strands. A low moan came from the man’s throat as he dragged his fingernails across his face. A maddened gibber followed, his bloodshot eyes staring off into the distance between his fingers. He sank to his knees. The display made Avo chuff in slight displeasure. Why didn’t the man appreciate his attempts to make things right?
The boy, however, proved to be a different tale. As the Big Nothing came for him, the boy’s eyes rolled back into focus one final time. His lips quivered. He looked at Avo, at his father, at the writhing wretch that was Little Vicious, and finally, at a holographic voidship climbing up the levels, dissolving in the open air.
As welcoming audio looped again, he managed a triumphant giggle and smiled. “Nu–Nu Vultun!” he said.
His was a face of pleasure, a face cast in the glow of dreams that would have never belonged to the likes of him. Still, his was a face that was happy. Truly happy, without the need for cruelty and hunger.
Avo found himself jealous at that. He, too, looked at the rising voidship. Something made him turn Little Vicious around to do the same. There, the five of them watched as the welcoming holograms came to an end and restarted anew.
REND CAPACITY: 77%
WARNING: REND AT 3/4ths CAPACITY! RECOMMEND ACTIVATING HELLVENTS!
The recommendation flashed across his cog-feeds without Avo noticing, for Little Vicious had started laughing.
As his branches spiraled over the pitiful organ she called a heart, Avo found it a pity that he could not infect her. The vaccine was strong in her blood, her biology already conditioned to face the haemophage.
“This…this was not the dream.” she said, sniffling.
Looking up at her, he pushed his branches through her flesh, pulling her skin wide. Spreading apart to his will, the glow of the holograms made her resemble a leather lantern.
“This was the dream,” Avo said, pulling her back from any possible escape, physical or mental. “This,” he gestured out at the vast emptiness around him; the abandonment and the rust, “was what your kind made. All the Heavens. For a world of nothing.”
His words cut through her momentarily reverie and she threw her head back, giving all that she had left into a final howling scream. At that, Avo found his smile again. Her pain was his dream. Her pain was what he wanted. What he—
Avo swallowed. What Walton taught him to fight.
REND CAPACITY: 84%
VENT! VENT! VENT!
Staring at his prey, Avo gave a sigh as he heard the crunch of something pushing against the roof of the boy’s skull. The child was dead. Avo couldn’t hear his heartbeat. Still, better this way than in some gutter. At least the last thing he knew was hope and joy. That would prove to be his last forever.
As he drew Little Vicious in close, he found her looking everywhere but him. He cupped her face into his hands and forced her to meet him, eye to eye. “You had a choice. You chose. You chose to hurt. You deserve this.”
“No,” she whimpered.
“You deserve this,” Avo said, uncertain who he was trying to convince. He wanted this. She should die. She killed the boy. But the torture. The cruelty. That wasn’t for her. That was for him. Walton might have killed her. But not tortured her.
Avo wasn’t Walton.
With a thought, all his threads folded, and her body did the same. The sounds he earned from her then were demonic, primal, pure. He left her spine and skull intact, but everything else began to shift and tear. She came apart and began pouring out from herself, his will sculpting her organs into inverted wings mocking her descent to oblivion. She might’ve begged him at some point. He really didn’t hear.
When he was finally done, her disfigured skull and spine hovered, a mangled totem that served as a centerpiece to the fused blocks of her organs. Her heart still pulsed as he forced blood through it. Her liver was still warm on the inside. One of her lungs popped. Sloppy on his part.
But he had delivered his loathing back to her. The feeling was wondrous.
Eyes empty, her thoughtstuff spurting as chaotically as the father’s, all her tangled cords were capable of producing now were whistles. Short shrieks of belonging more to a bird than a girl.
Placed his hands around her head–so small that his fingers could wrap all the way around–-he buried his fangs around her eyes and sucked.
In a sense, his hunger was the last thing she ever got to see.
Avo feasted. And for a moment, the world was perfect.
REND CAPACITY: 90%
VENT! VENT! VENT!
WARNING: NO HELL MANIFESTED
UNABLE TO VENT
ENGAGING SAFETY OVERRIDES
ADJUSTING TO ZERO BURN
Suddenly, felt his connection to Heaven break. A flash of incandescence pulsed through him as Little Vicious flopped free from where the pillar used to be, her organs pouring loose like offal. In his cog-feed warning icons were flashing through the menu of his Heaven. Several icons were burning at capacity. He didn’t care. He was too busy chewing on her eyes. They were delicious.
After he finished, he heard another crack coming from behind. The boy’s body wasn’t much of a body anymore either. His limbs had detached at some point, drained dry of all substance as a porous sac swelled from where his chest used to be. Something inside was swimming. Pushing. Traveling up the sack and nursing on the remaining brain matter within the skull. A ghoulling was about to hatch. Inside, Avo heard the tiny hisses of his offspring. Just the one.
The father was clinging to the boy’s hand, even as he whispered broken prayers. Artad this. Artad that. Artad was dead and so was the boy.
And Avo, even with all his newfound power, could never make that right again.
Avo ignored the man and walked over next to Draus. She was looking up at him, her wariness returning. Only when he matched gazes with her did he realize that she was probably thinking if he was going to kill her. “Nest. About to hatch one.”
Beaten. Maimed. Weary. She rolled onto her back over her scab-coated stumps and let out an exhausted breath. “Yeah. I know.”
“Didn’t want to infect him,” Avo said. “Going to deal with it.”
She flicked her eyes over to him. “You. You got a Liminal Frame. How?”
He shrugged. “Can’t remember.”
She scoffed a laugh. “Jaus fuckin’ Avaundaer. ‘Course you can’t.”
Another crack. A flap of the skull was lifting off. Distantly, Avo could hear the pounding of heavy footsteps approaching with a course of whining servos. Exo-rigs, it sounded like. Approaching from beyond the desiccated marble columns, standing like parapets before the partially collapsed walls.
“Probably Syndicate hitters,” Draus said. “Come to collect us. Or finish us off.”
Avo walked over to the boy. He didn’t look at the child’s face. He did his best to let there be no memory at all. With practiced ease, he brought his foot down on the boy’s skull, pulping it and the ghoulling festering inside. The crunches came with two echoes but only one ghost.
THAUMIC CYCLER: 22 thaum/c
GHOSTS - [35]
Ah. Right. One more of each from Little Vicious as well.
The father, past the point of breaking, just stared on as the blood pooled toward him. Avo dragged him away to avoid repeating the same act on him later. No sense in letting the man get infected too. As Avo returned, he looked down into the blood at his own neon-basked reflection.
He expected to see the Sangeist again. What he got was just a ghoul in a tattered undersuit, the holographic glow of a voidship rising over his skull like a crown.
He shook his head and chuckled mirthlessly.
The city was welcoming him back. The only way it knew how.
“Missed you too,” Avo said.
The Warrens didn’t used to be a part of New Vultun. Much the same way the crust around the rim of your toilet didn’t actually start a part of your toilet.
People outside the Arks are renewable resources. Fuel, if you will. Genetic specimens to be cataloged for the breeding vats. Their minds can be mined for ghosts upon their deaths. Lesser Miracles and cheap cyber too obsolete for even the Undercroft are smuggled to the countless desperate souls in the sprawling squalor that is the Warrens.
Just an unfortunate fact of the system. The Arks were made to hold maybe 10 billion people. There are 100 billion living inside them now. Even with the inner Tier’s explosive growth, the Warrens below expand twice as fast as new refugees and immigrants flock to our sovereignties by the day.
Last estimates put them somewhere north of 300 billion. And this is with the waves of wombrash brought on by sporadic attempts at natural breeding.
The harsh fact is that not enough people died during the Godsfall.
It’s just too much weight.
-Leaked Audio Recordings of Ark Admin [Redacted]
The Sancton’s Purges Miniseries
3-1
Reception
Draus’ blood called to Avo.
Her wounds were still hot, the sweetness in her flesh taunting him with its novel flavor. He had never eaten a Regular before. The beast rattled inside his bones. Screeching, hissing at him. Begging him to indulge. Telling him that he might never get this chance again.
Avo looked at the messy soup he had made of Little Vicious after his meal. His insides felt full. He ignored the urge. The beast howled, and Avo felt satisfaction triumphing against his greedy pleasure and decided that he liked the sensation.
Three alive.
Three out of over two hundred survivors. This was three more than how most Crucibles ended.
Long abandoned, the space around him was more waste dump than living quarters. Mountains of abandoned luggage rose and fell in rolling hills. Whoever lived here fled in a hurry. Past the entrance, decayed columns stained with hap-tags stood beneath the collapsed outer shell of the building. A gouge ran through the midsection of the block, the winds and sounds of the city whistling in as if through a ravine.
Neon spilled through what naked stretch of the sky they could see. No starlight shone through the haze of light pollution brought on by an overdose of holo-ads. Cleaves of light carved along the open cracks of the block, infusing the moisture in the air with an etheric glow.
Droplets of rain slipped in from cracks and rents. They were like colored beads, each connected in the eyes of Avo as if an abacus shifting the burdens of the city’s expenses down into the Warrens.
A ripple washed out, crackling with dissolving ghosts. Avo grew aware the audience was filtering out. A few had tried to approach him, tried to come and take a closer look at the carnage. They traveled for less than a scant second before the locus they were tied to blinked out in the Nether.
The connection was cut. It was like a star going out in the dark. A silence of external thought followed. Where once he could taste a mass of minds screaming, chattering, bleeding their emotions into the Nether, now was just him, Draus, and the father.
The three unidentified approaching signatures of ward-shielded thoughtstuff notwithstanding.
Beside him, Draus was wheezing with every breath. She lacked his cellular regeneration, but whatever military-grade implants she had ensured she was a hard target to snuff. Still didn’t mean she was invincible. Far from it.
The father wept behind him, whimpering at the puddle of viscera that once was the skull of his son. Avo wanted to say something to him. No words came. The man was beyond comfort anyway. He had gone to that special place he couldn’t follow. Psychosis, Walton had explained to him. When the human mind was so inundated with trauma that something broke.
Avo wondered what it was like to suffer cruelty rather than feed from it.
They faced down a light-assault platform and survived. Barely, and not all of them. More than that, the Heaven that gave the golem its powers was now dormant inside him, its form smelted into existence by the resonance of his eldritch flame.
Among this little ragged band, only he emerged intact. Disregarding his two deaths and many prior wounds that were somehow removed after his resurrections of course. Come to think of it, when he found himself on the barge, why was he so injured? The last two times had seen him return unblemished. Not even a scratch.
Now, his Heaven wasn’t working. In the back of his mind, he could still see the flashing warning signs, the ringing klaxons telling him to “vent now.” More revelations. More questions. Walton had engrammed a message into his subconsciousness from beyond the grave, and Avo felt a headache coming on. Too much too fast.
He needed to deal with what he could first.
Draus was alive. Healing. But she was a mangled ruin compared to what she used to be. Her rasping breaths told him something was filling one of her lungs. He wasn’t sure if her nanosuites were equipped to deal with that.
In retrospect, if he hadn’t…overused his new abilities, he could have stitched her insides somehow. Maybe. Even though he had an instinctive understanding of his new domain, playing with Reg biology without the proper biotech equipment or knowledge didn’t strike him as wise. Now, one of his interfaces was screaming at him, saying that his Rend was at ninety-percent capacity and screaming at him to vent.
He wondered if there was a neuro-guide he could download regarding how thaumaturgy worked in general. Or even just the functions and features of Heavens or Hells. Sequencing ghosts was one thing, but Ontologics required a lifetime to master. If only that. Still, it wasn’t exactly something he could understand on his–
Avo froze.
He stared at Draus. She was a Regular. Regulars fought for Highflame. Highflame was almost entirely Godclad for their upper social crust. Instead of being an idiot, he could just…ask her.
Reaching down, he made to pick her up and place her in the seat of the destroyed golem’s command module. He shouldn’t have been surprised at her weight–her musculature was designed to be efficient; powerful. Being overly heavy was not among those qualities. She grunted back a gasp of pain as he lifted her but did nothing more to betray her hurt. “Got questions.”
“Yeah,” Draus said, wheezing. “Makes the both of us.”
Lifting her past the jagged teeth of metal from where he tore into the command module, he placed her in the softness of the seat. A cleft of flesh from the previous occupant clung to one of the frayed edges.
Avo sniffed.
Ah. Little Vicious. Still leaving him with snacks after she was gone. What a nice host she was. He scooped it into his mouth and savored the last piece of her. Shame she didn’t have more eyes, but her over-modified biology had kept her ripe. He clicked his teeth together. “Thanks for staying supple, Vicious.”
Draus rasped a laugh. “Still a fuckin’ ghoul.”
“Never stopped being.”
The Regular looked at him. “The frame. You don’t remember getting it?”
“No.”
A beat followed. She stared at him. “They don’t just hand those out, you know. ‘Specially not to your like.”
Avo chuckled grimly. “Hm. Made history.”
“Made a target for yourself, more like. Folks find out you got what you got and you’ll find snuffers gunning for you up and down the Tiers. Every up-jumped cultist, chrome-fiend, snuffer, and Necrojack will be gunning for you to claim your frame. Got no idea how many imps you’re worth. Or how far the Guilds’ll go to have you.”
His laughter grew into a disdainful sneer. “Let them. Undying. Will just come back.”
Draus’ remaining eye narrowed. “Shit, Avo. You don’t know anything about Liminal Frames, do you?”
He shrugged. No point in lying.
“They can kill you. Will kill you if you let them. Seen it done. Hells. I helped do it a couple of times. The Heaven you got. You snatched it from the golem; got it grafted to you right after you died, am I right?”
Avo grunted.
“How much Rend’s fillin’ your tank?”
He opened his mouth and went silent. He wanted to tell her. He was afraid to tell her. As much as they relied on each other for survival, she was still a Reg, and he, a ghoul. Seeing as she knew more of his new capabilities than he did, he wondered how much it would take for her to take it from him.
Yet, his hesitation was naked. Obvious. And it took little for her to pierce through the veil of his apprehension. Draus scoffed. “Suspicious half-strand. Gonna need an Agnos to pull that kind of graft. Usually.”
Now it was Avo’s turn to narrow his eyes at her.
“Usually?” Avo asked.
“Don’t matter,” she said. “You’re a ghoul. Your ilk don’t cotton much to sanity anyhow. ‘Sideshunger. Ain’t much I can do to your ego to loosen it in my current state. Again. Rend. How much you packin’.”
Avo weighed his options and studied the face of the Regular. She hadn’t lied to him. Hadn’t really had much of a chance to lie. She had, however, come back for him earlier. Saved him when she could have run off on her own. Part of being a good Necro was being able to deconstruct memories and understand intellect as best to build the best sequence of ghosts to be used as working phantasmic.
Draus in a sense wasn’t so different from him. There was a brutal honesty to her existence. Not that she was incapable of deception, but more that she never saw the need to channel it via her tongue. She let him know what she wanted and how she felt through actions and choices, strong enough to lay her character bare and spit in another’s face.
Even Little Vicious’ torture seemed to slide away from her, like a film of oil swept away by a roaring rapid. He didn’t know if Draus was mentally unbreakable. Still, she was Reg, and they were probably psychologically as hard as adamantine.
“Ninety,” Avo finally said. “Ninety percent.”
She let out a breath. “Shit.”
“Not good?”
She didn’t answer immediately, choosing to ask him another question instead. “Is it going down?”
He checked the Bloodforge interface. “No. Still stuck at ninety. Telling me to vent.”
“How many thaums is your Soul outputting per cycle?”
“Eigh–” he caught himself. At some point, it had become nine with his killing of Little Vicious. “Twenty-two.”
She groaned. “Fuckin’ figures. Looks like you got a new build, consang. Got it planted in you before it was even fueled proper. Twenty might be enough to manifest a minor Heaven maybe, but sure as shit not a Hell at the same time. Not even a First Circle.”
Too many technical details. He didn’t have the knowledge to parse through what she was telling him. “Explain in functionality. What are effects? What is danger?”
“Danger is that your Heaven is effectively unmanifested right now. Liminal Frame’s safeties are still in place, I’m guessing. Probably triggered Zero Burn, yeah?”
Avo nodded.
“Zero burn means your Liminal Frame is effectively burning as quietly as it can. Outputting just enough thaums to keep the cyclers running, but not nearly enough to maintain anything else.” She paused. “Enough to bring you back too, usually, but you’re not going to want to die right now.”
“Why not?”
Draus chuckled. “‘Cause then you’ll be stayin’ dead. A Rend is like a…a tear in the fabric of reality. You know how Fallen Heavens can make Ruptures that mess up continents and turn parts of the voids into Sunderwilds, yeah? Well, imagine pushing your ontology through a shredder of raw chaos. Ain’t much that emerges on the other side. Frame could revert you to an earlier instance, but it’ll have to push you through the same shredder to reinject you into existence. Do the math for what comes after.”
Suddenly, the cold breath of mortality hissed across the nape of Avo’s neck. Like a shot across the bow, fear licked at his mind again, taunting him as his brief bout of assumed immortality fled from him.
Draus grinned. “Funny. You look plenty human when you’re worried. Almost like half the Guilder juvs I had to babysit on their first walks into a Rupture.”
Avo was about to continue asking her more questions but the sound of rolling pieces of rubble and encroaching footsteps slashed a halt to their conversation.
“And there’s the muscle,” Draus said, leaning back into the cockpit. “Stay zero, Avo. My guess is that they want us alive. Would’ve just jocked a missile into this block if they wanted to see us dead.” She sighed, spent. “Probably to take us so that we can have a chat with our local Syndi-reps. Partake in some...diplomacy."
Servo-propelled footsteps added percussion to the overall ambiance within the lobby of the megablock. They were getting closer, their bulbous shadows pouring forth from between the columns of the entrance.
Rocks cracked. Glass shattered. Avo prepared.
He knew better than to run. They would just strike him from the sky. Use a drone. His wards would prevent a mem-lock until they finally managed to crack it, but he still had a heat signature, and unless they were running real gutter-level kit, he expected motion tracks.
He harbored no illusions about his chances out on the run and with his new Heaven offline he doubted his odds against them in a straight fight. What he did have were his phantasmics, few as those might have been.
He tethered a few more shivs of trauma to his Ghost-Link. Worse comes to worst, someone will learn to empathize with Little Vicious’ last minutes, whether they like it or not.
Partway through making his third shiv, they emerged, standing as titanium-clad shadows, marching between the enshadowed gulfs between the columns. Their bodies, thick with armor, aged and battle-scarred, the wear obvious even from a distance. Yet, that wasn’t what drew the bulk of Avo’s attention.
What pulled his focus were their faces–helmets, to be more accurate. Silvery glass caged their heads as if they were wearing wrapped mirrors, reflecting all that was around them. The ovular shape of their masks stood out from the rest of their war-touched kit. That was something new; crafted with extreme precision to fit each and every one of them.
Like a symbol. Or a motif.
Quiet harbingers of tension, the Syndicate muscle approached, their guns live and ready, a dozen or so micro-drones pushing forward of ahead to secure the room.
Avo’s Phy-Sim marked twelve lanes of fire lined directly at his head. And here he was, with only two shivs. It looked like he was going to have to get diplomatic. At least for now.
Avo hated being diplomatic.
“Simple. One Guild has to finally win. Or at least decide to stop funneling arms down to fight their proxy wars.”

-Chief Paladin Naeko, answering what it would take for crime in the Warrens to go down.
3-2
Stay of Execution
The drones dove in first, guided forward along threads ghosts connecting them to the three Syndicate enforcers. They were small models, barely larger than the boy. Well, around the boy’s size when he was still whole and not mangled pulp.
From needle-tipped scanners, the drones cast out a holographic threshold, securing the area like Paladins would a crime scene. Most of the dozen or so drones hovered out in a defensive array, circling and securing the outer edges of the premises. Two of them narrowed in on Avo, their jagged forms forwards shivering with bottled energy.
A faint pulse shone over their matter for a moment. His cog-feed had identified similarities between it and the matter his Heaven was channeling right now. Tungsten. If he said something wrong, or maybe if the enforcers decided that they just didn’t like him being alive, these drones would probably punch through his head in a blink.
“Jaus,” one of the enforcers muttered, staring at the sheer amount of gore and viscera left over after the night’s festivities. “I think that’s Vicious…what the fuck.”
Avo could smell the disgust rising in their throat. Interesting. Their rigs weren’t vacuum sealed. Told him about the quality of their kit.
Their drones scythed scanning grids over the host’s remains. She was dead. Dead as he could make her.
Her eyes tasted so sweet.
The muscle dispatched to retrieve them was your standard Syndicate muscle: probably over-auged with cheap coldtech implants before locking themselves beneath the mechanized plates of titanium they called an exo-rig. Chrome in, chrome out. Each of them had some personalization to their armor, but the models were the same: domed heads, and bulbous bodies. Looked more like diving suits back from the bygone ages.
The exterior of their armor was harshed with holo-haptic decals of black and red, lining their bulbous shells with slurs and skulls. A few even had recordings of some of their previous kills and atrocities playing across their bodies. Probably a habit they picked up from criminals that the Paladins Sin-Marked. Once you got your crime burned into a constellation for everyone to see around you, it made it impossible to hide who you were, even if you emerged sane after getting your mind used as processing power for a locus.
Three weapon systems were festooned to their rigs.
A las-cutter jutted over their shoulders on a focused beam emitter. It seemed more anti-air than anything. Something to fry a drone or cook a missile’s targeting systems.
In their wrists, they had the requisite fusion burner, spinning with a spreading barrel of gleaming gold. It had become standard for most close-quarter operators after the Fourth Guild War. Good for slagging halls and burning the oxygen out of rooms. Made clearing habcells a matter of capturing O2 junctions rather than a room-to-room firefight.
Avo fought the urge to flinch at the sight of the weapon. Fusion burners, more than anything else, painted his nightmares with an eternal incandescent crackle.
The last system they had was just a Shuriken. A particle-lancer. Their models looked slightly less modified than what Slaughterman used, but close enough that Avo knew what to expect.
They came to an unsteady halt about twenty feet away. A beat of silence followed as midnight’s long-scheduled rainfall began gaining momentum. Basked in lights of enshrouding red spilling from the drone scanners, Avo studied his reflection in their pallid helms.
His undersuit dangled from him in tattered pieces and his skin was flecked in rivers of red. Blood. Some of it was his, from a past life. Some of it was from Little Vicious.
A drone hovered by, scanning the command module. Draus’ finger rose from the inside, her rude gesture matching the ascent of the holographic voidship in the ad. “Tryin’ to enjoy my internal bleeding in peace here. Find yourself elsewhere.”
With a thought from the frontmost enforcer, the drone obliged, slinking back as its jock strode forward.
“Speak Standard, ghoul?”
Probably better than you can. “Just fine.”
His lack of snarling or incoherence seemed a surprise to them. A synchronized whine of servos sounded as they all turned to stare at each other. They probably wanted him to be a feral. Just another monster festering in the streets. All they needed to do then was shoot him and move on to the others.
Less paperwork that way.
“Data says you’re Fourteen.”
“I was,” Avo said.
Another pause. Another glance between the enforcers. Avo felt a dull resignation set on him. Whatever was going on with them, he wished they would just get on with it. If they were going to shoot him, he doubted that he could stop them. After all the beatings he took, he was all out of fear.
The leader turned back to look at him. “The system also says you're dead.”
Avo looked down at himself. His body had shed its scabs, his cheap temp-skin undersuit a shredded mess. Besides that, he was as healthy as he had ever been. He lifted his arms in a show of health.
“Wasn’t informed.”
The leader just studied him for a moment. “A smartass ghoul. Never thought I’d see one of those?”
Avo glared. “Can do math too.”
“Cute,” the lead enforcer chuckled darkly. Their Shuriken snapped open, the helix cupping a building mote of light. One of Avo's Phys-Sim impact lanes went red. He prepared his Ghost-Link. "I think I'm gonna enjoy--"
A flash of something flashed out from within the reflective surface of the lead enforcer's helmet. Like something between a hydra and a leash, a ghostly construct slithered into the mind of the enforcer, yelping as his comrades stumbled back, their body language tense with worry, but not incomprehension.
A deep, thunderous voice flooded the Nether, the weight of the mind bleeding out from the shifting glass like a storm. +Were these my orders? To threaten our victors with death?+ The voice was tinged with raw annoyance.
The lead enforcer quivered with confusion. “I–yeah, boss! I mean, no! I mean...you said to deal with them."
+I said deal with it. Not them. See the matter done. Not the people. I wanted them to be gathered. Brought. Back.+
"Oh, ah," the enforcer, laughed nervously. "Shit, Mirrorhead--I mean, boss, I didn't meant--"
The glass surface of the enforcer’s dome-like helmet suddenly cracked, folding inward like bladed fractals. The enforcer howled, armored fingers gripping at their faceplate. The modulator for their voice cracked and broke, letting their true tone spill free. What used to be the booming resonance of an ironclad warrior became the anguished cries of a tortured man.
Their glass helmet fractured. Blood misted out through the cracks. A faint gurgle came from the enforcer as they slumped down, the stuff of their skull leaking in dollops from parted chasms of silver.
THAUMIC CYCLER: 23 thaum/c
GHOSTS - [36]
The rain fell. The other two enforcers stared at their dead leader, bodies gripped in a stasis of fear.
The killing was secondary to Avo. No. What drew his interest and worry was another matter altogether. With the cracking of the glass helmet, the presence of the intrusive mind suddenly vanished. Like it never was. Ghosts fray and thoughts dissolved, but they never just vanished. There was something more at work here. Something greater.
A low ebb of nervousness solidified inside him. He flicked a look at Draus and found an unsteady frown burned into her face.
The presence returned. A flood of its essence emerged with a glare of light through another of the enforcers, ghosts sprouting free from their helmet. +Chambers. You are in charge now. Bring them to me. Deal with them. No more wasting time.+
The rightmost enforcer–the one the voice called Chambers–snapped to shivering attention. “Sure thing, boss-man, anything you want–”
The ghosts sank back into the glass, disappearing.
And as soon as they were gone, the enforcer made the same rude gesture that Draus had made. Except he was pointing his middle finger directly at the ground. Avo cocked his head. It was as if the man was signaling his ire beyond the visual reflection of the glass.
“Alright, ghoulie,” Chamber said, sniffling. “I suppose we best get you and the rest of the lucky winners to your reward.”
“Reward?” Avo asked.
“Yeah,” Chambers said. “You just won an all expenses paid luxury car ride with the boss. Lucky you.”
Enforcer didn’t make it sound so lucky.
***
Things accelerated substantially afterward.
The thing about enforcers was that their expertise was narrow. They did well with breaking things or killing people. Vulgar displays of force and coercion mostly.
What he presented to them was a situation that was beyond their station. Something that made someone up top get involved. Something that said someone up top didn’t want them to solve by shooting, torturing, or threatening.
Someone up top wasn’t what Avo wanted or needed right now. What he needed was middle management.
He hoped he’d run into a Syndicate accountant or underboss of some kind. Walton liked those types for a reason. Wasn’t that hard to blackmail them or appease them with new profits. Avo had come to concur with his father’s assessment in time. By now, he had done enough dives in the Nether that he practically knew where the mem-forts of all the big players were.
Seeing as he didn’t recognize who these enforcers were and that they didn’t possess any visible logos beyond wearing silver bowls of reflective glass over their heads, he guessed they were a sub-family to a larger Syndicate at best or small fry at worst.
Their extraction from the area was conducted post haste. One of the enforcers handled Draus with as much care as they could. Avo guessed it was the holo-tags still burning around her neck that did the trick. Scum that most Syndicate-muscle were, the folk of the Warrens still remembered what the Veterans did for them during the last days of the war.
“You’ll be alright, Reg,” Chambers said. He snickered. “Caught some of the stream; that shit you pulled in the silo–”
“Shut the fuck up, son,” Draus said, eyes closed with exhaustion as the enforcer hefted them from the cradle that was the broken golem. “I’m talkin’ to my hurt right now. Don’t got time for you.”
The father, they were less gentle with. When they grabbed him by the shoulder, whatever was broken in the man before snapped again. Where his thoughtstuff spooled like loose strands, now they boiled and lashed like a simmering whip.
He fought. As much as a barely six feet tall screaming flat with no augs or grafts could. Unfortunately, his opposition was an eight-foot-tall cybernetically enhanced butcher encased in multi-alloyed armor.
The father had the will, the burning desire to lay next to the pulped soup that was his boy and wait for death to take him. But they had the orders to take everyone and leave.
The resulting “light” jab they gave him to put him in his place probably fractured the poor fool’s skull.
The father got no better care from the enforcers after. They dragged him up the rubble, his head bouncing and shaking, face pulled and sliced on outcrops of glass and rebar. Strangely though, it was his tear-stained eyes and gushing nose that made him look beyond wretched.
Avo sneered. “Hey, meat.”
The enforcer turned to glare at him. “Fuck you want, rotlick?”
“Not me,” Avo said, biting back the urge to shove one of his mind-shivs into the enforcer’s cheap wards. “Your boss: he going to be happy when you bring this one in cold? Those his orders? Or maybe he’ll do you like your friend.”
Avo shrugged. The enforcer looked away from him.
“Carry him proper,” Avo continued. “Survived the games. Should survive you too. City decided it wants him.”
Maybe it was the threat of the enforcer’s boss stepping in. Maybe Avo was more persuasive than he remembered. Whatever it was, the enforcer slung the father over his shoulder instead of flaying him against the ground.
Thank Jaus for small mercies.
Surmounting the toppled ruins, Avo looked up and found himself beholding the underside of the Warrens. Stacks and stacks of blocks rose into the smog-gripped sky. Gunfire and thundering bass echoed from the forest of bridges connecting each megabuilding to another. So far down, he could only see the underside of platforms and the jutting extensions of the buildings. Light from the upper tier made its way down in dappled flashes.
Here then was why they called this place the Warrens: the sheer urban density had reduced the environment into a near-continent-sized sprawl connected by burrows of glass and metal, studded with towering blocks that were barely maintained. Flashing holo-ads bloomed from all angles, splashed against the underside of avenues and bridges, booming at maximum volume.
Above, a swirl of error codes was projected over the bottom of Layer One where a moon should be. Running some hundred feet above, a hexagonal series of district-wide techno-organic bone plates expanded like a city-sized umbrella, grown to separate the refuse at the depths of the Warrens from that which was still salvageable on the surface.
As they were led through a series of winding paths, they were led out to a parking lot that looked more akin to a landfill. Droplets of rain splashed down on them and stopped, the rainfall choked with every other step. The infrastructure above them was so dense that most of the spillage could barely get down. Cheap ads burned in both reality and the Nether, with the most common sight being offers of debt bonds and organ-breed sponsorships.
Distant gunfire pulled his attention. Through the air, a curving salvo of missiles tore through the thickness of traffic filling the skies to punch down into the abandoned megablock they were emerging from. A plume of dust and debris rose into the air. The block trembled. Its walls crumbled a bit more.
The enforcer carrying the father sighed. “It’s those Scalper fucks again, I bet. Half-strands won’t stop going for us.”
The new leader–the one called Chambers–groaned in agreement. “Raid! Raid! Double time!”
The two hitters exploded into motion, but they still weren’t particularly fast seeing as they were running in a near-ton of armor. New missiles bent through the chaotic floods of aerial traffic. Drones shot up to intercept. Las-cutters flashed, the beams blinking in wide flashes. Rumbling explosions bloomed behind them. Avo found himself pushed ahead of the group as he went from follower to shepherd on these empty streets strewn with waste.
Crossing out into an exposed part of the Warrens, the rain hammered hard down on him. As they pulled the father into the deluge, Avo noticed the wounds on the man’s face already closing. A group of street-juvs glared at them, bloodied knives in their hands. Their cut wrists rapidly mended.
Who needed healthcare when the Guilds seeded the midnight rains with miracles? That wasn’t the right question down here. The right question was who controlled the street corners where the raindrops actually landed.
For a stretch, the rain poured so hard that Avo could hear it knocking against the bone of his skull, stinging him. Chambers did his best to expose Draus to the wet. She, in turn, opened her mouth and took in mouthfuls of water. That would resolve the internal bleeding somewhat, but she would still need a grafter for surgery. Someone to replace her augs and limbs.
Another missile landed much closer this time. Daring a look behind, Avo saw a trailing Specter following close, triangulating the shots. With a snarl, he flung his Ghost-Link out at it. It rejected his request to connect, but he left it planted with a special surprise. His shiv sank deep through the poorly maintained Specter’s wards, injecting its insides with an expanding memory from one of the hunters he killed back in the Crucible. It was like staking a snake made of glass, and few things were more satisfying than watching a mind come apart at the seams.
Chambers shot him a double take as they kept moving. “The hells was that, ghoulie?”
Avo shrugged. Enforcer didn’t need to know his capabilities. “Guess their ‘Jack got nulled?”
A chorus of whistling engines drew his attention back ahead. A tunnel opened impossibly through a curtain of rain in the distance. The deluge parted along four invisible slopes as an unclear shape approached. They were at the edge of the parking lot now. There were fewer hills of debris here; more space to land.
What approached them was much, much smaller than an aerobarge, but still large enough to fit one of the enforcers. Even in the rig.
The aerovec was shaped like a sleek arrowhead with four tetrahedral engines hissing microfusion propulsors. Avo’s Phys-Sim simulated its most likely trajectory and drew a lane curving down from the outer edge of the Layer One hexagon. Avo wondered which district he was in; which sovereignty.
Chambers handed Draus back over to Avo. “Better not drop her, ghoul.”
He took her into his arms. She coughed out some rainwater and glared at the enforcer. “Gotta work on your cardio, consang. Could feel your heart hammerin' even through the armor.”
The aerovec spun and landed in front of them. Chambers jabbed Avo in the head with his fusion burner. “Listen, I don’t give a shit what happens to you or the fucking flat but this one was a Reg. She deserves better than this. This is as close to begging as I get, ghoul: do not fuck with Mirrorhead. He will make you wish I killed you. You synced with me, consang? You saw what he did to Yulens back there?"
“Yeah,” Avo said. “Synced.”
Chambers gave him a nod. “Get on then. And don’t fucking lie to him. He’ll know.”
A blast of cooled air washed over Avo as he felt Draus shiver in his arms. The aerovec had opened its rearmost doors to him. An inviting ambiance greeted him with soft cellos playing and musky aromas nibbling at his nose. He sneezed. The light was a dim purple trailing off into what should have been darkness.
But Avo saw just fine without light and beheld an immaculately dressed individual in a monochrome suit. His face was featureless, reflective. The same could be said about his hands.
There, against a large curving sofa with wyvern scales running down the armrests, sat Mirrorhead.
And immediately, Avo realized he wasn’t even dealing with some random Syndicate boss. No. This was someone with a name worth knowing. Someone that screamed danger.
Right then, Avo wanted to do anything other than get into the aerovec.
Few people got what they wanted in this city.
My Scalpers. Our Syndicate. We’re bad. I know we’re bad people. Juvs down the corner. Their gene-parents. They all know. Problem is we’re also the only game in Nu-Scarrowbur. Only real game anyhow. You show me a wager running official contract-gigs, working for imps on the second, and I’ll show you someone who’s bound to get their organs harvested or dosed out on joy in a month.
Without us, the flats and ‘fugees are easy meat for the others. Better they stay our meat.
Besides, there’s plenty of reasons why people join us. Some want the chrome. Some want to hurt folks. Some want to move their families up a Layer. Something about there being better air scrubbers and fewer ghouls.
Ultimately, the choice is simple: we’re all gonna die down here. All of us. I just want to do a bit more of the hurting than being hurt before I go.
Live a little.
-Mem-Log of Vincentine “Ripperjack” Javvers
Head of the Scalpers Syndicate
3-3
Mirrorhead
They threw the father in with him after he carried Draus aboard. The man tumbled across the black velvet carpeting the floor, his rain-soaked body dripping into the softness beneath him. Behind, the rear doors snapped shut with a hiss and the engines throttled up. With a lurch, Avo felt the aerovec rise just as a distant explosion shook the air with turbulence.
“Pick any seat you want.” Unlike when he spoke to his enforcers, Mirrorhead seemingly did nothing to disguise his voice here. His voice flowed like the texture of the velvet Avo was standing on. Deep. Smooth. Languid.
None of the thunder from earlier though. Nor did the glass in the aerovec crack.

Mirrorhead sat with a single leg crossed over the other. One of his shoes shone like a gleaming opal. The other was more akin to polished ebony.
Delivered as he was, Avo felt like a rat presented to a king. Which, in a sense, was kind of what was happening here.
Never taking his eyes off the expressionless mask of Mirrorhead, Avo watched as his every moment was reflected. No ripples or wards sprung over Mirrorhead’s mind, the sight suffusing Avo with dread. No Metamind. No phantasmics. No thoughtstuff. Mirrorhead was somehow projecting no signature into the air, nor trailing any memory signatures. Which was functionally impossible. Everything that thought, that held any capacity for cognition emanated thoughtstuff and released ghosts upon death.
But here Mirrorhead was, defying one of the fundaments Avo had spent his entire life studying; exploiting. It was like staring into an absence–a void that could strike out at you without ever being struck in return.
He laid Draus on her back along one of the couches protruding from the walls. He deliberately kept her as far as he could from Mirrorhead. “Turn me ‘round,” she said, jabbing him with her remaining arm. Avo winced as he felt her knuckles rattle his ribplates like a gunshot. Even dismembered, she packed a punch. “Wanna see the half-strand.”

If Mirrorhead took any offense to the insult, he did not show it.
The interior of the aerovec was spacious. Absurdly so. Beyond the ramp, soft leather couches formed an inverted U shape. Small magnetic trays extended from armrests, their stretch bearing the weight of crystalline glasses with strips of metal on the bottom. Looking up, Avo noticed the ceiling was also paneled with polished glass, separated only by a rod that shone a dim monochrome glow.
Disturbingly though, Mirrorhead was entirely missing in that reflection. In his place, an eldritch presence trembled faintly, the vagueness of its structure only existing in intermittent instants, manifesting to ripples of thaumic mass.

Avo tore his gaze from the ceiling before he gave the game away. He didn’t know what Mirrorhead knew about him–if he could perceive the Liminal Frame that burned within Avo. Once again, if the man–or whatever Mirrorhead was–knew, he betrayed nothing. Instead, he just sat there, waiting. Watching.
Avo was unable to shake the feeling that he was a sparrow in the jaws of a lion, waiting for the teeth to fall. The beast inside him was screaming for him to fight. Die fighting. Or break free and run. Be a ghoul. But doing that right now would undoubtedly see him snuffed. He was dealing with a Godclad. One more cognizant of their abilities than he was.
One that actually had a working Heaven and Hell right now.
For now, Avo did his best to play the role of the ignoramus, turning to pick the father from the ground.
“Stop,” Mirrorhead said.
Avo froze mid-step.
“Leave him. The floor is soft enough for his like.”
Avo shot a glance at the father. The man was stirring. A sudden turn sent him into a roll. Avo tumbled onto a couch, snapping an arm tray and shattering a cup against his lower back.
“Ah, good,” Mirrorhead breathed, uncaring of his property being damaged. “Finally seated.” From the crystalline table in front of him, he picked up a sparkling decanter filled with a glowing red liquid.
He poured himself a glass. And then promptly pushed the glass through his face.
A knock sounded above Avo. Jolting from the suddenness of the noise, he looked up to see Mirrorhead’s arm offering him the drink through the ceiling, reaching out through the reflection as if it was a pond. Yet, in the veil beyond the glass, Avo caught sight of something greater, the enshadowed counters of a being far vaster than that suited figure that sat before him. Its limbs were as if shattered shards of glass fused into six spreading wings. Three baleful eyes burned at its core as small rings of scripture revolved around it, spinning in cycles of radiance.
It was strange beholding the Heaven of another. Dissonant. Like staring through a pinhole from one existence to another. Even from here, Avo could feel the intensity burning within Mirrorhead, its presence slumbering, but powerful. A new ravenous hunger bubbled within Avo then, his flame wanting desperately to feed on the other, to be the only thing that burned. Souls were no living things, but still, the want it wailed from a place deeper than bone was impossible to ignore.
“Drink,” Mirrorhead said. It was not a question. Trapped between a deep reluctance to trust a drink from the ruler of a Syndicate and the risk of angering a Godclad, Avo erred on the side of less probable death and took the drink.
Mirrorhead motioned for him to take a sip.
Avo acquiesced, the glowing liquid feeling like lighting traveling down his throat. He shuddered uncontrollably. His blood thinned at the intrusion of alcohol. Ghouls weren’t much good for drinking. He couldn’t get drunk with his metabolism, but liquor never failed to give him a headache.
Mirrorhead tilted his head curiously. “First shot of Ambrosia?” He hummed. “I’ll admit, you took it better than most others of your kind did. Better than even I, in my youth…” Mirrorhead trailed off. “But again, we are not equals, you and I. Do us both well to remember the difference. Finish the drink.”

There was always a casual menace to the man’s voice. An edge ingrained behind the words that made every statement a command and every action a possible threat. There were people like him in the Undercroft too. Back when Walton was alive, he was the one that dealt with them while Avo did the legwork.
Here and now, Walton was long gone. Avo had to face the other monsters alone.
Finishing the drink with more composure, Avo held the glass back up to the mirror where Mirrorhead’s arm once pressed through. No eldritch god floating behind the mists of the reflection. Just Avo’s reflection.
That seemed to gain Mirrorhead’s attention. Moving for the first time, he clenched and unclenched his fists. Avo felt as if he made a mistake. “Bold maneuver, handing the glass back off to me like you’re the master and I’m a…servant.”
Avo kept calm. If he was all soft, Mirrorhead was going to eat him alive. There had to be some edge here. Syndicate types get over-enthusiastic about boundaries if you don’t leave hints. “Didn’t assume you were gifting me the glass.”
A tense silence fell.
Mirrorhead slapped his thigh, guffawing. “‘Didn’t assume you were gifting me the glass!’ That’s funny.” Mirrorhead wagged a finger at him, each jab forceful, spearing through the air. “You’re funny. I’ve suffered a few other ghouls in my time, but no funny ones.”

He reached down into his face and took the cup from Avo’s hand. Producing a silk handkerchief from his inner suit pocket, he wiped down the glass. If he feared Avo as an infection vector, he didn’t show it. “Now. I’d like to begin the formalities between us with an admission. For honesty’s sake. My enforcer, earlier. The one I killed. I did tell him to shoot you. Ordered it, in fact.”
Avo didn’t know what he was supposed to say to that. Was the man fishing for a compliment? Good. Good for you Mirrorhead. Most of my brothers have a hard time knowing what “psychopath” even means, let alone that they qualify. Truly, you are more self-aware than the average ghoul.
“You want to know why I killed him?”


No. “Yes.”
“Because he had no fiber.” Mirrorhead poured himself another drink and explained no more. Fiber. As if that explained everything. Swirling the ambrosia, he spilled the amber liquid directly down into his skull, the flow disappearing into the reflection. “Tell me about how Little Vicious died.”
The segue came without pretense or warning
Mirrorhead was scrubbing the glass now, working the material meticulously. Another psychological tactic? Or maybe he just liked clean. Didn’t matter. Avo was going to have to tread carefully here. He had no idea what Mirrorhead meant by fiber but outright lying wasn’t a good choice. Talking about how Little Vicious died, however, was suicide. For all he knew, it would make Mirrorhead snuff him right then and there and toss his corpse out the aerovec for a Guild to claim.
Syndicates were bottom feeders; carrion businesses. They fed off what they could steal from the downtrodden and what scraps the Guilds left unguarded. But a fox didn’t cut its teeth on fighting dragons. If Mirrorhead knew what Avo had inside him, what they both shared, the Syndicate boss would either cut the Liminal Frame out for his own use or ransom it up to one of the Great Eight for a big payday.
So, the whole truth was off the table. The next best thing instead was a lie of omission. “Happened when the elevator was going up. Golem broke. Malfunctioned.”

Mirrorhead hummed casually. “Some of the Spectators claimed that they saw you get torn in half. Be there any truth to that?”
Avo winced. “She hurt me. Couldn’t kill me. Healed.”

Mirrorhead stopped scrubbing the glass. And then started cleaning the other way around. “The golem. Tell me how it malfunctioned?”
“Not sure.”

“Hm,” Mirrorhead said, looking distractedly at his glass. A sudden series of five rings pulsed out through his head from within. Avo felt his stomach drop. The Syndicate boss had activated his Metamind. The ghosts were emerging from beneath Mirrorhead’s face, spilling out through a distant boundary. Little wonder why Avo couldn’t detect anything–the adversary was probably broadcasting from another part of the city entirely, using reflections to transport the information.
Clever. It was good counter against most Necrojacks. Prevented the opposition from studying your sequences, getting a mem-lock on you.
“If you can’t offer an answer, you should at least offer me a theory. One worth swallowing.”
Avo thought carefully about what he was going to say next. Right now, he was on the edge. His Ghost-Link still had one thought-shiv attached to it. But if Mirrorhead could transport his own ghosts through reflections, Avo wasn’t sure how sophisticated of a Metamind pattern he was up against. Mirrorhead could be in a specially-tuned amplifier lobby for all he knew.
Avo shot a brief look at Draus. She ran her tongue over her bloodstained teeth and winked. He had no idea what the hells that meant.
Avo shuffled awkwardly. “Not really sure. She caught up to us. Used decoy golem and thoughtwave bomb to distract us. Used me to…to infect the child. But something happened with the golem while it was tearing into me. Problem with locus, I think? The commands–”
Mirrorhead’s interruption came without any hint or prelude. “You know, she spent a frankly unreasonable amount of resources trying to kill you, two flats, and a dishonorably discharged Reg ten years out of the service? A dozen snuffers under my employ: all dead. An assault golem that I personally fueled using my Soul: broken. More, it appears that the Heaven itself is gone; beyond the presence of the coldtech shell of the command module, anyhow. And to plant a sour cherry on an already bitter, bitter cake, my host is dead. Mutilated. Achieving less than nothing after wasting an inordinate amount of imps to kill just. Four. People.”
Less than nothing. Avo wasn’t designed for empathy, but even a ghoul knew that two hundred people was enough to feed on for at least a week. Ethics aside, if Avo himself had killed that many people himself, that was more than enough thaums for him to have both his Heaven and Hells. Probably worth a good amount of money for the echoes of those slain to be fed to a tech-thaum reactor somewhere.

Mirrorhead scoffed and shook his head. “I would have snuffed her personally for this…farce. But I suppose I have to thank you.”
Avo didn’t know what to say, so he defaulted to reflex and grunted.
“Why are you special, Fourteen?”
That question stymied Avo for a second. “Not special. Just ghoul.”

“Well, you have to be special. Have to be. With the money she spent trying to kill you, I could have bred a thousand ghouls from the slaves I could buy. And please, don’t push this over to Former Captain Jelene Draus here,” Mirrorhead regarded Draus with a small nod. She responded by spitting on his carpet. “She’s a known variable. A problem that was eventually going to be dealt with. But she wasn’t who Vicious spent the most time hurting. Don’t say you are not special. Little Vicious clearly believed that you are. She died believing you were special. Tell me why you?”
What to say here? What made him special? Jaus, was this an interview or an interrogation? It was like Mirrorhead was judging him for a job. Or trying to make him admit to having a Soul inside. “I think she wanted me to fail. Maybe had money against me. Made her mad by not dying.”
Mirrorhead tapped the edge of the cup with his fingers. The clinking noise was jarring. “I see.” The crystal cup suddenly cracked and sank out of existence, into the reflection in Mirrorhead’s hand. The Syndicate boss sighed and stood up, adjusting his coat. “I…think you’re bullshitting me.”
With a snap of his finger, the back ramp of the aerovec hissed open.
Outside, rain fell hard to the percussion of thunder.
Lying used to be so much easier without ghosts leeching the truth from your memories.
Of course, finding the truth also used to be simpler as well; hard to tell what is and what’s just a planted memory when anyone with a Meta and the right sequence can mod a mid.
But that’s where the art comes in. Being a Necrojack is more than being a con artist, or a memetic engineer, or even both those things put together. Being Necrojack is about shaping belief; diving in to know what people want and twisting it to serve your needs.
-White Rab, Constructs of Deception, Page 96
3-4
Lying
Avo growled and prepared to fight for his life. There weren’t a whole lot of ways to interpret the back of an aero opening up as a friendly gesture. This was why Walton used to do the talking.
He pressed Mirrorhead, preparing his Ghost-Link, his jagged tip of trauma prepared to spring.
At least it was until something tore him through the ceiling. An impossible force seized him along the scruff of his neck, its grip piercing, slashing into him as it drew him through the reflection in the ceiling.
Panic seized him. Primal. Animal. He felt his body lurch as he crossed through an unseen threshold; pulled into a place that simply couldn’t have existed without the presence of thaumaturgy.
Or a Heaven
Thalassophobia: the fear of the deep waters. Necrojacks suffered from time to time due to the nature of the work; it wasn’t uncommon to run into a leviathan of trauma hiding between folds of seemingly unconnected memories. But even then, there was always a recourse. A way out. To cut the ghosts and part your consciousness. To hide amongst the chaos and wait.
Here, before that thing of piercing wings that gleamed, of circling bands warping its three chasm-sized eyes, Avo felt his ghost wail and his Metamind brace. No place to hide. No place to run. His wards spiked, straining before the sight. He tore his gaze away, the weight of madness lessening, but still present.
Its eldritch mass was far larger than the Sangeist–a leviathan capable of swallowing cities rather than a meager tower. Yet, as its fire burned, ebbing rising licks of unfathomable iridescence, Avo felt something deeper within it screaming a mournful note.
TWICE-WALKER, SERAPHID OF THE CHORUS
Such was its designation. Such was what it called itself. The presence of its existence tasted like a wound to Avo’s mind, a weight of naked memories of ghosts bleeding forth from it eternally, like a scar carved into the flesh of all that was.
And then, with contemptuous ease, it swallowed him.
Suddenly, he was seeing the world out of a narrow, oblong pinhole. He emerged from the reflection, his body squeezing free from the narrow confines of Mirrorhead’s skull, pulled loose by the impossible strength presiding within Syndicate Godclad’s cold fingers. Avo snapped free, thrashing instinctively, mind whirling at just what was happening. Avo fought. Thrashing. Clawing with blind animalistic rage.
All in vain.
The arm drawing across the veil was beyond any strength he could fathom. His claws tore through the outer layers of a suit but sank into the reflective material that formed the bedrock of Mirrorhead’s flesh. Where his claws dug in, they tore out, bleeding his own form as Mirrorhead twisted the attack back on themselves. Avo managed three swipes before even realizing he was mauling himself, flensing pieces of flesh off his chest.
Mirrorhead sighed. “Now that was very wise of you.”
He poured Avo back into his skull with a simple shove.
The world narrowed, growing unbearably tight. Avo felt himself pass through the threshold again, toppling out from the ceiling now. His senses spun, and he gasped as if he was surfacing from deep waters. Struggling, he found himself held over the edge of the ramp. The rain stung his body like needles. Beneath, the raging winds misted the streets below through murky sheens of neon, hiding just how long he would fall if dropped.
Nausea roiled through him. Faintly, he could hear the rain more clearly now, taste the soothing power imbued into the air.
“He didn’t lie,” Draus snarled, dragging herself across the carpet. “Pull ‘em back.”
Avo’s mind spun. What had just happened? How did–
Mirrorhead stood over him, adjusting the collar on his tattered suit in a show of raw control.. The Syndicate boss tapped his face as Avo saw his own wretched visage reflected, a soaked, pale creature in the casual grip of something far beyond.
“Reality submits to metaphysics,” Mirrorhead began. “And though I’m no Agnos–no proper theologian of the broken divines and the Heavens that once composed their bodies and manifest miracles for our cities,” Mirrorhead said, his hand turning like a lecturing theorist, “I do know a few things. Like how unlikely it is for a few mortals to overcome a golem. Even one running a Heaven as obsolete as a Sangeist.”
Lightning flashed, reflecting pale, branching scars through clouds clotted with darkness via reflection, via Mirrorhead. The gutters flowed like a rash of urban decay, of hollowed buildings dotted with little fires. “So, let’s try this again: what happened to Little Vicious? We know the Nether was disrupted at the moment of her death. We have remembrances from a few Spectators from afar confirming that the golem’s Heaven fell. We know that you ate her. And my Necrojackers didn’t detect any intrusions, so how–”
“Your N-Sec is terrible,” Avo growled out through Mirrorhead’s grip, the sheer audacity of the statement actually striking the Syndicate boss silent.
“Elaborate,” Mirrorhead said, fingers tightening. Avo felt a series of cracks sound through his neck. Spots began to form in his vision. “And you better not lie to me. You lie, and I drop the flat first.” He was talking about the father. “And then our former Guard-Captain Draus. And finally, you.”
Avo breathed in as best as he could, trying to remember what Walton taught him about social deception.
It’s not about the truth. It’s about what they can conceivably believe, and what they want to believe.
What did Mirrorhead want? Good question. Avo barely knew him, but so far, every act of menace, every silent threat, or shift in tone had been dedicated to maintaining absolute control. And Avo might’ve just insinuated that his security wasn’t nearly as good as he thought.
Which meant he either just killed himself or found a way out.
Back to the truth then. See where that got him.
“Your visitor’s ghosts aren’t up to quality. Bad accretion. Emotional and thought leakage. Could feel what they felt instead of it being one way. Easy for a decent Necrojack to smuggle themselves in. Your Necros weren’t doing their jobs right. Need a better team.” Mirrorhead loosened his grip.
That was either a good sign or a very, very bad one.
“Something breached the golem’s locus. Breached it through me!” Avo blurted out. “Think…think rival Syndicate. A team.”
Mirrorhead froze and turned. “Well, why didn’t you start with that? Damn me, and damn me across each and every hell. Been ignoring the obvious all along. Scalpers. Godsdamned Scalpers.”
He tossed Avo over his shoulder like a sack of trash, uncaring as Avo cracked against the ceiling and ended up digging his claws into the velvet carpet to halt his momentum. With a simple gesture, Mirrorhead motioned for the rear doors to close, silencing the falling rain and the city below.
Gasping, nerves firing with surging adrenaline, Avo clung to the floor, staring at Mirrorhead like a feral animal. He stayed low and away from anything reflective. But though the beast wailed for him to try again, Avo knew he had about a snowflake's chance in a furnace against a Godclad when he couldn’t even physically match up against a well-chromed snuffer like Slaughterman. Or the golem for that matter. For all the might possessed by the Sangeist, it was at best a lit wick compared to the roused flame that was Mirrorhead.
If only he could get the Sangeist working again. Still at ninety percent Rend.
VENT! VENT! VENT!
“I’d like to apologize for my behavior,” Mirrorhead said, tossing his handkerchief at Avo.
Avo blinked. “What?”
Mirrorhead looked at him like he was slow. “I apologize. I was wrong.”
Paranoia spiked within Avo. The conversation was jerking, twisting in too many discordant directions too fast. It seemed the person acted just like the god that dwelled with them; chaotic, twisting. “I don’t–”
Mirrorhead strolled past Avo nonchalantly. He resumed his seated position like nothing had happened and poured himself another drink. He pointed the drink at Draus. “You bear some fault too, though. You know why, Captain Draus?”
Draus sighed, her face exhausted. “How’s that?"
“You didn’t speak up!” Mirrorhead growled. A crack snapped through the inside of the car. Glass everywhere shattered. Avo’s ears rang. Somehow, Mirrorhead had cleared the space between him and Draus in a blink. He was holding her against the walls now, fingers around her throat, blood spilling from her nose.
Avo noticed then how much bigger Draus was than Mirrorhead, even bereft of her limbs. Still, the way he held her like she was weightless felt wrong. She grinned down at him, unimpressed, amused.
“Well,” she said, spitting a globule of blood across his featureless face, “now I know your Heaven sure as shit don’t have a Domain of Strength.”
Avo saw Mirrorhead’s free hand clench. And then unclench. Sighing, he let Draus drop and strolled away from her. “In…recognition of the service you provided, I’m going to let that slide. Suppose I can’t blame you. You are measured opposition and all. Part of the Column. As such, I will respect this as an act of open hostility and not subterfuge. But you will tell me what I want to know from now on. Lest you test me. Then, I’ll have my Jackers work through that mind of yours. Know your kind doesn’t give, but you do break. Everyone breaks.”
To her credit, Draus just rolled her eyes and winked at Avo again.
He was certain. She had a death wish.
Picking up a spare cup from one of the arm trays, Mirrorhead laughed and poured himself another drink. “Besides. I do find it touching how a former Guild-Sworn soldier can find so much common ground with a subhuman monster. I can’t tell if that’s a compliment to you or degradation on her part. She was designed to snuff any threat, you know. Your kind was little more than a speed bump during the war. But something about you must’ve incurred some kind of loyalty in that brutal vessel we call a Reg.”
Striding up next to Avo, Mirrorhead paused. “Who educated you? Taught you about the Nether. Couldn’t have learned that as a feral. Dressed too nice to be a feral.”
The question speared too deep for Avo’s comfort. Mirrorhead was back on the attack now; new probing questions, peeling at who Avo was, who he thought himself to be. “Walton.”
“Walton what?”
“Just Walton,” Avo said. Walton never used a last name.
Mirrorhead nodded. “Just Walton. This Walton taught you to speak pretty well. Can you read? Write.”
And they were back to interview questions. As if he hadn’t just dangled Avo outside a moving aerovec a few seconds ago. “Standard. Low Nolo–”
“Standard’s good enough,” Mirrorhead said. “And you know how to be a Necro?” Avo nodded. “Well, I’d say whoever this Walton is, they made a man out of a ghoul.”
As far as compliments went that was probably one of the least-backhanded ones Avo received. The dull ache of prejudice was a layer of scar tissue that bled too often to even hurt. A natural response–but not a human one. Ghouls didn’t feel much about ostracization or prejudice. They weren’t social creatures. Couldn’t be, considering they were designed to infect and devour humans.
Considering the proximity between the species, psychopathy was a natural trait for a ghoul to be ingrained with. It wouldn’t do for a clade of bioformed monsters to suffer emotional turmoil when their prey cried out for mercy.
“He liked fixing broken things,” Avo said.
“We all got our…fixations.” Gathering the shards of broken glass he had in his hand, Mirrorhead tossed them through his face. Why did he do that?
“These things happen, you know,” Mirrorhead continued, motioning for Avo to sit. “In fact, until Ms. Draus admitted to things, I knew you were juking me. Don’t know why a Reg would save a ghoul. Hells. Maybe she thinks you're like a… souvenir from her olden days. Makes her nostalgic for all the others in her unit. The Orphans. Tell me, captain, I heard another of your number died last month. My condolences.”
Nearby, Avo could hear Draus’ heartbeat quickening. Mirrorhead had struck something deep with his words. Behind, the father was groaning in pain. Within Mirrorhead was all silence. No sound. No heartbeat. No scent.
Like there was nothing there.
“You’re lucky, you know that,” Mirrorhead said.
Avo grunted. “Lucky.” Lucky he had a Liminal Frame preventing the Maw from draining him empty. Lucky it could bring him back from the dead. Lucky it could tear a Heaven from a golem and graft it onto him.
So, now the big question remained: where and when did he get a Liminal Frame burned into him?
Still nothing. Like those memories had been scalped clean from his mind. Couldn’t mean anything good.
“Let’s talk about arrangements,” Mirrorhead said, startling Avo back into focus.
“Arrangements?” Avo asked, confused.
Mirrorhead waved a dismissive hand. “I own you now. Now, how I own you and how I use you can be discussed.”
Avo understood the words but found a barrier blocking his full comprehension. “You own me?”
“You’re a ghoul, consang. Might’ve had a nice master, but let’s be honest: you don’t have rights. You’re a weapon at best,” Mirrorhead laughed, “but frankly, to me, what the Low Masters made of your kind was more a…art project.”
Jaus, he’s serious. Avo’s mind was reeling. “Bought me from scavengers. Put me in a Crucible. And now…I belong to you?”
“Yes,” Mirrorhead said like it was the most natural thing in the world. “Something strange about that?”
The aerovec began to slow, and descend. A light near the rear doors flashed twice.
Mirrorhead stood straightening his monochromatic suit. The man flicked his holographic tie off.
“Follow.” Avo looked at Mirrorhead. He looked at Draus. He looked at the father, still clutching his head. “Don’t mind them. I have other designs for them. And do not mistake my statement for a request. Follow.”
The door hissed open again. The rain had weakened to a mere shower now, the haze broke enough to reveal the pulsing of distant neon and strobing lights. Clashing music echoed from distant ghosts, interspersed with exchanges of gunfire.
This was the heartbeat of the Warrens. This was how people down here lived.
“Go on,” Draus said. “Get after him.”
Avo stared at her. He didn’t know what to say. “Draus–”
She chuckled. “Shut the fuck up and get out of here. I’ll be fine, keep an eye on the flat. See about bumming some new arms and legs off these half-strands if they don’t try to torture me.” She snorted. “Be like going through basic again.”
“Ghoul.” Mirrorhead voice rumbled through the glass. He didn’t sound like he was going to ask again.
Avo wanted to say something to Draus. Offer her a promise. Something. But Mirrorhead was listening. Watching. Peering through every reflection. Every curve and bend in the room. The shackles of paranoia settled on Avo, and a new weight clung to him.
So, he didn’t say anything. Instead, he quietly extended his Ghost-Link over to her, hiding his shiv as best he could.
TRANSFERRING GHOST
GHOSTS: [34]
Lost one fragging the Specter earlier. And another, wrapping his thought-shiv in a nice little package. Confusion momentarily flashed across Draus’ features before her face flattened. He could see the twitch of a smile on her cheek.
“Yeah,” she whispered. “Thanks.”
The Guilds built the Warrens to be temporary. The widening of the Tiers was supposed to be a continent-wide project. A stable haven for humanity to re-expand across this broken world. And what more poetic place to do it than from the forge that once made the gods themselves?
The blocks were fabbed by Voidwatch. An act of unity between the voiders and the terrestrials. A cleansing of old wounds. Highflame provided most of the Souls. Ori-Thaum built the Nether. The No-Dragons reseeded the world with life while Stormtree wrestled the ecosystem back from the hypercanes and chronostorms.
Hells, even the Mandate got in on the action, mauled as they were. Filled out the local oceans and rivers again while Sanctum stiched the broken planes of geometry back in place.
Ashthrone? Their Hells made the whole enterprise logistically feasible. Just a shame about how the others tried to cut them out afterward. Some say that was what started the wars again.
Truth is, peace can’t last; Existence can’t uphold eight different utopias. Not after all the blood that’s been shed.
-Revo I’Kurita, The False Peace, Prologue
3-5
Sanctum of Mirrors
Mirrorhead made Avo’s blood churn. There was something wrong with the Syndicate Godclad, and it wasn’t the Heaven he possessed. Rather, it was the discordant nature they went about things that gnawed at Avo’s nature. For all Mirrorhead’s pretenses of control and refinement, they were at once naked power and fleeting attention–seemingly more lost in their own mind and questions than focused on the world around them.
Perhaps that was a natural outcome of peeking out at the world from within a glass cage.
Emerging into the night, the Warrens wailed at Avo’s senses. Through the Nether a line of loci burned like miniature suns, each bound to the next through megablock after megablock, junctions to traffic ghosts. In the material, Avo found himself in a place far different than where he emerged.
There was a certain density in the local ecology. A thickness in the air like life was overflowing. It was a place that slumming topsiders would take mem-shots of in disposal sheathes, taking in the sights and the daily lives of the mortals, before splashing the remembrances in their memory palaces for their friends to see. Some called it art. Others called it madness.
Walton would’ve called it expression.
Descending the landing pad after Mirrorhead, the topside of Layer One greeted with noise and motion from almost every inch of space. If the gutters below were characterized by abandonment and decay, then this section of the sprawl would be a biomechanical swamp at war with itself.
Biotech and alloys splashed against each other here. Rising fungal rot and bio-engineered shitslugs ate their way up the mid-levels of the blocks. Meanwhile, drones and holographically constructed aero-lanes lined the skies–arteries of flowing matter dancing to the age-old rhythm of red-yellow-green amidst all the neon.
Before Avo’s eyes, a cybernetic leviathan-whale swam through the air. Its narrow head snapped along as its colossal tendrils undulated behind it. Aerovecs blared their horns at it as the eighty-foot-long chimeric behemoth inched forward languidly, spewing plumes of fire from bulging pustules filled with helium.
Avo looked away from the bombardment of physical and phantasmal ads burned across the creature’s moon-bright body. He had caught sight of the flashing blurs of a local suicide and organ repossession center. Just staring at it caused part of the address to whisper itself to him. Whoever designed it also instilled the ghosts with an added kick of compulsion. Unethical, but effective.
Ultimately, ignoring the whale was far easier than ignoring the smell. The inevitable mingling of piss and perfume, of spice and stink, of deliciousness and disgust. New Vultun was a city at war with itself in every way, and it never let you forget.
Here then was where the light beheaded the shadow. Here then was where the alloy crowned the flesh.
Mirrorhead trailed away, suit barely shivering, the wind drifting into him, whistling through his being like air currents sucked through a chasm. They must’ve been at least fifty stories above ground level here, and at least ten miles up from where the Maw was.
A long distance to rise in a single day.
Avo liked to think of the totality of the Warrens as a rash. A chaotic sprawl of urbanization spread out around and beneath the Tiers like an allergy of the skin. Where the topmost districts still shone with their spires and archways of glass and metal, it did faintly little to hide the chaos bubbling below.
Strobing lights of passing traffic slashed across Avo’s peripheral vision. He winced and looked away. Wailing horns interspersed with beats of gunfire and explosions echoed, the noises bouncing across the war-weathered bulks of each block. He pushed through the chaos with practiced focus and continued following Mirrorhead down a descending staircase.
Peeking into his cog-feed, Avo commanded his ghosts to interface with the local Nether. His MemNav display flashed in the back of his head as the ghosts ferried and scanned the mem-pack before installing them into his Metamind. He was in the Stralhurst District, and it was five-thirty-three on Thulsday morning.
The district was part of the Yuulden-Yang Sovereignty, with major ownership percentages going in favor of Stormtree and No-Dragons: thirty-two and forty percent respectively. What little remained belonged to Highflame. The post-mortem echo-tax would be divided amongst the three Guilds at the same percentages.
Mirrorhead led him toward a massive polychromatic bulkhead that hid like a depression a full dozen feet past the edges of the block itself. This structure was old. Probably built a century ago during the Hundred-Year Truce. Unlike most blocks around it, there was a bit of ground around the edges. Drawing more trajectory data into his Phy-Sim, he guessed that the bulkhead was a recent installation, as it was all edges while the standard plascrete encompassing the rest of the structure was more curved in design.
He wanted to cast out a Specter. Reach up and scry a bit further. Get a bird’s eye on his situation.
He didn’t. He wasn’t equipped to deal with proper opposition should he encounter trouble in the Nether. For now, he contented himself that he was far from the Crucible and the deeper–and some might say true–Warrens that spilled out far below.
A rumbling hiss pulled Avo’s attention back to the door in front of him. It folded upward. Gears ground on for a full minute before a small crack opened itself at the very middle, revealing a miniature entrance to what looked to be an ancient elevator. He struggled not to stare incredulously at Mirrorhead.
“Elevator?” Avo asked. No one used elevators in the Tiers. Not even the Undercroft. It was a blatant structural weakness–something that could be used to bypass levels without ID scans.
“Let’s go,” Mirrorhead said. The Syndicate boss marched forward with his hands in his pockets, never once bothering to look at Avo.
Probably because he didn’t see Avo as some kind of threat. Avo hated that. Mirrorhead wasn’t wrong, but that didn’t diminish the sour taste. The beast inside growled, wanting Avo to tear into the Godclad while they were distracted. This impulse was easier to control. Fighting suicidal acts usually were.
Following Mirrorhead, Avo waited instinctively for a skip of the man’s heartbeat, a stagger his step. Anything. But Mirrorhead betrayed nothing. Inside, he was a cone of silence. Outside, he was like a spot of emptiness.
The elevator was old. Very, very old. And very, very industrial. Avo couldn’t remember the last time he saw an elevator that didn’t interface with ghosts or at least a datajack. This one had haptic inputs. As the door closed, the coldtech bot that served as the limited intelligence for this platform sang a jingle.
“Wel-come to block 7! Choose your floor!”
“You gave something to Captian Draus before you left,” Mirrorhead said. “A ghost. What was inside the ghost?”
Avo didn’t lie. He expected this. “A memory. Of a killing.”
Mirrorhead barely turned his head. He stood only as tall as Avo’s sternum, so the effect of the stare was muted at best. “One of yours? Or one of hers?”
“Mine,” Avo said. “Parting gift.”
The Syndicate boss hummed. “I did not take you as one for sentiment, ghoul.”
“No sentiment,” Avo said. “Just something she deserves.”
“‘Blessed be the worthy,’” Mirrorhead said, quoting Highflame’s ruling mantra. “I do concur. A nuisance though she might be to my enterprise, she is, in her own twisted fashion, still living up to her charge. Highflame would be proud.”
Avo shot a furtive glance at the Godclad. The glass around them was dull and stained with filth. No hints of an eldritch leviathan dwelling beyond. Still, after the experience in the aerovec, Avo would be checking every reflection he could see for some time.
“You a golden?” Avo asked, throwing out a casual question.
Asking someone’s color was a lot like asking which side they declared for if the hypothetical “End-War” came about. Few would give a straight answer. Some changed their opinions based on taxes. And most didn’t give a shit and just wanted to live their life.
Mirrorhead stayed silent for a beat. Finally, he turned to look at Avo. “I am not a follower. My will is my own.”
The elevator had a u-shaped window above its controls. Without hesitation, Mirrorhead reached out and selected the option at the very bottom. S-300.
“Three hundred levels down?” Avo asked. That was deep. Probably at least as deep as the storage level from which he and Draus just ascended. A curious apprehension built within Avo. “What’s the need?”
Mirrorhead revealed his answer easily. “Far enough to survive a kinetic kill-rod.”
Avo couldn’t imagine someone wasting a tungsten rod to kill him. Suppose Godclads lived different lives. That thought struck a beat into his thinking. He wondered if he needed to plan how he was going to avoid getting killed by interstellar weaponry should he survive long enough.
He was, after all, also a Godclad. Just one experiencing meta-technical difficulties right now. Something he could remedy with a few more lives fed to his Soul if the thaumic requirements of his Hell were any indication.
A nicely curated garden filled with ebontas rose into view. The black, jagged slither vine of the mega-plant skittered out in eight directions, climbing up even the surface of the inner courtyard of the building.
“That’s a–” Mirrohead began.
“I know what an ebonta is,” Avo said.
“--an ebonta,” Mirrorhead continued, like he was never interrupted, and then stopped. The glass began to rattle. A shadow appeared in the depths. Avo took a step back. “Never interrupt me.”
Avo grunted a non-apology.
Mirrorhead promptly finished telling him what an ebonta was. Every detail. Location. Creator. When it was first biocultured into existence. Everything.
It occurred to Avo that there was one thing about Mirrorhead: if anything threatened his control, he hated it. Which meant the guy probably hated being alive, considering that he was down here and the Guilders were up there, making everyone pay them taxes.
Avo made a mental note about that. Maybe he could tip off the Guilders if he ever managed to jack into Mirrorhead’s information and found the Syndicate boss doing an evasion scheme. Guilders didn't agree about much, but not getting paid their tithes was one thing that could spur a joint operation.
“...and so, it cost me another fifty-thousand imps to have it transported inside.” Mirrorhead finished.
“Tough,” Avo said.
The courtyard was–surprise, surprise–also layered in wing-shaped panels of glass. Besides the hunters in the Crucible, it seemed that pretty much every member of this Syndicate was forced to run some kind of mirror theme. Guess Mirrorhead had a healthy ego.
“Organization name,” Avo said. “Something like Monochroma? Or Glassheads?”
Mirrorhead snorted in derision. “Cute. Conflux.”
“Conflux,” Avo said. “Because black-white convergence? Or Syndicate having both legal-illegal businesses?”
Mirrorhead suddenly didn’t have much attitude about that. He tugged on his collar, defensively. “It’s effective.”
Cute. That was what Avo wanted to say. He went for a less suicidal statement by just grunting.
The elevator had started playing some kind of chronobass. Avo hated chronobass. It was the looping of two different tracks crossing over each other that made his ears ring and his head hurt.
Peeking at the unmoving Mirrorhead out of the corner of his eye, Avo tried to come to terms with that, no, the Syndicate Godclad apparently was taking this all in stride. No awkwardness about nearly throwing him, Draus, and the father out mid-transit. Nothing about the slavery talk. Not even any mention of where he was going to move the other two or if he was going to provide them with any help at all.
It suddenly occurred to Avo that he might’ve been dealing with someone even more socially antagonistic than he was. That probably merited Mirrorhead a reward.
Slowly, they sank below the courtyard and Avo learned something that day: he learned that elevators were slow and he despised them. Reflexively, he wanted to reach out into the Nether again but froze mid-action. Unwise to commit to anything next to Mirrorhead. Especially if the latter knew of his capabilities. Might take his ghosts moving around as a threat.
Instead, Avo occupied his mind with another, more interesting question.
If his Heaven was working, could he kill Mirrorhead? Would a spike of blood and tungsten pierce his foe? Avo studied the Syndicate boss again. He had no idea what Heaven the man had grafted or how much thaumic mass he had, but it felt larger. Greater. But that didn’t mean it was more effective in direct combat.
Of course, there were several other issues, like how he was to go about procuring the requisite amount of blood first before engaging Mirrorhead, or what limits the enemy Godclad truly possessed. Their Heaven of glass and reflections must’ve had its own canons; its own hubristic limitations.
Knowing those might just be the path to survival.
What Avo needed was some privacy. Somewhere to study, experiment, and practice without someone watching.
Right now, he needed to figure out several things in order of importance. The first was getting his Heaven active again. Judging from his cycler, he was just seven or so kills away from getting it working again. The second was getting a chance to sleep so he could resequence his Metamind and mod and fab some new phantasmics.
After that came the bigger questions, like how he ended up in the Maw to begin with; what happened to a week’s worth of memories missing from his mind; or where was his previous Metamind; and how did he get a Liminal Frame burned over his ontology?
And that wasn’t even getting into Walton’s last message about the Easy Armistice or whatever the Ninth Column was.
Lots to do, with all of it needing to be done circumspect or upon being fully emancipated from Mirrorhead. Difficult but not impossible. Avo spent most of his career as a Necrojack being subtle. He’d find an opening.
There was always an opening.
The elevator door rang. Avo twitched. He was more used to ghosts announcing his arrival in the back of his mind than just blasting noise at you. He hated coldtech.
The door opened to a long, red carpet surrounded by several marble busts of pre-modern nu-cats and nu-dogs amongst other animals, now rendered extinct through biological obsolescence.
Mirrorhead marched on. The room ahead expanded in a gulf of brightness. Spears of blinding light pierced deep into Avo’s eyes as he winced. As he stepped forward, however, he felt his claws click against what felt like…glass.
His wince became a shudder. Avo pushed through the glaring radiance to realize that he was standing in a room made of naught but crystalline reflections, each pane polished to crisp perfection. Ahead, Mirrorhead’s skull grew hard to spot amidst the curving reflections. If not for the Syndicate boss’ suit, it would have been hard to keep track of the man at all. Eyes darting around, a disconcerting fear snaked through Avo’s veins: ghouls were made to be predators, not prey, but he had survived long enough to know when he was entering the den of another.
This chamber was a place of power for Mirrorhead. Somewhere they were nigh-omnipotent, nigh-omniscient. Greed and envy followed the fear in Avo. He realized that he wanted this: what Mirrorhead had–sanctuary.
And, continuing from an earlier thought regarding whether he could beat Mirrorhead should his Heaven be functional, he wondered if he could take Mirrorhead’s Heaven from them instead.
As they traveled further still, the room widened into a round expanse. No ghosts or thoughts penetrated this domain. The Nether went quiet. Dead. No electric cameras that Avo could see either. Just mirrors. Reflections. In every direction. A bunker of glass. The effect was so encompassing that Avo couldn’t even find the way out as the elevator doors shut behind him, for they too, were reflective.
Avo sighed.
Mirrorhead didn’t just use his gimmick like a brand. No, he cut its corpse open and literally used it as his skin.
They made it halfway across the red carpet to nowhere before Mirrorhead suddenly took a step off it. Now, they seemed to be heading toward a random curve of the room-sized mirror without a hint nor reason.
Suddenly, a flash of rippling fire burst from Mirrorhead. Avo cocked his head. There was something wrong with the other Godclad’s flame. It wasn’t flowing; it looked frozen. Dead. Before Avo could dwell further on that, Mirrorhead’s Heaven pulsed in the reflection and speared a shard of its wing back through Mirrorhead himself. The act was reflected across every surface in the room. Avo shook off a rising bout of nausea and looked away.
Mirrorhead motioned directly ahead. “Proceed.” Every instinct yelled for Avo to stop, that he was going to bounce off the mirror, that he was walking into a lair of an eldritch monster beneath the glass depths, waiting to devour him. But Avo knew natural instinct had died at the hands of this world long ago.
Without a better option ahead of him, Avo took his first step through the pseudo-looking glass.
You might encounter some bitter cynics who tell you that dealing with the Syndicates is like dealing with the Guilds.

Frankly, this is outright ghoul-shit.
Guilds–for all the warring they do–provide structures of economic exchange, laws, and the foundations of security and infrastructure.
They are, effectively, nation-states. The only reason I’m reluctant to call them such is because most High-Guilders act like godsdamned cultists and would like to see the world collapse into another apocalypse if it would achieve their desired utopia.
I can’t even give the Syndicates that much. They’re just leeches. Stealing old licensing chips. Exploiting the FATELESS. Fighting their own little gutter wars for hedonism and profit.
They might tell you they provide security and stability for the Warrens in absence of greater powers. To this, I’d say that I could also tell you my piss contains the cure to wombrash, and you should buy it from me and drink it deep at 10,000 imps a cup.
-Quail Tavers, New Vultun Sunrise Interview
3-6
Crystal Cages
Avo felt the same self-inverting pressure peeling free from the reflection as he did when Mirrorhead tore him through the ceiling. This time, however, there were no unfathomable depths infested with an eldritch god. Instead, a small office greeted Avo.
It too, of course, was entirely made of glass. Avo sighed.
The walls were mirrors. The desk was cast in mirror polish. Even the chair was reflective. And being the self-satisfied, dominance-abusing half-strand that he was, Mirrorhead decided to emerge out from the glass of the chair, stretching themselves through a narrow tunnel of space. Avo’s skull spiked with pain as his natural mind failed to comprehend the transgressions inflicted upon geometry.
Materializing into his seat, Mirrorhead pulled another two glasses out from his face. He clicked them both down against the desk and, with a wave of his hand, manifested a small barrel shape stool across from the desk. A small barrel-shaped stool that he motioned for Avo sit on.
Avo shot Mirrorhead a naked glare. His legs would end up ascending past his chest if he sat in that. It would be like doing a squat.
“I don’t get many ghouls,’ Mirrorhead said, dryly.
Yes. The only other seat you own is from the toddler’s section so we don’t visit, was what Avo wanted to say.
Instead, he awkwardly doddered over and leaned down, staring at the seat. Reflective too. Probably in case Mirrorhead wanted to give him a prostate scan while they were talking or something. The Syndicate boss would probably end up going on about how staring up someone’s rear was more a dominance thing than something that might induce the rash.
Carefully planting himself down on the stool, Avo still found himself a head taller than Mirrorhead. He struggled not to grin. The Syndicate boss didn’t seem to care. A waifish six-feet though Mirrorhead might be, Avo supposed the Godclad had other, more important qualities he concerned himself with.
Like pulling a decanter from his skull.
This time, Avo watched carefully, attempting to better glean how his enemy’s Heaven functioned. Could Mirrorhead store things inside himself or was it just like pulling things through a doorway? What was the scope of the Syndicate boss’ miracles? And what if the mirror was smeared or shattered?
Mirrorhead dropped the decanter onto the table with a loud clack. He shoved it over to Avo. “Pour us a drink.”
Avo obeyed. The other option was likely death. Didn’t mean he liked it.
“So,” Mirrorhead said, waving for Avo to stop the glass filled halfway. Avo deliberately spilled some as he pulled his arm away too early, pretending to wince. Mirrorhead ignored him. “As I said earlier: I have a use for you. Being the survivor of a Crucible has qualified you for certain…circuits in the Warrens. There are other games I’d like to enter…” Mirrorhead trailed off into a sigh as he saw Avo raising his hand. “What?”
“Didn’t want to interrupt–”
“Raising your hand is interrupting, ghoul,” Mirrorhead said, his simmering annoyance made evident by the edged rumble in his voice.
Avo loved dealing with reasonable people. “You want me. To…participate in another Crucible? Do another snuff-stream? A circuit?” Avo asked, trying to understand. What kind of reward for winning was this? The boon for surviving a slaughterhouse like the Crucible should be no more Crucible and a ticket out of this den of misery.
Now Mirrorhead was trying to get him to do another?
“Yes,” Mirrorhead said without a hint of shame. “It’s a good use for you. You are capable: a champion to one of the harshest Crucibles in the city. Someone the viewers can remember. Someone I can use to shape a narrative. Across the Nether, I could use someone who is… distant from my official dealings. Another angle of attack, so to speak.”
Great. Perfect. It was all Avo ever wanted. To get famous making snuff vicarities for a control freak. How could he ever thank Mirrorhead enough? “You asking me to keep doing these Crucibles?”
A trail of ghosts spilled past Mirrorhead’s face. Again, Avo never even saw them manifest. That was going to be a problem. Detecting incoming ghosts and not getting detected in return was part zero of surviving the Nether. Without a glance at the greater sequences Mirrorhead’s ghosts were anchored to or what phantasmics he was using, it wasn’t going to be easy to gauge how good of a Necro he was.
With a wave, the Syndicate manifested the metrics for the most recent Crucible stream produced under Conflux along with several highlight headlines. Avo blinked.
Ah. A Phantom phantasmic. Odd. Most people still used holograms for visual representations. Phantoms were, after all, solely perception-based phenomena; something that couldn’t be stored or itemized other than through remembrances.
The phantoms swirled into a variety of figures and graphs. Nine hundred million views; a few hundred billion imps in revenue; images of dead hunters, a broken golem, and Little Vicious’ brutalized remains.
“Are these not among your deeds?” Mirrorhead asked.
A highlights reel began playing, staring with Avo’s struggle with the first hunter–the one with the frequency blade–taking her with him down the rails. Then came the bodkins and his first death at the hands of Slaughterman. The recordings played on from there, showing Draus, him, and the father at times in various “triumphant” circumstances. Most of the footage was taken from the uploaded memories of the spectators.
Post-processed memories, Avo realized. He stared upon his own form amidst the dancing phantoms with annoyance. They had shortened his arms. Flattened out the gleam in his scleras. Even reduced the length of his fangs. In fact, aside from the pallid translucence of his skin, there was nothing the Syndicate didn’t touch up. And even there, Avo found his flesh shining like moonlit marble rather than the leathery ash that it truly was.
It all culminated in the hissing remains of Little Vicious’ cockpit as a final shot of the Crucible. A capitalized “THREE” marked the survivors. Him. Draus. The father. A triumphant flash framed the exterior of their presentations.
No hint or mention of the boy. In fact, it looked like the dead child was entirely edited out.
Had to sell it to the broader public somehow. There were levels to the snuff game, and enough of the city still recoiled at the deaths of children. Especially after the rash.
The phantasmal images faded to black. Avo stared at Mirrorhead, wordless, expression blank. Two could play at being obtuse.
“The viewers even came up with a title for you,” Mirrorhead said, unaffected. “Moonblood.”
Avo glared silently. Moonblood belonged to something from a children’s serial. He was a ghoul. Ghouls and children go together like a nu-cat and an aratnid nest.
“I’m glad you like it,” Mirrorhead said, his nod almost imperceptible. The worst part about that was Avo couldn’t tell if the man was serious or not. “I think it’s….fitting, for the purity you exemplify over your subspecies. A ghoul, unlike all the others, capable of thought. Capable of reason. Capable of emot–” Mirrorhead’s voice trailed off. “Ethics.”
“More accurate,” Avo concurred. He struggled not to grimace in annoyance. The man was going to use him as the “good” ghoul. Something of a token monster turned to the sensibilities of the city.
“You like it?”
“Does it matter?” Avo asked, already knowing the answer.
“No. I’ve decided to use that as your title. Marketing is seeding the lobbies as we speak.”
Avo grunted. He would take great pleasure in eating Mirrorhead’s tongue if he got the chance. If the half-strand even had a tongue.
“Have questions,” Avo said.
Mirrorhead motioned for him to speak.
“Draus. The father. What about them?”
The question slid off the Mirrorhead like water from a windshield. “What of them?”
“What are they going to get?” Avo asked.
Mirrorhead hummed at the question. “Captain Draus will likely fetch me a neat sum should I sell her back to one of her former employers at a ransom. I could attempt to subjugate her to my will. The thought of having a Regular in my service is…pleasing. But not worth the trouble. She was more threat than the benefit she offers–worse, she has a mind of her own.”
And there it was. Despite all Avo had accomplished, all he displayed surviving the Crucible, it still wasn’t enough to make him a person. The bitter bemusement he felt at knowing that Mirrorhead had miscalculated.
Between him and Draus, the latter was indeed the far superior fighter. But Mirrorhead wasn’t a problem to be settled in a typical combat engagement. No. Mirrorhead had the reach of his Heaven and his organization. It would take a certain level of strategy and leverage to pry it all apart.
Unfortunately for the Syndicate boss, he just invited a Necrojack with a grudge into the inner confines of his court. A miscalculation of overconfidence. That’s fine. Avo would do for Mirrorhead what Walton did for him: be direct in the correction of that mistake. See hubris rewarded with just violence.
"The father?” Avo asked.

"Of little use,” Mirrorhead said. “By all rights, he should be dead.”
"By fact he isn’t,” Avo replied.
A beat slid into their conversation. Mirrorhead considered Avo’s words. “True. But truth is unimportant. I will find a use for him. Or release him if I cannot.”
“Release where?”
“Outside,” Mirrorhead said simply, non-specifically. “It is a vast city. There are plenty of corners.”
“Plenty of harvesters,” Avo said. “Even flat-organs give imps.”
“If such is to be his fate.”
This was an affront. An arrangement so easily broken was no arrangement at all. Walton would have been disgusted at this. Avo knew he would. “He survived your game. Deserves better–”
“He deserves whatever I deign to provide him," Mirrorhead said. Fissures spread across the glass, opening like spiderwebs around Avo. A reminder of where he was. Of who held the power. And with a single tap of the table, the cracks disappeared. “Hm. I may have a use for him yet.”
Somehow, Avo doubted Mirrorhead was going to offer the father work.
“Enough distractions,” Mirrorhead continued. “Let me speak of your initiation. And reward.”
Avo tilted his head. Dead gods, it actually was like he was getting a full-time wager contract.
With a thought, the phantoms returned to the moment where Avo found himself engaged against Slaughterman.
“You have…potential. But you’re clearly rough. Untrained. Sloppy.” Mirrorhead deliberately cycled through moments of Avo getting brutalized by the oversized hunter. “Yet, your resourcefulness and surprising…comprehension of Necrothurgy are evident. What you managed with the drones was a fine feat. I commend you.” Mirorhead’s approval was as blunt and stilted as he was. “But aside from skill, your biggest deficiency is within your attributes. Your sluggishness. A pitiful failure on the part of the Low Master in your design. Modifications will be necessary.”
“Implants don’t work,” Avo said. “Ghoul. Blood rejection. Don’t think you have nano-surgeons here. Ones good enough to tune my blood.”
“There are other means of enhancement than just chrome,” Mirrorhead said. “The No-Dragons have achieved interesting medical breakthroughs experimenting with your kind. Do you know that your blood has very effective qualities? More than being an infection vector. The synaptic nodules each cell possesses presented new opportunities for research. And products.”
That piqued Avo’s interest. “Bioware?”
Mirrorhead nodded. “A prototype. Procured from a raid on one of the No-Dragon’s subsidiaries. Something that will solve your…lack of pace.”
“Grafting them to me?” Avo asked, incredulous. No one gave something for free. There was a catch. There was always a catch.
“Yes,” Mirrorhead said. “I can’t have my newest nu-steed lacking in acceleration now, can I? Besides. You have already made me far more imps than the cost of the graft. Consider it more reward than gift.”
“Investing a lot in me,” Avo said.
Mirrorhead scoffed. “I’m investing far less than what you have earned me. Giving you a tool I was originally going to have to sell, to begin with. Most among my ranks lack the…biology necessary to sustain the implant, anyhow. There is also the matter of your Necrojacking experience.”
A sudden excitement rose within Avo, greater than even potentially getting a workable implant for his reflexes.
“I will speak plainly. It offends me. A creature like yourself should not be capable of the art. And it stands as a threat to me. A threat that I can’t accept. You will need to be…leashed.”
Avo felt his excitement plummet into near-fury. The beast snarled beneath Avo’s skin. He shivered, trying to keep it bottled in. Attacking Mirrorhead now would see him killed. Nothing came of that. Staying alive allowed him to survive longer. Study. Wait. Find an opening.
Here he was again, going from one cage to the next. A nice, more opulent cage, but still a cage. Avo had enough of those. He had enough of being owned after a lifetime of unconditioned kindness from a father he never deserved. At that moment, Avo hated Mirrorhead. Hated him with more vehemence than he ever felt. The emotion could only manifest itself in one way: hunger.
Avo wanted to know how Mirrorhead tasted, wanted to tear the Heaven from the man and subsume the fires of his Soul.
The Syndicates wanted to play as minor Guilds to the FATELESS and downtrodden. Mirrorhead likely wanted to carve a small fiefdom out here with his powers and influence. Except he still lacked the weight of Guild support and was just a trout in a cod pond.
Sure, when you bring in a few auged-up hitters in old rigs you can clear out an area and take part of a block, but throw a few chromers against a Paladin and the only outcome you’ll get is a mass casualty event floating by midnight news as an infographic. Possible also a bump in Guild stocks if enough people die to fuel a new Heaven.
Avo swallowed his bloodlust. Time to bide his time. By this point, Mirrorhead was just staring at him, wordlessly.
“Yes,” Avo said, forcing the word out. “I understand. Injection?”
Silence became Mirrorhead. “Good. You know. In honesty, I’m impressed. Your impulse control is remarkable for your kind. And your intellect is…” Mirrorhead trailed off.
“A threat?” Avo provided.
“Interesting,” Mirrorhead said, sounding almost disgusted in himself. “I find myself fascinated with you, despite our stations. I see now why Little Vicious was so driven to kill you, despite her incompetence. You are an aberration, Avo. An abomination.” Mirrorhead chuckled.”The city is going to love you.”
Practice made things remarkable. Focus and clear objectives allowed for improvement. That was what Avo knew. The beast could be contained; directed.
"Still. I must ask, as my curiosity demands it: how do you know about the injection.”
"Worked for clubs. Joy parlors. Lots of sudden aneurysms on certain days. Lots of interesting information leaking from their ghosts after.”
Reaching under the table, Mirrorhead produced a thin–mirror-coated of course–needle. “Well. Suppose that saves me the need for getting to the hard part then.” Avo looked at the little coldtech bomb swirling inside the needle. Funny how you could kill just anyone with a little damage in the right place. Like a cortex bomb. Fried synapses were hard to come back from.
That was ultimately the greatest advantage coldtech had over thaumaturgy: low upkeep for consistent effectiveness. A ghost made to traumatize someone into compliance needs to be made specifically in opposition to an individual’s mind. Bombs worked all the same on almost everyone.
He gave Mirrorhead his best shrug. If he couldn’t avoid this, he might as well seize the choice first. “Let me do it. Straight in the veins. Yes?”
Again, Mirrorhead was taken aback. “Fine.”
Slowly, he offered the syringe. The diamond tip of the needle could pierce augmented skin without issue. With a slow press, Avo injected the contents into himself. He felt nothing, which told him the machines were too small or complex for his blood to notice without aid.
But were they too small for him to eject with his Heaven? And would they still be inside him after a post-death reversion?
“This concludes…negotiations?”
The syndicate boss huffed a laugh, wagging a finger at Avo, as if a child had said something amusing. “Negotiations,” he chuckled, downing another glass of ambrosia. “I’d like to meet this Walton. Man must’ve been cut from the cloth of Jaus Avandaer himself to do what he did with something like you.”
Avo grinned to hide his snarl. “I ever get the chance, I’ll acquaint you with him.”
In ignorance, Mirrorhead drank to the threat as a toast.
The Apotheism Movement was born from generational powerlessness and dysmorphia. This much is commonly known, but often the old wounds inflicted on each of the great cultures go less examined, and from the reason beyond each Guild’s predilection for a certain kind of augmentation goes unexamined.
To wit, look no further than afflictions suffered by the Scaarthians at the hands of Szaseangeach–The Flesh-Weaver.
By its will were the binary sexes of the Scaarthian people fused into one. And now remember that it did this to first of the joined kith by fusing husband and wife together through interlacing roots, weaving their beings inextricably through the Stormtree. From thence, all were born male at their birthing and expired as female at the twilight of their age.
In the present, the Scaarthian view their flesh as something both sacred after years of chronological refinement, but also something easily shed. In understanding this, their reluctance to impregnate their flesh with chrome is understandable due to the volatile nature of their morphic biological architecture, but so is their willingness to accept bioware, nanoware, or symbiotes that will align with their biologies rather than intruding outright.
-Apotheism, Ch. 1
3-7
The Symbiote
Ultimately, Avo was surprised the Syndicate boss even allowed him to do the injection himself, being a creature of egomania and vague opportunism. Couple that with a spontaneous capriciousness, and Avo found dealing with Mirrorhead outright disorienting.
Indeed, as soon as Mirrorhead culminated the “signing” of the contract marking Avo as his property via the ever-reliable method of employee retention cortex bomb, he immediately ordered his new star to walk through a nearby reflection for the procedure.
No other instructions followed after that. Avo wasn’t sure if the recruits that Conflux hired had orientation or even a mentor to lead them through an onboarding process, but so far, something about this organization felt too haphazard. Mirrorhead seemed like he was involved with almost everything. It felt like the entire middle of the organization was outright missing.
This lead into the first and immediate question: why was Mirrorhead dealing with him directly? Micromanager? Yes, but the initialization process didn’t require him; such was a thing that should’ve been done by an administrator of some kind. Pair that with the lack of lieutenants, liaison officers, deputies, operational conductors, logistical supervisors, and internal harmonists, and Avo found himself looking at a two-rung structure thus far.
Mirrorhead. And his enforcers.
Maybe Avo hadn’t been there long enough, but still, missing infrastructure gave off a loud silence. It was like expecting to hit a speed barrier but drifting right on through. Didn’t feel right.
Emerging from the glass into the room where his grafting was supposed to take place, Avo’s expectations were ambushed yet again. The room was pristine. Tiles of blinding white lined the room while the air was laced with stinging decontaminates. Twin hovering cylinder-shaped drones unfurled into a host of medical implements at his approach. One was marked with a stripe of black along its center, while the other was white.
Mirrorhead really liked his thematic colors.
At the center of the room, a grafting station whirred upright into view, assembled by several magnetically charged appendages. Above it was a showerhead undoubtedly filled with the rainwater of midnight. Made mending flesh easy–far more affordable than the meld-tanks that Guilders used to install their augmentations.
Shaking his head, Avo grunted. This was absurd. The quality and equipment here were better than most of the grafter dens in the Undercroft. Holo-screens swirled around the station showcasing a variety of implants and mods available along with the certified licenses to which Guilds they belonged.
The funding that would take to operate this grafting station alone was astronomical.
Avo’s suspicions grew starker. This definitely wasn’t high-class enough to be a Guilder facility, but a street squire or your average chromer-muscle would’ve killed–and have probably killed–to get bled at a place that could afford the original alpha-grade hardware.
“Please proceed to the grafting station.” The White-Striped drone said. They sounded human. Intelligent. Feminine, yet, he could see no ghosts trailing into them, sensed no thoughtstuff or thought-accretion ebbing from their loci. Were they connected through coldtech alone? Were they just autonomous?
“Bot?” Avo asked, curious.
“Beep-boop,” Black-Stripe said, chuckling. Their voice was deeper than their counterpart and was possessed of a lyrical wryness.
“Osjack…” White-Stripe warned.
People. They were definitely, absolutely people.
“No ghosts,” Avo said.
“Oh, no, nothing so sophisticated as a ghost,” Black-Stripe said. Osjack. Osjack was his name. “Just neurally-laced through good old H-wave transmissions. Pity us poor voiders and our lack of magical bullshit.”
“Osjack,” White-Stripe said, “stop wasting time with the bioform.”
“Aye, Osjane. Whatever you say, Osjane.”
Oh. Not names. Pseudonyms.
Avo blinked. Wait. Voiders? His grafters were going to implant him jocking these drones from the void? Just how much imps did Mirrorhead have that he had actual voiders in his employ?
“Please proceed to the grafting station,” Osjane said.
Reluctantly, Avo did as she said and walked up to the station.
To call what he was facing a grafting station felt wrong. It was too minimalist. Beyond a tetrahedrally shaped mag-field projector and eight floating clamps, there was little else to the station itself.
As Avo ascended the final few steps to greet the floating pieces of metal, they clicked open like possessed manacles seeking an escaped prisoner. The beast inside him twitched. It didn’t like being bound. Neither did the sensible side of him, but from how Mirrorhead spoke, getting this implant wasn’t something up to Avo. It was a nu-unicorn of a gift; something that most desperately wanted but could never afford.
Avo would be lying if he didn’t relish the opportunity to shear away some of his deficiencies. He survived most of his life as a ghoul facing threats physically and reflexively superior to him in every regard. Suppose it was time for one of those aspects to change.
Stepping into the restraints felt unnatural. As did being drawn up by the tilting mag-field projector.
One of the drones sighed. Black-Stripe. Osjack. He gunned one of his drone’s saws and scanned it. “Another day, another ghoul. Wonder if this one will stay still long enough for us to do the operation or if the client will have to go digging around for another one. Would hate for us to get repainted by this thing’s blood like the last one.”
Avo turned his head at that. “Another ghoul?”
“A test-run for the prototype,” Osjane said. “Something to ensure your transplant will take. The client said this one would comply. And that he would pay us extra if we expedited the processes.”
Osjack whistled. “Right. Let’s get this thing going so I can punch out. Hate working down here. The lag’s hell on my NooDeck. Burns up my exo-cortex something fierce.”
Another crumpet of information. NooDeck. Exocortex. Likely meant they were under the official employ of Voidwatch or one of its subsidiaries. No other Guild was as committed to their anti-thaumaturgical stance. Still, bringing in coldtech experts meant Mirrorhead had serious capital. Or connections.
But that begged the question: if Mirrorhead had such resources, why was he in the Warrens? He could have easily bought his way up into the Undercroft. Unless he didn’t want to. More guesses. More questions.
The black-striped shoved a light in Avo’s eye. Reflexively, he bit the torch.
“Well, his reflex checks out,” Osjack joked.
Avo let go of the torch, gnashing his fangs together. “‘Going to stick a light in your eyes,’” Avo growled, making mock conversation with himself. “‘Don’t be surprised.’”
Osjack chuckled. “Shit. Sass from a ghoul. There’s a first.”
“Stay focused, Osjack. Don’t need you accidentally drilling a hole through this one’s C-Six as you did to that Nu-Dog.”
“Never gonna live that down.”
“No. You’re not.”
The two operators went momentarily silent after that. Light splashed over Avo as he felt static wash over his skin. They were scanning him. A sudden prick in his arm made him bite back a hiss of rage. The beast was coiling inside him. The clamps kept him locked firm. A grim thought occurred to Avo that the magnets connected to his limbs could pull in different directions and dismember him with ease.
Something inside him even expected it, despite knowing that such a killing would have been pointless for the Syndicate. They would have just shot him. Or thrown him from the aerovec.
“Clean bill of health,” Osjane said, sounding a tinge surprised. “Its blood work might be the most stable I’ve seen. No tumors at all. Synchro-synapses show full spectrum firing. Muscles reacting properly; no imbalances. Even its brain patterns are at baseline. Look.”
“Jaus,” Osjack said with a huff. “Client wasn’t lying. This one’s impulse control must be in the point-one percentile for ghouls. Intelligence too. Look at that brain.”
“Making me blush,” Avo muttered.
Another laugh from Osjack. “Even cracking me up. Careful there, consang. Wouldn’t want me to start feeling for you when we start making the cut. Might get all anxious and split through your spine.”
Avo didn’t respond to that. He didn’t find much pleasure in being treated like a child or a novelty item, but it beat being shot at while someone hurled slurs at him. “Eat you if you were here.”
“There we go,” Osjack said. “That’s what I needed to cut you without concern.”
The drones continued working on him for a moment. One of them began lathering a sticky substance along his spine. Avo frowned at the feeling. He had to undertake tri-annual surgery for his tumors. Most of his kind didn’t live long enough to experience tumorfication. Avo was envious. Part of the perks of having hyper-accelerated healing: sometimes, the cells got confused as to what biomatter they were supposed to reconstitute.
A new vector of force tugged on the mag-clamps. Avo found himself being spun around. Osjane was hovering back, now carrying a large vat nested at its core. To the drone’s sides, its chassis was open in mono-thin surgical saws that Avo guessed were supposed to slice up along his spine. The micro-cutters apparatuses it had in support were probably for his muscles then.
The drone hovered up to show him the vat. Avo squinted through the transparent screen, trying to perceive the writhing organ. He couldn’t tell how long it was or even how it was textured. All he knew was that it looked like something between a serpent and a centipede. He thought he saw some small writhing root-like structures twitching along the edges.
Avo didn’t know too much about bioware, but he had done enough business for grafters that he saw some of their products. Bioware products were far easier to smuggle than chrome. Mostly because you could hide it using a proper mule. Of course, that’s why it also had the highest mortality rate: implanting hyper-powered organs into a body below acceptance criteria was a surefire way of making a corpse.
“This,” Osjane said, “is a prototype Celerostylus. An exo-synaptic symbiote. Its more finalized offshoots are scheduled for public cloning next year. This version had to be…pruned. Too much synaptic overload. Test trials resulted in seizures. Embolisms.”
Avo stared. Was she trying to intimidate him?
“The prototype itself is undiminished. As such, expect your sensory input to be…disturbed while it integrates into your nervous system. Eventually, it will graft itself over your spine before fusing with your brain stem. Do you understand?”
“Mortality rate?”
“High for humans,” she said. “Thankfully, your blood cells offer a lot more bandwidth than your creators were capable of utilizing. A shame. With even a rudimentary reflex boosting organ grown into you, your effectiveness would have been exponentially increased.” She sounded genuinely mournful. “We are going to begin the procedure. Please do not struggle. Due to your biology–”
“Anesthetics. Useless. I know.” Avo shrugged. He had been through this before. He doubted they could hurt him worse than Little Vicious had. Forcing himself to relax, he found even the beast inside him was quieter than usual. Perhaps it liked the offering? “Wait.”
“Yes?” Osjane replied.
“Show me. I want to see it. See it clearly.”
She hovered closer to him and turned the vat translucent. The creature no longer looked much like a mass. Instead, it almost seemed like a wrinkled arachnid of some sort. It was shivering at a pace nearing a frequency blade. As he tilted his head, it twitched in response. The beast wanted to eat it. The drones were going to implant it. Either way, his body was about to get some new meat put in.
Somewhere in there was a dirty joke that ended with everyone dying of wombrash.
Avo grunted. “Rip me open. Get it done.”
“You heard him, Osjane,” Osjack said, “let’s see it done.”
Slowly, the magnetic clumps spun him around, turning him to look at the ground. The titanium steps leading down into the drains greeted him with a shimmering gleam. They kept this place clean. He wondered if it was bright enough for Mirrorhead to peer through. Didn’t matter really. Mirrors lined the outer wall of the room so there was no escape from his new boss's gaze.
Avo took a breath and relaxed. Considering what he was, they were probably going to have to make repeated cuts while the process was ongoing. Peel away scar tissue before it clumped up.
That might be why there needed to be two grafters on standby.
A series of low whirls sounded from behind. Avo was mid-attempt trying to relax his muscles when one of the drones cleaved into his flesh and bit down into his spine. In his ears, the chipping of bones being drilled drowned out his sibilant hiss. A force pulled at the incision along his back, opening his flesh like petaled flaps.
A faint surge of hunger grew within him. Mentally, he held onto his blood as much as he could, his cellular lattices clinging to each other. A waterfall still seemed to spill free from his vivisected flesh. The pain was a five. Not pleasant. Not the worst thing he experienced. Avo didn’t mind being cut too much. Not nearly as much as being burned or flayed. He was mostly succeeding at keeping his spasming to a minimum.
That “mostly succeeding” dissolved as he heard the vat open. A wet, stickiness filled the air as something spread its limbs. A stinging sensation whipped into his back, needling into the cleft of his spine. Another followed. Then, a series of cracks burst through him. It wasn’t pain he felt. No. Pain was natural. This was like something was putting him on like he was a rig–a meat suit.
Foreign impulses shot through his body. His limbs jerked and quivered. The clamps held him in place even as his joints popped and tore from the violence of explosive motion surging through him. A series of new stings ran up along his shoulders, into his neck, and finally needled into the base of his skull. A buzz filled his brain as numbness spread through his digits.
It was like he was back in the Maw again, just waking up.
“Reflex test,” Osjack announced. Avo heard a spark.
A small shock ran through him. That small shock exploded into a lightning bolt, burning across every last nerve he had. His back arced. As much as it could arc against the mag-field. But that wasn’t the strange thing. The strange thing was the building heat inside his skull and a growing oscillation to the lights above him.
Looking down, he noticed his trickling blood falling like molasses. His senses felt razor-sharp. Feeling spiked back through his fingers as he felt every inch of pain across his opened back, heard every sound between the drones’ articulations, and felt the crackles in his bones as his muscles fired faster than his structural base was used to.
The state broke. Suddenly, the world sped back up. He slumped back down. The pace of reality returned to normal.
“Implant installed,” Osjane said, sounding like she had a hint of a smile in her voice. “Symbiote accepted. Artificially cultured haemophagic cells integrating. No rejection. No subsumption. Success.”
Avo felt something fold the flayed pieces of his back into place. A scythe of heat lanced across his wounds, sealing them, and filling the air with the aroma of sizzling meat. Overhead, the showers came on dousing him wet as the waters ate his wounds out of existence.
By now, Avo’s hunger was throbbing inside him. With measured slowness, Avo spun back to uprightness by the mag-clamps. Something jabbed him in the shoulder. A flood of energy surged through him. He felt good. Hungry. But good. Heavier and quicker at the same time.
“Look at that,” Osjack said. “Took to it in seconds. Think of the number of nanos it would take to replicate the same adaptive survivability in one of us?”
“Not an apt comparison,” Osjane said. “It’s not human. It’s a war-grown bioform; bad initial foundations aside, it likely can serve as a useful sheathe if further tweaked.”
“Planning on turning ghoul, Osjane?”
“No. But they would be useful as pre-embedded shock-troopers if their impulses were quelled and their blood potency was enhanced. Likely what the Low Masters were going for but failed to achieve.” They scanned him again. “Can you feel your limbs?”
Avo clenched and unclenched his claws. “Yeah.”
“Deactivate clamps,” Osjane continued.
The mag-clamps spun him around. He found himself staring at a narrow exit leading to a closed doorway. Avo slipped from his restraints. The door opened, a scanner spilling a motion grid in front of it.
Osjack hovered over to the door, and upon being scanned, the door clanged shut. The drone floated back over.
“Alright, ghoulie: let’s give you a live exercise,” he said. “See how the symbiote fires when actively triggered, shall we?”
The first implant you should get is an Accelero. Everything else you get slotted should work to augment the Accelero. Skin replacements to reduce air friction. Bone lacing and muscle fibers so nothing breaks or tears. NerveNet so your senses don’t get all torqued. That kind of shit.
For Jaus’ sake, don’t go installing pistons or industrial-grade frames onto yourself, alright? They’re pretty much just dead weight half the time and they won’t be enough to keep you standing against high-ex.
You move to lose shooters. Your subdermals are for the shrapnel. Hit hard. Hit fast. Hit once. Break contact. Get out.
Get nothin’ twisted, consang, New Vultun ain’t a city where you get to shoot second. Shoot first. Always shoot first. And always be gone afterward.
-Quail Tavers, School of the Warrens
3-7
Celerity’s Burn
Avo stared blankly at the door for a beat before glaring at the drones. “Trying to get me cut in half?”
Osjack laughed. “Sure. It’ll do that. A civilian resident cheap-fab crushing our eighty-thousand imp ghoul right after we cut him open.”
“Loathe as I am to admit it, I do agree with the bioform,” Osjane said. “We can gauge a baseline using the drones. There’s no need for this…ceremony.”
“Ceremony,” Osjack said, imitating her voice. “You make it sound like I’m trying to amuse myself. No. Got to see if it works practically. Contained environments are nice and all, but I doubt our employer wants his pet cannibal someplace safe. There’s really only one reason why someone wants to field a ghoul, and it’s almost never to turn them into a manservant.”
Avo bristled slightly at being referred to as a pet. Right now, he was technically closer to an indentured servant seeing how he had an unpaid organ latched onto him. His blood swirled over–and through it. It had capitulated to his cells utterly. No transplant rejection. It writhed snuggly against his spine, its added weight feeling less than natural at his core. It was as if a ridge of tumors spread out into every part of his body like roots.
The organ’s tendrils were spreading out even deeper, as if budding in his limbs, enwreathing his structure in a new shell.
The installment fascinated him. When he could, he needed to get a MedCon phantasmic running. See just how the Celerostylus was integrating with his biology. Maybe even find methods of optimization and improvement.
Osjack sighed. “Don’t got all day, ghoulie.”
“Avo. My name. Use it.”
“Don’t got all day, Avo,” Osjack repeated in the same bored tone. “Get through the door and come back before it closes. Please? For me?”
Avo shot Osjack’s drone an annoyed look. No one really ever said please before, but he was pretty sure the grafter was being condescending. Still, he wanted to find out what he was capable of with this new augment. See how it changed things for him.
He frowned. “Implant: how do I activate it?”
Osjane scanned him. “Do you feel a new weight along your core? Like a muscle. Where your sternum and T-four meet?”
“T-four?” Avo asked.
“Upper spine,” she said. “Tense it.”
There was a weight there. A growing numb ebbing throbbed within the cage of his ribplates. He wondered if this was what having a heart felt like. The organ was slow to respond at first, his attempts to tense it making its spasm. It was a lot like tightening his lower back. Then, he felt it, a different squeeze distinct from all his other muscles.
He was about to ask her what was next to follow when it suddenly surged, chaining its voltage through his blood cells and buzzing his mind with energy.
As the implant hypercharged the flow of his synaptic signals, Avo felt the lights around him oscillate and dim. The drones around him were almost frozen except for their spinning optics that moved in increments of scant micro-inches before his hyper-accelerated perception of time.
Avo blinked. A searing pain shot through his eyelids as he felt micro-tears form. His body, it seemed, was far behind in adapting to how fast it could move. More interestingly, he was beginning to feel a building ache in his skull, the insides of his brain cooking as heat swelled.
WARNING: COG-CAPACITY DIMINISHING…
Good of him to find out now. The pressure in his head was fast building. It hadn’t even been two seconds yet and there was already a problem. Taking a tentative step forward, Avo tried to keep his movements as controlled as possible.
His leg lashed out before a counter impulse flowed through the limb, dragging him into a near stumble. It seemed the new inhabitant in his body was trying to get used to him as much as he was getting used to it.
Another step. Another stagger. Six seconds. The pressure was slowly beginning to ascend into the territory of a headache. Ahead, the door was still a hallway down, taunting him. Crackling energy and boiling tension washed out from his core, instilling a sharpness in his movements. It was like he was floating on a sea of static, something actively compensating and adjusting as he moved, tuning his nerve impulses; honing his dexterity to fits its requirements.
Through the door, he looked at the wall. Cheap plascrete. Worst comes to worst, it would break against him. Maybe see a few of its supports bent inward. Taking the plunge, Avo pushed off the ground in a sprint.
The hall suddenly blurred around him. His first few steps made him wince. The ground dented beneath his blurring feet. A claw snapped at the tip. It felt like a giant was plucking the tendons in his legs as if they were strings. His arms ground hard in their sockets, chewing against his softer tissues. The air around him grew thicker as if it was growing closer to water tension. Wind folded across his face.
With a thought, he activated his Phys-Sim. Spilling velocity vectors and impact trajectories littered his vision. As he tore past the door’s scanner, he found that he was already in the red, lined with an impact trajectory with the wall ahead. His speed was listed at somewhere north of sixty-five miles an hour and climbing.
Impulses and counter-impulses clashed through his body. His bones and muscles crackled and creaked as his body adjusted to the strain. Right now, the organ was pushing his musculature to its fullest potential, his corded fibers learning to fire as one, moving to the designs of a new symphonist introduced to his system.
Where his vessel faltered was in the bones and sockets. As a whole, his muscles provided much of his durability, serving as an endo-weave over his bones. Now, they were wrenches, levering and jerking his structure out of place.
The fact was that so long as his osseous tissue constrained him, his reflexes would be greater than his body to accommodate.
Likely a deliberate choice on Mirrorhead’s part, Avo assumed. Why give the ghoul the whole course when you lead him on from meal to meal?
Blinking past the door, it was hard for him to keep his eyes open now from all the wind rushing in. His jerking movements created microfractures and tears. Only his active healing prevented his body from spiraling into a major breakdown. Impact warnings sounded from his Phy-Sim as he slammed hard against the wall.
As expected, the outer surface caved outright. Avo braced himself and felt his wrists pop against a folding bar of steel. Twenty seconds. Everything behind his eyes was on fire. He stopped tensing his Celerostylus and clutched at his skull, wincing as the pain immediately began to diminish.
Behind, the door hissed shut.
Rubbing his temples, Avo shook his head. Twenty seconds of active synaptic boosting. Probably closer to fifteen if he wanted to be in any kind of shape afterward. It was overtaxing his brain, signals frying his nerve structure. His cells burned through more of his metabolism, healing the minor stress damage he put his body through. He used to think most street squires were overcompensating with all their chrome, that a rig should’ve been enough for most purposes.
He was wrong. Biology was a brittle, crippled thing, and it needed all the support it could get. When he got back into the room, he needed to talk with his grafters about all the parts that should have gone with it.
The door remained shut behind him. To his left, a busted pipe wept what smelled like sewage down the sides of walls, the lights flickering, walls stripped bare and abandoned. To his right, an elevator awaited, its exterior ghost-tagged with cog-tags of different gangs, ghosts carrying whispered slurs, and throwing up gang signs directly against his mind.
His ward dissolved them before he could catch any mem-viruses.
It felt like he was in a cheap tenement block. Yet, the hab-cell in front of him clearly housed a state-of-the-art grafting station and two experts. The clash of expense and destitution was whiplash-inducing, but from it, a theory began to form in his synaptically-taxed mind.
Maybe Mirrorhead wanted this. Maybe the Syndicate boss was keeping his operations masked and hidden. Or just logistically separated into different sections of this megablock. Running a quiet operation somehow. But why? Was he being hunted? Afraid of being hunted?
The door in front of him hissed open. Osjack hovered over.
“You make me sad, Avo,” Osjack said.
Avo walked past him. “Because I didn’t make it back in?”
“Yeah. That and you clearly hate walls.” Osjack’s drone scanned the damage. “People used to live here, you know.”
Avo grunted. “What happened?”
“Oh, they got eaten during the Uprising,” Osjack said, floating back toward the grafting station. “Ghouls broke in.”
Avo didn’t react to that. Wasn’t much to react to. The Low Masters had unleashed them on the city, sending them up through the Umbra into the Underways and the guts of the blocks proper. Called for a grand feast for the ghouls, and feast the ghouls did. Even at present, the Guilds only had vague estimates for how many FATELESS died during those initial days.
“Missing implants,” Avo said, pointing back at the station. “Reflexes work. Skull hurts. Bones and sockets are major liabilities. Will need to get them adjusted too.”
“Yes, that is known to us,” Osjane said. “Alas, we were paid to implant one experimental organ, and so one is what we shall do.”
Expected, but annoying. Again, how very Mirrorhead. Rich enough to pay for a grafting operation but not willing to finish out the entire package. The Syndicate boss clearly wanted his new pet project to be effective, but not formidable, building in deliberate limitations that could only be plugged gap by gap.
“Now that you’re done, you can return the way you came,” Osjane said, gesturing toward the reflection Avo arrived from. “We have contacted your owner about this operation's success and he would like for you to return for your first assignment.”
First assignment. Already. Mirrorhead wasted little time, but also didn’t seem to leave any float room to see if the implant would have post-surgery complications. Told Avo the man was either wasteful or just didn’t have that much experience actually running projects. Maybe both.
Avo himself couldn’t imagine making someone perform a task immediately post-surgery, but then again, ghouls were ghouls and people were people. One was made to thrive despite damage while the other had to attune themselves to it.
Staring at the mirror he entered from, Avo shot the drones a look, biding his time before he had to leave. Truth be made manifest, he hated the sensation of sinking through the glass. He could feel the presence of Mirrorhead's Heaven in the depths. Always. Lurking. Burning dimly. Reflections hadn’t felt right since Avo felt himself get pulled into the mirrored ceiling of the aerovec and made to face the Twice-Walker.
“This a frequent thing?” Avo asked, gesturing at the grafting station.
“What? Putting experimental bioware in ghouls?” Osjack said. “Strangely, yeah. Paladins don’t much give a shit about ethics when your kind is involved and…ah…what can I say? Your subspecies make for good test subjects. A little bit of food and they stay alive. You can implant anything into them and see how it works in them. You guys are nearly perfect. Except for, you know, the screeching, violence, shitting all over everything, trying to kill everything, the spitting.
Avo grunted in agreement. Who was he to deny the faults of his brothers? “Works until the blood rejects the implant.”
“Till that,” Osjack agreed. “But for a few beautiful moments, you’re the perfect lab dummy.”
“Touched,” Avo said. “Low Masters gave us a future after all.”
Osjack laughed again. “Ah, man, I wish I could keep you. You're like the perfectly grumpy monster I always wanted.”
Osjane sighed. “Osjack…”
“Can we keep him?” Osjack asked. Avo couldn’t tell if the man was actually being serious or not.
“No, Brother Osjack. This is unbecoming and our sessions are being recorded. We cannot keep a client’s property.”
Osjack smacked his lips. The sound emerged as static and crackles through the other side. “Shame. Goodbye, sassy ghoul. Or maybe see you later. Who knows? If your master decides he wants to continue these installments, you just might end up on our station again.”
Begrudgingly, Avo had to admit: these two weren’t the worst grafters he knew. Far from it, in fact. Even the Undercroft had establishments that offered a varying expanse of products and qualities. It took Walton some time to find one that was halfway decent at tumor removal.
“Thanks. For not severing spine.”
“Praise from a ghoul,” Osjane said glumly. “Truly, my practice has reached its apex. Off you go then. The client is contacting us again, doubtless to harry your departure.”
Osjack snorted. “Half-strand’s about as patient as a lit fuse.”
“Do not speak ill of the client, Osjack.”
“I’m not speaking ill, Osjane. I’m speaking truth. Should’ve been a philosopher.”
“And I should have had a better partner. But we must face life as things go, no? And what are you still staring at us for? Have you not been summoned.”
Avo studied the two drones a moment longer. “Question. Last one.”
“Make it quick,” Osjane said, voice tight.
“You two got public idents? A mem-scan that links to a palace? For contact.”
“Oh, I think the ghoul’s asking us out, Sister Osjane,” Osjack said.
“In accordance with Tenet 3-A under the Nu-Scripture, a practitioner of the New Alloy is not to be attached to the flesh which they will come to strip,” Osjane said.
Avo tilted his head. “Does that mean no?”
“That means, ghoul, that should you require our services again, you may submit a request to the Church of the New Alloy under Voidwatch and schedule an operation. Should you possess the means and funds, we will provide services for any modifications you so desire.”
“Yeah,” Osjack said. “But if you want to see us again specifically. Just ask for Mayflower-3288-B and Terror-3285.”
“No B for her?”
“I’m not a duplicate,” Osjane said as if that explained everything.
“Purist bigot,” Osjack said, sounding like he was smiling.
“Mayflower. Terror.” Avo repeated the words.
He guessed those were the names of ships. Walton said the voiders were bound not by parentage or culture, but by the voidships that printed them. However that worked. Supposedly the ships were references too, a name taken from long-lost vessels from eons before when the fabric of the void was still calm and the stars had yet to succumb to madness.
He recorded a remembrance of this conversation in his Metamind.
Avo gave the two drones an awkward nod and departed. They bantered on behind him as their drones began to dismantle the grafting station. He wondered where they were bound to next. New Vultun was a big place, and there was no shortage of flesh to temper with the alloy; no shortage of work for these post-human pilgrims.
Curiosity flickered inside Avo. He always wondered about the stars. Perhaps someday, if he didn’t find true-death along the way, he could greet the voiders in person. See how they really were. A great gulf remained between those who woke amidst the cold emptiness of the void and those that were born in a place long sustained by now-silenced gods.
The synaptic burn had subsided by this point. Avo guessed it took close to a minute before he recovered. His new transplant didn’t seem nearly as enduring as what Draus had, but still, he felt like…he was more. Greater. He just wished this happened in a circumstance where he wasn’t owned by another.
Freedom was easily lost and hard to win back.
He couldn’t be too disappointed. He did also have a Heaven. A dormant one. But still, a Heaven. Avo grinned as he marched toward the glass. Mirrorhead was still unaware of the problem he had on his hands, thinking he merely stumbled into possessing a controllable ghoul.
For now, it was time to prepare. Leech what he could from his new master. Figure out just what happened to him and how he got his Liminal Frame. Sequence and rebuild his Metamind. Kill enough to manifest his Hell and get his Heaven back online.
And with the Celerostylus working in tandem with his domain of blood and matter, new options were being made available for him. What was that the canon said? That the speed and force of his blood will mirror his natural limits unless the canon was altered.
Well, his canon hadn’t been changed, but he had. An image came to Avo of his blood lashing out at speeds greater than even his body could contain. Yes. There was potential here. Great potential. A chance for greater bloodshed. A chance to sample the flavors of flesh that were previously unimaginable to him.
The beast growled gleefully inside him as stepped back through the threshold of the mirror, his senses lurching.
Time to see what Mirrorhead wanted from him. He had a thirst to slake.
Ghouls take the bullets, you shoot the enemy. Gather up the dead ghouls. Pour their blood into your prisoners. Infect some more meat. Wait three months. Do it again. Works practically forever.
I can see why the Low Masters made them.
Efficient.
Expendable.
Predictable.
Replenishable.
Only problem comes with feeding them if they survive. These half-strands don’t ever seem to get full.
-Vincentine “Ripperjack” Javvers on deploying ghouls as disposable assets
3-9
The Bait
As Avo stepped through another threshold of glass, he found himself in a narrow hallway of mirrors. Narrow beams of crimson ebbed and dimmed overhead, casting the room in an eternal struggle between light and dark.
To his sides, ritualistically fashioned plates of glass were layered in folding feathers, like wings sprouting from wings. He continued, traveling down this liminal pathway until he emerged, squeezing through a narrow band of brightness.
He staggered out into the confines of an elevator. His cog-feed spiked his awareness with new details, ghosts drinking in a sea of mem-data from all the thoughtstuff ebbing around him in the Nether. Multiple loci across the immaterial horizon like ethereal suns. One shone just above him. The traffic flowing to it, however, was enervated. Minimal. The type you expect for a private lobby.
Someone cleared their voice to his right. He noticed a still, nervous mouse of a woman in the corner. There was little remarkable about her other than the multi-colored dendrites she had for hair and the gleaming optic that burned at the core of her forehead like a gem. The optic flashed then, a beaming sweep of light washing over him in a scan.
“You…you Moonblood?” she asked, swallowing hard, face ashen.
He grunted. Her heart rate was thundering. He could sense her blood circling through her veins, flowing ever so slower in her right arm. A heavy sweetness tanged the air around her, a heavy scent that Avo found himself all too familiar with. She abused joy in her spare time. The nectar-like substance tended to clog up arteries. Avo had been a witness to more than one death from the congealing substance.
She walked over to the front of the holo-haptics controls and struck an icon. The elevator stopped. A breath escaped from her, nervous and shallow.
Hands shaking, she drew from her filth-stained monochrome coat a mirror-plated mask. Taking a few breaths more to steady herself, she held it over her head as if she was about to plunge a dagger into her skull, and only with a final exertion of will did she manage to put it on.
There was a fatalism to her action. A finality. Considering who she worked for, Avo couldn’t blame her. Explained the joy habit too. When your boss could crush your skull and strike at you from any reflection, what respite could spare your nerves from fated lassitude?
Again, a spill of writhing ghosts seeped through the glass, linking to her through the reflection. A voice rumbled out from her, then.
Sonorous. Expected. Mirrorhead.
+Did you appreciate my gift?+ he asked.
Avo didn’t answer immediately. The question was secondary to his interest. Mirrorhead was speaking through this girl. The implications breathed upon the fires of theory. Was the person Avo interacted with on the aerovec even Mirrorhead himself or just another minion–a conduit–for the Syndicate to channel his Heaven through?
Such was a possibility. For all Avo knew, he could have been fighting an advanced synth-sheathe. Just another gateway to Mirrorhead's true power.
+Is this wait contemplation? Or disobedience?+ Mirrorhead asked, his voice dipping ever so lower.
“Thinking,” Avo said. “Implant’s…appreciated. Though bones are lacking. Overtaxes nerves too.”
+Then, it is working as intended,+ Mirrorhead said. +What you have is only a prototype–and a sample of the gifts that I alone can continue to offer. So long as you heel. So long as you obey. Besides: you will be needing this prototype for the task to come.+ Delightful. The Syndicate boss was planning something. The woman mimicked a sweeping gesture that Mirrorhead made a habit of performing; a rising slash with his right arm while the left remained folded behind his back. +I have a use for you. Consider it a test for both you and the implant. Something to tease our viewers. A promotional, if you will.+
“Promotional,” Avo said, trying to keep the weariness out of his voice.
Most entertainments held little sway over Avo's time. He was a creature of task and purpose, made so by biology, augmented so by good habits learned from a caring father. Reviews and tutorials on Metamind sequencing and new phantasmic builds occupied the majority of his streamed content. Applying his learnings to action consumed much of his remaining time. He did find himself following a hunting/cooking hybrid channel called Flesh of the Fall. It detailed hunting aberrant beasts that spawned near major Ruptures caused by Fallen Heavens. Last he remembered, it was put on hiatus after the host got her spinal marrow infested by fractal-wasps after looking in the wrong direction.
+Indeed,+ Mirrorhead said. +New Vultun, as you might understand, is a thirsting city. It thirsts in more ways than one. You, my novel little acquisition, offer it a chance at a new dish; a new cocktail of violence. But first, we must beat the deluge coming from the competition, and thus I need something eye-catching. Something that will send ripples across lobbies acrosses the city. Something controversial.+
Controversial. The way Mirrorhead said those words sounded like the man wanted Avo to attack a nursery. As tasty as new-grown infants were, Walton would have most certainly frowned upon the mass consumption of half-formed babes. Better to wait until they grew a bit and sinned. In time, there was reason enough to find anyone deserving of being devoured.
“What’s the dive?” Avo asked. Traffic began to flow into the locus above, running like trains of thought fueling the brightness of an etheric sun. More eyes were filtering in, drawn to the promise of entertainment like moths, snaking their way beneath the great unseen sin that was the city’s cojoined mind–a grand network of cognition and memory.
+A story with two acts,+ Mirrorhead began. +Something I thought of personally. For you. It is rare that I find my attention occupied by a single individual.+
“Honored,” Avo said, his note of dryness hidden amidst the usual flatness of his tone
+Good. For the first act, I need you to merely follow the directives of an instrument of mine when the elevator doors open. Rantula, she calls herself. I have instructed her to…test your mettle. To take you to the pits. There, you will face your first trials.+
Avo was beginning to suspect that Mirrorhead had the genetic material of a bush-creature spliced into his biology with how much he liked beating around the point.
“The second?” Avo asked.
+When you see what Rantula has done, I wish for you to challenge her for reasons that will be made manifest. Hurt her. Humiliate her. Break her, in front of her peers. But do not kill her. A hatred is to be cultivated. I think there is potential for a heavy rivalry to be seeded between the two of you. Something that will add lingering tension to future storylines between both of you for the good of the Syndicate. Do this, and another reward awaits you. I promise it.+
Avo frowned at how Mirrorhead seemed to be plotting out an extended timeline for this farce. “Her capabilities. What are they?”
+That will be obvious when you greet her. But that is not the question you are interested in, is it?+
“No,” Avo admitted.
+Ah. Well. Put your concerns to rest: you may not assail her with your constructs of memory. This act is to be played out in the flesh. Use anything more than your Mem-Guard and bear my displeasure. It will be a shame to lose something as promising as you so early. But I have suffered other losses in my time.+
Avo was half-tempted to kill himself in front of Mirrorhead right there and then. Drop dead. See if the Syndicate boss would keep prattling on to his corpse. But as enticing as dying to escape the social tumor that was his new boss might be, his Heaven was still filled with Rend. Any death was permanent, according to Draus. No reason to doubt her about that.
An aerovec flashed by outside the outside window, guns blazing, engine screaming. Three missiles streaked after it. A loud blast followed seconds later.
Never change, New Vultun.
The momentary distraction also made Avo realize that he scarcely had any clue as to where he was anymore. He supposed it was a common problem when dealing with someone who could twist space to their whims. To muddy the waters further, he wondered just how much control Mirrorhead held over reflections, and how vast the Syndicate boss’ dominion over glass was.
More questions. More dangers. Not quite on the pan or in the fire, but not far above it either.
Mirrorhead would be watching him. Avo would be watching back. The Syndicate boss couldn’t be omnipotent. Or even omniscient. If he was, he would be matching edges with the other Godclads instead of stomping around these shallow waters.
“I’ll spare her mind,” Avo said, finally his focus catching back up with himself.
+Spare her mind,+ Mirrorhead chuckled with mirth. +How she will hate you, Moonblood.+ The Syndicate boss’ dipped then to a hefty whisper. +Remember: finish your task. And then hurt her once she gives you proper cause. Break her flesh but do not touch her mind. When you are done, all that, to the victor shall go the spoils. And so long as you have the mettle, the temerity, it can all be yours for the taking.+ Heeding Mirrorhead's will, the woman leaned back, as if he basked in his pride for him. +Bear witness. Another reward promised so easily.+
“Generous,” Avo said.
+And let it never be known otherwise,+ Mirrorhead replied. Their thundering voice cracked. The chain of ghosts snapped. Like snakes slithering back into the shallows of a river, the phantasmal sinews drained away into the glass.
With shaking hands, the joy-fiend lifted the mask from her head, face pale and sheened with sweat.
Avo studied her for a moment. Frustration swelted inside him each time he had to speak with Mirrorhead, and frustration he wanted to release. An intrusive thought ignited in him them. He wondered what it would be like to bite into this woman--this drug-fiend--when her substance was still flowing in her. Joy didn’t work on his kind, but perhaps he might just get a secondhand thrill from her flesh.
“The, uh,” she swallowed. “The boss. He’s…gone.”
“I know,” Avo said, his attention sliding away from the glass mask and onto the person beneath like a snake descending a cliff face.
The beast whispered louder to him then, speaking to him with wants posed as questions. What if he activated his Celerostylus now? Could he tear into her faster than anyone could react? Could he feed from her without anyone noticing?
Tear out of the cameras. Frag her memories. Say she went missing.
Avo licked the insides of his cheek, trying not to imagine the taste of her flesh. She still had two organic eyes. They looked invitingly soft and deliciously pearly.
“Should press that button," Avo said. "Now.”
The last bits of his rationality had somehow managed to smuggle the words out despite his want. His claws were twitching, his throat was wet with appetite.
She didn’t need any more encouragement.
As the elevator restarted its ascent, she sank back into the corner, her eyes fixed on him, fingers coiling on an unseen weapon inside her coat pocket. Avo heard the unmistakable sound of a chambered spring.
“I…I saw the stream,” she began. “You were, uh, I–I didn’t think you could do it.”
He just studied her blankly. It always felt awkward for him when a potential meal tried to indulge in small talk. Perhaps it was the clash between his mind understanding that he was dealing with another self-aware creature against his instinctual savagery that wanted its delights.
“Yeah,” Avo said, mind only half-tuned to the conversation “Should inject the other arm instead. Can smell the joy.”
She cupped her right arm as if the limb itself was shy. She was hiding it from him. “I don’t use that much.”
Avo grunted. “So you say. Doesn’t matter to me.”
Her lip quivered. He forced himself an inch back. He wished there was someone else in the elevator with them. Some kind of muscle. A new suspicion kindled itself within Avo, telling him that this too, was Mirrorhead’s doing. Perhaps the woman was meant a reward as well. A post-transplant meal to start the festivities. It fit.
The Syndicate boss knew what he was; understood his impulses. Simply leaving her would be an act transcending the careless into the callous.
This had to be deliberate. She was being used as bait. Like she was an aratnid. Which made Avo the nu-cat in the metaphor. All toys and tools for Mirrorhead to pit against each other. What a delightful company culture his new boss fostered.
“It’s all I got consang.” Her eyes flicked at the glass around them, trying to see if anyone or anything was looking back at her. She swallowed. “Just want to…to forget that I’m being watched.”
“Not judging,” Avo said. The shape of her cheeks reminded him of that of a hog’s belly. He wished Draus was here. The thought surprised him. Short as his time with the Regular was, she provided him with a net. A bulwark against the beast. Someone he could count on to stop him from disgracing Walton.
“Do what you can,” Avo said, barely managing to choke the words out. “Choose better, if you can.”
She shrank into herself, folding against the curved angle of the elevator. The lights above her flickered. Over her, his encroaching shadow loomed. In his periphery, in the glass where she was just staring, he saw spills of saliva running down the side of his cheeks. It was as if he was a passenger in his own flesh, taking a backseat to his basest hunger.
She wasn’t going to stop using. And in her, he saw an echo. They were all only as strong as–
The elevator door rang. He shivered. His Celerostylus fired. The world slowed for a beat. The woman's eyes were only widening. She hadn’t even begun to stumble backward yet. So fast were his senses that he found himself in exile; time courting his mind back into its rightful place as he watched her expression coil into terror.
What was he doing? What was he about to do?
He quelled his new organ. Standard time reasserted itself. The user's hyperventilating breaths ground at his senses, her eyes bloodshot and wide, her fear naked and raw. A cool flush of air flooded the insides of the small space, cupping Avo and dousing the last flames of the beast.
Her lips were quiet but her body screamed, the terror leaking out from her poorly stitched ward. Stiff and still, her fingers were likely clenched around a small switchblade of some kind. Inefficient against him. Inefficient against this city. She couldn’t choose her fate. She couldn’t choose anything. If even a ghoul could take her life from her, then what choice did she ever have?
FATELESS. Choiceless. How close he came to breaking his promise. How weak was he still in will that he could be drawn astray so easily?
Shaking his head, he pulled himself away from her. He caught the closing doors before they could shut and damn him to a certain mistake.
As soon as he looked away, the joy fiend crashed back against the railing, sobbing in relief. The salt of her flowing tears hit his taste buds immediately. The elevator shook. A red light flashed over the elevator’s control interface, warning its passengers not to shake.
“Good…good luck,” she muttered.
Avo didn’t respond, choosing instead to leave. He had done enough to her. She would still have to suffer in the city afterward.
Closing his eyes and releasing a tense breath, Avo looked down as he pressed forward, wondering what tribulation he would have to suffer next.
He made it three steps before he ended up bouncing forehead-first off a jaw made from reinforced titanium.
Stumbling back, Avo looked up and found himself looking up into eight burning eyes. Each one was a different style of implant, a different color, and implanted on the same snarling face. Phys-Sim impact vector flashed red a moment too late. Avo frowned and deactivated the phantasmic with a thought.
Behind him, the elevator doors closed.
It took no second glance for him to know what he was looking at. She was Scaarthian. Her eight and a half feet of height made that clear as the stars' shine. Five skald marks were carved along her bare, musclebound arms through conjoined whorls of complex ritualistic scarification spread up to her neck. Each coiled ridge of tissue was supposed to represent another decade survived. She had five on each arm. Eight industrial-class legs of segmented titanium hissed steam into the air, each as thick as his thigh. They coiled and twitched behind her, bolted into her spine, hydraulics whistling, tips wicked and piercing.
Rantula. As in tarantula. Oh, these chromers and their cute little gimmicks.
The only skin that adorned her face was pasted thinly along her cheeks and forehead. From a single knotted braid swinging down from her flame-mutilated scalp, the fingerbones of creatures she supposedly killed were left as hairpins and mementos.
Looking down, she sneered at Avo, unimpressed. “Was hoping he’d gotten something bigger. Like one of ‘hose No-Dragon Jade-Mastiff nu-dogs.” She leaned down, her putrid breath probably smelling close to his. “They’re sure harder than your like.”
She snorted again and spat a thick gob of phlegm past him, the wet pulp sliding closed doors of the elevator. Avo sighed. One winning personality after another.
“Come along, Moonblood," she said, leading him away. "Can’t let you be late for the performance.”
The Circuits are an easy way to get out of the Warrens. Of course, by easy, I mean either you get recruited and offered a Guilder contract or you end up dead. Either way, cosang, you’ll be well on your way gettin’ a Soul grafted to you or being burned inside a Soul.
Same difference, really.
Circuits come with plenty of variety. Largest pool of recruits comes from the drone-jocks since they don’t tend to fucking die the first time they make a mistake. Getting a second chance at the cost of burning a few thousand imps and all that, but don’t get it twisted, adamantine-hard street squires have and will always be a commodity.
What can I say? Everyone loves a good pit brawl.
-Quail Tavers, School of the Warrens
3-9
Like Dogs on Leashes
If there was one thing Avo hated about these Syndicate types, it was their pointless theatrics. Slaughterman. Rantula. Mirrorhead. Every last one of them had a stupid concept they just wouldn’t let go of. It was like tumbling from into a world where everyone liked buying new clothes for their guns and giving a themselves a new name by slamming two random nouns together or sometimes an adjective.
The paths that Rantula led him down were covered in layers of tarp. Bulged pockets inflated with gusts of wind.
Rantula continued. “See the boss decided to get a new pet.” She folded her arms over her chest. They were twice as thick as his, each muscle natural and not. Scaarthians were modded from times of yore. First by their environment, then by their gods, now by themselves. With Rantula, it looked like she was just the continuation of a repeatedly botched job.
The ground staggered beneath her weight, each step thumping up eruptions of dust. The patterns of the particulates were strange. Looking up, Avo understood why. Bullet holes and poorly threaded wires ran through the ceiling. Flashes of movement cut over the gaps, bobbing to the flow of thoughtstuff. People were upstairs too, heading in the same direction as he was.
Eight burning optics flashed in his periphery. Rantula was glaring right at him. “Can’t say I see what's so special about you. You’s just like any other ghoul I know.”
“Can do the alphabet backward,” Avo said.
She spat again. Didn’t know she hated literacy that much.
The hallways they were walking through were cramped. Dim. Avo heard the distinct chitters of aratnids scampering through the vents. The walls were lined with half-molted battle foam. Instantly deployable cover. Probably leftovers from a gunfight some time back. The walls themselves were lined with an insulating tarp, patches of which swelled with the flowing winds.
The fact that the currents could course this deep into the structure meant a few things. The most likely was that someone–or more likely a wing of drones–put a lot of holes through the block at some point. Probably was a holding point during the last war, now reinfested with gangers and other vermin of the like.
As they went further into the block, two enforcers sharing similar aesthetic implants moved to flank her, peeling out from an intersection they passed. Their inferiority to her was evident: six industrial legs on their backs instead of eight. One was bald. The other had a translucent dome lined with twitching antennae. Probably called themselves something glib, something to do with insects. They were decidedly not-natural born Scaarthians though. They had the scarification but no bones. More evidently, their hearts were beating on the left rather than the right.
Just another questionable piece of Scaarthian biological design. Came unnaturally with a god who enjoyed molding flesh like clay.
“Jareg, Issig, you see our new pet?” Rantula asked.
Annoyingly, the two decided to add a grunting chorus of laughter to her words. It was like a scene from a trashy academia-setting vicarity: watch the rich vat-grown Guilder gang up on the hardworking womb-born wager who was drafted up from the Warrens on their own merits.
Unfortunately, the narrative didn’t echo here. His "bullies" were closer to genetic refuse or scrap metal, and he was a cannibal created by a terror cult trying to retake a homeland that never was. Trying to make a ghoul feel bad from social ostracization was like trying to insult a fish for its lack of wings. Can’t lose something you never had.
Turning, she shot him another glance. Her lip twitched, revealing clenched slab-like teeth. “He’s an ugly one–”
He continued, walking past her. “Which way? Being too slow. Got work to do.”
The faint sneer drained from her visible skin, replaced by the building red of outrage. He didn’t know what she was expecting. Banter? Confrontation? He was a ghoul; she was some half-strand working for Mirrorhead–basically a ganger who had to wear a team uniform. The sooner they could move this along the better.
His daily allotment of patience had long since run dry.
He had no problem getting bloody in the hallway with her, and judging from how her thoughtstuff protruded in oozing clumps from her wards, it was little wonder why Mirrorhead ordered him to keep his mind away from hers.
With how poor her Meta’s build was, he might literally be able to crack her just by dumping an overdose of memories into her.
A metal limb hammered down in front of him, tearing the tarp and chipping plascrete. Debris clicked as they bounced along the floor. Avo stopped to study her implant. He could see the servos, the naked hydraulics inside. A poor choice to leave it so exposed. He wondered how many technicians it took to keep her running.
More importantly, he wondered if it would still work if he lodged something inside the moving parts. Something sharp.
As he studied her limb, she drew closer. He had his new organ tight and prepared to fire. She lowered herself by a few inches to greet him face-to-face, trying to stare him down.
Avo barely suppressed a smirk.
If she thought he was going to look at her and make this a moment, she had another thing coming. These were power games she should’ve played with a human. His only interest in her was in her eventual pain. And taste.
Scaarthians were such a rare delight to sample.
Next to his ear, she drew close, a growl under her breath. Her two walking skin-tags were leaning in behind her, shadowing her as they puffed themselves up, flexing their implants. It reminded him of how nu-dogs had little contests of dominance. If she tried pissing on him, he was going to crack her mind, didn’t matter what Mirrorhead commanded. Smell of piss took too long to fade.
Rantula hissed. “Listen, rotlick. Mirrorhead said–”
Avo stopped listening at that point. Whatever appreciation he had for Mirrorhead’s hiring standards earlier was rapidly leaving him. From Osjane and Osjack to this. Was this the caliber of personality that he had to deal with in the Warrens?
Her breath stank of some kind of seafood as she spoke. Calamari. She wasted a few more sentences and jabbed him in the chest with a finger. A sting of pain followed. Avo looked down to see one of her jagged nails an inch into his chest. He looked back at her, unsurprised at the return of her sneer.
“Calamari,” he said. The sneer went away again. It was like she had two expressions. Sneer for when she was trying to provoke someone. Confusion when someone deviated from her expectations. A cheap locus was probably more complex than her actual mind. “There’s a cafeteria here?”
Her mouth opened and closed. Now she reminded him of the fish he had in his aquarium. Except he didn’t have the urge to flay and wear the mangled heads of his fish as a makeshift dunce hat. “Let’s get things done. Hungry. Want to eat.”
He took a step back and felt her finger slide out of him. He clotted the wound immediately, not wishing to leak anymore in her presence. He didn’t know if her immune system was augmented, but he felt obliged to conduct a murder-suicide if she hatched any ghoullings. Their stupidity would be a shame too great for him to bear.
Without another word, he stepped aside from the limb she had buried deep through the floor. He continued walking until she howled a slur at the back of his head to tell him he was going in the wrong direction. Just like the nu-dog she acted, she pushed herself past him to reassert her place in this little march.
Things returned to a state of acceptable boredom after that.
She still shot him brief glares of malice beneath the swirling lights of neon green as they proceeded toward their destination. Frustration lined her posture. Hers and her two companions. Seemed they might’ve had a conversation with the boss as well. Not hurting the new merchandise and all that.
And with all the reflections lining the ceiling, Avo was pretty sure the boss could've been watching at any moment.
A day ago, he would’ve doubted his odds in a straight fight against any one of them. Now, the Celerostylus gave him options. Fleeing, at the least, was quite reliable. Burning up more of his ghosts, loathe as he was to do so, to use as thought-shivs was also an option.
The path she led him down felt winding, and their echoing footsteps told him of hollow walls. Suspiciously, Avo eyed every reflective substance around him, always waiting for Mirrorhead to step out, to make a new winding speech that went nowhere and said nothing.
Public DeepNav data filtered into his Metamind from the local locus told him this was Mazza’s Junction, another district in the Yuulden-Yang Sovereignty. Maybe only fifty kilometers away from where he landed earlier.
Some eight hundred million people lived in the thirty blocks that comprised this district. He frowned. He remembered the captain that nulled him saying something about Mazza’s Junction, but he guessed she offloaded him a few hundred levels down.
He made note of that. When he managed to free himself, he would need to go back down for another conversation. See what she could offer. And find out what was calling to him on her ship.
The noise began rumbling through the walls. Loud, rhythmic noise. The strumming of screaming guitars called to him in repetitive frets parted between the pounding of war drums while a synthesizer bled into the mix. Faintly, beneath the main instruments, Avo heard the gasping pulses of a fusion burner cutting in and out.
Overhead a holo-sign flicked. It told him that he was departing section-theta, and the arrow ahead pointed toward a long walkway leading into a twenty-foot wide man-made entrance awash with strobing light and gunfire. The Syndicate must’ve knocked down the walls beside the door to make a larger entrance.
Curved around the upper corners of the entrance, a massive mem-tag ebbed in the Nether.
+WELCOME TO THE BRAWL-MALL+
Countless scents wafted down from the path ahead, filtered by long-broken air scrubbers. It smelled like there were thousands of people inside. More interestingly, he smelled something familiar. Something like him. Other ghouls.
Again, was Mirrorhead collecting ghouls? He thought his kind obsolete for war-making.
“Know what a circuit is, rotlick?” Rantula asked, licking her lips with her twin-headed tongue.
“Yeah,” Avo said. He fought the urge to sigh. Wasn’t exactly the same as the Crucible, but it wasn’t much better. The biggest change was that most participants were expected to thrive instead of dying in these circuits. Become gutter-legends; counter-cultural brand names for bored Guilder kids to stick it to their spawners.
That being said, every now and again, a gutter-legend becomes an actual legend by catching the eye of a major player and getting recruited up the Tiers to serve a Guild. Most of the combatants probably thought that they were going to be like the Stormsparrow, with the circuits offering them a straight shot at earning godhood.
With how Stormsparrow fought in her streams, though, Avo questioned if there would ever be anyone else like her. The faint flame inside his chest turned quietly at that thought.
“Can’t go from koi to god,’ Avo muttered. “Was a god to begin with.”
“Hm?” Rantula said, scything a glare at him with three of her many eyes.
“Nothing about you,” Avo replied.
Through the entrance looked to be a vast chamber with the ceiling filled with additional supports of quick-fabbed metal between ugly mounds of hastily sprayed battle foam. Avo realized he was standing in the reused remains of a mall-based gymnasium.
Chromed bruisers loitered here, some cracking combinations against kineti-gel dummies while others sat on grafting chairs as biotechs worked on them. Their sweat stank of excess chemicals and the foulness of over-boosted adrenaline. An over-muscled bruiser benched reps of eight tons by the dozen on a grav-press station. A few of the bruisers were already drenched with gore and dotted with minor wounds; sparring, it looked like.
Against titanium slabs lining a rock-climbing wall beneath the drifting obstacles of an acro-grav course, a dozen disposable Wights bearing holographic targets stood in a loose crowd. Three Conflux enforcers committed to sloppy drills there, firing single bursts from various weapons before switching. Interestingly, they mostly seemed to use gyrojet munitions. Low recoil; high explosive. With each shot that struck, flesh scattered and bodies plumed into mist.
No gauss weapons. Interesting.
“Thinking if any of your kind ended up as targets, Moonblood?” Rantula taunted.
“Doubt it,” Avo said. “Guild policy was to burn us after.”
Looking at the specimens gathered in the room, all Avo could say was that Mirrorhead certainly had the funds for the technical personnel, but the distribution of his resources was uneven, and his enforcers were of a brutal, less disciplined stock.
Specimens like Rantula, so to speak. He caught glares from all the other competitors the same way he did from her. Their half-defended thoughtstuff seethed at the sight of him, rising and falling in little waves of hate.
He understood. They were children of the Warrens. He didn’t doubt that nearly everyone in this room lost family to him and his kind during the war, during the Uprising. He didn’t doubt the only reason why none of them made a run at him.
Mirrorhead.
“Boss said to get you ready for the show now that you’ve been ‘hanced,” Rantula said. She scoffed. “Don’t know why he keeps trying to make snuffers out of you ghouls. No discipline, your lot.” She spat. “Had to kill the last one of you. Lost control. Tried to eat one of my lads. You gonna try to eat one of my lads, Moonblood?”
Avo grunted. “Smells bad. Can find better food.”
The bald peon shot him a look. Avo couldn’t recall which one of them was Issig and which was Jareg. “Hey, fucker. You sayin’ I smell bad or Jareg here?”
“Yes,” Avo agreed.
The bald one glared. “Rantula, this one thinks he got jokes.”
“Didn’t know I was joking,” Avo said, genuinely confused.
The bald one stepped forward, teeth bared. Right into Rantula’s backhand. His head snapped back from the whipcrack of a blow. His nose burst like a fountain. Clutching at his ruined face, he stumbled away, whimpering like the struck nu-dog he was.
Externally, Avo watched the events unfold before him with mock disinterest. Inside, Rantula’s speed–at least her reflexive base speed–had shown itself in part. She was fast for her size. Probably did have some neurachem cooking inside her bloodstream. Unfortunately, all her excess chrome was weighing her down, making her unbalanced. She had to struggle to right herself afterward. His sight traced the arc of her blow even without firing his new implant.
The force, however, spelled out a very clear reality. If she hit him, something was going to break.
When it came time to hurt her, his plan was simple: brick her limbs, hew her heel; work at her from a distance after he found a spear of some kind. No sense in getting into a brawl with her. Still didn’t know how tough she was, or whatever else she had under the cover.
Another reason to sequence an advanced combat scanner into his Metamind. Pre-emptive detection of implants and weapons would probably keep him alive better than any armor ever could.
“Heel,” Rantula said, cutting her bloodied “lad” down with a side-eye. Her other subordinate was smarter. Kept his distance while pouring hate into Avo through his eyes.
“So,” Avo said, proceeding like there wasn’t a stench of humiliation in the air, “how are you going to make…”
His voice trailed off as he caught a familiar scent–a familiar heartbeat. Turning, he watched as a Syndicate enforcer led a figure far smaller than them on a leash made for nu-dogs across the gym. They were headed toward the flashing lights and booming music beyond the glazed glass of the automatic doors.
Toward where Avo guessed the circuit was to occur.
Stepping past Rantula again, Avo ignored her curses as he tried to get a better look at the figure. Even from behind, his wretched form was unmistakable. He could still smell it on him: the blood of the boy. It clung to him like a cloud of unbreaking death, the trauma boiling his thoughtstuff into absolute placidity.
Like everything inside him was past the point of ruin.
“Wait,” Avo called out.
The enforcer shot him a look, and, licked their teeth over their incisors, mocking his fangs. The father, neck collared with studded shock coils, only made enough of a turn to reveal the side of his face.
It was as if only then did Avo behold him for the first time. So hard had he tried to forget the useless man in the Crucible that he cast the father and the boy’s faces from his mind. He had not wanted to burden himself with their humanity, made to dream of them like he did Walton.
He did not feel. Not as humans did. But he knew regret, and the memories of his failures bore him more sour than secondhand injections of emotion ever could.
“Oh,” the father smiled. His lips curled up. His eyes stayed dead. “Artad blesses me again this day. You are alive, Avo. Alive and well.”
Avo doubled his pace toward the father, knowing that he would not be able to reach the man in time. That was fine. He had another goal. Ahead, the enforcer clenched a fist as currents flowed down the wire of the leash. The father did not cry out, but his body did spasm, and his eyes did roll. Cruelly, his overseer held a moment longer than was needed.
Wet stains ran down the father's pant legs. The man had relived himself.
“Flat,” Avo growled, “he’s a flat. Can’t take it. He can’t take–”
Behind him, the ground cracked to a chorus of screaming hydraulics. A shadow shot into the air. Rantula. As expected. Avo fired his Celerostylus. The world brightened, and the gears governing the pace of time ground against his surging synapses, coming to a near halt.
Spinning on his heel, he dug his claws into the plascrete and dashed toward the impromptu gun range. In the room, all the enforcers reacted with varying speeds, the fastest of amongst only barely on par with him. A faint crackle of pleasure burned inside Avo. For all the pain of dealing with Mirrorhead, this implant almost made it worth it.
Almost.
Bounding on unsteady legs, he ignored a sharp snap in his left leg as he slid knee first into the ankles of one of the gunners turning to shoot him. His hyper-accelerated mass greeted the enforcer’s ankle in a popping crackle. Something was broken. Another problem with these gutter types. All bone and muscle, no ligament protection; less aesthetic to have smart-gel cartilage than bone-lacing.
As the enforcer toppled, their face a blooming howl of pain, Avo shook away the spots in his vision as the heat built. He seized his falling prey by the neck in one hand and caught their falling gun in the other. Next time he did this, he would make his Metamind manifest a timer.
Twisting his hip, he launched them backward. They careened, arms whipping wildly from the sudden thursut, and slammed back-first into their other two cohorts.
Avo didn’t press the attack. Not even as they all went down. Instead, he shouldered the only thing that would truly give him some breathing room once he quelled his Celerostylus.
A gun.
Picking up the weapon that his most recent victim dropped, its specs began flashing into his mind, its ghosts lacing with his. It had a small locus embeded, something to compensate for his nonexistent shooting skills. Good that he had some experience with the Mirrashard Draus gave him. Would’ve looked a fool trying to figure it out now.
IYYGUA-2O RECOILLESS ORDINANCE RIFLE
Twenty shots. High explosive. Rated to shred nine hundred and fifty millimeters of armor in a single shot. Currently condition-yellow: some maintenance needed. These enforcers were filthy.
Avo spun around, raising the gun barely in time to plant the barrel against Rantula’s throat. Her eight limbs froze scant inches away from closing around him.
A headache spiked, feeling as if nails were emerging from his eyes. He stopped tensing his Celerostylus. It took most of what he had not to drop his gun from pain. It took the rest of what he had to hide the fact that he was in pain at all.
The room was tense, but not silent thanks to someone wailing about their broken ankle. The remaining enforcers were standing, weapon implants bared and fists clenched. The biotechs, meanwhile, were making as fast they could for the doors.
Rantula’s face broke into a snarl. “Fuck me, Moonblood. Boss wasn’t lying when he said he gave you the good shit.”
Avo responded by spitting phlegm on the ground next to her. “He needs to go.”
She backed away from him slowly, hands raised. “Trust me, I’m not interested in a soft-belly like him. Not even a little. But the boss has found a use for him so…” She shrugged. “Hey, hey, ghoulie. We’re all dogs here. Nu-dogs, heeding the hand that feeds us. You know you can’t help him. Mirrorhead’s got a use for him now. Best you can do is let him go.”
The headache was receding. Slowly. Avo counted the number of enforcers in the room. More than twenty shots. Good thing he had more than one gun to use. Flicking a glance at the father, he reactivated his Phy-Sim and began estimating impact trajectories. He would have to kill Rantula first. Her threat was clear–
“Avo,” the father said, lifting his hands in a near shrug. “It is well. It is well. I am fine with it being this way. I…I don’t care. It doesn’t hurt. I don’t care.” The man laughed. "I don't care."
“Deserve to be free,” Avo said. “That was promised. You were supposed to get into city. Survived Crucible.”
A crackle of laughter came from Rantula. “Deserve. Fucking crackling me the fuck up ghoulie, shit.” The laugh drained out of her eyes as her voice rose to a braying roar. “What fuck do you think 'deserves' got anything to do with our lives?”
“Doesn’t,” Avo admitted. “Should.”
“Jaus. A fucking ghoul optimis–”
“No,” Avo stopped her. “Not optimist. Just honest. Seen the way you live. He deserves better.”
And there it was. He needed her to understand. This wasn’t her world. Her miserable little life didn’t mean any more than he did up the Undercroft, where contracts and agreements were enforced by the Paladins.
New Vultun wasn’t about optimism, cynicism, or any ideology. At its heart, New Vultun was enforcing it. Whatever that it may be.
A dark shadow passed over Rantula’s face. “That gun’s got–”
“Twenty shots.”
“You’re holding it wrong.”
“Linked to the ghosts.”
“You’ll miss.”
“Not this close.”
She glared at him. He stared past her, keeping an eye on the father.
Sighing at the struggle, the man gave him a nod. What was he doing? “I appreciate all you did for my son. I will tell him of you when I see him. Again. Again. Again.”
And so the metaphor played on. The father tugged on his leash, and, like a nu-dog asking to be walked, was led out into the flashing neon of the mall proper.
Avo, struck by the sight, just stared, gun frozen in hand.
“All that for nothing, huh,” Rantula said, shooting a victorious grin at the door that the father just left.
Avo grunted his non-answer. For the first time, he met Rantula’s gaze. “Still need to get me ready?”
Her sneer returned. “Nah. You look plenty ready enough to me.”
Before this day was over, he was going to make a victim of her.
Making the ghouls was a mistake. I see that now more than ever. During…when we were trying to liberate Old Noloth, we wanted something that would spare the people. Something that we could make easily. A… mass-producible bioform like the No-Dragons had.
No. No, we didn’t get the bio-template from them. We made the ghouls ourselves.
How? I…you need to find a Low Master to tell you that–I…I was just an Acolyte. I was just following scripture. I didn’t want this to happen–I didn’t mean for so many to die.
Trust me, if it were up to me, every last ghoul would be dead. They were a mistake. They were a mistake.
-Paladin interview of Acolyte Sewe Agwar, Former Low Cultist
3-11
The Flesh of My Brothers
Avo kept the gun with him. He might have Mirrorhead’s protection, but the strength of orders and contracts got real soft when some over-chromed street butchers decided their feelings were hurt.
The enforcers had their eyes on him all the way. Like moving slabs of metal, they all faced him from a center profile. In a sense, they were peacocking at him. Some of them sprang blades out as he passed by, ostensibly to test if their implanted aug worked. The lifter added more tons to their grav-bench, the mag-chains laced to the size of the bar ensuring more stability.
Rantula, true to her habits, just stared, eyes fixed on Avo like the spider she wanted to be.
The discomfort stayed even after they finally opened the doors to lead him out.
Before Avo was a place awash with sound, light, and roaring bloodlust. Not so different from the Crucible, besides the fact that all here were of Conflux, each individual bearing a mirrored mask on their hip, marking them with Mirrorhead’s favor.
The mall, if Avo could even call it that anymore, stood bifurcated along with the rest of the structure, a gouge of glass running clean through its expanse, scar doubtless left by an instrument of heat. Overhead, pulsing lights spilled from hovering drones while guitars growled on from pillar-sized speakers. From a deck a hundred levels high, tides of humanity lined the stories below, their implants shining, their thoughtstuff clotting into a blended flurry.
This was to be an experience shared. An experience conjoined. The festivities of the circuit called back to times of old, back when the gods did reign and lives were offered in sacrifice and supplication in colosseums made vaster by myth.
At the very bottom of the stairs, the growing gradient of decks lining the intact section of the mall sank before a crude moat bridged by a cracked billboard. Beyond the billboard rose massive pylons that arced with a constant thrum of volts. Within its confines of the electric cage, a place that used to be a food court greeted Avo with all its typical properties. Extendable tables. Holo-ads. Service wights still shambling around, dressed in mocking referee’s garb.
Right now, two enforcers were messily brawling in the center, hammering each other with blows that would have liquefied most baseline creatures. Smears of blood and the remains of dead bioforms drenched the floor. Avo smelled some nu-dog. Guess they had a war-variant in play earlier.
Crowning the arena itself was a massive hologram showcasing the prize that awaited the participants that drew the most views. It was a newly acquired exo-rig. Nightmantis. In the corner next to its blinking blueprints was a mem-code. After a second of staring, Avo copied its data into his Metamind and let them run in his mind’s eye.
A remembrance played. The body the memory was hosted in stared at the exo-rig with admiring eyes.
The Nightmantis wasn’t particularly large, lined in small cells of hexagonal plating that made it look more like a shelled bioform than the literal tanks that most enforcers preferred. What it did have was a jump-jet system and a ZKS-89 precision cannon attached to its back. Three thin glares of light shone through its armor-splined faceplate. Behind it, a prehensile echo-pulser granted it full spectrum awareness.
Each quality and function lined itself to a specific part of the armor. This was a demo, then. Something to entice the vicious and savage like luxury voidships and custom demiplanes did for bored Guilders and celebrities back up the Tiers.
Avo could see the appeal, but the appeal was still beneath him. If he was in visual range of someone he intended to snuff, something had gone terribly wrong. Now if the prize offered was a suite of fully sequenced combat phantasmics made by Ori-Thaum, he too might be as excited as those around him.
Still, having an exo-rig made up for some of his other deficiencies. Made him harder to kill. Better he take it off the hands of his competitors than be faced with it in active combat down the line.
“Ain’t gonna be yours, ghoulie,” Rantula said, her voice taunting. “Doubt you know how to use it anyway.”
They were standing on opposite corners of the staircase, both eyeing the other from their periphery. Twenty feet of distance separated them and Avo wanted twenty more if only so he could be in front of a speaker. The beast inside him was screaming loud now, its belly full of unslaked savagery from earlier when he didn’t tear into Rantula.
Frankly, being boxed in by so many Syndicate goons wasn't making his mood any better.
A loud crack echoed out from the area, followed by a roar of agony. Looking down, it looked like one of the brawlers had won. Snapped the left leg of their opponent in half. A strange show of sportsmanship and caring surprised Avo afterward, when the victor lifted the loser out in their arms, laughing all the while.
Might’ve been doing it for the spectators. Might not have.
War drums began to thunder around him as the next match was announced. The speakers behind him crackled.
“Alright you bloodthirsty savages,” the announcer growled. Her voice was, honestly, too high for her to achieve the desired effect. But she was trying. And hard. “It’s time for our next event, specially requested by the one, the only, Rantula!”
Rantula lifted her arms–all of them–and flexed. From the decks below, hundreds of Conflux personnel cheered while spectators clapped. She turned to Avo as the announcer droned on.
“Time to give up the gun,” Rantula said, holding her hand out, expecting him to just hand his weapon over. “Don’t worry. I won’t hurt you. Yet. The boss wants this to be a personal affair down the line between me and you. You’re gonna be up in a minute.”
He stared past her blankly. “Still haven’t told me what I need to do.”
She grinned. “It’ll be obvious, ghoulie.”
“Alright.” Avo bent the gun. It cracked down the middle. Rantula frowned at his act. Good. Best that she was confused. With a grunt, he cracked the magazine open as well, letting most of the ammo spill out.
While her attention was pulled by the falling clatters of micro-rockets, he cupped the two left and hid them in his fist.
“Careful,” Avo said, as multiple enforcers backed away around him, cursing, “might go off. Should get someone to clean them up.”
They would be useful for what he planned later. The only problem was that his temp-skin undersuit was too shredded to hold anything anymore–it dangled from his upper body in tatters. He would have to replace it with something more rugged, more–
Avo noticed an unattended synth-leather jacket bedecked in plates of rusted metal hanging over a nearby chair. He reached over and took it.
Owner was probably someone he would eat anyway. He put it on and found his arms far too long for the sleeves. A common problem for most clothes he wore; had to get them custom-made. Still, it fitted him well enough. He slipped his two micro-rockets into its inner pocket.
“You just steal a jacket?” Rantula asked, her confusion growing.
“Yes,” Avo said.
“...and for our next vic–uh–contestant, one of the survivors of last night’s Crucible! Offered to the circuit under Rantula’s recommendation, give it up for Essus Sibupan!”
An ensemble of jeering cheers rose as Avo narrowed his eyes. Down, standing right in front of the pylons, the father stood. The enforcer had already taken the man's collar off and handed him a steel-headed cudgel far too heavy for a flat to bear.
Yet, like a hollow puppet, the man dragged the weapon behind him as he moved forward. The electric field dropped. The father–named Essus–entered to find an end to his pain.
The end didn’t take long to come.
The smell betrayed them first; their hissing voices after. Stepping to the edge of the top deck, Avo saw an oozing cluster of boiling thoughtstuff, the wavelength of violence and bloodlust so familiar to him as it mirrored his baseline.
From the other side, beyond the rumble, the pylon's dropped their field as pale monsters bound over tables and tore into the wights.
Ghouls. They had unleashed ghouls on a flat.
“There,” Rantula said, pointing down at the ghouls encroaching on the father. “That’s your task. Moonblood. Go fetch.” Her grin was ugly and wide and made Avo want to do violent things.
Unafraid, the father walked forward, hammer raised sloppily overhead. One of the ghouls noticed his weakness and flicked a claw over the man’s leg. The father toppled over howling with pain. His cries only grew louder when he dropped his weapon on himself.
Some watchers laughed. Some yawned. Almost all were content to watch the ghouls savage the flat.
Almost.
Avo moved, leaving Rantula behind as he drove down the steps in a dead sprint. Glasses of mead and cups filled with questionable contents shattered against his back as certain watchers pelted him, baptizing him with their disdain. He cared not.
Below, the father fought like a man already dead, swinging from the ground, but never scoring a hit. With each miss, the ghouls took more pieces out of him, sampling handfuls of his flesh between bouts of screeching laughter.
Thank the dead gods these brothers of his were more brutal than practical.
His unbelievably, incomparably stupid brothers.
Avo fought the urge to fire Celerostylus immediately. Such an act would be one of wasted haste. What kept the father alive was the ghouls' penchant for cruelty; his body would serve as sustenance enough, but pain was a flavor unto itself. If Avo burned through his reflexes now, the best case was a five-on-one against him.
Not good.
Ahead, someone stuck out a leg, trying to trip him. Avo drove his heel claw down into their ankle and twisted. He left them screaming as he pushed off their bleeding limb. As people in the deck below turned to look up at the commotion, he snatched a bottle of liquor from a messy table.
He had need of the drink, but no want to actually taste it. Instead, he was going to use it as an offering.
The enforcer who walked the father on the leash looked thirsty.
The chromed-out bruiser waited there for Avo just before the billboard bridge leading to the pylons. The enforcer just stood there, whistling while he spun the father’s shock collar on a finger like it was a hoop. Closer now, Avo could see the main had a holographic mohawk projected from his skull and two flashing imp-signs where their eyes should be. They grinned, upper teeth spelling “hard” while the bottom said “fucka.”
“You’re late–” That was as far as the enforcer got before a bottle of liquor broke against his face. Yelping, he toppled back, dropping the shock collar. “Rot-fucking–”
Avo snatched up the collar before it could hit the floor and clamped it around the enforcer’s neck. The chromer was unprepared; stunned by the bottle and blinded by the liquor. The situation was made worse when said liquor was ignited by Avo clenching the shock trigger. Surging volts danced up the leash, beckoning pitched wails from the enforcer as he gripped at his neck.
Avo wasn’t interested in a fight. Avo just wanted him dead. With a kick, Avo pushed his newest victim across the bridge into a sparking pylon. Whips of lightning lashed into the enforcer’s flesh, coaxing a spray of flame from his faux-hawk as his implant malfunctioned. Gleaming red, his optics burst while his howling cries grew louder than the droning music. Pale-white synthblood pooled from his ears as Avo listened to implants popping inside the Syndicate goon’s flesh, skin bulging with every burst.
THAUMIC CYCLER: 24 thaum/c
GHOSTS - [35]
The cheering cries for bloodlust had choked off in the deck behind, the jubilation of their thoughtstuff now betrayed by rising horror and indignance. They came here thinking they were going to kill and not be killed. But they forgot themselves. Violence didn’t play favorites; anyone and everyone could be a victim or an agent.
All it took was a simple choice.
Stepping up to the electric field, Avo waved impatiently, trying to get someone to drop it. On the other side, a sickening slap echoed.
The father tumbled head-first across the floor before Avo. A chorus of sibilant laughter and encroaching shadows drew closer, the ghouls themselves hidden behind the pylon that was still cooking the enforcer.
The field shut down with a crackling fritz. Avo stepped forward, halting his brothers in their tracks. As soon as he crossed, the field flickered back on, sealing him in. Hummed static danced across his skin.
Timed perfectly, the drums began a climb to a steady crescendo, the echoes of the beats ringing down from on high. It was a vulgar thing of marketing, to paint him as an arriving savior after he just killed someone, but who was he to deny others of their delusions?
Sniffing the air, his brothers studied him, the largest of the group–the firstborn to emerge from the nest–leading them, claws already dipped in the red of the father’s blood. Avo guessed he must have struck them as a strange sight to behold. One of their own, yet not dressed like them, not sharing their stance, not tearing into the flat as easy feeding.
“Brother,” the firstborn hissed. This one was a creature of respectable size, even compared to the standards of their kind. If Avo’s muscles were like layered ropes, this one had tires instead. “Our prey…ours!”
The other four clawed the ground, hissing and screeching at him with spittle flying and fangs bared. One threw a handful of loose flesh at him. Avo tilted his head and let the giblet sail past.
The firstborn and his brothers were five of a nest. Their features and movements were too similar to make Avo suspect otherwise. The Syndicate had dressed them in gore-soaked skins of synth-leather stitched with Old Nolothic runes. Runes that amounted to gibberish since the sigils were all in drawn random sequences. Bloodied entrails clung to the ghouls’ bodies as well, flapping from them like dripping dresses of offal.
What a joke this was. In Conflux’s attempt to instill his kind with greater savagery, they ironically pulled his brothers further away from their nature. Most of his kind wore no clothing and bore no ornaments. It was the will of the Low Masters that they died clean and bare. It was their own will to have their skin be caked in the flowing crimson of their prey.
The father was crawling along the linoleum floor, a bloodied pulp of a man hissing shallow breaths. Still, he groped along the ground, looking blindly for his weapon.
Avo understood. The man wanted death. He had little left but death. But dying at the hands of a ghoul was no death at all. If the man wanted to seek an end, he should claim by his own hands, not in this macabre game of amusement that others inflicted upon him. That seemed right to Avo. What Walton would have wanted.
“No,” Avo said. “He’s his own. A survivor; Crucible champion. Not for you. Not for anyone else.”
The firstborn studied Avo, their head tilting, trying to gauge his odds in a fight. Stupid as most ghouls were, their stupidity was less a matter of lacking intelligence and more a problem of crippled impulse control; less that they couldn’t think, more that they seldom did.
With the firstborn, the thinking didn’t last long. It fixed the twitching arm of the sizzling enforcer with a look. The corpse was now melding flesh-first over the metal, like a fly on a zapper. The smell was divine. Avo wished he could take a bit from the body without getting shocked.
“Share,” the firstborn said, barely managing to work out the words through his seething hate. The ghoul was twitching with barely bottled energy. He pointed at the father again. The man was trying to pull himself up using a table. “Share him.”
Avo laughed. “Share?”
The firstborn bared its fangs. “Will let you have arm. Little. Brother. Choose which.”
Avo sighed, struggling not to snarl at his brothers. Gods, how stupid they were. Gods, how diminished they made him feel. Why? Why was he the only of his kind who could see them for what they were? See them for how they acted. Was it all Walton, then? That which made him more than this mockery of sapience gathered before him? All impulse. All want. No control.
Here they were, performing not for their original cause, but for a new master all the same. And unlike him, all that was needed to cajole them into function was just live prey.
All the power to think, and none of the want to do it.
The Low Master should have made his kind animals.
“Forgetting the alternative,” Avo said.
“Alt-alter–” The firstborn growled, infuriated by his inability to say the word. “What you mean?”
“Why share him,” Avo continued as if it was the most obvious thing in the world, "when you five are more than plenty?”
Avo fired his Celerostylus.
The firstborn twitched back, freezing as a coursing bolt of electricity lit his skin, looking as if ivory beneath naked moonlight. The other four moved no faster, their pace clenched to a near halt, bade to stillness in Avo’s perception. By fractions of inches, they moved, unprepared for what was to come. And by fractions of a second, he would part them from this world.
Striding, he wasted no time stepping past the father to claim the cudgel. It was an ugly thing–a clump of thick steel on a rusted pipe. Felt like it weighed over a hundred pounds. Little wonder why the father couldn’t even hold it well.
But a ghoul could. With a weapon in hand, Avo proceeded to his task.
What followed was no fight, and could never be considered one. A fight entailed someone fighting back, capable of a struggle.
There was no struggle in the moments that followed.
Avo struck. The firstborn’s head pulped inward, brain matter spewing loose from a fissuring skull. The rival ghoul didn’t even know how he died–likely didn’t see how he died. The last thing the firstborn probably remembered was a blur of motion.
Then nothing.
Carried on rising bloodlust and momentum, Avo tore into the rest of his kind, hissing, cudgel rising and falling. The tendons in his arm tore and ripped amidst his swinging onslaught. He didn’t care.
The survivors of the nest died. Their heads folded behind their necks at unnatural angles. Fangs were shattered. Skulls burst. But always, Avo made sure to crush their brains. Anything less was to leave a chance for a ghoul to mend and rise again.
As he brought the final blow through the forehead of his last brother, a discord roiled inside him. How easy this was. How base was his kind. Three real seconds had not passed yet. His mind wasn’t even burning. Why then, did the Low Masters make his kind? For combat? Look how parted he was from their weakness with but a single alteration. What worth were they against the alloyed peoples, against machines armed with gauss and fire?
They never had any chance to win the war. None. To the Guilders, they were nothing but fuel for a Soul. To the Warrens, they were just monsters that never should have been.
Avo quelled his Celerostylus. Time resumed its pace. His arms fell by his sides, limp, the cudgel bouncing from his grasp. Around him, five skulls finished splattering apart, the bodies collapsing almost synchronously, their deaths timed to perfection.
THAUMIC CYCLER: 29 thaum/c
GHOSTS - [42]
A new flick flashed inside him. The mass of his Liminal Frame was expanding. Growing. One more, and he would have his Hell.
Roaring cheers and calls for an encore came up in the crowds. Drifting ghosts called out his stage name, cheering him on for his “nobility” for defending the father.
The father. Essus.
Turning, Avo saw the man he came to defend leaning against a chair, looking at him. Sobbing. His heartbeat was pulsing a near-constant. Blood and snot poured down from his nose.
“I wanted it to end,” the father whispered.”I just wanted it to end.”
There were words that could have been said to this man. Words that could coat his pain with comfort, at least temporarily. Avo knew nothing of those words. The best he could do was cut the boy from his memories with the right phantasmics. Remove the pain altogether.
But something in the father’s face told Avo that forgetting was never going to be in the cards.
“There you have it, consangs! Moonblood! The good-ghoul! The one! The only of his breeding!” The announcer coughed briefly. “Hatched not from the flesh of basest-beast, but a fallen saint of absolute virtue–one bearing the Will of Jaus! Praise him! Praise the Moonblood! Glory to his strength. Glory to his humanity! Praise him…”
Searing aches ran down his arms. His joints and sinews healed, reknitting after the exertion he put them through. Bringing a shaking claw up, Avo looked at his bloodied hands, and between his claws, at the bodies of his brothers.
“Humanity,” he said, laughing mostly to himself.
He glanced at the father again. The man was broken. Weary. Wounded. He needed to leave. He needed medical attention.
Avo needed to bring this night’s affairs to a close. Turning, he pointed out at the crowd. Time to give Mirrorhead what he wanted so he could see this day done.
“Praise me another way,” he called out. The crowds went silent. Floating Specters splashed their rapt attention down from on high, bathing him beneath a hundred thousand eyes. “Praise me by giving me Rantula!”
He pointed up, right where Rantula was. He knew she would answer. She thought she wanted this as much as he did. She was wrong.
“Forced a flat to fight your games,” Avo said. “A survivor. Now without a son. Did my part. Now you fetch.”
A rift opened amongst the watchers. The enforcers in the decks scoffed and spat with indifference and scorn. The Specters bled rank horror at the accusal. Two different worlds. To the latter, the father became a full person the moment he made it into the city–someone who by survival–should have earned a spot in the citizenship roster. Such was the opinion of those bearing Massist political leanings, anyway.
The enforcers on the other hand were just backing up their own.
Snarling with laughter, Rantula descended, her steel-tipped boots ringing loud with each step. She rolled out her arms and extended her spider legs. With a sudden push, she thrust herself high into the air, leaping forth from the heights of the deck and darting into the air. On the same limbs, she landed, shards of linoleum flaring out in a tide.
Avo pre-emptively fired his reflexes again and stepped in front of the father. The soft tips of the shrapnel pierced his skin slightly but penetrated no deeper. He halted his reflexes. As the dust settled, he walked over to reclaim the cudgel he dropped, keeping his eye fixed on Rantula’s thoughtstuff. His arms were healing, but he could still feel a throb ebbing through them.
He would need to make his swings count. His tendons weren’t built for how hard his muscles could twitch in tandem with the Celerostylus.
A titanium leg drew a semi-circle through the debris as the curtain of dust lifted. Rantula stood behind the fog, greeting Avo with a grin. She bore a bronze hammer in her arms the size of Avo’s body.
He stared at his cudgel and suddenly found it wanting.
“Scare you that much?” Avo asked
“Nah,” Rantula said. “Just want to make sure you stay down after I tap you. Mirrorhead said he don’t want you dead–hells, I’m willing to bet he told you he wanted the same fucking thing for me, yeah?”
“Yeah.”
Rantula nodded. She flipped out her lower lip and shrugged with a hand. “Suppose I won’t go for your head, then. Feed you your brothers after I’m done so you’ll get all better. After.” Her lip curved up. “But I am gonna kill the flat.”
Avo grunted. “Won’t crack your mind. Promised Mirrorhead. Won’t feed you my brothers if I win. But I am going to make you beg.”
Rantula snorted derisively. “Clever ghoulie. Clever fucking ghoulie.” She spat, shouldering her hammer. “You’re smart. You. Are. Smart. Even I can tell that.” Her mechanical limbs rose into a slow shrug. “But it ain’t gonna change anything. You might got some fancy new reflexes, but you’ll get tired. And when you do…”
She brought a leg down and buried it deep into the ground.
Avo grinned. He could still feel the two micro-rockets in the pocket of his new jacket. Little did she know, his thinking ahead was going to affect everything. She would live. He wouldn’t touch her mind either. Not phantasmally.
But when he was done, the enforcers in the stands would beg him to grant her mercy.
Alright, I’m going to say this one more time for you half-strands that won’t stop asking about it: do not…you hearing me? Do. Not. Implant yourself with assault-grade chrome.
You wanna know why people call it assault-grade chrome? Because most implants of that kind probably belong better on a drone. And you’re not a drone. You’re a street squire. Least I hope you are–don’t know why a drone-jock will be taking any advice from me.
As street squires, your biggest advantage is that you’re high-speed and no-drag. You engage and disengage. Push in. Mark something. Snuff someone. Get out. The moment your chrome pushes you past the two-ton mark is the moment that you stop being no-drag and start being a logistical liability.
The heavy lifting should be done by your rig, not your body. Your body should be oriented for speed and survivability, not raw durability–and certainly not layered in heavy weapons.
Why not?
I–you—tell me, juv, how many calories do you consume in a day? How many nutriboosters can you shoot up in a row without emptying your stomach? Whatever you say, it ain’t enough to fuel 2 tons of alloy, a neuro-op system, and however many heavy weapons you want to graft into yourself.
I swear to Jaus, you fuckin’ kids are nuts these days. You keep thinking about how you can make yourselves assault drones or tanks when they already bloody exist!
-Quail Tavers, School of the Warrens
3-12
To Joust a Spider
Rantula’s metal legs twitched, rearing at Avo as a spider might as she slowly circled him. Randomly, she would strike the ground, chipping chunks from the floor in an effort to get him to flinch, to prematurely fire his reflexes.
He thought it appropriately dog-like of her to play these games. She was hoping to burn his nerves out before the fight even started. It wasn’t a bad plan. The problem was Avo had a measure of her pace already–an advantage she betrayed when she struck her subordinate earlier.
As such, he kept thirty feet between them, mirroring the arc of her movements. Inside, Avo coaxed his inner beast. He wouldn’t be able to keep it chained forever, but his earlier slaughter of the enforcer and his brothers had sated it, if only slightly. Now, deaf to the rising jeers of the crowd, he waited for Rantula to break first.
He’d keep his Celerostylus quiet until after she moved. Then, he would begin by crippling her.
Tension was building through her body; she gripped her hammer’s handle so tight her fingers grew pale at the tips. Her optics were narrow pinpricks, all eight locked on his form while they paced, circling each other. Then, he caught one flicking over to the father before swiveling back to him.
Rantula grinned.
Avo glared.
Wasn’t hard to guess what she wanted to try. She probably got the idea from Little Vicious when she finally trapped Draus using the boy as bait. Poetic, in a sense, but it made her plan obvious.
Avo adjusted his cudgel. “Go for it.”
“You know what,” Rantula said, licking her hammer, “I think I just might.”
Two of her spider-legs descended, digging deep through the material of the floor and flinging outward toward the father, hammer raised, voice roaring. Avo fired his Celerostylus. She slowed, her pace stymied as if she was pushing through a pool of water. Still, she was faster than his brothers. Fast enough that he wasted no time in enacting his own strategy.
If she wanted to steal a trick from Little Vicious to use on him, he would pull one of his old tricks on her as well. Avo moved, striding first to tear a pulp of flesh from the savaged remains of one of his brothers before pushing for her. The father was leaning against a gore-coated table, his head tilting all too slowly to even see the descending hammer.
But that wasn’t all Rantula had prepared.
Avo activated his Phys-Sim, numerical data spilling from her moving limbs as dissolving strands within his perception. Rantula, for all her obvious stupidity, had a low cunning. Her hammer wasn’t the only thing giving off velocity markers, for her spider legs had reacted, shortening as potential energy began to build up within, the hydraulics ringing loud even with his heightening perception of time.
She closed. Eighteen feet and falling, her legs and hammer extending her reach by another eight. Ten feet in function. Avo wouldn't make it in time. He didn’t have to.
Cupping the handful of flesh, he called a trajectory lane with his Phys-Sim and cast it loose along the calculated arc. Dripping viscera sailed free of his hand, a fracture rattling through his index finger. Avo winced. All that force concentrated on one digit was more than the bone could take; needed to favor his other hand when using his weapon.
Like a pebble of trailing crimson, the pulp of flesh darted closer and closer toward the plotted point of intersection with Rantula’s head, her face barely turning in time to reveal her surprise. One of her metallic legs pushed forward to deflect, but too late. Red burst across her face as the pulp of flesh disintegrated into a misting cloud, doing its job.
A furious cry free from Rantula’s lungs. Blinded, she swung with her hammer, missing the father by a full foot. Her alloyed legs speared, shredding naught but air and the edge of a table.
Avo felt a simmer of heat radiating from the center of his skull. The clock was ticking. Three feet between him and the father; four before another one of Rantula’s wild swings came into impact radius. Avo caught the father by the collar and shoved the man onto the ground.
Just in time for his Phys-Sim to wail. Avo shifted back, angling just as an extending segment of titanium plunged through the rippling air where his head was.
A stinging pain flared along the side of his skull. One of Rantula’s legs had opened a thin slice on his scalp as she shot past him, her momentum guiding her down toward the moat. Hissing, he spun and brought his hammer down on the back of her calf before she was out of range.
He struck, and felt a vibration flood through his hand, his broken digit flaring with pain. It felt like he was hitting a mountain, her muscles akin to veins of ore. His blow had all but bounced off. Snarling, he hit her twice before the burning cauldron inside his skull made him stop.
Backing away, he dragged the father with him as he retreated, watching the distance grow between him and Rantula as she landed in a rising spray of fragments, waiting until the thirty-foot boundary was reestablished before releasing his Celerostylus.
His hold on time dissolved. Spiking pain twisted through his skull. His knees and his elbows felt like someone had been hitting him with a hammer instead the other way around.
Across the foot court, Rantula turned around, rubbing the back of her right leg as she crackled. “That was dirty, ghoulie. Dirty. But you got the swing of a flat.”
As she turned, he focused his Phys-Sim on her. Numbers flooded his awareness, and he got his confirmation: mass was resting more on her left now. She wasn’t nearly as unaffected as she acted.
“Pretty quick though,” she said, wiping the blood from her augmented eyes. “Nice to have speed advantage for once in your life, ain’t it? Shame ‘bout them bones and sinews though. Too soft. Too weak.”
He was only half listening to her. He plotted his next course of action. The cudgel was barely enough to bruise her calf. Would be entirely useless against her torso and head with all the subdermal lining. Could continue targeting the same leg. Force her to walk on her spider implants, and reduce her vectors of lethality; force her to leave one of her exo-limbs planted long enough for him to drop his micro-rockets into the exposed hydraulics.
Yeah. He thought that could work. Inside his head, the throbbing ache was beginning to recede, but barely. He wouldn’t be able to keep his reflexes boosted for twenty seconds this time, but maybe there wasn’t the need.
Maybe instead of using the Celerostylus across extended durations, he should fire it in bursts. Accelerate his reflexes at specific instants to reduce injury and improve control. Rantula was fast. Fast enough to react to him. Not fast enough to catch him. And like the golem, inertia had levied a tax on her mass.
He could make this work.
“...and when I’m done, this time you’re gonna finish watching the ghoullings hatch from his corpse!” Rantula snarled.
He studied her steaming breath, swaying hammer, and twitching implants. Somehow, it looked like she managed to cause more rage in herself while taunting him. Detriments of an unstable personality.
“Sorry. Need you to repeat,” Avo said. It was a virtue, being honest. “Wasn’t listening.”
“Fucker!” she cried. She moved on him. “Fuck! You!”
Her legs struck the ground in a thunderclap. She leaped, her hammer drawn over her shoulder in a readied swing. Avo tensed his Celerostylus and shuffled toward her, Phys-Sim measuring their closing distance.
He approached her linearly first. He took inspiration from Draus with his next steps, stealing the initiative as he dashed toward Rantula, closing within eight feet, but just barely. She swung. Her legs lashed out. He shifted outside her threat radius, waiting for the strikes to miss by inches before stepping in again.
Marking the arc of his strike using his Phys-Sim, he whipped his weapon out directly at her ankle. The cudgel crackled through the air, punching through a barrier of resistance to greet Rantula’s enhanced tissue as a scythe. This time, he felt a pop follow the pulses running down the handle of his weapon.
Ugly thing was, he couldn’t tell if the pop came from his elbow or her ankle.
He pulled away, throwing himself back as he watched the distance between them reach thirty-five feet. By the time he quelled his reflexes, spots were forming in his eyes, and his body was shaking. It felt like molten heat was coursing through every nerve inside him. The pain was so total, so intense that he almost missed Rantula toppling over with a roar as she put pressure on her right foot.
Almost.
He laughed, relishing the sight of his success as she gripped her leg, spitting litanies of slurs to the sky. Quivering, he placed a hand against a table. And felt his left elbow fold out of place entirely. He joined her on the ground, tumbling down with a hiss.
Turns out, the answer to his question of what popped between his elbow and her ankle was yes.
Clambering back to his feet, he kept his eyes trained on Rantula as two of her spider legs punched into the ground, lifting her into the air. Snot and hate flowed from her being, her thoughtstuff boiling out like the steam from her implants.
“Fucker! Fucker! Fuck-agghh!” Profanity and gibberish found a shared home on her lips. With staggered steps, she pushed forward, coming for him before he could recover.
Thirty feet.
Shaking his head, Avo winced. He didn’t know if he could fire his Celerostylus for more than a second this time. Needed to be accurate. Quick. He plucked a micro-rocket from his jacket and left the other as a reserve.
Twenty feet.
He snapped his elbow back into place and let it heal. It suddenly occurred to him that he dropped his cudgel. Reaching down, he froze. No. He’d come back for it later. He needed speed more than its mass right now. Had to get in and out away from Rantula in a heartbeat.
Ten feet.
Avo met Rantula’s charge, firing his reflexes. Pain exploded behind his eyes in shockwaves of agony, and darkness crept along the corners of his eyes, almost causing him to miss a leg of solid titanium sliding down into the red-outlined impact trajectory toward his skull. Avo threw himself into a roll. A hammer descended, sundering where he was a mere moment ago. The force made Avo bounce. A leg sank a full foot into the linoleum beside his chest.
Before pain ate away what remained of his consciousness, he flicked his micro-rocket into the exposed mechanisms within the leg. It sailed along a planned trajectory. His reflexes cut out before he could see if it went in or not.
Avo rolled, crawling blindly as he tried to flee. Thundering clusters of headaches exploded in the depths of his brain. He tried rising to his legs, but his body shook too much to comply. A series of servos sounded behind him. He ducked instinctively. A sudden gust tore past him, sending him staggering. The hammer? Did Rantula miss?
His answer came shortly in the form of another two of her legs. They did not miss. The good thing about having the single most torturous headache in existence is that you barely noticed it when two titanium pillars punched through your shoulders.
Gasping, Avo wrapped his still functioning arm around Rantula’s extended exo-limb, trying to lever it free from his flesh, feeling its serrated edges sawing through his ribs.
Rantula made a noise that was something between a growl and a laugh. “Let’s fucking see you be clever now.” She pulled him across her body like he was a bowstring to better look at him. Avo coughed mouthfuls of blood as he struggled, fighting harder as one of her hands closed around his nape.
She dropped her hammer onto the ground.
Pulling back a cinderblock of a right fist, a feral grin spread across her face. “Gonna feel this, ghouli–”
He spat blood into her mouth, his Phys-Sim lining a lane directly down her throat. She choked. He didn’t waste time, plunging the claws of his prehensile feet into her optics and tearing. Wires and cords of tissue popped free. Gargling a howl of pain, she took a step forward, trying to shake him off.
Then, Avo heard it–the glorious sound of pressing hydraulics cracking the casing of a micro-rocket. Beneath them, an explosion rippled. Flensing shards flicked flesh free across Avo’s body. Rantula toppled, screaming, the spinal base of her implanted limbs now jutting free at an angle.
The explosion ripped it out from her body.
Greeted the ground back-first against cold shattering tiles, Avo groaned as he clawed against the ground, pulling himself free from impalement, inch by inch, from edge to edge.
Somewhere next to him, Rantula was shrieking. “My back! Fuck! I can’t–I can’t fucking feel my back!”
As he finally felt the metal slide free from his back, he vomited blood across the ground. With his head spinning and legs shaking, he pushed himself to his feet. His hunger screamed at him, body mending his countless wounds, cells burning through his caloric intake at an intense rate. Stumbling, he made for the mangled remains of his brothers, mind-blank as he left Rantula behind him to her pain.
When the haze of his hunger cleared, his new jacket was coated in a sheen of red, clumped with dotted tissue. He had no idea how long he spent feeding, only that he had gorged himself before his senses returned to him. Rantula was still jerking on the ground, screaming.
The father was crawling away from them in his periphery. Avo ignored the man and made to finish what was started.
Approaching Rantula, he savored the sheer extent of harm inflicted on her. Along the detached bolts of her spider legs’ implanted spinal base, her flesh was torn, lifted in a chasm of weltering crimson. He could see the moving gleam of her spinal column, doubtlessly laced with metal. A few looked like they had been wrenched out of place. Dented even. Two of her implanted eyes hung from her face as she cried out. Her right foot was folded unnaturally.
As his shadow slipped over her, she stopped crying out for a moment and swallowed.
“Alright.!” she snapped. “Alright, fuck ghoulie! Smart play. Good play! You win! You w–” He picked up a detached tip from one of her formerly implanted legs. Her lip quivered. “Ghoulie.” He took a step over her. “Moonblood…” His shadow slid over her body like a snake. “Avo, no!”
“C-Six,” he said, chuckling as he remembered his time with the grafters. Pulling back, he viciously plunged the titanium stave beneath a random column of bone.
The scream he tore from her lungs was loud enough to burst the first layer of his eardrums. The second layer went when he wedged it deeper, and booted the flat side of the stave, levering her already ruined spine into two loose pieces entirely.
Mirrorhead said to break her body. Well, who was he to leave a job half-finished?
The enforcers in the first row were silent, their faces ashen. A mixture of horror and triumph rained down on him from the spectators as he proceeded to the next component of his mutilation.
An ear.
He plunged a claw into her softest tissue, and when he found something that clung to him, he pulled. Ropes of the prolapsed organ came spooling out of her with each tug. Her lungs carried the weight of agony louder than the heavy metal still blasting from the speakers.
Above, he heard the announcer call out for the fight to end, that he had won, that there was no need for this. Avo heard her. Avo didn’t care. Drove his claws into her face, carving around her optics as he worked to finish her blinding. By this point, Rantula was whispering faint pleas of mercy.
He flipped her over so that her working ear was facing him.
“I’m in your mind,” Avo whispered. “Going to be there. Always. When you close your eyes. When you look at a reflection. That’s Mirrorhead. But when you dream. That’s Me.” He tore an optic free from her face. “Always and forever me.”
He was rearing back to take another one of her eyes when he heard a sound. A crackle of debris to his side, fifteen feet toward the moat. The father had crawled past them and was making for the electric field. Dust and blood trailed behind him in a smear.
Avo struggled to stop himself from hurting Rantula more.
Brutalized, beaten, broken. The fool was trying to fry himself. Most of Avo didn’t care. The part that belonged to Walton couldn’t let it happen. Not until the man was clear of mind to choose self-termination properly.
Oh, how he wanted to finish Rantula. Kill her. Take one last echo and manifest his Hell. How he wanted to spit in Mirrorhead’s face and leave this place. But he knew better. Knew to be patient. Knew that before he could ever escape, the Syndicate boss would need to be dead and devoured.
Avo was not going to spend the rest of his life fearing every reflection he came across.
“You live now,” Avo whispered to Rantula. “Live. But never heal. Not inside. You see me again, eyes stay on the floor. Like a dog. Heel. Dog. Heel.”
He shoved her head down and cracked the tiles beneath her, leaving her sobbing there amidst the detritus.
Staggering and limping, he trudged behind the father as his flesh continued to mend.
“Wait,” Avo said. “Wait.” The father kept crawling. Avo tried firing his Celerostylus, but the pain blooming through his nerves was too much. Three feet between the flowing arcs of electricity and the man. Ten between Avo and the man. He wouldn’t close the distance in time. “Essus!”
The man stopped and turned to look at Avo. “You know? You know my name?”
Avo nodded. The field cut out. “I know.”
The father–Essus stared. “Do you know my son’s name?”
What was the answer to this question?
No?
I don’t care.
What would Walton say?
“Tell me?” Avo asked. “You can tell me.”
Essus blinked and let out a breath. “Aurrie. His name is…was Aurrie.”
He too, then, joined in Rantula’s example and began to sob. He held himself and shivered.
Avo exhaled. His mind felt numb. His body felt frail. His insides felt hungry.
Looking back up the decks, the enforcers were half-standing in outrage, half-silent with indecision, and all too cowed by Mirrorhead’s presence to do anything about the ghoul that had brutalized one of their own.
Exhausted, Avo stumbled over and pointed out at someone random. A random girl in the first deck.
“You,” Avo said. The enforcer was young, with gleaming ebony skin and metal stilts for legs. The other enforcers around her inched away, leaving a space around her. It was like he cursed her.
“Me,” she pointed to herself. He could barely hear her voice from so far down.
“Yes,” Avo said. He gestured weakly at Essus. “Get him medical assistance.” He shot a glare at Rantula. “And a mop for her. Then, show me where cafeteria is. Hungry. Hurt. Need food.”
She must’ve been a genius among her comrades because she wasted no time doing what he told her to.
It was good to be feared.
If politics is defined as the activities pursued in relation to governance and power, then the greatest conceit in New Vultun is thinking what the “people” want matters at all.
That’s not to say that you–little person–don’t matter. You matter. You matter a lot in the big equations that make New Vultun the biggest, baddest, goddest city there ever was.
Of course, the way you matter is the same why hydrogen cells matter for the aerovec I got for my seventeenth: sure would be good to have more; sure would be bad if we ran out.
So, with that properly set, here is the major divide for terrestrial politics: Massist or Saintist?
Power shared by the many–or diluted by the mob.
Power enforced by the few–or dominion in the hands of singular tyrants.
Calla Marlowe, The FATELESS Thoughtcast
3-13
Lunchtime Chat
Avo left the Mall-Brawl basking in the glorious silence. He had seen to it that the enforcers present deposit the father, Essus, into a medi-drone for treatment. All the while, he felt the burning gazes of all who were present atop the deck, watching him, judging him.
The spectators lapped at him, praising his violence with uproarious delight. Yet, the flavor of their favor found itself diluted by the synchronous emotions of horror and despair from those of Conflux.
There were no smiles or jeers coming from the enforcers anymore. No calls for continued violence. Their expressions were childlike, eyes wide at the sight of one of their own so mauled. It was clear that Rantula was someone to them–a creature of fear and respect. But their creature. Their monster. Their champion.
And through his act, he reminded them that in this godless age, not even deification spared one from the desolation of violence.
Limping up the steps that split the deck, Avo nursed on a pre-lunch snack: the arm of the father’s former handler, now crisp and fried from the electrocution. Disgust played across countless faces that faded as they sank past his periphery. Their thoughtstuff remained.
Above the food court, the holographic display of the arena continued to play, scenes of med-techs trying to stabilize the still whimpering Rantula, attempting to ready her for drone transport as well. More pleasingly, a single line of text had been burned across the Nightmantis rig.
Claimed.
Another gift was claimed. Or delivered, as Mirrorhead would so say. The idea of being harmed less pleased Avo; the thought of getting actual food after days of feasting on raw meat, even more. Miserable as this day had been, he was still here, still burning.
And if it wasn’t for his Liminal Frame, he wouldn’t have been. Death had touched him thrice this day, and thrice he walked back out of its gates. His fears were beginning to dull, he realized. In his past life, before whatever happened to him over the course of the last week, he would have never engaged Rantula so. Hurt her, yes. But only after getting away, and finding a sliver of memory he could infect with one of his poltergeists.
Now, he greeted his problems in a different way. A savage new pathway had unveiled itself to him, and Avo found himself wanting more. Or perhaps it was the beast that desired bloodlust. It was getting increasingly hard to distinguish where his instincts began and his mind ended. With every act of brutality committed, he felt like the sinews of his being were intertwining.
Guided by the stilt-legged enforcer he called out earlier, he ordered her through grunts to lead him to the cafeteria or mess hall or whatever these street-scrum called the place they ate. He was hurting. He was healing. He needed–no, deserved–more food.
Body tense with fear and reluctance, she obeyed. No one stood with her. No one pulled her away from him. How solitary it was to be an enforcer? How helplessly alone. Already, she was about to lead him into an elevator and no one had stopped him. It made him loathe the other–
“Oi, rotlick!” Avo heard a voice call out from behind. The heartbeat and scent were familiar. He sniffed again. Ah. They smelled bad. One of Rantula’s minions. He didn’t care to remember either of their names.
A click followed. Avo turned, staring unimpressed into the jutting barrel of a gyrojet rifle. It was in the hands of the bald one again. Their hands were shaking, their breaths tense with withheld gasps of air. They were scared. Genuinely, truly scared of him. Avo chuckled. How amusing it was that he, by all accounts a failed ghoul if judged from the standards of the Low Masters, would be the first to experience a taste of self-actualization.
“Fight’s done,” Avo said. “Won. Finished. Go lick wounds. Find a new master.”
“F-fuck you,” the enforcer spat, sweat clinging to their brow. Was he Issig or Jareg? Avo shrugged. “You godsdamned monster–what you did–”
“Was good for her,” Avo said, digging at the thug’s wound. “She was weak. Slow. Stupid. And all the augs can’t fix that.” He chuckled an exaggerated laugh as he pointed a claw at the enforcer’s implanted limbs. Six insectoid legs. Six limbs to weigh them down. “Look at you. Deadweight and no will. No skill. Best part of you didn’t even come from you. Bought from a grafter. How much did it cost? Three thousand imps? Thirty thousand? Wasted. All of it. Just like you. Little wonder why Mirrorhead wanted me: current stock doesn’t light the wick.”
The enforcer’s gun cracked apart in his grip, his thoughtstuff boiling as tears of primal rage spilled from his eyes.
“Oh,” Avo said. “That’s right. Can’t shoot. Mirrorhead’s orders. One good thing about Rantula: she was good nu-dog. Listened. Obeyed.” Avo took a step forward. His foe took a step back, wilting, lips quivering like a child. “Another thing about Rantula. She was a screamer. Tell me: you the same way?”
Something broke inside the Rantula’s former peon. His face cracked, raw fear burning away the roots of his hate. The gun slipped from his hands. He inched back. Then stumbled back a step. “Fuck,” he whispered, his thoughtstuff coming apart in wide strands, his will shattering under the weight of terror.
Spinning on his heels, he ran, ejecting the limbs from his back, shedding that which tied him to Rantula so he could flee faster. The sight burned itself into Avo’s eyes as a precious memory, something to savor in his dreams tonight when he was sequencing his Metamind.
“This is power,” Avo muttered, mostly to himself. It was like a light had come on in his head. His Celerostylus; the Heaven; his Hell soon to manifest. All those were a power of physical and metaphysical disciplines. Yet, what he just achieved, the control he had over the fear of another, was equally absolute, equally destructive in its capacity. “This is power.”
A ring sounded from behind him. His head spun. His guide was currently hitting the interface of the elevator as fast as she could, trying to get the door to open before he closed on her.
Slowly, he walked next to her, his shadow shrouding her.
“Which floor?” Avo asked.
She froze. Her stilted leg carved a scratch against the floor while her breath hitched.
“Fi-fifty-second.” she choked.
Avo nodded. “Patience is a virtue.”
The time they spent in the elevator was no less awkward than when he slithered up behind her. Her body was deathly still, faced away from him, eyes locked forward on a reflection. She was trying to will Mirrorhead to intercede, to save her.
That drew Avo’s interest as well. Where was his esteemed owner? The Syndicate-ruling Godclad had been suspiciously silent for a while. It occurred to Avo that the man should have intervened earlier if he wanted Rantula’s spirit to be intact. Which meant that the boss either didn’t care that much or was actually absent.
The former was fittingly capricious. The latter was an interesting prospect; it could give him a window of opportunity to tune things to his advantage.
The Syndicate cafeteria was hosted in the shredded remains of what used to be a gallery, as far as Avo could tell. Dented frames holding tattered parchments of colors greeted him as soon as the doors opened. Most of the remaining rooms on this level had been sealed as well, the symbol of a snake wrapped around a crown telling Avo that the quarantine areas had unfixed memetic contagions. Useful, if his wards could take it.
Mem-Cons made for good weapons.
He needed to swing back around when his Metamind was properly built.
Regardless, feeding took precedence and Avo found himself salivating with hunger as he trudged past the line, making for the bowls of hot food.
“Hey, get back in–” the enforcer was pulled aside by a cohort, their voice a low whisper.
“Don’t light his fuse, consang. It’s fucking Moonblood. Our hitters upstairs said the ghoul just bricked Rantula.”
“Bullshit.”
A flashing holo-recording proved that to be otherwise. A chorus of footsteps followed a mass of people inching back and away. Suddenly, there was space for him at the front of the line. Good. He didn’t want to wait. He wanted to eat.
So it was that Avo found himself standing at the front of the line, looking at an expansive list of food options now available to him. He savored the sensation of bliss. Joy was fickle. All feelings were fickle. But right then, right there, Avo knew true happiness to be a big bowl of pork-beetles set to twenty-thousand calories, served and packaged in record time via hovering auto-chefs working in a robotic assembly line of food.
Peering back, he scanned the myriad of faces greeting him, and found them soft and wanting. Most here didn’t have the exaggerated chrome he saw on the enforcers. A few even looked to be outright flats, bare of alloy and obvious bio-enhancements. These, then, must’ve been the logistical support to the muscle. Drone-jocks as well, perhaps.
He greeted them with disinterest and they greeted him with apprehension. What few bruisers and enforcers there were found corners away from him, trying to pretend he didn’t exist.
It seemed he took a certain pillar of stability in their little pecking order away from them. How unfortunate. With Rantula now broken before her peers, Avo wondered if a power struggle would develop, see a new enforcer come after him for the spot of “dominant bruiser” under Mirrorhead.
Maybe someone would go for Rantula first, now that he had made her so weak. It was an easy way to rise. Prove themselves strong.
Avo’s problem was that he didn’t fit in this little miserable ecosystem and he ultimately didn’t want to. He was an invasive species here, and he wanted to get out. That meant finding leverage on Mirrorhead and breaking his hold on him. Removing the cortex bomb as well. These street squires might be content to spend the rest of their short lives fighting over who was the biggest dog in the yard, but Avo had little interest in being someone’s dog. He saw where that road ended before he even came of age.
A humming whistle came from the auto-chef in front of him, refocusing his attention. Its shell was like three balls stacked atop each other, the middle producing the food while the topmost sphere projected the selection options via a holo-haptic lens. They looked aesthetically pleasing. He guessed they were more like actual purchases than salvage. Probably smuggled through the Deep Bazaar to avoid DRM or NRM breaches.
Along its shell, the logo of DynaHome Technologies shone from a mem-code. Another defunct subsidiary. This one was of Ashthrone’s roster. Made sense, still active corporations and companies had active fab-licensing chips, and licenses were never cheap.
Looking up at the ceiling, Avo looked at himself in the mirror. Still no Mirrorhead. Missing, then. He couldn’t imagine his new boss just letting his new prize ghoul run around and wreak havoc. No. He was occupied. Avo was curious about just what had drawn the Godclad's attention away so suddenly.
A slot chimed at the center of the auto-chefs, the indicator flashing green. Through the opening came a large plastic bowl of pork-beetles. Avo sniffled in the scent and clacked his fangs together. These nu-bugs wouldn’t be long for this world. Still, it felt wrong not to bite down on something that didn’t struggle before it died.
He wondered if all his recent killings twisted his psychology. Or maybe just the fact that he wasn’t suppressing the beast with a morality mod in his Metamind right now.
As he retrieved lunch, he caught Stilt-Legs trying to sneak away, thinking her task was done. He caught up to her from behind again.
“Name?” Avo asked. His forcibly-obtained guide slammed thigh-first against a table as she leaped, jolting with fear.
“M-mine?” she stammered.
Avo just stared. He would continue to just stare until she decided to get past this pointless display of cowardice so they begin more useful conversations.
Stilt-Leg swallowed. “Ved.”
“Ved,” Avo said. He studied the woman’s features, looking for defining marks beyond the implants. Her skin was pale. Unnaturally pale compared to most of her peers. “Native? Nolothi?”
Ved blinked. Her eyes lit up. “Yeah! Uh, my mother’s mother’s mother was here before New Vultun even was establish–”
“Find seat,” Avo said, cutting her off.
Ved’s jaw opened and closed. A flash of offense spilled across her face at not being able to finish her story, but she did as she was told.
Joined tables made from insta-fabbed plastics ran from wall to wall. The chairs, meanwhile, were metal stumps. Had to be with how heavy some of these enforcers were. This place was still mostly empty right now. Strange. He expected there to be more people here, eating. It looked like it could seat a few hundred easily.
But with the wealth that Mirrorhead displayed so far, he was pretty sure the Sydnicate boss had more than this single establishment, this single location filled with personnel and equipment. No one concentrated all their goods in one place. Not if they wanted to keep playing this game for long.
Ved found a nicely vacant row for them. There were ten chairs to the left and the right. The eyes of the others in the room were still locked on Avo. He wondered if they were planning to attack him at some point, and found that doubtful with how placid their thoughtstuff were. It was tense. Tense, but not nervous. Just a dull acceptance that there was a ghoul in their midst, and that he had hurt one of their number.
Besides, Avo doubted anyone here could actually ambush him properly with their pounding footsteps and thundering hearts. The constant chattering was a dulling miasma of noise to his senses, but he had lived in different Undercroft megablocks all his life. Those had millions of bodies all packed together across a few hundred levels at the most. The noises warred, a symphony of eternal discord. And the smells. What to say about the smells, other than the fact that his feelings regarding the smells were better left unsaid?
It taught him compartmentalization if nothing else.
“Family,” Avo said, as they were seated, pawing a handful of pork-beetles. The little spliced bugs struggled in his palm as he tossed them into his mouth. He munched them, the crunching bringing him an ineffable satisfaction. Strangely, he had expected to gain an echo from that.
There was a question in that: what made one death release an echo, while another gave nothing more? Was it tied to the ghosts? Could it be that only the intelligent, the self-aware granted him echoes?
“What?” Ved said, blinking.
Avo fed himself another mouthful of food before he could sigh. Writhing little limbs prodded against his tongue, tickling the roof of his mouth. His fangs fell like a guillotine, splitting their little bodies. The oozing of their juices on his taste buds was sublime. Sour and sweet, each coming apart with a satisfying pop. Glorious food. All the killing had been worth it for this alone.
Ved watched him with paling features. “I–uh–I didn’t understand the question.”
Swallowing the second mouthful of bugs, Avo waited for the food to go down before talking. Manners were important. Walton said so. “You were talking. About family.”
“Oh,” Ved said, understanding. “Oh–oh! Yeah, uh! So as I was saying my mother’s mother’s mother’s…”
This went on for some time. It appeared Ved had an aversion to using the word “grand” in front of “mother.” Even a, “my distant ancestors” would have been better. For a few minutes, Avo just pretended to listen, nodding and grunting as the family backstory began to expand into a metaphorical territory Avo regarded as “beyond useless.” He did his best not to remember anything that Ved told him aside from the essentials. Minds had limited space and he didn’t want Ved’s story about her grandmother’s funny wart to be using any of it.
“...I mean, Jaus, consang, it was like she didn’t even care about mom. After everything mom did for us, she just leaves. Takes the fucking Guild job and leaves. Complete half-strand behavior, the fucking sow. Fuck. Can’t believe we’re related.”
“Yes,” Avo said, “the sow.” Whoever the aforementioned sow was. Probably family. People hated their families. He interjected before Ved could go off on another spiel.
“Ved. Rantula.” Ved went silent. Nervous. Her heart pace doubled. “She respected?”
He swallowed. “Rantula’s one of the classics, consang. Been working for the boss since day one. But you messed her up good. The shit you did to her...” She cupped her ear and swallowed, steeling herself for something to come. “Wasn’t right. You should’ve stopped. Should’ve let her be. She surrendered. We all heard. You could’ve stopped.”
Avo understood the sentiment. But understanding didn’t mean acceptance. “Would she?”
“Would she what?”
She was being deliberately obtuse now. Didn’t want to answer. Avo didn’t care. “Would she have stopped? With me? With the flat? Would any of you?”
Ved opened her mouth, words slow to come as she mustered all her tact to put what she felt into words. Avo knew what was coming. He had known for years. He just liked hearing it said by another, to remind him of what the city thought about his kind.
“You’re a ghoul, consang,” Ved said. Those words explained everything. “There's no one in this room who didn’t lose someone to your like during the Uprising.”
A moment of silence settled between them. “Low Masters,” Avo said, wanting to trade honesty for honesty. She had been brave. That was a virtue. Virtues should be rewarded. “They said that we were saving you from Guilds. That our sacrifice was for you.”
That made Ved laugh. “Jaus Avandaer said he was going to give everyone their own Heaven, consang.” She mimed getting stabbed in the chest. “Suppose nobody predicts getting stabbed by their own kid, yeah.”
Avo grunted in acknowledgment. No one really wanted this. No one asked for this. They just got what they got and chose from there. “I didn’t ask to be.”
“I–I know,” Ved said, unsure how to respond.
“Want to hurt you,” Avo continued. Across from him, Ved went stiff. “Want to hurt everyone. Eat them. Always. Not easy, trying to deny it. But I choose. You understand. And that’s why I hurt Rantula. She never chose. She’s a coward. She’s like my brothers. Don’t be coward Ved. Don’t be like the sow in your family. Whoever she was. Be–”
A blaring blast wave of ghosts tore through the level. The lights flickered. Avo felt a surge of adrenaline flow through him. +Situation in medical! Repeat! Situation in medical! Staff down! Patient missing–the Regular is loose! She's fucking loose! Send help–send–+
A loud rattling scream cut the flow of thoughts off. The ghosts snapped with the termination of the host, dissolving as the phantasmal broadcast broke away into nothing.
Draus. It had to be.
Avo left that shiv with her on a whim. Just in case she wanted to make her own options. Avo hid a smile. Good for her. But… wasn’t the father bound for medical as well?
Sighing, Avo stood, taking the bowl of pork-beetles with him. “Medical?” Avo asked. “Where?”
Ved blinked. “It’s the second to last level. All the way."
“Lead,” he said. “Get the elevator. I follow.”
Chrome is a money trap. This isn't a statement. This is an objective fact.
Let’s look here at your standard implanted limb. Sure. It can be made of solid Adamantine. You know what isn’t as tough and strong as adamantine? Your spine. Your skin. Shoulders. So, every implant is a full-body package too.
But that’s okay, I hear some of you say. The nanosurgeons can fix it right up, ignoring the fact that if you could afford nanosurgery, you’d be purchasing less invasive augmentations anyway.
So, that leaves the poor and downtrodden with limited options. Sure, they can visit a grafter or, if they’re brave enough, a street sculptor. Plenty of old exo-armors laying around to protect you from the mean streets. Just need to bolt that to yourself right?
Energy. Don’t forget about energy.
That’s a category-E microfusion cell for the cheapest linear combat rig. You could make an argument about getting a category-A cell and cybering yourself to the roots and sinews, but by that point, you’re already spending enough imps to build a void cruiser, while only being about as effective as maybe a heavy drone.
Compare that to a wager with market-standard biomods, and you’re looking at a net loss in both effectiveness and longevity. Compare that to premium nanosuite injections, and the question of hardware and software begins to blur.
There is a tax that comes with the alloy, and it stays long after the implant gets chipped in.
-Dissertation on Cybertech’s Effects on the Socio-Economically Disadvantaged Populations of New Vultun
3-14
Unwilling Survivor
Back down to the guts of the Warrens Avo found himself descending. Again down, two hundred levels, and more. He was beneath the plates of the surface now. He could taste it in the air, in the rumbling weight of the city above him.
The question he had for why the medical levels were located so far down was a fleeting one. Building essential facilities far below Layer One was a deliberate choice for most organizations. There were too many points of insertion on the levels above, and it still wasn’t clear to him if Conflux controlled the entire structure or not. With how Mirrorhead had them stationed, there was a feeling that they were mostly squatting in the block rather than formal occupants.
“Ved,” he asked, watching as the elevator sank down toward the four hundred and fiftieth level; thirty-five more to go. “Medical: is there anything lower?”
She blinked at him momentarily, not understanding the vagueness of his words. “The Underways? We got a motorpool. Well, almost a motorpool. We got, like, three golems; two Shadowcrawlers and a Galeslither.” She chuckled. “And only half of them work.”
Avo stared at her in confused disappointment. “Why laugh? Unprofessional to have broken equipment. And how does half a golem work?”
His answer made Ved wilt. “The…uh, Galeslither has a busted engine. Still flies though.”
“Can it land?” Avo asked.
“Not sure. Haven’t really tried.”
Avo frowned. “Then you have one working golem.” Ved didn’t have much to say about that. Fitting. A broken tool wasn’t a joke but a sign of incompetence or ill-discipline. Such displays reflected poorly on Mirrorhead. For all his resources, the morale of his people was certainly abysmal. Imps could buy motivation, but having a boss that constantly monitored you and could kill you at any point from a reflection likely left everyone here risk-averse.
Flaws upon flaws. Mirrorhead probably viewed his control over Conflux like a master with a leash. Apparently, he forgot that when you pulled too hard, a leash could also be a noose.
The elevator doors chimed and opened. A flurry of movement was already underway, med-techs and their medical drones already in a whirlwind of motion. Overhead, another plane of mirrors coated the ceiling while cone-shaped surveillance drones whistled through narrow vents along the walls.
The shine of the room made him reflexively wish that he had found some shades or goggles. It was hard to see, even with his ghosts tuning his perceptive brightness. The cognition of sight could be adjusted, but the light stung his eyes all the same. He needed to find something to blunt brightness if he eventually found himself operating during the day.
Going with the flow of foot traffic proved to be a sound idea as the hospital’s layout was a maze. Hallways led to twisting turns that ended in plascrete-sealed dead-ends. Doors were melted shut or clamped down with mag-locks. It looked like they secured this place in the aftermath of a siege and never renovated it.
Following the crowd into a larger chamber, a hive revealed itself to Avo, the walls lined with hexagonal hab-cells, each meant to serve as a treatment center of some kind. Judging from the scuffed numbering painted over each cell, however, it was obvious this used to be a coffin hostel of some kind.
“This is C-Wing,” Ved said. “Used to be a capsule hotel. Back when the Blackways were the Underways. Back when the darkness wasn’t infested with…”
“Ghouls,” Avo finished for her.
“Yeah.”
One of the last insults from the Low Masters, the Blackways. Infusing all darkness beneath the city with a Heaven of liminal spatiality was one thing. Connecting that spatiality with random alleyways across the gutters to ensure their ever-replenishing nests of feral ghouls would always be a problem, meanwhile, was deliberately cruel.
Starring beyond an entire shredded wall of C-Wing, Avo found himself look down quick-fabbed plasteel railings leading to a twenty-foot drop to the former Underway station below. Rusted rails left unused for nearly a decade stung his nose with a familiar stench of decaying metal. Three tunnels had been fused shut with battle foam and plascrete blockades, while a final path looked cored clean through by some impossible force.
“Oh, fuck me,” Ved said, sounding stunned, “I think the Reg punched her way through using a Shadowcrawler. Got nothing else down here that can do that.”
A team of enforcers was gathered in front of the new opening, their guns raised, lights burning away the encroaching limbs of the whispering darkness, wanting to drag the unsuspecting into its depths. Avo could taste the sheer anxiety in their voices, hear it in their gasping lungs as they faced the black and called for their engineers to jock into a construction drone and fill the gap.
Avo grunted a soft chuckle. Here was Draus making her own options. Probably used the shiv he gave her, then. Didn’t know how she did all this with only one arm. Reg was still a Reg, even discharged, it seemed. Looking into the umbral womb that was the Blackways, Avo felt the siren call of his infanthood home call out to him, offering him freedom if he just sank back into its embrace.
He knew better. There were things that lurked in the dark. Creatures, much like the Heaven Mirrorhead commanded. Up here, he lived in a tyranny ruled by the one. In the blackness? It was like wandering a dark forest, trying not to make noise, trying not to be spotted.
Another reason why Draus probably stole the golem. It was something to ensure that what she made was a getaway instead of a suicide. Weirdly, Avo wondered why Mirrorhead hadn’t noticed. With all the reflections present, he expected the Syndicate boss to already be present.
The silence breathed upon the embers of paranoia within Avo. There was something with his new boss that seemed more prey than predator in this instant. For all the boasts and control the man exerted, he certainly did like to keep his movements chaotic, keep his tracks hidden.
A low guttural cry rang out from one of the hab-cells behind. Avo knew the voice. Knew it better as a soft and measured cadence rather than fury-afflicted shrieks. Essus was here too.
But why had Draus left him behind?
Huddled outside hab-cell 37-D at the very corner of the chamber, awkwardly, a loose grouping of four med-techs. Only one of them was in a rig, and only two had brought their pistols. He could hear them muttering and arguing about what needed to be done under their breaths.
Avo wondered what had stymied their entry. The father was near critical condition when he was brought down; not in any condition to be a threat.
At least, not on his own.
As Avo approached, he smelled the stench of cooked flesh and melted plastic both. A scar of glass was burned into the tilted walls. The scrubbers inside were whining loud as they tried to drain away the dust and particulates in the air. From the inside, Avo heard two heartbeats, not one; saw two accretions of thoughtstuff, not one.
“Do not come in!” Essus shouted. “Come in, I’ll kill him. By Artad’s missing hand, I’ll kill him like I did the other one!”
Ah. The father had taken a hostage. Somehow. Half an hour ago, the man was barely alive, flesh flayed open along the back, face pulped and bloodied. Avo supposed the Syndicate injected him with some rainwater.
Avo considered the situation for a few moments. Ved stared, her eyes flicking between him and the cell.
“You…gonna do something?” she asked.
Probably wasn’t wise, as most of his hostage-rescue understanding came from illegal streams of Paladin raids. Unlike a Paladin, however, he could not release a literal phoenix from his eyes that was capable of melting an entire megablock while healing everyone within it at the same time.
Unfortunately, if he didn’t intervene then the Syndicate would. And Avo didn’t want to find out what Mirrorhead would do to the man. Or some up-jumped enforcer looking to earn some glory.
Avo growled, clacking his fangs in frustration. Breaking Rantula was a far simpler prospect than this. He didn’t want to speak with the father. Not really. But Walton wouldn’t just let the man die. “Yeah. Gonna do something.”
“He’s still in there?” Avo asked, striding up behind the med-techs. All four jumped in terror. One spun, mag-pistol raising.
Avo fired his reflexes. Time lurched. He snatched the pistol out of the med-tech’s grip, snapping their finger as he pulled. He relaxed his organ.
“Mine, now,” Avo said, shoving the pistol into his pocket. The med-tech bounced back first against the wall, steam fogging the inside of her glass-domed helm as she groaned, face twisting in pain. He looked back at the other three, now slowly backing away from him, their eyes wide with surprise and terror. “Situation?”
“I’ll kill him!” screamed the father from inside the cell. “I’ll slit his throat. I have already killed one! I already killed one…Avo is...is that you?"
“Jaus, fuck!” snarled the only rigged-up med-tech. Stomping over to Avo, he reduced the opacity of his faceplate. A bald, scarred face with two-coal red implants for eyes glared at Avo, a curse dying between clenched teeth. “You–you… what hells do you want? Trying to find Rantula? Finish the job?”
“Maybe later,” Avo said. “Different want right now. Come to see how Essus is doing.”
The med-tech glared. “Essus just killed Rully with a las-scapel and took one of our rooks as hostage. The Reg managed to subvert the auto-surgeon somehow; gave its control module over to the flat before she took the crawler and left.”
“Got a plan?” Avo asked.
“Yeah. Wait for the enforcers. That, or gas the half-strand with anesthesia.”
Yeah. Sounded like they were going to end up killing Essus one way or another. Flats didn’t do well with tranquilizers meant for augments. That would also end Avo's day on a less triumphant note. The father survived the Crucible, only to die in a hab-cell. Didn’t seem right. He needed to finish saving the idiot. Again.
“No,” Avo said.
“No?” the med-tech replied, confused.
“Going to talk with him,” Avo said. “Keep enforcers out.”
“And how do you propose I do that?”
Avo fixed the med-tech with a flat glare. “Tell them I’m inside. Tell them I’m still hungry.”
All Avo could hear of the father and his hostage were brief heartbeats as he crossed into the room. A nagging way still pried at his will. He could walk away. Let someone else handle this. The father really wasn’t his problem anymore. Unfortunate as the boy’s death was, it was as it went. People died. It was part of the bargain: the city gave you Heavens and miracles, and when it came time to die, you went back to feeding the city.
In a weird way, the boy was closer to New Vultun than any of them would get for a while.
Avo had helped the man as best he could. Saved him well over five times now. So why the hells did he still feel responsible?
Walton. Walton was why. Sometimes, Avo wished he had never met the man. Sometimes, he wondered if his life and eventual death would have been easier if he became a feral like so many of his brothers.
A beam-butchered corpse greeted Avo as he entered the room. Blood did not pool and organs did not show, but it was clear that someone had taken to slashing the corpse repeatedly with a high-intensity laser until the body’s face hung in burning strips and arms were hanging from smoking sinews. Avo counted something north of a hundred slash-wounds, sloppily carved into cold flesh, driven by undiminished hate.
Reaching over, Avo pulled a piece of fried skin and ate it. It tasted crispy, but not nice. Overcooked. “Let it burn for too long. Burnt. Not cooked.”
Nothing came from the father. No laugh. Avo frowned. His attempt at initiating this conversation through humorous small talk had failed. He had to think of something else.
The space of the room wasn’t that large, but a holo-veil shrouded what lay beyond the halfway mark of the thirty-foot room. Avo wondered if that was Draus’ doing as well. This had all the makings of a good ambush with the obfuscation of the veil. If Avo didn’t have his Metamind, he wouldn’t even notice Essus’ presence or his hostage.
“Gonna step through the veil. Beam me and I eat you.”
No response.
Avo passed through the threshold.
There, laying upon a dull grey gurney, the father stared. A glinting plate of chrome had been installed over his forehead. In his hand, he had what looked to be a spherical module connected via wires to the tetrahedrally designed surgical drone hovering over his bed. Avo tilted his head. A cluster of glowing cells shone from the back of the drone. Additional power cells jury-rigged by Draus, Avo guessed. Explain the intensity of the surgical beams.
In the corner, next to an IV stand, the surviving hostage whimpered, a brown-haired juv wearing monochrome medical scrubs. He didn’t look much older than the boy did.
“Avo,” the father said. He gave a surprised chuckle. The joy didn’t reach his eyes. For a few moments, neither one of them said anything, the only sound was the thudding of heavy boots outside. Probably enforcers arriving. The med-techs were talking, but the boots didn’t stop falling until Ved interjected.
“I asked her to leave me,” the father said.
“Why?” Avo asked.
“Because you were right. I was a dead man. Still am a dead man. I do not need to weigh you or her down anymore. I will find a resolution here. With them.” The venomous hate that spilled out with the last word didn’t fit the father. It was like something else had taken to nest beneath his skin.
What a fascinating thing, to watch someone learn to truly hate in real time.
“She left?” Avo asked. He was asking about Draus.
Essus understood. “She wanted me to leave. I wouldn’t go. She had already escaped by the time I got here. Somehow, she had disabled her doctor. Stole his prosthetics. The machine,” he pointed at the surgery drone, “she was using it before she gave it to me. It was not something someone as useless as I could manage to do.” Essus laughed.
The hostage stared at Avo. His eyes were square implants, pulsing with strobing scanners. The juv wanted to plead for a rescuer, but his face wilted when he found himself greeted by a ghoul.
“You kill the other one?” Avo asked. “Or Draus.”
Essus blinked. “I think I did.”
Avo gave another look at the mangled corpse. From inside the veil, he could see out without issue. Deep lacerations revealed the whiteness of the corpse’s spine, along with a variety of other wounds. Yeah. The recklessness fit. Draus was efficient; ruthless. She would have taken lives in single slices.
“So,” Essus asked, “where do we go from here?”
“Don’t know,” Avo admitted. “Came in because if not me, then enforcers. They’ll kill you. Probably.”
Essus blinked. “I do not think I care that much. I wish you let me die.”
Avo crouched and met the tired man’s eyes. Tired, but there was something else there. Despair. Sorrow. Hate. Maybe an angle he could work against Mirrorhead. Essus was a flat, but his mind was ripe with potential. Something that could be used to feed a phantasmic.
Or a re-weaponized memetic contagion, built to infest others with misery and loathing.
“The boy,” Avo said, considering his next steps. “His name. Aurrie?”
Essus blinked. A tear fell. “Yes.”
“Tell me about him.”
“Everything we offer, for so little in return; the gulfs of our lives last mere seasons, but the succor of your miracles is shorter; mere moments.
Why then, do we breed? Why then, shall we have children? Why then, do we seek Heaven?
The road of spreading futures trails out, like blood seeping through cracks, turned to roots. But be any of the paths ours? Be we ever happy?
Oh, my god, my god above all other gods, what reason am I to stay alive, if I am just another rhyme in this unending hymn? Fated to be forgotten. Fated like all before, all after.
-“Heretic’s Lament,” Historical text detailing the last words of an apostate before their enforced sacrifice to the Seraphic Choirs of Old Kosgan
3-15
Heart of the Machine
The father’s fingers tensed around the controls. With twitching fingers, he turned the haptic icons on the sphere, the beam-emitter of the drone tilting ever so slightly toward the hostage. Pressing himself against a wall, the terrified med-tech assistant’s heart was going off like an artillery line.
Perhaps bringing up the boy wasn’t the best thing to ask.
For a moment, Avo considered whether he wanted to take a step back as he watched a storm of emotions twist through Essus’ face. His thoughtstuff was like a hurricane, flashes and memories spiraling along the edges as the man was trapped at the eye, lost amidst a storm of his past.
Negotiations had always been more of Walton’s forte. Try as he might, empathy was a hard thing to learn for Avo, the nuances of morality too elusive, too fluid in rules and cultures. Ghosts, meanwhile, were far more direct. They revealed all if one could unravel their interwoven memories and divest from it a useable sequence. But that was the partition between a living mind and the remnants of a dead one: will. Ghosts mirrored the willpower of the living, tethering themselves to an organism that could make choices. Without the linkage, all a ghost could do was fragment. Dissolve. Be forgotten.
The instrumentalization of these ghosts was what made a Necrojack artist and engineer both.
Considering the path before him, Avo contemplated how he would proceed if he was using the mined pieces of the father's memories to create a functional ghost.
Pain would likely constitute the mass of such a ghost by this point. It was unavoidable. Emotions were like fuel or energy for a ghost to burn, and with every sequence related to the boy now afire with damage, all he could do was sheer the most erratic branches away; keep the funnel of pain and rage down to a limited set of options and features.
But that didn’t mean fighting the ghost. A Necro never fought a ghost. They merely altered it. Implanting other, symmetrical branches of memory to alter the overall structure, unbinding bits that were more abscess than an asset to the function of the construct.
“Won’t be hard,” Avo said, trying a new approach. Come back to the boy later. Try more present in the current moment. Essus snapped back to alertness as if just remembering Avo was there.
The man swallowed, he looked tired. Confused from trauma both physical and mental. “What won’t be hard.”
“Killing him,” Avo said.
The hostage made a whimpering noise. Avo was quite glad the juv managed to avoid pissing himself so far. The smell would have made this distracting.
Essus turned and stared at his hostage. “I–yes. They killed him. They killed my boy.” His face darkened, warping darkly into a seething rage. “They killed my boy.” He shook, voice choked by a growing tightness, more tears trailing down his face. “They killed my boy.’
Avo grunted in agreement. The sadness was good. Meant that there was more sorrow than rage from what he could tell. Sorrow was useful in making someone give up. Not go on a suicide run. But go too far and you hit despair, and depression was illegal in all the Highflame-ruled Sovereignties.
Been that way ever since the Demi-Sophists corrupted an entire locus by despair-bombing it with specialized depression-based constructions using their Ghostjack phantasmics. Suicides spiked to three million an hour that day; fried all the gamma-quality wards too.
“Killed your boy. Yours. And a thousand others,” Avo said, navigating the waters carefully. Too much, the man would give. Too little, and he’d lose him again. “Told you. You’re new here. Don’t know the heart of the machine.”
“The machine?” asked Essus, blinking erratically. His eyes were flicking between Avo and the other person he murdered earlier, horror-induced paleness staining his face.
“New Vultun,” Avo said. “City’s an engine. Gives life. Eats death. Feeds and is fed upon.”
Essus’ nostrils flared. Anger? Thoughtstuff was boiling around the edges. Definitely anger. Still manageable. “Are you saying my son was a sacrifice?”
“Yes,” Avo said without hesitation. “You. Me. The boy. Draus. Every last jock and enforcer. The Syndicates. The wagers. All of us. Sacrifices.”
“For what!” Essus raged. His thoughtstuff exploded outward. Avo waited, wondering if it would spike again. Essus directed the drone away from aiming at the tech and sent it a beam slashing out with a wild flail of his arm. Avo twisted, the pulsing stream of radiance spilling through the holoveil behind him. Rippling glitches pulsed from the light-made partition from where the piercing laser traced.
Avo considered tearing the surgical drone apart. Breaking it. But doing so might break Essus’ mind utterly. Again and again, the man had his agency deprived. Again and again, he was rendered impotent; he was practically the epitome of being FATELESS.
A thrum of microdrones began to sound from behind. Avo guessed the Syndicate goons were getting impatient. How unfortunate for them. They would need to wait a little while longer, or incur his ire.
He should have gone a bit further with Rantula. Perhaps she did not serve as an example enough for the others.
“They–they told me that New Vultun was a great city,” the father said, a rant building on his breath. “That–that it is protected from the Fallen Aethers?” Avo frowned before he understood. Right. A different term for Heaven. “Protected from the cults and the Ruptures!”
“Yeah,” Avo nodded. “No lie there.”
“No lie?” The father snarled, a loose globule of drool slipped free from the corner of his lip.“No…no lie?
“Better here than a lot of places,” Avo said. “Get up the Tiers. Life is good. Get into the Arks and have your pick over whatever Paradise you want. Countless demiplanes. Countless pleasures. No work. Immortality. Elysiums, they call it.”
Avo had never been to one, of course, but he didn’t doubt it was beyond the Great Eights’ abilities to build something like that. It was also one of the few things that outright disgusted Walton, though he never said why.
A deepness of confusion mingled with pain shrouded Essus' every action. He lowered his controller. The drone bobbed up and down, following the sphere in his hand, trying to anticipate what he was aiming at. He snarled. He sobbed. His heart raced.
“Planned to ask your name at some point,” Avo said. It was a risk, but something told him that it would draw Essus’ attention away from his inner turmoil. “Wanted to do it after we got out. If we got out. Other things interceded.”
“My name,” the father muttered. He sniffled, reeling snot back up his nose. “Only…only now does it matter? Only now, that I haven’t died?” He laughed, incredulous, cupping his face as he folded in on himself.
“Said you were going to die,” Avo said. “Was wrong. Now name worth knowing. Simple as that.”
“Is that all there is? If I prove myself strong, I get to be a person? What about my boy! What about–”
“Not strong,” Avo growled, cleaving the father’s rant low before it could begin. The man wilted back at him, too stunned to even aim his drone at Avo. “Just survive. Strength and survival. Two different things.”
“Oh, gods, oh Jaus,” the hostage prayed. Too bad for them the closest thing he had to a savior was a ghoul. A ghoul that was considering eating them if the opportunity presented itself.
“Nothing to do with strong,” Avo said, watching as the father struggled to cling to his rage, struggling not to break. “Not me either. Not Draus. None of us. Your boy was unlucky. No hope for him. Rest of us…luck. Some skill.”
“Was it mere skill that let you return from death–” the father whispered.
Avo took him by the jaws with a single clawed hand. Essus’ eyes widened. “Never died,” Avo hissed. The man was a fool. Did he want Mirrorhead to know of what actually transpired, to give away one of the few sole advantages they had? Avo was not ready yet to fight another Godclad, and he would not be struck down in the cradle of his power.
He removed his hand from Essus’ face. The father swallowed. “Hallucinated. Trauma does that to you. Agree.” He lowered himself, leaning over the father. The man was shocked. Silent. It would be easy to take the drone’s control module from him now. Avo didn’t. The man deserved a security blanket.
If only to keep them stable.
“Let’s say you kill this one--” Avo said, gesturing to the hostage.
“What?” the assistant squeaked. “No, no wait--"
“--Let’s also say the hostage stays quiet. In case ghoul gets hungry.”
The squeaking stopped. The hostage possessed adequate intelligence. How encouraging for his odds of survival.
“What then?” Avo asked, returning his gaze to Essus. “He doesn’t matter. Mirrorhead will find another. Warrens. Lots of meat out here. Syndicate undamaged. You’ll be dead. Dead with boy. But they’ll get to continue killing others. More men like you. More dead sons."
Essus bit his lip, drawing blood. “I could…I….”
The path ahead, in truth, was simple. So long as they were with the Syndicate, they couldn't be free. So, there couldn't be a Syndicate. Avo thought that the father might come to like the violence his plan entailed.
“Enforcers are coming. Will come for you once they get impatient. Might not if you surrender. And if you let this one go.” Avo flicked a gesture at the hostage. “He’s worthless. Send him out. Let this be done.”
“Kill me,” the father laughed, a bitter sound. “I’m not afraid.”
“Didn’t say kill,” Avo said. He let a hint of menace linger in his voice. “They can take you. Cut your boy from memories. Use you as organ farm.”
The father paled. “What–why–”
Avo gestured around the room, and the locus shining above. “Ghosts. The ones inside your head? Ones everyone in the city has? Ones I use? Made of memories of the dead.”
“Memories of the dead,” the father blinked.
“Metaphysics,” Avo said. “Complicated. Like leftover matter. Parts of the mind get torn off after death. Nether 'remembers' your mind. But mind is bound for death. Nether tries to tug. Struggle tears off sequences. Pieces. Ghosts. Leaves them as threads in the Nether."
The father swallowed. “What does this have to do with–”
“Can use ghosts to shape cognition,” Avo continued. “Pull pieces left of intelligence, emotion, experience, and knowledge. Use them to make instruments. Sequence memories for Metamind; modify senses.”
“I don’t understand–”
“Can also use them to take things out.”
The father looked sick by this point. “Can…can they put my son’s mind back…”
“No,” Avo said. “No for the boy. He’s dead as Jaus. No phylactery for him. Gone now. Nothing left but pieces of memory; echoes of knowledge. The Syndicate. They can do worse to you.”
“Worse,” Essus moaned, “what could be worse?”
Avo shrugged. “Could take his last memories. Chain them to your mind. To a memory trigger? Let you relive his death when you think of him.” Essus grew paler still. “That's why I want to ask your name. Yours. The boy. So I could remember. In case they decided to break you.”
The father looked at him, dread creeping over his features. He opened his mouth, but nothing came. No sounds. No words.
Avo couldn’t tell if his attempt to properly prime the father against the Syndicate was working, or if he was just tormenting the poor fool. Right now, the father going on a suicide run was wasted. The father–made cautious by fear and made focused by hate–could be a wieldable asset. Just a question of how well he can hold against the pressure; how much Avo could shape him.
“They can take him from you too,” Avo said, twisting the proverbial knife ever so slightly. “Tear every memory of him from your mind. His smile. His laugh. The first time you held him. His name. Everything. Everything.”
The father looked at the hostage and Avo. His eyes darted back and forth, the strain of what he was being told consumed his features with agonized stress. He dropped the module. He clutched his head and moaned. “I do not wish this…”
“Doesn’t matter what you want,” Avo said. “Matters what they can inflict. Matters what you can stop.” He motioned for the assistant to flee with a wave, not even looking at him. The juv wasted no time, shooting up and rushing for the exit on pumping legs.
So there were smart people in this Syndicate after all.
Avo picked up the drone’s control module and cast it to the side, letting it clatter against the ground. Before him, Essus was hugging himself, folding inward as he grew wracked with sobs. “Oh…oh Artad. Oh, Artad, I killed my son! I killed my son, my god! I shouldn’t have come–I’ve killed my son.”
Awkwardly, Avo placed a palm on the weeping man’s shoulder, trying to remember how Walton used to do it. Was easier for Walton though, considering his distinct lack of claws. Avo leaned in, considering what to say. He needed something that could instill a sane baseline. Something to keep the man stable, at least until he could be used against the Syndicate. “Sorry. Don’t like seeing you hurt like this.” Wasn’t entirely a lie. The fact the man had been treated so poorly despite his survival offended Avo’s ethics. “Need you to focus and listen now.”
The father kept crying, holding himself as he shook between choking gasps. Avo leaned in closer. “They did kill your boy. They did steal your dreams from you. Keep the hate. Keep the pain. Will need it. Useful for us. Stay sane. Stay sane and I will give true retribution.”
Avo extended his Ghost-Link and, with a single sting of phantasmal matter, injected a thought into the man's mind: a concept of a memetic weapon, instead of a word. Something that Essus could deliver without drawing attention to Avo, thus avoiding the cortex bomb.
“You–you can help me do this?” Essus asked. “You can make my mind a weapon?”
The man was ragged, bloodied, weary, but now also very pliable. And all it took was the potential for revenge.
“Yes,” Avo said, without a hint of doubt. “Just need some time. A night or two for sequencing. Additional items as well. Need to arrange things. Prepare yourself.”
Dulled by exhaustion, concussion, mania, and sadness, the man looked at him and offered a little less than a weary nod. He tried to grip Avo by the arm, but his weak fingers missed and fell down amidst the sheets. “Promise me you will do this.”
So Avo committed to the easiest pledge of his life, beast, and mind in alignment as he spoke. “Yes. Mirrorhead will die. The Syndicate will die. Everyone involved will die.”
Then, he pulled away from Essus and stepped back. “Stable. Sane. All I need from you.”
For the first time, Avo saw a flash of steel sliding beneath the man’s features. He didn’t reply. He didn’t need to. His thoughtstuff still ebbed, but accretion's currents ran slower than before.
Most pleasing.
When Avo emerged from the hab-cell, two teams of faceless enforcers were just standing around, glaring at him through their reflective helmets as he wandered out, ignoring them.
“He surrendered. Hurt him. I hurt you. Like Rantula.”
He kept going, walking past them before any of them did something stupid like talk to him. He had enough of talking for one day. Wanted to go to sleep. Start fixing his Metamind. Preparing his plan to escape.
Ved and the med-techs were nowhere to be seen. He guessed they got cleared out. And still no Mirrorhead for that matter. Very strange.
For a moment, Avo considered where to go. Frankly, sleeping was the most important thing he could do right now. He could perform Necrothurgy anywhere so long as he was unconscious, thanks to his Metamind. Only issue was that he needed to avoid being disturbed; sequencing ghosts was a delicate art. Getting pulled into awareness with one could leave some lasting damage.
As he wandered down the path he came, he studied the cells and considered if any of them could serve his needs. Too close to the enforcers. Wouldn’t work. He needed something more out of the way, something that–
“Didn’t know ghouls could be gentle,” a voice called out from behind. Heavy footsteps thumped closer. Someone in an exo-rig.
Avo slowed and sighed. He didn’t want to talk. “Go away. Annoyed. Hungry. Eat you.”
Still, the enforcer kept coming, chuckling as he got closer. A port opened along the hip of their rig. Something thin extended outward, reeking of smoke and taped in ringed gold.
Avo prepared to fire his Celerostylus.
Quiet Wars are called quiet wars because they can happen under your nose.
Quite literally. That’s the thing about ‘Clads. It’s not the scale of their powers that hurts the mind, but the unnatural angles they occupy.
Knew a Fallwalker who had a Heaven of Filth once, and let me tell you, deep impressions are made when the first time you meet someone is them materializing in someone else's ass while they were shitting.
Never thought I’d have nightmares going to the toilet, but, hey, the hells does an old woman like me know, right?
-Quail Tavers, School of the Warrens
3-16
Might-Coulda
“Didn’t know ghouls could be gentle,” the enforcer said, a note of amusement in his voice. “Or maybe that just you, huh?”
“Just me.” Avo’s Phys-Sim told him that no weapons were trained on him, but the object in the enforcer’s open rig-port was still unidentified. Not knowing what something was got you dead in New Vultun.
The enforcer reached down. Avo tensed, preparing to fire his Celerostylus and jam a shard of trauma into the man standing across from him.
“Long day for both of us, I guess,” the enforcer said. There was something about their voice that evoked a memory in Avo. Something familiar. He thought he knew this thug from somewhere. A clicking sound popped from the enforcer’s exposed port, and he finally pulled the object free. Avo blinked. Was that a cigar?
“You smoke?” the enforcer asked as he lifted his glass helmet off his head. A messy mop of dirty blonde hair appeared. The enforcer had emerald green eyes modded to shine like gems. His face, gaunt and somewhat sculpted, was small of nose and sharp of chin, giving the man a weasel-like appearance. He met Avo’s glare with a wry smile, the expression more befitting a mischievous child than an enforcer of a criminal organization. “I got the good shit: Sanctus Thrills–originally grown hiflass. Turns your skull all jelly-like. Lights the world up.”
The smokable stank of something horrid to Avo. It was like the bladder of a burning dog. Yet, more than the smell, it was the contents of the substance that bothered him. Hiflass was radioactive. Radioactive wasn’t great when combined with a ghoul’s lifespan. “No. Gives you cancer.”
That earned him a laugh. “So does firing a fusion burner. But thirteen surgeries later, I'm still kickin’.”
“Twelve more,” Avo said.
“Hm?”
“Beat you by twelve more.”
“Oh, right, ghoul. Competitive shit, aren’t you. What’s next, you gonna one-up me by dyin’ more times than I can.” Chambers snickered. If the fool only knew. “So. One of my consangs told me that you gave Rantula an ear exam.”
“Friend of hers?” Avo asked, still ready to finish the fight. Chamber’s face was exposed. Fight could be over before it started. No need to waste a ghost.
Chambers barked another laugh. “Rantula don’t have friends. And you can tell her that Chambers said that.”
“Chambers?” Avo tilted. Chambers. He knew that name. One of the Enforcers that came to secure him from the aftermath of the Crucible. Same person?
“My name,” he said, chuckling. “You managed to bully the flat into telling you his right? That’s what you were whispering to him all that time? Trying to get him to empty his sob-sacks about him and his dead boy. Welp. Here’s mine, free of charge.” Chambers shook his head and snorted. “Fuckin’ ‘fugees, consang. Come here with stars in their eyes and end up crying about the ghosts. 'Must be the only one smart enough to sign this deal. Oh, oh, no he’s enslaving me. Oh, fuck me, my son died.’” Chambers shook his head in annoyance, mimicking a man being leashed. “Ah. Poor, stupid half-strands. Fuck do they think that was going to happen?”
It took Avo a moment to realize the man was trying to make small talk with him. And was using speciesism and cruelty as a crutch against lacking substance. Maybe he thought Avo appreciated the topic.
“Harsh,” Avo replied.
Chambers cackled, his voice like a hyena. The sound was distinct. Something told Avo that the sound would soon become grating. “What? You one of those Tier Expansionists the Nether keeps whining about? One of them ‘save everybody’ Massists? Shit, consang, tell me if you are, ‘cause that combination is so fucking rare that you might as well be a cryptid. Can get you on New Vultun Sunrise and make a million imps from the finder’s fee for that interview.”
Avo grunted in vague non-acknowledgment. He was dimly aware of what an “expansionist” and a “reductionist” were in terms of political ideology. Something about distributing resources evenly amongst people and opening the Arks or the opposite. There were arguments about public-use Heavens as well, but those were usually more fringe-party items to fight over.
Ultimately, Avo didn’t care too much. Wasn’t represented by either leaning anyway, considering the policies of most Guilds' regarding ghouls were to either regard them as illegal bioforms designed for war and therefore FATELESS by default, or just burn them on sight.
“Going to keep him here for now?” Avo asked.
“Who? The flat?” Chambers shrugged. “Well, someone will probably ask him a few questions and then judge him for what he’s worth. He’s a sheen from the oily shit he sweats, so maybe that’s worth something. Least for lube. Could rub our guns on ‘em; oil them up. Makes him more useful than most flats. Definitely more useful than the floaters. Not the squidheads though. Love me some squidheads.”
Chambers alternated between slurs without hate or consideration. The insults came like breaths to Chambers, as if the refugees coming to New Vultun were unfortunate seasonal allergies he had to deal with.
“Let him live?”
“Yep,” Chambers said. “Survived the Crucible, already, didn’t he? And frankly, everyone’s just gonna blame the dead tech on the Reg, ya know? Tough luck. Die when you gotta die in this city is all I’m sayin’. Fuckin’ Mirrorhead, consang. Half-strand’s getting real lax with our performers these days. Ain’t that many tippers into seeing kids run the Crucible is all I’m sayin’. Cold city, but since the rash, real sore spot opened up there.”
The sudden outpouring of casual indifference toward death was at once unsurprising and confounding. Avo wouldn’t have ever considered a Syndicate enforcer to be particularly open-minded, but something told him that Chambers probably genuinely thought they were bonding over this conversation.
That, and their overt willingness to insult their boss right now. Avo distinctly remembered Chambers sounding terrified after the leader of his extraction team got their head sliced up.
Reminded of Mirrorhead’s power, paranoia ebbed through Avo. He stared, studying the reflections around him as if waiting for the Syndicate boss to manifest. But no one came. Mirrorhead continued to disappoint. No one came. It was just Avo, Chambers, and several idiot enforcers in the background, who were only just now realizing that their rigs were too wide to enter the hab-cell?
“What? You checking for the boss in my reflection?” Chambers snorted. “Don’t worry about that fucker right now. He’s hiding. Clams up real scared-like when the ghosts start whisperin’ ‘bout Guilder ‘Clads marching through the neighborhood.
A lightning bolt of pure focus whipped all distractions out of Avo’s mind. “Godclads? Fighting for Sovereignty again? Quiet War?”
Chambers licked his lips and leaned in. “Word through the Deep-Neth is that Highflame and Stormtree are at it again over Nu-Scarrowbur. Shit, No-Dragons might be in on it too, but we might be lookin’ at the end of the Yuulden-Yang Sovereignty–or a least cutting a third player. Highflame’s been makin’ moves to cozy up to the Dowager again. Really working a lever between the No-Dragons and Stormtree.”
“Why?”
“The fuck you mean why? More death tax. More fuel for the Souls.”
That didn’t make sense. “Too much risk,” Avo said, “could spark another war.”
“Maybe they want to,” Chambers took another drag from his hiflass. “Anyway, while the rumors are a-flyin', Mirrorhead is a hidin’. Something about using his powers gives away his position is my guess. Why else would he be scared so shitless? Just wonder what he did to piss off the other Guilders.”
The last sentence drew Avo’s attention. “Think Mirrorhead was a Guilder?”
Chambers looked at him like it was obvious. “Consang, do you see anyone else down here who wears a suit like his and has a Liminal Frame? ‘Course he’s Guilder. Probably a sixth-gen academy dropout, if that. Explains why he fled out here to slum it with us instead of playing against people in his pond. Too small there, but a giant here. Must feel good.”
Somehow, it still felt taboo to be mocking Mirrorhead in public.
“Relax,” Chambers said. “I’ll let you know when you gotta worry.” Awkwardly, Chambers threw his arm over Avo’s shoulder. He was still shorter by at least five inches, even in the armor. “Fuckin’ ghoulshit. Godsdamnit. Why’d the Low Fuckers gotta make you so tall? What’s the point of that? What’d they think bullets respect height?”
Silently, Avo glared, pouring his disdain into the titanium-clad arm that snaked across his shoulder. Chambers was lucky. For all his chattering, his mouth made more than just noise. The rumors he carried and supposed truths he peddled painted a clearer picture of Mirrorhead now. One that was more understandable.
Without a statement, Avo took a step forward and shrugged the arm off.
Chambers took it in stride, hands returning to pluck the smoke from his mouth. “Not much of a toucher, are we?”
“Don’t want to risk rash.”
Chambers’ face contorted in disgust. “Wasn’t going to touch you that way, consang. Trust me, I wouldn’t be into ghouls–and I definitely ain’t giving you my mem-link.” He snickered, miming a gunshot at Avo, who was content to just glare.
Despite the lingering annoyance, there was something else about this Chambers that bothered Avo. Something that parted him from the other enforcers. Namely, he wasn't scared of him. At all.
Placing the hiflass back between his lips, Chambers eyed Avo with a wry grin. But just as he opened his mouth, he went silent. He shrugged. “Welp. Break’s over. ‘Clads might be clearing out. Got ten minutes before the boss is back to spying on us.”
He shrugged. “Word of advice. What you did to Rantula? Play it off straight-like. Don’t be coy. Don’t bullshit him. Just act real ghoul-like. Her mind’s good and fucked with what you did. Boss is gonna be pissed, but you’re probably safe. He ain’t gonna piss away two investments when you just made sure he lost one.”
Avo grunted. This was expected. Still, the advice was a surprise. Helpful, in a way, even. Playing to Mirrorhead’s ego had been Avo’s original plan, but playing to the extremes might also augment the former.
“Thanks,” Avo said. A drone flew by scanning the area. Chambers looked at the ground, trying to stay silent for once. “Question. Want sleep. Looking for place.”
Chambers nodded. “Well, after what you pulled, I wouldn’t recommend you close your eyes around–” He shot a look at the other enforcers. “--My sort. As I said. Rantula: not many friends, but still, you fucked up a Conflux hitter in front of all the other hitters. Hells, more than that, you made them all think of the bad old days during the Uprising. Not great. Might just end with you suddenly choking on your tongue while asleep.”
“Yeah,” Avo said. He winced. Right. Consequences for the killing. The thought hadn’t even occurred to him till now. Walton would’ve been disappointed. Avo was disappointed in himself. He should’ve foreseen this, even if he wouldn’t have done anything differently.
Running his tongue along the insides of his cheek, Chambers tilted his head at Avo and winked. “I might-could help you there.”
“Might-could?” Avo asked.
“Might-could,” Chambers said. “Same way you might-could do me a favor.”
Expected. Nothing was ever for free. “What’s the dive?”
A broad grin spread over Chambers’ face. “You ‘got’ that shiny new rig that Mirrorhead conveniently stacked in your favor. Well, you or Rantula. Probably didn’t care which of you won so long as the other lived. Anyway, might need you to help me pick up a package. Total milk-run. Trust me.”
Trust was another one of those things that got you dead in New Vultun. But without Chambers, an “accident” might find him while he was asleep anyway. “Better be milk-run.”
“Come on,” Chambers said, putting both hands over his heart. “You’d eat me if I lied to you.”
“Not if dead.”
“Mirrorhead will find a new ghoul to eat me if I lost you.”
Avo paused. That, however, was indisputably true. “Fine.”
Chambers produced a fob of some kind. Avo squinted.“Omnitech Solutions” was burned along its backside, a double-layered infinity sign gleaming.
“It’s the access marker to the busted Galeslither. Inside should still got enough room for even a bean pole like you. Might need to bend those arms though.”
Avo studied his limbs. The length was an old issue. Even now, wearing his new stolen jacket, the garment clung to him more like a vest, his arms far extending the coverage of the sleeves. Avo took the marker and grunted. “Thanks.”
“Jaus, he can be polite too,” Chambers said, waving his hands in mock horror. Avo stared blankly.
“Think you're funny?” Avo asked.
Chambers chuckled. “Eventually. I’m more of a quantity guy than a quality guy.”
“Shows.”
“Fuckin’ ouch, ghoulie. Breaking my hearts.”
“Get another. Where is Galeslither?”
“Six-hundredth floor,” Chambers added. “Just follow the repair drones. Should be covered in a tarp. Ain’t that many actual personnel up there. Not since the Scalpers attacked.”
Scalper. Another Syndicate. The one that fired a missile at them. Conflux had more enemies that didn’t fear a Godclad, it seemed.
Avo shook his head. “No organization.”
“Hm?” Chambers asked.
“Expected some kind of…discipline.”
Chambers sneered. “Mirrorhead don’t want an army, consang. We’re just muscle. We start getting together and actually practicing, we might end up getting ideas instead of just following orders. Can’t have that.”
Avo wasn’t sure what to say about that. Conflux was increasingly looking like an organization that existed despite seemingly no effort being put into its structuring, organization, or long-term goals. It was like the entire Syndicate was just a blunt instrument for Mirrorhead to wield and apply pressure. Something about that idea clung to Avo’s thoughts like tar, but his brain was too fogged with exhaustion to think. He needed sleep. More importantly, he needed to finally sequence his ghosts.
“Going up now,” Avo said. “Sleep. Find me for ‘milk-run’ later.”
Chambers gave him a half-hearted salute. “Hope the boss doesn’t rough you up too much. Maybe next time you won’t be a glassjaw and have a smoke with me”
Avo walked away. “Next time.”
Making his way back to the elevator was more an endeavor of time than it was navigation. Again, Avo questioned the need for one Syndicate to operate an entire megablock, especially with so much of it being outright rubble or blockaded.
By the time he found his way, his want of sleep had become a descending hail weight on his skull. He noticed that his hands were shaking and that his body was shivering beyond his control. A spot of hunger was creeping back into him already. He frowned. That was fast. Probably the symbiote, then. Burning through his metabolism as well.
Again, nothing was for free.
Hitting the call icon, Avo leaned his head against the cold matter of the wall as he waited for the elevator to descend. Too much has happened to him in one day. Too much. Only now did he have a chance to even just think. Reflect.
As the doors opened, he stumbled through and entered six hundred into the interface. Leaning against the rails, he found himself anticipating the rise back past ground level, waiting to study the ebontas again. Better change of scenery than the endless mirror, plascrete, and rusted metal of the subterranean anyhow.
Something cracked next to him. Avo sighed.
By this point, he was too weary to even react in surprise as Mirrorhead slipped into existence through the reflection of the walls to the right. The Syndicate boss adjusted his suit. There was a stiffness to his posture that Avo hadn’t seen before. A projection of rigidity that looked unnatural, even for Mirrorhead.
Like a circling wolf, the Godclad deliberately crossed around behind Avo, a spot of silence and nothing to the ghoul’s senses. Mirrorhead loomed as he passed Avo’s left shoulder, his presence making up for his middling height.
“I heard,” Mirrorhead said, his smooth baritone betraying nothing but coldness, “that you had a busy day.”
“OriThaum would kindly like to remind all citizens that possessing Guild intellectual property within your private Metamind is strictly prohibited.
Please ensure that your workplace memories have been properly stored in your Guild-provided NooProx instead. Failure to adhere to Guild guidelines will result in a decrease in your citizenship merit rating, a credit fine, and a scheduled memory-extraction appointment (free of charge)."
-OriThaum Public Nether PSA
3-17
Performance Review
Within the elevator, the glass cracked, shards peeling inwards in jagged symmetry, like daggers dripping from daggers. The sheer presence of Mirrorhead’s Heaven manifested at such a close proximity gripped at Avo’s chest. It was like he was a flame burning with a flame, hoping the greater fire did not notice; did not swallow him.
“Have you nothing to report? Mirrorhead asked, tilting his head at Avo.
The glass inched inward, drifting away from the walls toward Avo. The room shrank. Thirty square feet before. Now, perhaps twenty-five.
Yet, he stole inspiration from Mirrorhead himself, and took to being a expressionless reflection; betraying nothing, the ghoul turned to address its supposed master, face blank of expression, but not of thought. “Was fun. Breaking Rantula’s flesh.”
He pushed forth his first lure to the Syndicate boss. The statement was obvious, but Mirrorhead sought more than meager feelings. They must have if they proceeded in an inquiry so deliberately tense.
Obtuse as always, the Syndicate Godclad gazed upon his unknown adversary and let the silence boil the atmosphere between them. Avo hated talking to Mirrorhead. Hated the lack of any tells coming from his enemy. For all intents and purposes, the Sydnicate boss was a blank spot in the room–a void which all flowed inward, but nothing came out, as if descending into a bottomless chasm.
The shards drifted inward another inch.
“I believe,” Mirrorhead said, “I specified my will.”
Avo grunted. “You did.”
“And do you believe,” Mirrorhead continued. Their voice was flat but the glass crackled with tension, like the snapping jaws of a beast half-submerged in reflection. “that you followed my will?”
The consideration, then, that Mirrorhead would just draw the glass in and shred him was not far from Avo’s mind. The beast inside him rattled against the will-wrought cage that was Avo’s discipline, trying to get him to attack pre-emptively, to escape. Stealing quiet breaths, Avo tempered himself.
“No,” Avo said, committing to Chambers’ advice. No point in denying what was obvious. A direct insult after humiliation might just drive Mirrorhead to see an end to this farce, regardless of investment or not.
The blades sank in–the jaws of the Heaven close. The Twice-Walker was near now, its leviathan sending ripples beneath the flesh of reality.
“And why did you spite my will?” Mirrorhead asked, voice dropping to a chilled rumble. “Was the gift not enough? Was my attempt to make something from your mongrel existence too displeasing for you?”
“No,” Avo said, trying to ignore the glinting shards in his periphery. “Not your problem.”
“Then–”
“Ghoul,” Avo interrupted, leaning down to show Mirrorhead his fangs.
For the first time since he could remember, the Syndicate boss took a step back. The beast hissed with delight. A crack, perhaps. A show of human surprise or weakness? Avo let hope and elation wash through him without holding onto it. He continued.
“You tried. I failed.” More honesty. Twisted honesty. Interpretive honesty. But honesty nonetheless. That’s what Mirrorhead always wanted, but only honesty that was palatable to him; something that absolved the man at the top of all burdens or mistakes. “Didn’t touch her mind. Not directly. Just wanted to work on the flesh. At first.”
“Then. What. Changed?” Mirrorhead asked. The Godclad had caught himself, replanting his heel and pressing back into Avo. Across the expansive of the Syndicate boss’ mirror-bright skull, Avo saw the sharded wings draw closer but burdened with a new languor.
Maybe this was all a game of pressure with the Godclad. Maybe in going along with what Mirrorhead wanted to hear but still no breaking, Avo had found himself slipping between the cracked edges.
Maybe.
“She cried out,” Avo said. “She was in pain. Had to hurt her more.”
Mirrorhead, for all intents and purposes, was a weaponized enigma. Someone to always keep you guessing, always a breath between praise and violence. Right then, the shards shivered. One pulled away from all the others, spinning and nicking through the surface skin at the base of Avo’s neck.
“And so you defied my want?”
“And so I fell to nature.”
A flatness slacked across Mirrorhead’s shoulders. A rigidity was leaking out from his posture. His head twisted momentarily, as if in disappointment. Had he come seeking violence? Was this because he had to hide from his rivals? Feelings of weakness he wanted to plug with a dose of inflicted control?
These questions could go a long way to providing more leverage to use against Mirrorhead. It was always easier to find the cracks in someone’s mind if you know the architecture better.
“You know, ghoul,” Mirrorhead said, tone thin with a speckle of frustration, “I have to admit. I hate talking with you. Hate how I can’t read you. Hate the lack of a heart beating in your chest. Hate how still you stand. Yet, I find myself grudgingly wanting to commend you for your honesty. Your…awareness.”
Suddenly, his arm blurred, seizing Avo by the collar. Avo struggled, but as with before, whatever force he sent toward Mirrorhead flowed back from another reflection. With his Phys-Sim spraying error strings into his cog-feed, Avo found himself unable to track the flowing vectors of momentum. There was no obvious conduit between the transfer of forces, no visible link. Yet, as Mirrorhead pressed him back, driving the single shard left floating into the base of his skull, Avo noticed something.
The light spilling across Mirrorhead’s body was twisting. Unnaturally so.
“I have half a heart to be done with you, Moonblood,” Mirrorhead said. The shard sank in an inch deeper. Avo felt its coldness radiating out from the center behind his skull. He tried to reach, but Mirrorhead caught his hand, halting him in an unshakable grip. “But I am not a creature of impulse. Not like you.”
With a disgusted snort, the Sydnicate boss tore the shard out from Avo, casting it back at the walls with all the others. The shattered pieces of glass fused back together, mending as if never broken.
Mirrorhead released Avo’s hand, fingers coming free first, turning into a gesture of an upward-facing palm. “I see now that in you, nurture, though stronger than your kindred, still cannot rise about the baseness of your design.”
“Way I am,” Avo said, words thrown out in half-hearted honesty.
Baseness of his design. Which of them made imps streaming the murder of children again? And what excused Mirrorhead from this habit? Did he also have an instinctive urge to kill and devour and pleasure himself from the pain of others?
Between nature and nurture, Walton thought it more shameful to succumb to depravity when one had tasted the latter. Enlightenment, too often, came short of discipline and found itself as more title instead of practice.
“Still,” Mirrorhead said. “Despite your involuntary insolence, the day has proven fruitful. You are a popular specimen among the viewers. Already, many have called for you and shared remembrances of your deeds across their personal domains. It will take my organization some time to scrub your…misdeeds with Rantula, however. Such a thing looks poorly if I am to sell you as a gleam.”
“Gleam?”
“A circuit term. You are, for the effect of my promotion, a virtuous character rather than a savage one. Gleams. And Rusts.”
More entertainment marketing.
“Alas,” Mirrorhead said, drawing his hand as if he was snatching a piece of Avo with it. “Your…performance against Rantula. That was also unexpected. I expected you to frustrate her at best. I expected you to withstand her. To show that she couldn’t hurt you. Not in the way that mattered. Your victory was supposed to be one of engendered sympathy, not of such totality. Of course, she is to blame as well for deciding to lose to you.”
Avo tilted his head. Yes. That’s why Rantula lost: she decided to. Nothing to do with him. Just like she decided to get mutilated after. “Told me to break her.”
“The intent was for you to try,” Mirrorhead said. “To see if you would attempt it, despite the disparity between the two of you. In this, you were a most loyal instrument.”
Avo just stared. Mirrorhead, quite possibly, was the single worst boss in New Vultun. His will was apparently shape-shifting and required those that served him to be mind-reading savants to decipher. Little wonder Conflux was the way it was; there were no standards of operation because the standards changed to whatever philosophical musings Mirrorhead found in his ambrosia that morning.
Mirrorhead turned away from him just as they surfaced above the basement floors, greeting the ebontas on reflex. He clasped his arms behind his back.
“Instead,” Mirrorhead continued, “you broke her. And broke her in front of my other enforcers. How shameful on her part.” Mirrorhead twisted ever slightly to stare at Avo. “It would have been a mercy to kill her. That which you took from her in pride will never heal. And without her pride and reputation, her kind does not last long before another consumes them to inherit power and privilege.”
Avo had no idea where Mirrorhead was leading him with this spiel. “So. I’m going to get her things?”
A low sigh came from Mirrorhead. “No, ghoul. You will most certainly not be getting her things. Her things belong to me now. Because they came from me in the first place. From whence, to whence. What you will be getting are a rig and a minder.”
“A minder,” Avo asked, struggling not to sigh himself. The last thing he needed was someone watching him all the time. Mirrorhead was already doing that.
“Indeed. Someone who can stop you from committing any potential follies before you foolishly capitulate to your urges.”
“Good,” Avo grunted. “Thanks.”
“You are most welcome,” Mirrorhead said. Suddenly, Avo found the Godclad’s index finger an inch from his eye, a jutting point of glass thrust out at him.
“Make no mistake,” Mirrorhead said, inching closer to Avo, who struggled against every instinct not to fight back, or at least create some distance, “I am furious that you cost me a valuable hitter. Furious. Her worth as a legbreaker is done. And I will have to organize a raid on some unfortunate third party in my vicinity to clear this stain of humiliation inflicting my enforcers.”
Avo stared at the levels descending through the elevator’s interface. Almost there. Something about the doors opening just made him feel better. He never wanted to be in another elevator in his life thanks to Mirrorhead.
“There is also the matter of the refugee,” Mirrorhead said. “I hear that you managed to save him. Not only that. You managed to talk him down into surrendering after he killed one of my medical technicians. Is this true?”
Avo grunted. “Yes. Shock. Stress. Not well.”
“Why did you not…kill him?” Mirrorhead asked. “It is your nature, is it not?”
Avo thought for a moment. “Was full.”
“And that was all it took.”
“Not complicated.”
Mirrorhead adjusted his collar. “I suppose not. Tell me: what would you do of someone like him?”
That made Avo wonder if he could even use the father as a mem-weapon platform anymore. If Mirrorhead wanted to make an example of the father, there wasn’t much that could be done. “Fix him. Then let him go.”
“Free of charge?” Mirrorhead asked.
“Made you money in the Crucible.”
“Ah,” Mirrorhead said. “I suppose you are right. And likely more than that tech was worth.” The Syndicate boss considered his options for a moment. “I will see if I can find a new use for him. Muscle is certainly out of the question. I saw how he fought. Perhaps as an organ farm…”
A twitching wince flashed across Avo’s face. Now the question was if Essus would be sane. Organ farms grown inside people were usually something north of agonizing.
More importantly, though, a slow understanding of Mirrorhead began forming in Avo’s mind. The man was addicted to a twisted kind of arithmetic. He didn’t see the events in between, focusing only on outcomes. Pluses made him like you. Minuses in any form made him mad.
The task of appeasing him suddenly seemed a lot more surmountable.
“Shame about the Reg, though,” Mirrorhead said. “Would have been nice to have one of those.” He chuckled. “I had an idea for her. Wanted to keep her with you, on the same team. The same circuit. Old enemies. Now allies. Quite a sell. Brings back the old days.”
Avo grunted, playing along. “Old days.”
The elevator chimed. The door slid open.
“Quite the first day,” Mirrorhead said. “Would you not agree?”
“Quite.”
“Are you going to insult me again with your defiance?”
Insult? Avo planned to eat him and suckle the marrow from his bones. Perhaps even claim a new Heaven in the process. “No.”
“Good,” Mirrorhead gestured forward, allowing Avo passage. “Be on your way then. Consider yourself…spared of duty. Until I call for you. Or send someone for you.”
Tentatively, Avo made his retreat from the opened elevator doors. He was a step across the threshold when Mirrorhead called out to him again.
“One more thing,” Mirrorhead said, halting the closing doors. “Do you…have any idea on how the Regular might have escaped. She supposedly had no offensive phantasmics. Yet…the guard I had watching her seems to be missing an intact ghost.”
Avo went still. If he had a heart, it would have skipped a beat. “She’s a Reg. Who know’s what she has.”
Mirrorhead considered his words with a languid chuckle. “Words learned from experience.” The Godclad released the door and faded from sight as it shut.
Avo found himself alone beneath a buzzing light. The halls were layered in hardened plascrete and lined with strip-shaped construction lights. Ahead, he could hear drones buzzing. Shooting another look over his shoulder, he proceeded onward, pulling the golem’s marker from his pocket.
One day and he already had enough of Mirrorhead. Enough of him, and his entire Syndicate. Avo wouldn’t abide by this. Why should he when he had to power to change things? Just one more kill. Just one more and he could have a Hell–
Avo considered that. He had no idea how that might manifest. If Mirrorhead would notice and realize he was also a Godclad. Paranoia rose from within. He needed to make the kill while Mirrorhead was distracted, and clean the evidence afterward.
To do that, he might just need a new phantasmic.
Before more trouble could find him, Avo redoubled his pace, making for his temporary shelter. Soon, he would slumber, and in waking dreams, he would reconstruct the fortress that his Metamind needed to be.
Memory is a weakness; memory is a weapon; memory is a place; memory is water.
Memory, ultimately then, is a thing of modularity and malleability. But still–and do not forget this–memory is matter incorporeal.
And it must be the will of the Necrojack that infuses it.
-Forge of the Fallen
3-18
Instruments of Memory
Ved was lying about the state of the Galeslither. First, it wasn't in the motor pool, it was rotting away in a quarantined cesspit. Second, the golem wasn’t just broken–its Heaven was outright missing. Upon approaching, Avo tasted no resonance ebbing from its shell, no shine of the dismembered flame that once burned within all gods. Instead, the narrow combat platform lay in three jointed segments some thirty feet long. It looked almost train-like in its design, with a roundel-shaped head and a deflated lattice made from unknown materials clinging to its back.
Rust coated its exterior as well. A sign of decay and negligence. Truly, Conflux kept their treasures like trash, leaving something that could still be salvaged to languish instead. A picture began to form in his head regarding the Syndicate’s woes. Lingering hisses of whispering ghosts trailed in the air–the unmistakable presence of decaying mem-contagion strands snaking uselessly against Avo’s wards.
Someone was targeting Conflux. And nigh constantly. Might even be the same group that jocked those missiles after him just as he left the Crucible and entered the gutters.
Something to consider.
Producing his mem-marker, Avo held up the small stick-like device as it pulsed a spray of memories from its micro-locus. The ghosts it cast out splashed over the golem as it began to groan, a door on its side hissing and grinding open with a squeal.
Looking around to ascertain there was no one else visibly or phantasmally tracking him, Avo studied the room. Shredded tarps and sloppily poured plascrete were the aesthetic of this floor. Clumps of hardened matter sealed former breaches while the light shone through the tears on the tarps. A large gate was fused into the walls; its metal frame melted in pools that spilled into webbed fissures.
This might’ve been where aerial vehicles could launch from. Or it was, before the block was made so destitute, so damaged.
Stepping into the golem required Avo to dip his head. Clearly, this was not designed with ghouls in mind. The primary control module was located in the middle segment of the golem, which itself was split into an upper piloting gimbal and two lower auxiliary stations. Neither gimbal nor stations would serve his purpose; he simply wouldn’t fit. However, the walkway between the two stations offered eight feet of room.
Activating the marker again, Avo laid down upon the soothing chill of the ground before closing doors could even shut away the outside lights. Between two dormant loci–now seated at the center of concentric slots–he settled his head and embraced the comfort of darkness. It might’ve taken promising Chambers a favor for the marker to sleep within this golem, but at that moment, it was absolutely worth it.
No noise.
No distractions.
No Mirrorhead.
Just him, his Metamind, and the darkness.
Good enough conditions to begin reconstruction.
Stretching out his neck one final time, Avo plucked mem-data from the local locus and looked at the time. It was five in the afternoon. Which meant that he had been awake for nearly eighteen hours now since the night before.
He didn’t know how much time he would have to himself for his sequencing, but at least for now, it seemed that his use to Mirrorhead had run its course for a day. Still meant that he needed to prepare and modify his essential phantasmics before anything else.
Best that he got his sequencing completed before someone else got the drop on him. Avo preferred to hold the initiative instead of reacting. And these days, he had done a lot of reacting.
With a thought, he set a timer for six hours. Six hours wasn’t much, but he wasn’t in his workshop and didn’t have the tools he needed to tune complex constructs. Thankfully, what he needed right now wouldn’t require anything too complicated, though he could do with more ghosts.
GHOSTS - [42]
Forty-two was workable, but not ideal. Much like with his Liminal Frame, he needed to claim more victims. Two hundred offered a much vaster expanse of options. That was where a Metamind went from a mere tool to being a phantasmal operations platform.
Avo shook his head. Ifs, buts, and coulds. Those didn't matter. He needed to focus on the now.
“Prepare dive,” he said to his Metamind.
RECEIVED
INITIALIZING META-DIVE
He could have done the command mentally, but it was better enunciated. More brain activity for the Metamind to pick up; sped up the descent of his consciousness. A white flash splashed across his cog-feed, spilling over his vision like stretching needles.
And suddenly, as if a blade had cut him free from the strings tethering himself to the weight of his body, Avo plunged into his own mind.
Like a raindrop of pure color, he fell into a vast grey expanse. The horizon around him was factory setting, barely adjusted. This Metamind must’ve been new. Just recently forked from a clone of his mind, but not tuned into a palace yet.
Guiding himself down like a tungsten rod from the Heavens, Avo envisioned the memory that would form the foundations of this place. The memory came to Avo clear and solid, refined and shaped through years of visualization. And with this memory swelling inside him like a seed, he plunged into the greyness of the land. Out the clay-like depths, he rose, pushing free from the shapeless nothing as around him the megablock of his youth rose, a bright “thirteen” shining on its side.
With four arches running across its corners and an open-air lobby, detail began to bleed from Avo’s mind into the building around him. Doors, columns, and spiraling jump-tubes spread through the building like veins. A single blackdred tree stood, three hundred feet high and half again as wide, its spear-like branches expanding from the tumorous growths that domed its bark. Next to the tree, a web of tubes splashed, bodies flitting to and fro across the entirety of the block. Slowly, the lobby took shape, spreading until the light began shining through between the dancing holo-ads of the entrance.
Shaped from the matter of thought itself, Avo pulled himself loose from the soil of his mind and made to leave his still-growing home.
Much of the palace was only surface deep. He knew that beyond the doors and walls, in places where he hadn’t imagined or remembered, there would be only greyness again. But that was unimportant. The lobby; the tree; the jump-tubes; the holographic advertisements. Those were the things that rooted his mind and helped serve as a junction to join the other ghost-made memory constructs.
And with that in mind, Avo left, stepping beyond the threshold of his Metamind’s new central nexus to see his current inventory of phantasmics.
Stepping past small food stalls and the neuro-cade game consoles, he descended the steps of the block and found himself standing before an empty street, shining a resplendent hue of opal beneath the violet gaze of the darkstar.
On the horizon, a grand vortex of ghosts swirled, their etheric forms filled with the shapes of objects and people spinning, shrouding the insides of Avo’s mind behind a veil of roaring traumas. Out of everything, at least the wards were begrudgingly acceptable, though they were functionally simple to pierce if the opposition had enough pressure.
That was as far as his palace could stretch for now. The total space that the total cog-cap forty-two ghosts could simulate, anyway. It would do for now. But he would need to expand, both vertically and horizontally soon. In the meantime, Avo turned his attention to his phantasmics and immediately found himself wincing.
Dead gods. The structure sequencing of his phantasmics was horrible.
Bleeding into the street, five crude lanes of featureless grey extended outward, connecting the ordered design of his megablock to five very different structures that stood waxen with chaotic memories dolloping from their structures. So poorly held together they were that Avo couldn’t even tell what he was looking at.
Memories had structures and ghosts enforced them–molded them. But there was a limit to what they could do when the design wasn’t clear. The cost of bad sequencing was either an unusable construct, a self-corrupting construct, or a construct that demanded far more attention from the ghosts than it needed.
With a command, he rematerialized high up into the air. With another, he called upon all his ghosts, and, despite the risks, momentarily drew as many ghosts away from his wards as he could without collapsing them outright.
Forty rippling visages descended down on strings of thought, bound to his Metamind. Forty floated there, just staring at him, their faces attentive, the fragments of their minds shining, his will flowing into them through sinews of thought.
Each of these ghosts offered tithes of memories to provide the architectural composition of the phantasmics below. As he scanned his gaze over each of his constructs, his Metamind filtered the requirements directly into his mind.
Normally, he would have spent hours to months just working a single ghost, tuning and pruning the memories until there were no flaws left in the structure. Now, with what little time he had, his need was going to be more focused on his goals.
Presently, he needed two things: more meticulous wards and more distance should he need to assail an enemy mind. Something that could let him attack from beyond visual range.
And thankfully, Avo already had an idea about how to deal with the latter.
[GHOST-LINK] COG-CAP: 6 SEQUENCES (FIXED)
STRUCTURE: “A LETTER DRIFTING, CHASED BY A SCRAMBLING NU-DOG AS AEROVEC FLIES IN THE DISTANCE”
FUNCTION: DELIVERS COG-DATA TO A CORRESPONDING WITHIN VISUAL RANGE.
[SPECTER] COG-CAP: 15 SEQUENCES (BASELINE)
STRUCTURE: “A BODKIN DRONE FALLS TO STRIKE A COUNTRYSIDE HOME, KILLING A MAN EATING ALONE AT A TABLE
FUNCTION: ALLOWS THE EXTENSION OF CONSCIOUS AWARENESS BY 60 FEET; CAN BE EXTENDED BY MULTIPLES SHOULD MORE SEQUENCES BE USED
In total, both would occupy twenty-one of his ghosts, as each ghost could only simulate a sequence of memory at a time. And to make matters worse, since he didn’t have the time to spend weaving all his ghosts together using points of symmetry, all he had were individual circuits instead of a proper network. This meant that only certain ghosts could fuel certain phantasmics: not every ghost had the right memories to draw from to flesh out a structure.
Very inefficient.
Sorting through his current inventory, Avo saw that he actually only had twenty-eight ghosts that could offer the requisite memories to run the Specter. Forty could feed the Ghost-Link though, so there was some overlap.
Most people died knowing what an aerovec, nu-dog, and letter were. The scene was easy to create.
But not every ghost knew what a bodkin was, nor had the memories to approximate its design.
Such were the limitations of cognition. You couldn’t create what your ghosts didn’t know, after all. To this regard, phantasmics were much like blueprints more than anything–specific constructs mined from someone bearing enough mental significance to ripple across a plane of thought.
Fortunately, Avo knew enough of the art that he could reduce the required upkeep.
Dismantling the structures of both the Specter and Ghost-Link, he began to line them based on points of memetic symmetry. Generally, the flowing winds and backgrounds could be left to be simulated by a single ghost. That reduced the total sequence required by one. He could probably get another off. One of these minds was able to simulate both a Bodkin and a standard aerovec.
Slowly, he merged the two memories and planted them back in his mindscape.
Before the road in front of his megablock now sprinted a six-legged nu-dog, yapping at a flying letter while behind it, a flitting vehicle snapped down, striking a villa before expanding into a ball of fire. The memory stuttered. The memory looped. The dog had five legs this time.
Avo frowned. There was probably a memetic bleedover happening between the memories of his ghosts–two different ghosts were remembering two very different morphs of nu-dog and the simulation was getting confused about which one to simulate.
Part of Avo wanted to dive in and prune the mistake now. His better sense told him not to. Once he started, he wouldn't be able to stop. This would do for now. He renamed his newly merged phantasmic and moved on.
[WHISPER] COG-CAP: 19 SEQUENCES (BASELINE)
STRUCTURE–
Avo skipped that. He could already see the structure. It looked like it could simulate fine. Wasn’t clashing with anything else in his mind.
FUNCTION: ALLOWS THE EXTENSION OF CONSCIOUS AWARENESS BY 60 FEET AND THE DELIVERANCE OF COG-DATA WITHIN SAID FIELD OF AWARENESS; CAN BE EXTENDED BY MULTIPLES SHOULD MORE SEQUENCES BE USED
This would allow him to thought-shiv someone through a wall, at the very least. Saved him the trouble of getting close. Of course, he was still burning a ghost due to using them as a fragmentation weapon. But there was no easy way to replicate the functions of an offensive phantasmic like a Ghostjack.
Of course, he probably didn’t want to build something that ghost-intensive or sequence-demanding either. Not unless he wanted Mirrorhead to get suspicious and trigger the cortex bomb, that was.
With his new phantasmic made, Avo grouped the ghosts that fed its sequences into a specific area of the palace. It would make pruning them easier when he had the time. Always better to have a stable of ghosts specifically dedicated to keeping a phantasmic functional.
Turning his attention to his other constructs, he passed by the Phys-Sim without too much attention.
[PHYS-SIM] COG-CAP: 18 SEQUENCES (FIXED)
STRUCTURE: “A MISSILE LOCKED TO AN AEROVEC, EVER INCHING CLOSER, DODGING INCOMING POINT DEFENSE FIRE”
FUNCTION: CALCULATES THE ACCELERATION VECTORS AND IMPACT LANES OF UP TO TWELVE DYNAMIC OBJECTS
He could probably improve on it, but that was going to require more components. Better design. Best to leave it for now. Focus on his wards. With his current cog-cap limitations, he doubted he would be running the Phys-Sim and the Whisper at the same time anyway. He just didn’t have the sequences between those two and his wards.
Uninstalling his Whisper for a moment, he let his Phys-Sim run. Overhead, he watched as the missile chased the non-descript aerovec, bullets tracing through the air in a ballet of violence.
Good. No issue.
He moved on to the final modification he wanted to make this night: the wards.
[OSARAI MEMGUARD] COG-CAP: 20 SEQUENCES (BASELINE)
STRUCTURE: “A HURRICANE TWISTING AND HURTLING SCREAMING FIGURES AND BROKEN STRUCTURES”
FUNCTION: GUARDS THE MIND USING A LAYER OF TRAUMATIC MEMORIES: CAPABLE OF WITHSTANDING AND REFORMING AGAINST HEAVY-MASS PHANTASMAL INTRUSIONS; VULNERABLE TO NARROW-BUILD INVADERS.
Avo frowned. No reason that should have eaten up the attention of twenty ghosts. The only good thing was that pretty much all his ghosts could simulate the structure needed. Still, the enhancement here was simple but time-consuming.
He would make the storm thicker–he would bind the trauma of the ghosts into a lattice where he could. There was another thing all Necrojacks could do, but few mastered. Linking symmetrical memories together.
For the remainder of his time, he worked, binding similar traumas together from ghost to ghost, weaving what used to be mere milestones along the storm's border into a net. From his mind, he stitched memories. The first two he joined were between Hap-Tat and Little Vicious. Turns out, both had lost nu-dogs in their time. The only difference was Hap-Tat lost an actual dog and Little Vicious watched her ten-foot tall dog-looking bioform get turned into paste by a gauss-cannon fired from a block over.
He was about to connect another two when a dull ringing sounded from on high. Avo froze, stopping his work as he waited, wondering if it was a secondhand memory bleeding over into his mind, or if he was actually–
The ringing grew to a hammering then. Definitely not a memory.
EXTERNAL PRESENCE DETECTED
RETURN TO CONSCIOUSNESS?
Avo stared glumly at his wards, barely fractionally strengthened. No time. Never enough time. At least he planted his foundations down. Let him continue building his palace next time. Make things easier for himself.
“Yes,” he said, turning to stare at his megablock. “End dive.”
Light suddenly flashed into Avo’s eyes. His body still felt tired and sore but his mind was refreshed; ghosts drained most of the cognitive burden while he worked, Metamind lucid while his brain slumbered.
Blinking, he heard the hammering sound thumping against the door to the golem again. Turning, he spotted a glint of thoughtstuff shining through the wall.
“Mornin’, consang. Sleep good? Did you dream any ghoulie dreams?” Chambers said, voice muffled by the plating of the Galeslither.
Didn’t look like there was anyone else but Chambers. Did he want the favor back already?
“No,” Avo said, grunting as he felt a tension headache begin to build. His ligaments were screaming. It felt like his joints were on fire. His body was still punishing him for abusing the Celerostylus.
“Asked you two questions; you just gonna answer with no.”
“Yes.”
“Real sociable. Do I need to lube your conversational bits up with a daily hostage incident so that I can get a full sentence out of you? I think I can still find the flat. Hand him an actual gun this time. See how many techs he takes hostage and how many he kills.”
“No,” Avo said, rubbing his head. “You. Why are you here?”
“Gotta take you to go rig-fitting. Time for you to put the Nightmantis on. Take it for a test run. Mirrorhead’s orders. Turns out, since ol’ Chambers is the only one willing to deal with you, so you might’ve just got my ass a promotion. Looks like I’m your personal nanny now, Moonblood.”
The enforcer laughed his hyena-like laugh. Avo stared at the ground and sighed in annoyance.
At least he was getting a plate of armor out of the deal.
Most Syndicate “combat” exoskeletons are usually bashed together from centuries-old industrial or explorer variants. Don’t get spoofed by these half-strands. Their promos are gonna be fake and the shit you get will be years out of date.
Guild licensing issues. All it takes is a ghost-sweep from our owners up the Tiers to find if anything’s got leaked. Then…well, then they start scalpelling people from on high.
Here's something to remember: You don’t own what you can’t keep someone else from taking. Not your feelings, thoughts, materials, or even your death.
Not in New Vultun.
-Quail Tavers, School of the Warrens
4-1
The Exo-Rig
The armory was some two hundred levels down, and so, seizing the opportunity, Avo made a brief pitstop in the mess hall to feed himself again. His bones and muscles felt raw. Like a chisel had run up and through his insides, working pockets of pain into him.
For the Celerostylus to still inflict such torment on his body was a sign of deeper nerve damage. His surface biomass should be healed. But the more intricate systems within him had yet to adapt to this new state of suffering.
Stumbling over to the auto-chefs as Chambers whined behind him, Avo punched a request for a ten-thousand-calorie meal. Listening to the machine hum and churn, he grabbed his quota. And reconsidered. He made the meal twenty, just in case.
“What’s that fucking noise I keep hearing?” Chambers asked. They leaned back as they watched the auto-chef rattle, straining to produce such a dense meal. “The hells did you order?”
“Nutri-paste,” Avo said. It wouldn’t taste very well, but it was a solid dose of calories. It'd be like taking bites directly from a biocell. From such nourishment, he may yet last the day without the need to eat again, but Avo doubted that. There was a burgeoning tension around him in the air; fated violence that clung to him like an invisible shroud. Better that he had the energy to heal when he needed it.
“No shit?” Chambers continued. “The thing sounds like it's goddamn screaming. What’d you do to it? Ask it for a ten-thousand calorie tube of sludge?”
“Twenty.”
“Jaus? You trying to give our godsdamned machines a mechanical hernia?” Chambers snickered as if having a hyperactive metabolism was a punchline of some sort. “Fuck, man the techs are gonna hate you. Your monthly meal expenditures have to be insane.”
Such was why he started his own nu-fish farm and aratnid nests. Supplementing his diet using rapidly breeding bioforms cost less than constant takeout and was more effective than trying to store tons of meat. The shipping would have drawn too much attention as well, there was always a chance that someone could have audited him on his suspicious meat consumption. Wasn’t something he wanted to deal with.
After a painful few mechanical groans, a hefty tube of paste slid out from the processing slot as a coiling rope of thick sludge. Noticing a distinct lack of a bowl, Avo shrugged and took the slug-like texture of his meal into his hand.
The bubblegum taste of the meal was most unwelcome.
“Let’s go,” Avo said, eating while he walked. He stared at where he sat with Ved yesterday. She was missing right now. Could’ve been too early for her. Could’ve been that she was trying to avoid him. Shame. Her affability was refreshing compared to the other enforcers, and she didn’t laugh nearly as much, nor as gratingly as Chambers did.
As they got back into the elevator Chamber clanged his armored hands together. “Alright, here’s what’s the what: gonna be walkin’ you through using an exo-rig today. Real basic shit. Stuff that even a ghoul can handle.”
Avo stared. Chambers giggled.
“We'll get you set up first. Walk you through the paces–the ush. But–” Chambers lifted an eyebrow wryly. –When we get to the test run later, I need you–"
“Want me to do the favor.”
The enforcer snapped his fingers and mimed firing guns at Avo. “Want you to do me that favor. Trust me: total milk run. Much easier than brawling with Rantula.” He pointed himself with a thumb. “Boss man wants you to be showtime-ready on the quick, but don’t worry, your new master’s gonna make sure everything turns out to be a-okay.”
New master. Avo grunted. Cute. “New master. Didn’t know Essus was getting promoted already. Maybe I should also kill a tech. See if I get promoted too. Might even get freedom back.”
Chambers laughed. “Fuck you. You know I was talking about me.”
Avo wolfed another few bites down as the floors slide by, ebontas appearing and passing, numbers flashing overhead.
From where he stood, the entire block felt deathly quiet. The elevator was stained with new smells: a stinging musk of cheap cologne mixed with the faint whiff of Numb or some other paralytic drug. Alcohol and puke were more subdued, but still there.
The armory was a vast open floor that was lined with groaning pistons hissing along the walls. A literal legion of drones assembled and attached exo-rigs to different stations, sawing and charging different pieces of machinery, making adjustments to guns, and imprinting symbols and holotags upon hardened alloys.
To the left, countless weapons of all shapes and sizes were festooned across the magnetic plates layered over the walls. The guns were haphazardly organized, with no sense or logic to their groupings. More than once, Avo saw two drones fighting over the same item, each tasked to bolt it onto a different rig for different enforcers.
Stranger still, few actual personnel were present. Beside him and Chambers, only two techs worked at the very edge of the room, directing a swarm of drones as they continued adding extensions to the arms of a rig.
“Under twenty minutes,” Chambers shouted, suddenly. Both the techs jumped, startled by the sudden noise. Chambers shook his head. “Fuckin’ half-strands.” He pointed at Avo. “Pay up, you fucks. Told you I could bring him down here, no trouble. Show me the imps.”
Ducking down low to avoid getting clipped by any of the erratically flying drones, Avo found himself standing before the exo-rig. The Nightmantis.
His exo-rig.
The Nightmantis wasn’t particularly large, being more like armor than a literal tank built to hold the shape of a person. It stood barely half a meter taller and wider than he was naturally, and its arms were still in the process of being extended to mirror the oddities of his physiology. The only thing that seemed to protrude from it was the gauss cannon attached to its shoulder, twin-blade-like barrels humming with static.
He could also see a great deal more scratches and dents than he expected. How disappointing. The memory sold him a sleek suit of high-tech violence. Before him, instead of a knightly plate of power armor layered in hyper-reinforced hexagonal cells of titanium, parts of the exoskeleton were outright welded from misshapen steel. A melted stop sign was even melded over the rig's left shoulder.
The best thing that he could say about the armor right then was that it held the shape of what he was promised, but none of the other details.
A rough armored hand clapped him on the shoulder. The beast recoiled. Avo flexed his claws and nearly fired his reflexes. Only the annoying grin of Chambers leering into his cog-feed from the periphery brought a jerking halt to the reactive violence burning inside Avo.
“Don’t do that,” Avo said.
Chambers kept his grin in place and leaned back, holding his hands up defensively. “Hey, don’t wanna make you bleed me. Just wanna let you know that you made me happy and wealthy.”
“It’s just three hundred imps, Chambers,” one of the techs said, spitting.
“Three hundred free imps, consang. All thanks to you.” Chambers nudged Avo. “Well, you and these two stupid fuckers. All you had to do was get down on time.”
Avo thought he understood. “Betting that I would be late?”
Chambers squealed a pig-like laugh. Avo winced at the sound. “They were betting that you’d get lost.” He suddenly threw a surprisingly strong arm over Avo’s shoulder again. Avo went stiff, eyeing the enforcer with disbelief. He was looking to get cut. The man ignored him and continued. “They think you’re simple. Illiterate. I swore up and down that you seemed plenty smart for a ghoul. But nope, techs gotta be techs. Gotta show that stupid fucking enforcer the what for when they can.”
Pulled along by Chambers, Avo found himself staring down two technicians who suddenly found no interest in talking to him or even making eye contact. With an awkward cough, one fled to the rear of the Nightmantis’ rig station while the other grew hyper-focused on jocking her drones.
“Didn’t say they were shy,” Avo grunted.
Chambers flicked his gaze across the two techs, his eyes a scythe of derision. “Nah. Just sore. Just glassjaws about losing a couple of imps to a simple grunt like me.” He turned to face the tech fiddling behind the armor. “Hey, you. Janon.”
“Janand,” the male tech corrected with a sigh.
“Ja-whatever the fuck. Lower the rig. Let our ghoulie here see what he’s probably going to die in.”
The tech did as obliged, entering something into the console behind the station.
Immediately, the armor stopped folding light across its shell and revealed its scratched black carapace.
It seemed as if the techs had made a few additional changes to the armor beyond just the lengthening of the arms. Avo noted dots of swiveling optics installed on its front and back. The outside of the armor was lined with three graphene blades that extended along the arms and greaves like jutting rails. The chest piece, meanwhile, was further lined in diamond-like grids.
“In case you weren’t able to tell, most of our kit has seen action,” Chambers said, walking over to rap his knuckles on the Nightmantis. The melted stop sign clanked like a dented drum. “So the good news is that, at least at some point in time, this shit used to work.”
“Good news,” Avo said dryly.
Chambers opened his mouth to say something undoubtedly brilliant and philosophical but ended up choking on his own spit instead. Avo frowned as he just watched the man hack for a minute. The techs ignored him. Avo ignored him. Unfortunately, Chambers survived. “Before…I get into the bad shit, tell me what you know about rigs?”
“Keeps you alive,” Avo said. “Takes bullets better than meat.”
Chambers nodded. “Yeah, that’s about right.” He stared. Avo stared too, having spoken all that he knew in detail about rigs. The enforcer sighed. “That’s all you know about rigs?”
“Ones Regs wear seem to be better. Killed lots of us. That count?”
“Well, since you have to be the one shooting instead of dying now, no. Not fuckin’ really.”
Avo grunted. “Rigs have hardpoints,” he added.
Chambers stared at him blankly. “Do you know what a hardpoint even is?”
“Something that can attach a gun?”
“Close,” Chambers said, shaking his head. He suckled on his teeth as he motioned at Janand, the tech. “Open it up.” He shot Avo another glance. “You–uh–never even played any shooters? Gunmetal Glory? Fields of Valor? Stormjumper?”
Avo grunted. “No. No interest. No time.” That was a lie. He did know those games, but he had no interest in indulging a shared hobby with her.
Chambers puffed out a plume of smoke. “Looks like Papa Chambers got himself a lesson to teach. Judy, why am I not hearing the psst-psst sound that armor’s make and shit?”
With sagging shoulders, Janand responded. The armor hissed and peeled open from the front. The diamond grid receded as the top of the rig seemed to open itself before him in a spontaneous autopsy.
The first thing that Avo noticed wasn’t the neural lacing bands, nor the cheap polymater coating the exposed power grid. No. He noticed the razor-thin rows of needles built where his spine was supposed to fit. It made the rig look more like an ancient torture device than an exoskeleton.
“Needles catch your eye, huh,” Chambers said. “Won’t bullshit you: it hurts like godsdamn shit when those fucking neural drills sink into your spine. See them make a cripple or two in my time.”
“Drills?” Avo asked, trying to see if the man was just having a laugh.
Chambers managed to hold a straight face for half a second before breaking. Half a second longer than Avo thought he could. “Fuck no, consang. It’s supposed to just get you with the tip. Works in tandem with the neural lace so the armor moves with you. Without those, you’ll be wrestling with two-thousand pounds of second-war era ghoulshit that may or may not dislocate your limbs when the servos overreact.”
Great. One anxiety for another.
Chambers grinned. “Hey, before we do the other shit, step inside the armor. Mirrorhead is sending one of his pet Necros out with us and I wanna see the look on her face when you suddenly start talking inside the armor.”
“Great way to get nulled using a Ghostjack,” Avo said.
“Trust me, she’s more likely to dump a ghost into her own mind. She’s got no taste for the hurt business.”
Avo just glared at him, unconvinced. Great. Another Necro watching him. Last thing he needed. Had to keep his modified phantasmics hidden from her. He didn’t need Mirrorhead to know more about what he was capable of.
“Come on, consang. Don’t be a glassjaw. It’ll be a laugh.”
“Not unless you want to induce a seizure in him,” Avo heard Janand mutter. Avo couldn't see the tech’s face but he felt the annoyance all the same. Seemed Chambers liked testing people. “Haven’t even adjusted the neural interface to sync with his synapses. Shit. With his biology, I don’t even know if I can.”
“Synapses?” Avo said, as loudly as he could.
“What?” Chambers said, sounding confused.
“Janand was whispering to himself. Something about Synapses. Seizures. Me.”
“Jannard,” Chamber said, his face spreading into a grin as he narrowed his attention on the exhausted tech, “how do you plead? Saying our ghoulie here’s got brain problems.”
“I–no. Well, yes, but it's with the machine,” Jannanrd said, stepping out from behind the station. The metal bands implanted into his skull were spinning fast. On his back, a large coldtech machine of some kind hummed a dull ambiance. “The Nightmantis’ hardware isn’t designed for hyper-boosted reflexes like his. Some of our other enforcers with wired reflexes or cheap dilation boosters also got clobbered by similar bugs. Considering the clustered strands of his new bioware, we could be looking at a reaction differential by point three seconds.”
“Means I’m too fast for the machine?” Avo asked.
“Means that you might feel stuttering with linking to the machine. Worse: maybe it won't get the full data from your mind due to being unable to keep up with your mental pace. Potentially even pairing rejection if your, uh, mind’s biology is too deviant for it to understand.”
Chambers laughed. “What? You saying Avo here is too weird for the machine to handle?”
Janand sighed. “I’m saying that I have no idea how the machine might react to him. He’s a ghoul. Probably the first one to ever step into a rig. Judging from his…biology, he should just be close enough to pass for a human when interfacing with the machine. Should be, but I’m not sure.”
Chuckling, Chambers jagged at Avo’s shoulder.
“Hear that,” Chambers said. “He’s complimenting you.”
Avo glanced at the armor, frowning. “So? Usable or not?”
“Well,” Janand said, “I’ll need to do some adjustments while you’re inside. You might experience some disorientation for a moment though.”
Avo looked at the needles and then back at Chambers. “This kills me, I eat you.”
Chambers smirked. “Hm. Sounds fair.”
Wordlessly, Avo ascended the rig station's steps with a scowl, turning as he stepped into the open armor, its neural drills glinting at him the entire way.
A wary apprehension built up inside of him. He didn’t know why a dozen feeble little needles were making him feel this way. Not after the sheer agony he suffered at the hands of Little Vicious. But still, the idea of letting them sink into his backbone made him shiver.
He felt his Celerostylus twitch too.
Maybe it was something simple, with how it looked like a contraption for torture. Maybe it was the fact that he spent most of his infancy fighting incomprehensible and implacable foes clad in shells much like the one that he was about to entomb himself in. Ultimately, something felt deeply wrong about doing this. But things hadn’t felt right since he found himself in the Maw.
Stifling a sigh, he turned, ignoring the saccharine smirk plastered across Chamber’s face. “Machine leaves me mind-dead; shoot me.”
Chambers scoffed. “Hells no. I’ll keep you alive and sell your kidneys for as long as I can.”
Avo nodded in resignation. Again, at least the enforcer was honest. More than one could expect from most these days.
Early on, before the advent of golemics and imbuements, most in-field operators used exo-rigs.
Now, rigs are probably closer to being a combat platform than armor most times, but the conceptualization of its design is simple: To create adaptive, survivable light infantry for a new hyper-lethal era of warfare.
Of course, with the following advent of quick-fabbed atomic and newly created Heavens, the rig themselves lasted barely more than two centuries before being consumed by obsolescence.
That being said, most criminals and low-class enterprises still use outdated models from centuries prior for their ease of procurement and lack of licensing controls…
-Kare Kitzuhada, Dissertation, “Stillborn Metal: The Weapons New Vultun Left Behind”
4-2
The Tubes
Inching back-first against the drills was an affair more ticklish than painful. Neither fear nor worry greeted him in that instant, and oddly it was this lack of worry that spurred a flicker of anxiety within him. He had died twice just yesterday. Thrice, if he counted his first resurrection in the barge. Now, it seemed that mortality was taking its weight off him, that long-familiar dread of oblivion losing its hold.
Yet, he knew that if he died now, his consciousness should be eternally shredded by the Rend stored within him; that entropic property Draus had warned him about.
How close lay the borders between liberation and hubris? With that dormant power that yet burned within his being, Avo wondered how far he would go again once he made his next kill. Already, he was feeling it–the addiction. The beast had tasted the ichor of blood and supped flesh from people he never dared dream of sampling in his past life.
A slight whine of machine servos sang as the needle tips of the drills cupped along his spine and spun. Unlike his surgery at the grafters, he didn’t feel much cutting, nor did pain come in any capacity. Instead, it felt like his body was expanding, his senses filtering out as his Celerostylus wriggled along his spine, accommodating the pricks of neurally-binding needles.
One by one, he felt the digits of the rig twitch. The connection, already, felt far more fluid than that which held the scavengers on the barge. Sinking deeper, his legs slid to the bottom of his armor’s sabatons, claws scraping all the way.
Janand’s skull implant flashed red, coming alight across his head like a band. “Expand sabatons. Ten inches.”
Two drones darted by and began plucking and untightening bolts within the boots.
Avo felt his feet stretch out slowly, the interior of the armor loosening to fit him better.
A dozen clicks sounded across his spine as he felt clasps rise to stabilize the position of his torso. A semi-circle sprouting thin metal threads closed around his skull before he saw the armor begin to close itself up. Like disappearing into a lightless cage, the outside world was sealed from him. Gridded segments of plating spilled over his vision as the world was suddenly encased in darkness.
For the length of a minute, he felt at peace, enjoying the quiet. The world outside could barely be heard aside from dull murmurs. Macabre thoughts greeted him as he wondered if anyone had starved to death within one of these armors, or if there was a way to tear his way out from the inside if he needed to.
A static jolt cleaved into his awareness as the threads stung into the flesh around his skull. Avo blinked as he felt a wave of stuttering pulses rush through his mind. Flashing pictures and choked flickers of sound speared into his perception in irregular doses.
All of a sudden, Avo felt his awareness yawn open like a fissuring chasm. He was suddenly seeing in front, behind, to his sides, and from his hands. Each of his new “eyes” also offered him greater clarity and more detail than his natural eyesight could ever muster. Yet, it was not as intuitive as his cog-feed was. The rig couldn't detect thoughtstuff for one.
Vertices and other icons streamed into his mind as the armor fed new telemetries and data into his brain, his Metamind working to accommodate this most direct of intruders.
Sweeping his eyes tentatively across the room, he saw Chambers making a vulgar gesture at him. Reflexively, he found himself zooming in on the gesture through the optics built into his shoulder.
The sheer dissonance and overload of angles he could perceive made him nauseous. He wondered what would happen if someone fouled themselves in the armor. From what he could tell so far, this thing didn’t have any waste disposal ports.
A crack of sound went off as if directly beside his ears. “A…vo….Avooooo!” The sudden spike of the pitch made him wince. Well, that wasn’t normal. Ghouls had a multi-layered cochlear organ for an ear. The Low Masters supposedly put it into them to reduce their weakness to sonic weaponry.
Reduce, however, did not mean remove.
“AVO!” The greeting was deafening, the sound patched directly into Avo’s innermost ear layerings. “HEY! GHOULIE! CAN YOU HEAR ME!”
“Yes,” Avo said, wanting to rub his skull. When he tried anyway, he ended up just uselessly tapping a metal finger where he vaguely felt his head was. It was like he was blind to his own body. The dissonance just increased his nausea. “Too loud.”
Coordinating multiple eyes to zoom in on Chambers, Avo watched the enforcer snap his fingers at Janand. A light buzzing thrummed through Avo’s mind. Chambers spoke again. “How about now?”
“Better,” Avo said. “Project sounds to my outer ears if possible.”
A static series of pops sounded to his sides as if the noise was moving further and further away from him.
“How’s that?”
“Good.”
“Alright,” Chambers said. “Now, raise your arm as fast as you can.”
“Reflex test?” Avo asked.
“‘Because Chamber’s fucking said so’ test. Do it.”
Grunting a quiet note of displeasure, Avo raised his arm.
Something hard struck him in the side. Through his new eyes, he caught sight of the spinning ceiling blurring into the floor as he toppled over, the weight of his rig tearing him from his feet, an unseen force ripping him loose from the clamps of his rig station.
Aside from the suddenness of the jolt and a spike of surprise, he felt no pain. He noted a small subinterface displayed in the corner of a newly appeared interface, showing armor integrity and how much power remained in the armor. A splash of blue-coated the impact zone of his left pauldron.
No damage. No penetration.
Through the armor’s audio detection functions, he could hear Chambers cackling like a madman. Focusing on the sound brought up a spill of complex new features that analyzed the man’s voice and extracted an audio sample for posterity.
‘What just happened?” Avo asked.
“You whiplashed yourself is what happened,” Chambers said. “One second, nothing. Then, your arm went straight up and sent you sprawling. Jannard here probably overclocked the rig’s E.I. to match your speed but not your exact timing or some stupid geek shit like that.”
In the background, Avo could hear Janand cursing in frustration.
The sudden sensation of something magnetic and heavy clamped around his shoulders. Avo was dragged back to his feet. He swirled his backmost hardpoint optics to see an industrial drone with a square-shaped magnetic pulling him back to his feet.
He suddenly realized how odd the weight felt as he stood. Looking down from his knees, he saw his feet looking like two flexing blades, extending his new height well past nine feet in height. He knew the design was to grant him more speed during a run but the missing agility provided by his joints and claws instilled a certain instability in his movements.
Avo supposed that was just another byproduct of people building their kit to kill you rather than for you.
Janand had gone about more adjustments after that while Chambers rattled off thinly veiled insults at the man. Avo took this time to adjust his optics and narrow in on the other tech, who seemed to be doing her very best to avoid the enforcer’s attention.
He noticed multiple vision functions that were still shaded out. Inactive, if he was to assume. Low light, infrared, electro-spec, and thermal modes were all transparent in the background of his visual menu. He wondered if he could have multiple vision modes active across different optics. Judging from how he could assign submenus to each of his viewpoints, the answer was probably yes.
Avo couldn’t help but chuckle to himself bitterly. Little wonder how the Regs seemed omniscient. Little wonder how they seldom missed.
A memory of fleeing down narrow alleys came to him now, dashing like a scared animal as gauss fire tore through the walls. He charged through the misting remains of the brothers ahead, coating himself in their viscera, screaming prayers to the Deep Hungers--gods once worshipped by his former creators.
Behind, he heard the cooking of flesh as a blinding radiance flashed. His shoulder bubbled and welted as he rounded a corner, sprinting to escape the hellish battlefield that was the topside, desperate to flee back into the comfort of darkness, to the Umbra below.
Fusion burners have that effect.
“Hey, Avo,” Chambers said, shattering the memory. Avo grunted in acknowledgment.
“Change of plans, the Necro got caught up on doing whatever spook-ghost shit Mirrorhead thought was more important. Which means we get to go out on this outing without someone breathin' down our necks. Yay!”
Avo grunted. Odd that Mirrorhead was being so hands-off today so far. He expected the Syndicate boss to appear and threaten him vaguely or something or other. Maybe remind him that the armor was a gift as well and that Avo would be nowhere without him.
“So, here’s what we’re going to do,” Chambers said, “we’re going to take the tubes to a nearby district occupied by our–ahem–esteemed competition. A little abandoned waste-pit of a spot called Burner’s Way–”
“–Burner’s Way?” Avo asked.
“–I’ll teach you how to read the map in your HUD later. Right now, shut the fuck up, please. Anyway, we’re going to have you do a little walk, maybe a little run. Then, we’ll see how good you are with shooting before ending on a light note of organ theft. How does that sound?”
“Sounds more like a mission. Less like a milk run.”
Chambers began making squealing noises and mimicking what could only be the sound of an infant suckling on something. “You know who I’m pretending to be right now?”
Avo stared flatly at the enforcer. He had an urge to just try and kill the man now. Annoyingly, he realized that he couldn’t eat Chambers because the armor prevented it.
“You. Revealing autonepiophilia?” Avo deadpanned.
“Auto–what?”
“Fetish,” Avo continued. “When an adult wants to pretend to be an infant.”
Chambers stared at him, jaw slacking in confusion.
“Calling you a baby-man.”
Chambers chuckled as he shook his head. “Jaus, I was just going to call you a fucking wuss, but godsdamned and all the lowest hells, you’re not only a wuss-ghoul, but you’re also a dork-ghoul. Fuck me, consang, but I was expecting a hard, cold-blooded man-eater. Not a pigmentally-challenged thesaurus that goes ‘b-b-but that m-m-might not be s-s-safe’ every time I bring up an idea or ask them if they want a smoke.”
Avo hummed a low note of amusement at the man’s rant. Specieist, racist, amoral piece of Syndicate trash that he was, Walton would have liked this man. If only because he would make for good entertainment after being stolen from.“How many living ghouls have you met?”
A beat of silence followed. “Well, shit, consang. You might be onto something there.”
[***]
Before the Fourth Guild War, before the Low Masters Uprising, the G-Tube project stood as a hopeful symbol for potential peace between the Guilds and a sign that the long-promised prosperity offered by the powers that be was finally waterfalling past the Tiers down to the Warrens.
Spanning across the entire seven-and-a-half million square miles that splashed outward from the shining utopias built along the Tiers, the G-Tubes project was meant to be a far less expensive, far more reliable method of public transportation for people to travel. It combined a mag-propelled rail system, nanoferric tubing, and a specialized Heaven made to create pockets of vacuum. The project was supposed to join previous partitioned Sovereignties and districts back together.
And for a while, it did just that.
In those twenty years of relative peace, a growing spirit of prosperity had blossomed in New Vultun. Even quiet wars were choked to a halt by attritional stalemates and growing economic interdependence between the Great Guilds. The additional influx of the first Voidborn immigrants offering skilled labor and massive leaps in thaumaturgy brought explosive development. Each Ark stood the epicenter of industrial expansion, meant to serve as the central pillar of guidance and command to bring the Warrens into the Tiers and bring stability to the battle-scarred wastelands of the city.
Then, like all the false starts that came before, the Guilds found a large enough piece of a god or a Heaven, and suddenly the expenses of a new war were justified by the allure of domination.
Just what the Low Masters had been biding their time for.
In the G-Station nested within Conflux’s megablock, Avo stared down along the walls toward the ground. Between carvings of heat-borne glass that once bubbled through the melting plastics within the station, the shadows of long-slain ghouls and FATELESS shaped were imprinted on the walls in vague contours, bleached eternally by the brush of fusion burners as an unintentional mural.
He wondered if he was personally to blame for this damage, or if his brothers had been the ones to deliver a mem-bomb to this station. The ghouls hit all the stations at once when they surged out of the deep darkness below during the Uprising. They had taken the tubes first and foremost, cutting off transportation and opening new vectors of attack.
The G-Stations turned from public transit to slaughterhouses.
Avo wondered how many lives he bore a debt of blood for. Thousands? Millions?
A flash of an abandoned storefront was there and not. In the flicker, Avo caught sight of the yet-flickering hologram of a once-popular children’s mascot. Back when natural-born children were still a thing. Charlie the Chimera. Even now, it continued to dance, playing a jiggle with its duck-like face, goat-like legs, and its ape-like paws.
The toll inflicted on the city’s youngest, perhaps, was one of the greatest blemishes of being a ghoul. The Low Masters had taken deliberate action to attack the youngest, imprinting ghouls with the desire to hunt supple meat.
“Severing the future,” Avo’s former masters had called it.
Here now, in the northwest section of the hundredth floor was the G-Station. Once vibrant. Now abandoned. A porcelain-smooth gravity capsule hovered down the steps, its frame shaped like a reverse raindrop. Avo had taken the elevator along with the techs and Chambers, stumbling and staggering in his armor, learning to walk again.
Having a working capsule was another sign of Conflux’s dissonance. To possess something as expensive as a capsule–and for it to still be in such pristine condition spoke of either immense material resources or masterful maintenance. With Mirrorhead, the former was far more likely due to the obvious lack of the latter.
“Chambers,” Avo asked. “How long?”
“How long what?” Chambers said, grinning. “Gotta use more of your words there, Moonblood. How long is my d–”
“Capsule. The station. How long have they been active?”
Chambers snorted. “Fuckin’, long as Mirrorhead’s been the head of this outfit.” He gestured at the room. “Boss is the only guy around that’s got a Soul, ya know? Kinda hard to keep this running without the thaums.”
Behind them, fused plascrete blockades left narrow openings behind shattered doors of glass. Ahead, past the dormant ticketing barriers stood the capsule hovering on plates of flowing ferromagnetic liquids, rising around the capulse to wreathe it in a weave of concentric tubing. Avo saw a dim flicker of divine fire in the rings. There was a Heaven here. A faint one. Close to drying out already.
It seemed that Mirrorhead’s determination to ensure himself as the sole fulcrum of power within this organization went even further than Avo expected. Looking at the rings around the capulse, something inside Avo hungered. His Sangeist spurred, briefly spinning up his Soul before it recoiled and sputtered against an impenetrable gate. The Rend was still caging his power, holding his Heaven in a death-grip.
Avo growled silently. The beast urged him to kill Chambers. Or at least one of the techs. Wake his Hell. Crown himself with the full mantle of his power. It took more will than Avo liked to resist. It would be folly to commit anything that could out his full capabilities to Mirrorhead right now. Not when the cortex bomb was still inside him. Not when Essus was still unused. Not when he didn’t know more about his enemy.
Still, his Soul burned for a taste–a drip of what stood before him. His Liminal Frame wanted to grow.
Wordlessly, the side of the capsule split open, revealing a far more rugged interior. Plush carpets were stained and torn by all the heavy machinery dragged aboard. A rig station awaited Avo along with a dozen more microdrones. The techs had more modifications they wanted to make during transit.
Quietly, Avo deposited himself upon the clamps of the station. All the while, he watched the mirrors, the reflections. Mirrorhead was still absent in flesh, but was he absent in attention? And how far did his power reach? A burning suspicion rose within Avo. Perhaps his esteemed owner wasn’t there today at all. Perhaps he was hiding again.
The doors to the capsule shut. A map flashed into being, showing three segments of their journey. Three segments amidst a massive sprawl. It was like they were traveling down the spines of a hydra.

“Plotting route to Burner’s Way,” an automated voice toned. "Time to arrival. Five minutes. Please stay within your gimbals. Thank you."
Avo looked around. The only evidence there were ever any passenger gimbals were the bolts still left stuck along the walls. Fifty feet wide, this thing could've fit more than a few people per slingshot. Strange that they were only carrying four and a dozen drones. Come to think of it, where were the other enforcers? Other techs? Someone to communicate with if things went wrong?
What was procedure? The way Conflux functioned was beyond nonsensical.
“Chambers?” Avo asked, a growing doubt manifesting inside him. “Mirrorhead. He approved this?”
Chambers shrugged. “Yeah, you know. More or less.”
Avo stared. “More. Or less.”
“Don’t worry about it,” Chambers said. “As I said: I know how the boss works. We ain’t disobeying shit, so you can just numb on the worryin’. He isn’t going to pop up and yell at us. I'm getting you to do the tests that he wants. We're just… going a bit above and beyond, is all.”
With a thought, Chambers manifested the model of a sloped megablock and pulled it up for Avo to see. “Tell me, ghoulie? What do you know of beta-grade biomods?”
“Sells good,” Avo said, suspicions growing even greater.
“Exactly,” Chambers said leaning in, his chrome-sheened teeth gleaming in a broad smile. “Sells really, really good. You--uh--see where I'm going with this?"
A sigh worked itself loose from Avo's chest. This wasn’t going to be a milk run. Not at all.
Burner’s Way. Now there’s a godsdamned tragedy if there ever was one.
You wanna know how often communities genuinely cross blocks and come together to make a better home? Fuckin’ never. You wanna know how often all the blocks in a district decide to band together and establish something of a pseudo-parliament of the clades and colors? Elect actual representatives to interface with our “owners?”
Less than never.
And you wanna know what it took for all that to go to hell?
One night?
One night, thanks to one billion cannibalistic subhumans and their half-strand masters that couldn’t let go of a long-dead empire.
Fuck the Low Masters. Fuck the ghouls. And triple-fuck the Guilds for using the Uprising as an excuse to bomb the district. We all know why they did it.
Be with Jaus, Burner’s Way. You were a better dream than we ever deserved.
-Quail Tavers, “The Night of the Long Feast”
4-3
The Gouge
The space beyond the windows of the capsule blurred along needles of motion. Even attached to the rig, Avo felt a certain inversion to gravity, as if he was falling sideways, pulled by a force at growing velocity. Yet, there was no danger of toppling, nor any sensation of falling. The powers of a Heaven were at play, and the miracles it delivered inflicted an uncanniness on Avo’s equilibrium.
Before him, Chambers prattled on, showing no signs of discomfort. Familiarity within the capsule, even. From his crudely sequenced Metamind, a spill of three ghosts fused into a Phantom phantasmic, their vapourous forms manifesting to zoom in on the midsection of a megablock.
This block, however, had no number, no identifier. That might’ve been because someone colossal had gouged an entire portion free from the middle of the structure, shredding a half-mile deep into its foundations. It was a testament to New Vultun’s infrastructure that the building was standing if nothing else.
To the flicks of Chambers’ fingers, the phantoms drifted down, scrolling past the damage and dissembling the block into its component floors. Swiping up for what felt like a minute, Chamber grinned and found his prize: floor one hundred and seventy-seven. Just seventy-seven floors above Layer One. He pulled the floor free, as if pulling a plate free from its stack, and flipped it vertically so Avo could get a top-down perspective of the structure.
“There we go,” he said grinning. “Here’s your playground: Level one-seven-seven of the Gouge.”
“Gouge,” Avo said, considering the name. “Name. Because the damage?”
“Yeah,” Chambers said, smiling darkly. “I saw it happen, you know. Was just a juv. Middle of the Uprising. One of Stormtree’s ‘Clads was pushing hard, trying to dislodge a No-Dragon firing position. Manifested a leviathan out of godsdamned raindrops and took a bite from the block. Staring at it made me shit myself. Ma told me I spent most of that week just cryin’.”
Avo grunted. That sounded like a useful Heaven to have. Of course, he didn’t know how it would even interface with his current Heaven. Getting his Hell working was the top priority, and if he was meticulous, perhaps he could even reactivate his Liminal Frame without Chambers noticing. But that meant he needed to survive this run, and he couldn’t just trust what Chambers was saying.
That was a rule about being a Necro: never let someone else plan your dives.
“Full details,” Avo said. “Opposition. Positioning. Defenses. Capabilities. Surrounding map too. Open up terrain. Five-mile radius. Want to study local environment.”
“Whoa…whoa,” Chambers said, laughing, “fuckin’, going all strategery on me there, ghoulie. A bit too much for your consang Chambers. Trust me, it’s a simple milk–”
Avo glared and repeated his words verbatim. “Full details. Opposition. Positioning. Defenses. Capabilities. Surrounding map too. Open up terrain. Five-mile radius. Show me local map.”
A twitch of frustration ran through Chambers’ face. The enforcer sighed and tugged at the front of his hair. “You know, ghoulie, you’re a very aggravating person to talk to.”
That made Avo chuff with irony. “You must be rubbing off.”
Chambers snickered. He pressed a rude gesture against one of Avo's optics. “Fuck. You.”
“No.”
The enforcer just laughed louder. “Alright,” he said, expanding the map to show the surrounding area. The buildings surrounding the block looked just as mangled. None had gone untouched by the war in some way, and the streets above Layer One were pockmarked by artillery as far as Avo could judge. Only two structures remained nearby the Gouge, and one towered over it still, looking as if an abandoned broadcast tower with its layered dishes.
Between the tower and the block looked to be a distance of five hundred feet. Avo couldn’t jump that, but if he had a parachute or a jump thruster of some kind…
“Yeah,” Chambers said, waving away the broadcast tower, “know what’s ticking inside your head. Cute. Totally a good idea on a scry, but it won’t work.”
Avo frowned. “Why not.”
“Fallen Heaven,” Chambers said, bringing up the floor plans for the Gouge again. “Lingering contagious Ruptures or some shit. Something’s fucky about the spaces inside all the buildings. Makes it hard to get out, and breathing in the air inside spores you with hydrapedes, supposedly. Fuckin’ painful when they start hatching in your lungs.”
Chambers sounded like he was speaking from experience.
“Loci?” Avo asked, taking an approach he was more comfortable with. He might not have his full list of tools in his Metamind, but he could still make this work. Especially considering the quality of the local Necros. The wards he saw on the enforcers were appalling. “Something to jack into.”
“Just minds,” Chambers said. “Not worth it either. Decent Necro could null most people in the district easily but this is a run-snatch-dash gig. Nothing more complicated than that. Wouldn’t want you to waste a ghost on these worthless fucks, would we?”
“Depends,” Avo said. “Opposition.”
Chambers snorted. He pulled up a simulacrum of a person. They had cheap exo-rigs bolted to the implanted ports on their bodies and hap-tats flashing all over them. What flesh the person had was for rent. Except for the wrist. That was swollen with dripping sap. Joyfiends. They carried a crude-looking rifle that seemed at least a whole eon out of date and were backed up by equally anemic-looking drones.
“The Drippers,” Chambers said. “Small-time gang. Maybe two hundred strong. Likely less. They run organ farms and peddle joy. And use it. You know. The usual. Kit is nothing but spit. Got cheap industrial rigs bolted to their bodies. Good for picking up heavy shit. Bad at moving fast, taking damage, having working servos–you know, that kind of shit.”
Avo grunted. He knew the type. The type didn’t live very long before feeding the city. “Just them?”
Chambers winced. “Well. There are those Scalper fucks across the district but a good ten miles away, across the local stretch of the Maw. Nu Scarrowbur.” Chambers spat. From one of Nightmantis’ many optics, Avo noticed Janand shaking his head at the sight of phlegm coating the ground. “Half-strands. They shouldn’t count for anything anyhow. No sense in them playing around in this district seeing that it's cut off from the Sovereignty. Guess Yuulden-Yang decided that the imbalance in local real just wasn’t worth fixing.”
“Civilians?” Avo asked. He knew the answer. Even after the districts fell, it wasn’t like people could just move around at will in New Vultun. Their residency was bound to a district, to a Sovereignty. Jumping out of line was illegal, especially with the influx of refugees flooding in daily. It was a certain way to lose your spot. Miss out on getting to the Tiers.
“Are FATELESS civies now?” Chambers asked. “Hells, Moonblood. Come on. For serious. Come on.”
Silently, Avo judged the enforcer. The man was no monster by design, nor did he have a taste for flesh, so the failure must’ve been in his nurture. If there was any nurture to Chambers at all. “Choiceless. Not their fault. Not their fight. Killing them is unethical.”
Chambers' eyes narrowed to a thin glare of disbelief. “I’m sorry, but did you, a cannibalistic fucking subhuman monster, just say the word ‘unethical?’
Avo nodded. The armor interpreted the action as a roll of the shoulders. “Prey can’t fight back. Bad diet. Leaves constitution weak. Encourages bad behavior.”
The enforcer grabbed Avo’s hand dramatically and shook it with undue vigor. “Oh, ho, ho! I salute thee, brave saint-ghoul! In fact, I commend thee! I begeth you a questioneth–”
A low growl threatened to work its way out of Avo’s throat. “Question doesn’t need an ‘eth’–”
“–shuteth theth fucketh upeth–pray tell me, have you, perchance eaten any children during the Uprising.”
Probably. “None that I know of.”
That was also technically true. He was more in the middle of the horde. Hard to tell what flesh came from who or where when you were gorging yourself on the disfigured scraps your larger brothers left behind.
“Jaus,” Chambers said, laughing in disbelief, “actual ghoul-paragon of noble virtues. Mirrorhead finds us another freak.”
Avo held back the urge to break the man’s neck and use him as the last bit of Essence to claim his Hell. Every concern was a joke to him. Every principle was something to mock. But Walton had faced his type before. Faced him with an expression unchanging, accepting. Always accepting. For now, Avo decided that he would do the same.
Besides, he could always eat Chambers later, after his uses finally ran dry.
Still, If joyfiends were all there was to contend with, then sure, it definitely did look like a milk run. No need to really worry about civilians if he played it subtly and strategically. But there was another thing he learned from diving: it wasn’t about the skin, but the meat beneath. Chambers could be wrong, and the cost of that would be Avo catching a flechette or ten to the chest. The opposition could always be someone else. The environment could always be altered.
Avo needed to keep his own game close to his chest. Chambers wasn’t just untrustworthy, he was also sloppy. Slow road to suicide if there ever was one.
A drone hovered over, pulling Avo’s attention momentarily. In its grip, it held a strange chittering creature with what looked like blubber popping out from its ebony-shelled segments.
“What’s this?” Avo asked. The creature was planted against Avo’s back and suddenly locked in, the ringing sound of the creature’s shell magnetizing and vibrating even through the rig.
“Clickersail,” Janand said, scanning the creature. “Utility bioform. Grown last month. Expires tomorrow. Should still be able to bear your weight and let you catch the winds a bit in case you fall today.”
Avo grunted. Useful. He wondered if he could graft something like that into himself. “How does it work?”
“Automatically,” Janand said. He didn't elaborate any further. Avo was beginning to get the feeling that the tech very much didn’t want to be here.
Chambers snapped his fingers. Avo turned. “Hey, ghoulie, enough dork-shit, focus up.” The enforcer pulled up a route. Avo tilted his head. It was, quite literally, a straight route from the upcoming G-Station exit to the block. “So what you’re going to do is walk over, right? And fuck everyone up. Then climb up the building. Take the package. And leave.”
Avo blinked. “Walk in…and just leave?
“And remember to take the package,” Chambers said. “Speaking of which…” The enforcer twisted his phantoms into the dull chrome exterior of a stasis case. A scorch mark ran over the words “GUILD PROPERTY", which were painted large and white. “Here’s our prize. Biomods. Sealed in a stasis case.”
Didn’t really look any different than any other stasis case. Avo wondered if he could crack this one’s mem-code without a Ghostjack. If it was smuggled from Ori-Thaum? No. Not a chance. Any other Guild was probably a yes.
“And in case you’re worried ‘bout the mem-code, don’t worry,” Chambers said, grinning while he tapped his head. “Ol’ Chambers already got the right memories installed for that.”
A low whine filled the capsule. The lurching sensation of gravity righted itself, turning slowly on an incline. A tone sounded. “You are now arriving at Burner’s Way. Please don’t forget your personal belongings. Doors will open to your left.”
Outside, the motion needles began to slow and dissolve. Avo felt his weight sink back into his feet again. The world was right again. Normal. Chambers knocked on the Nightmantis.
“You ready to take a walk, Moonblood?” The enforcer grinned.
“Why not,” Avo said.
What he really wanted to say was that he wanted to spend more time preparing. He always wanted to spend more time preparing.
Unless he killed Chambers and made a run for it. The upside to that was he wouldn’t need to hear Chambers laugh anymore. The downside was that Mirrorhead would likely go from being a potential problem to an active one very soon. Not something he needed with the cortex bomb still in play.
As the rig station released the Nightmantis, Avo felt himself drop. The capsule bobbed as if a boat on the water. Rolling his shoulders, Avo took his first tentative steps toward the opening doors. Light greeted him like a blinding wave and he winced. Immediately, his optics began to make the necessary adjustments, polarizing to protect his vision.
His cog-feed could tune visual details, but it couldn’t get rid of his sensitivity to light. That was a physiological problem.
“Listen,” Chamber said, reaching up to place a hand on Avo’s shoulder. “I’ll walk you through it. All of it. Chambers here has got your back.”
“All I could ask for,” Avo muttered.
“I’m serious,” Chambers said. “I’ll walk you through it. Even send out a few drones to give you overwatch if need be. Shit basic street-gangers won’t have. A fucking child could do this, trust me.”
Yes. Trust the enforcer who decided to plan an entire smash-and-grab operation under the nose of his Godclad of a boss. “Trust you?”
“Trust my self-interest,” Chambers said. “We get this stuff and bring it to Mirrorhead and–” Chambers kissed the tips of his fingers, “–sweet, sweet imps for me, and probably lots of screaming children for you to feed on? How does that sound?”
The capsule’s doors sheathed themselves vertically, opening the path for Avo’s departure. “Rather have beef.”
Chambers shrugged. “Beef’s expensive. ‘Fugees are free.”
Avo didn’t bother giving the enforcer an answer. Slowly, he stomped out from the capsule, feeling the weight of neural lag pulse from his nerves into his armor a moment too late. Janand’s adjustments made the responses of the exo-rig more fluid but it still felt a half-second behind Avo’s body. Or maybe he was just faster now, thanks to the Celerostylus. Both could be true.
Whatever the case, the sooner he got this done, the sooner he could be finished with Conflux. Get his frame working again, and his freedom back. Then, he needed to get his bearings and deal with Mirrorhead before the Syndicate boss came looking for him first.
“Check-check,” Chambers said, switching to communicating with him directly through the armor’s coldtech communicator. Avo was about to ask why the enforcer didn’t use ghosts, but seeing the condition of the man’s sequences, decided that he didn’t want a link to a mind that compromised anyway. “Hearin’ me, ghoulie.”
Avo grunted.
“Alright. Janards here should’ve uploaded a map into your rig’s enhanced intelligence. Should lead you to the right path. Just stick to the blinking lane and you’ll be right as the midnight rain. You can do that right?”
Avo grunted again.
“What? You taking a shit in the rig? Use your words.”
“No,” Avo said.
The sensation of being spoken to through dead metal was still uncanny. Each ghost had aspects of personality and memories. It made communicating feel natural like there was something there that resembled the aspects of one’s own mind. With coldtech, everything was numbers. Code. It wasn't that Avo was bad at math, but the sheer emptiness of the machines left him…
Starving, in a sense.
The G-Station at Burner’s Way had clearly been bombed. Repeatedly. Jutting beams and half-melted plascrete dolloped along the skeleton of the floor above, the light of day pouring in through a particularly large chasm. Peeking out from the optics on his shoulder, Avo noticed that the tunnels leading down to the next station were long collapsed.
All they had was three stops. Three stops more than he expected considering the sheer ruinous force the Guilds brought down on the city during the war.
Stumbling past translucent pathways made by fusion-burned glass, Avo found only slagged stumps where the ticketing barriers were supposed to be here. Three hunched figures stood in the corner of a burning aerovec power cell placed in a barrel. Over the flames writhed the impaled body of an aratnid, eight jagged limbs stabbing blindly into the air. One by one, Avo watched the eight eyes pop across the creature's rat-like face, trailing down to feed the fire like ichorous tears.
Inside the rig, Avo clacked his teeth in hunger. Aratnid. Juicy and tasty. He wished the rig was easier to open. He wanted a bite.
“Don’t tell me you wanted to eat that,” Chambers said, a note of disgust in his voice.
“Meat is meat,” Avo said. “Good nutrition.”
“Bleh. Jaus, your breath must smell like death.”
“No,” Avo said. “Breath smells like nothing.”
“Just... shut the fuck up and keep moving. You can stare at frying spider-rats later.”
Ascending the narrow steps leading out of the station was easier than Avo thought it would be. The mass of his armor helped. With every step, the blades he had for feet dug furrows into the superheated ground. He found himself frowning at that. Obvious track marks. Not very good if he wanted to hide his tracks.
Exiting into the city itself, the sheer ruination inflicted on the district struck Avo like a blow. Bloated maggots some six feet in length and double again in width clawed up and down the desiccated skeletons of the buildings around him. Yet, what pulled his attention more were the human faces pressing out from the soft skin lining the creatures’ backs, static pulses of thoughtstuff still misting from within their jiggling forms.
“Those people…” Avo asked.
“As I said, consang. Fallen fuckin’ Heavens. Don’t need to make sense to work. Such is the way of the Guilds, as was the way of the gods.” Chambers spat again. Avo couldn’t hear a smile in his voice this time. “Sick shit. Should’ve at least burned ‘em. Finished the bombing properly. Gave ‘em mercy.”
Avo supposed Chambers was more talk than he let on.
Warily, Avo moved on, walking down into the forest of urban decay ahead of him. Flickering neon pulsed overhead as he followed the indicated path flashing across his visual feed.
A mile away, the gouge, a wounded monolith at the center of this hive of damnation. A single reticle narrowed upward, seventy-seven floors above.
Slowly, Avo accelerated his approach to a slow jog. Best that he figure out what this rig could do before trouble found him first.
The SRU Nightmantis was a good platform. Don’t ever let the Syndicates fool you about that. Not the rig’s fault those bastards keep doing direct assaults using a scout-exo. ‘Course, a recovered Nightmantis is still far superior compared to say, an Atlas Lifter model with some armor plates bolted onto it.
Don’t get me wrong. It’s got problems. Substandard power grid. Single weapon hardpoint. Audio-glitches. But those are more “current” problems. ‘Mantis was made by Voidwatch some five-hundred and sixty years ago. The fact we’re still using it is a testament to its design.
Why is the Nightmantis so popular? Same as any other armor the Syndicates like to use: licensing. The corp that made the Nightmantis is dead as Jaus, so there’s no one enforcing the proliferation of its design. Of course, most of these rigs are still secondhand hand-me-downs because the auto-fabs themselves are licensed and the Guilds won’t outright sell one to the little people down below.
Something about the balance of power and all that. Can’t have the FATELESS get too creative with their own lives, now can we?
-Quail Tavers, School of the Warrens
4-4
A Milk-Run…
On wounded streets of cracking rust did Avo begin his run. Speckled pockets of thoughtstuff lined the periphery of his cog-feed, and ebbing indicators flashed through his armor’s HUD. As the dappled shine of the daystar spilled across his war-touched rig, Avo felt himself an intruder in this local ecosystem, his gleaming form like a knife descending once again into an open wound yet to heal.
Broken bridges and shattered streets caked in mucus lined the sprawl around him with an oily sheen. Left by the slugs was Avo’s guess. Visual telemetries scanned the substance through his myriad of optics, yet his database came up empty. Didn’t know if that was because there was nothing on the creature or if his rig’s internal systems were just a blank slate after whatever the Syndicate did to it.
“Alrighty,” Chambers said. Avo thought he could hear ruffling papers. Papers? Was the enforcer looking at an instructions manual? “Good a time as any to explain your sensory suite. All you have to do to trace a specific sound is…is focus on it as if you were trying to listen to one sound specifically or some shit. Jannard, the fuck does ‘omni-cloaca’ mean?”
“You mean ‘omni-cochlear’?”
“That’s what I said, Jadan.”
Avo heard the tech state his actual name once more. Chambers responded by telling him to throat a fusion burner. Avo ignored the conversation and decided that he would have an easier time figuring out the rig on his own. Carefully he focused his attention on the ripples of two nearby voices, the rig’s HUD narrowing on their position.
Immediately, he felt diminutive flaps and dishes extend along his shoulders. Pulsing representations of sound waves bounced along walls, guiding him to a more optimal position to perform his reconnaissance. Avo heard a crackle run through his ears. Another sputter, and suddenly he was listening to a drunken conversation between two slurring men, their position triangulated to be three stories up in a run-down tenement.
Loose looping threads of thought pulsed free from their minds.
“Works,” Avo said, interrupting Chambers’ tirade against the tech. “Stop yelling.”
“...And… and I says,” a slurring voice crackled. A squatter, Avo presumed. “I says to him, I says, ‘look here you half-breed of a half-strand, you stepped in my territory.’ And so I popped out my mono-knife and guess what he did?”
“Pulled a gun?” A softer voice this time. Another person. More static with their words. The rig’s EI was compensating hard to sort their words from the general ambiance.
“Pulled a gun, he did. Stole my good knife from me.”
The analysis had both of their vocal signatures recorded and stored for future analysis. Additionally, it had placed a pulsing outline of their best-estimated position. Updating its systems to the new data, Avo’s EI sent him recommendations for engagement.
A solution for a firing vector appeared in his HUD. The walls of the tenement were mottled and porous. They looked to be of cheap plascrete to begin with–easily penetrated material with little chance of stopping a precision gauss cannon at close range. His HUD was calling for him to move a foot to his right so he could get both targets with one shot.
With a thought, Avo layered his Phy-Sim over the armor’s calculations. Phantasmic and binary targeting lanes ran up exactly.
“Chambers,” Avo said, curious. “The tech? How early?”
“How early what? Jaus–use your words, consang, come on! How early was the tech developed?”
Avo grunted.
“Shit, ghoulie. Rigs are six centuries old. Well, six centuries old since the Voider-fucks sold it to us terrestrials for squatting rights on the moon. Those half-strands probably had this shit for thousands of years.”
Thousands of years. A coiling discomfort twisted inside Avo. The Low Masters had made their kind within the century. They were supposed to be monsters beyond monsters; a bioweapon to surmount all bioweapons. Come to realize that even just one of the Guilds could have slaughtered his kind centuries ago. It didn’t take a Regular to kill a ghoul. All it took was someone in a rig.
There was a special kind of horror to realizing you were created obsolete; useless. The Low Masters were fools.
With Draus, at least he could bath himself in the delusion that she was specifically better than her kind. More weapon than a person; a proselytizer of death and messenger of the Big Nothing.
Now, in this armor?
A child would have made quick work of a dozen ghouls. He knew it. Felt in his movements, in the lesser omniscience it offered him. Even in the dark when he thought he was safe, in the depths where he thought he was hidden, they could see him. They could always see him.
Pure fortune was the only reason he survived the war.
“So, you gonna shoot those squatters or not? Test the gun?”
Avo turned away from the firing vector. Another interface flashed into his mind. He felt the weight of the cannon inside him, tuned to fire on mental command. It had twelve shots a stack, and three stacks in total. Seeing that each dart was the length of one of his fingers, he doubted they were meant to be wasted on infantry, much less FATELESS.
Still, it was a struggle to spare them. Part of him wanted to just put the shot through them. Watch their flesh bloom and liquefy before supping up their ghosts and Essence. That would let him have his Hell and reactivate his Liminal Frame.
He wanted to shoot.
He was going to shoot.
Spinning on his heel, he aimed at the ruined chassis of a downed aerovec. With a thought, he felt the gun begin to link to his mind, a firing trajectory lined by both his Phys-Sim and his HUD. It was a strange presence, being able to feel the gun. It felt more like a weight in the back of his head than a proper limb or phantasmic.
Still, the ease with which it acclimated to his neurology surprised him. If not for the ease and maintenance of ghosts, Idheim would’ve still been ruled by metal, silicon, and circuitry. That was a world that would have belonged to Voidwatch, indisputably.
Instead, in the world that was, the Voiders hid close to their Lagrange points, their fleets scattered wide in fear of terrestrial thaumaturgy, well aware of their vulnerability before the Godclads.
Avo commanded the gun to fire. He felt a surge spike through his armor, the power grid along his ribs whining loud. A spike clicked into place, spiraling between the barrels before it tore loose with a lurch of mag-flung force.
Like a stone pushing through the center of a page, the chassis folded and then opened, rusted alloys and plastics spraying loose in an eruption of damage. The shot continued, a streak of pulsing arcs lingering in the air. It punched another three feet into a half-standing plascrete wall to an abandoned storefront before finally halting.
The sound rattled loud and far. Avo shot a look at the Gouge in the distance. Didn’t matter. Gunfire was like birdsong in the Warrens. Would take some repetition before anyone came looking, especially a street gang.
But just to be careful, he pulled away from the streets and down into an alley. He stepped over a sleeping family, three unmoving bodies laying against a ragged carpet with an auto-chef hovering above them, rumbling as it steamed cheap rice.
There was a story there. One that Avo didn’t have time to examine. Technology and poverty made for strange bedfellows in the Warrens. Most people took what they could get. Or steal.
“Wanted to test shot on something thicker,” Avo said. “See penetration.”
He continued, circling across the local alleys. Aratnids and hydrapedes scattered, fleeing back into fissures along the wall as he stomped along. Ghosts lingered along walls, their memory structures slowly fragmenting as the gang signs they were meant to be bear slowly fragmented apart.
“Sure,” Chambers scoffed. “That’s the reason why you didn’t shoot those two. I know you wanted to.”
“Want isn’t what matters,” Avo said.
“Then what is?”
“Choice.”
“Fuckin’ sounding like a message from a lotto-engram, ghoulie.”
Life clung to crevices and alleys in Burner’s Way. Street brats held their corners, glaring out at him with holographic slurs hap-tattooed across bare torsos studded with cheap chrome. They hefted cheap pipes and fusion torches, hurling invectives as he passed them quickly. They had little idea how much they incurred the beast’s hunger.
Another reason he was glad to be wearing the armor.
Around him, once tower stacks of industrial blocks now billowed gouts of blackened waste into the skies above, their ringed structures melted clean of all matter but metal. It looked like the ribs of some metal giant had been layered sloppily over each other.
Through the thicket of alloy and dripping mucus, Avo saw the jagged edges that lined what used to be the hexagonal edge for this plate of Layer One. Faint particulates of rising blackness spilled up and into the air, the rising presence of the Maw licking up at the edges of the city proper. That usually happened when one of its sections wasn’t fed enough matter.
Pressing on, Avo pushed himself to a run. The armor was surprisingly quiet even as he sprinted, his legs launching him forward. Fifty miles. Sixty. Ninety. Trash and debris burst across his armor, lighting up blue-tinted impact areas in his rig-integrity interface. No penetration. No damage.
Around him, the streets blurred and beaten figures stared out at him over ledges and windows. He would have been worried about them sending a signal to the local gang. Would have been if most of them weren't slumped against the ground, bodies misshapen by excess doses of joy.
Broken skyways and the rubble of overpasses remained as clutter on the streets. About the only thing that still worked was the street lights, their neon holograms of ever-alternating red, yellow, and green.
Down the artillery-pounded alleyways, Avo ran, building up more speed as he passed ruined husks of fallen golems sheathed amidst the spooled wreckage of collapsed buildings. He plunged out from within the alleys, legs digging into the soft matter of the street as he sprayed plascrete chunks free.
Moving was beginning to feel better. The synchronicity between him and the rig was growing. Back along the main avenue of Burner’s Way, the building cupping the district looked like cracked teeth. There were a few more of those large maggots stuck along the walls here too. Ahead, the Gorge awaited, a scant four hundred feet away.
Four hundred feet, surrounded by parapets built from layered aerovec wrecks, and manned by two guards drunkenly chattering, laying on their backs and staring up at the holographic clouds projected by the bottom of Layer Two. Far behind them, shrouding the Gouge itself in a blacken haze, the ebbing curves of the daystar's light spilled down across the edges of the district like a waterfall, clashing with the artificial radiance projected by the holograms above.
“Sloppy,” Avo said, looking at the state of the Gouge’s security.
“Told you. Total milk–”
A crack of shifting rocks sounded from across the street.
Avo spun, following the accretion of thoughtstuff he saw in his periphery before his HUD even identified the threat. His cannon was lined and primed, a shot chambered and spinning.
He froze.
A juv was staring up at him. A hooded, twitchy juv with nine different kinds of arms, six insectoid legs, and eighteen different eyes planted across her face. Pinkness ballooned from her lip as she continued blowing her bubblegum. Her gaze was flat, betraying no terror or care that he was aiming his gun at her.
Pulling a hand from her pocket, she winked at him with half her eyes and mimed shooting at him first.
He powered his cannon down.
She stopped staring at him and went back to skipping down the road.
“What’s wrong with her?” Avo asked.
“Ah,” Chambers muttered. “Godsdamned FATE-donor. Looks like whatever Syndicate owns this one overstuffed her with mods. Rough shit.”
“FATE-Donor?” Avo said, studying the girl. None of the eyes resembled the others, and as he zoomed in on her, he guessed that they belonged to different species and designs as well.
“Basically a walking bio-mod farm. Parents take an, uh, non-standard loan to grow a kid and have their FATE registered with one of the Guilds. Their sponsors get to plant a bunch of questionable shit in said kids and sell them as they grow up. Win-win. Well, long as the juv don’t die, that is.”
“Impractical?” Avo said. “Could just clone the organs.”
Chambers scoffed. “Copyright consang. Ain’t no Guild’s going to abide a cloning vat or a bio-printer in the hands of a Syndicate. And if they catch us stealing some, they’ll fucking scapel the whole district. No fuss.”
“Growing mods in children solves this?”
“Yep. Puts one law against the other. Copyright law against the…the fucking…what was it–Charter of Sophont Rights! Thank Voidwatch for that shit, the Massist half-strands. If the organs are carried by a legally recognized sophont, the state can’t just repossess their organs because that will kill the individual. So, here’s the results of that legal shit.”
Ultimately, it still didn’t make much sense to Avo. The Guilds needed people to die to fuel their Souls and feed their Heavens. But not so inhumanely that it offended their sensibilities. Perhaps it was a certain moralistic aesthetic that Voidwatch was going for. Something more palatable than functional.
“Anyway, enough of the gammaware growing on her face, you should be focusing on getting me my betaware up in the Gorge.”
Avo growled. “Not even used to the armor yet.”
“The fuck you mean? You can move. You can shoot. You can read. You got two more advantages than most our guys. Anyway, enough of this shit, get down there and snatch our stuff so we can get back before the boss gets curious. Tests don’t last that long.”
Sighing with a disgusted snort, Avo began his slow approach to the Gouge. To his left, he studied the factory block he wanted to ascend for a vantage point. Maggots littered its sides in clumps. Looked like that was off the table now. Good thing the opposition was even softer than expected. Made things all the easier to deal with.
Despite that, he still moved cautiously, moving to clamber over the walls surrounding the Gorge instead of just trudging in through the front gate. Feeble and loose of thought though the guards might have been, it was still better for him not to get their attention.
Best for all sides to keep this from being a mess. As far as Avo was concerned, he was still untrained with his rig. Chambers clearly didn’t know what he was doing and Janand was just going along with what he was being told to do. Any escalations would be Avo’s burden to bear, and he was getting pretty close to being done with that arrangement.
As he reached the topside of the barricade, he peeked over using the optics on his hands and looked for patrols. A long drop into a deep channel filled with stale water greeted him. Avo frowned.
“Holy shit,” Chambers said, actually sounding impressed, “the half-strands built a moat. On the wrong side, technically. But still.”
Avo looked at the ditch filled with dirty water. “Moat?”
“Fuckin’...super ancient warfare fortification. Doesn’t let people on horses just ride up to your walls.”
Avo blinked again. “Horses?”
That question actually stumped Chambers for a moment too. “Think it’s like a nu-dog that’s big enough to rid–besides the point. It’s fucking cute, but you’re in a rig. Jump over it. Get in there. Get my–”
“Case,” Avo said, finishing the enforcer’s words. “I know. All you want is the case.”
Aiming for a particularly soft patch of soil to cushion his landing, Avo pushed off from the barricade and landed, the weight of his rig kicking sprays of soil into the air. Scanning the area through his omnidirectional optics, he waited for a moment before continuing. No guards. No patrols. Just lights and music pulsing down overhead. The hallways inside the former megablock were exposed to him like someone’s ribs. It was like looking at a mortal wound that just didn’t take.
A low humming drew his attention as two drones drifted on by, hovering unevenly in the air. They scanned the ground beneath them, and not much else. Ten feet away, Avo went undetected.
Chambers laughed. “Oh, this is so adorable. Shit, I almost wanna take a picture of this. Two drones as overwatch. That’ll stop someone.”
Studying the flight patterns of the drones, he watched as both rounded the sides of the tower simultaneously, leaving entire sections unmonitored. Poorly programmed patrol patterns. It was beginning to look like the milk run Chambers had promised.
Avo approached the tower, treading slowly over stretches of ovoid depressions parted into squares within a grid of glassed matter. It appeared that bored artillerists had indulged in a game of tic-tac-toe during the war.
Amusement finds a way.
Keeping low, Avo detected a trio of gangers stumbling out from the partially collapsed front entrance of the block. Smiles stretched each of their faces in an unnatural rictus and sharp giggles escaped from their throats. Their bodies looked atrophied and withered, cheap cyber with faulty servos keeping them moving despite their sapped muscles. Their clothes clung to them in tatters and flecks.
A few of them seemed to have murky pustular growths along their necks. There was a translucent sheen to the living cancers. They reminded Avo of the jiggling backsides of maggots.
“Fucking joyfiends,” Chambers said. He spat the slur without any jocularity; all rancor.
“Don’t like happiness,” Avo said, prodding him in return.
“Don’t like it when people take that joy shit. It’s poison dressed as something else.” Avo heard the enforcer swallow. “Ain’t right.”
Something was more personal here, like a weight resting on a nerve. Avo wanted to prod again, see what reaction he could provoke, but his better senses warned him against it.
He waited for them to saunter behind the block, making for a shack. They were laughing, weeping with joy, finding amusement in everything and nothing. It wasn’t an uncommon sight in the Undercroft. But joyfiends were easy fuel for the snuffing.
Getting close to the block, Avo found himself studying his choice of ascent. The front door was seemingly unguarded, but that was too direct. Would pull too much attention to him–he didn’t want to risk anything that might catch someone’s attention. He knew the armor was stronger than his flesh, but if anyone here had explosives, he would probably just end up as pasted meat inside a can.
Last he checked, the rig didn’t have inertial dampeners built into it. Meant he still bowed to the whims of physics when it came knocking.
The other option, then.
Down the sides of the tower ran opaque panes of glass frozen as if tides mid-undulation, parted into four sections by strips of holojectors. Without something being projected, however, it made the tower look like a studded, wavy paddle of some kind. Ridiculous, in a word.
At least the projector strips allowed him something to latch onto.
His ascent was thereafter a quiet affair, with him using his optics to keep track of the patrols beneath him. Thankfully, they were too drugged out or inattentive to look up. The climb continued to the accompaniment of Chambers humming a new pop-tune to the lyrics of slurs.
Despite the vulgarity of the man’s parodies, Avo had to admit the enforcer could carry a tune. “Wrong line of work, Chambers.”
“What? A compliment? From you?”
Avo grunted. He left it at that.
He settled into a near-meditative trance as he rose. Beneath the false light projected by Layer Two, beside a gleaming tide of blackened glass, it occurred to Avo that he was experiencing something he never enjoyed before. He was outside during daylight hours without wearing a shroud, without masking his eyes behind mirrorshades.
He took a moment then to savor the moment, lifting a hand as if to clench the holographic orb that was supposed to mimic the daystar in his fist and claim its mantle for his own. It was such an absurd act that he nearly laughed. But he enjoyed what little power he gained over the light all the same.
And then, the moment was promptly ruined when a pane of glass was lifted above him. A puff of smoke gusted out as a wheezing ganger stuck her head over the edge to empty the wetness coating her lungs. Her face was a collection of copper piercings, strobing neon-bright hap-tats, and prehensile hairs that changed styles from minute to minute.
Avo froze in place, his fist still grasping for the light.
She was a few floors above him, coughing out from the window of floor one-hundred and seventy-seven.
The destination marker shone in Avo’s HUD like a beacon.
He pulled himself close to the building. Alright. This was simple, he just needed to–
She leaned down and spat a mouthful of bile. Bile, which then splashed down over shoulder of Avo's rig.
Blinking, she rubbed at her eyes and froze, noticing him. “Holy shi–”
Avo fired his Celerostylus.
Why Scalpers? Heh. Name’s leftover from a bad habit I picked up during my days serving in the Skaldglas. Was posted in Nu-Scarrowbur during the war, but spent most of my time beneath the plates, fighting the ghouls.
There is a certain…desperation that fills you when you fight the ghouls. A thrill. It’s like you looking down the throat of death unchained, and you just have to keep feeding the Big Nothing. Explosives. Guns. Drones. Golems. Flechettes. Knives. Kill the monsters however you can, but you gotta go for the brain.
“If the head’s intact, the ghoul ain’t dead,” was the saying.
Guess I took that too close to heart.
-Mem-Log of Vincentine “Ripperjack” Javvers, Head of the Scalpers Syndicate
4-5
…Is Never a Milk-Run
His body surged. His armor caught up nearly an eternity later. The neural connectors in his back came afire with heat as Avo hissed in pain. His body wasn’t feeling the strain with the rig moving on his behest, but something was wrong with the connection. It felt like his nerve centers were being cooked along his spine, flashing pulses of pain and hurt surging through his skull.
But even in the haze of confusion, he still struck before the target could retreat. He zoomed up the side of the building, a wild hand reaching out for her. He tried to grab her. He ended up slamming a palm into her nose instead. A spurt of blood escaped through the gaps in his armored fingers. He felt the ridge of cartilage that was her nose sink below her carving face, her teeth cracking free like scattering pellets. Carried by the sheer force of the blow, she met the ceiling back-first in a thunderous impact.
A loud crash of shattering titles and rattling metal made Avo wonder if he killed her outright. The lack of flowing Essence or a ghost drifting into him meant otherwise.
Avo stopped tensing his organ. The sudden tidal wave of pain that shot through his body nearly made him lose his grip. He buried his fingers tighter through the surface of the projectors. The Celerostylus really didn’t like interfacing with the armor. Another problem that should have been resolved earlier.
Taught him to trust Chambers or Janand to ensure his in-field efficiency. He expected they would ensure his functionality if nothing else. But it should have taken little foresight to see them bringing about his death through raw incompetence alone.
He should have insisted on examining his own kit. The same rules between equipment and phantasmics applied here.
Across the commlink, he heard Chambers roaring with laughter. “Jaus’ fucking corpse, he swatted that poor girl! You see that shit Janard?”
The bastard tech was laughing at that too. Reminded Avo all his new coworkers were part of an amoral snuff industry.
Peeking over the open window, Avo saw a bent metal doorframe directly across from him. A smear of blood ran along the cracked ceiling, with the recently made jutting edges still clinging to flaps of skull tissue. The girl he just hit lay next to a folded door, confirming her survival in wet sputtering breaths.
She must’ve had laced bones seeing that her neck didn't snap in half from the hit. Avo doubted any flat could take a blow like that and come out alive. More than surprise, he felt the rage of shame bubbling inside him, building with Chambers’ choked chortles.
Milk run. Milk run didn’t mean Avo could let himself be this sloppy. Walton had trained him to be better, to focus more on the task than being smitten with a new tool. With him treating his new armor like a toy, the distraction cost him his focus, and in turn, his resulting incompetence made him inflict harm on the choiceless when it could have been avoided.
Well, before he had enough cause, anyway. He would gladly kill and eat her if she granted him proper cause.
Crawling into the room, he tore the window loose from its hinges and forced his way in. Around him was a bathroom of some kind, vast in its design.
A square-shaped bathtub filled with stale water sloshed about to his right. Dead flies danced along the bobbing waters, rising up and down like freckles upon the face of the turgid waters. A bent showerhead swung back and forth above him. To his right, five gold facets protruding over a large grime-coated sink added a dim note of ambiance to the room, playing soft dripping drums.
The girl moaned in pain. Avo clanked his teeth out of habit.
The beast wanted to finish her off. Open her throat and drink from her. Avo resisted. He had done enough to her. More than he knew she deserved anyway. Her thoughtstuff indicated that she was still conscious, but concussed past the nine hells with how her surface thoughts were popping before they could even congeal.
Something moved through the walls. Avo looked up. Three signatures of thoughtstuff filtered into the room past the door. None of them were warded. Gangers were equipped even worse than the Syndicate's goons down here.
The Nightmantis’ audio-detection functions narrowed in on several sources of sound. The walls weren’t thick, but there was a steady undercurrent of volume he needed to work through.
The Chambers’ marker pulsed beyond the bent door, lighting the entirety of the room. It was here. The biomods. The package. He just needed to–
“Ta-zzzie?” the electro-modded voice toned. Whoever was speaking sounded like an electric guitar of some kind shredding faint approximations of syllables into existence. “Co—oonnnnnnsangg! You al-Right!”
Avo cringed at the sudden spike in volume pulsing out from the speaker through the busted door.
“Oh good,” Chamber said. “It’s Shred. Snatch him. He’ll tell you where the biomod is. Save you the trouble of tearing through the room."
Avo squeezed out a hiss of frustration. “Know him?”
“Yeah. Pretty fucking annoying guy. Had a voice modular implanted in his throat. Crazy into the Nautcore–”
“Useful details, not hobbies,” Avo said, interrupting.
“I sold the package to him, okay? He’s the guy who should have it.”
This important, but previously unmentioned detail brought blessings of headaches and tidings of building fury. It was like applying for a job under a chem-addicted Guilder in the Undercroft; the details and duties he had to fill under Conflux were seemingly dependent on the whims and moods of whatever handler he had at the time.
“Chambers,” Avo said, barely containing his snarl, “Snatch-and-grab is fixed-position retrieval. No harm. Just take. This isn't snatch-and-grab. This is repossession.”
Chambers scoffed. “Why’s this shit matter? Look, if it makes you feel better, you are still technically snatching it back from them.”
"Also forgot to tell me that you sold it to them. You had the mods in the first place."
The enforcer chuckled. “Well…”
Avo took a breath. It didn’t help. He was going to pluck out one of Chambers’ eyes later and eat it later. That would calm him down.
“Let’s just say I made a mistake,” Chambers continued. “Might’ve undervalued what I had.”
“And…you want it back?”
“Hells fucking yeah I want it back. Heard Mirrorhead was offering bonuses for any new aug earlier in the week. Offering fucking triple what I sold it for. Tried buying it back ‘legally’ but that ganger-fuck Shred said someone else already placed an order for it. So, naturally, I decided to seal three deals with one run. You test your little dress. I get my stuff back without paying. The boss gets some new product.”
Avo ground his teeth together. Taught him to agree to favors. Taught him to let someone else plan one of his dives. This could have all been avoided if he just said no. Why didn't he say no?
Maybe it was exhaustion from the sheer amount of torment he went through the day before. Maybe it was the fact that Chambers was just so affable, and Avo thought he found someone he could turn to his advantage in this incomprehensible organization of unscrupulous degenerates.
“T-AAASSIII!” Shred said, voice rising to a shredding note. “Op-eennnnn the doooooorrr. Put the nee–dlee dow-nnnn. Buy-ers-are-a-commm-iinnnggg.”
Shred began kicking the door in frustration. A piece of metal burst off the hinges. Activating his Whisper, Avo fed his awareness through the wall like a needle to scry at what he was facing.
He found himself staring an executive suite turned drug den. Used elixirs and half-filled syringes littered the place. Gaudy skins harvested from chimeric bioforms hung from the walls like nailed carpets. A massive grav-bed hummed at the end of the room, the gold frame shining despite the filth.
There were but three people in the room. Two had minimal combat augs and looked to be light of arms as well. One sat upon the couch, focused on a holovision playing an old frontier piece. The last one’s considerable bulk and lack of chrome made Avo guess they were Scaarthian, albeit under seven feet tall and still young enough to be male.
Good. Meant they were far younger than Rantula. Avo didn’t want to deal with someone that had her strength even in a rig. The fact that he was facing a juvenile boded well.
Threat assessment: Minimal. Avo seized the initiative.
With a tug, he listened to the servomotors in his rig whistle as he pried the door free. Before him, Shred stumbled back, eyes widening in shock. Reflexively, the ganger went for the pistol tucked at his waist. Casually, Avo jabbed him in the ribs. The chorus of snaps ran deep and loud. Shred went down gasping for air.
Wild gunshots roared. Impacts skipped off Avo’s armor from the left. A ganger-youth covered in hap-tats and lined with horns aimed a wrist-grown bio-gun at him, the cartilaginous barrel smoking, the sacs of skin behind it alight with biochemical combustions.
Speckles of blue dotted Avo’s rig-integrity menu. Low caliber impact. Small arms. No danger. He could have probably taken those shots even outside the rig.
Instinctively, Avo almost activated his reflexes again before the ebbing pain reminded him not to. Didn’t matter. Didn’t need it.
The bio-gun barked twice more and puffed. Empty. The juv took a step back, but too late. Avo brought his arm down like a hammer. The ganger's collarbone split in half, folding beneath the weight of the blow. The ganger tumbled back with a choked cry, crashing against the couch and finally alerting the Scaarthian, who was too distracted by the climatic sequence playing on the holovision.
The large alt-human stood, turning to greet Avo with a broadening grin. Inside, the beast chuffed with curiosity. Did this one think he could take someone in a rig? The other two were too soft to be of amusement, but perhaps this one…
The Scaarthian ducked. Avo reached over to grab him, but then something blurred upward in an arc. A flashing blow sent Avo sliding back. A spill of blue ran down his right arm in the integrity menu as a guitar shattered against his right pauldron. Without pause, the Scaarthian pushed, slamming his forehead into the center mass of Avo’s armor.
The strike was heavy. Outside of the rig, it would have doubtlessly broken Avo's bones. Inside, he barely heard the thud.
Eyes lined with ritualized scars running from a sigil-like orb at his forehead, the Scaarthian brayed a bellow of joyous violence as he brought the broken neck of the guitar to bear like a club, working against the titanium plating of the rig.
He swung. Avo shifted back, the lag leaving a beat too slow and the blow an inch too close. A line of blue was scored across the rig. Three nothing. Avo frowned. The rig was making him slow and careless. The mounting frustration inside him made him want to shoot the last ganger with his cannon.
Ethics, meanwhile, plucked at his aim. He needed to finish this properly; without killing them. He was already committing a wrong by invading their home.
The gangers were just defending their goods, after all. Not their fault he had been hoodwinked by Chambers into a literal home invasion in a snatch-and-grab turned dishonorable repo-op.
Shuffling back, Avo jabbed the Scaarthian twice as he overextended. Satisfying shivers of force washed deep through the rig. The Scaarthian’s cheek broke, and jaw snapped. He slipped on a rolling bottle, tripping. Avo caught him by a flap of ear and pulled. The Scaarthian yelped, stumbling forward.
Eye-first into an armored elbow.
The pain of having one’s eyeball popped would have put most people down. But this one was a hard-blooded brawler and fought on as if divorced from pain. The Scaarthian batted Avo’s hand aside and drove into him. In a feat of gene-blessed strength, the ganger pushed, arms wrapped around the legs of the rig. Like a tree being chopped, Avo felt the impossible strength in his adversary's muscles swell, raw flesh overcoming wailing servos.
For a moment, he managed the inconceivable: lifting the rig off the carpet. That triumph lasted until Avo shoved a pointed thumb right into the Scaarthian’s ear, shredding the flesh inside and hooking out to cripple his equilibrium.
This finally earned a cry from the Scaarthian as he toppled forward. Both of their masses plunged back and crashed through the walls, Avo stumbling, the ganger toppling. They were back in the bathroom again, the fight going from dirty carpets to filth-stained tiles.
Groaning, the last ganger spat broken teeth and held the tattered sinews of his inner ear in place. Glaring up defiantly at Avo, the Scaarthian grinned, expression feral and warlike, caked beneath a mask of blood. “C-come on, soft-hands. Give me some pain worth feeling.”
“Jaus, fucking Scaarthians, cosang,” Chambers said. It sounded like he was eating something. A snack. Once again, Avo found himself serving as entertainment. “My advice... just shoot him.”
Inside the armor, Avo was licking his lips as well. The Scaarthian had proven to be prey worth eating, but prey that was still too unethical to claim. The beast coiled, writhing against its restraints. Avo swallowed his saliva.
“Sorry about the leg,” Avo said.
The Scaarthian frowned in confusion.
And before the ganger could rise from his knees, Avo shifted to the side and stomped down. A bladed leg bit through an Achilles tendon. The Scaarthian winced but didn’t cry out. Not even when Avo took the other leg from him as well. Immediately, before even hitting the ground, the ganger clawed out, trying to bring Avo down with him, anything to keep the fight going.
Avo nodded. Another time, another life, the old war gods of the Skuldvast would have proudly poured great blessings upon this one.
Right now though, the ganger was just a stubborn brawler in a foul bathroom. One that was eating away at too much of Avo’s self-control and time.
Reaching down, he slammed a final punch into the previously exposed tissue of their inner ear. The Scaarthian roared, voice carrying more fury than pain as he toppled, balance fleeing his body. It took three more heavy punches before the bruiser was finally incapacitated. Still, he was broken, not beaten, and took to pawing in circles, muttering slurred demurs at Avo.
“Fuckin’--fuckin’ half-strand fucker coward,’ the Scaarthian growled, worming near-blindly on the ground. His body was done. HIs will wasn't.
Tearing his focus away from the oozing wounds left on the ganger before the beast’s urges overwhelmed him, Avo was about cross back into the room when Chambers’ chirped in.
“Wait, hold on,” Chambers said. “Zoom your optics in closer on his face. Wanna get a profile.”
“Why?”
“Thinking of poaching him later. Tough godsdamned bastard.”
For once, Avo thought Chambers to be making a wise decision. Wise for a messed up bunch of thugs and criminals anyway. Recruiting good hitters couldn’t be easy. This one would be persistent, if nothing else.
Crossing back into the main suite, Avo found Shred crawling on his hands and knees, trying to make it to the doors. Puddles of puke lined the path behind the flailing ganger, likely a direct outcome of being punched in the chest by someone wearing an exo-rig.
As Avo approached, Shred rolled, pulling out a cheap switchblade. Avo hummed with amusement before swatting the weapon free from the ganger’s hands. It darted against the holovision and snapped in half. The frontier piece kept playing–scenes of Scaarthian raiders charging Kosgan gun lines unfolded in a most cinematic portrayal of slaughter.
“Motherfuc–” Shred said. Avo grabbed him by the back of the neck, the ganger’s curse trailing off to a riffing yelp. The man was a near-flat. Wiry, if not for the bulging vocal amplifier built around his throat. He wore a leather jacket under a leather coat and had too many belts.
“Shred?” Avo asked, trying to confirm if he hit the right guy, or if the one with the broken collarbone was his man somehow.
“Ye–ah! I’m Shrrrr—eed! Wha-t! The fu-uck do you wan-ant, half-str--ra-ra-rand!”
Avo tapped his voice aug, causing Shred to choke. “Talk normal. Or I’ll remove it. Communicate by notes afterward.”
Shred coughed and nodded in the first hints of obvious fear. “Alright, alright.”
“Biomod,” Avo said. “Where?”
Shred blinked. “Did Chambers send you?”
Chambers suddenly cut in. “Avo don’t–”
Avo grunted. The response was so vague that Shred just looked at him, confused.
“On second thought, I don’t know why I was worried.”
“Biomod. Where?” Avo’s voice a sibilant hiss.
Frankly, this could’ve all been much neater if he just used his Whisper. They didn’t have any wards, and digging through their thoughtstuff using a Ghost-Link was probably easier than any interrogation he could conduct. But cracking their minds was much the same as killing them in Avo’s opinion. Leave them catatonic for the rest of their lives at the least.
Walton probably wouldn’t appreciate Avo using the art this way. Avo frowned. Father probably wouldn’t have appreciated any bit of this endeavor.
There was always some grey to dives, but Avo had done his best to avoid hurting the choiceless when he could. Right here, right now felt like a betrayal of those ideals. One born of deception, but functionally, the outcome was the same.
Ganger though these men might have been, they didn’t ask for this invasion. Nor did the girl in the bathroom ask to be struck across the face.
Chambers had much to answer for when this was done. As would all of Conflux. But he needed to survive long enough to turn the tables.
“Al-alright, consang, stay zero,” Shred said, holding his hands up. “It’s right over–”
A loud knock hammered against the front doors of the suite before Shred could answer.
“Hey, Shred! I brought them Scalpers up with me.” the person behind the door laughed. “You ready to cut a deal?”
The Scalpers should be considered more paramilitary death cult than Syndicate–And Vincentine, if you’re watching this, it’s not a fucking compliment.
Whatever the hells happened to him when he was down in the dark fighting the Low Masters touched him good and deep. Knew him before he went down. Didn’t know him after he came back up. Can’t say I blame him. The Low Masters only had primal Heavens, but before we go about forgetting, they’re still shells of dead gods.
And there’s nothing–ain’t nothing–that can prepare you for facing a god on your own.
Best metaphor I have is… like emptying your gun into a hurricane. Inevitable. Just inevitable.
-Quail Tavers, New Vultun Sunrise Interview
4-6
The Scalpers
“Shitshitshit,” Shred whimpered, eyes flicking between Avo and the door.
“Shit! Shit! Shit!” Chambers cursed. “Janand! Scramble the drones! Scramble now. Avo! Get the bioware and get the fuck out of there. Fucking Scalpers–fuck, how the fuck was I supposed to know they were going to be there–”
Avo tuned Chambers out. The enforcer’s panic was unbecoming and unprofessional, but his folly was not one to be shared.
Beyond the door shone the accretion of six minds. Six, and an endless sea more of flowing thoughts suffusing the entirety of the block. Five among them were warded, though poorly. The type of quality Avo saw in Conflux enforcers.
Still, if the Scalpers were properly set up for insertion into the room, the momentum would be their advantage. Soft as their minds were, Avo’s phantasmics were going to be hard-pressed to engage six targets, especially if they were shooting at him at the same time. Worse yet, he knew nothing of the Scalpers’ equipment, numbers, or even if they had a Necrojack with them.
To his advantage, he had a working Metamind, a functional but outdated exo-rig, and a head start for whatever he wanted to do. Worse comes to worst, he needed to make a kill–get his Liminal Frame up and running again. Get rid of his Rend and keep from staying dead.
The person outside the door hammered against the door again. “Shred? Don’t tell me you went and shot up before this?”
Avo leaned down next to Shred. “Tell him to wait.”
Shred nodded, face flush with stale sweat, their body shivering with fear. “I-I’m clean right now.” There was a choking lilt to Shred’s voice, his gulps sending out echoes of guitar twangs through his modulator.
“Sure, Shred,” the ganger said. Their scoffing laugh told Avo that they didn’t believe Shred, but belief wasn’t needed right now. A delay was. “Anyway–”
“Just a second,” Shred choked out. “I’m…I’m getting the shit. I’m trying to get the shit–forgot the combination again, alright?”
A beat followed. An ebbing flow of disappointment spiked into the Nether. Avo tasted the emotion in the near-waters of thoughtstuff and scowled. He had no idea why their minds were bare, or why they couldn’t be bothered to even get some cheap wards installed. It was like bleeding into the water.
“Jaus, Shred, get your shit together. Two minutes, alright. We need this fuckin’ deal done, consang–you set it up. Don’t glass-jaw on us now.”
“Fuck, man, alright,” Shred shot back. “Just need to–just gotta get it open is all. Just give me time. That’s all I need, okay? Fuck!”
“Hey, hey, fine, relax. Just… get the shit, yeah? We need their imps. Farm's gonna fail otherwise.”
“Yeah,” Shred said, looking down at the ground. “Yeah.”
Through the door, Avo watched as the sphere of thoughtstuff bobbed away. Muted voices were exchanged. Questions regarding if there was a problem. Hurried assurances that the gangers were professionals, and that the bioware was just being screened to ensure there weren’t any issues.
A plan formed in Avo’s head. First thing. Secure the package. He already broke in and committed a transgression against his ethics, no sense in leaving a job half-done as an insult to his professionalism as well.
“Please…” Shred said.
Avo released the ganger. In the corner of the room, the bio-gunner was still groaning in pain, clutching at his neck. The lumbering bruiser continued groping against the tiles of the bathroom, palms smacking hard against the ground. “Don’t beg. Get mods. I leave. You live. Understand?”
Shred nodded. “Okay! Okay!”
“Nice job, ghoulie. So, I scrambled the drones and I’m thinkin’--”
“No,” Avo snarled. “No more thinking. Not from you. I get you the package. I finish delivery. But you have thought enough. Your plan caused this. Your lack of research. Preparation. Sloppy. Unprofessional. Shamed the dive. Shamed me!”
A lull of static-charged silence followed. “I, uh–”
“Get drones over Gorge. Fly high. Need overwatch. Find how many Scalpers. Find where. Need exfiltration route through alleys. Streets open. Rig light. Direct run too dangerous.”
Chambers sighed. “Ghoulie–”
“No. No more talk. Do. No distractions. Action. Fix your mistakes.”
With that, Avo put Chambers out of his mind. He would have his reckoning with the enforcer later if he survived this. Now, he needed to do some preparation of his own.
He manifested his Whisper but held it in reserve. If he cast it out too early and got spotted by someone, the Scalpers would know something had gone wrong with the deal. With the gangers bare of any phantasmics, it wouldn't take much for them to deduce that another player was in the field. Probably a rival Syndicate. From there, assumptions of a double-cross would naturally follow.
Along with violence and bloodshed.
Avo needed to engage them at his leisure. Or better yet, avert combat entirely, despite the beast excitedly screaming for violence in his veins. High as the thrill was burning inside him, greater still was the numbness of his prior disappointments.
Let himself be made a fool. Milk-run? Nothing was a milk-run in this city, in his current condition. His assumption that Mirrorhead would have prevented Chambers or anyone from making a mistake with his life was unfounded. He had forgotten to include the variable of rank incompetence landing him in a desperate situation.
Dragging a case out from under the bed, Shred half-pulled, half-punched in a series of icons on the case's holopad. His shaking hands resulted in two failures and a flow of unending curses.
Thirty seconds. More chattering from the outside. Scalpers sounded impatient.
A hissing series of clicks sounded from the case as Shred stepped back, pointing down.
“It’s all here, consang,” the ganger said, backing up against the wall, palms raised. “Fuckin’, take it and go.”
Inside the case was a small sealed tube with a translucent window. Picking it up, Avo watched as a cluster set of eyes floated by. His hunger quavered. A most appealing thought rose, one that had him eating the bioware right in front of Chambers out of spite. Hells, he might just do it for the taste. Carefully, he magnetized its backside to the armor on his thigh.
Turning to look at Shred, Avo let out a slow breath of displeasure. “Sorry. Didn’t want this. Will clear blemish with favor down the line. If you’re still alive.”
Confusion spread across Shred’s face. “What?”
Avo continued. “Get down on the ground. Shooting might start. Gauss will shred through plascrete. Got no armor. Shrapnel might kill you. Recommend hiding under grav-bed.”
The beast wailed. It wanted Avo to kill the man, to sate both violence and thaumic demands. He ignored the urge. Instant gratification and lack of forethought got him into this. Just reacting was, at best, going to compromise the values of his father, and see him damned regardless if he didn’t correct his hubris.
As the ganger dove beneath the bed, Avo cast out his Whisper–thrusting it through the ground beneath him instead of directly through the door. The Scalpers were outside, but if he took a different angle, he could perhaps mask his presence amidst the thoughtstuff of the gangers in this building. Scry at the Scalpers from an angle.
Or he would have if he didn’t feel the awareness of a Specter splash up at him from a floor below. Awkwardly, their minds greeted each other, both unprepared, both sharing the same plan to peer at their enemies from an angle.
Avo was the first to break free from the trance.
Driving his Whisper like a cleaver down upon the strands of phantasmal matter connecting the Scalper to his Specter, Avo felt his wards roar as he impacted and tore into the mental shielding of another. Yet, Necrojack though the Scalper was, their defenses were static and their sequencing laughable. They used wards that were constructs sequenced to battlements of stone, starved of ghosts. Avo brought the hurricane that was his Mem-Guard down upon them.
COG-CAPACITY: 44%
Like churning wheat, Avo felt the walls protecting his enemy come apart in pieces, their surface thoughts dissolving over into his mind through a mutually blooming headache. Roiling pain and trauma exploded through his enemy as Avo watched them retreat, their thoughtstuff bleeding loose from their minds, spewing naked memories into the Nether. Memories that ended up splashing over Avo’s Whisper.
Insight spiked inside Avo. Suddenly, he knew more than he did a moment ago–chaotic flashes of memories flooding through his Metamind. There weren’t just five Scalpers, but twelve. They had other members on standby scattered across the building, guns already locked to the room.
Outside the door, Avo heard the whines of gauss weapons powering up. The ganger outside gasped in dismay.
“Whoa, whoa, hey, consangs, what’s the big–” the ganger began.
The sound of a blade slicing clean through flesh greeted Avo’s ears. A body fell. Servos sounded. The Scalpers were moving. He turned to run, making for the walls of the bathroom. With a thought, he activated his Phys-Sim.
Just in time for the shooting to start.
Around him, walls exploded, and the ground shredded. Lancing shots tore through the room and carved gouges from the floor to the ceiling, the sheer force behind the projectiles tugging stumbles into Avo’s gait. Launching himself hard, he smashed out from the way he entered, walls crumbling before his mass as he dove into the open air before one of the Scalpers got lucky.
Crackling flechettes filled the air. A stray shot chipped across his shoulder. For the first time, a light flash of yellow ignited through his rig integrity menu. The screaming wind cupped his guts as he fell, leaving him at the mercy of gravity and the utility bioform that Janand planted on him earlier.
He hoped the thing worked.
From this high, the stretch of Burner’s Way straightened out like the trunk of a metallic tree coated with cancer sores made from waste and debris. Flickers of thoughtstuff lined stray buildings, but looking down, Avo could see more pockets of emptiness than there was life.
Ten feet he fell. Twenty. His Phys-Sim was rapidly running calculations, trying to give him an estimation to impact. His rig would probably survive the landing, but he would splatter inside if the bioform didn’t open soon.
Inertia, again, was a cruel ruler.
Snapping fragments of plascrete sheared out from behind him, pluming dust clouds tracing the trajectories of flechettes gone off target. Benefits of having decently maintained wards: Prevented you from getting mem-locked.
Suddenly, a loud pop sounded along the back of the rig. Avo felt the balloon expand before he heard the low note of the bioform drawing in wind. Across his shoulders, a flesh lattice expanded out like tattered strands, slowly filling as the bioform respired. Air began to flow and the lattice expanded, unfurling wide to become akin to a flesh-made sail held together by links of cartilage.
Avo felt his descent lurch as his new parasail caught its first draft of wind. Within the rig, he growled with satisfaction as he felt himself catch a gale of wind, riding upon its currents. His Phys-Sims falling numbers stabilized.
Good. At least Janand did good work. All he needed to do now was–
A flashing mote of light tore out from a distant alley and struck Avo in the chest. An impact trajectory manifested, but before Avo even saw the redness that was its color, the micro-missile detonated against his chest.
The rig screamed, integrity exploding in a tide of orange, armor warping before the blooming shockwave. Inside, Avo felt his muscles absorb the impact the inner rig lining couldn't. Tendons snapped. He felt something inside him fracture. The bio-sail he was gliding on disintegrated, torn from his back as he was blasted back into the Gouge.
Spinning, tumbling, limbs twisting, and armor hissing, Avo crashed through two walls and scrambled on hands and knees into a room. People were screaming around him. Blurring feet and fleeing shadows shot past him. Children were sobbing.
Looking up, he found himself in a cramped living room, the haggard faces of a family staring back at him.
Avo drooled blood over himself and groaned, trying to shake off the dizziness. Chambers was cutting in and out. The HUD was flickering. Cracking with glitching errors. Half the optics were gone. “Sorry. About the room.”
Dazed, he pulled himself up using the walls and a stump-like holovision stand.
Another flechette crackled down through the ceiling, and the holovision burst apart. The family screamed. More shots followed from above, the room was coming apart. Stumbling, Avo moved for the doors, smashing through as the family kept screaming.
Growling, he stumbled deeper into the structure, skull throbbing, flesh aching. External air was whistling into the rig. The armor had prevented the missile from punching through, but at a cost. Petals of twisted metal dangled free from his chest, the glow of a sparking power grid exposed. System errors rang through his mind as he pushed further down the hall turning.
Behind him, he heard whistling. Two dagger-sized drones swooped around the corner. They scanned and marked him. He, in turn, used his still functional Phys-Sim to make up for his rig’s failing systems and fired his precision cannon.
The shot threaded through both targets. The recoil-balancer pulsing from the back of his cannon cut a clean slice through the wall behind him. A good shot, though still a waste, obliterating two drones with a precision cannon made to kill light vehicle platforms. Of course, it would have been a bigger waste if he ended up dead.
More voices rose into screams. Men. Women. Children. Animals. He was trapped in a gunfight among the choiceless. He didn’t want this. He didn’t–
Someone burst down through the ceiling above him, blades flashing.
On instinct, Avo fired his reflexes, and hellfire exploded through his nerves. He ducked back, barely evading the first slashes. The armor didn’t work well with his Celerostylus during the best of times, and now it was like trying to keep focused while molten metal licked pain through his veins.
The Scalper that assailed him had two vibrating frequency blades extended like scythes across their shoulders. Their rig was the shape of a skeletal grasshopper, legs bent, arms jagged with autocannon barrels. With how fast they were moving still, they must’ve had some kind of reflex booster as well.
Probably one that worked with the rig, and didn't make them feel like they were coming apart from the inside.
The Scalper drove forward, barrels raised, blades rearing.
Avo, too consumed by agony to play fisticuffs, slammed his Whisper into their wards again–this time bearing a thought-shiv as a spear tip. His phantasmal dagger sank past their wards before they could bury their frequency blades into him.
GHOSTS - [41]
The Scalper cried out, toppling as their thoughtstuff shattered free like a dish breaking against a wall. Avo released his Celerostylus. He tried to right himself but ended up vomiting inside his rig instead. His limbs were twitching despite his struggle to control them. At his feet, the Scalper began to whine, a low keening of madness signaling the death of their personhood, their descent past the jaws of madness.
Lining a firing trajectory with his Phys-Sim, Avo put the Scalper out of their misery. The shot bifurcated clean through their head in a spraying mist of brain matter and titanium. Avo made it three more steps past the body before he toppled over himself.
Faintly, he could hear the whining servos of more rigs approaching along with the low hum of gauss guns spinning tungsten along their barrels. He tried to stand. His nerve clusters screamed. His skull screamed. His insides stung.
He was going to die here.
He was going to–
THAUMIC CYCLER: 30 thaum/c
SOUL ONLINE
ENGAGING THAUMIC CYCLER: 30 thaum/c
HEAVEN [SANGEIST] ONLINE
MANIFESTING HELL [FIRST CIRCLE]
HELLVENTS ACTIVATING: EJECTING REND
And, like an entropic flame tearing free from an alloyed cocoon, a gusting shroud of darkness poured loose from Avo’s very being as matter around him began to decay and dissolve. The floor flaked and crumbled away beneath him, peeling out of existence along with pieces of the Nightmantis.
Avo fell.
REND CAPACITY: 81% AND DROPPING…
The impossible cannot be balanced by the natural.
For every Heaven, there needs to be a counterbalancing Hell. A certain counterweight of impossibility from the miracles created by a Heaven.
But don’t get it twisted: the Hell is still an ontologic–a weapon.
From the First to the Ninth Circles, each Hell is bound to a domain, and from that Domain they will vent their designated Rend. As such, if you ever want to qualify as a proper Godclad, you will learn the canons of your Heaven, and will understand what daemons it might accrue…
-Santanado “Starsinger” Mondelles, “Gods of Self”
4-7
The First Circle
The fall did not stop. Even after Avo plunged past the first floor, and then a second. Hardened plascrete and rebar shattered into particulate upon greeting his skin. From his black, plates and pieces from the Nightmantis spilled free, its dissolving matter spreading out from the entropic shroud that clung to Avo.
Down through rooms and halls, Avo sank, his body like a cursed stake driven into virgin soil. Solid matter around him withered away into flakes of crumbling sand, the spilling shell of his former rig unspooling like water-painted wings of chrome from his back.
Yet, more than the devouring gales that rippled forth from his body, Avo felt his awareness blossom again. It was like a limb was returning to him–a part of his being that had been forgotten, asleep, now reawakened and roaring back into existence. Through the darkness, a chasm of inverted flame began to burn.
Within, he felt it. Controlled it. His blood flowed and fused to his whims, shaping itself to his will. The Sangeist within him exhaled the strain that suffused its insides, and finally, it opened itself to the world. The entirety of the block came alight in glowing veins. All solid matter around him greeted his gaze as flashing patterns; the source code of their ontological architecture.
It was as if another pair of eyes had opened beneath his own, and opened fully.
He felt the weight of his Heaven now, burning deep within him as his Soul spun bright. Below, an ebbing reflection danced in opposition to the Sangeist, supping from it the building Rend, balancing its mass with a counter presence of its own.
A Hell for a Heaven.
Rattling shots sounded from above. Reaching out, Avo tried to halt his fall but found that though he could guide the gusting shroud spilling free from his inner flame, he could not stop it from unmaking all solid matter around him.
Not until he halted his venting.
VENTING PAUSED
REND CAPACITY: 55%
Like a gas choked away with a twist of a valve, the shroud broke from reality as existence shuddered and reset. As the blackness vanished, however, it suddenly became evident to Avo how much damage his Hell had done. Across multiple levels, decay reigned, and a certain rot had eaten away even more of the Gouge’s skeleton.
For a thirty feet radius, it looked like his Rend had vaporized countless tons of matter, peeling through walls and exposing horrified families. The entropic gusts that enwreathed him had eaten through metal and glass with equal ease, sparing only liquids and gases.
More interestingly, however, was the fact that the lingering edges left in his wake dribbled with falling rivulets of blood.
Avo’s Phys-Sim screamed, snapping his attention back to the present. An orange lane lined the encroaching impact between him and the ground coming up three floors below, threatening to meet him head-first in a collision, with his exposed flesh certain to be caked between the remains of his armor and floor of tattered carpeting exposing hardened plascrete.
Reacting more on instinct than thought, Avo shaped six limbs from the blood within him and drew them out from his pores. Bearing the properties of tungsten and blood both, Avo felt the new limbs greet his senses as he plunged their jagged tips into the walls.
Like hooks digging across chalkboards, the surfaces around him screamed, sprays of jagged shrapnel spilling free. Out of his shoulders, Avo felt a lattice of blood blossom into shape, caging his face between the closed hound-like jaws of the Sangeist as the symbol representing the pattern of tungsten exploded over his skull like a flaming crown.
This was the smallest the Sangeist had ever been. Far less than even a ton, but still, Avo could feel the blood that used to flow inside him coat over his body, pushing the neural drills of his destroyed rig out from his spine like rising adult teeth.
A growing hunger burned with him. Using himself as the channel for this miracle held its own expense. Still, he could not deny its coursing power. As the final drill clicked free from his spine, Avo landed. The impact would have broken his legs if this was a natural fall, but as he fired his Celerostylus, he hammered into the ground with expanding pistons of blood shaped from his haemokinesis. The ground groaned, fissuring, the plasteel beams inside groaning as they bent.
He released his reflexes. Nothing inside him hurt this time. Without the limiting feedback of his rig and or the fragilities of his body, his blood heeded the whims of his accelerated mind like a perfect instrument, never breaking and easily shaped.
A feral smile spread across Avo’s face.
REND CAPACITY: 58%
Without hesitation, he pushed his Whisper out the block to check which floor he was on now.
Twenty third. Between the missile and his Hell, he experienced quite the fall.
Sweeping his perception up in a wide splash, a building full of naked thoughtstuff greeted him, the emotion of fear pouring free from the minds of gangers and tenants into phantasmal stratocumulus.
Five warded minds were diving down the exterior of the building, maneuvering to fire at him from the outside in, their perceptions yet to notice his Whisper. Four more were positioning themselves some ten floors beneath him, seemingly hoping to establish a horizontal-vertical L-shaped firing position to cut him down.
A final unit of two was already skittering down through the dust-choked openings his Hell made while venting his Rend, the contours of their rigs gleaming like missiles in a sandstorm. Reflex boosted. They were probably of a team as the Scalper he killed earlier–come too late to support their comrade.
Come too late to realize that they were merely throwing themselves to the beast.
Clicking his teeth in anticipation of his meal, Avo flexed the blood around him. With a scream of shredding alloy, the Nightmantis came apart around him. He emerged then from two cocoons. Physically, he shed his exo-rig as slats forming the shell of the Sangeist hardened around him. Metaphysically, he felt the Rend building within him again, inching back to fullness.
But this time, it wouldn’t stay full.
The two vanguards skittered down along the walls using embedded frequency blades, clad in the same black armor as the one that died earlier. It struck Avo as odd with how out of position they were with the rest of their forces but he supposed there could have been a bonus if they claimed his head and the bioware–
Avo winced and shot his mottled armor a look, bloodthirsty reverie breaking momentarily. He couldn’t tell if the mods were still on him. Probably not considering he took a missile to the chest. He sighed. Check later. Kill now.
Lining their descending thoughtstuff with his Phys-Sim, Avo lined his attack vectors and coiled two spear-tipped whips into being. When he was done with them, he needed to move further into the block. He had all the advantage up close right now, but still lacked the mass as well as the means to engage from afar.
As they came into visual sight, all but running down the walls through the floors, Avo fired his reflexes again and cast his whips free. The world stumbled to a near halt. The dust in the air flowed by the micro-inches. With his tactile senses broadened by his absolute control over blood, he felt the narrow lanceheads of his newly shaped weapons punching through the thinness of both Scalpers’ plating.
Immediately, though, he felt their writhing weight pulled down at him, their combined mass more than his natural strength could bear. Right. The force and speed of his blood would mirror his natural limits unless modified.
So, instead of struggling with the weight of the Scalpers, he tore their vessels empty of blood as well, exsanguinating them and feeding himself. Suddenly, he didn’t feel so hungry anymore while the mass of his tower grew.
THAUMIC CYCLER: 32 thaum/c
GHOSTS - [43]
Avo scanned through their ghosts with thought and found no sequences worth pilfering. He considered taking their rigs, but before he could claim any of their weapons or armor, two concentrated barrages of fire shredded the hallway. One from outside, one from below.
They established the pincer sooner than he expected.
He tensed his Celerostylus again and bit back the growing discomfort building in his skull, grateful that his body was being spared at the very least. As the symbiote imposed languor upon the motion of the world, the flechettes still greeted him frightfully fast, the impacts blunting against the thickening cells of his blood.
Still, Avo felt each shot strike him like a thunderclap, the kinetic energy spearing deep into his mind as layers of armored blood broke, folded, and mended. In an instant, he adopted more angles to his form, trying to encourage the shots to skid.
Manifesting a reaching limb from his back pulled himself toward the windows, the outside of the building. Two more shots rang through his rapidly circling bloodstream–the joined efforts between his Celeostylus and Heaven throwing flechettes aside as he spun his plate of armor like a whirlpool. Still, he could feel each shot chipping deeper, getting closer to the meat that wore the god.
And unlike the god, the meat was soft. Real soft.
REND CAPACITY: 61%...
Avo cast his Whisper out and peeked out at his foes. One team of shooters was below, at ground level while the other was scant feet away, vaporizing the exterior walls down to nothing as their gun barrels glowed and hissed baleful hisses of waste heat into the air.
In a second, Avo selected his targets and counterattacked. Lining an angle along the sides of the shredded walls, he yanked himself into position, his skull burning with pain, as he slammed against what remained of the walls and vented his Hell again.
REND CAPACITY: 58%...
Immediately, the Sangeist fizzled out of existence as a black cloud of gnawing entropy spilled free from Avo’s lungs as the flame inside him exhaled. A gust of all-devouring wind scythed through the wall in a winnow cleave. The walls dividing the interior of the Gouge from the world outside suddenly weren’t.
Four of the five Scalpers didn’t even get to scream, their bodies coming apart as if stripped clean by locusts. The last fell, the Scalper’s voice crackling through her compromised armor in a rising shriek, the shroud eating away her right arm but missing the mass of her body. Still, she maintained enough discipline to cut her cord, giving herself over to gravity as her shoulder-mounted gun flashed.
THAUMIC CYCLER: 36 thaum/c
GHOSTS - [47]
REND CAPACITY: 39%...
A burst of three flechettes plunged through Avo’s nimbus and struck him. They broke like glass against his body. Bending the currents of his shroud with a thought, Avo basked her, unmaking her lower body with a gesture.
A shot punched through the ground beneath Avo’s feet, slicing a clean wound up between his eyes. Hissing, he pulled the shroud back around him and channeled its withering flow through the ground beneath him.
But a flash of naked thoughtstuff flashed across his mind. Choiceless. Caught in the crossfire. Just beneath him. Reacting, Avo pulled back, funneling his gale away from a bronze-skinned juvenile running terrified through the halls.
The kid turned to up stare through the hollow in the ceiling, eyes dull as they stumbled, the thick nectar of joy dripping from an exposed vein.
Avo growled. “Get away–”
A rising tide of mag-flung shots cut through both his words and the juv. The adolescent came apart in a soup of gore, blood staining Avo’s body while their bursting flesh dissolved.
Growl turning into a furious hiss, Avo brought the full weight of his Hell down through the floors beneath him, guiding his entropy like a coruscating tornado.
REND CAPACITY: 21%...15%
Beneath him, his blood pooled, the ground cracking and sinking as the floor destabilized. As the last hissing whispers of his Rend came spilling free, Avo lashed it through the last floor and sheared the winds through the building. He didn’t get far enough to kill the Scalpers, but the way was clear.
REND CAPACITY: 0%
With a thought, he drew all the blood he was in contact with back over himself, the Sangeist layering over him in seconds as he dove.
His humiliation this day was approaching completion. He had been fooled into partaking in a fool’s errand by a short-sighted idiot. He had shamed himself when he failed to do his due diligence to prepare for said fool’s errand, proceeded to intrude into the lives of three people that didn’t earn the pain he brought them to steal a package, likely lost said package surviving a missile strike during his escape, and now got a bystander killed in the crossfire.
Avo had enough.
The Scalpers were going to die. And when he got back to Chambers, the man will find the fates met by his Syndicate rivals to be far more merciful.
Diving down, Avo pulled himself down what walls remained like a spider. The collapsing structure poured confusion into the enemy’s firing pattern. Still, he could see the pulsing flashes of their guns even through the smoke, the dull shine of their ward-protected thoughts in the Nether.
For the third time within thirty seconds, Avo fired his Celerostylus and struggled not to scream. He expanded the veins inside his head using his own blood to prevent an embolism from the stress erupting through his body.
He slammed down in their midst like an unfurling flower, his petals lashing wisp-thin blades. Around him, the Scalpers screamed and gurgled. A stray shot cracked deep, halted inches from his shoulder. He felt his slip, chipping through the thickness of titanium before slipping through flesh without resistance.
With every stroke, he cleaved a life free from existence, claiming them for his Soul. Limbs and parted pieces jutted loose from bodies. Screams choked off into silence. A blind haze of ravenous hunger exploded at the center of Avo’s mind as the world turned red, his violence unchained from his thoughts, the beast slipping free of its leash.
THAUMIC CYCLER: 40 thaum/c
GHOSTS - [51]
He knew not how long he spent afterward mutilating their corpses and shredding through their armor. All he knew was that by the time his conscious mind managed to usurp the feral creature wearing his body, he found himself striding past the front door, the flayed skin of his recent victims clinging to him like a cloak.
Avo blinked. He looked down at his hands. They were shaking. He looked behind him, and the open doors to the megablock smashed outward in a welter of gore and mangled bodies caking the soft swallow soil beneath his feet.
His Rend was empty. He must’ve vented again at some point. He must’ve. But he couldn’t remember. He clutched at his head and strained to contain his rage. Bubbling with tension, he dug his claws across his body, tearing into himself.
He promised Walton he would be better–that he would wield choice of instinct. For the last few years, he did his best to serve the ideals of his late father; offering piety to the ideals of the man in place of their person.
Today, Avo failed his father. Today, he let the beast run free. Today, he was unethical.
A ghoul.
A wet cough caught his attention. Not far ahead, leaning against the rusted husk of an abandoned aerovec, one last surviving Scalper muttered into her comms, her auburn hair stained red with blood running down her scalp.
Oh, right. He saw her fall. He took her arm. Legs. But didn’t finish killing her. The jagged edges of her frayed armor were sawing into her spilling intestines while the right half of her face hung denuded, swaying from her jaw.
“L-Longship, ”she said into her hissing rig, “re-request e-extraction. Team’s f-fucked. Ne-need immediate…” Her voice trailed off.
Beneath the shadow of the Gouge, Scalper and ghoul greeted each other for the first time.
“Kivvers? Kivvers? Come in Kivvers? Galeslither has been dispatched. What is your condition? Ki–”
She killed her comms by driving her thumb into the exposed electronics of her rig. Something delicate broke. Spitting blood at Avo’s feet, she barred her teeth in resigned defiance. “Di-didn’t think y-your kind could be…’Clads. Am…am I hallucinating right now?" She tilted her head and narrowed her working eye. "D-do I know you from... somewhere."
Avo looked at her globule of blood. He looked up back at her. He said nothing, choosing just to shape a lance from the blood in his veins. "Does it matter?"
She closed her eye and scoffed. “T-hat’s it, huh? Just… gonna kill me. No questions.”
“Yeah,” Avo said, the boiling urge to hurt her still there, still gnawing at him. He wanted to stick his fingers into the clefts of her wounds, to use his Heaven to keep her alive for longer. Find pleasure in cruelty. He fought it. He fought it. “That’s it.”
Around him, the wind began to kick up unnaturally, swirling on concentric patterns as the air grew thicker. The Scalper grinned at Avo and lifted her throat, offering her life, but giving no surrender. “Be seein’ you real soon–”
"No." Avo thrust the lance through her left eye. She choked, face twitching into a grimace as a low death rattle sounded from her throat. Her hand jerked twice before she slumped over. Before he tore her blood free from her body, shaped it into a hammer, and pasted her skull with a violent snarl.
As her body slumped over, blood pouring, Avo listened to the building wails on the rising winds. Her words finally caught up to him.
Galeslither. Golem. Reinforcements. The beast reared itself again as a low rumble of bloodlust burned within Avo.
More prey.
A single angle of attack will no longer suffice for the demands of war. As our capabilities have grown, so too has the butcher’s bill widened.
Once, we spoke of things in the complexity of range, firepower, shock factor, and mobility. These concepts remain ironclad but only serve as the foundations for the maturation of war.
Beyond the physical, we must consider the phantasmal. Ghosts of the past dead bearing traumatic memories by the century. Deceptive poltergeists slip through your mind to steal operational information. All must be warded. All must be faced.
Beyond the physical, we must prepare for the impossible. By the will of Heavens, sound can be woven into wavelengths of fire. Light can be twisted into a slicing blade. A song could expose an entire area to radiation.
We live in a time of no sanctuary; no escape.
As such, everything must pivot into an attack.
-Osjon Thousand, Newly Risen Supreme Commander of the Highflame Warhost
4-8
Fallen Heaven
It didn’t take Avo much scrying with his Whisper to confirm that the bioware he came to claim was gone. Dissolved with much of his armor when he vented his Rend. Inside the block, people were weeping, their thoughtstuff spiking as fear cojoined with sorrow, voices pleading for help. The scent of blood and clashing odors choked the air, flowing through new ventilated hab-cells.
There had been other casualties during the engagement. These walls were lined with plascrete, but against gauss-propelled weapons, plascrete just didn’t do.
Like a vulture, Avo fed upon the corpses he left behind, refilling his body with nourishment, and readying his metabolism for more wounds to come. From the dead, he also claimed their blood, the Domain fusing around him in ascending plates of armor. Shame about their guns and implements. Mem-printed to their minds. Bricked upon death.
Another demonstration of Conflux’s comparative lack of professional procedure. How did they manage to survive in the face of such opposition? Was it merely Mirrorhead’s power?
A gust of wind spilled over him. Avo shook the questions out of his mind and finished his assessment. His current blood mass was paltry. Easy as his Heaven was to shape into piercing implements, his survivability was still limited. He could spin his blood fast enough to cycle a shot aside, but was still far too vulnerable against explosives.
As such, he had a choice to make. Did he make his stand in the block or should he seek a better position? The winds were sweeping hard through the district as if blown from the lungs of a titan. Outside the Gouge, the ruined husks of aerovecs squealed along the cracked roads. Debris skipped. Inside, the walls creaked and the winds howled.
The Galeslither was coming.
And Avo didn’t know what else was coming with it.
Fleeing was not an option. He wasn't going to outrun a golem, nor did he want them to just blast his capsule mid-transition through the G-Tubes. He caught sight of the local Nether during his brief jaunt out the window. Mostly pockets of thoughtstuff. Concentrations of ghosts. Wouldn’t take much for a properly equipped Syndicate with control over the sky to bombard. Nor would it be difficult for them to detect a single runner fleeing away from the other minds.
That was fine with him. After his day so far, the low growl of violence was still burning hot in the back of his mind, and he wasn’t done with the killing. But it was that small spark that belonged to Walton that made him leave the block.
The choiceless had suffered enough. Because of his foolishness, of Chambers’ idiocy, of the Scalpers’ cold cruelty.
With his Whisper cast high into the air sixty feet above, Avo scried his path forward as he moved to depart from the Gouge, leaving its battle-carved visage behind him. There were other blocks here. A few looked abandoned. He would make a stand there, perhaps. Draw them in and cut them down in close quarters, the same as he did in the block.
What he wanted to do was to force the fight subterranean, inside Layer One.
If they caught him in the open, his counters toward a ranged assault or ghost-jocked missiles would be limited, if that. That, and they could doubtlessly box him in, fire at him from all sides.
As he leaped over the moat and tore through the scrap metal barricades leading outside, Avo suddenly spotted a titanic broadcast dish dotted with puncture wounds. Right, the place he wanted to use as an insertion point into the Gouge. The one Chambers’ claimed was infested with a Fallen Heaven.
Without a moment to waste, Avo spun haemokinetic legs, his new blood-shaped constructs galloping against the pull of the grinding winds.
He was Godclad. The Scalpers were just chromed-up snuffers. Now, provided he died clean of Rend, his demise would prove a temporary setback. A boon that his foes sorely lacked. Unless they too had someone bearing a Liminal Frame. But somehow, with how Mirrorhead hid at the mention of other Godclads, Avo doubted the Syndicate boss would have set up this close against a dreaded rival.
REND CAPACITY: 2%
As he came upon the walls of the block, he fired his Celerostylus for a beat and cycled the blood around him as fast as he could.
REND CAPACITY: 11%
He relaxed his reflexes and vented. With more time to think, to feel his Hell flowing through him, he sensed a burning pattern of mimicked matter shining over his skull flicker as his entropic shroud came gusting free from his orifice, the blood spilling around him.
It seemed either a Heaven could be active, or a Hell. Not both at the same time. Made sense if they were to be as balanced as they felt. Guiding the entropic shroud flowing free from his body felt less like controlling a limb and more like exhaling onto something–except he could still guide said exhale long after it had left his body.
Thinking back, he wondered why he didn’t see Little Vicious vent any of her Rend. And she used her golem far more extensively than he did. Was it a thing of mass? Or something else he didn’t understand yet.
Just as the walls in front of him petaled away into dust, Avo felt it. Sensed the intruding golem before he even spotted it. With his Soul online, the world seemed divided–as if there were countless stratified layers over existence. Through his Whisper, he peered out.
Some few miles above him, through a coiling vortex of undulating currents, the triple-segmented body of the Galeslither squeezed free from the air as if a mechanical centipede leaving the cleft of a wound. But its divine fire did not burn alone. The flickering brightness hinting at two more golems shone like a trinary sun within the Galeslither, while two spear-shaped aero-barges darted out from currents of wind.
A blossom of over twenty missiles tore out into existence through the gap in the winds. Behind them, the spear-ships dove, their tips flashing the same pattern as that which shone over Avo’s head: tungsten.
REND CAPACITY: 0%
With haste, he enwreathed himself in the shell of his Heaven and pulled himself into the guts of the block.
No sign of Chambers’ so-called drone support. Not that he expected anything from the enforcer by this point. Seeing the state of Conflux’s logistics and organization, Avo had a feeling that, without Mirrorhead’s presence, the Scalpers would find plenty of trophies should they ever make a push to claim Mazza’s Junction.
Lashing himself forward on tendrils of blood, a series of building shockwaves slammed into his back, launching him further still as the barrage of missiles detonated in expanding gulfs of fire, shredding ugly wounds into the clean gulf he made using the entropic shroud.
Buffeted by a tidal wave of force, Avo felt blood rattle, spreading the kinetic flow through as a ripple while staying as hard as metal. He chuffed with pleasure. Such was why the Sangeist had proven so hard to face, its eldritch structure resistant to direct impacts.
Riding the force, Avo watched as a wall rushed toward him. He shaped his head into a drill and fired his reflexes, spinning his shell. Like a flechette dropped through wettened tissue, he punctured through the plascrete walls, his ever-malleable blood keeping his tip from ever blunting, his heightened reactions grinding through the matter ahead of him with ease.
REND CAPACITY: 18%
With each surface he burst through, a bit more inertia clung to him until finally, he sank through shattering glass and found himself tumbling out into a wide open chamber with a dormant turbine oozing ripples of half-choked fire from its cracked shell.
The exterior ghosts nesting Avo’s surface thoughts wailed at the sight of the exposed thaumic reactor. He felt his wards groan momentarily, as something chittered before spattering against his phantasmal armor.
There was a wrongness to the space around him that he couldn’t explain. Like a gaping wound had opened across the guts of reality, drowning every inch of the room's three hundred-feet expanse with spatially-twisting resonance.
It was as if the fires of Soul were coming apart and spilling the reality it bore within into the reality that was without.
WARNING: RUPTURE DETECTED
LEAKAGE: SPHERE III FALLEN HEAVEN
INSUFFICIENT REND CAPACITY TO STABILIZE
HELL [THIRD CIRCLE] REQUIRED
Casting two strands of blood into the wall behind him to slow his fall, Avo descended past scattered railing and spun his Whisper, splashing his awareness behiind.
There was no need.
Through the ceiling, the two gleaming spearships plunged down into the chamber. Each was forty feet in length and extended along the midsection, with needle-like las-drones ejecting free from their docks.
Without hesitation, Avo went for them, sparing no time for respite. He counted twelve accretions of thoughtstuff–
The drones fired. His Phys-Sim wailed. He pulled himself to the side. A beam cut into his Sangeist, the heat chipping a narrow groove of his armor away and turning it to steam. Avo cast out a grapple of crimson and pulled himself close. The distance between him and the drones closed as he fired his reflexes. Time slowed. He shaped new constructs, lining their arcing vectors with the drones.
He surged, forty feet closing to nothing within a millisecond. The monowire-thin edges of his haemokinetic weapons bit through the drones, strands of blood parting alloy, glass, and silicon with equal ease. Twenty feet away, the first of the Scalpers were bursting free from their landing modules.
Cleaving out with the flow of his momentum, he directed his lashing whips out at his new prey.
Only for the turbine to shudder, space itself bubbling around it as it burst apart in a fissure of light. The fires of a broken Soul flooded the chamber. Avo’s cog-feed fizzled as his ghosts fled behind his straining wards. His Phys-Sim went offline. Around him, the minds of the Scalpers burst, their wards shattering.
Joining their ghosts in madness and pain, the enforcers screamed.
WARNING: REND CAPACITY SPIKING
REND CAPACITY - 97%
EXTERNAL RESONANCE BLEEDING OVER
VENT! VENT! VENT!
Feeling the building thaumic mass of another Heaven flowing into him, Avo gasped as he released his hold on the Sangeist and unleashed the waste building within his First Circle. A tidal wave of annihilation flowed out from him, cleaving through Scalper and matter alike.
THAUMIC CYCLER: 52 thaum/c
Even as he vented, he felt the flow of new echoes flooding into him. One by one, the thoughtstuff of the Scalpers winked out, their Essences joined to him through the ritual of his killing. Yet, their ghosts did not answer. Instead, their broken minds dissolved into fragmenting ghosts, nulled before he could even claim them.
As the roaring eldritch radiance faded around Avo, as he vented the last gasps of the Rend within him, he found himself staring at a path of clean destruction panning an eighty-foot length through furrows and gulfs cleaved clean through the porcelain surfaces of the chamber.
Only sheared pieces and gnawed parts remained of the Scalpers and their ships. From their skin, writhing hydrapedes pushed free, the chitinous shell of the writhing insect fusing from skin, bone, and armor alike. And finally, when the eldritch creatures drank enough matter to comprise their bodies, they dove up and sank through the folds of space, their six-headed bodies skittering out of existence toward a place unseen.
Before him, the gouts of fire from the turbine crackled at him, mocking him with its laughter.
So. That was a Fallen Heaven. That was the heart of a Rupture. If the stray miracles leaking free from this block could do this, Avo could only wonder in quiet awe at how people could survive beneath the continent-blotting chasms of anomalous ruination where the old pantheons broke.
Little wonder why so many were fleeing to New Vultun and the other megacities.
But before Avo could ruminate any further at the horror he just beheld, a sudden hurricane exploded into existence from above where the spear-ships punched through.
Drawing the Sangeist over himself, Avo felt lighter than he was. Weaker. He was wielding only the blood in his veins now, the rest doubtless subsumed by the rogue miracle to create more hydrapedes.
As such, when he speared two limbs into the ground to stop himself from being pried out of the chamber, both his mass and strength were found wanting, and like a bug swallowed by a vacuum, he snapped free from the ground he was clinging to.
Spinning, he cracked against the walls, a hip dislocating with a pop. Still, he held his outer armor as best he could, his slatted cells sparking as he was pulled up along the walls until he reached the lip of the opening of the ceiling.
Like being launched free from a catapult, he spun high into the air, and for a moment, he passed by a coiling presence that ebbed brightly with fire–far more intact than that which could be detected within the broken thaumic reactor.
Pushing through turbulent clouds into the sprawling green of the megablock’s hydroponic gardens–also infested with hydrapedes writhing free from the leaves and branches of the plants–Avo watched as the Galeslither pushed through the membrane of impossibility into reality. From its sides sprayed wet mists, its cloud-like presence bringing with it two more golems–both rival Sangeists.
Even flung free into the air, Avo hissed a note of glee, feeling the semblance between the fire that burned with him and its two cousins. Across his body, his blood wailed in recognition, the Heaven screaming from within.
ERROR: HEAVEN [SANGEIST] IS---
MAKEMEWHOLE! MAKEMEWHOLE! MAKEMEWHOLE!
The voice of the dead god came alive and roared like a nuclear explosion, the last vestige of its wants and will bleeding over into Avo’s ontology. He gasped. He didn’t even know it could do that.
Yet, as he lashed a tendril of blood into walls and pulled himself atop a tree, a gushing tide of clouds washed forward, coating the Galeslither from existence as it flowed free on torrential winds.
But from its fading form fell another five Scalpers clad in heavy exo-rigs. They landed unbothered by the winds as if the Galeslither had exempted them from its pull. Through the blurring winds, their arms flashed bright with humming flames, fusion burners singing the dreaded thrums of activation.
Avo shuddered as if struck. He remembered that sound from during the Uprising. Often, it followed him to sleep at night.
Letting the two eighty-ton Sangeists push forward as vanguards from opposite angles, smashing through the overgrowth trees of the hyper-stimulated garden and pulping the ichor of stray hydrapedes, the infantry pushed down the middle, setting the gardens ablaze. Above, the Galeslither wafted, building to be a small hurricane that was pressing down.
From four angles, the Scalpers made to claim Avo's life.
And, with his Whisper cast free in the Nether, and threads of blood extending from his claw tips, he made to claim theirs first.
A pre-modern assault group of golems is called a knot. Vaguely based on Godclad cadres, a knot is typically structured with the–now outdated–four specializations in mind.
Porter. Seer. Breaker. Maker.
In tandem, the designated Porter of the group works to position their allies–most typically the Breaker and Makers–to ensure maximum kinetic output and battlefield shaping capability. Likewise, the Porter must work in sync with the Seer to maintain a strategic dominance of the battlefield.
A knot, then, usually serves as the maneuver and firepower core of a Fist –with a Fist denoted as two teams of operators, a knot, and two drone squadrons; parted into variant assault platforms and logistical aid…
-[Redacted], The Old War
4-9
Apotheosis II
Launching his Whisper high, Avo studied the opposition and found himself playing a game of simple arithmetic. Even by raw numbers alone, he was outnumbered. Overwhelmed. Moreso than that, they had the firepower and range advantage as well. Three golems. Five enforcers. Uncertain if they had any drones left.
Bad odds, even with a Heaven. If he let them collapse on him, his death would be certain. More certain than it was now, anyway.
With the Galeslither bearing its weight down on him, he couldn’t climb, couldn’t even maneuver all that easily. There was a growing pressure pressing down the room, bending branches, cracking trees.
Presently, he was moving like an inverse marionette–a spider, driving his body and limbs into motion using the blood inside himself. With a flex of his mind, he snapped his floating hipbone back into place before the grinding winds could pry it entirely free from his body.
Forced into nothing but bad choices, he took inventory of the essentials needed for his survival. He needed to break through one of the units pushing on him so that he wasn’t fighting in the corner. More than that, he needed more blood to buffet his survivability.
And with that, the path became clear to him.
Spraying tendrils of blood out from his claw tips, he felt his constructs bite into the sterile floor, sinking through crystalline material as he grappled off the coiled tree infested with hydrapedes. Lanes of fire cleaved into his sight. He tensed his Celerostylus against the winds, warring against its staggering pressure. Numbers and variables screamed across his vision as his ghosts tried to focus.
The Galeslither was building pressure around him, two warring vortexes trying to flay him by applying opposite axes of force. Already he could feel it. More than that, lines of fire sliced past him, distant guns trained on his person. Around him, the thicket provided paltry cover against either wind or gunfire.
Suffusing his flowing blood with the full celerity provided by his implant, he lashed his way across the ground in desperate grapples, flinging himself at the rightmost golem smashing through a row of encased trees to his right. Trails of gauss fire lanced past him by bare inches as he twitched, averting his foes’ aim more than the speed of their flechettes.
REND CAPACITY - 22%
With how diminished he was now, he doubted he could even spin a single round aside. His Phys-Sim screamed constantly. The enforcers were thundering closer, sixty feet. The other golem was forty. The one he was going for was twenty.
Desperation and humming bloodlust collided in his mind, fusing to become a nigh-fatalistic determination as he quelled every one of his phantasmics aside from his Whisper, spearing it down toward the golem. Immediately, with his capacity expanding vastly, he drove his ghosts down, using his wards as a drill, priming a single ghost pregnant with trauma as a disposable dagger.
Looming forth, the widening form of the rival Sangeist mirrored his own, its blades lashing wildly in a crimson embrace. For a moment, a surreal weight washed through Avo. Not a day prior, he had been here, fleeing from Little Vicious. Here and now, he was charging the very golem that killed him, spurred on by dilemma and bloodshed both.
And deep within, he could still hear the voice of his Heaven pleading, crying out.
MAKEMEWHOLE! MAKEMEWHOLE! MAKEMEWHOLE!
Three blows landed concomitantly. The first was a gauss flechette shredding clean through Avo’s right arm. The second was the shredding of the tree he was standing on by inversely spiraling gales. The third was Avo, his mind crashing against the pilot of the Sangeist, his wards greeting theirs in a cataclysmic burst as he felt his surface thoughts disintegrate outright.
GHOSTS - [50]
Even as his train of thought slipped free from his mind, he felt a deluge of spilling memories washing over him, his phantasmal shiv punching deep into their palace and detonating.
His focus cracked. His cog-feed peeled from his sight like particles of dust, his nearsightedness returning in full force. On instinct alone, he managed to keep his arm, his reaching tendrils of blood latching on and reforming the limb in a lattice of pseudo-matter. The bones within, meanwhile, remained parted like shrapnel.
COG-CAPACITY OVERCLOCKING - 103%
WARNING: MINOR MEMORY DAMAGE INCURRED
DISABLING PHANTASMICS
Biting back pain in both flesh and body, Avo fired his reflex again, feeling a sudden lightheadedness pop behind his head. A loose spray of hyper-accelerated blood came free from his flopping arm, more clutched by his blood than reattached.
Before him, the mind-screams of the pilot told him that the golem fared no better, and did not expect such a hit. Madness mingled with maudlin spilled from the shattering thoughtstuff of the pilot as the Sangeist toppled, the command module tearing through a screen of blood. The machine within the miracle shot past Avo and slammed into the other Sangeist in a thunderous impact.
THAUMIC CYCLER: 52 thaum/c
The fact that the pilot had died did not capture Avo’s notice. Instead, his focus was drawn to the burning shine of thaumic resonance. The flesh of a god’s Heaven was installed in its Domains, after all, and that which belonged to the golem was washing forward within a tide of blood.
Dimly, a flash of light speared into his eyes from the periphery of his sight. A flash of arcing electric sparks spewed from the exposed coils of a gauss cannon. Without looking, he vented his Rend, coating himself in a second-skin of decay as he pushed toward the golem with all his might.
The wind was shrieking, plucking at him. Fire ran down from his skull into every sinew, every nerve. Speckles of pain stung his body as grains of metal tore into him; micro-filaments leftover from flechettes that passed through his shroud.
REND CAPACITY - 20%...18%...
Mauled in thought and guided more by the screaming want of the Heaven burning inside him, Avo dove to greet the collapsing Sangeist, arm outstretched as the very ground he strode upon was disintegrated by his shroud. Each step was a battle against the howling gales, feeling as if the world itself was pulling him back, trying to tear him loose from the ground, the pressure ever-building.
The claws of his feet snapped amidst the struggle. With a snapping tear, his blood lost its grip and his dismembered arm came loose.
REND CAPACITY - 12%...4%...
A shower of blood connected to the golem greeted him in an invigorating torrent. The world grew wide in Avo’s mind, the inverse flame within him surging bright–
REND CAPACITY - 0%
The first shot blew a chasm through his ribs. The next three cleaved his torso into strips of quavering sinew. What started as a cry in Avo’s throat ended as a choked spray a dozen more shots tore into him, his body misting apart in splatters of gore.
ATTENTION - HEAVEN DETECTED [DOMAIN: BLOOD; MATTER]
DESIGNATION: SANGEIS–
And like the hammer of a titan, the weight of the winds descended on him, smashing into him as a swirling gale, flensing bone, flesh, and all. Avo felt his body crumple in on itself as something flashed into sight before him. Against the cold chrome of the Galeslither, Avo came apart as a smear.
The last sight that struck him before the light left his bleary eyes was the surging visage of a sleek tri-skulled steed shaped from the matter of blackened clouds. The true form of the Galeslither, unbound from the machine.
INITIALIZING RESURRECTION - 1%
SIMULATING LIMINAL FRAME
Like he had been cast down from the mountain of existence into the jaws of a welcoming fire, Avo fell into the stygian sanctuary that was his Soul, sinking into his core and feeling the growing swell of his Heaven. Again, he had passed through the gulf beyond reality and that ineffable threshold between, his path empty of Rend.
The more he died, the more the act felt like stepping through a portal: a waiting room inside himself before he could begin his next attempt.
His mind and vessel felt pure again. Clean of wounds. Clean of pain. Stripped from the baser impulses of his body, his thoughts greeted him with a torturous clarity. Dead again. Dead, but not done.
INITIALIZING RESURRECTION - 11%
A familiar shape greeted him–looked the same as him in the expanse of his Soul’s cascading radiance. Another Sangeist sank to greet him, looking identical to his current form. He guessed it was easier to standardize the golems instead of ensuring each had a custom-made Heaven.
Suddenly, a will beneath his own writhed, the veins of grasping limbs shedding out from his current Heaven, desperate to embrace the other. With a thought, Avo quelled the involuntary action and recoiled. What just happened?
WHOLE…
From inside his consciousness, he heard the thunderous whisper of the plea. There was no life behind the desire, only a mournful finality–the last fading echo given breath by a long shattered primordial being. From the weight of its lament, Avo tasted despair and dread. He remembered sampling similar thoughts from ghosts that died after having their organs harvested.
A quiet terror of dismemberment–of being unable to even preserve your own flesh.
Emotionally parochial as he was, Avo empathized. He did just lose another arm.
INITIALIZING RESURRECTION - 11%
Reaching out with the limbs he impulsively shaped earlier, he enveloped the other Heaven. It gripped him back. No. More than that, it was sinking into him, the shape of its tower pooling apart, the entirety of its ontology bleeding into him.
GRAFTING HEAVEN - 99%
REQUIRED THAUMS - [20 thaums/c]
REVI–
ERROR - OVERLAPPING HEAVEN DETECTED
THAUMIC CYCLERS: 1/1
SOULS: 1/1
ATTENTION: (PROTOTYPE) META-FAC FUNCTIONS ACTIVATED
DECONSTRUCTING HEAVEN
REASSIGNING COMPONENTS
INITIALIZING RESURRECTION - 35%
Funneled into the expanse of his own Heaven, the metaphysical components of the Sangeist he just swallowed flowed into his ontology, down the spinning rings of his Essence-looping serpent, smelting its architecture down to raw quintessence using the fires of his Soul.
Within the territory of his rippling radiance, the twin sigils that marked his governed Domains erupted, expanding outward like snaking roots that grew egg-shaped nodes for each Domain. One that rose above. One that fell below.
CLAIM…MY…MANTLE…
Again, the Heaven relieved itself of an utterance, its crimson form shuddering. Faced with his growing Domains, Avo tasted each new node and found them seeds–paths of growth that offered him new canons to empower, and new hubrises to suffer.
And right now, they were bare of form, their fertile beings the stuff of raw chaos, of fundamental creation, incubating potential miracles.
INITIALIZING RESURRECTION - 45%
And Avo was running out of time to properly prime them. Thinking quickly, he thought of his battle earlier. Of his death. The Galeslither was the greatest threat he faced with how it could bend the winds and shunt matter through its currents. He still wasn’t sure why he hadn’t absorbed it as well.
He managed to swallow Little Vicious’ Sangeist upon death. Did that have to do with her destabilizing the Nether using Thoughtwave detonations?
Shaking the questions aside for later, he focused on what he needed to survive his next resurrection.
What he lacked was mass. And force. But if he could have more blood to alchemize, he would’ve had much better odds. That, or if he could somehow get a Heaven that gave him a free month of time to hunt down each of his foes in the Nether and fester them using mem-plagues.
He thought of one of the seeds, willing blood to be created from nothing. To his delight, the Domain of Blood flashed as his Soul’s radiance flowed into it. And then fizzled out.
INSUFFICIENT THAUMIC MASS TO ACHIEVE DESIRED MIRACLE
REQUIREMENTS: NINTH SPHERE LIMINAL FRAME
Instinctively, Avo checked his current build.
[STILLBORN] - SECOND SPHERE LIMINAL FRAME
Delightful. He still knew absolutely nothing about what all this meant, or what separated a Second Sphere frame from one that was in the Ninth. Creating blood out of thin air should’ve been just as impossible as using said blood to channel the properties of solid matter.
INITIALIZING RESURRECTION - 66%
But time was not an ally and should he return as he was before, another death would surely be inevitable. His mind speeding, Avo defaulted to his experience as a Necrojack–build from symmetry. Build from foundations.
To the domain of blood, he offered a prayer. A new canon.
This time, an egg connected to his Domain of Matter hatched, a new marking spilling down to join its sigil.
DOMAIN OF (MATTER)
CANON: HAEMIFICATION - THE MASTER OF THIS DOMAIN CAN NOW SUBSUME SOLID MATTER INTO BLOOD; THE CONVERSION WILL ONLY PROCEED ON TACTILE CONTACT AND IF THE BLOOD SUBMERGES THE MATTER ENTIRELY
HUBRIS: ONLY SOLID MATTER CAN BE CONVERTED. ANY ATTEMPTS TO CONVERT LIQUID OR GAS WILL RESULT IN THAUMIC BACKLASH.
INITIALIZING RESURRECTION - 86%
Muted sounds greeted him, modulated voices sounding as if they were underwater. Or he was. Already, he could feel the flames of his Soul clenching his consciousness, priming him for reinjection into the world.
Thoughts accelerating, he thought of what he truly needed from his Domain of Blood. Right now, he could control the blood in his body.
Wield in accordance with his speed and force. Add an aspect of reach to it as well? A haemokinetic field, perhaps? Something that would allow him to tear the blood from his foes as well?
UNABLE TO PROCESS CANON
MISSING BRIDGING DOMAIN [SPACE/FORCE]
Of course. That would have made things far too easy. Sensing his Resurrection counter pass ninety percent, a memory flashed into his mind.
Cover. The enforcers had gunned him down before the Galeslither got to him.
If he could just make his blood harder or eject his hardened blood as pieces of quick-fabbed matter then maybe–
Another egg hatched from his Domain of Blood. A horizontal column extended from the center of its sigil.
DOMAIN OF (BLOOD)
CANON: LINGER - THE MASTER OF THIS DOMAIN CAN NOW EJECT THE CONSTRUCTS THEY SHAPE FROM THEIR BLOOD; A BINDING PERCENT OF REND WILL BE GENERATED FOR EACH CONSTRUCT FABRICATED IN CORRESPONDENCE WITH THEIR SHAPE AND MASS
HUBRIS: ONLY UP TO EIGHTY TONS OF BLOOD CAN BE MANIPULATED AT ONCE
Likewise, the hubris melded here as well. What were the rules? What was the cost?
REASSEMBLING HEAVEN
MODIFYING [SANGEIST]
GRAFTING HEAVEN - 100%
REVIEWED - MYTHOLOGY STABLE
HEAVEN GRAFTED - [SANGEIST]
DOMAIN: (BLOOD/MATTER)
THAUMIC REQUIREMENTS - 40 thaum/c
With another 20 thaums added to the cost of manifesting his Heaven, Avo felt the mass of his Sangeist double, but more than that, he felt its shape change. From within the jaws protruding, another pattern rose, quavering like a blistering eye beneath the symbol of the matter he was channeling. Between the layered slats lining the body of the tower-like Heaven, a ventral jaw expanded into existence, and from its baleful depths spewed a deluge of blades, bullets, and other instruments.
All instruments that Avo had recently shaped in service of slaughter.
INITIALIZING RESURRECTION - 99%
With the new additions to his ontology, Avo felt a growing weight settle against his Hell. A pale reflection of his Heaven danced like a flickering ember down through the concentric gates of his Hell.
RESURRECTION - 100%
IMPLANTING NOUS
Fingers of flame clasped over his consciousness, and with a push, Avo rose, cast back through the threshold of death, back into the screaming embrace of reality.
ONTOLOGY REVERTED
RESURRECTION COMPLETED
DOMAIN RESPAWN ENGAGED
ENGAGING THAUMIC CYCLER: 52 THAUM/c
LOADING PHANTASMICS…
Avo tore out from the pool of blood left by the golem he nulled, his Celerostylus firing even before he fell upon the unprepared team of Scalpers.
The Laeygyr Galeslither was not a golem designed for combat. But as was the case with the engines of void ships, if someone had a Soul, it had the capacity to be a weapon.
A Heaven of Air with the Domains of Wind and Space, the Galeslither was designed as a transport-logistic golem capable of moving over 300 hundred tons per mile shift between reality and the plane known as the “Yondergales.”
During the Four Guild Wars, however, it found additional success as a makeshift bomber and a fast extraction unit alongside its more traditional functions, though it suffered unacceptable losses once Ori-Thaum learned to counter them by jocking micro-frag missiles into the Yondergales just as the Galeslithers’ made their shifts...
-Caes eld’Calder, “Annals of the Fourth Guild War”
4-10
Reap the Winds
An instant. A moment. A millisecond of surprise.
That’s how much time Avo claimed upon his return, emerging from the veil of blood left behind by the golem he broke as if it were a gate. Into the screaming embrace of reality, he burst free, with the light curving before his surging synapses. With a thought, he drew layers of armor over himself from the very element he used to ingress into reality, the Domain that served as his doorway now becoming slatted plating, the new and improved form of his upgraded Sangeist fusing around him.
With a flick of will, a lashing construct tore free from his blood, lancing out toward the unprepared Scalpers scanning the perimeter. He knew not how long his death had been in existence, only that they were still there, that the beast still wanted its kills.
His licking blade flicked through the helmet and skull of the first enforcer. The armor ruptured, and from the rent, flesh burst free as roping sinews. Avo continued guiding the blade, building a rippling curve to its trajectory, its upper edge folding to spear into the knee of another enforcer.
THAUMIC CYCLER: 53 thaum/c
In the brightness of the block’s hydroponics center, a slitted wound opened across their leg, revealing the glinting grey of an augmented meniscus. They toppled with a low cry. One that went unfinished as Avo’s haemokinetic-grip surged into their wound and fused a dozen tungsten clots within the vessels in their brain.
THAUMIC CYCLER: 54 thaum/c
And then the momentum balanced out.
Suddenly, the Scalpers shuddered, their own reflex implants firing as they spun, festooned guns roaring in a wild deluge of suppressive fire. Immediately, Avo drew more mass to his control. His form swelled, he cocooned himself at the epicenter of his metaphysical shell made manifest, rising ten feet, then twenty. Shots skipped off against the torque of his spinning armor as he fused the thirty tons of blood that he drew upon, the rest parted from his tactile senses by cracks and fissures in the ground.
The enforcers doubled back, their augmented legs working against his galloping limbs as a lattice of ghosts flitted packets of thought near-instantaneously between the Scalper kill team, now three instead of five. From what looked to be the team commander, two more phantasmal chains spilled out. One to the other Sangeist, thirty feet away and out of position to be any aid. The other Ghost-Link went to the Galeslither sliding across the currents overhead, only just beginning to spin up its storm.
For now, it was just him and the–
The Ghost-Links between the Scalpers suddenly disappeared from Avo’s cog-feed. What were they–
A tide of spreading distortion burst free from the leader of the Scalper’s enforcer team. The impact splashed Avo’s surface thought from his mind, striking a gap in his focus–in everyone’s focus. Mind drifting, Avo stopped clenching his Celerostylus. Time resumed. For a breath, all combatants went still.
And when the thoughts filled the accretion of all their Metaminds, violence resumed.
“Necro!” a Scalper cried, their shoulder-mounted autogun snapping back to life, firing gyrojet rockets.
“Godclad!” another screamed simultaneously, fusion burner still thrumming up to readiness–not nearly fast enough to come online and save them.
A series of crackling blasts bloomed puffs off Avo’s armor, the rippling property of his blood canceling the concussive force. As the last sputters of thought reattached themselves to his mind, he immediately fired his Celerostylus again, as nails of pain slid through his nerve endings. Biting back his hurt, time slowed again and he lined his arcs. His Rend flooded down his Hell at a rate nearly triple the speed it used to.
The additional mass of his Heaven bore a cost.
REND CAPACITY - 42%
His Whisper was out of play now with how destabilized the Nether was, but there were only ten feet between him and the Scalpers, the gulf closing by the micro-instants. Lining three kill paths with his Phys-Sim, he shaped a dozen wisp-thin threads made from pressure slicing. Their armor was thick. Titanium. But titanium was mundane metal, and in this new age, mundane just didn’t light the wick anymore.
He pulled down his instruments like the strings of a marionette. Through trees and glass did his new-grown limbs sink and pass. And along a cage of intersecting cleaves, he would lay claim to the newest of his thaums when he finally slew the enforcers.
At least he would have, until the wind wretched his strikes off course.
The Galeslither’s arrival came not as a hurricane this time, its bodies still spinning, trying to build up the winds before attempting to mangle his flesh. Nor did it slip free from the spaces between currents to greet him alloy against pseudo-alloy, though that was doubtlessly soon to come. Instead, it was a plucking irritation; an interfering hand parrying aside mortal blows. Even with time slowed, its whistle sounded mocking, its form hidden amidst the warring tides of cloud above.
Through no longer being able to overwhelm him with ease thanks to his newfound mass, the wind-twisting golem would still shift his strikes.
All the while the other Sangeist came thundering over, its looming mass coming like an avalanche.
Fusing his strings into a hammer instead, Avo spun his mass around, acquiescing to the wind just as the Scalpers brought their burners to bear. Like a twirling wrecking ball, his newly shaped weapon spun out, its head growing to be three tons as it smashed and tumbled across the ground–far more than Avo could naturally hold upright.
But with the new canon he claimed that wouldn’t be a necessity. With the canon of Linger, the ball retained both properties of blood and metal even as it left his grip, letting it bounce toward the Scalpers. Even with his skull afire with nerve pain, he couldn’t stop watching, waiting for his blow to strike. Crashing through the splintering trunk of a tree, two Scalpers dove out of the way.
One, their thoughtstuff still recovering, went under the sphere, their armor cracking as they died, a roar of agony preluding a final crunch as their insides came free like paste in a crumpled can.
THAUMIC CYCLER: 55 thaum/c
REND CAPACITY - 79%
His capacity was screaming at him again, calling for him to vent his Hell as soon as he could. The new permanence in his constructs was filling his Hell fast. He needed a safe place to vent.
And then, an idea flashed in Avo’s mind.
Expanding the armor around him into a round fortress, he solidified what he could as his Rend spiked to the edge of overload.
REND CAPACITY - 95%... 98%...
OVERLOAD WARNING!
He released control and, shielded at the center of his new fortifications, he unleashed his entropic shroud into the ground beneath him, punching deep and through as he sank low.
REND CAPACITY - 90%... 82%...
Descending, he heard the ringing impacts of projectile fire cracking the thickened exterior of the blood skin he shed. Grinning, he moved quickly. If they were focused on shooting, they might not realize his thoughtstuff was in motion. Shaping his shroud, he cut until he punched through to the level below and then moved it forward, leveling it out into a circling arc.
He was going to cut the floor out from under the enforcers. Take them by surprise and flank the Sangeist. He ran after the eight-foot wide gaps he was eating through the matter of the floor. Above, a thunderous crash sounded as the other Sangeist brought its weight down against his barricade, shattering through with its superior mass.
REND CAPACITY - 71%... 64%... 55%...
Behind him, he heard the pitched voice of the pilot boom out. “He’s gone under! He’s gone under! Burn ‘em out! Burn ‘em the fuck now!”
A low warbling thrum rang from the half-tunnels he'd left behind. Avo realized what was happening. Their fusion burners were ready, and everything in its path was going to slag.
REND CAPACITY - 41%
No time. Avo stopped venting and reactivated his Heaven. Tearing into the plascrete foundations between the levels, he swallowed chunks of mass and grew, the matter between the shovel-like jaws he shaped using his own blood, each bite getting bigger, working upward. Behind him, the air grew hot, and every inhale singed his lungs.
REND CAPACITY - 54%
His mass was well past a ton when he cut free out of the ground. Not ten feet away, the enforcers were pouring fire into the tunnels he made, the diminutive suns funneled through their arm mounts spraying a yolk of bright light, coating the lip of the tunnel with a new sheen of hyper-heated glass.
The Sangeist, then, was so focused on the burning that it too missed him; the Galeslither, sweeping low, missed him as well. The thoughtwave bomb had proven to be more asset to him than they.
An opportunity presented itself. Avo took it, driving a spearing whip through the backplate of one of the Scalpers.
With a flex of his mind, Avo felt his control spread through the blood flowing within the enforcer’s body. With a fist, he pulped their organs. With a twitch of a finger, he swung the dead Scalper’s still-firing fusion burner up in an arc. Slashing past the blood of the enemy Sangeist, slagging its command module.
THAUMIC CYCLER: 56 thaum/c
Mimicked titanium melted and blood steamed in a rising hiss. Before Avo’s eyes, a pulsing flash detonated across his sight as the Heaven within the blood fissured, like it was short-circuiting.
The cutting lance of fusion flame left a gleaming wound through the ovoid command module, and the bricked machine core of the golem came loose amidst a falling shower of blood.
REND CAPACITY - 66%
From its depths, Avo heard the deafening wail of the pilot. Her screams were of a mellifluous melody, his opportunism rewarded, his appetite awakened. The scent of her cooking flesh wafted through his nose as he pushed for the last Scalper enforcer, the wide shoveling construct beneath him swallowing swaths of plascrete as his tonnage began to swell past ten feet.
REND CAPACITY - 77%
“Mihada!” the Scalper cried, their voice keening with anguish, directed toward the cooking pilot crawling free from the melting ball that used to be the titanium heart of their golem. Shaking the strain from his skull, Avo was just about to fire his Celerostylus when a gust of wind wafted over.
And through him.
A rapid splash of roaring clouds pried Avo free from where he stood, drawing him into a constant free fall. Firing his Celerostylus, he caught sight of the wisping mane of a roiling three-headed steed.
The creature was shaped from blackened clouds and its eyes were pinpricks, like centers of swirling storms. Wisping torrents of spraying rain formed the misting main of the horse, and a frozen bolt of lightning fissured like a cage of clasping ribs holding the midsection of the horse intact. Its body flowed, the snapping bones of the machine enwreathed at the center of the metaphysical Heaven zooming toward Avo like a speeding lance, the winds coalescing around it.
Its hooves, then, ran on rings of pulsing air as it dove toward Avo, flicking between machine and steed. His Phys-Sim screamed numbers flashing through his cog feed as a million moving variables overloaded his ghosts and drove up his cog-cap. With a snarl, Avo deactivated the phantasmic before the overload could cascade through his Metamind.
As petals of speed peeled from behind the Galeslither, Avo realized what it was about to do, and how it had him in its sway. His Rend was still full, and it was charging at him at Mach speeds. Desperate, he fired his Celerostylus to buy him a bit more time.
An eruption of pain bloomed behind Avo’s eyes. It took him every ounce of will to keep his organ tensed even as spots formed in his vision. Immediately, he began venting his Rend out.
Except it wasn’t going down. Because no matter was dissolving.
No matter other than the shell of the Galeslither.
The pilot didn’t think this through.
Between him and the pilot, their spiking terror split into two halves, mutually shared. Avo, desperate not to be real-deathed as he fell, guts clenching, the pilot of the Galeslither likewise unwilling to bifurcate themselves upon the shroud of entropy blooming out among the storm clouds, its presence a spot darker than blackness.
The Galeslither tore to the side, the flashing steeds neighing loud like passing thunder. Avo felt every layer of his eardrums burst apart as his sense of sound left him. Thrown free into a spiraling descent, he suddenly felt cast back into reality, falling from on high.
Outside the block now, plunging down toward the broadcasting dish that crowned its top. To his left, the Galeslither screamed as it tried to right itself. No. It was pulsing in and out of the winds as it tried to right itself.
Did his…Hell infect its structure somehow?
The thought didn’t linger. Instead, Avo found himself in free fall, the blackened gout of his shroud gusting as he greeted the dish. He cast his entropy ahead in a wave, burning a hole through the dish's thinness as he fell, and kept falling. Equilibrium lost, Avo cleaved at everything he caught sight of with his shroud, chipping his path clean with wide-arcing scythes.
REND CAPACITY - 68%... 58%... 46%
Down, down, down he went, like a dollop of blackened plasma eating through all in his path. Plascrete, glass, metal, and biomass came apart before him as chasms opened up down the levels. Howling in desperation, he vented as much as he could, spreading his gusts wider, longer, hoping that he could finish out his debt before he splattered.
REND CAPACITY - 33%... 21%... 15%
For a beat, as he plunged into the hydroponics center, a snapshot of two figures and a hound snapping to stare at his falling form burned itself into his mind.
REND CAPACITY - 8%... 0%
And, as Avo’s Rend finally emptied, his shroud disappeared. And so did his protection.
For the second time within a minute, Avo's smeared apart in the hydroponics chamber, casting him beyond the coil of mortality and back into the embrace of his Soul…
INITIALIZING RESURRECTION - 1%
SIMULATING LIMINAL FRAME
Why Godclads instead of Golems? The fact you phrased the question that way tells me you’re looking at this wrong.
The question is why should we attach a Soul to one person via a Liminal Frame rather than mass-producing a bunch of cheap Heavens juiced up with thaums and a pocket for a pre-dump of Rend?
Tempo.
Intensity.
Sustainability.
Anyone can pilot a golem with training, but a Liminal Frame is special. It’s burned into the ontology of an individual in a process that’s half thaumaturgical genius, half ritual suicide. A good golem can fight for three hours at high intensity without requiring a Rend-dump followed by a thaumic refuel.
A Godclad can keep fighting. Theoretically forever.
Yes, there is the issue of their thaumic cyclers effectively causing them to over-produce Rend and need to vent at nearly ten times the ratio compared to a golem with an equivalent Heaven, but the fact that they have active Hells within them instead of needing to store that waste in a physical Hellsink is the difference between pushing your enemies back or needing to abandon your golem because they’re just too full of reality-tearing waste heat to fire up without godsdamned Rupturing.
-Captain Osjack Wells, Guest Lecturer at Axtraxis Academy of Highflame
4-11
Galebreaker
INITIALIZING RESURRECTION - 31%
Avo despised the Galeslither.
Even coated by the waterfalling flames of his Soul, the rancor that seethed within him stung hotter, the feeling more akin to the heat of an infection rather than the warmth of a flame.
It was two and nothing now. Twice the golem had killed him. Twice it left him less than a smear. Without his ability to resurrect and the sheer blind chance he didn’t cast his shroud out in the wrong direction, his death would have been permanent.
Learning to be a Godclad was a lot like training to be a Necrojack in a way; Avo might have had the tools, but lacking the mastery and a proper plan, all the Heavens, Hells, and phantasmics were wasted on him.
Quelling his impotent rage as best he could, he reverted to his best practices when faced with an impasse.
He accepted the situation, as Walton always did, and began working at the problem from there.
He had ruined a Sangeist with each death–a pity that he didn’t manage to paint his remains over the newest golem he killed. Didn’t know why it's Heaven was misfiring by the end either. He was like a blind ghoul manually piloting an aerovec when it came to metaphysics. Guesses and hopes were all he had.
There was a saying in New Vultun: “If you were going to hope in one hand, you best have a gun in the other.”
His raw power was unreliable against the Galeslither with its miracles far out-angling his. He needed to stick to the fundamentals. Build a overarching plan of attack, like he did with his dives. Letting his rage simmer in the background of his thoughts, he broke the situation down and approached it with as much candor as he could muster.
Against him were the following obstacles: the Galeslither could fly; the Galeslither could tear him out from reality and throw him into its demiplane; the Galeslither could engage him at leisure; the lingering effects of the thoughtwave bomb removed his offensive phantasmics from play in the near-term; the surviving enforcer and their fusion burner were still in the equation.
INITIALIZING RESURRECTION - 43%
To his advantage, he was dealing with a far more even field now. There was a single enforcer left. The pilot of the other Sangeist might still be alive. He didn’t remember drinking in her Essence. What he did remember before he splattered, however, was the shape of a dog and two people in the room.
So, he had a Woundhound to avoid if that was true. Thankfully, he knew how to deal with that problem. Kill the host. He willed that the pilot didn’t know how to transfer hound ownership as Draus did.
If such was the case, it only left him, the pilot, the hound, the enforcer, and the Galeslither in play.
Avo’s thoughts halted to a screech.
The enforcer.
Avo had puppeteered one of them to kill the final Sangeist a mere minute ago, their fusion burner working through blood and alchemized matter to slag the command module. Yet, more than that, enforcers rippled with thoughtstuff–gave off signatures in the Nether, at least when it wasn’t all distorted by a thoughtwave detonation.
A most enticing flicker of an idea crackled ablaze like the fires that formed Avo’s metaphysical sinews. The Sangeist he was nested in shuddered with pleasure, blood rippling as the roots of a plan began taking hold.
INITIALIZING RESURRECTION - 55%
The specs of the Galeslither were unknown to Avo, but from its behavior and the previous two engagements, he could assume a few things. The first was that it lost track of him every time he broke visual contact, such as when he went under the flooring. The second was that the pilot had a method of operating and was sticking to it.
They would either charge him down with a hurricane of force unleashed by the eldritch steed that was the true form of the Galeslither, or snatch him up to drop and splatter him again. Admittedly, it was a working strategy. He couldn’t fly and they were effectively rolling the dice to see how many times it would take to real-death him.
Or they could just retreat. The beast within him would rattle at that, but now, nestled deep in his Soul as a construct of concentrated consciousness, Avo would be fine with that. His hunger was an addiction, and the beast that wore his skin when the bloodlust was upon him had no eyes for how outmatched he was. It just wanted to hurt. To kill.
What he needed was to figure out how to properly use the Liminal Frame.
But failing that, what he needed was to take the last enforcer alive. Broken, but alive, so that the Scalper may be shaped into bait and instrument.
INITIALIZING RESURRECTION - 78%
As the resonance of coiling drew tighter and tighter over him, Avo made his final considerations and set a few basic objectives.
He needed to remedy the matter of the Woundhound and the pilot if they were in play. Seeing how the hound managed to squeeze through a narrow gap to get at a hunter during the Crucible, Avo wasn’t going to risk it swimming through his Sangeist’s armor as well.
Then, he needed to subdue the enforcer and enwreathe them as a decoy Sangeist.
Finally, Avo would keep said decoy small enough for the Galeslither to swallow. Before forcing the enforcer to fire their fusion burner within the demiplane. Worse case, the golem might survive, but that would still give Avo enough time to get out of the area to somewhere his offensive phantasmic might be usable again; use his Whisper to brick the Galeslither after.
A thought occurred to Avo as he realized he was partially aping from the diversionary tactic Little Vicious had used to ambush him and Draus on the platform during their final ascent into the Warrens.
How satisfying it was to loot knowledge from a bested foe, even post-mortem. But then again, he was a Necrojack. It was as Walton had taught him: learning from the successes and failures of others was to prune the paths that could lead to one’s ruin.
RESURRECTION - 100%
IMPLANTING NOUS
As he drowned in his Soul’s shine again, he ascended toward the comparatively cold radiance that cupped existence, his pathway back far narrower than last time, like he was emerging through a porthole–a smear of blood rather than a pool.
ONTOLOGY REVERTED
RESURRECTION COMPLETED
DOMAIN RESPAWN ENGAGED
ENGAGING THAUMIC CYCLER: 56 THAUM/c
LOADING PHANTASMICS…
WARNING: LOCAL NETHER STRUCTURE UNSTABLE - ESTIMATED TIME TO STABILIZATION: 1H 14MIN
Again, he fired his reflexes as he pulled free from his Domain-made gateway, and with less than a thought, armored himself with the metaphysical matter of that which served as his entrance.
He came into being sixty feet away from where he must have splattered. Disquietingly, he could still see the mangled spread of his flattened corpse. When he died in the Crucible, he had left no trace of a body. With a shiver, all evidence had disappeared. Why had that changed? What was the nature of his resurrection?
Shaking questions of unanswered thaumaturgy, he made for the last Scalper and the pilot, the twosome yet to notice him. Shaping stalking limbs that let him stride silently across a carpet of shattered bark and glass. He kept his mass at body weight–light and quick for his ambush. As he rose, he spotted the form of the Woundhound–and what a grand specimen it was.
Ten feet long and encased in a disfigured wrap of waxen flesh, the hound seemed a parody of a bioform–a thing dead and made not so by some impossible miracle. A scent of burning human hair clung to it, its yips rattled in low droning barks with the dulled passage of time.
Beside it, the auburn hair of the mostly unaugmented pilot swayed.
Neither she nor the Scalper saw the threading wisp coming her way, and, with a flick of will and the calculated trajectory run using a Phys-Sim, Avo snipped the top half of her skull from her body.
ENGAGING THAUMIC CYCLER: 57 THAUM/c
The enforcer jerked back, toppling in horrific surprise as the contents of his sole remaining comrade’s face came spilling free. Nearby, the hound burst apart into flaking ash.
Pressure building in his skull, Avo pushed onward, bathed beneath a single column of neon brightness cast from above, his form a pale white amidst the flickering lights of the hydroponics chamber.
The plants around him were burning. A consequence of biomatter getting kissed by hyper-heated air generated from multiple fusion burners firing as one. Forty feet away, cupped upon a small dais created by constant clotting pustules ballooning in an inverted U from the broken husk of the second Sangeist’s chassis.
Something burned wrong with its Heaven. Avo could feel it. Whatever urge he once had to shape from its blood or claim its radiance to enhance himself fled in an instant. Right now, the thought of taking from it was like supping from a bowl of contagious tumors.
The enforcer staggered then, but too late. Their fusion burner came up in an arc just as two haemokinetically projected spears punched through their shoulders. The enforcer howled, their struggle was all but vain as Avo’s control expanded through his bloodstream, holding the Scalper like a flesh-mitt.
Avo released his symbiote. The fires around him suddenly cried in unison, their crackles unheard during the dilation. Behind, the pilot finally collapsed.
With a flex of his claws, Avo tore every ligament and connective sinew in the Scalper's limbs. To their credit, they only choked out a muffled shout, shuddering as the pain consumed them.
Through the gap in the ceiling, a vortex poured in. Debris danced in spirals, the synchronized motion an augury for the coming of the Galeslither.
Perfect timing. Told him the duration of his resurrections ran longer within the confines of his Soul than in reality. Avo checked his Rend.
REND CAPACITY - 12%
Almost nothing. Good. Hide. Wait.
“Jaus,” the Scalper coughed, voice wet from internal bleeding leaking into their lungs. As Avo stepped past them, they twitched, surprise somehow shining through despite their crippled state and body language. “Ghoul…Godclad? Ghoulclad?” A delirious giggle rang from their rig’s voice modulator. Avo heard pain. He also heard genuine incredulity. “What the fuck.”
Profanity aside, Avo was inclined to agree. The Soul burning within him made him feel powerful beyond measure–had given him access to prey he previously couldn’t even dream of consuming.
It also wasn’t meant for something like him.
Draining and converting the debris around him, Avo funneled the glowing mass of his blood to form the shape of a Sangeist around the enforcer.
“Wait,” they cried, “what the fu–”
Avo encased them utterly and released his hold over the Scalper’s right arm, where the fusion burner was installed. Immediately, the sonorous thrum rang within the flowing crimson of the decoy Sangeist. Already, Avo was feeling his blood evaporating, fleeing from his control. Before he could accidentally trigger a backlash by clinging or trying to shape gas–however his hubris worked–he inflicted his decoy with Linger and watched as a pinprick of brightness began to bloom.
REND CAPACITY - 55%
The column of neon-bright radiance Avo stood under just moments prior faded, a coiling vortex surging low, the winds washing in with a neighing scream. A throb of discomfort clicked through Avo’s ears as he dove for the glass-coated tunnel he and the enforcers had a hand in making earlier.
As he dropped down and peeked over the edge, he watched as rivulets of blood were melting from his decoy, its insides bright like a lantern. Not noticing or simply too late to stop, he watched the Galeslither wash over the three-ton Sangeist bearing a special package of entombed-enforcer.
From sight did the currents slip into faint nothings, the Galeslither peeling the brightness of his decoy out from tangible existence with itself. The clashing winds wafted loose and spun inversely out through the long series of punctures Avo made during his fall earlier.
Sweeping out his shroud, Avo carved a final chasm into the hydroponics chamber and vented his Rend. As soon as his capacity was empty, he immediately began spiking it again, forming hound-like jaws from his body to snap through the bulk of an ash-claimed tree. In moments, Avo reached the mass needed to produce his grapple.
Triggering his Celerostylus again–momentarily this time–Avo launched a javelin of blood into the ceiling and felt it punch deep. He expanded gripping roots from its point of impact before using the link to reel himself up.
REND CAPACITY - 23%... 31%...
As soon as he reached the lip, Avo clasped himself in skittering insectoid-like legs, pushing and bounding upward as he smashed through the already wind-frayed edges of the exit wounds leading up and out of the block. Light spilled down from above in dappled undulations of shadow.
And as Avo finished his ascent, he understood why.
Smoke was flowing free from multiple currents of air, leaking up into existence as blood would trickle from a cut. Within the wind, a chorus of explosions thundered, and the draughts laced with smoke began to concentrate, began to fissure, and began to rejoin.
And from where once was just open air and clear skies, a burning steed tore screaming back into existence. One of its heads was shorn clean off, and between flickers, saw that a segment of its command module had been utterly cored by what looked to be a concentrated beam of heat.
Here then, was his hope. And there, burned through the body of a much-loathed foe, was the sign that his aforementioned gun had gone off.
Like a meteor, it trailed, speed and impact zone lined in Avo’s cog-feed via his Phys-Sim. He clacked his fangs, the beast hungering for the flesh of the pilot, his Soul yearning to consume a new Heaven.
Through a distant series of squat blocks, the whinnying husk of the Galeslither met aged plascrete in a thunderous clash, smoke and rubble erupting high into the air.
Clambering down the block, Avo rode out with steed-shaped legs of his own, galloping to claim a new Heaven.
You ever see two ‘Clads past the First Sphere fight? Heh. Fight. The word don’t light the wick for the clash. The ordeal is like… something from an ancient myth bled out before you: a small apocalypse that goes unnoticed across the city.
The first thing that you feel is your mind straining, trying to keep its parts together. We’re creatures of pattern. Order. Our eyes are picky eaters in a sense. We like some standardization to the…uh…viewing process.
So let me tell you when the concepts of light and time are forcibly mangled down into a block-sized ingot, parting you from the outside until the ‘Clads finish their little scuffle, you don’t come out quite right. Even with your wards up.
And then you realize why they fight these wars quietly. Because Godclads ain’t heroes of wonder and miracles, but weapons built for existential defilement. Weapons choked by the wants and flaws and little idiosyncrasies like… like us. Too much like us…
Said we were creatures of pattern earlier. Well. Ain’t no pattern more consistent than reality. It’s almost like a parent to us. Cradling us in a… cradle of reason. And with that, there ain’t a better way to flay comfort out of a child’s eyes than by hurting their parent, is there?
-Mem-Log of Vincentine “Ripperjack” Javvers, Head of the Scalpers Syndicate
4-12
Loud
Flowing smoke clinging to streams of sweeping wind lashed Avo’s skin with a tongue-like warmth as he drew closer to the Galeslither’s crash site. A bend of rising fire crowned on columns of smoke rose in the distance over Burner’s Way. The streets were empty and ringing crashes signaled the sound of closing doors.
Avo didn’t stay out in the open for long. Local Nether might’ve been all distorted by the thoughtwave but that didn’t affect drone surveillance much.
Skittering through the alleys of the district, Avo listened as thumping heartbeats sounded through the walls to the ambiance of urban decay lined with a chorus of fire. The scents of unwashed bodies whispered to Avo that there were people here just recently, frying an aratnid over a barrel, bleeding themselves with joy.
Through fissures spreading along the walls, he noticed small spins of thoughtstuff shining naked over the eyes of a glaring voyeur, who fell back, screeching with madness as they beheld his presence. No wards--their mind boiled, witnessing something that they couldn't bear seeing.
Didn’t matter to Avo. He planned to snatch his Heaven, and he planned to make a leap down into the gutters, beneath Layer One. He left a body behind and shrouded himself in the armored form of the Sangeist–now charging at a reliable ten tons, Rend building steadily.
REND CAPACITY - 42%
Too steadily. He needed a new Hell. Something to soak up all his waste energy better. His Heaven had grown far beyond the already lacking equilibrium in his system.
Still, thinking back to what just happened, he wondered if his traces were covered by the body he left behind, or if anyone back at the Gouge got a good enough look at him manifesting his Heaven of Blood again. His guess was no, seeing how much strain it put on his wards to even gaze at a Heaven.
A naked mind staring at the corpse of a god wouldn’t have much of itself left afterward.
Following the sound of the crackling fire, he emerged from the winding paths of the alley into what looked to be a narrow sidestreet between two factory silos, the G-Tube running between them missing. Along the edges of both blocks.
The cut was clean as if a mountain-sized blade had surgically removed a sphere of space some eight hundred feet in area. Past the sputtering flashes of the only working street light in the area, Avo watched as glitching holograms danced overhead, flashing from the holojectors festooned to the corners of an industrial overpass.
Welcome to Burner’s Way, the Forge of Tomorrow.
Out of all the words, tomorrow seemed to flicker the most.
The skies over the promontory of rubble where once stood five pentagonally stacked temp-blocks were incandescent with a swaying flame. Stinging chemicals from melted plastics and popping electronics made Avo gag. Still, he carried on, the promised ecstasy of new power spurring him on, the gluttony of his Soul wed to the avarice of his mind.
Though a fire burned in reality, the shine of the Galeslither’s Heaven was absolute, its radiance choking away, but not dead, still tangible enough to be subsumed into his being. He could feel it.
Screaming aerovec engines sounded on the horizon, prying his attention loose to look past a reaching bridge that ran perpendicular to the factories. Across a grand expanse of open air, a translucent threshold was marked in his cog-feed.
Nu-Scarrowbur.
The district where the Scalpers were based. That fool Chambers should have known better than to sell to a junkie living right next to a rival Syndicate. Of course, the fool thing was selling to a joyfiend, to begin with.
Business required some semblance of reliability to work, lest it became stretches of tense trade punctuated by instances of opportune theft that would eventually prelude several very deliberate assassins.
The impact zone looked something like an egg to Avo, with its outer edges bright with fire hissing out from the detritus while a shattered leg kicked desperately, its form flickering in and out of existence as the pilot continued gunning the golem’s engines, trying to wake the winds again, to escape.
REND CAPACITY - 49%
With a thought, he blanketed the flames with his gusting shroud, slicing away the matter which fueled the flames. Deep instead, where his Soul echoed in blasts of resonance, he felt his Hell grind hard, straining itself to simulate miracles opposite to his Heaven.
A problem created by the mass imbalance inflicted by his newly seeded canons was his best guess.
Slashing a path of quenched fire between the rubble, Avo expanded the space between him and his armor to prevent convection. The heat in the air was unnaturally potent as if the drifting air was only just remembering to cough up some of the burn cast by the now-dead enforcer’s fusion burner.
The trail cleared, and he ascended the rubble as if it was a dais, and he, a figure from old history, come to assume the mantle of privilege and position.
Fitting, seeing as he was going to seize a new Heaven.
The downed Galeslither lay in two mangled cans of titanium folded into one another. The third, slagged, segment of the golem was missing. Maybe it went tumbling loose. Maybe it just finally finished melting. Ultimately, it mattered little. He didn’t come here for matter but mythology.
He pulled himself toward the crippled steed on stalking tendrils of red, smoke baptizing him as he sank low, the rising resonance burst from his cycling Soul crashing against the ontological vessel of the Galeslither.
“Killed me,” Avo said, hissing at the struggling horse. This time, it was he that was approaching, and there was nothing it could do. It flickered back into being a machine as jets of hyper-heated air screamed loose from the command modules’ rent engines. He chuffed a laugh. “Twice. Most expensive meal I’ve eaten.”
Blood spilled free from the confines of his flesh, shaped into a hound’s jaws. He tore into it. But it was not his blood that clamped down around the horse. No. It was the weight of his ontology, given shape by the thaums in his being–the fire unleashed by his Soul.
The steed wailed a final time as Avo began to draw it into himself. Around and above, vast tunnels of twisting gales coalesced like rapids rushing toward the delta that was Avo. Around him, his Soul’s flame burned bright, the colors of the conflagration around him nearly colorless and muted before his divine incandescence.
The flavor of suffusing a Heaven into oneself was an ineffable ecstasy; sustenance that filled him in a place deeper than bone.
Yet, as he drank, he wanted more. More.
As the final bits of the Galeslither went down, he felt his Liminal Frame flare out before collapsing back inside him.
A new aspect of the beast awakened inside him, a primal understanding that he was no longer just a failed monster left to die in an ever-climbing food chain. Now, he was a Godclad, and with enough preparation and audacity, there would be nothing and no one he couldn’t eventually claim as prey.
And suddenly, a small scar of dread formed in a pocket of Avo’s mind. Maybe it hadn’t been right to consume the Heaven, to awaken his desires.
But he couldn’t deny that this was the single closest sensation he knew to true happiness. The parameter of his existence was a savage thing, and so, he found himself gripping the chains of control tighter.
A hissing pop sounded, a hatch on the side of the golem bursting free. Avo's attention snapped back in place. The thoughtstuff of the pilot, once shrouded by the brightness of the Heaven, came staggering out. He was surprised they were still alive, even more, that they were almost unharmed.
Garbed in badly scratched utility plating that carapaced in ridges of chrome, the pilot came forth, twitching, their heart screaming in spasms. Neurachem withdrawal.
“Wait,” the pilot said, holding up their hands, “I surrend–”
Their head came apart in a welter of gore. Avo blinked. A trajectory lanced a lane of red through the parting pieces of their skull and out on the horizon. Gauss flechette. With reflexes surging, Avo spun, a wire-sharp whip of blood slicing out from his veins. A flash of thoughtstuff came into his periphery. He cleaved.
And Draus shifted.
Her first movement was a stuttered twitch, his Phys-Sim lining her position–but too late. She spun again, her head tilting less than an inch. Avo’s whip claimed not by a flake of skin from her ear before he collapsed his construct and halted his reflexes.
Time flowed free. The flames around him burned on, the crackling sounding like clapping. Before him, Draus stood, face blank of any expression beyond disdain, glaring at him.
“Shit, Avo,” she said, her drawl somehow adding more weight to her disappointment, “how’d you manage to snuff anyone with that shit accuracy.” She shot the dead pilot a look. “Couldn’t leave that one alive either. They saw you. A loose piece of mem-data right there, drifting in the wind.”
He didn’t really know how to start this conversation. Not well, anyway. Part of him was strangely glad to see her again–a notion he found beyond dissonant considering she was a Reg. The beast, however, wanted him to cleave her in half and drink from her corpse for taking his deserved kill.
“Could’ve let me feed then,” Avo said, voice nearly a snarl. No thaums. No ghosts. She took that from him.
Draus ran her tongue behind her cheeks. “Nah. I ain’t that cruel.”
Her new limbs were chitinous, her arms bearing mantis’ edged blades along the elbows while still extending onward into workable digits. Her legs, however, bore resemblance to that of a grasshopper’s. Along her back, the clasping legs of a biomechanical rig expanded out around her, connecting her to her new limbs via an external centipede-like organism slotted into the back of her skull. In her hand was a standard gauss rifle.
Avo swallowed and gnashed his fangs. Draus stared. For a moment, neither acted, just watching. He had gained power, but the opportunities it granted him also unveiled new temptations. It was much easier resisting the urge to eat her in the Crucible when he knew he couldn’t kill her.
The beast snarled, but Avo smothered it with a burst of willpower. Draus wasn’t choiceless. There was probably a reason he could find to justify killing her. But she knew more about the functions of his Liminal Frame than he did.
That, and he still felt like he owed her. He couldn't stop thinking of her open wrist, of the sweetness in her blood, his bestial hunger clashing against ingrained honor.
“New limbs?” he asked.
She looked at her insectoid limbs and shrugged. “Got ‘em at a discount.” She studied him for a moment before her face cracked in a ghost of a smirk, and shook her head. “You were thinkin’ of making a go for me just now, yeah? Won’t lie. Odds are in your favor now. But I’d spit the same ‘bout all the other ‘Clads I helped put down.”
“No,” Avo said, the words coming out choked with effort. “Won’t try to snuff you. Not right.”
She squinted at him. “What? You tellin’ me I’m out of your diet now?"
No. “Yes. Found me. How?”
“Waited for you to make a mess,” she said. “And then I followed the noise. And godsdamned did you make a lot of noise. Reckon it might even be enough to pull the attention of the Paladins down here. And trust me, you don't wanna tangle with them just yet."
“Should leave,” Avo said.
“Reckon we should,” Draus said. “Just gotta pick our new friends up is all.”
Avo's eyes narrowed. “New friends?”
“Found in the G-Station. They were trying to pull a runner. Leave you hangin’ from how it looks to me.”
Avo growled. He was going to flense the flesh from Chambers’ body slowly before dipping him in salt water.
“Still there?” Avo asked.
“Nah,” she said. “Bricked the capsule takin’ them. Secured other means of extraction. Mine. Can’t rely on Syndicate equipment, see. Little problem with it being compromised. So, you comin’ with?”
Avo studied her, listen for her slow, methodical heartbeat, and used his Heaven to watch the flow swimming at a constant pace through her system. If Mirrorhead was a blank, then Draus was stability. She didn’t betray much about herself either but then again, she didn’t have much to betray in the first place.
“When you stole the golem. Thought you did a runner. Expected it.”
Draus’ face cracked into a sneering laugh. She took a step closer, standing a scant foot away from Avo. Even with her new limbs, he still towered over her by half a head, but her musculature made him look outright malnourished.
“Did you kill Mirrorhead yet?”
Avo frowned. “No.”
“Then this ain’t over. Then we ain’t done. Know his type–burned my life fighting for his kind. The boy’s Highflame, through and through. Or he was. Suppose that makes him and I birds of a burning feather, but I don’t cotton to sullying myself by association, so he can stay in that there classification alone.”
And immediately Avo remembered why he missed Draus during his very, very brief tenure with Conflux. Unprofessionalism and incompetence were like cancers. It got into you and around you, and before long, it would see you dead.
Yet, within seconds of meeting Draus, she came prepared, with his former “comrades” bagged, more information on his former employer, and potentially a means of attack that didn’t require using the father as a triggering mechanism for a mem-con phantasmic.
Avo leaned down. “Coming with. But Mirrorhead. When we take him. Going to eat him. Hurt him. Drink his Heaven. Strip his frame. Crack his mind.”
Draus’ nostrils flared. “Well, if you want to eat an ex-Guilder, I think I got the condiments.”
Torture is inefficient for information, but an absolutely wonderful way of getting new offensive phantasmics. But there’s an art to this! A wonderful, wonderful art! You can’t bake a cake with a broken egg, after all, haha! Am I right, novitiate?
[Tester screaming]
You see… that’s… that’s already too much. Look into the mirror and stare at your eyes… I mean, really look into them. You see that. You’re going somewhere else. Mind’s already breaking from the pressure I put on you. Too much too fast.
Your ego pouring out with the tears. Too much. Too much. I got to peel slowly. So, let’s start with someone more sublime.
[Tester pleading; begging]
Oh, this isn’t the moment where it gets bad. This is just an initiation. Remember, your memory will be cleared after this. You are experiencing this through a proxy. This is only to get a gauge as to where your limits lie. Do you understand?
[Tester sobbing]
Now, you said you loved your father? Now, let us learn what might happen if I sprinkled some abuse on those cherished memories…
-First Instructor Kanaede, Incubi Entrance Exam, Ori-Thaum
5-1
Bad Cop/Cannibal Cop
It was the smell that caught Avo’s attention first, hinting at what kind of vehicle Draus’ had decided to procure for this “extraction.”
Hovering past a narrow weave of alleyways over the edge of the district, the trash barge was a long plow-shaped vehicle with mem-tags sprayed all along its rusted exterior. A narrow “V" formed its primary windshield and a dozen mechanical arms folded and dormant along its sides. A cake of filth crowned the sealed top of the barge, crusting it with fecal enamel.
And without difficulty, it blended into the sheer dilapidation of the environment, looking just as used and worn as the buildings and the people here.
“Trash barge,” Draus said, sniffling. “Comes cheap; got space; lined with lead. Best flyer you can get for movin’ ‘round these parts.” She cast a darting chain of ghosts into the front of the vehicle, flinging a thought command at the locus. Slowly, the vehicle began to turn, shifting to angle its backdoor to them.
Yet, as Avo drew close, he noticed the frizzling ripples coming from three minds, their thoughtstuff scattered and spiking with sudden alarm.
His former “comrades,” Avo guessed. How nice of Draus to pack a hefty lunch for their trip over to…
“Draus.” Avo asked. “Location? Where?”
“Xin Yunsha,” Draus said. Avo’s cog-feed caught the Sangshanese and began filtering a loose translation from the memories of his ghost. Proper localization needed an Omniglot phantasmic, but right then, he had enough mem-data to pump out something raw.
“New Cloudsand?” he asked.
The Regular shook her head. “Translation's too literal. It’s a line from one of them Sangshan poems. Something about the time being like the clouds and the sands.”
Avo grunted. He never held much interest in poetry. Required too much sentiment. Sentiment that just didn’t burn inside him. “Why there?”
“Got a fixer there. Cloned from the Line of Qing, named Green River. Also got half a dozen other names there, but the important thing’s that she’ll be putin’ us up for now. Got a hab that’s out of the way. And some…facilities that you and I can both find useful.”
“They take ghouls?”
Draus grinned. “Why, Avo, when you sell a fully functioning golem to a local arms broker, all sorts of taboos make like.. uh… clouds and sand.” She breathed mockingly at him.
An intrusive thought snaked into his mind, images of him opening her throat and eating her trachea. He wondered if she would still smile at him then. Inside, his blood rattled, snapping together like prisoners clanging their chains against the steel of their cages. He could shape a blade through her skull. It would be so easy…
Avo shook his head and continued toward the barge. “Fine.” he croaked. He needed to kill Chambers. Someone. Someone to dull the edge. He could hear the flowing of her blood running through her veins. His hunger was growing stronger. Getting worse.
It was like eating that Heaven had torn a gaping wound into his stomach. He was full. His body’s metabolism wasn’t burning. But he wanted more. It felt like his blood was coming afire, compelling him onward via a building heat from within. It wouldn’t be long till it became a need.
“Open door,” Avo said, staring at the glaring three ripples of thoughtstuff inside the barge. Their flows came muted, the terrible opaqueness of their wards leaking, filled with exploitable cracks. If he had a Ghostjack phantasmic installed, he wouldn’t need to dismantle cracked minds so utterly to lick the faint traces of memetic nectar from their minds.
As it stood, he didn’t have a Ghostjack. Their minds weren’t going to be intact. There wouldn’t be much of them at all by the time this was done.
Avo ran his tongue along his inner teeth. He was going to enjoy this deeply.
“Hey, Avo,” Draus said, the roughness in her voice an unwelcome intrusion, piercing his murderous reverie. He tilted his head, not bothering with a full turn, choosing to stare at her out from the periphery of his right eye. If that offended her, she didn’t show it. “You ain’t eatin’ them. You heard?”
Now he did turn. Now, the ringing chains of blood inside him echoed like cracking whips. The beast roared, fused within a metaphorical cage, but this time, it was not alone. His active Heaven–his Sangeist–could feel through matter as well, and it felt the quality of her blood. Pure. Premium. Designer make.
Avo wrestled with himself. Every sinew within him came afire, screaming at him to unleash the power of his Heaven as a bloom of unfurling blades. Peel the Regular apart and strip her clean to the bone. Find where even the adamantine will of a Regular would shatter and feast on her broken–
He pulled himself away before he could sink deeper. Too much. He had fed the beast too much these past few days. Over fifty lives taken to feed his hunger, to fuel his fire. And more. It always wanted more.
“The talker,” Avo said, voice seething as he imagined what sweet sounds he could get from taking a sharp edge to Chambers slowly. “The fool. His unprofessionalism got me killed. Twice. Killed choiceless in the crossfire. Lied to me about the dive. Can’t let him live. Wouldn’t be right. Insult to the craft.”
“And it’ll be an insult to pragmatism if you up and kill him now, won’t it,” Draus scoffed. “Look. I’ve been killing these Syndicate half-strands for a while now. I know how it is. Ain’t got spit for them if they was on fire. But we get what we can get first, yeah? You were more than a ghoul down in that Crucible. I need you to stay more now.”
Draus stared at him. Avo gnashed his fangs together and actively plucked his thoughts away from eating and hurting people. He imagined sequencing a ghost. He imagined how Walton corrected his mistakes.
“Fine,” he said, barely.
She scuffed her nose momentarily with her thumb and shrugged. “It’s a short ride. Twenty minutes. Prepared a couple hundred pounds of raw meat for you at the hab. You cotton to keep yourself checked till then?”
“Yeah,” Avo said. “Can do that.”
“Well, alright, then.” She shot the barge a look. “Still, there’s… something we ought to be doin’ along the way. Gotta ask our new friends a couple of questions. You said you were a Necro?”
“Still am.”
“Right. Good. Gonna need that when we get down to business." She pointed at the thoughtstuff ebbing from within the barge, “and I’m going to need you to get one of those half-strands sequenced up. Got a phantasmic in mind. Wanna make a plant of our own later. You spent more time ‘round them. Should have a better idea which of them’s got more pull with Mirrorhead than I do.”
“Chambers,” Avo said, without hesitation. “The talker. He’s the one to… use. Other two are techs. Logistic. Support. He’s management. Or what passes.”
“Him? Shit. How the hells are they still around?”
“Mirrorhead,” Avo said. “Best guess.”
She spat through the gap between the barge and the edge of the district. Across the gulf to the next district, a thin sheen of blackness spewed upwards in pluming gouts: the Maw exhalations given color.
She struck him on the shoulder and cracked a smirk. “Hey. What’s say you and I talk to him. Real old-fashioned like. See what we can persuade out of him first before you get to work on his mind. Like in one of them... cop soaps?”
Avo grunted. A faint chuff of amusement punched through despite his subconscious desire to suckle out her eyes and run his tongue through her sockets. He and Walton had watched a few crime serials back in the day.
Lay and Li was one. An impossible knight-squire comedy between a straight-laced Kosgan fresh from the academy and a former Sang circuit fighter who was probably more than a little based on the Stormsparrow.
The show lasted twelve seasons. Critical acclaim was supposed to have helped ease tensions between the No-Dragons and Highflame. Came to an abrupt end when the two leads caught the rash from each other and died. The media somehow found it tragically romantic.
Somehow, Avo couldn't imagine spraying stillborn versions of yourself through fissure sores to be that enticing.
“You bad cop? Or am I?” he asked.
Draus guffawed. “Shit, ghoul, I think we’re both the bad cop. Only question is which of us will be worse.”
To that, Avo only grinned.
With a wordless command, the door snapped open, a rising pillar of light flooding into the room. Three figures writhed, wincing at the sudden brightness. They were left in their undergarments, with their armor and equipment nowhere to be seen. The interior of the barge’s back end was a blank canvas of dull gunmetal grey and protruding lockers.
It was only as Avo stepped in that he realized they were writhing because all their limbs were folded over, shards of bone jutting loose from pierced skin. The scent of blood hit him. He swallowed and glared at Draus.
“What?” she asked.
He gesticulated in annoyance at the brutalized state of the Confluxers. “Trying to tempt me?” he hissed.
She rolled her eyes. “Jaus. Can’t just tie a rope or a cord these days. Half these half-strands’ got monoblades implanted somewhere. Its break the limbs or accept that they’ll do a runner.”
Chambers groaned, his voice raw with pain. “You crazy fucking sow–I carried your ass through the rain and–auughhh, fuck my legs.”
The Regular laughed. Walking over, she likely booted the bone spur protruding from Chambers’ shin. He screamed. The bone slipped up deeper, sliding through the flesh.
Avo’s mouth watered.
Gods, but she was testing him.
Rolling onto his back, Chamber stared into the light, gasping with sobs. His eyes widened. He leaned up. “Avo? Holy fucking shit! Avo. A–Avo, help me? Kill this crazy fucking Reg sow! She came out of–Avo?”
Pulling free from the brightness outside, Avo strode into the darkness within the barge, his skin taking on a strange glow in the ambient light, making him resemble the bastard offspring between leather and jade. Beneath his skin, he felt his Heaven twitch, the blood flowing with him clicking, chipping together in anticipation.
It seemed the more he fed his Heaven, the more alive it felt. Not unlike the symbiote, in a certain regard; it was a part of him, like a new organ layered into his being, granting him new limbs to reach, and new eyes to see.
And see he did. See the sudden flush of terror as the haemokinetic circuits that formed Chambers’ system, his heart filled with explosions and deflating like a balloon. The sound of the organ throbbing loudly was the truest expression of terror
"H-hey," Chambers whimpered, "I-it's me, consang. I--I gave you a place to sleep at night."
“Going to eat your eyes,” Avo said. “Eat your left for leaving me. Eat your right because I’m hungry.”
Chambers spun back over Draus, the fact that she crippled him a distant memory. “Fuck!” he cried, worming over to her, bouncing on his chest and neck. “Fucking, you’re a Reg, aren’t you? Stop the ghoul! Stop the fucking ghoul!”
Draus sneered down at him, like a hawk judging a worm. “Sorry, consang, but my discharge was dishonorable.”
“Ah, fuck,” Chambers moaned.
Behind them, the door snapped shut, silencing the outside. With a low hum, the barge’s engines fired as it sank, diving low to embark along its pre-navigated path.
With a nudge of her foot, Draus shoved Chambers into a pile with the two techs. Janand wailed as the Syndicate enforcer landed back-first against his snapped leg. In the corner, the other tech lay still, unconscious.
“So, here’s how it’s gonna be,” Draus began. “Me and the paler here might-gotta a few questions y’all could answer. So, I suggest that when I talk you speak up, because–” Draus could help but snort a laugh, “--though neither of us is what I’d describe as the ‘social type,’ only one of us might eat you if you don’t spit true right now. You synced?”
Janand hissed, staring blankly up at the ceiling, stress and exhaustion forming a catalyst of post-traumatic apathy in his expression. “Don’t know anything. Just a fucking tech. Ask… uh… what’s his name? ... Jambers? Yeah. Ask him. He’s the one Mirrorhead promoted.”
Chambers roared. “You glass-jawed, sell-your-new-boss-out, death-courting fuck!” He turned to wriggle hatefully against Janand. The tech continued frowning at the ceiling, silently wishing for death.
Draus sighed and dragged the enforcer away, casually tossing him in the other corner.
A blaring horn sounded from the outside. The barge dipped hard to avoid traffic. Avo stumbled, claws squealing along the steel to stabilize himself. Janand rolled. Chambers bounced hard against the walls, head ringing against metal. Draus barely reacted, her balance untouched.
Slowly, she knelt down before Chambers. With both of them out of the rig, the contrast between them looked as if a champion of myth speaking down to a scoundrel.
“Let’s start with Mirrorhead. Want some details about him. When’d he show up? Where’d he come from? What’s he want? That kind of stuff.”
“Showed up a year ago,” Chambers said. “Sometime during… the eighteenth day of the Waxing. I don’t know. Just showed up one day. Started throwing imps around–mean really throwing imps. Hired every two-bit street squire wannabe into his ranks that could hold a gun. Paid wager rates for contract work too. We all thought shit was nova working for Conflux.”
“And then you let him jab you?” Avo finished.
“And then he started jabbing us, fuckin’ yes.” Chambers froze. “Ah shit. Oh shit! He’s gonna fry our synapses now–he’s gonna…” Chambers’ hyperventilating slowed. He blinked. Avo tilted his head. The enforcer was thinking. Chambers laughed, a chuckle rising to a cackle. “He ain’t gonna do shit.”
Chambers lifted his head, smiling. “He ain’t gonna do shit, and you know why?”
“Do tell?” Draus said.
“'Cause he’s hiding,” Chambers said, a bit of spittle coming free from his lips. “He’s hiding from another Godclad. He goes missing every time the Nether talks about it. Well,” Chambers said, grinning at Avo, “you raise enough hell to make the local lobbies think that another Guild war was starting. Heard–heard the rumors flyin’ that the Scalpers even sent out a knot while I was trying to bug out—”
Avo hissed. Chambers wilted.
“Milk. Run.”
“Shit, man, you can’t blame me. I didn’t know this was going to happen.”
“Do blame you. Should have known.” Avo growled, baring his fangs. “Innocents died. My fault. Your fault. Scalpers fault. Can’t fix me. But I fixed Scalpers. And I can fix you.”
Chambers winced away from Avo. “Okay–alright I can make it up to you. I can help. I’ll help you get the flat out. I–I–I know his name! I know his real name!”
Draus held out a hand. Avo blinked as he ran into it. Had he still been going for Chambers? He lost track of himself for a moment. Within the recesses of his mind, the beast seethed hatefully at Draus.
“You good?” Draus asked.
“Yeah,” Avo said, backing up. “Chambers. Whose name?”
“Mirrorhead,” Chambers said. “I know Mirrorhead’s real name.”
“In principle, we are inverting what the gods used to do to us. Where once they channeled their divine miracles and Heavens using our vessels as expendable conduits, we of Highflame have risen beyond meager grudges to seek greater aspirations.
What we are offering all those who commit to our color is simple: agency; choice; the ability to hold your own leash. We’re not here to use and burn you at our leisure. We broke our gods for this transgression.
All we want for you is to take the flame through your merits and become someone that can provide a better future for humanity unchained by mortal limits. Here at Highflame Industries, we stand alone but rise together.
Should any of you prove yourself worthy of divinity, you’ll find yourself amongst a court of peers and equals, a place where iron is sharpened by iron. But that is only if you have the will and skill to claim your place. Idheim has suffered enough from mediocrity.
Blessed be the worthy!"
-Supreme Seraph Veylis Avandaer, Commencement Address for the Highflame Academies
5-2
The Second Fortune
Draus’ expression twisted as if she tasted something sour. Shaking her head, she tilted, glancing at Avo. “You believe this? A name. Our… friend here is gonna buy our goodwill… with a name.”
“Everyone’s got one,” Avo said, clacking his teeth lightly, trying not to think of how the soft inner flesh beyond Chambers’ eye sockets would glide against his tongue. “I got one.”
“It’s Mirrorhead’s real name,” Chambers said, straining to keep upright with all his limbs snapped. His efforts came in wiggles, the motion reminding Avo of the strange slugs he saw back in Burner’s Way. “I’m not trying to juke you.”
The Regular scoffed. “Didn’t say you were now, did I? Just meanin’ it probably ain’t worth spit to us. Know plenty of names already. Osjack. Osjane. Oswin. Ling. Yang. Uwayde. Kossolo…”
“Jhred,” Chambers interrupted, jutting his chin forward, his rat-like grin masked beneath shadows and bruises. “How’s that for a name? Know that one?” The barge twisted again, turning hard. Chambers twisted hard, jerking to stay upright, but his back made a squealing noise as he toppled, a light smear of blood marking his face-first pitch against the corner. “Shit! Shit! Shit!”
The enforcer's head rang against the metal again, forming, cupping him in place. “Fuck! Ow!”
An inconsistent pulse sang out from within Draus’ chest. For the first time, Avo heard her biology betray her emotions. Through his Heaven, he felt a surge of force run through her veins, her heart thundering twice. If Chambers’ had a drum, that beast that beat in her chest was an artillery piece.
Over her head, the nigh-transparent crown of her Metamind rippled, her thoughtstuff boiling at the frequency of rage.
“Know the name,” Avo said. It wasn’t a question. Not when the effect was so obviously written across the Reg’s features.
“Yeah,” Draus said, the playfulness leaking out of her like blood from a slit wrist, “yeah, I reckon I do.” Reaching down, she plucked Chambers up and laid him against the corner. A small bump was building as a thickening bulge along his head. Draus glared down at him. “Alright. You was right. You weren’t lying. Got my attention.”
Chambers smiled.
“Problem is: you got my attention. So if I don’t like what I’m hearing, I’m gonna get real forgetful about why I need you alive, and let Avo here do the talkin’ for me.”
Chambers’ smile melted into a twitching gulp. “I’m gettin’ you loud and clear, ma’am. Nothing but the truth from Chambers.”
Across the floor, Janand snorted a laugh. “This’ll be good.”
“Shut the fuck up, Janard. Roll over and pretend you’re dead or whatever the fuck you were doing.” Chambers sighed. “Alright. So, let’s start with his name–”
She flipped him over. Chambers yelped. “Hey, the fuck are you doing? I’m trying to tell you–”
“Avo,” Draus said. “Pluck the bomb.”
Avo stared at her. “He could tell more.”
“He could. He don’t need to. I need you to sweep his mind later. But I know who he’s talking about. Get the rest by divin’. Pluck the bomb.”
“D-don’t you even want to know how I–” Draus struck him across the jaw, the flow like a blurring sledgehammer. Chambers’ head whiplashed, but Draus–in a feat of speed–caught him before he struck the wall again, allowing him to flop down silently.
Avo frowned. “You good?” How odd it was he that promised her to remain in control. Even the beast was momentarily silent in confusion, his bloodlust abated by the sudden violence from Draus.
“Nah,” Draus said. “And I’m hankerin’ to get worse. Pluck the bomb. I… just need a second is all.”
Huffing slightly, Avo extended roots of blood from his wrist. Draus winced, the flash of discomfort gone in an instant. Janand, though, caught full sight of the miracle, and whimpered, turning to empty his stomach.
All over his unconscious partner.
Avo snarled. Pathetic. The father held stronger against Little Vicious. And the man was a flat.
Reaching into Chambers’ body with his Heaven, Avo dug through his bloodstream and collected the pieces of the cortex bomb. The ease of the act startled Avo–his powers allowing him to conduct casual nano-surgery.
REND CAPACITY - 2%
Avo vented his Hell right into the glinting particulates in his blood’s grasp. Then, he moved onto the shivering form of Janand and did the same thing, with the nameless tech following soon after.
Drawing the web of blood back into himself, new horizons expanded much as the sanguine roots did in his veins. He wondered if he could mimic the matter of flesh and build himself new implants. Or use his Heaven to build him a mimicry of a rig. Or just use it to implant others with cortex bombs without them knowing.
The Sangeist suddenly offered far more than just blunt force trauma and limited fabrication applications. He had been thinking too limited in his approach to solving his problems.
Letting out a breath, Draus sighed. “We’re gonna need to talk about that too. Your Frame.”
“Yeah,” Avo said, agreeing. “Still don’t know functions. Not completely.”
Draus nodded. “I know someone. I’ll make a call for you. See what we can figure.”
He grunted his wordless thanks. “What was that? Hitting him. Losing composure. Not like you.”
“You know what I’m like now? Known you for a day, ghoul.”
He ignored the jab even as the beast bristled. “True. Also true that you never act this way. Not against the golem. Not even while it was breaking you.”
“That's,” Draus said, “a different case.” She hissed out a breath hot with rage. “This one said Jhred. Well, I know a Jhred. Hells, all of Highflame probably knows him. But I personally knew the half-strand’s father.” A thunderous expression came over her. “It’s an old wound. From the war. You understand.”
Though the details were sparse, he did. “Yeah.”
A stutter cut into the barge’s engines, its descent slowing to a low whine. Draus flicked a ghost into the locus at the front of the vehicle and lifted her chin at Avo. “We’re here. Welcome to Xin Yunsha. First and most prosperous district of the Yuulden-Yang Sovereignty.” She chuckled. “That still ain’t sayin’ much.”
As they landed, Avo noticed the ripples coming from four accretions of thoughtstuff below. They were waiting, two in the front and two in between, like a waiting party.
Or an ambush.
“Relax,” Draus said, sensing his tension. “They wanted to snuff us they would’ve sent swarmers to melt us while we’re airborne.” With a thought, she opened the backdoor of the barge, and the winds came flowing in. Strange that his Sangeist was so active yet his Galeslither had yet to respond.
Maybe Draus could help with that.
Out in the spire-dappled light of midday, two bioforms stood waiting, both armored in titanium vests and muscle with unnaturally biocultured muscles. One of them was a ten-foot-tall bipedal nu-tiger, albeit one that bore glinting scales instead of stripes upon fur, and sculpted to be bipedal. Across from it was an ox-like beast, even wider but a head shorter.
Upon their bodies were strange hives, chittering with glinting insects, bright and menacing. Swarmers. Hyper-acidic, hyper-breeding insects that could eat through steel in seconds.
The only thing the two creatures shared were the glinting crystalline shards embedded in their heads. Loci.
Draus took a step forward, with no hesitation, no fear. She waved at the two towering bioforms, throwing out orders. “Three alive. Limbs busted. Need them fixed. Handed over to holding. And the barge needs to be disposed of–locus smashed.”
+Be you Draus?+ an echoing voice carried by a ghost crackled from the locus embedded at the center of the bioform’s head.
“Yeah,” Draus said. “I be Draus. Tell Green River I’m here and that I hope she finished setting up our abode.”
The tiger’s eyes blinked in a rhythmic sequence. With a low chuff, it obeyed, backing away and out of sight. The entire time, neither bioform even regarded Avo, seemingly not noticing he was there.
Like there was a vacancy in their instincts.
Behind the ox, two smaller figures approached, their bodies short and mutilated, their top halves obviously human, the bottom that of dogs. Along their shoulders was a red carpet, rolled and carried.
Eunuchs, Avo remembered Walton calling them. Those born of the Sang and hailing from the Thousand Plains had a different manner of settling accounts. For most, crime was a question of rehabilitation or punishment. For the No-Dragons, the question was one of debt incurred against the community and state.
Both the Eunuchs were–against the name–female, their eyes held open by hooks while hair-thin serpents grown from their eyelashes dripped dollops of lubricant, watering their eyes but ensuring they never blinked. Their bodies were wretched things of flesh-sculpted artistry, chimeric in design, molding to be mockeries of dog and human both.
Four dog-like legs strained to bear the mass of their obviously human torsos, clothed only in sacks of ragged white seemingly designed to stain at will. From the hip up, they balanced themselves with each step, the weight of the carpet on the shoulders heavy, dragging them low as if supplicating before Draus as they approached.
With a practiced motion, they cast the carpet down and rolled it out. Small legs chittered out from under it, clattering along the ground and twisting around the corner. Along its surface, long strokes painted words Avo couldn’t understand.
“Tyrants seek blades; the wise seek a path,” Draus said, reading the script. Avo couldn’t tell. His Metamind was giving him gibberish. He stared at her. She grinned. “Yeah. Can’t read it, huh? Written in archaic form. These Eunuchs here probably can’t read it. Can you?”
“We know nothing, esteemed guest,” one said, the words practiced. Routine. Accepted.
"It is not the privilege of a dog to know things,” the other added.
Leaving the barge, Avo found himself in another alley, this time pressed between blocks grown from still-living bone. Scents of clashing flesh and warring biologies greeted him. Following the carpet, they came before a small tower, the insides loud with clamoring voices and clacking chess pieces. The entire structure looked like a stacked pagoda grown from columns of enamel.
In the matter, Avo saw hints of the old war towers that the Low Masters aped during the Uprising.
He wondered how much truth there was to his old owners getting their support from the No-Dragons.
As they came to a circular door at the back of the tower, the tiger stood by, head now bowed low, gesturing for them to enter the courtyard.
“Keep your foot off the bar-crossin’,” Draus said, pointing to the rising protrusion of bone protruding along the bottom of the door. “Sang get real particular-like if you offend their customs.”
Avo grunted. He knew. One of his old fixers–Nine Fox–was Sang. Still, it was good to keep that in mind. He supposed that was the reason why the Eunuchs were trailing along with them–a reminder of what awaited those who transgressed, outsider or kindred.
Into a square-shaped courtyard where a tumorous expanse of roots grew, skin tags swaying instead of willow leaves, Avo breathed in the scents of flesh and bone around him. Few things were of inorganic design. The glass. The titanium carapace armoring the nu-ox and the nu-tiger. The loci implanted within them.
That was it.
There was nothing here that couldn’t be grown in a nest of flesh or a sufficiently developed organ farm. Yet, unlike the sloppy transplants that gangers plied, there was a symmetry here, an engineered art.
Standing before the tower, veins of bioluminescence lined the exterior in neon. Beneath large Sangshanese words, a secondary line flashed into Avo’s cog-feed.
Welcome to the Second Fortune.
As Avo stepped past the threshold of the front door, he felt a sudden wave of enervation cleave through him. He gasped, hand snapping out to hold himself upright using the hinges, claws digging furrows into the frame. A warmth spilled from inside him, blood trickling from his orifices like snot. With a thought, his Heaven flickered and he drew his leaking ichor back inside himself.
“You alright?” Draus asked.
He nodded, forcing his blood to still.
By now, the discomfort had nested itself deep inside him, boiling his veins. The pain was muted by the strength of his Heaven, but he knew it would always be present so long as he was in Sang territory. Not unless someone gave him a neuter-mask coded toward femininity.
The Dragon-Curse was radiation and ontological alteration both. Infested in the surviving bloodlines of the Sang, the affliction killed all that it deemed “male.”
It started with chromosomes. And then it moved on, its effects lessening but never quite wavering, going from a hemorrhage down to a nosebleed depending on your habits, principles, diet, speech pattern, and even facial shape.
In the attempts of the dragons to break their former slaves, they had culled over three-fifths of the old lines of the Sang. They thought it was enough. They judged the death of the patriarchs and the solars of the family to be that which stemmed the tide of rebellion.
A classic mistake of divorced cultures between the rulers and ruled; one that the dragons were educated upon via their own enslavement and mass slaughter when the Godsfall came.
Still, the curse remained. And no matter how many dragons were forced to divide for additional dissection and experimentation on the parts of the No-Dragons, they just couldn’t quite crack the changes the dragons inflicted on them.
The first–always the first thing–that struck anyone about the No-Dragons was the fact that they usually wore some kind of bio-organic rig that counted as a living creature. Incarnates, they were called. It was their main method of circumventing the infliction of the curse should they be required to battle or conduct activities understood by the dragons as “masculine.”
In such a respect, it could be said that it was the creature they wore that did the act instead of the sister that did the piloting.
Entering the establishment, they found more Eunuchs tending to the room, holding up curtains of skin that blocked Draus and Avo from the sight of the other patrons, feasting on dumplings and steamed vegetables, voices bright with laughter and drowned by flowing rice wine.
“Regular,” the fourth sister greeted, her designation assigning her labor. She stood guard at the entry deep past the lobby. She too shared arm-limbs of similar design to those transplanted upon Draus, though she stood taller on the legs of a spider. “The third sister’s waiting for you.” The fourth sister swiped her eyes over him, the motion like the flick of a blade, not even lingering on him. “I see you found a pet monster. Shall we place it in the kennels while–”
“He’s called Avo,” Draus said, leaning in close to look up at the Sang. “But you’re right about one thing: he is a monster. Do well to remember that.”
The fourth sister shot Avo another glance and shrugged. “Your suggestion is taken with gratitude, now please, our sister has been waiting most politely.”
And it just wasn’t the No-Dragon way unless there was that slight spark of passive-aggressiveness. Tea, but with a bit of spit in it.
Led on by the fourth sister, they followed, the bright orange bioluminescence cast from the organ lanterns in the last room turning into a thick droning red. Along the walls, ink slithered beneath patchworks of perceived skin, the blots coming together to form ads and showcase the latest bioware and symbiotes for sale.
Avo stared, wondering if they had anything that could work on his biology. Mirrorhead managed, and the Sang were the best in Idheim at biomancy. The problem with them was less of a matter of could and instead one of would. He was a monster, after all. Draus bringing him in was faux pas enough. Like bringing a nu-dog to a club.
Deeper and deeper into the casino they went. Drugged-out joyheads leaned against the walls inside padded lung-like cells of frosted glass, ghosts swirling over their heads, faces distorted with expressions of unending, ever-climbing bliss.
Stepping through a side room, a scent of blood struck Avo as he peered over the rails. Far below, a fight was happening between two piloted Incarnates, the stands filled with braying spectators and drifting ghosts.
The fight was between a twenty-foot serpent and a spider that could fire swarmers from its shoulder hives.
Through a veil of rattling jade beads, the fourth sister led Avo and Draus to stand before a flesh-caked door with a narrow eye implanted at its center. Squinting maliciously, it blinked twice as the bone slats along the wall clicked.
The door swung open, and there, at end of the narrow chamber lined with luxuries of flesh and matter both, Green River sat upon a grand oaken chair. A patch of tumors had grown over where her eyes should have been while the long scarf-like body of a vulpine unwrapped itself from where it was grafted into her neck. Its pale green eyes locked on Avo and Draus as the fourth sister guiding them bowed and backed away out from the door, eyes never meeting Green River’s.
“Former Regular Draus,” Green River smiled, the vulpine attached to her sharing the expression, “Your return pleases me. Come, drink with me.” The fox turned to stare at Avo. “You too, Moonblood. A sparrow I know told me quite a tale regarding the two of you. Now, I wish to hear it from the source.”
Do you know the Sang paint their skins before they re-carnate? Use their skins to wrap up the newer infant variants of themselves that came with them when they hatch from the husks of their old bodies.
The ratio of young that comes out with them is always the same. Four girls and a dying boy–the latter has no chance of surviving less you ‘tomb them in one of those Voidwatch med-vats.
Why? It ain’t up to the Sang.
Dragons. Always goes back to the dragons. Don’t know what made them… different from the likes of our gods, but it seemed like those half-strands could cross over whole. Didn’t need any domains or Heavens to step into the real. From what was told, it sounded like they were proto-clads in a sense.
‘Cept for the part of them forcing the Sang to create other gods, before wearing the bodies of the Sang themselves to channel said miracles second-hand like.
What makes ‘em different also be why the Guilds still breed them; keep ‘em around. No other way to make Thaumic Cyclers. Don’t know any other beings that can loop their own chronobiology…
-Quail Tavers, New Vultun Sunrise
5-3
In the Fox’s Den
The blood architecture within Green River was a façade of chaos.
In her palm, the tea swirled. In her body, three different hearts guided an intricate system of arteries and veins, the biology between the woman and the fox interlinked, organs fusing together in a melding clash. Yet, only a single accretion of thoughtstuff rippled, belonging to the Sang resting gracefully in her seat.
“Does the rhythm inspire a hunger in you, Moonblood?” Green River asked, a placid smile adorning her face. No mockery clung to her words, only genuine curiosity, unchained by fear. But past the woman, the fox was staring at him too, and in its eyes, he saw the languorous gaze of a predator watching for weakness.
“Always hungry,” Avo said. “Good at ignoring it.”
Draus tilted her head in a low nod. “He ain’t lyin’.”
Green River chuckled. Her grafted fox squealed, its notes mirthful and sharp. “Be my very words so accusatory? I only tease.” The fox bit at Avo, ever-playfully. “But first, before more words, a drink.” With practiced ease, the Sang cupped the tea in both hands and brought it to her lips, blowing. “To your health.”
Now she sounded like she was mocking him. An intrusive fantasy of tearing the top half of the vulpine’s jaw off and beating Green River to death with her own graft appeared. He did his best to hide the gnashing of his teeth.
Reaching down, the Regular plucked a bone-carved cup filled with a yellowish fluid. A petal of folded tea leaves drifted, their shape a Sang character that he couldn’t recognize. Their light floral scent suffused itself into the steaming water and tickled against Avo’s olfactory senses.
“Black Jasmine?” he asked.
The fox perked up in surprise, and its human half frowned. “Quite so.”
He grunted. Walton preferred the common-soil flavor. If that was the accurate translation. Just another thing he didn’t get to ask before his father passed.
“Listen, River,” Draus said, doing her best to barrel through the layers of ceremony, “not that I don’t wanna speak with you, but we got something we have to–”
“Your rooms are being prepared. The supplies you requested have been stocked. Your prisoners are being chained. And your… associate is already on her way.” Green River smiled. “I understand your haste to greet your task. I have been there. So, I implore that you understand when I say there is not the need. All there is to do for now is wait. Relax. That is your role as a guest. Leave the rest to me, in my role as host, and master of this abode, to ensure the slave work is done thoroughly. That is why you came to me, is it not? Sold me the golem.”
Draus eyed her flatly. “It’s also my role to ensure that things are done proper. You’ve been where I am? You should know that too. Courtesy’s courtesy. But that only burns so long before you run out of wick.”
Green River drew in a breath and held it. Carefully, she tugged at the leathery collar of her green and white gown of pearlescent shine. A Qipao. Or at least that was how Avo remembered it being pronounced.
“I respect…” Green River began, “... candor. And I will honor your candor with some directness of my own.” The fox flicked its gaze at Avo, all playfulness lost, its expression growing focused, body perching on the woman’s shoulder. “Your survival. How did it occur? The stream grew thin at the end when that fool-child disrupted her own event. But I saw enough. I saw two refugees, a ghoul, and a Regular long stripped of rank and resources flee from a golem. A Sangeist. Tell me… how did you survive?”
Draus shared a look with Avo, their joined expression both empty, bereft of expression. He considered linking with her using his Whisper, but seeing the interlacing rings protecting Green River’s mind, he doubted she was ignorant to be fooled by the obvious.
“Did more runnin’ than fightin’ then,” Draus said. “Made it to the platform up. Tried to leave it behind….”
Green River pressed. “But how did you leave it undone?”
Draus sighed. “River, you’re askin’ an awful lot of questions.”
“Am I,” Green River said, feigning surprise. “Pardons. But seeing as I, as senior of the line, have a responsibility to ensure that my juniors survive long enough to at least greet their first cycle… I hope you do not take offense to my pedantry.”.
Between Draus’ visible annoyance and Green River’s continuous attempts to pry at what happened, Avo took to wielding the same lie against her that he used against Mirrorhead.
“It was locus,” Avo said. Suddenly, the fox snapped back to him as Green River halted, her attention thrown off from Draus. “Someone breached the golem’s locus. Made it malfunction. Broke it.”
“Someone?” Green River asked, gesticulating slowly as if trying to haul more information free from Avo.
It didn’t work.
“Someone.” He kept to his vagueness, seeing ignorance as a better place to make his stand than an outright falsehood or quickly-woven tale. “Would tell you if I know. Curious myself.”
Casually, Green River took another sip from her tea and nodded. “That is interesting. But what fascinates me more is the fact that I heard the golem was bare. Just… dead metal. Empty. Deprived of its Heaven. Such a thing cannot just go missing. Why, it requires a team of Agnoses with a steady stream of willing sacrifices to arm, and twice as many to dismantle. Yet, my sparrow only sang of three that lasted against the golem. So, unless the child amongst you was an Agnos of no uncertain skill...”
“Really, River? Using the dead as a tool already?” Draus asked.
A cringe ran through Green River; a twitch of shame at the faux pas she committed. A certain excitement had spurred the Sang to accelerate beyond the bounds of social acceptability, into vulgarly invoking moribundity and using the death of a child as an instrument to get at a much-suspected truth.
For a passing moment, Green River fell silent, her warring expression riding the edge between continuation and apology. She committed to staying in the middle. “To honor the honesty you have granted me thus far, I will like to compensate truth for truth. Perhaps it will be of interest to you.”
Draus sighed, rubbing her face, eager to be done with this conversation. “Fine. Let’s have it.”
“I have been in contact with one of my seniors—a Hundred-Eighter, operating out of the Undercroft. She claimed that the Upper Tiers are in an uproar. That the Paladins and Guilds are joined in cooperation, for once, tearing entire blocks apart in search of something.”
A beat of silence followed. Green River seemed content to let the room hang on the tension. Perhaps it was her method of vengeance against their obliqueness, matching them with deprived answers of her own.
“They, uh, say what this somethin’ was?” Draus asked.
Green River drew in close while her fox draped itself across her shoulders, nose snuggled between its paws, blinking demurely. “A Liminal Frame.”
Externally, Avo sampled his tea in silence. Internally, he had to use his Heaven to stop his claws from crushing the delicate cup to dust. Liminal Frame. What did she know? Was she taunting him? Or just striking the waters, trying to see who or what scattered beneath the flow?
Draus lip thinned. “Shit. Guilds must be must tricklin’ boiling piss at that. Theft? A raid? Fallwalkers looking to jump up a sphere without tradin’ in?”
A sour note of contemplation washed through Green River. “Alas, I cannot say. Further communiqué with my senior was silenced by the sheer density of scrubbers released by Guild-sanctioned redacters. A veil of censorship has taken full effect. But–” Avo nearly growled. She was making a habit of that. Dangling just enough bait to see if she could hook them like a fish. “–before her silence, she breathed a final rumor.”
Avo spoke this time, the annoyance in his voice naked. “What. Rumor.”
A coquettish smile teased its presence at the corners of Green River’s lips. “That this was not just any Frame. But a prototype. One with the capabilities of an in-built metaphysical factory. Capable of active growth. Unneeding an Agnos to help make changes or adjustments. Something meant to be made pattern-standard for the Authorities of Highflame.”
META-FAC FUNCTIONALITY AT 100%
Avo was glad he couldn’t pale as a human could, for, at that moment, his face would’ve run whiter than bone. Her intel was too accurate to be mere rumors, and she was circling too tightly around them to be “beating the grass and expelling snakes.”
If that was how the Sang proverb went. Staying here spiked all manner of rising alarms inside Avo. They couldn’t stay. He doubted that she suspected he had the Liminal Frame burned into him, but she clearly knew enough that she thought he or Draus was closer to the matter.
And judging from the frown hanging from the Regular’s face, he guessed she was thinking the same thing.
Again, silence put its weight down on the room, its mass growing from the weight class of uncomfortable into the territory of light suffocation.
There, in that narrow lantern-lighted room lined with tapestries of monochrome paintings from when the Sang still suffered under dynastic lines of warring dragons, two people and a ghoul found more fascination in the dancing of their tea leaves than with each other.
A knock on the door burst the bubble of silence and slew the spell.
Green River whipped out a ghost. a phantasmal chain leaped free from her and plunged into micro-locus hidden in the corner of the room, running out in an etheric lattice that served as a secondary nervous system for the living matter that formed the basis of the Second Fortune’s foundations.
With a wave, the door clicked, and like the releasing legs of a lobster, it half-unclasped itself from the wall, swinging open.
A younger Sang–her features looking almost identical to Green River’s–stepped in. Body festooned in the membranous tendrils of a nu-cephalopod-themed bio-rig, she swept her arms in a ritualistic flourish and spoke, eyes facing the ground, never meeting her senior.
“Third daughter, requesting permission to speak.”
“Third daughter, granted permission. Please speak.”
The most traditionalist of the No-Dragons and those associated played games such as this. Games. Because that’s what they were. Walton had ensured he knew enough about the cultures of each of the eight major colors that he knew deliberate deception when it was being portrayed.
Ultimately, the Sang were nowhere near as obtuse or rigid as they pretended to be with outsiders. He gave it good odds that this was planned–even rehearsed.
Whoever Green River was, she did not hold a senior enough position in the eternal cycles of the Sang. This ceremony was aped from the habits of one far older than she.
“The rooms of our exalted guests have been prepared, along with all other requested facilities. Furthermore, the third party has arrived and is waiting to greet them in their chamber. No difficulties have transpired in the meantime. We beg of our leave.”
“Most excellent. Leave granted.”
Backing away without turning, the third sister bowed upon reaching the door and disappeared upon its shutting.
A low sigh slipped free from Green River, uttered by both woman and fox. “I shall release you thusly. I beg your pardon for twisting pleasant conversation into seeming interrogation.”
“Nah, we’re all curious sometimes,” Draus said, brushing past things but sounding unconvinced. “Already water under the bridge.”
Green River smiled, her expression genuine. “Splendid. Well. I suppose I shan’t keep you longer. You both look… tired. Tense. You should enjoy my facilities while you are here. We have a most excellent gambling arcade, and there are local circuits to enjoy. Chess too, if your battleground is more of strategy than savagery.” She spoke the last words eyeing Avo.
He met her gaze then without issue.
“I don’t doubt that you do,” Draus said. “But as you said… tired. May we request permission to leave?”
Green River laughed, her voice a lyrical bell chiming in the wind. “You may. It has been a most insightful conversation, despite what little has been said.”
“Yeah,” Draus said, rising from her seat and rolling her shoulder. “Come on, Avo. We got some ‘sleep’ to catch up on.”
Looked like he was going to be diving again soon. Finally. More time to fix his sequences. Improve his phantasmics. Rising, they made for the door to leave, the path opening automatically as the living door sensed their encroaching footsteps.
“Oh,” Green River said, “one final thing–two, actually.”
Draus halted and turned. Avo just twisted his head.
“Should you desire to… participate in sport for the circuits, know that the doors are open to you. Both of you. And, mayhaps this might be more interesting to the Moonblood, but we have a most excellent in-house grafter as well. One with personal experience working on… your ilk. Perhaps it will do you well to see her. Improve upon strengths and fill lacking attributes.”
Wordlessly, Avo grunted. She wasn’t wrong. That did feel interesting. It also felt like a perfect opportunity for them to implant him with a specially engineered virus. He left the room ahead of Draus, deliberately planting a foot on the bar-crossing below.
Behind him, he heard Draus huff a low laugh. “Just had to be a shit at the end, didn’t you.”
“Need to leave. Playing games with us. Testing us. Place is her den. Unwise to stay here.”
Draus hummed. “Would agree, but these are the Warrens, consang. Don’t got no other place to stay less you wanna do some gutter divin’. And she owes me enough to be good for it.”
Avo nearly hissed with annoyance. “Honor? That’s your justification?”
“Justification is that we signed a contract, marking us as sworn-bound. She’ll catch the bleeds n’ die before she can betray us proper-like.” Oh. That changed things. “But you’s right. They onto us. Lookin’ close and seeing what they can get.”
“Think she’s No-Dragon?” Avo asked.
Draus laughed. “Her. No. Too young. Too soft.” Her expression then flattened. “But if she finds proof for what’s she suspectin’, I reckon that’s gonna go up the chain internally. Good thing is that she won’t sell us out to any ‘outsiders.’ Bad thing is that she might just be angling to become a proper No-Dragon.”
Part of Avo was disquieted at Draus openly speaking the words as a junior Sang came to greet them, to take them to their residences. But looking around, there was little hidden from obvious suspicions.
The walls here were alive, after all. And they were listening. They were always listening.
The Agnos are not theologians. Nor are they worshippers of the old faith–though some among their number most certainly wished they were, and could be.
Instead, they are engineers of metaphysics. Those who know the structures of metaphysical philosophy and scripture so well that they know what parts of each canon can be tweaked, and what must remain for a god to be anchored to their Domains.
Under their guidance, the offered–those sacrificed and sent in to fix a Heaven or Liminal Frame–for the only method of access to the absolute by creatures of mortal design is to die–maintain the power of the city and help the Guilds keep their hard-fought peace…
-[REDACTED], “Trials of Agnosis”
5-4
The Agnos
One of the junior Sang had led them toward their “abode,” slithering instead of walking for her body was joined with that of a twelve-foot serpent spliced with the fur and muscles of a hound. Between kitchens with walls lined with chimeric wombs delivering wailing creatures biosculpted to taste both novel and delectable, Avo and Draus followed, their presence shrouded from the “proper” clientele, guided toward the employee elevator.
At once, the structure reeked of iron and bone, a corralled enclosure shrouded by a layer of muscle and tissue, pulsing with each moment. It struck Avo then that he was looking upon something analogous to a heart–that there was an active force lancing through the entirety of the shaft.
He could sense the surging, pressurized liquids propelling the elevator up and down.
Blood. His primary throne of power. One that ensured his victory against the Scalpers even when paired with his lacking skill. And now, all around him, he could feel a building mass automatically gravitating toward him, like he was singularity on the cusp of emergence.
All he needed to do should he wish to collapse this place was plunge a tendril into the walls, and tug.
Then, by Heaven and Rend, he would cast this place into ruination.
Stepping into the elevator, a shiver of pleasure ran up his spine at the thought. The urge teased his mind and incensed the beast. Through the entirety of the establishment, he counted hundreds of accretions scintillating with thought, moving like a dance of constellations. How many could he claim in thaum and ghosts? How many could nourish his strength and–
“You doin’ alright there?” Draus asked, her voice thin, the intent behind her words cutting at him.
Split free from his building bloodlust, Avo blinked. “Yeah.”
The Regular nodded. “Good. Keep it that way, if you can.”
Slowly, the Sang turned to fix Avo with a wary glance. He glared back at her, trying not to imagine what it would be like to strip her of flesh from the inside out and how nicely she would suit him as a mangled coat.
She drew away, lip-twitching, and turned to Draus. “Does it always reek of murderous intent?”
“Does the sun always shine?” Avo asked, tired of being ignored. Draus wasn’t his owner. Mirorrhead wasn’t his owner. He had no owners, and now that he was a Godclad, he would greet death eternal before he went back to being someone else’s pet.
The Sang flinched at the harshness of his words; a child not expecting such a stern reprimand, especially from a creature considered barely more sophisticated than a nu-dog.
Draus chuckled. “Word of advice, girl: Don’t make no assumptions ‘bout folk in their presence. It’s rude. It’s impolite. And it’ll get you snuffed.”
“I–yes, apologies,” the junior said.
“Not to me,” Draus said, flicking her head at Avo. “To him. And I’m not kiddin’. You was rude. I don’t like rude no more than he does, you gettin’ my sync?”
Again, the Sang turned, her mouth opening, eyes narrowed at the absurdity of what she was about to do. “I… beg your forgiveness and understanding, esteemed ghoul.”
Esteemed. Avo chuffed a low laugh. How fascinating the way someone quailed when pressed with the weight of superior force. How easy it must’ve been to spend life coddled in such a way.
A sudden silence intruded into his mind, preluding the spark of an epiphany. Was this how Mirrorhead knew life? The Guilds? A world that bent to them–always bent to them? How warped would he be if such privilege was all he knew instead of bloodlust? Instead of hunger?
“All chained to our design,” Avo said, trying to fuse the matter of his words with his fleeting thoughts.
Draus fixed him with a look. “What’s that?”
“Understanding,” Avo said. “I think.”
She didn’t press him further. And for that, Avo was thankful.
At the top floor of the Second Fortune, the atmosphere was infused with a muted serenity set by the ambiance of waters flowing down from canals of bone along the walls, while the air was suffused with flavored incense, sweet and crisp.
Their room, was far down the corner, in the southern section of the building. Past walls of hardened bone inlaid with jewels and jade depicting grand battles from the depths of the sea to the cold of the void, they finally reached their destination.
Room of the Crane. 88.
The junior looked up at the number and giggled a soft, pitying note. “My senior sister seems to think that you need luck.”
“Wouldn’t begrudge some right about now,” Draus said. She looked at the large enamel-coated doors and scoffed. A spiral-like slot glinted at its center while two paintings of ornately dressed individuals with their faces painted shivered upon the doors. “Key.”
The Sang plugged what looked to be a cylindrical shell into the slot. With a click, the creature within the shell chittered to life as it spun, sliding the door open with a twist. The wind whistled out from between the doors as they cracked open.
The hab-cell Draus procured from Green River was a thing of biomechanical luxury. Well, as much luxury as the Warrens could provide, anyhow.
Plush couches lined with soft pillows occupied a far wall. A cheap floating locus hovered in the corner, the heart of an entertainment station with a pre-interfaced holovision projector. Twin beds with lung-like mattresses and a warm pocket of velvety skin serving as covers greeted Avo’s gaze.
He wanted to eat the bed more than he wanted to sleep on it, but still, he appreciated the sentiment.
Walking in, he sensed movement above and found that the ceiling was transparent, allowing him to gaze up into an aortal aquarium, the fishes inside specially biosculpted toward the aesthetic, poems writ with bioluminescence lining their bodies.
“Do you find your furnishings satisfactory?” the junior asked.
Draus nodded. “It’ll do. You send Green River my thanks, and, uh–” A stream of sparkling motes surged out from an opening between Draus’ thoughtstuff, flooding into the junior’s mind. The Sang blinked, slithering backward in surprise.
“I–you over-gift, this… this is too much–”
“Shut up. Take the imps. And when your sisters bring up the ‘third party,’ you make sure she comes straight here, you understand? No lookin’ around. No lettin’ her get lost. You got my confidence, I trust you won’t lose it, right?”
The junior nodded, her expression taking on a dutiful understanding. “Your words. My will. It will not be long.”
“Enthused to hear it. Close the door for us when you leave. Thanks.”
Doing as Draus requested, the junior nodded, shutting the door behind her, but not before leaving the shell key on a nearby table. Inside, Avo walked around the corner and found himself staring at a bio-organic bath stall with a waste disposal slot built into a protrusion along the walls, which were implanted with clay tiles.
The best thing about the place was the distinct lack of mirrors. Not so many reflections at all, come to think of it. But Avo suspected that might’ve been more a thing of deliberate design rather than happenstance.
Green River knew much. Too much. Doubtless, she knew of Mirrorhead’s capabilities as well.
“In a couple of minutes, we’re gonna do a three-way link,” Draus said, her bio-rig unlatching from her. Stepping out of the insectoid exoskeleton, she strode over to the door and planted a small device along its frame. Walking back over, she chucked him four of the coldtech devices as well, their shapes small, with two piercing teeth and a low-light laser that Avo could barely perceive. “For now… you’re tall. Line the corners of the ceiling. Set up the perimeter.”
He did so, though he knew little of how her devices worked. Still, she was the Regular, possessed of experience most needed in their present situation. With that in mind, he once again found himself missing his Ghostjack phantasmic. With its editing properties, he could have made a patrol from his ghosts.
For now, he settled on launching his Whisper high and sweeping his perception through the walls in a slow spin.
Almost immediately, he caught a glint from three moving minds slowly rounding the corner, approaching.
“Draus,” Avo said.
“Ahead of you,” she replied, pulling a square-shaped mechanism from her rig and tossing it in the corner. “Don’t touch that.”
“Don’t want to.”
“Smart ghoul.”
As the three splashes of thoughtstuff drew close, one stood out in particular. It was a fractured thing, clamped in place by wards both internal and external. The damage, even from a glance, made Avo curious. It was as if someone had plunged a thought-shiv or an explosive trauma into a mind and then immediately set about fusing what was broken back together.
That, to Avo, marked a sign that a master Necrojack had inflicted this harm. Or several. For the damage to be this immense, for so many sections of memories to be severed, yet for the mind to be rejoined, it could only mean that whoever delivered the hurt knew what to damage, and what to keep.
This was beyond Avo’s present skill. It would take someone like Walton.
Or an Ori-Thaum Incubi.
“Draus,” Avo asked, voice low, “Your third party friend. She ever anger Ori-Thaum?”
The Regular froze, her motion slain mid-stride. “The fuck? How’d you–”
“The damage. Too severe. Takes a real Jack to fix.”
Her expression of surprise, rarely seen and wrought with astonishment, pleased him. She was a good practitioner of her discipline, but he had one all his own.
“Close your mouth,” Avo said, “they’re at the door.”
Draus’ eyes lingered on him a moment longer as she walked over to the door. Before she got there, a series of three knocks sounded. The voice of the junior sounded. “Mistress Draus, your guest, delivered with haste and concern, as per your request.”
Avo pushed his whisper through to get a closer look. Just three. The junior; the third party; an augmented nu-dog carrying an alloy shotgun–the same kind Avo used in the Crucible. Opening a narrow crack, Draus muttered her thanks and let the newcomer in.
The third party was a mouselike woman, dwarfed both in height and musculature by Draus. Cybernetics ribbed the right side of her skull, an exo-cortex. No doubt then that this augment was to make up for the damage she suffered to her visual memory capacity. External storage to bulwark against metaphysically inflicted wounds of cognition. She was dressed in a red polymer synthcoat, and a thin translucent veil ran along the right side of her face in the fashion of the Ori, hiding her clan mark from outsiders.
Fright bled off her every movement and tension lined her sweeping gaze. Her thoughtstuff fared no better, splashing and spiking with each new sensation that greeted her.
And when she laid eyes on Avo, her breath hitched and she reached out to grab for Draus.
The act was so childlike and helpless that he had to fight his instinctive predator response to maul and kill her.
Draus closed the door. The stranger began to hyperventilate.
“Dr-Draus,” she squeaked. “G-g-ghoul!”
Draus shot Avo a look and grinned. “What? Him? Aw, Kae, you don’t need to worry yourself none ‘bout Avo here. He… shit, he bites plenty, but I don’t think you’re part of his diet.”
Kae quivered, shuffling back a few steps to stand behind Draus. The Regular rolled her eyes and made the introductions. “Avo. Kae Kusanade. Agnos. Well, former Agnos. Kae, Avo. He’s a… he’s somethin’ different.”
Belief didn’t touch the shine in Kae’s eyes when she nodded. “I-I see.”
“Alright,” Draus said. “Reckon we should link up. Get this meetin’ started.” With a wave of her hand, she activated the mechanism she threw down earlier. A stack of three autoguns extended, each tracking something beyond the walls via vibrations.
With the perimeter covered, Avo drew his Whisper back in and held it forward. Draus connected to him first, her peripheral thoughtstuff pouring into his. Kae, terrified and slow to follow, offered her broken mind only after Draus did. Immediately, Avo could taste the metallic coldness where the machine simulated thought for her.
GHOST-LINK ESTABLISHED
CLOSED CHAIN FORMED: [3]
+Y’all hear me fine?+ Draus asked, walking over to sit down on the bed. The lung mattress began pumping hard, gathering more air to comfort her mass.
+Y-yes,+ Kae nodded frantically, arms wrapped around herself. Awkwardly, she inched past Avo and went to Draus. He stayed standing. Preferred it that way.
+Alright,+ Draus said. +Avo. Kae here’s someone I trust. With my life. Now, in a moment, she’s gonna take a look at your Frame. But that might need you…+
+I-I might need you to be dead,+ Kae’s thoughts surged out, hammering into them. Draus closed her eyes, a twitch of discomfort running through her. Avo, more obviously, hissed in pain. +S-s-sorry.+
+S’fine,+ Draus said. +Just… keep countin’. Like I taught you.+
Kae nodded. +Okay. Okay.+ She ran her fingers past her weary eyes, grabbing at her stray tufts of hair. Between her index finger and thumb did she grind the strands, her lips chanting counts as she tried to catalog each one, fibril by fibril. +Alright–okay. A look! Let’s—let’s take a look.+ She turned to Avo and swallowed. +Gonna need you to die soon–if that’s okay.+
Well, that was the first time someone politely requested his demise. In a strange way, he found it endearing. As much as a ghoul could find anything endearing; his desire to kill her waned ever so slightly.
+He’s fine with it,+ Draus said, speaking on his behalf. +Done it plenty by now. Should be more than used to it.+
He slashed his eyes over at her, the strength of his glare made twice so by raw incredulity. +More than used to it…+
A thought equivalent to a derisive snort rippled from out of her mind. +Aw. Sorry. Did I assume too much? Well, Kae, seein’ as the ghoul here feels mighty bad about dyin’ and don’t wanna see what’s burning under his hood–+
+Fine,+ Avo growled, his thoughtstuff crackling. +Do I need to do it myself?+
Kae shook her head and pulled a syringe from her coat. +Manticore. K-kills the p-physical mind in seconds. A-and then I’ll follow you in a moment.+
+Follow me? How? You going to die too?+
+N-no. Going to–going to use a False-Hev.+
Avo blinked.
+A False-Heaven. H-Have it b-bound to me.+
He kept staring.
+I–it’s like a shared lobby.+ She held out the needle, the tip near vibrating in her unsteady hands. +Can–can you please c-come over? We do it on the b-bed.+
Avo grunted. Well, since he was so keen on collecting ways to die, what was one more? +Give it over. I inject. Your hands. They shake too much.+
Looking down at her hand, she nodded. +Yeah–yeah. G-good idea.+
Death is the only bridge between man and god. Of course, it is. What else can a mortal do that’s more absolute than death; more total?
The gods… I would never have called them omnipotent. Such a term would be absurd–moreover if one’s power has no borders how are they to define the differences between themselves?
But the gods are absolute. From greatest to the smallest. Parasitic to the broader tapestry of existence, but still—absolute. Each holds a specific aspect of a Domain—no matter how small. It is in carving these little grooves–these niches of absolute sovereignty–that god can hold shape in reality, can influence the world.
But then again, it might just be because they didn’t want a rival god of the same Domain to eat them. After all, how should reality delineate between two gods that can “weave fire from the air.”
It’s too vague. Again. Borders. A Heaven only has as much shape as its clarity allows…
-High Agnos Ossam Hariruda, “On the Eldritch”
5-5
Immortal Architecture (I)
+When do I start dying?+ Avo asked, his attention fixed on two schools of squirming fish clashing in the overhead aquarium. Beneath him, the lung bed breathed while its skin folds struggled to find the right temperature for his body. Within his body, he briefly considered surging the manticore toxin through his system until he realized that would inflict him with a debt of Rend.
Something he probably should avoid.
Through the sculpted arteries lining the insides of the Second Fortune, the haemo-aquatic lifeforms made war on each other constantly, their patterns of slaughter, feeding, birth, and death all a chaotic orchestra, yet never overwhelming. There was always enough fish to fuel the slaughter. Always more emerging from the suppurating womb canals that dotted the ceiling.
Seated demurely on the other bed, Kae, Draus’ Agnos, swallowed. She studied him wordlessly as her left index and middle fingers beat a steady rhythm, trying to wrestle calmness into her heart, the unruly organ shoving blood through her system in uncontrolled staccatos.
+I-it take-take much longer than… uh… Not much longer.+
Avo let out a low breath and tried to think of anything but brutalizing the waifish woman not eight feet away from him and plucking each rib of her exo-cortex out from her skull. The murderous desire grew with each inhalation, the scent of her chrome working up through his nostrils like a whetstone.
+Don’t know why you can’t do it.+ Avo said.
+Told ya,+ Draus replied, sounding annoyed, +We gotta do this real subtle-like. Don’t need Green River learnin’ anything more ‘bout you than we need. That you…+ A wave of self-inflicted delusion crashed over her surface thoughts. Avo knew the flavor well. +The Liminal Frame she mentioned. It don’t necessarily–+
+Yes. It is.+ Avo said. +I have it inside me. Have a Meta-Fac. Only reason I probably survived the Scalpers earlier.+
The Regular was busy assembling some kind of microdrone. It looked to be a drone the size and shape of a nu-bird. Canary or a sparrow perhaps. Avo’s knowledge of nu-ornithology was only slightly north of none. The diminutive machine held no weapons but possessed a bulb-like camera on its underside. Scouting implement. Like his Whisper. Always useful.
Outside, her facial demeanor was one of pure focus. Inside, her thoughtstuff tensed, drawing together as if anticipating a ward breach.
+I ain’t gonna lie, Avo.+ Draus said. +We’re in a world of shit.+
We, Avo wanted to ask her using his ghost. Except his words grew slippery, while his thoughts dissipated like smoke. He blinked. He forgot why he blinked. He wanted to move his arms, but lead seemed to line his muscles and veins. He made a noise then, a sloppy gurgle as his tongue slipped free out from the corner of his mouth. It looked akin to a dead serpent hanging from a ledge in his periphery.
Spots formed in his vision embers singing through old rolls of film. Dappled blankets of spreading blindness formed like snowflakes over his perception, each epicenter flattening out to join the others. The last thing that greeted him was Kae, her face rapt with curiosity, more student greeting specimen than broken Agnos quailing away from a ghoul.
A single shining tear was sliding down the corner of her right cheek. Strange, how it shone…
+W-wow. Took three minutes t-to achieve pa-paralysis. It–he m-must particularly resilient, even for a ghoul.+ Through the narrowing tunnel that was his mind, a final dollop of thought dripped. +Un-unless he has s-something that is actively-actively tuning his s-synapses…+
And then, for the briefest of moments, actual nothingness. It was like true slumber. It was silence. It was bliss.
And from his muted paradise, Avo fell, his consciousness tearing through the thinness of mortality down into the eldritch resplendence of his Soul. It was brighter than he remembered. Wider.
INITIALIZING RESURRECTION - 1%
SIMULATING LIMINAL FRAME
And floating across the crimson sheen that was his Sangeist, a new presence greeted his descent, the sound of howling winds rising, beckoned by his arrival to the clapping of thunderous hooves.
Like an arrowhead cast into a pool, he felt his consciousness plunge into his Heaven, the blood pulling upon him, embracing him. As the inner confines of his ontological vessel manifested with another ripple of radiance cast from his Soul’s ever-turning flame, the winds around were alive with motion.
Across from him, gripped in a thin sheen of translucence was the Galeslither, its presence forming and fading with paltry sups of secondhand light spilling loose from within the Heaven of Blood Avo had grafted unto himself. The separation between his Heavens lay in a place beyond his understanding.
Fortunately, this time, another presence descended. It was the shine of a falling teardrop of crystalline, its bright drinking from his.
INITIALIZING RESURRECTION - 7%
Like a division line, the comet trailed between his current Heaven and the Galeslither, a partition; a sage sent from on high. It was then that Avo realized what looked to be a comet was no comet at all, but a dais–an altar formed from tessellated matter, celestial and ineffable in its patterns.
And as the platform descended to a hover, its empyrean-bright archway greeted him, its position to him so close that its curves looked like the doors to a stable, with the Galeslither's three heads swaying dormant, existing only instants between brushstrokes of wind.
Atop the dais, then, came the form of the Agnos, Kae. It grew obvious to Avo why it descended as a teardrop. The entirety of this platform–this False-Heaven–was streaming out from her right eye in streams coruscating and pellucid. Her tears parting, the structure of her vehicle bent and fused above, around, and beneath her. An altar shone in front of her speck-like figure, the shape and size of her being dwarfed by his Sangeist.
It was the difference between a hawk and a gnat.
“Avo?” Kae asked, her voice surprisingly stable here, her tone fluent. “Can you sense me?”
“Yes,” He said. Across his Heaven, the blood rippled, and the twin patterns that burned atop him shone down on the Agnos like a glowering spotlight. Here though, she quivered not before him. It was a contrary thing, how frail she was in reality compared to this… self-actualization of her being, come to greet him.
Stepping forth, a trail of tears descended from her cheeks and formed steps away from the dais. Her skin was like marble then, cast in the glow of an ethereal shine. With a frown on her face, studied him, her expression that of an artist critiquing a piece of work. “That’s not right… Not right at all. A standard Sangeist doesn’t have that…”
“Doesn’t have what?”
“Shh,” she said, “I’m focusing. Focusing, yes, yes, that’s native. The mouth at the center–the second pattern… New. Both new.”
INITIALIZING RESURRECTION - 12%
Her face scrunched in annoyance. “Slow your resurrection.”
“How?”
She shot him a strange look. “By accessing–oh, right. You’ve never been to an academy. No. No, you’re a ghoul.” A sudden look of shock seized her. “Oh… Oh, Jaus. A ghoul with a Liminal Fr–”
He cut her off before that became a thing again. He was growing weary of these reactions. “Kae. Focus. Tell me what to do. No more shock. No sudden epiphany. Master yourself. Teach me to use the Frame.”
She blinked, and drew in… It wasn’t exactly a breath, for there wasn’t actually real air here. Suppose she solidified her resolve, then. “Right. You have a list of commands. Commands, yes. Um–dive further into yourself.”
“What?”
“Just… do it. Try sinking deeper into the… the fires. The meta-root access should still be the same from your Frame.” She looked around. “Should be… I… it’s been a few years, a few-a few. The design… it’s a bit different.”
Noting her apprehension, Avo tried descending further, dropping the center of his consciousness through the enwreathing flames before it could clasp over him. Immediately, he greeted a threshold, and, with another press, snapped down and slid deeper into himself.
Suddenly, his Heavens, Kae, and even the simulated expanse of metaphysical reality within him disappeared. In its place, what greeted him was raw information, conjoining with his mind.
[STILLBORN] - DEVOURER-CLASS LIMINAL FRAME
STATUS: IMBUED
SUBJECT: [CLASSIFIED]
LAST INSTANCE OF ONTOLOGICAL REVERSION: 2 MIN AGO
HEALTH: OPTIMAL
PRIOR REVERSIONS AVAILABLE - 31231231 INSTANCES
REVERT?
RESURRECTION IN PROCESS…
20 CYCLE-RESURRECTION PACE (STAND.)
ADJUST CYCLE?
MAX/MIN
MAX
RESURRECTION RESET
100 CYCLE-RESURRECTION PACE
ESTIMATED FRAME PERIOD FOR RESURRECTION: 12 HOURS
ESTIMATED REAL PERIOD FOR RESURRECTION: 12 MIN–
With a strained thought, Avo tore himself free from the root functions of his Liminal Frame. It was too much, like swimming against a current while drowning. He couldn’t tell where he began and the Frame ended–if there was a beginning and end.
Nestled back in the Sangeist, back before Kae, she was still finishing the last sentence that she was speaking upon his descent. A beat of silence ran between him as Avo strangled the whirlwind of command lines and mem-data flooding through him.
It was like running ghosts direct into his base mind instead of using a Meta.
INITIALIZING RESURRECTION - 13%
“Did you do it?” Kae asked. “Maximize your resurrection period?”
“Think so.”
“Good. There’s… there’s a lot to go over–but before we begin, I need to know something.” She pointed at his Sangeist. “Was your Heaven this way when you first had it grafted?”
He considered his answer. Instinctively, he wanted to lie to her. Only Necrojack habits. You didn’t let a rival see your sequence, it exposed your methods; leaving you susceptible to a counter. But right now, he wasn’t a Necrojack. He was Godclad. One who didn’t know what he was doing, and she was a broken Agnos specifically requested by Draus. If he couldn’t even work with her, then he was well and truly out of options.
“No. Made changes.”
Her reaching hand clenched into a fist as she looked up. “I–I knew, I just knew. But… when? Which Agnos worked on you? And using what methods? Your radiance… the splashing… the storage of an unused Heaven… this should all only be theoretical. Experimental thauamturgy.”
“Experimental might be right,” Avo said. “No Agnos. Except you. You’re the first.”
Kae froze. From her right eye, the shine of her False Heaven flared. Streams of silvery tears slashed over him as she peered into his ontology.
“What are you doing?” Avo asked.
“False-Heavens… used to be called Oracles. The thing that gods would gift us. Mortals. Usually took an eye. Gave a piece of anomalous glass or marble. Let them gaze through the ancients they chose. But… but we learned how to turn it around. Learned how to use it to peer back through them.”
Between the flowing strands of shimmering pale flooding from the pinprick that was her right eye and the twin burning symbols boring down from the jaw-like spire of his Sangeist, it looked like they were cleaving at each other with blades of clashing light.
“Avo. I–I need you to bring up the specs for your Sangeist. And your First Circle.+
HEAVEN - [SANGEIST]
DOMAIN: (BLOOD/MATTER)
THAUMIC REQUIREMENTS - 40 thaum/c
HELL - [FIRST CIRCLE]
DOMAIN: (MATTER/ENTROPY)
THAUMIC REQUIREMENTS - 10 thaum/c
REND VENTS ONLINE
Her tears dripped in through the veil of his exterior, interfacing with the fires of his Soul. “Canons and hubris too, please.”
DOMAIN OF (MATTER)
CANON: ALCHEMIZATION - THE MASTER OF THIS DOMAIN CAN NOW SUBSUME AND MIMIC THE STRUCTURE AND EFFECTS OF ONE PIECE OF PHYSICAL MATTER; ONLY ONE PIECE OF MATTER MAY BE MIMICKED AT A TIME UNLESS THE CANON IS ALTERED
CANON: HAEMIFICATION - THE MASTER OF THIS DOMAIN CAN NOW SUBSUME SOLID MATTER INTO BLOOD; THE CONVERSION WILL ONLY PROCEED ON TACTILE CONTACT AND IF THE BLOOD SUBMERGES THE MATTER ENTIRELY
HUBRIS: ONLY SOLID MATTER CAN BE CONVERTED. ANY ATTEMPTS TO MIMIC/SUBSUME LIQUID OR GAS WILL RESULT IN THAUMIC BACKLASH (x2)
DOMAIN OF (BLOOD)
CANON: HAEMOKINESIS - THE MASTER OF THIS DOMAIN CAN NOW ACCELERATE AND MANIPULATE ALL BLOOD THEY ARE IN CONTACT WITH; SPEED AND FORCE OF THE BLOOD WILL MIRROR THE MASTER’S NATURAL LIMITS UNLESS THE CANON IS ALTERED
CANON: LINGER - THE MASTER OF THIS DOMAIN CAN NOW EJECT THE CONSTRUCTS THEY SHAPE FROM THEIR BLOOD; A BINDING PERCENT OF REND WILL BE GENERATED FOR EACH CONSTRUCT FABRICATED IN CORRESPONDENCE WITH THEIR SHAPE AND MASS
HUBRIS: ONLY UP TO EIGHTY TONS OF BLOOD CAN BE MANIPULATED AT ONCE (x2)
HELL - (FIRST CIRCLE)
CANON: THE BREATH OF THE WITHERED - THE MASTER OF THIS DOMAIN CAN NOW EXPEL THEIR TOTAL REND INTO AN ENTROPIC GUST OF WIND THAT CAUSES THE RAPID DESTABILIZATION OF MATTER; ALL PHYSICAL MATTER WILL BE AFFECTED ASIDE FROM THE MASTER - THIS CANON IS ABSOLUTE
DAEMON: EXPELLING EXCESS ENTROPY INTO A SINGLE POINT OF MATTER WILL BIRTH AN ANATHEMA OF RUIN TO SERVE AS THE MASTER’S ANATHEMA; THE ANATHEMA CANNOT BE SLAIN AND MUST BE STARVED
“Two extra canons?” She uttered. “Where did they–”
ATTENTION: (PROTOTYPE) META-FAC FUNCTIONS ACTIVATED
“My… my gods,” Kae whispered, disbelief stretching her eyes wide. From the roots of his Frame, the mem-data flowed up her tears and into her skull. “They… they couldn’t have. This… it’ll make the Agnostics useless.” A sudden understanding flashed across her face. “Make us obsolete. Thaumic cycler. Show me.”
THAUMIC CYCLER: 57 thaum/c
“Fifty-seven… Fifty-seven.” She was pacing before him, running her fingers and counting strands of hair again. “You’ve killed… fifty-seven people.”
“About. Draus got some. Took them afterward.” Come to think of it, why hadn’t that happened earlier with the pilot of the Galeslither?
Kae, interfaced with his being, drank in his thoughts. “It didn’t happen because in the… in the Crucible there’s…. No Sovereignty. No… no pre-marked Soul for delivery. When… when you kill on the surface, it’s been direct? You’ve made contact with their vessels using your Heaven?”
“Yes.”
Kae threw her head back and let out a squeaking laugh. “You… you’ve been stealing Essence from the Guilds. Echoes that belong to them.” Kae looked incredulous. “How… how did you even get this burned into you… It couldn’t–No, right, Draus said you couldn’t remember.”
That drove a spike of displeasure into Avo. Draus had given away too much. Revealed too much about him. Between Necrojacks, this would have been grounds for a nulling.
“But–but,” Kae said, her expression beaming, a new vigor alight behind her eyes. “This is new… it’s very new. But I can figure it out. Show you how it all works. You can… store Heavens. It… remembers Heavens. It doesn't just implant them. That’s… that’s why the fire ripples! It’s alive. Or… or simulating your thoughts. Like.. a… like a Metamind. It’s brilliant. Its design is fantastic. It’s…” She paused. “Let’s start with something simple. Open the Sangeist. Show me your bare Soul.”
Taken aback by the Agnos’ sudden explosion of passion, Avo did as she asked slowly, warily, wondering just how much more she knew compared to him. With a slight thought, he compelled the blood to open around his Sangeist as she peered in.
As she stood, bathed before his eldritch furnace that was his heart, Kae’s mouth opened slightly in wonderment.
“Your flame… it burns inwards… it's pouring down into you… It’s inverted. Soulfire shouldn’t be inverted….”
“Meaning?” Avo asked.
“It means that… I have a theory.” She turned then to stare at the dormant Galeslither hovering behind her, head tilting. A thoughtful expression took hold of her. “Perhaps, it is time for me to… impart upon you the basics of Agnosticism. And how our blessed Frames were meant to be used." She giggled again. "They... they can't excommunicate me again... again."
Do you know what I think curtailed the gods during their long reign over us?
Reactivity.
Worship
They were like... like Parasites! They fed from our deaths, and our deaths shaped them. It was like they deliberately shackled themselves to the design which we bestowed upon them to better feast from us; to better rule their corners of reality.
As they shaped us, so too were they shaped by eating us. Ha. It's... it's a bad diet! Ahem. Sorry. I... this isn't funny to anyone else but me. Oh, no Kae, you're apologizing to yourself now...
Anyway.
A common blood slave meant to be meat for the eldritch in years yonder had such parochial dreams compared to that which festers within the slavering bloodlust of us New Vultunites.
Do you think a slave dreamed of chrono-chain bombs and spatiokinetics? We did! And by fusing our dead gods, we made weapons that could squeeze excess time into ingots of matter from the shine of a star! We could build planar fortresses not bound by structure but by disjointed flows of space twinned to running streams of water!
I suppose in a strange way, the chains between us and the gods ran both ways...
Like... Chains from chains...
-Mem-log of Agnos Kae Kusanade, Musings
5-6
Immortal Architecture (II)
Learning from the mind-shattered Agnos reinforced Avo’s gratefulness for Walton’s tutelage. Where his father was concise and focused toward practical application, the Agnos was a leaking cauldron: filled with knowledge but leaking, and always trying to grasp at vaporous theories that had once been solid to her.
“...S-so. This. This place around us? It’s another reality…reality.” Kae strained momentarily, trying to keep her mind and words running on the same track. “But–but as you can tell, it’s–it’s not that large. Not compared to the totality…” She drifted again.
It already felt like she had been talking for days, but his resurrection was still stuck at twenty-one percent. The little Agnos liked to lecture. Avo strangled his annoyance. She was broken. Possibly more than that.
With how utterly ruined the outer shell of her mind looked, he wondered just how much lingering damage Ori-Thaum left festering within. It would not be beneath or beyond them to pour viruses into her memory chains, to eat away thoughts before they could manifest properly.
He wondered what she might've done to incur such a wretched fate.
“--The totality of existence!” she suddenly declared. She gestured toward his Soul again. “Yours… it’s different–different, yes, because it’s more… like… software and hardware–hardware?” She clutched at her head and gave a frustrated moan. “I–I used to be able to… tell people things–hold onto my words–memories… Took so much from me… Broke me–broke me for doing the right thing.”
He couldn’t tell if she was sobbing or just lamenting. Through her False Heaven, she had been crying this entire time so her anguish came masked. But her moment of self-pity did not linger. Sighing, he watched as something steeled inside of her. A thought perhaps. A new approach that she could try.
She clenched her fist as if trying to grasp his Soul. “Soul. It’s not an engine… It’s… everything. Simulation of another… a reality under a reality. But also something that can overwrite prime reality. Understand? The Soulfire burns to spread… swallow... usurp existence with… with your own reality… and then layer your Heavens over it. Hells too."
Avo halted her. "Wait. Summation. Soul is a subreality? One that can grow larger? One that can swallow parts of the... main?"
"The... the technical term is overriding," Kae said.
The simplicity of his words made her face contort with discomfort. Strangely, he knew the feeling; the bitter taste one gets when trying to convey the full magnitude and complexity of Necrotheurgy to someone of the laity.
Still, what he needed right now wasn't theory. It was understanding. The academics of thaumaturgy could come later. Right now, he needed to comprehend its design as a weapon.
"I suppose you can see it as that..." Kae said, sounding slightly disappointed that her earlier lecture has splashed against him, rather than filling him. “When... when the Soul over-overwrites, reality Ruptures–but your Heaven pulls it back inside. Inside. Then… then counter-miracle. Your Hell. The anti-Heaven. Inflicts opposite Rend. Inverse damage. Rend plugs Rend. Entropy leaves the system. Equilibrium is maintained. ”
And finally, a flash of clarity. Insight caught flame in the corners of his mind as he began to understand. A Liminal Frame was a metaphor for many things because it was many things. It was supposed to be a system unto itself, but still capable of spreading the fundamental laws that ran the confines of its enclosure over reality.
She spoke of this, then. The progress coming hard, but even drips could fill the bottom of a bucket.
The assembly of his form came in three major aspects. The Soul. The cycler. And his Nous--a construct she best described as the melding of his mind and willpower. Two things left dismantled from a person's being upon death after the Godsfall.
Once, Souls could not grant themselves ever-sustained succor. Hence the need for mass sacrifices and hyper-inflicted dogma. Like tyrants festering beneath your mind and flesh, the gods had taken to ravenous feasts to fuel their needs. Empires rose and fell at their whims, the history of this period a calculated slaughter in the great game between the eldritch lords.
Idheim was a slaughterhouse. The gods were butchers and feeders both. And humanity was the meat. Wasn't hard to see where the Guilds got their habits from.
Sometimes, your abusers can still inflict their power over you. Even long after their passing. So was Avo reminded by the constant burning violence that boiled through his every sinew while he was still clasped in his living flesh.
"You... your Heaven, then is like a... a living coat over... uh... an element. Or concept." Kae was getting slightly better at holding herself together. Her growing focus might've come from the narrowing of her topic. "Gods... gods used to be purely elemental... you know--very interesting... but with there being many Gods of Fire, they started eating--"
"Focus."
His interruption startled her, but she took no time getting back on track. "Your... your Heaven. The Sangeist you're using right now... has many parts. The first.... first is the Domains. What... what aspects or concepts in reality it alters... It's..." she chuckled as if fondly remembering something, "something shaped by us. To narrow the throne of a god."
Avo considered that. "Like matter. Or blood itself. And the canons? Hubris?"
She hummed. "Those... those are decrees. Like specific influences... code-changes they made to... to the source of reality. The roots. Gods... they mimic the patterns of reality to... to make their own. And the weaker ones... like... like a Sangeist, can only afford minor... minor alterations. Hubris, too. It's... meant to be an anchor... an ontological flaw caused by... by specificity. Or sub.... the instability of their substructural.... substructural reality."
"More canons; more thaumic mass?" Avo asked.
"Yes--yes, but not only." Kae said. "Imagine--imagine the scope and vulgarity of a canon. You... you have one of haemokinesis. It is... is tactile. you bring things... touched.... touched by your concept into your reality. Makes... makes them mutable. Not that high in Rend. Not... not that much Soul... Soulfire required to sear away reality's roots... roots for it to manifest."
"Scope. Vulgarity. What are they?"
Kae hummed. "Scope... scope is like... not just how much you influence. Not just. But also, complexity. Size of pillars. Like gravity. Or time. Or... or space. Reality uses those... those as pillars. Affecting them causes... severe harm. Much... much more of reality must be burned away. Much... much more Rend."
Around the blood that comprised Avo's ontological shell, he felt a tungsten glint flick down the fluidity of his blood, like the running red was unsheathing blades from the scabbards that were their cresting waves. But the change was tied to him. And only the blood that he could touch. The changes made were ultimately quite limited.
"So," Avo said. "Larger Heavens also inflict more Rend?"
"Not... not always," Kae replied. "It... it also depends on vulgarity."
"Vulgarity?"
"A spatial... spatial Heaven that can store... an aerovec in a demiplane. Imagine one which is stored directly by compressing... compressing matter into shadow. Versus... versus one that just... just pockets the matter."
If Avo could frown just then, he would have. "So. vulgarity. Just disguising and hiding it better."
"I... guess you can--"
"Just disguising and hiding. Okay. Understanding." Silently, he considered the implications of this. Was this why when he wanted a canon of unending blood, it simply cost too much? "Agnos. Infinite canons--"
"Can't work!" Now it was Avo's turn to be startled. The pedestal of the False Heaven drew in closer, her face poking past the open chasm exposing him--his Soul. "Infinite... we can't comprehend it. So, the gods... they can't derive worship very well. It's like... more than I can use. Canon-smithing... it's... it's art and engineering both... like... like a baseline Heaven is... is joined of two Domains, so... so is the knowledge it takes... it takes to change them."
That meant that his Meta-Fac needed more meat than just desired outcome to design new canons.
"Heavens. How are they made?"
"Most... most are cemented," Kae said. "Years of worship. Ingrained scripture. Solidified into... into a living concept that's--uh--carried over into a god's Soul upon... upon death."
"But new Heavens have been made."
Kae nodded, her expression growing distant. "Many. Constructed in chrono-accelerated prisons using... using prisoners as... as the delivery mechanism."
"Sacrifices," Avo said, echoing the action of the gods.
"If you call it that," Kae said, shrugging. "Thaumaturgy is... we are not creatures of the absolute. Only of relativity. With death, however, that is changed. In... in death, we finally cross into the same threshold that the gods occupy. A shared... shared wavelength."
Or maybe they just had a very particular diet. Not so unlike a ghoul in that regard. "What of Hells?"
That drew a chuckle from Kae, though not a mirthful one. "It... it is an... anti-Heaven... inverts the design... like a... like a funnel. If Heaven is built by belief.... then, Hell is--is raw disbelief. It's the opposite made into... metaphysics."
"Hell's smaller than Heaven. Rend building fast."
"Hm," Kae said, "Open the specifications again. I want to see."
HELL - [FIRST CIRCLE]
DOMAIN: (MATTER/ENTROPY)
THAUMIC REQUIREMENTS - 10 thaum/c
REND VENTS ONLINE
"Good," she continued. "good... it's tied to your... your matter. Entropy is... is always the second... second Domain for Hell. But the waste expelled is... is always different. Yours... when did you get the Hell grafted."
Now there was a good question. He knew that it didn't come from Little Vicious' Sangeist. At least, he didn't think so. It downloaded a Heaven for him, but moments before that, when he flared after killing the two hunters, a sphere of space and matter was outright unmade around him.
"Can't remember. Think it was put on sometime before."
"Sometime... before..." She wanted him to elaborate. He couldn't.
"Missing memories. All of the week before. Might've been installed then."
"... Not... usually the way it's done... at least one Domain needs to match. otherwise," she gesticulated, pushing the fingers of one hand into the palm of her other, "it's not lined parallel. Perpendicular Domains are asymmetric, and... and the Rend doesn't cross over right. Subrealities aren't aligned that way."
Symmetry. Sequencing phantasmics relied much on the concept as well. Necrothurgy and Agnosticism were both studies under the school of thaumaturgy, by technicality, but the nature of the latter was deleterious to reality, while the former was like scaffolding--affecting only cognition.
On the topic of Hells though, a problem yet remained. He was generating too much Rend and wasn't soaking it fast enough. "Hell. I'll need a new one. Where?"
The way he asked it knocked a stutter into Kae's dais. "I--uh, do you have a... a chronologically accelerated plane? Or prison?"
He judged her expression to see if she was mocking him, but found only confusion. "No."
She winced. "Could... could claim one from an enemy Godclad. Or... or..." She blinked. "You have a Meta-Factory. You can... you can unmake Heavens... deconstruct them?"
"Yes."
A smile spread over her face like a growing fire, savagery briefly glinting in her eyes. "Good. You can... can build a Hell then. Break down a Heaven. Fold it inward. Link it to your Heaven... Heaven of a shared Domain."
A location of interest sparked in Avo's mind. Each district had at least one techno-thaumic reactor contributing a local Heaven or two to the overarching Sovereignty. Ten districts made up a Guild-taxable Sovereignty; that was the case during more reasonable times, but after the war, plenty had been left fallen. In disrepair.
Like Burner's Way.
There was a Fallen Heaven there. Right across from Scalper territory, but there was a promise...
"How can a Rupture be stabilized?" Avo asked. "A Fallen Heaven?"
The Agnos' response was all reflex, slipping free before she even fully realized what he was implying. "Should the... Heaven's system be returned to equilibrium you can... you can break it down without..." Her voice trailed off. Her eyes widened in dawning comprehension. "You want to harvest a Heaven from a reactor?"
No sense in hiding it. He would need her to help him understand how to conduct the stabilization process properly. At least for the first time. He should also make a vicarity of the operation for the sake of being thorough.
"That... it's..." she stuttered.
"You object."
"It's a great... I love the idea! Fu... fuck the Guilds!"
Unexpected. Again, a shine of that hatred there, but it dissolved fast along with her thoughts. It seemed that the only thing keeping her mind together and not a blank mess was the external cortex she had implanted. His prior curiosity regarding the damage inflicted upon her sprouted seeds of genuine interest now; hers was a story he would delve into once he claimed a Ghostjack.
"You... you're going after one of the Fallen Heavens right... right?"
His Sangeist warbled blood in a loose approximation of a grunt.
"Okay. Right now, you have a Heaven of Blood. Domains are matter and blood. Hell is tied to matter... Matter--I recommend you keep going for matter if you can. If... if you can. If... if you can get a one-to-one ratio in terms of thaumic mass... or more in favor... favor of the Hell... you can have... keep your miracle-vent cycles minimal."
"Equilibrium is primarily based on mass? Of the same Domain."
"Y-yes. From... uh... from one aspect of subreality into a parallel one. Like... like an abacus.”
Avo thought he got that, though he didn't fully know what an abacus was.
"I--It's mostly thanks to your Soul, you know," she smiled, and this time, there was no hate tied to it. She was happy; a creature in her element. "Yours... it's the most advanced subreality I've ever seen. It's... it's nearly alive and it's... it's entirely integrated with your Nous. No... no core-tuning needed... at-at all.
But if it was so special, how did it end up with him? Why wasn't it burning inside some Ark-top Guilder?
Unfortunately, Avo had a guess for this question. Walton. His father had something to do with this, despite being dead. Whatever Ninth Column was, he would not meet them unprepared and ignorant. His continued survival could not be left to coincidence.
"So. My system has a Meta-Fac. And is more reactive. Can break down Heavens internally?"
"Automatically... is what I'd say," Kae said. "It's like a condensed system of self... self-worship. No need to throw in sacrificial prisoners to modify or rebuild."
She sighed, looking on in admiration, the expression matching that of a wager leering at a new aerovec. “Your flame. It’s special–special. It’s… inverted. Also, it's rippling. Expanding. Other patterns of Soulfire… older ones, yes, those… they–they don’t ripple. It’s an external furnace built around a... a cycler. Fixed size. Dismembered from a god. No growth. No Meta-Fac. Like... like dead matter."
“Wait,” Avo said, halting her questions. “Mine emits. Others can’t do that?”
A strain spread through her features. Her hand sifted through her hair again, her lips counting as if she was passing prayer beads through her fingers. “It’s… it’s like… yours is a sea. It’s–water. Deep. Growing. But remembers as well. And also… more than water. Can–can shape things. Older ones are… are like a container. Uh... you have something like... like a full-spectrum nanosuite. Normal... normal Souls are just... just cybernetics. One Soul. Heavens. Hells. Fixed build. Needs sacrifices to tune.”
And that, then, was also why he was gaining ghosts and thaums with every kill. At least when he made physical contact with them. He was pulling them into himself. Drinking them empty, and snatching them away from the Guilds through the act of killing.
"There's... there's more but..." Kae turned and looked at the Galeslither again. Behind her, the horse-heads stared on blankly, the stuff of their skulls a swirling mass of storms centered around their eyes. The fissuring ribs of lighting at the chest remained frozen then as if the bolts were not allowed to flow--were not granted enough stay in the local reality flow.
"I want to conduct an experiment," she said. "I want you to switch Heavens."
"The fuck is this shit? A Galeslither? The Heaven you earned is a fucking Galeslither? A Heaven for a First-Sphere? Your Liminal Frame... a First-Sphere too? Jaus fucking alive--why the fuck did we spend so much on you, then? Is this my fault?
Didn't I give you the best genes? The best life?
What's that? I did? Then why didn't you even manage a Second Sphere? Your half-sister managed it! And she's practically a subhuman mongrel. Her half-strand father didn't even splice her! You had every fucking advantage you worthless piece of godsdamned gene trash...
-Conversation between a mother and her son, Axtraxis Academy of Highflame
5-7
Tower or Sea
Disentangling from the Sangeist was a disquieting sensation. It felt like he was hatching his mind out from his flesh. Considering his current ontological state, however, perhaps the analogy was closer to fact.
Sinuous arteries lined like metal and blood both snapped free from the fires of his Soul, parting at a shrug of his will. Dismembering himself from the Sangeist was akin to ejecting both limb and senses from his body. Behind him, the shed Heaven shivered like a mirage, remembered, but no longer solid.
HEAVEN DETACHED - [SANGEIST]
DOMAIN: (BLOOD/MATTER)
THAUMIC REQUIREMENTS - 40 thaum/c
Avo wondered if it would be possible to rename the Heaven down the line. It wouldn't be fitting to keep the designation of Sangeist once its capabilities outstripped that of a common golem. A tool needed a name that matched.
"Kae. Heavens. Can they be redesignated?"
His thoughts were bound to her False-Heaven now, her tears bouncing up and down like a wavelength. She blinked, not expecting his sudden inquiry. "Y-yes. Root functions. Dive down while your... uh... dive down inside the Heaven."
He wasn't looking forward to that. The last time was like trying to drown himself in a sea of data. It was like thinking through a deluge that flooded your mind constantly with thoughts and excess mem-data. But then again, that was what the root was supposed to contain: foundational mem-data.
The Galeslither greeted him as a foreign entity. He would have fancied possessing the powers of flight as a younger ghoul; during a time when he constantly hungered for mockeries and other birds. Now, his favor lay more in the practical aspects.
When he faced this Heaven as a foe, it had killed him twice, both times trapping him within its demiplanar embrace, claiming him in a cage of howling wind.
That power belonged to him now. Or so it seemed. He had yet to graft it to his Soul, after all. As his father had often told him: "Before success is confirmed, disappointment's always got a fighting chance."
His presence greeted the solidifying vortex that formed the outer flesh of the Galeslither. From his fire, the Heaven's three heads grew animated, wind sparking with repressed static steaming from their nostrils, their storm-enameled ribcage crackling with life. Beneath hooves shod with grumbling, ink-black nimbuses, miniature tornados screamed their hate at the world around.
Shrouding the Heaven was a veil of currents feeding into it, collapsing down and coursing into its body like an eternal delta, the heart of the plane, the rider of the storm.
So it was through roaring swells of storming winds that Avo plunged into the newest vessel he would use to clad his ontology. And where the Galeslither was the heart of the storm outside, so too was he the master of its domain within. The weight of torquing air spun deep, suffusing his Heaven as his cycler began to spin in pace with the whirlwind fortress that was his new vessel.
GRAFTING HEAVEN [GALESLITHER]...
HEAVEN GRAFTED - [GALESLITHER]
DOMAIN: (AIR/SPACE)
THAUMIC REQUIREMENTS - 55 thaum/c
Like the Sangeist, two symbols manifested to the sides of his Heaven, each representing a domain. Air and space were his to wield by way of wit, will, and canon.
DOMAIN OF (AIR)
CANON: AERO-VECTORING - THE MASTER OF THIS DOMAIN CAN NOW GUIDE AND ACCELERATE THE DIRECTION OF THEIR SURROUNDING WINDS WITH A THOUGHT AT SPEEDS COMPARABLE TO THAT OF A TYPHOON; ONLY WIND CURRENTS WITHIN A 400-FEET RADIUS MAY BE DRAWN UPON
HUBRIS: ATTEMPTING TO DRAW AND SHAPE HYPER-HEATED AIR WILL RESULT IN THAUMIC BACKLASH
Fascinating. Another hubris that results in a Rend-spike upon encountering an environmental deviance.
"The... opposites are... is a common hubris," Kae explained, her voice pealing clear like a crisp bell despite torrential spiral lashing at her pedestal. "Most... most Stormtree and Sanctus Heaven-builds use opposites as a template... because... because it's like a Hell. Something... something that the Agnos can easily modify."
"Hubris. Can they be entirely removed?"
"No," Kae said. "Drastically... drastically reduced at... at the cost of increasing thaumic mass, yes, but not removed. Its... it's a deliberate design. Something that a god uses to set boundaries... to like a decided weakness but--but to know that it exists. Like... a drawing the borders of your own personhood... Maintenance of self--uh, what was I saying... self-awareness."
How strange it must be to cripple yourself to gain full awareness. Then again, Avo had never lived life as a concept. Violence offered him clear enough distinctions to where he began and another ended.
But, he had to confess, with these Heavens, with the powers they allowed him, he felt a drift building in the back of his mind. A strange sensation that felt like he was bleeding over into his power through the commingling of his senses, natural and metaphysical.
DOMAIN OF (SPACE)
CANON: YONDERGALES - THE MASTER OF THIS DOMAIN CAN NOW SHIFT INTO A PARALLEL DOMAIN USING THE FOLDS OF AIR CURRENTS AS A GATEWAY; THE YONDERGALES OCCUPY A 400-FEET RADIUS AND ALL CONSTRUCTS OF MATTER PULLED IN ALONGSIDE THE MASTER WILL BE TRAPPED IN A CYLINDRICALLY VECTORED FREEFALL
HUBRIS: DRAWING IN OVER 400 TONS OF MASS WILL MAKE THE SIMULATED PLANE COLLAPSE AND RESULT IN THAUMIC BACKLASH
Between the two, the domain of space struck him as the far more useful one. He could imagine situations where he would be bereft of air, but few that could take from him the ability to edit the laws of space.
"Brilliant," Kae said, the cheer in her voice a squeak. "Su--success. Auto-installation. No need for a constant flow of deaths to... to link the Heaven. N-no boot-up g-glitches... stuttering? No... none. Even active onto-tethers... not needed. Soul interfacing.... interfacing and bridging alone... It's brilliant."
Her joy was a confusing one. With all that she just described--the parts that he comprehended--it sounded as if she was cheering on her own obsolescence.
But it occurred to him that her individual severance from use likely happened a long time ago.
"Other Agnos. Are they like you?" Avo asked.
Her smile quavered unevenly, her expression as if the fire atop a candle graced by a flow of wind. But as the discomfort passed through her, the happiness remained.
"No," Kae said. "T-they're still afraid."
"Afraid?"
She nodded. This, then, was a topic she remained absolutely lucid on. Something she knew down to her bones, a thing that was beyond solid, beyond certain. "I... I did something... the right thing... helped someone try to fix... fix a Fallen Heaven. I think. I can't remember... Can't."
The loss pained her. Pained like a dismembered limb would. Except her wound was always bleeding, and would never fully mend unless something could fix the damage inflicted on her cognition from the inside. Just what did she do that deserved such torment instead of just death?
"It... it doesn't matter," Kae said. "Something... something wrong with your current build is that... is that you don't have a symmetrical Hell. Nothing for air.... space."
"Break down another Galeslither when I get the chance. Use Meta-Fac."
A flash of fascination lit up her non-crying eye. "Bring... bring me. I want... need to see. To help."
To be close to the art she could once practice that was now lost to her. This was a rare moment in Avo's life. One where another had made a demand of him that was far nobler than what was spoken.
Truthfully, he wanted her to remain regardless. The way that Ori-Thaum damaged her, was, in turn, something he wished to study. To practice upon. The Incubi were they who haunted every sequence of memory in the Nether, and Avo envied them for it. How could he not? They were what the Low Masters intended to make him by design: apex predators in the great, black sea of memory and mind that was the Nether.
What better masters could he learn from now that Walton was gone?
Gone.
Was his father really? With the final message and this frame, Avo wondered then if perhaps his own memories weren't as solid as they appeared. Stripped of a week in recollection, the damage could have gone far wider.
Ultimately, without a Ghostjack to edit and manufacture memories with, certainty offered only brief flirtations and no commitment. That phantasmic, then, was his next priority. His mind had been left bare of a proper arsenal for too long, and without it, whatever Draus wanted to do with Chambers and his desire to examine the Agnos' damage would be impossible.
For a while longer, Kae spoke to him, going over more details of his internal subreality. There were things that his Soul lacked that others had. Onto-tethers meant to properly festoon a Soul to a Heaven; fixed thaumic cycler hardpoints that were made to fit Heavens of specific spheres, in the separation of Heavens by build and classification.
And it was then that she asked him the question that stood at the foundation of all ontological builds. "A-Avo... do... uh... do you want to be a tower... a tower or the sea."
Avo grimaced. "Riddle?"
"No... no, two philosophies," Kae said, her hand forming a vertical shape. "The... the tower focuses on building one Heaven... or fusing as many canon they can into... into a Heaven possessing just... just a few Domains."
A specialist. A predator of a specific ecosystem but no more. There was comfort in being such, but if Avo had learned anything from all the time he spent as a Necro, it was that over-specialization saw you nulled all the same. There was never just one situation. There would always be another, and power, when not applicable or insufficient, meant little on its own.
He wanted options. He wanted to be overwhelming. He wanted more angles of attack.
"Sea," Avo asked. "What's that about."
Kae titled the shape her hands were making sideways. "No... not as directly pow--powerful as a tower, but wider... more options... if... if a tower let you channel the power of a sun... at... at the Seventh-Sphere as a tower... then a Seventh-Sphere of seas would have... have a Heaven fused from over... a dozen others, with... twenty or more domains and canon to wield."
"Power versus utility," Avo said.
"No," Kae corrected. "Mistake. All... all Heavens are powerful. The... the Sangeist can alchemize matter using blood. Can... can kill anyone it touches if... if it clots their bloodstream. But... but it can't bend the winds to its will... and has no control over space. Both Heavens are absolutely powerful. The tower and... the tower and the sea is a single question: symmetry and asymmetry. Dominance by... by absolute control over a Domain or two within a reality where... where you are a god above other... other gods, or endless angles of attack, but less... less scope and scale..."
Kae studied his Galeslither and gestured at his Sangeist as well. "That... said, you might just... I think you can do both... You can... swap... swap Heaven at... any time now..."
Avo peered down and noted a distinct lack of a circle attached to his thaumic cycler at the foundations of the Galeslither. "Sure. Just need a Hell first." Two strange thoughts greeted him, one following the other. "Kae. Can I control two Souls? Or can I run two Heavens at once?"
"I... it's been tried but... tears the nous in half and kills you. Two realities do things to your being... doesn't clone--it fragments. As... as for the Heaven... yes. You... it's been done. Very popular for Stormtree, in fact... but you'll.... you'll need more than one thaumic cycler to interface with each Heaven you want. Easier to fuse Heaven in most cases."
"Thaumic cycler? How do I get one?"
Kae giggled. It was a hopeless sound. "Simple. Kill... kill and absorb the Essence of a dragon."
Avo fell silent at the thought of that. "Where are dragons now?"
"No-Dragons will sell them to you... from... grows nulled versions of dragons on a farm. But the cost is high... The natural-born dragons... the No-Dragons' original masters... either long massacred or missing. Hiding in places between places. Too valuable to be left... left alive."
Avo grunted, and through his new Heaven, the horses neighed. "Simple. Not Easy."
"Like... like many things in this city."
Her remaining lectures and elaborations added more to his fundamental understanding of just what he had become. Through this, the waters of worry within him had calmed somewhat, this new gnosis--and the possibility of the Agnos' continued aid--proving to be a salve to his confusion.
She spoke on while he half-listened. In silence, he plotted. Procuring a Ghostjack top priority, but after that, more task essentials grew clear for him. He needed two new Hells--one to sate his Sangeist, the other for his Galeslither--he needed to dive through Chambers and the two techs' memories before executing whatever Draus wanted to do with them; and finally, he needed to start doing step-up work on the Conflux megablock.
He was free now. The momentum had shifted to his side, but the task, as Walton would understand it, was half done. Mirrorhead was still alive, and the father was still trapped. Two things Avo couldn't abide by. How clashing were these two ideals as well, the act of killing the rival Godclad one of selfish hunger and retributive bloodshed, while the need to save Esssus was rooted in his ethics?
"...Any.. anyway, I think you can probably... probably remember enough to use the Frame now... Somewhat..." She swallowed. "Avo... I... I wanted to apolo--uh--apologize."
Avo's full attention slid back over her while confusion slipped over him. "Apology? Why?"
"I... I assumed that... as a ghoul that..."
"I'd want to hurt and eat you?"
"Yes. That, and you being an... an animal."
"Not wrong. When I'm... in the flesh. I want to. Hurt and eat you."
Kae fell silent. "Oh... I thought..."
"Can control it. Can't ignore it."
"Like... like me and... my thoughts," she laughed.
"No. Someone hurt you. Someone made me to hurt. You were born a person. I was a poorly made weapon."
Here, inside the Soul cut away from his biological impulses, the truth flowed ever so easily, like all was weightless.
"I... see," Kae said. "Well, I--"
"Changing back to Sangeist now," Avo said. "Also. Want to make you a deal."
"Deal?"
"You help me with thaumaturgy. Heavens. The art. Keep teaching. Want to keep learning. Return: I'll try and fix your mind."
She took a step back as if the deal was a dagger driven into her gut.
Avo continued. "Will also need to vet you first. Scan memories. You understand. Know Draus. Don't know me."
"I... do... do you really think... think you can fix it... my... my mind?"
"Yes," Avo said, more out of selfish curiosity than certain capability.
"Then, I... I think we... we just might get along," she said with a faint smile.
If her damage was as stimulating as it looked, Avo didn't care about getting along. What could he say? One person's crippling was another's education.
There ain't no weapon I fear more than a Ghostjack. It's the reason I run mem-matches every day; it's the same damned reason I don't cast into public lobbies. You never know what kind of seeded mem-tags they got sprinkled through the public mem-packet downloads.
And understand that when I say "they" I mean fucking everyone. The Freedivers do it for the art and thrill; some up-jumped ganger who lucked into getting a 'Jack; Ori-Thaum Incubi, already shaping minds and memories for their shadow war...
Point is, if the half-strand you're fighting's got a 'Jack, he's the one you want to make sure is snuffed by fight's end. Because if you don't, if you let a 'Jack slip, trust me, they'll come back for you. They're gonna pull a visual memory of you and throw it into a Recollector Registry is what comes next.
Then? Then, you best make good on the disappearing and running. New name. New look. New sequences for your Meta. 'Cause if you don't, you just might wake up remembering only how to scream your own name, seein' how they pruned all the other paths out from your mind.
-Quail Tavers, School of the Warrens
5-8
Alignment of Interests
The practice of resurrection was bound to the nature of one’s being.
For those vacant of Domains, resurrection is a thing of deception; a sleight of hand played against reality. This was also the method that Kae had instructed him to use for his return instead of emerging forth from a threshold of blood.
The nature of a resurrection was intrinsically tied to one’s available Domains and canons. In his prior deaths, his return had been tethered to the tactile, overwriting his original corpse to re-manifest or, in the case since his ascent from the Crucible, emerging nearby the nearest concentration of blood.
Position anchored to where he lay dead on the lung bed, Avo felt reality shudder violently, his ascent from death striking it across the jaw in a cracking backhand against all that was right, all that was sensible. As his senses clicked on, he found himself held in the boiling grasp of the bed—doubtlessly heating itself to match the post-mortem cold that was his former body.
RESURRECTION - 100%
IMPLANTING NOUS
ONTOLOGY REVERTED
RESURRECTION COMPLETED
DOMAIN RESPAWN ENGAGED
ENGAGING THAUMIC CYCLER: 57 THAUM/c
LOADING PHANTASMICS…
Across the room, a narrow depression cupped the apartment's entertainment system, holovision spraying particles of light in pinpricks of static. There Draus sat at the end of a couch, working away, basked in the neon fractals cast by the holovision's projector, ignorant to his return. Before her, a vertical stack comprised of three revolving rings chained by an axis wrought from magnetism sang a low whine. At the center of this coldtech concentricity, a clot of beam-printed materials emitted from the inner curves of the rings burned matter into shape, fabricating plassteel carapaces from congealing particulates.
On the ground before her were two spinal clasps, freshly fabricated and emitting a kaleidoscopic radiance from their ventral projectors.
A field-fab. Avo didn't know she even had one on her. But then again, it shouldn't have surprised him. Regs liked to keep themselves prepared, and Draus' habit remained long after the dissolution of her rank and service.
"We should envy her," Avo muttered, looking up at the fishes. They didn't respond in words, choosing still to tear into each other, darker sprays of blood pluming into the shining red waters that lined the aquarium, preying and being preyed upon. But he supposed they were as close to joy and terror as anything could be. Feeding and fed upon. More impulse than choice or enlightenment.
Perhaps things should be seen as the opposite. Perhaps it is he and the fish that should be envied, true children of New Vultun that they are.
From his periphery, he saw a strand of thoughtstuff slowly creeping into notice, manifesting indicators in his cog-feed. Kae was trying to initialize a link-chain again. Trying, but halted. Through the horrendous cracks inflicted over the outer lattice of her mind, he heard the ghosts within her squirm, their presences swimming beneath her thoughtstuff in the form of bubbling anxiety, as an eternal clash, her exo-cortex constantly reuploading her memories, her affliction constantly dissolving them.
Fragmenting strands of thought hissed from the wounds of her mind like steam from a cracked tea kettle.
The beast inside him twitched. Her weakness, plain in flesh and mind, aroused his violence like a herb-scented meal would one's hunger. Still, her damage was too fascinating--he couldn't consider killing her until after his study was finished.
But to even begin, he knew what he needed. Had known since he resurrected in the Maw.
He needed to get his Ghostjack back.
Without hesitation, he connected his thoughtstuff to the Agnos and Regular. The former winced, her form looking small on Draus' lung bed, back to the wall and rubbing her arm awkwardly. The latter, however, gave nothing away. She merely continued tuning the holo-model of that which she was printing.
GHOST-LINK ESTABLISHED
CLOSED CHAIN FORMED: [3]
+How long since death?+ Avo asked.
Across the room, the fabricator whined its last as Draus pulled an oblong-shaped helmet from its containment field. +'Bout six and a half hours. Would've figured you for dead. 'Cept Kae's been crying into you for a while. Never get used to that.+ She turned and stared at the Agnos from the corner of her eye. +So? How's our ghoul's Soul? Is shit 'bout as fucked as I reckon?"
Kae shrugged so timidly that it might as well have been a shiver. +P-probably worse. M... Single most... uh... advanced Liminal Frame I... I ever interfaced with.+ She chuckled. +A different frame... f-fit for a different kind of Godclad.+
Draus' lip thinned. +Can't tell if that's a compliment or an insult."
Avo, too, found himself curious.
+C... compliment!+ Kae provided, a sudden panic overtaking her. Her side of the link spiked a rising wave of nervousness that crashed through the chain. It rattled Draus' end but splashed back into straightness on Avo's. He sensed it coming from the shifts in her thoughtstuff.
The couch squelched as Draus rose, the ground beneath pushing the furniture leggings out from its carpet-like biomass with the parting of weight. Picking up her newly printed helmet and a holocoat clasp, she walked over to Avo.
"Here," she said, speaking directly instead of using her Meta. "For you." She handed him the helmet first and the clasp after. "Took the initiative to scan your skull while you were sleepin'. Found some time to work in a fab-job after digging through mem-data relatin' to Conflux HQ. It'll protect your eyes from mean ol' master daylight if you gotta look up for some reason."
Avo took the helmet from her. Its exterior was like the shell of a beetle with three v-shaped outer lenses for him to see. Different visual functions probably. Cautiously, he peered inside trying to glean some understanding from its design despite holding no comprehension of coldtech.
"Yeah," Draus snorted, "gonna work one over on you after you wake."
"Have to be sure," Avo said. "Last time I was promised kit there were problems. Old. Outdated. And no jump-jet."
Draus shrugged. "Can't fault you there, I suppose. Wanna rundown of the functions?"
"Would be helpful."
"Put it on, then."
There was something very persuasive about Draus. It might've been the fact that she was probably thinking about how to best pulp his skull if he made any sudden movements.
To be fair, it wasn't like he wasn't considering how he could kill and eat her every moment he was aware of her presence.
The helmet slid easily over his head, with the interior lining molding over his bones to provide additional padding. He wasn't sure what kind of materials she used to fabricate the interior, but it accommodated him just right.
Like a wreath, the upper section of the helmet settled over his crown. An envelope of light flashed, the visors coming on one after another. Curiously, he reached up to tap one of the visors with his claws. No glitching. No scratching. Decent materials.
"It'll take small arms just fine," Draus said, "but try to headbutt a flechette and you print your own helmet. After you stop bein' dead, of course."
Coldtech was coldtech, and physics was cruel. Armor was hard. Gauss hit harder.
"Three vision functions. Standard. Infra. Electromag. Switch through them by blinking twice real fast."
Avo tried it. Infrared proved promising. Electromagnetics, however, made him nauseous. Ultimately, this was more for perspective enhancements rather than scouting. His cog-feed would always be better than coldtech for clandestine functions.
"It's also got comms." Draus' voice crackled in the helmet but her lips didn't move. She bared her gleaming teeth at him, each one looking more like the shine of a voidship's hull than natural enamel. "Implant. Gotta have a way to keep contact if, say, someone shivers the local Nether with a thoughtwave bomb."
"Good," Avo said. "Useful. Radio?"
"Hyperwave," Draus said. "Voidwatch shit. Don't get it either." She chucked the holocoat clasp in his lap. "Reckon you know how to work this one?"
"Reckon right," Avo said. He picked up the clasp and shoved it beneath the mangled remains of his jacket. Little remained of the garment he stole besides tattered strips and a particularly tenacious zipper. The device expanded, thin fibrous ribs spreading along his torso. Along the back of his neck, he felt a wreath of feelers slither up from under the helmet, growing around his skull.
At a thought, an obfuscating veil formed around him, clinging to his body like a longcoat made from a stormcloud.
"There," Draus said, putting her fingers together to form a picture frame, "you ain't ugly anymore. Ain't I a miracle worker?"
He tugged at the bottom of the helmet. "Can the underside retract?"
"Helmet wasn't pattern-made for cannibals."
"So. No."
"No."
"Your miracles could be better."
The Regular shook her head. "You know, for a flesh-eating bio-weapon, you sure do like to whine whine whine."
Avo shrugged. "Very sensitive to constructive criticism. For a Regular."
"...The constructive part of that supposed to be a pun?"
"Sure."
The edge of Draus' lip curved. Was it a smile? Was it a snarl? Who could say? "Alright. Toy time is over. Time to take inventory." She gestured for him to follow, but Kae responded first. The Agnos was like a hurt child following in the shadow of the Regular.
Which, if the metaphor continued, made Avo the wretched bioform of this little chain. Some kind of particularly vicious nu-dog, perhaps. He hummed with low amusement at the thought of an over-designed dog being made a Godclad.
Suppose that was how most true people felt when they realized what he was.
Gathering at the entertainment system next to where Draus did her fabricating, a flood of phantoms peeled out from her link and began to feed mem-data directly into their chain.
She had been most productive while he was occupied with his lesson.
+So,+ Draus said, reverting to the link, +I'd like to start this here meetin' by listing the few ways in which we're fucked.+ She shot a look at Kae. +Well, me and the ghoul, here. Reckon you'll be fine, Kae. Unless the No-Dragons decide to forget the Nulling of Jinsha and make nice with Ori-Thaum. Then, you're also fucked.+
For a moment, the Agnos didn't notice. Then, her thoughtstuff spiked with reflexive terror. A beat ahead. A beat behind. Avo wondered how much of her ability to socialize was left to guesswork now that her present was lost to her. She was playing on the timeframe of was and will be, in a sense.
+Majorly fucked,+ Draus began, +We got a hyper-advanced, pristine off-the-corpse-of-a-dead-eldritch-hot Liminal Frame burning inside Avo here. And River already suspects us of at least knowing something about it. Not great, but she runs a tight ship here. Meaning No-Dragons'll be the first to find out. After that happens, it don't matter if we're out the city or even in the void. Short of divin' deep into the Sunderwilds somewhere, the Guilds are gonna keep lookin' till we're found.+ A bitter note bled through her link. +'Specially Highflame.+
+Second Point of fuck-edness: Mirrorhead. We're not done. He's not done. And trust me, a half-strand like that ain't gonna just let this go.+
+Left a corpse behind,+ Avo said. +My trail might be cold.+
Draus didn't look so certain. +City's full of eyes. Even down here. And you made a whole godsdamned lot of noise killin' those Scalpers. If I noticed, best assume someone else did too. But it ain't just that.+
+Essus,+ Avo said. +Still with Conflux.+
+Yeah.+ Draus frowned. +That his name? I asked him before I pulled a runner. Wouldn't answer me or nothin' then.+
+Found out through Syndicate circuit. Used him as entertainment. Ghoul-feed.+
A flicker of loathing manifested itself as a twitch in the Regular's expression. +It's why I wanted to keep them three alive,+ Draus said. +The two techs and the one that likes to talk. Might get some useful intel from them. Maybe you could turn them too if you're as nova of a 'Jack as you say.+
+Yes,+ Avo said, understanding the use of Chambers now. With a proper Possessor phantasmic and a well-designed Auto-Seance, the enforcer could go from Mirrorhead's puppet to his. Some parts of the idea pleased him. Mostly, he still just wanted to eat him.
+Will need Ghostjack first. Before I can do anything. Present phantasmics insufficient to conduct this dive.+
Almost silently came Kae's thought. +Y--you could b-buy the sequences to one... to one in the Deep Bazaar. Place an order... Have... Have it dream-dropped into your... your mind.+
It was an idea. Something that made sense from a glance, but not from practice. Avo had done his fair share of dives for the Deep Bazaar, and he knew how they worked. More importantly, however, he knew how Ghostjacks worked, in form, function, and market.
To put it simply, ordering the sequences to a Ghostjack was like trying to buy an antimatter bomb: there were ways of doing it, but those ways tended to get you scalpeled by one of the Guilds upon tracing your transaction.
His Whisper and a Ghostjack were technically both phantasmics in the same way that a cheap Mizuhada Seagull and a Voidwatch supercarrier were both vehicles: one had a specific set of functions it was limited to, and the other could modify and edit memories down to the minute of details.
With a Whisper, he could crack poor wards and pierce minds by leaving using them as unstable thought-shivs of trauma--a sloppy, desperate way of fighting that incurred a cost on him each time he slammed his wards against theirs.
Using a Ghostjack, however, he might not need to fight at all. With it rising over the structure of his Metamind like a pylon--a broadcasting tower--he could mimic memories and smuggle his thoughtstuff past the wards of another, or alter the sequences of his ghosts to make them proper weapons.
That would let him reach into someone else's mind and--
Avo's mind stuttered to a halt. He didn't need to buy or assemble a phantasmic. Why do that when he could just take it... and settle a grievance at the same time.
The captain. The one who captained the ship he woke on. The slaver. It was how she cut his senses directly, tearing the fabric of his cognition and rewiring his mind to drown in looping nightmares. He didn't know her name, but he remembered her face, and more importantly, he had the names of her crew.
That, then, was something that just might be purchasable as information.
+Draus,+ Avo asked. +Green River. Does she have a Recollector here?+
+Depends.+ Draus turned. +Mostly on the imps I throw at her? And before that: why?+
+Because I know who to get a Ghostjack from,+ Avo said. +You like traffickers?+
A faint semblance of disgust crawled over Draus' face. +Only when they scream. You?+
+Thing of taste for me.+
Kae shivered. How fast she was to forget he was a ghoul. It was flattering, in some regard.
Draus leaned back against the couch and sighed. +How big a run is this gonna be, you reckon? And do you even know where to look?+
+Mazza’s Junction. Deep gutters. Got her face. Got the face of her crew. Remember the ship. Works in the Maw. Not a hard target if we surprise her.+
Quietly, Draus studied him. +Avo. You be straight with me. We goin' after this... smuggler. Is it just because you know she got a Ghostjack?+
He considered lying to Draus, but something just didn't feel right about it. And why should he lie? His reason was justified. There were just additional wants involved as well. +No. Also want to eat her. And she sold me to Crucible. Reasons coincide. Practical. Pleasurable.+
A stretch of silence followed. Draus stared at him. He stared at Draus. The Agnos' eye flicked between the both of them as if they were her parents, on the verge of a fight.
+With the 'Jack I'm better,+ Avo said. +Can sequence you better phantasmics. Can maybe fix her.+
Draus shot a glance at Kae and turned her attention back to Avo. +We do this fast. And I set the op. You synced with me on that?"+
+Yeah,+ Avo said, trying to hold back his salivation beneath his helmet, +I'm synced.+
+C... can I come... come too?+ Kae asked.
Both Avo and Draus looked at her. The Regular picked at her nose.
+Well, Kae,+ Draus said. +That depends. Can you get real good at snuffin’ folk within the next day or so?+
Kae considered the question and scrunched her face hard, trying to keep her thoughts. +I could... could potentially trick Avo... into dying after accumulating too much Rend and perform a Usurpation on him... take... take over his Frame. So... yes.+
Avo stared. Draus stared.
+I say we take her with us,+ Avo said, very interested in what a "usurpation" was. +Worst case. She dies. I eat her. We find a new Agnos.+
Kae nodded. +I... I'm fine with that. I... I'm not staying here... alone. Don't... don't trust them.+ She squeaked. +The--the No-Dragons, I mean! The Sang are lovely people!+
Avo grunted. +Don't care for how they taste.+
Draus' stare trailed off as she frowned, eyes growing distant.
+Dra... Draus?+ Kae asked. +Yo... Are you okay?+
The Regular nodded slowly. +Yeah. Just... not used to being the... stable one is all.+
A run is not about meticulous planning but objectives.
A planner's task is not to anticipate every possibility down to the most minor detail but to layer every preventative measure possible to ensure that the team is always the one with the momentum and to ensure their extraction before the tides can turn.
For the group's ultimate survival in the face of ever-shifting circumstances, however, the charge lies with each and every member to do their part. Selection of assets in New Vultun comes into a few categories. Cheap and replaceable at the bottom. Powerful but expensive at the top.
Despite common advice, there is merit to possessing a roster of "feed" operatives for a blender-op. If nothing else, their deaths will serve as a decent roadmap for your actual squires down the line...
-[Redacted], Chapter 12 of The Troubleshooter's Doctrine
5-9
Subtle
Captain Aseleri of the Mawfarer II was an easy woman to find.
It took less than three hours for someone bearing her visual and audio markers to be flagged by the No-Dragon's Recollector. The phantasmal engine's scans ran only four thousand imps thanks to being narrowed down to the gutters of Mazza's Junction and had located several figures of note from Avo's mem-data.
The captain and her crew were daily customers at the local circuits, especially a moderately-known establishment called the Butcher's Lair, which hosted special showcases on different nights, ranging from beast-on-beast battles with the creatures sculpted from bidded designs to mini-Crucibles in which new bioforms were showcased to potential buyers via their efficiency at killing badly armed survivors.
From the Second Fortune, Draus had procured a "secondhand" Doldrum class commercial aerovec. It was a century out of date in terms of design and Avo suspected the delightful scent of brain matter still wafting in the air belonged to the car's former owner. Judging from all the past-due bills stuffed in their glove-box, their probable demise reeked of being caused by a debt-related issue.
Still, it served their needs most nicely, with five passenger gimbals within its confines, a full spectrum optical array for three-hundred-and-sixty-degree situational awareness, and a bead-wrapped locus that looked more like a piece of decor.
"Heh," Draus had chuckled upon interfacing her ghosts with the locus, "safe travels." She shot a look at the ceiling, the spinning shine of her augmented eyes picking up something Avo's couldn't. "Sang consider it a bad omen to ride in somethin' stained with the stench of death, you know?"
"Can't like me much then?" Avo said.
The Regular snorted. "Nah. They don't see much difference between you and a particularly vicious nu-hound variant."
The inception-assassination they were plotting could barely be considered a run. It was also an operation that Draus reserved the right to pull the plug on should something even feel sour to her. Prior to their departure, Avo pulled street models of the local area for study.
The Butcher's Lair's entrance was right next to the elevators of a formerly abandoned megablock turned Syndicate gutter market. It was placed that deep down to keep it far and away out from the notice of official authorities. From the way it was described, it looked to be a sort of "neutral" territory between the Syndicates; a place of numbness for gangers, wagers, and street nomads alike.
The enforcement of local rules, then, was enforced by a loose collective of a mixed band of peacekeepers provided by the Sovereignty's major Syndicates. Groups like the Scalpers, Dead Lotus, Maharada's Glaives, and the Neon Bleeders were all named as primary sponsors.
Conflux went unregarded, a silent note before its rivals.
Avo wondered how Mirrorhead tolerated that. From the actions of his former owner, the man couldn't tolerate any will that wasn't his own. But then again, perhaps that was why the other Godclad didn't participate. Because he would have to share his toys and profits. Mirrorhead did have that stench to him--the want for relative dominance over absolute gains.
Traffic ran clogged through the arteries sprawling across the Spine of the Warrens, with each change of sky-lane inflicting a micro-tax. Syndicates owned different parts of the city, and the veins of public transit were just another piece of the pie.
Just one level above the anarchy of the gutters, a faint mimicry of civilization was being attempted by a group of thugs cleaved between legitimacy and criminality. By technicality, there were Guilders down here. District councils. Local constables and Guild-sanctioned security. But in function, they wouldn't be seen until one went a level above to reach the Throat.
By the point someone rose to Light's End, the stench of the underlayers would be choked off by the plate beneath them, and proper Paladin-enforced order would take hold, and proper thoughtscans to parse the Fated and FATELESS would soon follow.
It took a total of a hundred and ten imps for them to finally slip over the lip of Layer One. As they slipped past the threshold ruled by the Syndicates and the roiling darkness lashed with fractals of neon and speckled with intermittent bursts of gunfire. Where they descended, few other aerovecs followed, and those that did were armed and armored.
The gutters was something between a sprawling wound and a doorway after all. Down here, the darkness came alive at times, hacking out its daily supply of feral ghouls and other horrors leftover from the Uprising like phlegm. And that wasn't even getting to the gangers and Syndicates trying to expand their corners.
Draus pulled up the DeepNav maps Avo downloaded of the local area. The stalls of the gutter market dotted the steps leading up into the foyer of the block, while quick-fabbed bridges and watchtowers housed turret drones meant to keep the peace. Spottings of Syndicate grown nu-dogs also displayed a second layer of security--one that was meant to prevent the use of bombs or bioweapons.
As they slowed to finish their approach, a thousand rings of shimmering thoughtstuff greeted Avo. Most of the crowd wore their thoughts naked. Too poor to afford even a secondhand Meta, too poor to afford wards. Good. That would narrow the search radius considerably, with the captain being one with their mind properly encased in phantasmal armor.
"So," Draus said, "from what we got, we know that our to-be-victim here is a nightly visitor of this here Butcher's Lair. Seeing that we're running close to dusk now, I think we oughta make this run all quiet-like. Snuff her nice and quiet before she makes it down. Took a peek at the body density in the Den and it ain't pretty. No easy kills there."
That was fine with Avo. Ultimately, all he wanted was two things: the captain dead and her phantasmics made his. The thought of cracking her skull and draining her ghost like it was yolk appealed to him, of course, but he wasn't going to sacrifice surprise for a more poetic retribution.
Not when he could still drink the details of the slaves he failed to save from her mind. Or use her mem-codes to raid her ship later.
He just needed to resist eating her was all.
"Anyways, I reckon you gotta be the one to do the snuffin', Avo, seein' as you can 'eat' her ghosts and all," Draus said, displeasure clear on her face. With a thought, she marked a particularly accessible lane leading toward the interior of the block. "If she shows tonight, that's where we take her. Now, I'm--"
"Won't eat her," Avo said. He held up a clawed hand before Draus and willed his blood to coalesce, five streams spilling out from his claw tips to form a chip of glinting metal. "Just going to burst a blood vessel. In her head."
Kae nodded enthusiastically at that. "T-that's a great... great use of a Heaven! Low... low Rend for... for high return! Very clever, Avo."
Avo chuffed, pleased with his idea. Social creature or not, it was good to finally have one's ideas acknowledged, especially by one as experienced as Agnos, broken though her mind was.
Draus flicked a flat glance over him and the Agnos. Awkwardly, she pulled a small injector gun out from the veil of her holocoat. "Was... gonna ask Kae to give you some Manticore to use on her, but... yeah, I guess this works too."
"Sound disappointed, Reg," Avo taunted. He leaned in closer, his tone growing mockingly conspiratorial. "See lots of Syndicate enforcers. Scum. Slavers. Could also make this more eventful. Festive."
"Oh!" Kae said. "That... there might... might just be enough lives down there to... give you enough thaums to qualify your... qualify your frame as a Second Sphere. Powers... powers of ten. Go from sub... sub-hundred thaums to... to a thousand."
Her giggle at the end made her sound like she was talking about anything other than a massacre.
Draus sighed. "Look. I like killin' half-strands and Syndicate types, but by Jaus' cold fuckin' corpse, can we do this professionally? Yeah? 'Cause we already got eyes lookin' out for us, and I don't want to be found because you," She pointed at Avo, who visibly struggled against the urge to bite her finger off, "see this as an all-you-can-eat buffet, and you," her finger turned to Kae, who beamed at being included, "can't seem to stop encouraging him."
"You were more fun in the Crucible," Avo said. "What happened to that Draus? She liked killing people."
A sharp breath slipped out from Draus' nostrils, the sound dangerous, like a blade rasping free from a scabbard. "Again: I still like killin' scum. It's what I do. It's what I've been doin' since Highflame 'retired' me. But right now, we need be real focused with our snuffin'. Can you do that? Are we concurred? 'Cause if we ain't, I can still turn this 'vec around and back to the Fortune. Been a while since I slept and that sounds mighty nice right now."
"Fine," Avo said.
Kae, after a beat of confusion, nodded along. "But... what if things... things go wrong? Can he... can we kill everyone th-then?"
Avo grunted sagely. "A good question."
"No. No, it's not," Draus said, her forehead wrinkling. "Avo: no snuffin' who I don't tell you to snuff. Kae, stop encouraging him. We're down here to get a Ghostjack--despite my reservations--and if you don't want said reservations to be spited so hard I call this run off, we do this clean and neat? Is that clear?"
Avo grunted again, more begrudgingly this time. "Yeah."
"C-can I have a gun?" Kae asked.
"No, you're gonna... be our eyes in the sky and extraction," Draus said. "In case things go wrong."
Kae blinked. "We... we're not landing?"
Draus expanded the holo-feeds to show all the visual data captured by the aerovec's optics. "You see those dots there?"
Kae narrowed her eyes. "They're... everywhere..."
"They're gangers. You wanna get our ride jacked by a ganger?"
"N-no," the Agnos said.
"Well, alright then, we need someone to circle the block. It's an important job. Gives us overwatch."
"Could just use my Whisper," Avo muttered. He did his best not to notice Draus' glare.
"O... okay," Kae said. "I... I'll do... do my best to be... your eyes in the sky."
"That's all we ask," Draus said. "We cast into the vec's locus when we need you. That fails, switch to your coldtech frequency. You know the one."
Kae nodded. "Y-yeah."
With a thought, Draus opened the doors. Air rustled in, bringing with it that familiar gutter ambiance of gunfire, screaming engines, and distantly booming music bearing so much bass that it could probably shake dust free from water. Just ten feet below were the cracked roof windows of an abandoned G-Station.
"Alright, Avo," Draus said. "I'll drop first. You follow after."
"Like before," he said.
"Yep," Draus said. "'Cept you ain't such a soft-target no more." She jabbed him lightly in the shoulder and stepped over the edge, plunging down with the pull of gravity.
"Avo," Kae said. He turned. "We... we should be far enough from... from the Sovereignty that most thaums and ghosts flow... uh... ghost flow directly to you. Physical contact is... is most optimal for... for your Frame, but... but proximity should work. So... so a ranged option... is-is also theoretically possible."
"Good to know," Avo said.
She smiled and gave him a thumbs-up. Something about her vulnerability made her seem deeply out of place down here; something else about how fast she warmed to his presence ever since he mentioned his interest in trying to fix her mind made him wonder if she was always so trusting.
Bearing such thoughts in mind, he leaped down after Draus, trying to imagine who the Agnos was before the unmaking of her mind.
A carpet of glass cracked in a chorus as he landed. Draus was already peeking along a corner, the microdrone she was tinkering with earlier hovering over her shoulder.
Following in her stead, he cast out his Whisper and splashed his perception over all that was around them. A few gangers in a nearby alley; half-dressed, half-chromed, poorly armed. Across the street, the homeless mingled with the joyfiends, looking for new scavenge to sell on the streets. What caught his eye were the warded minds of six holo-veiled figures, their forms veiled but their movements limping and staggered.
Street squires. That was Avo's guess. Freelance mercenaries that worked for imps and nothing but.
"Path ahead's cleared," Draus said. "Think there's a cadre of squires passin' the streets in front of the market. They look green enough to shoot anyone who looks armed."
Avo grinned. That would give him a reason to fight back. "I'm unarmed."
"You're also tall, thin, and move all jittery. Avoid them before we post up. Don't need them rememberin' us in any way, you synced?"
"Yeah. Not my first dive."
"Ain't a dive, Avo, it's a run. Shit can get stupid right-quick during runs." She turned to look at him again. "And I wasn't shittin' you about the pullin' the plug. If I say abort, we abort. Better that we let 'er slip than get exposed ourselves."
"Yeah," Avo agreed. The beast inside him didn't. Four hundred pounds of meat back at the Second Fortune and already it was beginning to itch again. It was as if all the recent killings had opened a chasm in his appetite.
They exited the G-Station like two specters, their bodies lined with the coned translucence of neon as ads slid over them, bathing the world around them in light. Across the street, four guards stood at watch outside the perimeter of the block. The walls of the structure were plated with additional sheets of plassteel, plugging up any rents or fissures leftover by the war, and leaving only the entrance accessible.
Still, it was a better option than taking the typical route of using the elevator itself. One that required the Syndicates to vet and confirm your identity before allowing you entry. Not exactly what Avo or Draus needed right now.
Scents warred in the air, exotic meats and different gene-spliced meals trickling forth from the market. The gutters themselves carried the same combo it always did: stale water, fecal matter, and tangy rust.
+Four guards out front,+ Draus said, casting her ghost into his mind.
Their wards shone opaque and dull, shells rife with vulnerabilities. +Could crack them. Drop them. Even with what I have right now.+
+Leave 'em. Keep it quiet. They ain't bright, but even a complete fool can see when a mind's leakin'. We do this with minimal noise.+
With a wave, she sent her microdrone after them, the little machine sailing forth more needle than arrow. Yet, like a thread it greeted the guards, piecing four necks in quick succession. A stumble entered their gait, and then came the nauseous expressions. Groaning, the four stumbled aside, fleeing to their separate corners to empty their stomachs.
Avo frowned. +Hm. Still seems noisy to me.+
Draus shrugged. +They ain't dead. And they ain't gonna report the fact they got sick while on watch to their bosses. Be like it never happened. Now. Let's go find our victim and get this done.+
And, shrouded by their coats and unseen by the guards, two figures slithered into the gutter market to find their mark.
"Look, sometimes shit just goes sideways, and you're not the one who fucked it up. That's not your fault. That's just New Vultun being New Vultun.
But... sometimes... sometimes things just work out."
-Quail Tavers, School of the Warrens
5-10
Blindside
+Nothin' like shitty Syndicate perimeter-sec, eh Avo?+ Draus asked.
They slipped through the unmanned entrance like phantoms given shape only by wind, their holocoats making them peripheral entities; not yet invisible, not quite noticeable. A lone turret drone spun lazily upon its high axis, casting its grided gaze over the four retching guards knelt over by the entrance. Unsupported, its cone-like field of view rendered it an instrument worthy of mockery rather than concern.
Piercing through the thinness of the market's outer defenses, ghoul and Regular stalked past sloppily patrolled checkpoints. Drifting Specters of rudimentary sequences splashed their perception in narrow beams across the foyer, protecting the inner confines of the block's central courtyard.
They were tethered to softly warded minds, wobbling high overhead on strings of phantasmal sinew. Avo scoffed at their make with scorn. The use of a Specter was not in the length of its gaze but in scouting. Hence, the ease of their sequencing; hence, the practice of using them en masse to conceal their deficiencies.
With positions so obvious and routes so rote, it took little for Avo to conduct a bit of counter-scrying of his own measuring, using his Whisper to see where the intersecting paths of perception lay.
As they trailed up a narrow staircase bathed in a clash of flickering neon, a ghost-infused tag along the cracked walls greeted Avo's cog-feed in a blossoming swirl of phantoms.
Head Left to Enter Carnal-Cluster...
And a cluster of carnality it was. Within the market, kiosks and stalls spilled out as if cancerous growths, dotting the entirety of the courtyard and even rising up several stories on platforms and stacks. Quick-fabbed stairs dripped in dollops of clumping matter, the half-life of the print-job encroaching. Yet, the customers cared little, their feet hammering hard down against every step, their eyes fixated only on the flashing ads screaming of new synth-drugs to purchase, or new vicarites to sample.
Music bled into ceaseless battering that entrapped Avo in a cocoon of sound, the breaths of customers and merchants alike coming in gasping inhales as they flagellated any and all who were unfortunate enough to hear their words. Booming vibrations crashed discordantly out of rhythm with one another, like the war drums of two clashing armies, both bereft of discipline.
A haze of angry red slithered over Avo's perception like someone had opened a vein in reality and just let it bleed. Other colors then greeted him like scars amidst the crimson ambiance. The shine of thoughtstuff burned like the simmering detritus of a cigarette cast over a piece of paper, and the blinding shine cast by the storefront signs shrouded an ever-flowing tide of bodies in bright light and shadow, the aesthetic of both people and word myriad in their forms.
To call the gutter market an urban jungle was an insult to its density. This was no jungle. The better conceptualization of its shape was to use suffocation as a noun. No. Cluster. Now the use of the word made sense.
And exposed to so many lives, their scents all varied, all appealing, the beast licked at the pleasure centers of Avo's mind, urging him to consider--just contemplate--the thrill of letting his Domains loose here. The color upon the plascrete then would match the shine in the air. Red on red. And inside, his Soul would burn...
+Avo,+ Draus said, her voice striking him free from his reverie like a steel rod. The urge shattered and the beast slithered away, seething at the Regular as it settled into primal depths burning within Avo's mind.
He grunted.
Her veil was casting her face into fractals now, nothing of her appearance discernable. Still, he could smell her, taste the purity of her scent, and hear the intermittent strength of her thudding heart. The market was flowing chaos, but Draus stood like a defiant stone amidst the river.
A bloodied bruiser encased in the bones of a half-wrecked exoskeleton cracked into her and staggered. Before he could turn to hurl a curse, the moving crowd tore him away, a riptide of flesh carried on clicking knees and weary feet.
A beat of silence ran within their link, though the world yet roared with noise. For a second, he thought she was going to cancel the run. For a second, he could taste the doubt slipping over from her end of their connection.
Instead, she primed him with a question. +You good for this?+
+Yes,+ Avo said, trying to shed the hunger from his voice. +Was just...+
+Thinkin' 'bout killin' everyone? Eatin' everyone?+
+Always.+
Even as deafening synth-pop exploded from his left, Avo heard Draus chuckle. +Was an exercise they teach us, back before I was formally a Reg. Was about visualization, to help some of those... less mentally stable among us stay zoned. Basically, whatever you imagine doin' to someone, imagine you're doing it to yourself. Think of feelin' it. The good or bad. Whatever it is. Keeps you grounded. Helped me some for a while.+
A quiet visited Avo's mind with the concept. To eat another. To eat himself. To kill another. To kill himself. He understood her intent and the purpose of the exercise. To center one's ego as a lodestone against any atrocity or virtuous deed committed.
But a ghoul feasted on pain and violence, and it cared not from whence it was derived. In his infancy, he watched more than a few of his brothers succumb to autosarcophagy--the act of devouring oneself. After all, why seek flesh that is harder to claim when the succulence grew on your very bones?
Avo had taken care not to bite into himself after beholding the outcome. The Low Masters let the faultier of his brothers run their course, and in turn, his other brothers found the self-devourers a most cooperative feast.
+I'll keep control,+ Avo said.
+Haven't shown me otherwise yet,+ Draus replied.
There was a latitude she was showing him. A growing trust. He wondered if it was because of the trials they shared in the Crucible. Or perhaps she just found him too interesting to kill. If that was the case, he could not claim the feeling to be mutual. The beast instead wanted him to kill her, to end her and feed from her in a triumph against an old foe.
But Avo wouldn't. He refused.
Draus wasn't quite a friend. Honestly, he couldn't even claim to know what a friend was. But it had been a long time since there was someone he could rely on since Walton's passing. She wasn't the same. No one would be the same as Walton.
But she was trying to help him. Not trying to stop him. Not trying to chain him.
It was almost as if she understood.
It took them the better part of ten minutes to shoulder through the crowds. More than once, Avo flensed a wandering hand trying to plant something on him. Judging from the sounds of snapping arms, the cries drowned out by the crowds, the Regular was no more gentle than he was.
The thick of the crowd worked on him, iron against iron. Every moment, every sound brayed at his instincts, a taunting call to unfurl the brutality sleeping inside him.
He saw flashes of children--offspring of wagers come down to see the sights, to be granted boons of entertainment with their exhausted parents. Most of them must've been born after the Conception Ban and the rash. Vat-grown, with their births provided on behalf of Voidwatch.
Choiceless. They provided a better buffet against his growing want to harm. Them and their parents.
Without a statement, Draus pulled him free from the current line of foot traffic down to the side as a Syndicate nu-dog emerged out from the corner of a stall, additional eyeballs and nostrils grafted along tendrils, searching for things and people that didn't belong.
Finally, they peeled free from the worst of the thicket, emerging at a clearing before the block's elevator. Steps of polished obsidian led up to the grand pillar of the mega-structure, the heft of its bulk spearing past Layer One and likely even further upward. At its base, a rumbling sound ebbed from behind the gargantuan plasteel doors of the block's central elevator.
From here came the primary installments of shoppers, delivered in batches up and down the block. The lower ends of the block were a bit like an entertainment center in that sense. More establishments dotted the stairs sinking along the sides of the elevator door. A grafter was practicing somewhere in the lower right wing of the block, their holo-ads promising betaware cybernetics cleared for high-intensity combat encounters.
To the left there was a single sign: Butcher's Lair.
A symphony of howled glee followed the echoing bellows of some manner of bioform. Beneath his feet, Avo felt a wash of vibrations run up and rattle his claws. Whatever was fighting tonight was large and heavy.
+Alright,+ Draus said, as a whistling sound signaled the return of her microdrone. +We might-gotta few minutes before--+
The elevator doors groaned, a hiss of air washing out as heated mist. Shoppers spewed forth from its interior as their sweat-soaked wagers staggered out, bodies wan of flesh and festooned with budge chrome.
Amongst them, coming forth from the very back strode a figure, unlike all the others. Her slatted coat rattled with each of her thumping steps. Her shadow, meanwhile, was a vastness that covered those behind her in their entirety. Neither Draus nor Avo could be described as diminutive, but Captain Aseleri was a ponderous mass of bio-enhanced muscle lined with spots of chrome.
Two of her crew flanked her sides, neither one recognizable to Avo. The attention he gifted them was brief, however, as another figure drew Avo's focus.
This one he did recognize. He had seen her across the holo-feed of the barge's bridge and watched her scream alongside her sister as her father was executed. Now, she was like a hollowed ruin nested inside the shell of a girl.
Aesthetic bioware lined her skin like moving blots of ink. A thin membranous structure expanded from her back like that of a butterfly. Her body was bare along the arms and legs while her torso was caged in a prisoner's harness, gripping her like a metallic lattice. From her neck, a holotag swayed in the front, the imps of her person and the active mods she was showcasing listed along different lines. Behind, Aseleri held her on a similar leash that was used on the father--Essus.
+Shit,+ Draus snorted derisively, +weren't pissin' around when you said she needed killin'.+
Avo clacked his teeth. Inside, the beast shook itself loose from its brief exile, grinning at the presence of the captain. +Seen the girl before as well. Watched Aseleri execute her father. Limited seating.+
+Is that why she killed him?+ Draus asked sardonically.
+Was the excuse,+ Avo said.
Even amongst the labor-stricken masses did the captain and her maw-divers stink. More than stench drew Avo to them, however, as he felt a familiar entropy clinging to their bodies, the very same kind that he wielded when venting his Hell.
Perhaps his First Circle and the Maw were tied, then? At least in design. A question for the Agnos later. Within his cog-feed she and her two crew flared with a silvery outline, Draus marking them from the crowd.
+Reckon you make for her now,+ Draus said.
Avo watched as Aseleri doddered forward, swigging a large bottle of Taver's Black in one hand while steering her peddled showcase slave with her right.
Clearly, the captain was looking to offload her "goods" before she was to make her descent into the Butcher's Lair. Imps came from a sold slave, and imps gave one more room to make bets.
But this also presented a unique opportunity. One that Avo was keen to capitalize on.
+Draus,+ Avo said, trying to hide the fact that he was salivating. +Got an idea. A better one.+
If he pitched this right, Draus could help him isolate the captain and her crew. His wants coincided with their objective: to keep this op silent and efficient.
+No,+ Draus said, +Changing the objectives at the last--+
+Not that. The slave. We can use her. Isolate Aseleri and her crew. Make kill away from sight. Even lower risk.+
The Regular froze. All the while, the captain hawked her slave, hollering loud, voice sweeping through the market. +You wanna lure her someplace private under the pretenses of buyin' the mods out from that girl? Or even the girl herself?+
+Yes.+
+Might work,+ Draus said. +Also makes me wonder a few things. Like if you're doing it for whatever vendett--.+
+Yes.+ Avo admitted. What reason was there to lie. +She's a slaver runner. Murderer. Sold me to Crucible. Want to eat her. Want to do it slow. An opportunity is now present to eat her. Do it quietly too. Why shouldn't I take it?+
To that, Draus gave him a slight nod. +That honesty of yours is gonna get you in trouble.+
+Am I in trouble now?+
Draus breathed, considering.
+Please,+ Avo added. +...It's what a consang would do. We can go free more slaves from her ship. Is good. Ethical.+
A strange absurdity filled him as he cast the word at her using his mind. He felt as if a ghoulling again, begging Walton for permission to eat the neighbor's nu-cat. The answer to that request had often been a soft no.
+Ethical.+ Draus said. +You know, Avo. I'm beginning to wonder if you're just... using that word when you want to justify a killin', but...+ The captain clamped down on the shock trigger to the girl's collar, forcing her skin to shift its colors and earning a hoarse scream out from the mod-slave.
A beat followed. A spark of bloodlust simmered into their shared link, and this time, it didn't come from Avo's end. Draus sighed. +Hells. You think you can do that thing you did with Vicious again? The one where you make wings out of their organs.+
Avo grinned. +Might be able to do better. Can also dissolve evidence now. Hell's working this time.+
+Well,+ Draus said, cracking her neck, +Suppose that'll be interesting to see. Want me to make the approach?+
+Yeah,+ Avo said. +Might still remember my voice.+
The Regular approached the captain with casual confidence. Her veil had switched to reflective fractals and she intercepted the path of the drunk maw-diver.
"Hey, you," Draus said, trying to keep the scorn out of her voice. "Hold on a minute there. How much for her?"
A slight burp worked its way free from Aseleri's mouth as she looked Draus up and down, frowning at the obfuscated figure before her. Holocoats weren't uncommon in the city, but they were made popular by street squires and snuffers specifically. Generally, people who didn't want to leave a visual footprint. Said kinds of people also weren't exactly the most trusted types in society.
"Right, right," Aseleri said. She tried to point at the prices projected from the girl's holotag, missed, then managed on her second attempt. "See you aren't much of a reader. It's... uh... written right here."
"Nah," Draus said, shaking off the giantess' words like they were nothing. "I mean the real price. Somethin' that might just make us keen to a bit more business. Maybe by the batch?"
A momentary confusion peeled across Aseleri's face as she tried to decipher what was being asked. "I... yeah. Mr. Larkton." She handed the leash over to one of her accompanying crew. "I must apologize. Haven't... haven't made your acquaintance yet. Captain Aseleri of Mawfarer II." She hiccuped and grinned. "And... unofficial destroyer of the Mawfarer I."
Draus just nodded. "Well. Good meetin' you, Aseleri. You know a place where we can talk proper?" She revealed a flash of her imps, a constellation of motes shining like diamonds before the slave runner's eyes.
Aseleri immediately sobered up at the sight of currency and cracked a broad smile. "Yes, yes, I think I do. You uh... you come along now. Let me get you a proper drink."
The detour that followed was a short one. Draus trailed behind the babbling Aseleri and her crew while Avo lingered a bit further, trying to keep some distance in case anyone was watching. They might not be able to locate him using a Recollector thanks to his holocoat, but a tail was still something that could be obviously spotted.
He found the journey's end to be a long cluster of cubes lining the corner of the courtyard. Shines of thoughtstuff flashed through the opacity of each glass chamber squared along the wall. He guessed this was where certain Syndicate deals were struck. Pitiful.
With a scan of her Meta, the captain called open the doors to one such booth and waved for Draus to head in first. With the crowd thinning along this quarter of the market, Avo clung closer to the shadows and moved with caution, casting his Whisper to get a bird's eye view.
It was only when the booths were quiet and straying eyes were few that he made his move. The local nu-dog was missing and the turret overseeing the area likewise was too narrow to notice him again.
Drawing upon the power of his Heaven, he pushed his blood along the doorframe and unlocked the haptic mechanism from the inside. The door hissed open. He stepped into the booth, its length more like a miniature meeting room.
"... and so, I ended up installing the Neuraskin in her," Aseleri said, gesturing to the shifting shivering girl kneeling before Draus, the mod-slave's colors a constant flux of change. "Even got a new tagline for it. Neuraskin: Think gorgeous, think pretty--"
She finally noticed Avo standing at the end of the room. With a wave of his hand, the doors closed again.
"Ah," Draus said gesturing to Avo. "My associate's here."
Aseleri blinked. "Asso--"
Avo fired his Celerostylus and his Heaven free. From his veins, he cast three branches of flowing blood. Two crashed into Aseleri's crew, piercing their bodies. With a thought, he alchemized their blood and bent their bodies under his control, slamming them hard against the ground.
Aseleri, possessing a lesser reflex booster but a reflex booster nonetheless, unleashed her Ghostjack on him again, her phantasmal weapons flashing free at the speed of thought. A constellation of sequences burned across her Metamind as the shape of her Ghostjack flared into existence.
Yet, despite possessing such a powerful instrument, despite bringing him low a mere two days ago with a casual thought, this time, her ghost-fused weapons crashed against him and splashed off his wards.
His cog-feed screamed, the strain placed on his cog-cap high but sustainable. She disgusted him. Blessed with the single most versatile phantasmic there was, she wielded it sloppily like a phantasmal hammer, making nothing but missiles of trauma to be dashed against his wards.
His final branch sank through her gut and snapped her into the air with a flick. Aseleri gasped, a mouthful of blood spewing free. Avo caught the flow and forced it back into her mouth. He manually kept her blood flowing.
She would not get to die so easily. Not from internal bleeding. Not from the trauma. Grasping feebly at the pillar of crimson forced through her liver, Aseleri gasped and writhed. "F-fuck... why... who?"
Avo dropped his veil and lifted his helmet. Through the haze of pain on her face, he watched as recognition dawned across her features and knew it to be a beautiful thing.
"Oh... oh, Jaus... oh, fuck me."
"Must apologize," Avo said, drawing Aseleri in close with a twitch of a finger. "We've met. But I haven't formally made your acquaintance. Was rude of me. Now. I'm ready to make up for lost time."
The fact that Draus was grinning as well didn't escape his notice.
You know... I didn't have a father growing up, but I remember being raised by several. One was abusive. The other two were just there. The last was a decent man who died too soon.
But... You have to understand, none of them were actually mine. They were just burned into me, memories spreading like... Like conflagration.
Have you ever gotten your mind Jacked? The feeling don't fit the mold of my words... hard to describe it.
Have you ever drowned in your own memories without even noticing? It's like that... except they aren't your memories sometimes. New pieces are added in. You remember talking to someone you never met. You remember a nu-dog you never owned. And eventually, as the deception metastasizes inside you, whoever you were isn't the same anymore.
Caught a mem-con during the war. Was the lucky one in my unit--the delta carrier for the plague. Low Masters sequenced a vile thing for us, it was like a silent wildfire burning through our links, pouring the smog into my mind.
...
What the fuck was I saying again? Ah. Never mind.
Just remember to kill the Necrojacks first.
-Mem-Log of Vincentine “Ripperjack” Javvers, Head of the Scalpers Syndicate
5-11
Ghostjack
THAUMIC CYCLER: 59 THAUM/c
GHOSTS: [52]
REND CAPACITY: 7%...
A mingling spillage of sloppy viscera pooled across the floor, leftovers from the meal Avo made of Captain Aseleri's two former aides. They had been wrung clean like towels of shattering bone and tearing flesh after Avo discovered the limits of their use. Then, he found a final use for them.
Unlike Jessa--the one Avo named Hap-Tat--killing them was an easy thing. Walton hated slavers, and there was no closer one could get than directly making a sale.
Avo smiled and imagined his father to be proud. So rare.
Meanwhile, Aseleri's screams betrayed her unfamiliarity with pain.
A weakness most unfortunate seeing as Avo was unlatching her ligaments from her bones. Her tissues were woven with strength, and that strength betrayed her. No ordinary diver nor snuffer could have afforded bioware of such sophistication; bones and muscles built to serve her body in a synchronous union.
She reeked of Low Guilder. Disgraced Low Guilder, judging from the cost it would take to engineer a body like hers. She was someone that had known the pleasures of the Tiers, but fell hard from grace, crashing down into the putrescent sprawl that was the Warrens.
He held her aloft on wires of blood, his tendrils snaking beneath her skin, the slicing root tips of his Heaven growing deep. Beads of sweat cascaded down her forehead mingling with her flooding tears. The way the pleas sang from her throat was like that of a child, whines, beggings, tantrums all coiled together.
The captain's arm was folded backward along her back, the ball of her limb scooping her cartilage free from its socket. He had mangled her insides again when she made a second try to lash his mind with her Ghostjack.
This time, he was more audience than an adversary in judging her capabilities; again, he found her wanting. This Ghostjack was not hers--it could not be. Her use of it was that of an ignoramus-- a child gifted the hammer and forge from a smithy. She had taken to using it as a blunt instrument, shaping missiles of trauma from ghosts and ripping at his memories, her feeble attack sliding off his wards, like nails snapping upon a chalkboard.
From her, he wrung dry the last of her will and drew her up on wires of tungsten-infused blood, arms spread. She swayed there like a piece of battered meat, gibbering, thoughtstuff straining against the cage of her shoddily maintained protections.
He greeted as a butcher would a prime cut of meat. Too bad she still didn't fully understand her situation.
Aseleri spat a clatter of teeth and blood at his feet.
Avo nodded, accepting her ill feelings toward him. And then promptly responded by fusing sharp grains of jagged blood inside her kidneys, and letting it flow along the tubes of her tract. The sounds he earned from her made the beast nesting beneath his skin chitter with glee. There was a spice that torture added to the body and mind; something that would come useful when he sequenced new phantasmics down the line.
But ultimately, that was just a secondary reason why he was inflicting this pain. The truth was that she made for good feeding, that she could make the beast go quiet if but for a while.
"Aseleri," Avo said, waiting for the captain's eyes to finish rolling. "Hear me? Have a few questions to ask you."
Behind him, he could hear Draus laughing in disbelief. "Jaus. Avo, you're supposed to ask the questions before you torture someone. Even if they are a half-strand."
"Got carried away."
"Yeah," she said, looking at the enmeshed mess of interlocking flesh that remained of the captain's aides, "Reckon 'carried away' would've gotten me an official court martial for the war crimes you're committing."
"War crimes?" Avo said. "Guilds follow those?"
"Sure. When they're fighting other Guilds and, uh, official citizens..." Draus cocked her head at the captain. "The FATELESS, well, they're a work in progress, so to speak."
Now it was Avo's turn to laugh.
"Fuck... you, both," Aseleri said, barely managing to spit the words free. Clumps of viscera dangled from her cracked teeth. She turned to glare at Draus with her bloodshot eyes. "Are you just going to let this... fucking thing torture me. Work me to death? I was a citizen. I was somebody! I lived in the fucking Tiers!"
"Well, that makes the three of us, then," Draus, for her part, flicked a glance at the former slave.
The husk of a girl was huddled in the corner, her skin boiling in an aurora of hues. Her eyes trailed off, transfixed by the unfolding brutality being inflicted upon her former enslaver. A broken expression between horror and schadenfreude crept over her face. Her mind, meanwhile, hissed in puffs of steam, her thoughts vaporous; the steaming hiss belying her mental collapse.
"Yeah," Draus continued, "yeah, I suppose I am fine with watching him torture you to death. What can I say? Shit rolls uphill; shit rolls downhill." Her focus shifted to Avo. "But that bein' said, you played long enough. I let you feed the ghoul, and reckon it's plenty fed. Get what you came for. Get this done."
Draus' request immediately drew the beast's attention. It pleaded with Avo now to keep going, to kill the captain, take her Ghostjack, and kill the Regular as well. But, sated as it was, the urges were weaker, more easily wrestled.
Avo exhaled. Stepping away from his bloodlust was long a struggle, like scrubbing tar using only his hands. Some of it always clung. But today, it was weaker after being fed. And so, he shoved it back down, knowing that once he had a Ghostjack, he would finally be able to reclaim a modicum of control.
He walked away from the captain then, his lashing blood extending like an ever-growing chain. Over to the slave girl he walked. He looked down at her, and in her childlike expression, found naught but confusion. Her mind was exhausted from warring with itself, too much stimulus experienced in too narrow a wind of time. Avo wondered what happened to her sister. Siblings were rarely sold as a pair.
"Wait," Aseleri said, her word's slurred from numbness and pain. "Wha--what're you doing?"
From his palm, Avo shaped a long blade and left it manifest using his Canon of Linger. It grew more than it was forged, the helixes of his ichor linking and joining in mimicry of a blade pattern. Its shape was simple. Crude. Sufficient.
From his being, it clattered free: an offering of retribution made manifest.
REND CAPACITY: 13%
She looked down at the crimson blade and back up at him, not comprehending what he wanted.
The beast wove urges and desires, wondering if her modded skin would taste any different and if he should flay it from her flesh for a sample. But beyond his basest self, Avo had another curiosity he sought to indulge.
He was not the only one harmed by Aseleri, brief though his hurt might've been. Perhaps what he could offer here would give the mod slave a measure of peace. See things made right.
She gazed upon the gifted weapon, its fluid-metallic quality casting the contours of her form back at her. A blossom of blue bloomed across her body. Her thoughtstuff sank inward in a sudden collapse. Her expression cracked into a face-wrinkling sob.
She did not reach for his blade. She never reached for his blade. Instead, her arms were used to hold herself as she wept.
The show of vulnerability called to Avo's hunger. Mostly, he was just disappointed. Ever frail was a baseline mind. Ever frail was unalloyed humanity.
"She don't got it, Avo," Draus said. "She don't got it. Let her be."
Intruding into dialogue, Aseleri snorted out a laugh. "Ah. Yeah. Suppose... suppose I was always good at picking the best... product."
Avo faced her. "Picked wrong with me."
Her smile faded. She coughed. "Now. Wait. I think I might just be ready to talk with you--"
Her death interrupted whatever she was going to say next. He sliced through her skull from the inside, haemokinetic blades unzipping the contents of her flesh during the ascent. Upon reaching the summit, they passed, melded, and sagged, dolloping like the petals of a flower, cupping clumps of bone. Her exposed brain, and nerves then formed a twisted mockery of a pistil. If she still possessed a face, she would have screamed, and loud would her cries be.
But he didn't need that from her. Not anymore. The wavelengths of her thoughtstuff were a sea beset with a storm of storms, tidal waves of trauma crashing and rising and crashing again.
He fed more blood to her brain then, keeping her alive if but for a moment more. He knew not if she was still there when his claws dug into the softness of her grey matter. He only knew the moment she wasn't when he finally bit into her.
To his displeasure, there was nothing that tasted so different from her mind. Amorality held the flavor of banality, the same as any being.
Her will and cognition came aware as he drank all that she was into him. In those final moments, he felt the walls of her wards collapse, shielding nothing.
He speared his Whisper into her exposed mind and claimed his prize.
THAUMIC CYCLER: 60 THAUM/c
REND CAPACITY: 18%...
ESTABLISHING GHOST-LINK
LINKING…
LINK COMPLETE - HOST UNDETECTED
LINK COMPLETE - HOST UNDETECTED
SIPHONING GHOSTS … [30]
GHOSTS - [82]
DOWNLOADING PHANTASMIC SEQUENCES…
DOWNLOADED
PHANTASMICS ACTIVE - [GHOSTJACK]; [TORTOISE OMNIWARD]; [AUTO-SEANCE]
Avo unsequenced the other two phantasmics; they were of no use to him. With bated breath, he claimed his prize, mouth watering as he felt the Ghostjack slowly linking with the base of his Metamind. More than any other phantasmic, he felt the power of his cognition strengthen, shaping the accretion of his thoughts into mutable wavelengths.
Shaped something between a broadcast tower and a sigil of a sword, the Ghostjack rose through the raging stratocumulus that was his sphere-shaped wards. Within his palace, he felt its base reach out and link with all his sequences. Constellations came afire in his mind. His presence flowed forth, washing over all those around him.
He knew not how Aseleri claimed this Ghostjack. Lucky scavenge was his closest guess. She couldn't have been trained in its use, however, and knew nothing of its greatest potential.
Ghostjack was a phantasmic. Same as a sequenced Specter or an in-built Ghost-Link. But not all phantasmics were built the same. Not all phantasmics could reach upward across planes into the very tapestry of the Nether instead of just manifesting where the mind was relative to other minds. Not all phantasmics could directly edit the sequences instead of merely rerouting them.
Little wonder why Ori-Thaum sought to withhold them from the market early on.
Aseleri was a fool. She kept the instrument like a weapon of surprise and wielded it as little more than a platform that fired mind-warping munitions fueled by ghosts.
Avo knew better. And with it, he finally felt whole.
Nearly whole. It wasn't his Ghostjack. He still needed to find his. But this was close. This was a replacement. This was a worthy transplant. He would have traded one of his Heavens for this. Mostly the Galeslither, since it lacked a Hell anyway.
"She still didn't answer your questions," Draus said sardonically.
"Her ghost will speak. Better than her person ever could."
The Regular nodded at that. "So. We done here?"
Avo grunted. Reaching out with his blood, he collected the gore and viscera he felt behind, squeezing it all together in a swirling clump.
"Wanted to see the Hell right?"
Draus leaned back and gestured for him to show her.
He vented, netting the sphere of gore with his entropic squall. In seconds, the gust sheared all physical matter away from existence like salt slaved to the flow of water.
"Well," Draus said, nodding appreciatively, "that would've come in real handy for some of that wetwork I used to do. You keep workin' at that Godclad thing. Might even be a new Heaven for you to make. Avo: Heaven of Corpse Disposal."
Avo hummed in response. Jesting though she was, the idea did make him wonder if he could somehow make his entropic shroud last longer, use it as a deployable bomb instead of a lashing limb.
Good thing he had an Agnos to consult.
He collected what few drips of blood he missed and drew it inside himself. Around them, the dim ambiance of the booth gave nothing away. No cameras nor ghosts scried upon their persons. None would be witness to his deeds.
None, other than the girl.
In the corner, the former mod slave continued to sob, inconsolable now that her momentary reverie was broken. She saw herself, and the reflection stuck bone, reopening prior wounds and leaving her unmade.
Draus made to take the girl. Leave no evidence. Avo halted her with a gesture.
"She can walk," he said.
The expression on Draus' face told him of her doubt. "I know she technically--"
His Ghostjack flared a burning sigil calling upon a swell of ghosts. The constellations of his phantasmics shone through the blacked sheath of his storm-coated wards. From the halo of his Metamind, he cast his thoughts at the girl and poured his cognition into her like an avalanche.
Bare and unwarded, he could have connected to her mind with his Ghost-Link as well, but sharing a mind with her or planting a shiv inside of her was what it could do.
Using his Ghostjack, he didn't bridge with her. No. He swam. Bereft of a proper palace, he pushed his mind deep into hers, submerging into a grey, mechanical ocean, its water running in conflicting spirals, each flowing to their own sequence, the tides alive with madness.
"Avo?" he heard Draus call, "What are you--"
"Quiet," he said, only faintly aware of his own body.
He was a diver, surgeon, and engineer right now. More than that, he was an architect and artist. This was his practice. This was his worship. And within seconds, he found the screaming rapids that led to the trauma he sought.
Bubbled by the submersible that was his wards, he checked again and deactivated all his presently useless phantasmics besides the Ghostjack and the Memguard. Diverting the majority of the capacity to his protection, he pushed deep into the angry maelstrom.
The structure of her inner mind was different than what was beyond. Metaminds gave simulated representations for navigation. Here though, deeper yet, were the memories themselves—hardened strips of remembrance that lingered.
From her eyes, he watched as she saw the death of her father; tasted her despair as her sister died on the operating table next to her, body rejecting the mods. The sequence was raw and hot with pain, cooking against Avo's armor and spiking cognitive capacity. The additional ghosts he downloaded from Aseleri's mind had proven to be an ample buffer against her hurt, but her trauma was immense.
COG-CAP: 28%
And immensely valuable.
Avo smiled in appreciation, mouth widening in delight. Her pain was not for nothing. It would serve him as a most potent weapon to shred enemy minds once he tore down their defensive traumas.
He wondered if the hurt he caused Aseleri herself would match it.
DOWNLOADING TRAUMA-PATTERN [ASELERI'S FOLLY]
A fitting name for a versatile weapon. One he could bind to delivery constructs like triggers, bombs, contagions, mind strikes, or even missiles.
GHOSTS: [81]
He fed one of his ghosts an overdose of positive memory sequences, filling it to the brim without more detailed work. With a thought, he released it into her turbulent waters, its joyous burn greeting the inferno of the girl's pain, the strain of her trauma lessening almost immediately.
When he had the time, he would need to finish this dive properly. Something to do while unconscious to achieve maximum focus. The trauma inside her was a spreading inflammation. If it wasn't cut out entirely, it would consume her.
Right now, he lacked the proper patterns. He needed more joyous memories to weaken the traumas. Constructs of melancholy to root her mind in fixation while he was conducting the extraction. Specific traumas to perform precise edits without shearing an essential concept from her mind and leaving her vegetable.
For now, addled would do.
Halting the broadcast of his ghosts, Avo felt a faint prickle of static rain across his body as his physical senses was at the forefront again.
Inside, the beast recoiled, suddenly noticing the return of his mind. The loudness of her pain had drowned it out momentarily. It was afraid. Good. It was going back inside its cage, where it belonged.
A Morality Inducer wasn't a complex construct to make, and Avo remembered the design well. Walton had made sure of that.
Across the room, the girl giggled and sobbed in equal measure, rising as emotions cycled across her face.
"Jaus, Avo," Draus said, disturbed by the insanity playing across the face of the former slave, "the fuck did you do to her?"
"Diluted trauma with a cluster of joys. Mind defaulting. Should be compliant right now. Won't last. Ghost will fragment eventually. Should take her and go now. You take her. I'll deal with the guards.”
Draus nodded. "Hey, uh. We're gonna... we're gonna get you out of here."
"Okay," the girl said, smiling brightly as tears trailed down her cheeks. Her skin was a battleground between between red and blue, the inky colors clashing in a grand charge. "Okay."
“Avo... You can do that. You can. It isn’t that efficient is the thing.
No two wards are the same. No two phantasmics are the same. Even ones made from similar sequences. People remember the same thing differently. And different things? Even more, so--
Wait. Let's refocus. Yeah, I know there's an aratnid in the vents. A whole nest actually. If you pay attention, you might just be able to discern the thought accretion that bubble from its young as well. Yeah. The aratnid's a mother.
How long does it take for aratlings to grow up?
...Heh. Now that's a question I don't know. Come on. Let's comb the Nether."
-"Walton," instructing [Redacted] on the basics of Necrotheurgy.
5-12
Exhalation
Departing the Carnal Cluster was a bit less than a trifle. The greatest folly rested mostly on the Syndicate Necrojacks, their gazes pointed outward, with scant few amongst them running patrols. Even then, those diligent few played at their duties with half-hearted intent, flying their Specters high and visible as if kites for all to see, making them easy to avoid.
From the gathered crowd, Avo stole flickers of knowledge, palming small pieces of surface thoughts with the pooling presence of his Ghostjack. His broadcast was subtle, spoof memories to meld with minds unwary and unprotected. He slipped in beneath notice, connecting to them by the exploitation of their short-term memories.
Who would think it strange to suddenly remember a random kiosk they just saw, after all? Or regard the sudden appearance of someone wearing a synthjacket in their mind's eye as more than an intrusive thought. Yet, shrouded beneath their ignorance, Avo plucked at their recent memories, using them to avoid the patrols and nu-dogs all the same.
Throughout it all, he savored the sensation of reaching out into the Nether again. Not merely floating. Not merely a vehicle. Now, he was melded, his Ghostjack allowing him to reach up into the cognitive plane that was scaffolded atop reality.
By the time he reached the perimeter, escape was a simple thing of injecting a crude edit of distilled rage into a customer who had already been swindled twice. It was enough to bridge the gulf between their frustration and fury proper. Few questioned why their anger grew when it already had a reason to burn. And few in the crowd were surprised when a disgruntled wager finally leaped into a stall to begin "renegotiations" regarding a faulty product they were sold.
They drew the attention of the guards when the first punch was thrown. And where attention was drawn, gaps formed. The metaphorical dam of security began to tear, opening in folds and leaks.
The guards of the outer perimeter were still incapacitated when ghoul, Regular, and slave crossed them, bodies sheened with sweat, with puddles of fetid clumps painting their writhing bodies.
+Thank Jaus for Syndicate security,+ Avo said, echoing Draus' earlier words.
She laughed.
Through the dark of the gutters again, they crossed a quiet street, neon ads clashing, flashing, and changing as higher and higher bids showcased a cyclic war of eternal product placement. At the end of the street, the gazes of gutter-juvs remained fixed on the fire, their emaciated bodies laden with cheap chrome surrounded by patches of scabs.
They extracted in the same vehicle they came in on. The inauspicious Doldrum served their purpose well, sinking low behind the cover G-Station as its side doors opened to allow for boarding.
"I... I circled the area... three... three-hundred and twenty... twenty-two times," Kae said, proudly. "Made... made the patterns random... I think... I think my... my forgetfulness helped!" She giggled bitterly. "For once--it... uh... it was useful!"
"Yeah, sounds great," Draus said, her words thin and distracted, her mind occupied by other concerns. Avo held a fair guess as to what. Her eyes had been fixed on him during their exfiltration. A conversation was undoubtedly in their future.
Guided by her leash, the former mod-slave boarded the aerovec giggling like a child between sobbing chokes. None gave her much regard within the market. Just another overly neuromodded, overly engineered piece of meat; a creature so commonplace that she was a bland offering amidst the many eccentricities in the market, more wallpaper than a person.
"Who... who's this?" Kae asked, her tone taking on a confused note.
"Salvage," Draus said. She shot Avo a look. "And test-subject if we're gonna be all honest."
Leave it to the former Highflame Regular to carry old fears of cognitive defilement. Such was the art that Ori-Thaum wielded against them, after all. Where Highflame was a thaumaturgic and militaristic powerhouse in the real, they survived only behind vast, warded fortresses in the Nether, constantly straining against the unending assault that Ori-Thaum and other freelance Necros inflicted upon them.
What a strange thing it was, to be a lion in one world, and a lamb in the other.
Avo studied the thoughtstuff of the mod-slave. Already, his ghost was fragmenting, the flow of her mind clamping inward akin to a jaw closing around a beam of cracking glass. Soon, the blue clouding her flesh would swallow the red. Injected feelings were things ever-fleeting, but traumas and emotions anchored properly to a mind were like scars and wells both. So long as the thinker remained, how then could they run dry of their own memories?
"She'll be broken again," Avo said. He strapped himself within the aerovec's gimbal, watching Draus do the same for the slave. "Soon."
"Put any thoughts as to what we're gonna do with this one?" Draus asked. "Ain't keepin' her with us, that's for damn sure. Ain't equipped to fix someone this broken."
At that, Kae narrowed her eyes at the Regular. "I... I think she can get better."
Draus nodded. "Yeah. Sure, so do I. But you gonna be the one to pay the imps for her therapy?"
"I'll extract the sequences," Avo said. "Useful. Good for weapons. Bioware also useful. Aesthetic. Sell it to the No-Dragons. Leave her with them."
"Don't like leavin' a trail that leads back to us, Avo," Draus said.
"Will scrub her mind clean. Give her new identity. Plant a false trail if anyone links us."
That struck a beat of silence into the Regular. Again, she looked upon Avo, but there was something new in her stare now. A new tension. "So. You weren't lyin' when you said you was a pretty decent 'Jack."
Avo grunted. "You haven't seen decent yet."
She exhaled and began strapping herself into her own gimbal as well. "Hells. Your father... ah, Walton was it? Must've been a real special guy."
"You said that before. During the Crucible."
"Nah," Draus said, shaking her head as she clapped her mag-belts together, "I didn't mean this special before. Mean it now, though."
A low breath snaked out from Avo's nostrils, a mixed noise. Her honesty, he appreciated. The admission that she thought his father was some kind of invalid, he did not. The beast was clawing inside his chest, begging him to crack the minds of all those present, to tear them asunder and ascend alone.
He had the Ghostjack. He was a whole person again. He didn't need them. He didn't. Avo swallowed. He wasn't even hungry right now. He just wanted to kill. "Draus. Silence is better than honesty sometimes."
She barked a laugh. "And sometimes if you don't be honest, that shit can go from a feelin' to problem mighty quick." She shrugged. "We might as well clear the air early. Get stuff cleaned up between us."
On that, he could agree. "Yeah. Want to talk about my Ghostjack?"
"I wanna talk about settin' some boundaries is all. Later."
That, he understood.
***
The local Nether was filled with recollections plucked from recently made ghosts; crude vicarities remembering an exchange of gunfire between Dead Lotus and the Neon Bleeders from multiple perspectives.
What apparently started as a dispute over who held the right to which taxable sky-lane descended into violence as local enforcers and drone jocks sought to settle things by gauss and firepower. Knots of golems, then, were called in. Including one that had a nearly filled Rendsink to begin with.
As a result, they had to take an alternate route due to a spatial tear bleeding intrusive counter-chronologic entities into the Y-Y-23 Red Express lane.
According to Kae, seeing as a golem lacked a Soul to keep feeding the Rupture, she expected the destabilization to last no more than mere minutes before it burned through the last of its borrowed Soulfire, leaving only the Rend. One of the Syndicates would probably use it to make a bomb or munition sometime soon, useless as it was for anything else.
They made it back to Xin Yunsha beneath the lethargy of mid-day traffic, a full hour later than expected but a few thousand imps richer. One of the imp-collector ghosts was leaking visible sequences of memory. Sequences that Avo studied and spoofed, allowing him to intrude into the construct and make a few changes of his own.
IMPS: [2722]
A sea of scintillating motes instilled the accretion of his thoughts with a nebula-like shine while sinking past the roiling clouds of his wards. In the back of his mind, Avo heard the light chimes sounded by the cognitive entities that were the imps. Supposedly, they were created by the excess thaumic resonance unleashed when the Nether was first installed. Most just accepted them as an easy, cog-tangible form of currency.
It was better than physical money. Too many Heavens of Riches, Wealth, and Prosperity already used that as an attack vector.
Still, Avo was pleased to have money again. He was even more pleased that he got to steal from a Syndicate.
They landed in a quiet lot located at the heart of a downward-slopping neighborhood, a few blocks away from the Second Fortune. A myriad of lights greeted their descent, some bioluminescent, some holographic; all neon. Dancing splotches of ink played advertisements across billboards of paper-like skin lining the side of smaller buildings, their surfaces infused with living tattoos.
Then, taking different routes, they each made their way back to the Second Fortune, Avo with the slave, Draus with Kae.
"Don't eat 'er," Draus said.
"Try not to," Avo said.
The approach the Regular took to covering her tracks was near-overkill, but near-overkill was sometimes insufficient in this city. With how many people had Recollector constructs at their disposal, and how many eyes were watching every corner of New Vultun, the only way to hide from the panopticon was to break from the routine and disrupt patterns of movement.
Already, the No-Dragons were probably suspicious. Avo would need to see if he could work an angle on Green River somehow. Find out just how much more she knew. That would take some careful work. As much as she revealed, her knowledge was more tied to the Frame and less to his capabilities.
The Ghostjack, then, would remain his best tool. One that he sought to keep hidden from as many as possible. Aseleri's mistakes were never going to be his, but still, her foolishness served as a reminder of Walton's teachings.
What he had was more than a mere weapon platform. And he did not need to be in visual sight of someone to null them.
Behind, the mod-slave was whimpering, her mind collapsing back under the weight of trauma. Draus had handed him her shock leash and he had taken it off. As much as he wanted to peel and sample her skin, he had no taste in keeping her chained. She had been treated enough like a nu-dog. If she were to break, another dose of joy should be enough to soothe her senses.
Along the streets, a train car hovered by, packed to the brim with children and their mothers, leaving a trail of laughter and thoughtstuff tinged with excitement. His holocoat and helmet kept his incognito just fine, though he found himself wishing he had an Incog phantasmic to parry any attention that might fall upon his person.
Above, the projection of a false sun shone as a splotch of darkness built at its core, a live simulacrum of the actual daystar slowly succumbing to its thaumic twin. Even in the Warrens there were wealthier districts and poorer districts. The gulf between Yunsha and Mazza's Junction--much less Burner's Way--was a magnitude of worlds.
From sloped roofs ribbed with jaded bricks, wind-chimes rang in the air. Across doorways, more figures of myth and legend from Old Sangshan, their looping animations portraying them as guardians of homes and establishments. Of course, outside walked the actual guardians. Bioforms implanted with weapons both biological and cybernetic, their Sang owners roaming behind them, encased in suits of living armor.
Short was the distance between a little government and a Syndicate. Somewhere, the Sang that governed this place must've indulged in their own set of horrors. But after Conflux, his appreciation came easy for an organization that could maintain its own buildings.
+STEEEEEEEEEAMMMMM BUNSSSS!+ A loud wail of phantasmal excitement washed out from a hovering aerovec. It projected a holovid of a dancing nu-bear of some monochrome variant riding on a massive tiger made of animated dough. +Any dog-headed wanderer can court death amidst the metal mountains of New Vultun! But only the wise will move to pre-emptively still the groanings of their stomachs. Be you wise or a dog-head, wanderer?+
That drew a low laugh from him. He thought Walton might've bought him a meal from an auto vendor much like this one. A lion head was his Metamind's direct translation. Still, despite the delectable scent of meat, Avo never had the taste for dough. Soft and clingy, it clung too much to his fangs.
Behind him, he heard the pattering footsteps of the girl stop.
"Wait," she said.
He could already see the top of the Second Fortune. The sooner he got back and met up with Draus, the soon the girl could be offloaded to the grafter; her bioware sold for profit.
"Please, wait," the girl choked out, her eyes red. Turning, he glanced at her mind and found his earlier shot of joy dissolved. Yet, despite the obvious tumult afflicting the waters of her thoughts, she had not caved in as she had before. Not yet. "I... I want to eat."
Beside them, the auto vendor roared with mind-drowning laughter. +Master Baozi senses hunger! Master Baozi says: you cannot channel the full powers of the Heavens when hungry! Fill your core, wanderer! Do not let your body down, lest it let you down in return!+
Avo studied the former slave. A conversation occurred between the many voices governing his person. The beast was the first to be strangled, its desires nothing but brutal banalities. Practicality, then, called to Avo. To pull her along. With her being an obvious mod slave, the people of the district might take note. Might remember. He needed to get her out of the street before--
A sour note bled out from her mind. Most human emotions splashed off against Avo's mind. Too much asymmetry; too little empathy from his end. What she bore against him, however, was potent. Just the right angle. Just enough pressure.
Hunger. She reeked of pain and hunger. Even the beast recoiled at her pain, the suffering not beyond its instincts to comprehend.
"Please," she said again.
Avo sighed. The light-bathed streets were few of walkers at this hour, but never few of watchers. Someone could still track Aseleri's death using her. She would be an easy find for a Recollector. He would need to edit her mind extra meticulously. Just in case. Ensure that even if someone connected her to Aseleri's death, they would find nothing through her. He would burn himself, Draus, and Kae from her mind; leave a false trail leading to a nonexistent group of squires in their stead.
Avo sighed. More trouble though this act might incur, he knew Walton would've smiled upon him. "What do you want?"
She swallowed. A trickle of a tear spilled out from the corner of her eye. "Steamed bun."
"How many?"
"One," she said, choking again. "Thank you."
One. How insignificant her hunger compared to his. He chuffed, a low chuckle hissing out from his throat. People hated ghouls. People massacred his kind like vermin. People treated him as less than nu-dog. Yet, for all the delights that New Vultun bestowed upon him, he never once wished he could've been human.
For in her was the fate that branded the vast majority of the species. Broken. Impotent. Exploitable.
FATELESS.
IMPS: [2697]
Avo flicked the imps over to the auto vendor's locus, placing his order with a thought.
+Virtuous indeed, wanderer!+ the bear cried, backflipping to catch two dishes of food using its feet. It began to cycle the plates back and forth as the machine began printing the food, rumbling as clone-meat melded with the sludge of grav-molded dough. A holo-projection of a percentage bar filled up rapidly, finishing with a triumphant ring as the machine ejected the bun.
Planted neatly atop a quick-fabbed plate, the white of the bun glistened still with a pearlescent sheen. A spill of soy sauce ran down its top in the form of the Stormsparrow, looking at her shoulder with a faint smile in sponsorship of the bun.
Avo plucked the meal from its port and handed it to the girl. "Eat and walk. You can do both."
Nodding numbly, she took the dish from his hand as they carried on. "I... thank you--"
"Already said that," Avo replied, cutting her off. "Don't talk. Just eat. Keep walking."
Quivering, she did as he said.
He didn't want to make nor risk small talk with her. If she formed deeper memories of him, if she started forming the sediment of affection when it came to his person, it would add hours to his work.
And she wasn't the only one.
Her. Kae. Chambers. The techs. Draus. Himself. The memories he got from Aseleri. They all needed work, and he was the only one who could deliver. At least for now he had some room to breathe. Claim more thaums, ghosts, Heavens, and Hells. Contemplate. Investigate. Prepare.
Avo exhaled.
For so long, an opposing momentum had seized him, dashing him along obstacles and adversaries like he was crashing from rock to rock, caught in the rapids. Now, the waters were slowing.
And when they stopped, he would see about driving it back the other way.
The Auto-Seance Phantasmic is the most commonly utilized phantasmic in Idheim.
Its function: communication; the capability to connect minds from almost anywhere covered by the reach of the Nether.
Though no two phantasmics are ever truly alike, they can however cycle memories so similarly that the memory's oscillatory frequency will be easy to distinguish from all the others, thus allowing for quantum-level pairing across even the vastest of distances...
-Tools of the Necrotheurgic Trade, 00:38:02 - 00:51:33, "AUTO-SEANCE"
6-1
Synchronized
INITIALIZING META-DIVE
The sun bled in broken instants of existence, its light leaking out in an oozing wound that stained the firmament and blackened the seas. Like a battered egg, it twisted, peeling apart into a kaleidoscopic coil. To call it decay ignored the new shapes pouring into form; to call it growth was a lie used to cover the built-in disorder that constantly gnawed at the structure of the construct.
Atop a mercury-thick pool of quavering moonlight, Avo stood, tuning the memetic frequency of the phantasmic. With each adjustment, the tremoring liquid grew more stable, while the discordant world took on more steady incrementations of alteration.
The alignment was close. He could feel it in his mind, a sense of synchronicity building.
He plucked a ghost out from his mind, a moment from the eyes of a child, contentedly embracing an eight-limbed nu-cat after a playful chase, and fed it into the waters beneath his feet. For a moment, chaotic architecture pulsed and reset.
When it finished reloading, Avo felt a ringing rattle his mind from high above as the Auto-Seance phantasmic finally snapped in alignment with another running the same sequences of alternating memories. With a stutter, Draus loaded into the simulated construct, appearing mere feet away from him upon a carpet of liquid opalescence.
The sun pooled together from sprays of incomprehensibility and shone briefly before repeating its earlier destabilization.
Auto-Seances were always loud. Always obvious. There was no true stealth in the Nether, for how could thought disappear in a realm made flesh by the tendons of cognition? Yet, the vast billions populating New Vultun and the world beyond offered opportunities to mask their presence. All Avo needed to do on his end was to slide the construct beneath a shroud of shapeshifting memetics.
[AUTO-SEANCE] COG-CAP: 2 SEQUENCES (BASELINE)
STRUCTURE: “A STAR BLEEDS INTO A SPIRAL OF SPLICED MEMORY SNIPPETS [ERROR: MEMORY ARTIFACTS TOO BRIEF FOR REVIEW...]"
FUNCTION: ALLOWS OMNI-SYNCHRONIC COMMUNICATIONS BETWEEN TWO OR MORE MINDS ACROSS ALL AREAS ENCOMPASSED BY THE PRESENCE OF THE NETHER
"Good," Avo said, "Works."
It had taken him the better part of three days to conceive a sufficiently chaotic collage of memories to properly encrypt this Seance session. Now, he and Draus could communicate with diminished fears of scrying eyes.
Kae had to wait. His brief peek at the damage cradled between the broken shell of her thoughtstuff offered him a glimpse at something astounding. Whatever Ori-Thaum inflicted on her was a masterpiece that demanded the totality of his skill to face. Hence, it would be the last thing he interfaced with, and only after he collected a surfeit of ghosts to buffer himself.
For now, he needed to finish testing the new line of communication between him and Draus.
Avo chuckled. Now there was something he never saw coming: being part of a shared mem-session with a Regular.
"Could've made the sun less nauseatin' to look at," Draus said, blinking at the phantasmal star dissolving into the primordial yolk of randomness again.
"Don't look at it," Avo said. A dull pang fired in the back of his head as the beast whispered its familiar words of honeyed violence. Presently, his Morality Injector was only half finished. Its structure was already burrowed deep into the roots of his mind, yet the ingredients he used to combat the beast remained missing. Joy; regret; sadness; embarrassment, all emotions he needed to synthesize the cocktail of pseudo-chemicals used to blunt the beast's nature and cage his inhibitions.
That would be the next thing for him to finish--a project he was truly excited for. He had survived the Crucible, escaped Mirrorhead's grasp, and now, on the precipice of severing the chains that bound him from within, he would once again return himself to who he once was. More, in fact.
The Soul burning inside him changed things. Placed new options in his lap. Of new flavors unsampled and roads untraveled.
Turning her eyes to the skies mottling into a peel of faces and locations, Draus nodded appreciatively. "Yeah. Encryption's looking pretty gleamin'. Figured it would've taken you longer..."
"No," Avo said. "One of the first things you learn to build as a Necro. Guild Exorcists have query artifacts bound to their functions. Search-memories. In-built Recollectors. Stable memory architecture easy to pierce. Might as well be a curtain instead of a wall. This is like hiding in a box inside a hurricane. More secure."
"Yeah," Draus said. "But I can't remember the other Necros I worked with ever makin' something so... detailed. Can barely make sense of nothing from nothing after it stops bein' a star. Maybe bits and pieces but nothin' more."
Avo chuffed, pleased that his work was affecting the Regular. If this was proving chaotic even for Draus, who possessed a keenness of awareness sharpened by years of battle, then nothing short of a dedicated Exorcist Mem-Breaker team would be able to crack their conversations.
"Circumspect enough for you?" Avo asked.
"Yeah," Draus said, nodding "Yeah, I reckon it is." Sweeping her gaze over the organs of the construct, she brushed her tongue along her cheek, deep in thought, before turning to regard Avo. "Can you make a few more encryption chains? Might want to keep switchin' up. Just in case."
"Want more complexity?" Avo asked.
"Well, I think somethin' like this works just fine for us now. We're gonna need to crank it up more down the line in case the colors themselves come a-knockin' for us. Syndicates Necros probably don't got no ability to trace this."
That made Avo hiss a laugh. "Syndicate Necros should learn to plug leakages first. And fix their wards. Deserve to be nulled for failing the art."
Draus fixed him with a flat stare. "Sure do get riled up 'bout someone else's mistakes."
"You'd accept Reg who can't hit a target?"
It took a moment for his question to register, understanding kindling between her furrowing brows. "Yeah... no. Anyway, it's good that we managed to get this workin' already."
Avo tilted his head. "We?"
Draus, in turn, mockingly tilted her head to match him, looking up at him with a similar incline. "Yes, you 'won't-stop-eating, killing-things-is-good-for-my-Soul, constantly-hungry-for-meat' half-strand. You wanna know how much imps I'm burnin' to keep your ass fed? Heard one of the Sang complain' about you the other day. They think I'm hidin' a nu-dog. A combat variant. Real mastiff splice. So, yeah, let's all give ourselves partial credit here seein' as I’m keepin' you alive..."
Avo glared, but it appeared that a lifetime of military service had already vaccinated Draus against any social pressure he could muster. "Would've done it myself. Just lost track of time."
Draus' eyes narrowed with doubt. "Avo, what the fuck kinda refutation is that? You would've done it yourself if you'd just have... remembered?"
He grunted. "Yes."
A noise came from her. The type one would make when trying not to hurl a series of slurs at an inconveniently malfunctioning machine. "Anyway. The way I see it. We got a few things that need talkin' about."
"Boundaries?"
Draus nodded, her stare breaking from him to linger on nothing in particular. "Yeah. Let's start with that. I'm gonna be real honest with you. Watching how good you jack... I don't like it. We need it, but I don't like it. It ain't rational. I don't got a better reason than 'feelin',' but I don't want you doin' anything to my mind without my say so, yeah? I don't care if I got a mem-con, I don't care if my wards are leakin'. If I say 'don't Jack into my mind' you don't, we synced?"
Avo grunted.
"I wanna hear a 'yes,' Avo," Draus said.
"Fine," he said. "Wasn't planning for your Meta. Maybe ward improvement. Not interested in affecting your ability to choose."
"Yeah. Good."
A moment of silence ran between them. A splash of sunlight washed over Draus before fading into nothingness again. She shrugged. "Ori-Thaum. The war. Got hit with enough mem-cons for one lifetime. You want a better reason, there it is."
"Understand," Avo said. And he did. There was a reason he avoided dives against Ori-Thaum. Whatever they lacked in the real, they had in the Nether. Even Walton treated them like the leviathans they were in the depths of mind-space.
"Yeah," Draus said, "I reckon you do, don't you?" With effort, she shook the malaise from herself. "Anyway, enough of that. We got other, more interesting matters to talk about. Like Conflux."
Ah. That was interesting.
She continued. "We got a few things that need takin' care of before we even entertain the idea of makin' a run at Mirrorhead. First is intel. Half the reason why we kept those three half-strands alive. Gonna be useful for you to do a little divin' in their heads later. After you do what needs doin' with that Morality-gizmo of yours. Don't need you eatin' their minds as well."
Avo frowned at her. "Can't eat a mind."
"I was bein' metaphorical."
"Not a good metaphor--"
"--Avo, for Jaus' sake, you know what I mean."
He grumbled. The thought of digging through Chamber's mind didn't appeal. There was more than a non-zero chance the enforcer's incompetence was a mem-con he downloaded from a dubious palace in the Nether. Avo decided he was going to upgrade his wards again before diving into the man's mind. Any mind, really. Especially Kae's.
"Should also set up surveillance of my own," Avo said. "Conflux lacks security. Several loci. Multiple angles of penetration. Active mem-cons in the block. Will penetrate defenses. Scry at them."
With a thought, Draus manifested a phantasmal replica of the block, the sloping devastation in its middle nesting the makeshift ring used for the Mall-Brawl. "Good idea. Did a little intel gatherin' of my own while you was busy. Did a fly-by of the block. 'Spoke' to a few of their local operatives. Turns out, Chambers was right: your little brawl with the Scalpers got Mirrorhead spooked somethin' bad. He's been issuing orders specifically through proxies now. They haven't seen him personally for days."
Well, that was something. Syndicate boss feared other Godclads for some reason. Might be useful to find out why. Avo's growing curiosity stripped some disgust away from needing to dive into Chamber's mind. Imbecility aside, the enforcer knew Mirrorhead's habits well--even his true name somehow. Just how Chambers came upon that knowledge was worth a dive alone. The enforcer was likely not smart nor brave enough to acquire such knowledge via sleuthing, so the only other possibility was happenstance.
And a chance encounter was far easier to parse than an epiphany manifested by deduction.
"Will need more time," Avo said. "More ghosts too. Need them for independent constructs. Also loci to anchor them. Can use ones from aerovec for now. Drones too."
Draus nodded. "You and me both. Right now, I think our best bet is to keep bein' quiet. Mirrorhead's a real glassjaw. Might pull a runner on us if he think's we're comin'." A bitter sneer spread from her lips. "'Course, if he does pull a runner, he might just be his mother's boy."
And there it was again. That hate. The same look in her eyes when she struck Chambers in the back of garbage aero."Never told me why Mirrorhead's name bothered you," Avo said. "Jhred. Made you hurt Chambers."
A twitch shivered through the Regular's face, the tremble shaking her typically granite-still jaw with a flare of rage. Such was the fury fanned within her, kindled by a mere utterance.
"Jhred Greatling," Draus began. He tasted the steam of rage hissing from her nostrils through the Nether. If this was but a fraction of what she was feeling, then hate was not nearly intense enough to describe what she was truly feeling. "If Mirrorhead is... Jhred Greatling, then I knew his mother. I knew her well. And it was my fuckin' pleasure to listen to Ori-Thaum dissect her mind and broadcast her screams through the Nether."
Suddenly, a long-dormant memory caught fire in the back of Avo's mind. Flashes of him fleeing sweeping tides of living fire, scouring his brothers from existence, hiding in cracks and crevices, hugging the darkness as he retreated toward the shadows in the gutters, to the embrace of a pathway leading him back down in the Umbra.
He faintly remembered the screams then. The howls of a woman as her memories were gouged free in clumps from her mind, cast out into the Nether for all to sample. It was as if her captors were chucking pieces of her flesh free into the waters, using her to feed the fish.
"Oh, I know that look," Draus said, her smile emerging as the afterbirth of a snarl, "yeah, you tasted a piece of her too, didn't you. Probably everyone in New Vultun felt her mind go that day."
"Maybe," Avo said. "Was a long time ago."
Draus scoffed. "Not for me. Anyway. His family and the Regs? Me? We got history. Old, bloody, Highflame civil-war type-shit history."
"That bad?"
"Worse. Greatlings managed to kill more Regs than any of our actual enemies did." She gave Avo a sardonic shrug. "Thing about enemies is that you know what to expect. With the commander of your theatre? Things ain't so easy. But you might know a thing or two more about bein' fed to the grinder than I do, don't you?"
"Don't really think about it," Avo said.
"How's that working?"
"Most brothers dead. Low Masters dead. I'm not dead. Worked pretty well."
Draus chuckled. "Still. We best keep treadin' carefully. I asked Kae about Mirrorhead's possible Heavens and she narrowed it down to a couple of possibilities. None of them good for our chances if he ever finds out where we are. Priority now is to keep track of his movements. While that's happening, we need to get your Frame optimized. Kae said something about the Fallen Heaven in Burner's Way to me. Said you could get a new Hell from that."
"Yes," Avo said. "Talked about that inside Frame. Still need to consider plans for thaums."
"What 'bout... we, uh..."
"Kill my brothers?" Avo asked. "Slaughter them to fuel my Frame."
Draus grimaced.
Avo grunted. "Could work. Problem is the dark. Some of it's alive. Womb and plane both. Pulls you in. Creatures in its depths. High risk for minimal gain. Might be better if we just buy ghouls from a farm somewhere."
A thoughtful expression came over Draus. "I'll ask Green River. She might be able to offer something."
Right. On the topic of Green River, there was another thing he had to do: breach her security and find out what she knew. Avo moved that to the far rear of his backlog. Green River wasn't exactly Ori-Thaum but the No-Dragons and their associates had good scrying phantasmics. Dealing with them would take time.
"I'll get us more arms and armor in the meantime," Draus said. "By the way, you cleanin' our mem-data from that slave girl yet?"
Avo shook his head. "No. I'll deal with her in two days. Need to finishing scrying for traumas inside her."
"Seein' what needs to be fixed?"
"Seeing what weapons I can mine. Her pieces will be useful when diving into Chambers."
Squires live and die by their legwork, and Guilds bleed or are bled by their rivals through the successes and failures of their shaping operations.
Preparation. You'll never have enough of it. And before you even get to the fun shit like going over what kind of ordinance you'll need or which squires you wanna hire to form the core cadres of your lance, you got to get the fundamentals down.
And by fundamentals, I mean intelligence. Awareness. Knowing what the other half-strand is doing and not letting them know what you're doing. You know. People watching. Mem-mail reading. Real riveting stuff; and the most essential things you can do.
Culture; habits; flaws; leaders; personnel; other shit. All this is essential. Power ain't enough to light the wick in this city. Not when a golem can flip a switch and change the rules of reality.
The fight is won and lost before it even begins. So, you best get phylaceried or get good at playing the long game.
Improvise? Sure. That's important too. But only the ready get to improvise. The rest of the bunch usually just gets dead.
-Quail Tavers, School of the Warrens
6-2
Preparation
Work slickened the passage of time, and ever was Avo pleased.
More than pleasing, however, was the splendorous radiance that formed the bars to his newest phantasmic. It was still a thing in progress--the skeleton of a cage fusing into shape around the megablock that served as the nexus of his palace--but already the sequences of memory he had to draw on were promising. Flashes of a parent hugging their child; a moment shared between loved ones; a girl calling after the fading form of her father's aero, stabbing through a curtain of falling rain.
All these lost instances offered heat; an intensity of emotion that rivaled the output of his beast. With these memories synthesized properly, in practice, their fire would choke the maw of cruelty and hunger that dwelled beneath the fabric of his being.
The composite for the neuro-metals of the Morality Injector was woven from strands of regret, fear, joy, shame, revulsion, and an even vaster multitude of emotions, all synthesized to serve as a grand cocktail to drown the beast. At the bottom of the cage were fanned blades, sharpened to dig into his Metamind's tissue and pierce into his instincts. If his mental architecture was sound and the phantasmic was stable, it would draw out the worst of his nature like a syringe and counteract its properties with an equal loop of counter-emotions.
Functionally, it would allow him to tranquilize the beast without overdosing himself on undistilled and secondhand rememberings. He examined the unfinished construct again. He would need to shower it with more time and effort before it could greet its conclusion. And shower it he did.
Hours washed past him as if currents, his tasks a joyous multitude, pressing down on him with the weight of comforting responsibility. Streams of mem-data played like a constant symphony in his mind, ever-present be he awake or asleep.
He had spent the better part of the last four days in a deep dive of his own mind, nested snuggly in a lung bed. Waking only to feed and talk with Kae regarding the nature of his Frame, a semblance of his past life returned to him. Again, he was giving himself over to his craft; Necrotheurgy his practice, his worship.
A worship that was interrupted every so often when Draus began synchronizing with his mind through their encrypted Seance session.
These days, Draus' mind remained close and easy to access. Though he had promised to leave her cognitive structure untouched, they had found an accord in limited mutual transparency. A Syndicate was a complex organism to poison and butcher, after all, and it would take the leveraging of many skills to see it undone; what he lacked in combat experience and tactics, he provided in terms of phantasmics and signal-based infiltration.
+Deployin' Larks,+ Draus said, without further elaboration or fanfare. Avo grunted. They both knew what was about to follow. If his phantasmics were sequenced right, the drones would remain hidden and serve as their instruments of aerial spycraft.
Through stuttered instances of Nether-lag, he started from Draus' perspective and watched her cog-feed trigger the ejection process. A trio of icons flashed into existence at the back of both their minds, each a micro-drone released from the bottom of the aerovec. In his mind's eye, Avo spun his DeepNav to a top-down perspective and watched the drones come alight with rectangular vertices.
Masked by the howl of the traffic and the haze of the rain, they moved, pace twinned to the midnight traffic, already beginning to filter mem-data up into the Nether.
It had taken Avo a few days more to sequence the ghosts needed to direct each drone along their routed path. Presently, they ran on minds most paranoid and anxious. He had tested their pathfinding and ensured they never took the same route twice. The pattern deviation would help them avoid the notice of Syndicate patrols long enough to get the intelligence they needed.
Across the DeepNav--a three-dimensional simulation of the city as mapped by constantly updated mem-data--the drones separated, each taking one of the three major skylanes outside Conflux headquarters. Running down arteries of holo-projected light, the loci of the Lark-pattern drones sang in a symphony of synched memories.
With a thought, Avo slotted another session of memories into his Auto-Seance, his thought-frequency tuned in tandem with the drones. Draus cut out momentarily as he twinned his mind to one of the Larks. Immediately, a second window of awareness opened in the back of his mind.
His thoughts masked by the ghost anchored to the Lark's locus, Avo swept his gaze over the district of Mazza's Junction. Drone-spec data dotted the corner of his perception as mem-code ran through the back of his mind as a constant spray of information.
SHI-WA CLASS [LARK]-PATTERN RECONNAISSANCE DRONE
SIZE: LENGTH 3 FEET; WINGSPAN 1.5 FEET
WEIGHT: 20 POUNDS
SPEED: 130 MPH
OPERATIONAL PERIOD: 1D/22H/24M
PAYLOAD/ENGINE: MICRO-FUSION REACTOR
INTEGRITY: OPTIMAL
He swept his mind through his optical sensors and zoomed on the streets expanding from the core of the block. Accretions came alight in his vision as pedestrian foot traffic littered the streets, vagrants, peddlers, refugees, wagers, and gangers running thicker than the pouring rain.
Flashes of gunfire were detected and logged in the drone's sensory suite. Warnings played constantly through its Phys-Sim. The Lark wasn't his best job. Not even close, but it would serve his needs for now.
Peeking out from its optics again he found himself gazing upon the bifurcated form of Conflux headquarters. Mirrorhead had other establishments he could flee to--maybe even up the Tiers if he got desperate enough--but the critical density of the Syndicate boss' forces were centered here.
To abandon them would relinquish the last real foothold he had over this little pseudo-kingdom he played at ruling. Something that his ego wouldn't allow him to forsake without a fight.
At least now, Avo had some eyes on him as well. Conflux wouldn't be able to scramble anything larger than a squad without him or Draus knowing now.
Another leviathan festooned with holo-ads swam by through the air, cutting the target from sight. Distracted, Avo considered his tasks and found himself going down his checklist again.
Right now, the initial deployment of spy drones was concluded. From here, there was a factor of patience involved. Such a thing served him well anyway. He still needed to finish attuning his Morality Injector to his Meta; the former mod slave was still an unfinished job; Chambers remained in custody and untouched; and most tedious of all, he needed to comb through all the memories he recently acquired to get a better understanding of their contents.
These memories included his own. He had yet to uncover how an entire week of experiences had been severed from his mind so neatly. Though he had glanced at his own cognitive architecture only briefly, it looked mostly stable, the sequences of his mind melding together in a long-remembered rhythm. Perhaps it was Aseleri's recollections that held the first pieces toward his gnosis. If nothing else, she would have logged where he was found.
And with that, another tertiary task came into concern: The infiltration and expropriation of her Maw-diving barge. She was dead and her crew was rendered directionless. If he could jack into its systems, he might even be able to trace the slaves, letting him free who he could and track those that were already sold.
Back in the real, a grin spilled across Avo's face. Now there was an enticing prospect: Hunting slavers for gains of taste and Soul. The Warrens were ripe with offerings. He merely needed to seek them out.
Perhaps after he filled himself with even more lives, he would be able to finally sequence complex enough ghosts to part himself from the awareness of Guild Exorcists. Then, he might finally be able to operate at the topside--at Light's End--and seek out the Easy Armistice where another piece of Walton supposedly awaited him.
His grin collapsed into a frown. Avo didn't much like thinking about the things Walton said to him. The disquiet he felt regarding that situation was a cancerous inflammation that seeded the corners of his mind with doubt and worries. The implications of his Liminal Frame and Ninth Column put him on a collision course with the Guilds.
And Avo had sampled more than one vicarity of what happened to those that ran against the Guilds.
Pushing his concerns to the back of his head, Avo disconnected from the drone and switched back to Draus' frequency. +Working.+
+How's the lag?+ she asked, casting an order for the aerovec to return to the Second Fortune.
+No issue. Twinned. Direct connection. Will be able to access them whenever needed.+
+Alright, then. Looks like we got ourselves some fuel to cook with.+ A wail of sirens shot past her as another aero blurred past, flying outside the lighted path designed by the skylanes. Behind it, missiles trailed, their engines screaming bright. Draus winced momentarily and tore her sight away from the shine of their pluming thrusters.
She began to heal immediately after. Avo watched the nanosurgeons scrubbing patches of blindness from her vision. +Squires been actin' up in the district.+ Draus said, blinking. +Been like this for the past few days. Reckon it's probably the Scalpers probing Conflux security. Been a few street-side clashes between them too. Borders and G-Stations mostly. Looks like Ol' Vincintine is blaming the death of his hitters on Mirrorhead.+
+Good,+ Avo said.
+Yeah, for us. Not so much for FATELESS.+ A bitter note ebbed from Draus' mind as she looked at the specks walking the multi-rung streets below, their enshadowed contours swallowed in neon. +They start a firefight and we're lookin' at a cool-hundred dead in seconds.+
Lives were fragile. Flechettes and missiles were cheap.
+Find us your 'alternative means of residence yet'?+ Avo asked.
+Soon,+ Draus replied. +Still workin' on its insides. Getting somethin' like that custom made down in these parts ain't easy. Takes time to get set up. Burned more than a few favors to get a command aero-unit disguised as a cargo barge. How about the mod slave? She scrubbed yet?+
That pulled a silent sigh from him. He was more than three days behind on dealing with her now. Not helped by her growing demands to be allowed to keep more and more of her mind.
+No,+ Avo said. +Was busy with the drones.+
Draus hummed. +We gonna have to deal with her at some point. Can't keep her with us. And her mind's gotta be scrubbed clean of our traces. She's already had enough pain. Last thing she deserves is getting her mind hollowed by a Guild Necro after they catch a trace of us there during a thoughtscan.+
+Yeah.+ Avo went silent for a beat. +She wants to keep the memories of her father. Sister. Wants to remember Aseleri dying.+
+So? Is that a problem 'bout that?+
+Will add more time. Not taking the sequence directly. Just copying. Also makes edits more complex. Redact our presence without removing central pillars of memory. Challenge enticing. Will need to approach it carefully.+
A beat of silence extended from Draus. +Can't you just... take it anyway and scrub her mind after. She won't remember nothin' anyway, right?+
+She won't. I will. She's choiceless. Don't want to be like Aseleri. Don't want to be like Low Masters.+
A beat of silence birthed a sequel as a swell of minor regret dissolved inside Draus. +Been a Reg for too long.+
Avo grunted. +Been a ghoul all my life. Seems we're both flawed.+
This time, she offered him a laugh. +Yeah. Reckon so. How about your Morality-thing?+
+Morality Injector. Not done yet either. Necrotheurgy takes time. Signals-gathering takes time. Same as your HUMINT "inquiries" these past few days.+
Draus' laughter took on a vicious, caustic quality. While Avo was working to make more effective phantasmics, the Regular had sought out a few members of Conflux she regarded as more pliable to her persuasion.
To that end, certain narrow pinholes of understanding painted a partial picture of Conflux's overall condition. Hemorrhaging personnel and ceding territory, both the Scalpers and Dead Lotus were pushing in from their respective districts against Mirrorhead's control.
Something that the Godclad couldn't abide.
Whispers in the Nether rose again, speaking of the start of a new gutter war between the three factions; Conflux straining itself to survive, the Scalpers thinking they were conducting retaliatory strikes for the loss of an entire Knot at Burner's Way, and Dead Lotus, thinking the Scalpers were trying to take Conflux--something they would not abide as it placed the larger Syndicate right along the border's of their district.
+River talk with you yet?+ Draus asked. +Last when I checked in with her a few days ago, she said she oughta be able to buy some other ghouls from some of the local grafters. The real feral ones.+
+Not yet,+ Avo said. And he wasn't looking forward to talking with the Sang den elder either. Her very nature plucked at his strings the wrong way. He was a Necro, a job that often had him more ghost-like than the instruments he commanded. She, on the other hand, was a knowledge broker of sorts on top of being a casino. Where her light spread, his darkness had to retreat. +Still waiting.+
There was no room for both of them to share. He tasted the inevitability of a clash between them somehow. Or at least the tension, as if they were two hounds circling each other, one curious, the other wary, both trying to cling to an advantage.
+Alright,+ Draus said. +Think I'm going to make another lap near Burner's way and see how Vincintine's butchers are gearing this fine Thulsday before finishin' today's rounds. See how chilled things are. Far as I've gleaned from the past few days, them Scalpers scraped their dead out of the block where the Rupture is and bugged out.+
+If luck keeps favorin' us, they'll keep on hittin' Conflux, seeing how they considered you a special operative. Bad news is that they're definitely sure you're still alive and know you got a Frame burning inside you. One of my old contacts embedded with them said you got an internal bounty on your head. Two hundred thousand imps. Not for outside distribution. Figure they want what you got for themselves. My guess was that the Scalpers you snuffed were running visual cyberware. Send snapshots of visual feed back up the chain. Nether might've been all jammed up durin' your little brawl in Burner's Way but... sometimes coldtech got poise that thaumaturgy lacks.+
A grunt of annoyance sounded in Avo's throat. He had been so certain the lives he shed in combat against the golems were enough to cast prying eyes off his trail. Draus was quick to dissuade his hopes from achieving the bloom of delusion. He knew much of how the Nether worked, but the nature of pure technology evaded him still. With a twin-aspected system, it seemed that they sidestepped a great many matters that crippled his communicative capabilities. Little wonder they were so willing to use thoughtwave bombs.
Here was another thing he needed to supplement down the line. As much as he loathed the impenetrability of coldtech, for the sake of his enduring survival, he needed to get accustomed to more of its functions before he found himself blindsided again.
+Going to keep working on Morality Injector,+ Avo said. +Assemble that first. Think about how to approach mod slave after.+
+That what we're going to keep callin' her?+
+That's all she was,+ Avo said. +Won't be anything more to us after. Can't afford a tail trailing behind us. She's a traumatized flat without Meta. Without wards. Fresh meat for all the predators in the city. Best we can do is plant her somewhere safe here. Move on.+
+Yeah,+ Draus said. +Get 'er done. Want us to be plugging Chambers and the other two with your mem-cons and scry-ware before the week is over. They'll offer another angle on Mirrorhead if we don't find something to press on from the exterior.+
Avo grunted. +Keep you updat--+ A flashing call sounded in his mind, interrupting his thoughts before they could be packaged and sent. Frowning, he glared at the small interface manifesting in the upper right corner of his cog-feed. Strange as it was for most to have an active perception filter in his own mind-scape, Necros tended to keep theirs on at all times.
LINK REQUEST INCOMING
CALLER: [SU, BRIGHT-WEALTH]
It took him a few moments to realize that he was being contacted by the junior. The one that Draus had assigned to personally escort Kae. The one that was now again gifted the new and glorious task of ensuring the mod slave didn't self-terminate.
Avo made a mental note to update to an Omniglot language phantasmic after he was finished with more pressing matters. He was still getting the most literal one-to-one character-meaning translations.
With a thought, he let the call come through, and Su's face came into shape as a ghost-made simulation of her current state.
+Hey, yao-guai, the crying one says she want to talk to you. Says she is finally ready to let go.+ The Sang wrinkled her nose. He could still taste the unease she held for him, her faulty wards leaking spills of alarm each time she looked upon him. Her fear wasn't primal, but that of a human looking into an uncanny valley.
The Sang made far superior predators than ghouls. Made them a century ago, even. Yet, he stood different from most creatures in their collection. A monster that somehow drifted from his fated course.
+Be there soon,+ Avo said. A beat followed. +Did she try it again?+
+No,+ Su said, frowning. +Not last night. But she still screams. She always screams. Loud as motherfucking shit, she is.+
Good thing the Second Fortune's walls were good insulators of sound. Or perhaps they were built to ensure the ease of listening for Green River, and Green River alone. Either way, her presence drew little attention in the real or the Nether as Avo observed.
Soon, if Avo performed his task right, she would be just another bland backdrop for thoughtscans to slide off.
With a thought, Avo ended the call and emerged from his palace.
RETURNING TO CONSCIOUSNESS
Sitting up, he found Kae watching the preliminaries of the New Vultun Grand Prix on the holovision. A great Rupture splayed the flesh of reality open in a metaphysical gash, the wound made all the clear for the former Agnos to examine as she used the haptic functions to zoom in closer across the concave holo-screens.
In the lead was Gaed an’Geld, representing Stormtree. Her projected velocity had her about to lap the planet’s diameter for the third time in an hour, the satellite zooming in on her Heaven flaring at full burn as she tore across the horizon as an arcing javelin of lightning.
Behind her, the first casualty of the race was listed. Ressler Kandred, of Highflame; real death via thaumic overload. It looked like he was using a Heaven that could alter geometries. Had used. Space seemed to fold and bend in a span of 10 kilometers, up and forward bleeding together, crumpling physical matter into flattened shapes.
Multiple golems were being scrambled to clear up the damage then. They didn't look like any models he had seen before.
"New golems?" Avo asked.
Kae shook, looking startled. "I... I... oh, oh! No. Those are Hellsinkers. Just... just there to soak up the Rend. Stabilize the Rupture." She gave a humming laugh. "Are... are you going to see... see Lucille again."
"Yes." Avo took a step toward the door and froze. Slowly, he turned to Kae again. "Kae. You know her name?"
The Agnos, bless her mem-burned mind, nodded, not comprehending what she did wrong. "You... you don't?"
"No," Avo said. "Makes things more difficult that way. Cements us more in memory. Will take me even more time to dislodge you from her mind."
It took a moment for the sadness to creep across Kae's face. "Oh. S-sorry. She was just... there's so much pain in her. Thought she could use... use someone to talk with."
Avo grunted. "New Vultun. As it goes. Going to see if I can finish with her today. Someone breaks in you know what to do."

Kae nodded. "Shoot myself."

Avo grunted. "Won't be able to fight them off alone. Don't want to be taken alive."
"Alright," Kae said, cheerfully. "I'll try to remember."
“Okay. First things first. Whenever you’re diving into someone’s mind, you are not the host. You might be able to change the design. You might be able to steal a memory. You might even be able to unmake all the supporting architecture.
But you are not the host.
Say it with me, Avo.
‘I am not the host.’
Good.
You keep that in mind when you dive. I’ve seen more than one Necro lose themselves inside the mind of another. Things get very, very complex when strands of thought become intertwined. Should your memories become entangled, who's to say where you begin and they end…”
-"Walton," instructing [Redacted] on the basics of Necrotheurgy
6-3
A Chance Encounter
Holocoat. Undersuit. Helmet.
These articles now clung to Avo like a second skin, sparing him the attention of the meek and hateful. It served him better being a figure cloaked in light-shrouded mystery than an obvious beast of gluttonous savagery.
So it came that Avo found himself twice glad of his new outfit upon his descent in the elevator, accompanied by a family of three.
Aside from the one he guessed to be the mother, the twin pre-adolescent sons were enwreathed by dancing shadows, coated with presences twisting and translucent. A mask of painted monochrome flowed with the movements of their heads, its design from that of old Sangshan shadow operas, blessed with patterns meant to denote the wearer as female. These, then, were neuter-masks: instruments of deception granted shape through thaumaturgy.
Once such items were the scarcest of artifacts; rarities gifted to foreign dignitaries for them to spare them from the Dragon-Curse’s notice. Now, it was little more than a commercial appliance. Commonly seen and widely used. By those that could afford them, anyhow.
The mother was weathered and worn, the unmistakable light whine of an implanted weapon glinting beneath her left sleeve. Small traces of cybernetic circuitry lined her face, caging her visual aesthetic in the trappings of long outdated augmentations. There was a presence about her. Something that told Avo she wasn’t unfamiliar with violence, awkward though it still might be to her.
Her children, then, were of a different make. Enhanced from the cell to the sinew. Molded toward superiority. Her virtues were exaggerated in them while her flaws were spared. Their attire was subtle; muted in color and lacking all ostentation in their design. Yet, it clung to flawless skins of glowing amber, and the scents coming from their bodies breathed earthly aromas fresh and unknown to the Warrens.
The taste was also helpful for blunting Avo's bloodlust. Overfed on raw meat as he was, the taste of soil was just another barrier against the predilections of the beast.
From the flowing constellations of clenched lightning that lined their thoughts in a defensive lattice, Avo guessed they were using a Sanctus Starseeker. A most competently made set of wards, though his compliments ended there. It gave too much of a trail, and a journeyman Necro could spoof in from all the gaps left unprotected. There was also the question of why children needed wards of such high potency.
Several guesses sprouted like seeds in the back of Avo’s mind. There were only so many possibilities that could force a mother to bring her children down to a place like this. They reeked of exiled privilege, stripped of status but not of their habits, their design. They had to be. It took a special kind of desperation for a mother to bring her male offspring to a place guaranteed to boil the blood in their veins.
The children continued to chat and laugh away, their small fingers jabbing at the bioluminescent advertisements dancing across the inner folds of the elevator. Animated figures darted and dashed, flirted and fought, until their forms melded together to become some kind of new energy drink with a mem-code to scan.
The Second Fortune was a place of new novelty for the twins, and they were here sampling a buffet of flavors. A vacation. Unlike her boys, however, the mother stood a sentinel, watching Avo from her periphery. Her porcelain-sheened eyes shone like diamonds or cracked glass. Her muscles were loose but her jaw was set, her trinary hearts beating a slow but heavy rhythm.
A new suspicion slid over the waters of his thought like a film of oil. This was not the habit of some fleeing wager. No. She had the ethics of someone familiar with living in the Warrens, body projecting caution but not confusion nor terror.
This was more of a homecoming for her. A place that she knew. Sanctuary. It seemed Green River was a popular lady. One willing to accept all manner of lost and damned.
"You working?" the mother asked, the question finally hurled out over the clamor of her children. Her eyes were still fixed on him. Her implanted gun was pointed straight down at the ground now, its impact trajectory coming alight via his Phys-Sim.
“Visiting someone,” Avo replied. “Not you.” The children seemed confused about the last part. The mother wasn't. She offered a slow, still distrustful nod and kept her gun primed. Smart, though it wouldn’t have saved her if he truly meant harm.
She exhaled slowly, trying to expel some of her tension. Three in. Three out. She knew how to breathe. Wasn’t the first time she did something like this. He looked at her implanted gun again and guessed its design. Didn’t look cheap either. Or pure-kinetic. Probably something particle then. Spatial-kinetic if she really had the imps for that kind of firepower. The type of stuff an ex-street squire would loathe to part with, even after they got out of the life.
"Had to ask,” she said. “Strange place to have your coat's privacy functions on."
"Private person," Avo replied. "You understand. Casino. Strange place to bring children."
The mother winced. "Short notice. Unfinished business. Needed to get them out of the way for a while. You understand."
Her twins were looking at him now, their eyes glinting with mirth, as their faces twitched with mischief. Rivers of ghost-made chains ran between them as they spoke to one another, likely mocking the tall stranger before them, bearing no sense of fear or worry.
He wondered if they were bound for death as well. Yet, in their faces, he saw nothing of the boy. Where his was a fate of softness and brutality, a certain fated mercy that would see them guarded against true peril. It was a twisted mockery of Essus’ folly, Avo thought, that this woman was likely to preserve the lives of both her children by heading downward, where the boy found only an unjust demise during his pilgrimage toward hope.
But for the Warrens, Avo supposed there were worse places one could hide than Xin Yunsha.
The elevator rang as two swirling blots of ink fused together to form the Sang character for "four" overhead. This was his stop. This was where he and they would part, hopefully never to see each other again.
Yet, before they closed, the professional within Avo demanded that he speak his piece. "Get new wards. Starseeker's for squires. You’re not on a run. You’re hiding. Keep it that way.”
And as if to accentuate his point, his words provoked a spray of surprise, the sensation splashing over him like a shotgun of rainfall.
Past columns of painted brass and lanterns burning flames of midnight black, he walked through the intersections of the fourth floor. Cheering echoed through the walls, cries of jubilance and despair as fortunes were won and lost. They were betting on the Grand Prix, was Avo's guess, handing what paltry imps they had over to the people that needed it the least.
A few hundred shining accretions came alight in his cog-feed. Most were spinning fast, burning hot like a star caught in a cosmic whirlpool, their desires cast near-naked into the Nether through the flaws of their cheap wards.
The opulence was lesser here compared to what was provided to Draus–and by extension, him and Kae. Doors of paper lattice waited here, with cheap auto-locks. A few of the lanterns burned dim, coughing and swollen, the organisms sick with some kind of infection. Hovering autocarts lined with alcohol, designer drugs, and a chipped locus filled with legal vicarities openly peddled their trade through the hallways.
Stepping sideways to avoid one such cart, Avo made for room 4-221 located in the crane wing, toward the far south of the building.
The mod slave--Lucille, as Kae had come to know the girl--was most easy to track. Her mind was barer than most, and the agony that hissed from the scarring cracks in her mind left a distinct flavor. Even if she was lost among a crowd of millions, Avo could have filtered her frequency out from the masses with but a thought using his Metamind.
Bright-Wealth, likewise was also simple to track, due to reasons inverse to Lucille. If the mod slave was naked and broken, the junior Sang was more like a bunker built alongside stacks of glass houses. Again, there was no absolute stealth in the Nether. That which bore memory and thought would always be visible. Hence, the need for masking, for obfuscation in the place of invisibility.
“Finally,” Bright-Wealth said, a rasp in her throat as she just finished inhaling a hit of the wolf-burn hallucinogenic. She lay a coiled rope outside the room, her bio-rig forming a concentric barricade with her real body resting at the center. “Thought you got lost or something.”
"Elevator slow," Avo said, ignoring her jab. "Would've been faster if you got a normal one."
"But Eldest River said it wouldn't be 'aesthetic' enough," Bright-Wealth said, rolling all four of her eyes. She moved, a slither of sudden motion as she removed herself from the doorway. “Been keeping a close eye on this one like you ask, ah. You watch out, yao-guai, her mind gets more mother-fucked by the day.”
“Thought you weren’t supposed to curse in front of the guests.”
Bright-Wealth snorted. “Fuck you, you cannibal half-strand piece of fucking shit. I bless your offspring with the good fortune of being born without an asshole. I bless you with groin rot and the rash. I bless all eighteen generations of your ancestors with eternal torment and I bless your nine family lines with early deaths.” She looked around. And grinned. “Heh. It appears that I can curse as much as I want.”
“Long as one of your seniors isn’t around,” Avo said.
“As long as one of my elder sisters isn’t around,” Bright-Wealth sighed. “It’s always ‘Bright-Wealth that’s unbecoming’ or ‘Bright-Wealth you can’t beat up the customers.’” She snarled. Her accretion spun. A foul memory cracked out from inside her. “Motherfuckers cheated me at Towers, they deserved it.”
He grunted. He wasn’t sure what else to say so he made to enter the room. He made it a single step before Bright-Wealth moved, a slither of moving curving from his left to his right. “Slow,” she said. “I… I have a request.”
Avo nearly sighed. “What?”
Bright-Wealth’s eyes darted about as if worried that the walls were watching. “Can… can you give her some… good memories?”
The ask knocked a stutter into his thoughts. “Good… memories?”
“Look, paler, you’re not the one watching her at night. You didn’t hear the way she screamed and… and screamed.” A shiver ran through Bright-Wealth her scales clicked. “She’s like an infant from one of those pre-modern vicarities, howling even in her dreams. I don’t know what degenerate shit happened to her but it's bad. Her cries have been following me at night, you know? Before I sleep.” She shook her head. “Poor fucking girl. She doesn’t deserve this.”
“Deserve,” Avo said, almost amused at Bright-Wealth’s word choice. “Your kind didn’t deserve the curse. People in the Warrens didn’t deserve ghouls. Ghouls deserve death but keep surviving. Deserve means nothing.”
She recoiled, face contorting in disgust as if he shoved a fistful of fecal matter beneath her nostrils. “What the fuck is wrong with you, yao-guai? Do you just go around pissing on other people for expressing empathy?”
The beast, predictably, wanted to shove its claws through her eyes and use her face as a new cap for her admonishment. On a more executive level, however, Avo just felt awkward. “Was offering honest perspective.”
“Well, maybe find another one, then,” Bright-Wealth said. “Maybe, next time, just say: ‘Sister Wealth, I can’t do it. I’m not good enough of a Necrojack–”
The beast hissed, but it was Avo who snarled with frustration. “She will laugh when I leave the room.”
Bright-Wealth went silent. Her lips closed, pursed with interest. “Really?”
“Yes.”
“What… if you can’t?”
“I will.”
“But what if you can’t.”
Avo nearly gave into the desire to make a hat of the increasingly insufferable Sang. “I. Will.”
“How much are you willing to bet.”
Avo’s mind slammed to a screeching halt. He looked up, and if his loathing could be manifest as energy, a cored chasm of gore would’ve hollowed the insides of the Sang’s skull. At some point, at some time, this stopped being about offense and was turned to feeding her gambling addiction.
“Will fix girl. No bets.”
Bright-Wealth shrugged. “Fine. But if she doesn’t laugh, I’m going to call you a bad… Necrojack.”
If she did that, there was a reasonable chance that he might not possess enough control to stop himself from making a victim of her. Looking around, he considered his approach and tagged the nearby cameras in his cog-feed. It always helped to be prepared.
“Make her laugh loud, yao-guai,” Bright-Wealth said, gliding entirely out of the way, sarcastically ceding ground to let the master perform.
He was wrong. Her people did deserve the curse if it made her life any more inconvenient than it could have been otherwise. But, shedding the annoyance, it would be a display of mastery to help reweave the girl’s mind so. Good practice for the intricacies he was soon to perform on Chambers and the techs once he was done with her.
Entering with little more than a shove and a low growl, Avo ignored the half-moon of a grin that pulled at the Sang’s lips, prodding him forward toward his task as if a spear.
It was Avo’s call to keep the mod slave separate from where they stayed. His intent was to keep her parted from the group to best help him reduce what he needed to prune. He had ensured local measures were set up to mask her presence as well, deliberately leaving a cracked locus in the room, leaking the ghosts from the local lobby into the room. Such an action held little risk of damaging the girl as well, seeing as she was already buried in her grief; a mountain nigh-inconsolable would not be swept aside by the feeble waters of a river.
The cracked locus also allowed him to siphon the excess ghosts running through the establishment to his own ends. With the eighty-one ghosts currently serving as the foundations of his Metamind, the task would have taken more than a week to complete. With the firehose of phantasmal resources on tap thanks to Green River’s purchased generosity, Avo needed but hours.
He wondered then what Draus had done for the River that earned her so much favor. Avo had his own fixers–ones that he needed to get back in touch with soon for the sake of reconstituting his missing arsenal of phantasmics–but the offerings gifted to the Regular were beyond that of even friends.
Avo had tried asking Draus what she did, but much like the matter with Mirrorhead’s mother, she spoke of it only vaguely and clenched the matter away, her stubborn silence closing around the affair like a fist.
Comparatively, Lucille–long regarded as merely “mod slave” in Avo’s mind–was a fountain of damage, her mind shredded clean and raw. She didn't rise to greet him even after he entered the small, cramped room, choosing instead to stay entombed beneath the folds of her lung bed. The space she was given was scarcely half the size offered to Draus, but it was cheap, and Avo was technically paying.
Beside the bed, the locus spun on a bedside nightstand, fissuring strands of phantasmal sequences into the near-Nether. The break was done most technically, allowing a concentrated breach of substance instead of a wide and uncontrolled spread. Aside from the locus, only a small holovision hung from the ceiling, and a narrow bathing cubicle occupied a narrow groove in the corner.
A shadow moving in the dimness, Avo arrived at her bedside to study his subject. She looked back up at him then, her gaze blank and features ill. After the steamed bun he gave her nearly a week ago, her relationship with food grew capricious. For days, it looked like she tried to starve herself, eating only when Bright-Wealth demanded it. On other days, she was an endless font of hunger, insatiable during bouts of sudden mania.
A deep blue had stained her skin, drowning her skin with the tones of a midnight ocean. The extraction of her bioware left to take place after the cleansing of her mind, a thing decided on by Draus. The Regular had thought it best to leave the girl with a start of imps with her separation from old wounds and memories. Whatever the bioware was worth, part of it would go back to her.
The likelihood was that she was either going to end up working for the casino if her restoration proved to be stable or just another joy-fiend or suicide if not. But that was a choice best left to herself.
Truth be spoken, Avo cared little for the girl beyond the value her mind offered and the chance to correct an ethical debt. With how many Aseleri had sold, he doubted she would be the last amongst the slaves he would encounter, especially if he was to take a gander through the Maw-barge when Mirrorhead was good and snuffed. Ultimately, the sooner he finished her neuro-edits and copied the damaged sequence, the sooner they could part.
He caught a taste of her vulnerability before and found it most unpalatable. It reminded him of being a ghoulling. Choiceless in the most direct of senses. Though he could ignore the urge to eat her now, he wasn’t capable of shaking off the shroud of annoyance he felt toward her. Like she was some kind of insect, one better served to feed the flames of his Soul than any other purpose.
The strange thing about that was he couldn’t remember if his animosity burned so intensely before he was bestowed with his Liminal Frame.
“I’m ready,” she said, her dry throat cracking the glass that was silence. Her words were lies. That fact could be read from the way her eyes were drifting about, from the lethargy impairing the fluctuance of her thoughtstuff; her pace of thinking was crippled by weariness, and her weariness then was a malady brought upon by night terrors. Readiness was beyond her. And that is the way it would continue to be until he cleaned the harm that festered inside her.
But it was a lie that mattered little. He was the one that needed to be ready–prepared for her onslaught of trauma. She, on the other hand, merely needed to make a choice.
“I still… I don’t want to forget,” Lucille said, eyes searching the ceiling. Hers was bereft of an aquarium, leaving only a swaying light and blank enamel in its place. “I want to remember my sister, my father.” A shiver of hurt bubbled over her. “Aselerei.”
“Yes,” Avo said, considering the challenges her requests presented. “Anything else?”
She shook her head. “I want to be me when this is done. I want to still be myself.”
Still be her. It was laughable. It was understandable. It was human. New Vultun ate humans.
“Won’t change your fundamentals. Just edit damage. Make you stable. Unroot some of the pain.”
“Okay,” she said, voice growing thick. “I’m scared.”
“Can stay scared. Won’t affect process.”
“Will it hurt?”
Avo chuffed a near-laugh. “Opposite. Feel better by the end. Even laugh.”
Now, she finally looked at him, fixing him with a baleful glare from one of her eyes. “Don’t mock me.” A hint of steel; a whisper of anger. It meant nothing before Aseleri, and so, it weighed even less when placed upon Avo.
“Not mocking,” Avo said, looking over her mind wounds one more time before he began the process. “Just telling you what’s going to happen.”
Sitting down against the wall, he linked with the locus and felt a tunnel of ghost flood out. He did not, however, allow them to use his brain as a junction. No easier way to catch a mem-con. Instead, he would purify them, and use the hyper-extended sequences from the Second Fortune to serve as a bulwark against her trauma while he reshaped the roots of her damage.
With a thought, Avo guided a tide of ghosts to funnel into her cracks. Wardless, it took little more than an edited idea of tiredness smuggled into the folds of her surface thought for her to fall asleep.
The rest of the task, though, would be immensely more challenging.
Good. No better way to get back into form.
INITIATING META-DIVE…
No one metaphor can describe what it is like to traverse the confines of someone’s mind; analogy fails to capture the totality behind the frivolities of psychology. Diving into another’s mind, in a sense, is an exercise in separation; in ensuring the waters which you swim belong to ensure that you don’t drown amidst the black of a mind most foreign.
Psychosis, then, is a common outcome for those that are unprepared. You can get lost inside someone’s mind.
Be prepared. Have an arsenal of memories. And when in doubt, jack out.
Always, always jack out.
-Incubi Mind-Diving Mem-Sim, Ori-Thaum
6-4
Mind Dive (I)
Most Necros don’t make it past the amateur level with how many shatter their minds during their first dive. It was a thing of both preparation and artistry that allowed most Necros to operate the paracosm of another mind. Back when he first rescued Lucille, his wards had served him against the immensity of her trauma; an operation conducted hastily for maximum effect.
Now, unrushed and with ample time to focus, he applied his ghosts with careful focus, his peripheral phantasms brushing against the turbulence of her surface thoughts.
He had the capability of punching through, but none of the desire. Broken was how she greeted him, but intact will be how he leaves her. And much of that will rely on him walking paths of lesser resistance, of symmetry and alignment with her memories and thoughts–to slip in unnoticed between clefts of memory, more shadow than an intruder.
Her mind was a hurricane of trauma yet, barely held in place after his last two visits. The damage Aseleri had inflicted on the girl was total, gouging her from thought to ego. Total, but not nearly the worst case Avo had seen. That remained a street squire that Walton had worked on once, who somehow had a thoughtwave detonator fused into the depths of their memories as a method of torture.
To this day, Avo still couldn’t fathom what his father did to restore that squire even toward partial functionality.
Like a bird of prey sailing over a maelstrom, studying the currents to find the softness of the eye of her torment, his ghosts ferried information back to him, telling him of what occupied the outer layer of her thoughts. Much of her thoughtstuff roared as rapids of raw emotion, the pain like coursing hellfire, searing even to Avo’s awareness. Tiredness joined it as an auxiliary, the low quality of her sleep shrouding the lands of her innermost kingdom in a misted haze.
Like a musician, he plucked her mind slowly, injecting her with intrusive thoughts to see if the waters would change. For the last few times, he studied her damage, he noted three major sectors that rested as the roots of her trauma. The death of her father, the death of her sister, and the forcible implantation of her bioware.
He needed to get to them indirectly. Trying to seal those wounds by brute processing force was possible, but it would likely crack her mind in the process, akin to him forcing his claws inside the cleft of an actual wound to draw out whatever shrapnel remained buried within. Any direct insertion could see her mind crack asunder, with the fissures of her trauma finally spreading across the broken ocean that was her mind.
HOST AWARENESS: 0%
In the back of his mind, the indicator tracking her mind’s reactivity played on, his presence undetected. For professionalism’s sake, he needed to keep this within the sub-fifty percent range. The measurements were more estimates than auguries.
For a few moments longer, he brushed her mind, and she recoiled, the entirety of her consciousness bearing a bruise the same dark nebula-like hue that spilled across her body. Then, between considerations of suicide and fear of final death, he caught a glimpse of something that glinted, that resonated even with his own mind.
Ah. A memory of the steamed bun. A golden tunnel amidst the overgrowth of scar tissue that coated her spirit. The sight of such a memory being his key to smuggling himself even deeper into the depths of her mind pleased him. He had scorned himself for capitulating to her want at the time, virtue or not. Walton would’ve been pleased, but he was a ghoul, and could only guess at the comfort of which his gift delivered.
Now, however, he had something to directly reference, sample, and comprehend. Rare was decency rewarded, and rarer still did a good deed smile back at Avo. There was something he needed to grasp here. He couldn’t fully conceptualize what yet, so he left a reminder in his Metamind to review this memory later.
Right then, however, he had a task to proceed with.
It took almost none of his cognitive capacity to spoof himself into the memory for he was already a part of it. It did, however, need to be edited afterward. Cleared of him, of Draus, of Kae. Perhaps it would be best for him to restructure the memory in a way that had Lucille buying the bun herself; an act of self-sufficiency after suffering often stood as a bulwark for an individual’s ego.
Traveling backward across that sequence, Avo subtly hid in his own dream-shaped simulacrum, rewinding the chronology to the slaughter in the meeting cubes. He sought Aseleri. He sought a central tether to access all her rooted mind wounds. From there, his task would prove to be threefold: dissolve the trauma without making her forget who she was, copy over the trauma to make fraggers–mem-weapons and the like–and clean out any instance that would lead back to him, the Agnos, and the Regular.
A deep edit for a deep dive. Still, a relatively soft subject and an easy assignment for one as versed as he. Her mind had no traps, after all, and she lacked a proper palace to serve as a fortification or a labyrinth. Perfect for getting back into the rhythm.
He found himself at the point where he was torturing Aseleri with his Heaven. His wards groaned slightly as a wave of discomfort surged into him. For a moment, his shape quivered, his actual mind slipping free from the representation she had of him in her dream. Without panic, he reconstituted his ghost and rooted himself even firmer. The waters of her subconsciousness stilled for a moment as he felt them wash over him, vague aware that something was amiss within.
HOST AWARENESS: 3%
Back in the real, Avo growled at his display of incompetence. If he was conducting this operation inside a proper Necro, Sequence-Eaters would have been activated; internally patrolling Specters would have mem-locked him and guided neuro-shredding missiles into his mind. He should have anticipated the impact and braced for it. He would not repeat this mistake again.
Stabilized, he studied the form of Aseleri again, and in an instant, the frustration evaporated off of him, turning to pleasure. He had kept her alive much longer than Little Vicious. Part of it was because of the robustness of the slaver-captain as well, her body being modified to survive more, and endure more.
It was a pleasure to inflict pain on her. It made him feel artistic, like a chef marinating their prey with the proper tenderization. Staring down at Aseleri’s face, eyes and mouth wide open in a silent scream that would follow him for the rest of his life, Avo took a snapshot with his Metamind. A new profile image burned itself in place along the walls of his childhood megablock. To deliver a final insult, he summoned Aseleri’s ghost to the forefront, the bulging masses of the borrowed ghosts he commanded from the locus’ letting the captain’s cognitive effigy through to behold the last moments of her life.
Stripped of will and hollowed of agency, the shade of the dead slaver could do little more than what Avo willed of her. And so, he puppeted her, twisting her sequences to make her speak the words within his mind.
+I deserved this… you were right to kill me… you should have made it last longer.+
In the real, Avo chuckled. Perhaps it was unbecoming of him to take such pleasure in this, but to cast a final insult like this felt sublime. There was a special flavor in forcing a slaver to sing the praises of their own death. In a sense, was this not also power absolute, to inflict mockery even as they were smelted toward better purpose by the fires of his soul?
Juvenile impulses sated, Avo returned to his task and began the next stage of his spoofing: weaving a new cage around himself. One in the shape of Aseleri. Wrapping the captain’s physical shape and crude thoughtstuff over himself, he slipped over into her body mid-torture, Lucille’s awareness none the wiser to his transference.
Using the former captain’s memory as a vehicle, he rode across the branches and flows of Lucille’s memories, speeding toward her three major trauma junctions with accelerated efficiency. There, he could find, copy, and edit her psychological wounds before committing to general redactions.
He shifted even deeper into Lucille’s mind, sinking well past the near-term, diving into the depths of her foundational structures, her long-term memories coated in bubbles of innermost desires.
The fabric of her ego was a vulnerable thing. He could still detect a spot of calm lingering from the ghost he burned on her nearly a week ago. By this point, anyone with a functional Metamind would have flushed the damage. Reset things to baseline.
She, however, was a flat. She had to live with the damage. Live the edits. But at least after the Sang extracted what her bioware was worth, she could afford some rudimentary wards.
Pulling himself along the chains of her mind, he manifested with caution at another point. Another place she remembered encountering Aseleri. Bereft of wards or internal memory-scanning functions, his task was simple: stay affixed to the body of Aseleri and see where the hurt lay. Immediately, he was rewarded.
And this time, when his mind was dashed against a tidal wave of torment, he was ready, holding still even as the trauma bifurcated itself against him.
HOST AWARENESS: 1%
COG-CAP: 12%
He was on the bridge again now, and scrying through her unprotected mind, the memory played from her perspective, made to kneel alongside her sister with vibrating knives held near their necks. Across from them, a leather-faced man with cold eyes stood, projecting a holoscreen to the bridge as they watched Aseleri take another piece of flesh from her father.
Behind the captain, a door was slowly beginning to open. Right. That was the moment Avo entered with Traffic Sight.
Lucille was wailing then. Avo grew aware of her feelings, though he experienced them in a far duller manner than she did, his ghosts nibbling away at her cognition to procure much-valued mem-data. That was one of the benefits of engaging in a spoofing dive–of integrating with her mental structure symmetrically rather than just tearing through her and doing a slapdash rebuild after.
The mind was a vast thing, and ghosts then were merely effigies to the wholeness that was, something between shadows and scars leftover in the Nether when life was struck from the real. Being this close to her mind, damaged as it was, granted him direct sups of knowledge from the well of her being.
Words and whispers began to sound. Her internal monologue. Avo spent a moment shuttling fragments out using the pull of his Ghostjack. Quietly, he fused a few pieces together and built a crude mem-log.
+This is my fault! This is my fault!+ The girl’s mind was a howl of regret and sorrow. +I should have waited! I should have waited alone. I should have! But… but I didn’t know they were gonna scan us–oh, I should have waited! I could have found my own way into the city…+
Clarity, then, dawned over why the hurt was so severe. It was partially her fault, in a narrow, unexpected sense. More memories filtered down through the depths, as he plundered her knowings to piece together the wholeness of her backstory. She was born in a Rupture enclave, her family retainers to a Fallwalker–an independently operating Godclad who was bound to no Guild and commonly hid in regions claimed by Fallen Heavens, hence their title.
Her patron Fallwalker was a young Godclad who called himself Greten Stonebreath. He dubbed himself thus, foolishly deciding to announce that he had a Heaven of Stone and wielded miracles relating to petrification. Under the indifferent governance of the Fallwalker, Lucille led a simple life, working to sustain the enclave’s hydroponics along with her family. Such was her story for fifteen years.
Then, one night, a radiant lance seemed to slash through the folds of space itself, cleaving through the entirety of the enclave. The sudden assault left the thousand or so retainers untouched but vanished the Fallwalker and his family. No explanation followed that. Whoever their attacker or attackers were, they merely kidnapped Greten and his kin before leaving, ignoring those that lived in the enclave, and throwing them before the tender mercies of the Ruptures and anomalous creatures.
She and her family had fled after that, marching blind through a place where all vertical lines manifested small snakes within one’s eyes, and then deaf through a place where a chiming song of infectious winter played, freezing the unfortunate and unprotected enough to hear the tune from the inside.
Her mother had met her end that way, her noise-canceling audio-set malfunctioning along the road. A lattice of ice hatched from her corpse. They had to leave her, for her corpse began to ring with the chimes as well, and up close, the noise was near deafening.
After weeks of venturing through the local Sunderwilds spreading out like pus from the Ruptures, they finally managed to make it to a Voidwatch-run refugee camp where they were issued waiting permits by the Guilds and given a number. One that would have seen them waiting their turn to enter New Vultun.
The fragments he paired from her memories played on. They stayed in the camp for well over two months, and its population swelled to that of an entire Sovereignty, numbering a good hundred million people. They dwelled in a battered quick-fabbed shack, living as best as they could while bathed beneath the eldritch fires of the Fallen Heavens. For a while, she, her father, and her sister were content to wait, to nurse the sorrow of losing their mother.
But then Lucille’s sister grew sick with an anomalous plague. Eggs began growing along the walls of her lungs. When the auto-doc scanned her, the drone told them that it was a thaumaturgic infestation and that there was little they could do.
They begged, asking for aid from local Voidwatch immigration officer and the terrestrial Guilders. In both attempts, they found only setbacks. They were FATELESS, which made off-world transit impossible, and they were anomaly-touched, which placed them in a quarantined quarter of the camps.
Avo tried reaching deeper, wishing to see more but the sequences he grasped felt far too brittle. Her mind shifted, the waters whipping into motion.
HOST AWARENESS: 5%
He retracted from the broader pool of her long-term memories. Despite her rising awareness, he did not regret his digging. With what little of the outside world he saw, memories from beyond New Vultun always made for most entertaining vicarities. It was one of the few commodities most FATELESS had for sale.
Moreover, it helped Avo judge the flavor and effectiveness of her traumas even better. He realized that the devastation this chain of memories played on the girl wasn’t just from seeing her father die, but also the fact that she, too, might have been at partial fault for it. From his guesses, her father might’ve been able to strike a deal with a smuggler in the camp, buying tickets for two people into New Vultun while hiding the fact that his daughters were twins.
Seeing as the trip was likely to get Lucille’s sister to taste the midnight rains, the fact that both of them were dead, and she was still alive worked at her insides like a knife stuck in her organs.
Perhaps if she just waited, if she just let her father and her sister leave first they would still be alive. Avo regarded such a thought as pure delusion, for Aseleri was a slave-runner, and the father and her sister, at best, would’ve been displaced if they lived long enough.
Fortunately, what was harm for her was a mineable weapon for him.
Casting his ghosts to stretch out over the sequence, Avo began to copy its properties. Lucille’s anguish and regret formed a venom that bore layers of harm. The torment of watching her father die was most damaging. The regret she felt thereafter was like corrosion inflicted upon the ego, a vector of hurt that also applied a modifier of self-loathing if shaped into an armament.
DOWNLOADING TRAUMA-PATTERN [LUCILLE’S REGRET]
Avo didn’t waste any time. From the sequence he drew the mold of another fragger for use; the second weaponized memory pattern to be stored in his current Metamind right after Aseleri’s Folly. As the download began to fill, Avo found his focus drifting over to the girl’s father, her, her sister.
For there, he began to contemplate how to whittle down the hurt that gnawed within this root of pain before he moved on to the others.
How much damage does a thought fragger do? What kind of question is that? This ain’t arithmetic, consang. What cracks my jaw might just bounce off yours. As for how much damage they deal to your wards, well, that’s more a matter of how they’re built.
You got something like a… memory of being set on fire, right? That shit can mess the both of us up. We don’t like that. But a pyromaniac–natural or conditioned by phantasmics–might see that as a duck sees water.
Heh.
Same thing with wards. Are the ghosts simulating a hurricane? A flood or a natural disaster? Yeah, throwing human-scale traumas doesn’t get through, though they’ll still crack the mind behind the wards plenty if you can smuggle them in. It's how my Necros used to explain it to me anyway. Hells. They’d probably explain it better to you than I ever could. Well, if any of them were still alive maybe.
The point is, you have to treat phantasmics and mem-weapons like things of relativity. It’s not a gunfight like it is in the real. The Nethers about trying to slip in through someone’s cracks after you dump a bunch of cog-missiles on them, and even during the bombardment.
Fragging up a mind is part art and part psycho-engineering. It’s the reason why there really ain’t that many true Necros. It takes a very particular person to face the darkest, most fucked up shit you can find inside someone’s ego, and go: “Yeah, I think I can build something real nova with this.”
-Quail Tavers, New Vultun Sunrise Interview
6-5
Mind Dive (II)
Mending a mind from the inside was one part sleight of hand and three parts subversive architectural reconstruction. Recovery wasn't the right world for Lucille. Much as she wanted her personality to remain intact, the world that encapsulated her interior was already warped by the blows she had taken. Life had treated her cruelly, and so the shape of her mind gave what it could in capitulation.
But when she witnessed her sister die on the grafter station next to hers, an indelible hurt buried itself inside her so deep that every memory to do with her sister, and her father came afire when Avo interfaced with them. They were like new nerve endings to a pain supreme.
Piloting the vessel that was Aseleri from one memory to the next, his Metamind groaned as the trauma battered his protective cage. The hurt was all personal, all individual, so the asymmetry played to his benefit. A recollection made to manifest in the shape of storms feared not the torments of a single girl, torturous as they were.
COG-CAP: 16%
Haste, however, was still wise. Ineffective didn't mean impotent. Beyond the analogous shapes and abilities that phantasmics granted, they were still born of individual minds in quintessence; people remembered, and most people suffered from the chains of empathy. So too did their ghosts share in such a setback.
Avo did not suffer such a disadvantage. He wasn't the most intuitive when it came to augmentative measures or designing mem-sims or vicarities made to appeal. But trauma enticed him on a primal and philosophical level. Watching a mind fissure, burn, scatter, shatter, or outright dissolve in various stages of ego-fragmentation was pure artistry to him; to deliver hurt on a scale so deep that the body remained, but the mind that mantled found themselves dismembered of shape. When he still possessed his old Metamind, he had a catalog of mental snapshots he took of broken minds.
He used to bring them up while he fed, his satisfaction and pleasure being nourished in tandem. One of the few joys he found not so many others got to experience in life.
It was through this that Avo also knew how best to ward against afflictions, to bridge the fractured sequences that remained.
He made to edit the memory then, pulling resources from his own cognitive library, considering how he could alter the sequence of her father's death and clip the sting of her pain.
To outright remove his demise would drive her into insanity. Having a sea of grief inside oneself without a node to center it around could do that to a person. So the exercise became something in micro-deceptions. A smaller tweak. One that lessened the hurt--or transmuted it to another emotion.
For a near hour longer, Avo studied the webbed expanse of her nearby memories. Clouds of threaded guilt sprang out from the sequence like it was a seed, the infection spreading and feeding into the other major roots of her trauma. It would take him at least a week to prune them all, but pruning was most inefficient.
No, a pillar sequence could work to his advantage. He only needed to change a few things.
Shuttling Aseleri's sequences into the forefront of his mind, he filtered through all the snuff data she had stored within her Metamind and plucked out the parts she remembered of the father.
Streklov. Osjan Streklov. Born in Pronghurst, on the periphery of Kosgan. Lineage was of thaum-slaves, meant to breed and be fed to the gods as a sacrifice. Was about fifty-one at the time of death. Augmentations minimal. his experience was primarily as a farmer out in the Winnow--a narrow landbridge that extended from the Nolothi continent to the scintillating, star-carved shores of Kosgan.
What Aseleri knew of the man came from the information he gave them. All other data remained out of her reach, something that belonged to the city.
Or Avo, should he be the one to perform the ritualistic act of slaughter, feeding his frame.
Regardless, he had enough of Lucille's father that he thought himself able to smuggle and overwrite the tail end of this traumatic sequence. His Ghostjack crackled upon command, burning the mem-data of the current memories he was suffused in over into one of his ghosts.
Using said ghost, a rebuild was prepared. The father would still die. Aseleri would remain a monster. But besides those eventualities, Avo would make a single change. A thing centered around the idea of choice.
Something that the girl sorely lacked.
Again, one part sleight of hand and three parts subversive reconstruction. He planted another suggestion into her mind, pliable without wards or phantasmics, and she began to dream. His prompts ran vague, something along the lines of her mother, her family, lost in a time of happiness.
In the ocean of her mind, a new swirl came together beneath the waves, forming a window of light and slaughter. Through the looking glass, the vague contours of four people greeted Avo's mind with a breath of warm air. In fields of ever-spiraling fungi, Lucille stood with her family watching as their patron, the Fallwalker made rocks the size of small mountains dance an opera around them while holographic fireworks expanded across the fissured firmament.
A speck within Avo, taken with interest, wanted to watch for a moment. The rest of him snatched the straying strand of focus and committed to his work. This was not his dream, and she would only be distracted by the dream for so long. Soon or later, the suggestion would wear off and her mind would grow harder to influence.
He seized the now, and he began to forge his divergence.
In his paired memory, he stripped the fear from her father's face; the feebleness. A sense of determination, then, was bestowed upon the man, an expression of fatalistic defiance not found in life. The impending nature of his death could mask the potential personality divergence. More importantly, using another planted suggestion as a mental relaxant, she had good odds of accepting the overwrite without question.
The harder part came with scripting the man's defiance. Avo had other artifacts he could pull from his library of memories. People struggling over guns; actual fights; defiant last words. If traumas were where he felt himself capable, then empathy was where he faltered.
The concepts were known to him. He had sampled more than his fair share of emotions. The difficulty he faced was in instinctive grasp, chasing feelings with simulated thoughts remained a task of great strain, and so, the bulk of Avo's hour was spent scrying at various memories she had of her father and trying to simulate that using the Locus' ghosts.
By the end, he had something of demonstrable value, though by no means his best work. A pale shadow of what Walton was capable of, anyhow, but pale shadow was a fitting metaphor for both Avo and the false memory he just crafted when compared to his father.
It took a special mind to be a Necrojack. It took a special mind among those to be one that still retained hold of virtue and decency.
Under the cover of Lucille's festive dream, Avo timed his overwrite, letting his Metamind run the process. He prepared his suggestion as the counter ran down. Things needed to happen in sync; like a sudden lull in her mind rather than a sequence of memories vanishing and reappearing.
The timer elapsed. Whipping like synaptic lashes, his ghost rooted themselves in her mind and inverted memories. Hers would be stored in one of his ghosts. His would replace that which he took.
The scene played again, with Aseleri asking him to choose between his two daughters. Avo took the special liberty of editing his own appearance toward the end as well. He would save her other impressions of him, Draus, and Kae to be cleared later. He'd plug in a mix of Scalpers and mercenaries he killed in their place. Keep their identities a mystery as well. Blend the designs of their rigs to obfuscate who they were. Treat them as street squires.
For now, he let the memory play again and surveyed his work.
“Again, Mr. Streklov, the eldest or the youngest? We signed a debt contract for two. I currently count three people in your family. I might be a no-good useless drunk piece of shit long past her heyday, but I can still do arithme–” Avo ordered Aseleri to halt here in the memory, keeping everything as much the same as he could.
As the door to the bridge opened, only Traffic Sight--full name Kasava Yully--approached, face sweat-soaked and afire with nervousness.
And on cue with Yully's approach, Avo altered the memory.
Where Osjan Streklov died on his knees in actuality, here, rewoven as truth into Lucille's mind was a father who raged against the end. Lacking augments and skill, the man made an attempt to grab Aseleri's gun, twice his size thought she was.
At the instant of his motion, Avo watched his memory puppet speak, the words coming as best as Avo could imagine them.
"Girls! It's not your fault! I love--"
And memory required veracity to stay solid, and so, the statement went unfinished as the reflex-boosted Aseleri blurred into motion, palming the man's skull in her hand and firing her implanted gun.
Streklov's head bloomed apart as Avo remembered it did. Lucille screamed. Her sister screamed. The waters of mind shuddered around him ever so subtly.
HOST AWARENESS: 6%
Her wakefulness was back up a bit. Still acceptable parameters.
Examining the root again, Avo considered his next steps. Her emotions and pain were still raw, but he had blunted the fires of her self-loathing with her "father's" engineered words.
Her emotions still roared like towering tides thrown into a rage, falling like clenched fists on the face of a battered sea. But a change had taken effect, and one to his desired advantage.
Her sorrow remained. But that which she used to gnaw at herself in hate was now shuttled over to Aseleri, building blocks added to an already staggering monument of hate.
Back in the real, Avo smiled. The beast whispered to him that he was doing a good job, that he should bite off the girl's fingers to celebrate. He ignored the overfed creature and continued with his work. If he did this fast and efficiently, he would finish before Lucille stopped dreaming.
Following the traffic of hatred and trauma with Aseleri as his primary vehicle still, he found himself positioned behind another holoscreen. Behind him, a vast swath of amorphous space swirled like a miasma in lines of missing mem-data. Lucille knew not what Aseleri's personal chambers looked like and dared not to imagine.
Nearer to Lucille, however, was a scene of horror. Body locked in mag-clasped manacles, she hovered at the heart of a concentric grav-projector--a grafting station cruder than that which was afforded to Avo. Across the room, her sister was trapped much the same way, face pale and swollen, beaten where Lucille wasn't.
It appeared to Avo then the miracle-sick twin must've been the struggler in the family--Lucille the relative coward. Commendable, though ultimately worthless. He let the memory play on and watched as Aseleri pushed her ghosts into their minds roughly.
For the first time, Avo winced. The rest of the pain meant little to him, but he knew why the two girls screamed while their minds were shredded so. The Low Masters were no gentler in issuing their commands. And Aseleri doubtlessly wanted to farm them for vicarities to sell.
Again, the slaver didn't know the value of that which she possessed, using her Ghostjack as little more than mindware for snuff films and edits.
But she didn't stop there. Instead, she Ghost-Linked their minds, bridging their emotion, and their thoughts. For a moment, Avo was confused, but the moment didn't last.
The beast hissed with delight at what it was about to see. Above the emotion, however, Avo felt his scorn rising.
It was a common technique in snuff circles. Some called it the mingling. The act was simple. Find two or more people that cared for one another and forcibly link their minds. Once they were synced in thought and emotion, deliver them upon the precipice of pain with each serving as witness and host both.
What followed was trauma, purer and greater than any single mind could muster. What followed was exponential pain of a cataclysmic variety.
A blast of pain enveloped Avo's mind. The beast within him cackled with euphoric jubilance. A dozen micro-drones took beam and scalpel to the body of Lucille and her sister. Much like Avo's surgery, there were no anesthetics or pain inhibitors involved. Unlike his, they needed it.
No longer did he think Bright-Wealth's words an exaggeration. Screams that could follow one into their dreams indeed. Screams ineffable in magnitude, descriptions insufficient to package the sheer devastation it inflicted.
Screams worth a million imps.
DOWNLOADING TRAUMA-PATTERN [LUCILLE’S AGONY]; [SECONDHAND FATALITY]
He had something harsh enough to overload wards now if Lucille's pain meant anything. Hard flowed the waters of virtue when vileness paid dividends so.
The horror played for an eternity of three minutes. Across the link, it felt like the sisters were clasping hands, trying not to let go of each other, their shared affection as strengthened as the pain was.
But where resolve was steel, the flesh was wanting, and on the cusp of the third minute, one end of the link just dissolved.
Eyes misted and mind raw with agony, a drone had to draw Lucille back by her hair, forcing her to look upon the stilled corpse of her half-flayed sister. She made a noise then. It was a scream. It was less than human, less than even the whine of a nu-dog.
Aseleri had taken her past the threshold of hurt she could fathom. Numbness became Lucille, and her thoughts drowned in a blank canvas as she suddenly began wondering why her father was missing, why her sister wasn't moving, and where her mother was. Even the endless stream of ghosts he drew from the locus was coming apart against the totality of her despair.
Avo felt his wards shudder. And begin to crack.
COG-CAP: 88%
"Ah, hells," Aseleri said, sounding more annoyed than anything. "Hope you aren't broken. Still gotta sell you, you know."
With a thought, Avo jacked out. He jacked out and took a second to think. Looking down at the girl, he saw turbulence in her expression. The dream would only last for so long. But he needed to consider how to approach this.
He had hoped the sister's death and her implantation were separate roots. Instead, the inflamed sequence was conjoined; overlapping. This would take more than a spoofed memory. Far more. Moreover, Avo was wrong about Lucille. If she was a coward, insanity would have devoured her then.
Reaching into his own Metamind, he watched as even the ghost he copied the memory sequence over to writhed, lightning bolts of trauma running through its wisp-like structure.
Glancing at Lucille again, Avo felt his focus sharpen. She was proving to be more challenging to fix -- and more valuable a resource -- than he thought. One that would take more than a few spoofs.
Thinking, his thoughts shifted back over to Aseleri. The girl couldn't kill the slaver. Not even after all that had been done to her. An even stranger reaction after what was inflicted on her, but most minds were unique in shape and reaction.
Then, a thought came to Avo. One of chronological reinterpretations and a grander falsehood to wave.
What if he added another link to the sequence? What if it also allowed him to censor her mind at the same time?
What if, instead of dying mid-graft, he gave her sister an encore worth remembering? See Aseleri dead in the same instant? Begin by weakening the trauma and tweaking her past?
A new plan began to grow in Avo's mind. He dove back in.
I visited twelve different Necros to remove the contagion after the war. Best of Stormtree, or so they claimed.
Do you know what they told me?
"Can't do it."
Can't do it. Asked them why.
Do you know what they told me?
"It's spread. There's nowhere it isn't."
Nowhere it isn't.
I thought about solving my own equation after that. Finishing things out as myself... well, that's not true. Whatever shadow of myself I was after...
Anyway, do you know what happened next? Do you want to know what it took to get me to stop thinking I had four fathers? Go back to having none?
A real Necro. One that does it for the pleasure of the dive. A guy I could... understand, I suppose; gives himself over to the action. He's like me, I think. He loves... what he does. I love the gun. He loves the ghost. Somewhere between it all, I think he just... pitied me? Such creatures of simplicity we were. But I was of the land, and he the air. When the waters rose, he was flying... but... but I drowned.
He removed the damage sequences. Pieced together who I was from the periphery of my life. Did it all in exchange for a memory? One that I was more than happy to give.
I killed a Low Master, you know. Don't remember how anymore. Sold that off to the Necro. Don't remember much about him after either. Think he was using an Incog when he spoke. No name. No address. Just a title.
The Strix.
And a smell. A smell that stays with you.
Citrus.
-Mem-Log of Vincintine Javvers, Leader of the Scalpers Syndicate
6-6
Mind Dive (III)
The first matter to circumvent was the sheer weight of the trauma. He lasted within the confines of the sequence leading up to the apex, but upon reaching the precipice, it was as if stepping above a sun-basked mountain into the first of dawn itself. Perhaps he could have designed wards more asymmetrical to its harm--collected ghosts of colder emotion and make.
Such things, however, would take weeks if not months. Time favored him more than before, but the tides of fortune could shift between seconds and instants. The last two days had ingrained much in him regarding the seizure of opportunity.
Instead, he embarked further into the girl's past, far before the point where her greatest wounds lingered. Still, he could feel the hurt bleeding over. Memories were connected after all. Like chains holding onto chains.
Like a stalker digging through flashing montages of a discarded life, he studied the nature of Lucille's sister, his Metamind set to keep her name from his memories. It would serve nothing for him to claim knowledge of her name and fill her with personhood. Such a task would better be automated for his ghosts.
Alas, for all the strength the sister supposedly displayed before her demise, it simply did not show throughout her life. Much like Lucille, she was a worker in the enclave's hydroponics facility. Unlike Lucille, it appeared the sister was something of a sim-addict, spending much of her time drowning in bootlegged memories and smuggled mem-games--experiences of experiences, mental constructs derived from a secondhand source already experiencing a vicarity themselves, offering a most diluted hit.
Gunmetal Glory was the prime drug to her habit. Taking place during the Age of Pantheons, the game was set in a world much based on Sanctus historicals, with derivatives of the Vuddivistae Pantheon facing mutually off-brand mimicries of the Kosgan Seraphic Choirs. Old wars masked in a new sheen of paint. Lucille herself cared little for the games, more addicted to the historicals herself.
Ultimately, neither sister held true predilections towards violence. This meant that if he need the sister to play the part of the avenger and savior, he would have needed to rewrite the entirety of her identity within Lucille's perspective. Something that he had neither want nor inclination of doing. Nor did he see the need.
A great portion of being a Necro, then, was adaptability. The mind could be rewoven toward a new narrative, but the paths to the promised recreation were myriad. The climax of her new recollective architecture needed to be one of finality, a thing that saw the death of the sister and Aseleri alike, followed by a cleansing of potentially incriminating details.
Thankfully, however, Lucille and her sister need not prevail alone. And sometimes, ignorance was the best armor against suspicion. To this end, Avo made two greater changes. The first was an alteration made to the anomalous sickness that plagued her sister--something that Avo added aspects to, making Lucille believe that her sister had been made more robust as well by the creatures festering beneath her skin.
The second was the presence of outside actors, coming not to save them, but to seek recompense from Aseleri.
Hours drifted and Avo succumbed to the breadth of his work. He worked from the short-term to the long, pruning and copying memories relating to himself, Draus, or Kae. He did not remove the events outright in Lucille's mind. To do so risked the host's outright awakening. Instead, he changed the events of her freedom, using the deluge of despair and near-madness after the death of her sister to shroud her recollections in mist and doubt.
From there, he structured a new tale using the artifacts and actors at his disposal. Bridged by the phantasmal pathway cast by his Ghostjack, Avo wielded his art in dichotomy, building new memories in his and deconstructing memories in hers.
He seeded new assumptions for the sister--minor suggestions toward her being more willing to accept violence in the face of death. More than that, however, he added new lines of dialogue to Aseleri when she spoke to their father, painting her face in sweat and nervousness, hinting at a debt that was coming due; a slaver made by desperation rather than rank greed and cruelty, something much easier to digest for Lucille's mind.
From there, he prepared new actors to enter the scene; debt collectors and outside forces, transplanting her feelings of shock and awe when he slew Aseleri before her to mask any possibility of disbelief. No outside emotion was injected into her equilibrium. Her feelings remained hers. It was but the truth that was disposed of.
By the time he was inching toward the culmination of the resequencing, the day was long faded and midnight greeted him as a chime via his Metamind, his DeepNav announcing the oncoming rainfall.
He had scrubbed himself and the other two from the girl's memories. Nothing would remain of him other than that of a passing feeling should their paths ever cross again. In his place, he introduced the presence of new strangers into her memory. Such was the risk he had to take should he want to bring the memory to a culmination during the grafting.
Melded from all the Scalpers, enforcers, and hunters he left dead over the past week, his ghosts offered him a selection of new and entirely non-existent personas from the forge that was his Ghostjack. They would inherit a mesh of traits and that would leave them just believable enough for the mind to accept as real, yet nondescript enough to never be found should Lucille ever gain the interest to go looking. These new proxies would serve in place of him and Draus, as debt collectors coming to claim that which Aseleri owed them.
Her mind halted a moment. In the real, a slight frown drifted across her face like a passing cloud. Avo froze, steadying himself to jack out as he watched her awareness climb, and stop.
HOST AWARENESS: 12%
Acceptable. He continued.
Taking a moment to review the sequences that he changed, Avo beheld his work, riveted with focus. Like a galaxy of ever-spreading branch-like dendrites of memories that fenced fluid stars of welling emotion, Avo looked upon the simulated map of her mind and made a few final adjustments. Through a single strand--the memory of the steam bun--he twinned his ghosts to her memories and made the changes.
He collapsed a few lesser events into each other, hiding them beneath the sequences of a grander memory. A few more hints were placed to infuse the sister's presence with more strength, more tenacity. He even shrank Aseleri down to afflict her with more vulnerability. Make her death easier for Lucille to accept when the time came.
Then, when all that was done, Avo ran the new sequence through himself as a simulation, with his ghost offering an estimate of how much attention his edits would draw from the host.
ESTIMATED HOST AWARENESS: 17-20%
Twenty ran the edge but was acceptable. Any more than that and he would be looking to reduce his number of changes. He applied the rebuild, letting his ghosts slowly overwrite her memories, the installation taking its time. A brute change would have allowed him much more speed but would've left her little more than a catatonic husk considering the immensity of the traumas she bore.
As another hour passed, the new memories dissolved the old, setting into place as he slowly rebuilt his way over toward the moment of her sister's death--and her implantation.
Mind quiet after hours of work, Avo found himself content to watch his revisions. The act, he could not deny, was one of pure ego: a one-ghoul audience watching his self-directed play in the cinema of another's mind. He would even have considered it voyeuristic if not for his relative lack of interest in the victim, supping amusement instead from a demonstration of personal capabilities.
The memory of her greatest trauma began again. The initial moments were much the same, with the sister and her forced to watch each other's brutalization. Their flesh was splayed open; their minds were joined in the fires of agony; their voices were united in screams.
But this time, the sister did not die immediately. At least, not yet. Not with her supposedly enhanced survivability. He accelerated the completion of the implantation process, truncating the process to not run out of time for this branch and bleed over into the next sequence.
"Well," Aseleri said, scripted to his behest, "seems like I underestimated my new products. Expected at least one of you to die." She sighed in faux disappointment. It helped that he had the slaver's ghost to simulate the part. "Still. Pretty neat vicarities you two made. Going to fetch me some neat imps. Heh. You're gonna be stars for a day in the Warrens. You're welcome--"
The grafting chamber shook then, explosions shaking the structure. Aseleri's holofeed flickered, and through a mind-numbed haze, Lucille found herself drifting in and out of coherence at Avo's suggestion, the room erupting in moments of violence as gauss fire tore through the walls, and gunfire was exchanged.
Hoarsely, she whimpered for her sister, now no more than raw scabs of swaying meat than a person. But breathing. still breathing. Another blast sounded. Another exchange of gunfire. Drones came apart into popping sprays of licking alloy. Screams and curses flowed from the hissing doorway, Aseleri fleeing in.
To add effect to the scene, he had the outlines of her two captains come apart under gunfire. A stale background inspired questions in the mind, after all. Firing back sloppily, the already wounded captain stumbled next to the two girls as struggled to reload her gyrojet pistol, blood welling from three wounds in her abdomen, subdermals punched clean through.
"I got... I got product!" He had made her shout. Silence returned. A shadow of an exo-rig appeared in the doorway, somewhere between Conflux and Scalper in design. Avo's persona said nothing and brought their gun to bear.
Aseleri cursed. She fired back, gun in one hand and weapon implant in the other. Both instruments boomed as she tore chunks through the wall, suppressing the incoming assailants. This lasted for but a second until another shot tore through one of the side walls and sheared through the captain's knee. Like a toppling tree, the giantess fell, her weight crashing down and sending Lucille careening from her grafting station.
By this point, the numbness needling through her skin exiled her from pain. And so, with a moment's urging from Avo, and after a choked beat of hesitation spent staring at the writhing slaver, Lucille stumbled blind into a cloud of gunfire, limping toward the mangled disfigurement that was her sister.
To have Lucille dream that she and her sister could overcome Aseleri alone was a step beyond. As much as Avo tried, the captain had left scars the size of mountains that rose through the waters of the former mod slave's mind. Hence the need for his personas, and outside assistance to help deliver the killing blow that neither Lucille nor her sister could manage. And in place of Avo and Draus, they served as halfway saviors.
But the resolution, then, belonged to her and her kin.
She pried her sister's bloodied form free from the station, a task made easy from the damage it sustained during the gunfight.
"It--it's okay," Lucille muttered, her mind awash of colors and screaming sensations. Terror ruled her nigh-frozen muscles and her heart strained to pump the molasses that occupied the place of blood in her veins. But still, dread did not omit the love she felt for her sister. And so, as she mustered the fragility of her will and tried to make her escape.
And on cue, the newly modified memories that composed the platonic ideal of her sister spoke the words Avo had seeded.
"Luce," the sister said, the blood and phlegm lodged in her throat filling her words. She gripped Lucille tight. "Gun. Get the gun."
Lucille stopped, her fear coming alight as her composure nearly broke. A factor his simulation predicted.
"Killed dad," the sister said. Lucille's fear slammed into a dam--just enough hate to stymie the flood.
Avo grinned, glorying as his work came together.
Awkwardly, the twosome stumbled, making for the discarded gyrojet pistol even as more trailing threads of tungsten sewed new beams of light into the room. Across the ground, Aseleri was groaning, cupping her knee, with the white of her meniscus bubbling around her fingers like mangled paste.
Lucille knelt down, leaning slightly against a fallen drone so she would collapse between her own weight and her sisters. Clenched between shaking fingers, she flicked a glance at Aseleri. A sob broke out from her.
"I can't," Lucille said, almost immediately. The shadow of her father's death hovered over the slaver, even now. Understable. Pitiful. Adjustable.
"I... I just need you to aim," the sister said, reaching down as if blind, her eyelids left flensed by the surgery. Lucille whimpered, but handed the piece over, hating herself for her weakness, averting her eyes from this greater version of her sister like one would turn from the rising sun. "Tell me when... tell me when."
Quietly, Lucille cupped her quivering hands around that her sister's, turning the gun toward the direction of Aseleri's head.
Avo had chosen that moment to make the captain notice them. "Wait," Aseleri screamed, her fear breaking into a grimace of pure terror. He would not lie, there was some pleasure in defiling the memory of the slaver. As much a screamer she was in life, cowardice was a vice too low for her. But Avo owed her nothing, and so he burned her image as an effigy, an offering to draw Lucille from fear to hate. The gulf was always about relative power, and it's hard to respect someone that begged.
Crawling, the captain reached out, imploring them with bloodied limbs.
Lucille sobbed again, terrified even now at her great abuser's approach.
"Luc... she killed dad," he had made the sister say.
And suddenly, he felt the torch of anger spark. Just a flash. Just enough.
Lucille stopped shaking.
"Shoot," she snarled. "Shoot! Shoot! Shoot!"
Her sister obliged. The gun barrel brightened. A micro-missile ejected free with minimal recoil before its afterburners flashed. He had selected the make with consideration to their bodies. The gun was something that two flats could fire without issue. Something that didn't engender disbelief upon a revisit, if she was ever to find herself in the stead of a neuro-therapist or a social memetist at some point.
Aseleri's head burst apart, spattering into jagged fragments of chrome, strips of sinew flapping free like petals. Lucille groaned reflexively and a sickness rose within her. Her sister laughed. Gasped.
And then collapsed.
"No--no," Lucille's cries came, childlike, her voice more confused than anything. "Get... get up. Please... please."
"Luce," the sister said, swallowing. Distantly, the heavy boots of armored figures were approaching, gunfire silenced. "You... you have to make it... Make it for us... Made it into the city. New Vultun."
Avo had drawn the words from some soap opera tragedy that one of his ghosts used to watch. As it went, he thought it was effective enough, but something about it still sounded strange. Alas, he was no narrative director, and Lucille's suspicions did not spike. He let it run. He let the sequence finish.
"Yeah," Lucille said, holding her sister close, "help... help's here. Going to get you well... going to--"
"Have to make this worth it, Lucille," the sister said. "Has to be worth it--for one of us."
"No," Lucille said, shrinking into herself, drawing her sister close even as the shadows of his implanted personas stood over her. "No."
"You have to. You can. Know--know you're scared, but we're with you. We... we slayed the monster." He added a laugh there. Sounded more natural. "Killed the monster."
And at that, Lucille looked at the captain again, and the structure of her mental scars shifted. As the towering heights of her dread crumbled by half, a new range of mountains rose, loathing to rival fear. Short of altering her in totality, the girl would always fear. But this way, he could lean two of her detriments against each other, choking a vice with a vice; an idea inspired by his own Morality Injector.
"Yeah, f-fuck yeah, we did," Lucille said, swallowing back a sob.
"Dad... dad would be proud."
"Yeah."
The memory was running its course to his desired end. He had connected a connective sequence looping back to a prior memory, the one with her family watching the dancing mountains beneath the neon fireworks. From sorrow to joy, he tied her, a link to a link, a spiral of memories and emotions locked in a perpetual wrestle. But it was a match that he ensured joy would win.
He placed it at the end, after all.
"Do you remember the festival," the sister said, serving as the connective tissue to the memory.
"Yes."
"I do too," the sister said. "I do too."
And so, from the transplanted sequence, Lucille was pulled on suggestion back into a true one. A smile twitched across her face in the real. Avo checked her wakefulness.
HOST AWARENESS: 18%
Good. He pulled his field of influence back, shuttling his ghosts back down the shunts of her memory, and dismantling the memory of the steamed bun as a final suture to seal the wound. He kept the memory still in case he needed a key into her mind again. Though she wouldn't remember him, he could still angle it to intrude. It had fit once. He could make it again.
Stepping back, he laid eyes on his work and found his job to be most adequately done. Though he was more often a thief or a nuller, he had pieced her thoughtstuff back together well enough. No longer did the waters of her mind roar and lash at itself. No longer did she collapse inwards.
Still, two crevices ran in a fissuring scar across her accretion. Fear and loathing. Both inflicted by Aseleri. They were there to stay for now. At least the flow of her mind wasn't crashing into them, draining down like open wounds.
With a casual glance outside the door, he noticed Bright-Wealth still there, chains of ghosts stretching through the building, doubtlessly linking her to one of her sisters.
He cast a thought at her with his Ghostjack, drawing on Lucille's mem-data to make a forgery of her voice. +It's done.+
Bright-Wealth's mind popped to full alertness. Her link broke and her ghosts were reeled back in. Without ceremony, the Sang pushed open the door and slithered in.
Her motion stuttered as she came upon Avo gesturing for her to behold his work. Her expression amused him. The way she moved past him without regard for giving him her back made him want to tear into her throat.
"Deal with you soon," Avo said, his words whispered as a taunt to the beast.
"Jaus," Bright-Wealth said. Her eyes were locked on the smiling girl, nestled tight embrace of the lung bed's biocrafted skin, trapped in Avo's pre-coded memory. The Sang shot the ghoul a stunned expression, lip-thinning, her snake tail coiling tight. "I suppose you're a... pretty good Necro, then?"
Avo grunted. "Comparatively."
Her eyes narrowed. "Comparatively? You just made a girl who I had to stop from killing herself smile in her sleep. Smile!" A frown wrapped itself around Bright-Wealth's face. "Although... you're not juking me, are you yao-guai? Didn't just give her a good dream and have her go right back to being miserable after, yes?"
"Miserable? Yes. Too much trauma. Would need to change her entire personality to fix. But functional now. Shouldn't want to die anymore. Vulnerable though. Needs support."
The Sang sneered. "Cost you extra if you want me to be her friend."
"No. You already care. Wouldn't make bet to have her smile otherwise. Playing games right now."
The sneer cracked into a glare of annoyance. "You don't know how I feel."
Avo shrugged. "I could."
"Hey, hey, now, keep your ghosts the fuck away from me." He noticed her wards hardening. A flashing glint beneath the scales on her shoulder told him that her sidearms were getting activated, just in case.
Beneath his helmet, he grinned. It was good to be dreaded.
Glancing at the girl again, Bright-Wealth sighed. "Kind of fucked up too, if you think about it. Changing her memories. Taking her traumas and turning them into weapons. Truth is like clay to your type."
And for once, she regarded him as more Necro than ghoul. It was almost touching. "This was not her dream. But it will be. Better than truth."
Her eyes bulged at his answer. "Jaus," Bright-Wealth said again. But the moment didn't last on her. Bright-Wealth, unlike Lucille, experienced things in bursts and moved on just as fast. A conspiratorial glint shone in the depths of her eyes. "Hey, listen... Every other Tulsady, I play this game of Towers with my sisters..."
He suddenly found himself wondering how Bright-Wealth's skin would feel if he peeled her face off and wore it as a mask. "Not helping you cheat."
A puckering noise came from her then, her tail striking the ground in a faux-tantrum-like rattle. Lucille shuffled, turning in the bed. "Come on. What is the point of being a masterful Necrojack if you can't help your good consang Bright-Wealth angle her way into a few thousand imps from her cheating sow-sisters."
Avo stared. "We're consangs now?"
She held out her hands as if waiting for coins to fill her palms. "With such skill, surely you--"
"No."
"Ah! You're so boring. You're so stiff. I thought you were going to be fun."
That made Avo chuff. "Most ghouls you know are fun?"
A trace of consideration passed through her features in but a moment. "Yes, actually. They are quite fun to bet on when they have them fight in the pits."
He was a fool trying to talk sense with a consummate gambler. Moreso to linger after his task was done and more awaited. "Going to need help," Avo said, gesturing to the still-slumbering Lucille. "Won't remember me or the other two. Might need some direction. So Warrens don't eat her."
Bright-Wealth cocked an eyebrow as she slithered around him in a burst of motion. "Oh. Do I sense caring from you, ghoulie?"
"No," Avo said. "Just feels like a waste of work if she died soon." He looked upon her again and felt little more than pride and hunger. She wasn't his best work but considering her condition and his lack of practice in reassembling minds compared to cracking them, it was a most acceptable outcome. "Be like watching my art burn."
"Ah," Bright-Wealth said, tone flattening to a nasal disappointment. "And here I was thinking you suddenly grew a heart."
"Would like that. Free organ. Free imps," Avo said. "Make sure the grafter doesn't spoof her. That she gets the imps."
Bright-Wealth snorted. "Fine. You want me to get her a job too?"
"Can you?"
The Sang was about to say something sarcastic in retort but then settled back into thoughtfulness. "Maybe. Might need to ask River. Our sister at the front desk solved her own equation yesterday. Too much joy."
One death was a tragedy. And an opportunity.
Avo grunted. "Good." With a thought, Avo casually flicked her a few hundred or so imps, the diamond-like glints of the motes threading out from behind his wards into her accretion. "As thanks. Ask Draus if you want another arrangement. She might have something."
IMPS: [2342]
The Sang grinned and gave Avo a wink. "Have I ever told you that you're my favorite ghoul?"
What fierce competition he must've been up against to claim such a title. "No. Must've been distracted last few times."
"Ah," Bright-Wealth said, waving his words off in a display of false modesty. "We all have flaws. Some of us get forgetful when our accounts get dry."
Greed. Ever reliable. Ever exploitable.
***
Avo made not to loiter, returning to elevator and reascending. Caressing the new traumas swirling within his mind, the designs of new constructs called to him. No more need to use his wards as a blunt instrument. No more need to wield his Whisper like a hammer. The feeling of being properly armed was a comfort he missed, the possibility of being able to build proper phantasmics enticed him further now that the matter of the girl had been solved.
Chambers was to be next. He and the two techs presented unique opportunities for subversion, and he long yearned for the chance to roam in a mind he feared not to break.
As the elevator climbed back up to the tenth floor, he activated his Auto-Seance and cast a thought over to Draus. +Avo here. Dealt with the mod slave. Going to work on our three guests next. Need me to wait for your return? Have ideas on how to turn them to use.+
Silence was his companion for a moment. Then, as if a doorway flung open, Draus greeted him, her cog-feed twined over his, flashing into form in the corner of his mind's eye.
+The girl. How's she gettin' on?+ Draus asked, her question cutting in without greeting.
+Mind's clean of us. Managed to knot the worst of her pain too.+
+Well, color me pleased 'bout that.+ Draus sighed her reluctance and curiosity upon the shores of Avo's mind through the session. +How... uh... how bad is it? Inside her head, I mean?+
+Aseleri mingled her and her sister. Made them face each other during the implantation process. Sister died while the link was still active.+
A dull throb of hate reverberated through Draus. +Well. And here I was thinkin' that me lettin' you work that slaver the way you did was enabling.+
+It was. She also deserved it. Both things can be true.+
The Regular laughed. +Real introspective of you there, ghoul.+
+Just being honest.+
She paused. +You mockin' me there, Avo?+
+Yes.+
+Heh. Half-strand.+ A flood of mem-data from her aero's locus slipped over into their link. +You fine with hangin' around until I get back? Got some things we need to go over. Ideas, more like. Think you can plant some spyware in their minds.+
+Give me desired function. I'll make the phantasmics.+
+Gleam,+ Draus said. +Another thing. Green River cast at me earlier. She got your thaum-chow ready. You fine with killin' your kind, right?+
+Easier than hunting them in the gutters,+ Avo said. +Quieter than hunting gangers. Will need to check if she planted anything in them. You tell her that they're for target practice?+
+Yep,+ Draus replied.
+She believe you?+
The Regular barked a laugh. +Hells no. But I think she's got her eye more on me than she does you. Might be thinkin' I'm about that bio-warfare life now. Use them as super-spreaders or somethin'. Figured that cause she offered me a couple of discounts on their off-the-book product. Virals and plagues. Outdated but still nasty No-Dragon shit.+
Made sense. +Want me to scry her out. See if I can get inside. See what she knows?+
A lull of consideration hovered. +No. No, don't do that. She ain't peeked at us yet, far as I can tell. Might be talking with her seniors, but she's held to our agreement so far.+
Avo didn't know if it was honor or doubt that restricted Draus so. +Can get in. Looked at their wards. Security. A bit less than competent. Good for these parts. Nothing I haven't--+
+Ain't nothin' about your jacking. Just... hold on for now. I gotta think.+ Draus sighed. +She and I, we got stuff on each other. Debts. Deals. The whole suite. It ain't 'bout trust but... she's been reliable. And I'd rather have her to deal with. Near anyone else I know would've sold us back to Highflame or their preferred color the moment they suspected anything.+
+And why hasn't she?+ Avo asked. +Honor?+
+Interest is more my guess,+ Draus said. +I'm sure she wants to climb up. Get into the Tiers. Just don't think she's content about the Undercroft. She might be gunning for the Frame herself, Avo. Trying to see if we're gonna lead her anywhere. If we know anything more than what we told her.+
Ah. So she sought the entirety of the reward rather than just a cut of the prize. But it was already suspect. She knew too much and played a passive game. Unless she was that good of a Necro that not even he could notice. Should that be the case, he and Draus were already dead. If Kae's mind was intact enough, he would have suspected her thoughts of being bugged. As she was now, she was lucky if her thoughts remained for half a second before immolating.
+Decide quickly with her,+ Avo said. +Won't wait for her to move first. Done making that mistake.+
"They're renewable. It's efficient"
-The official No-Dragon response regarding their continued use of ghouls after the damage inflicted upon public welfare after the Uprising
6-7
Target Practice
"Well... this brings back old times, don't it, Avo?" Draus said.
Avo didn't respond with words, instead granting the Regular only a low growl, the noise only earning a soft laugh from her.
Before them was "target practice." A wide-open room located in the back of a rarely frequented arcade in Xin Yunsha. With their bodies caged by the grasp of shifting gravity platforms that ran circuits across the fifty-by-fifty room, Avo watched as his brothers were shuttled in one after another, each looking more cancerous than the last. Judging from the half-healed surgical scars on their bodies, they were likely of use to the local grafters once. Until the tumorification occurred. Then, it proved to be cheaper to get another ghoul instead of attempting surgery to preserve the previous ones.
From behind a protective phase shield, Avo, Draus, and Kae listened as a rock-heavy jingle played and the ghouls twisted in pirouettes to the whims of a force unseen.
"MEGA-DEFENSE ULTIMATE! THE ROTLICKS HAVE COME TO FEED ON YOUR FAMILY! YOU GLEAM ENOUGH TO FEED ON THEIR DEATHS?"
The grating tone of the announcer made Kae wince with displeasure. "How... how awful. Avo, a-are you fine with this?"
"Yeah," Avo said, his tone flat. "More convenient this way." He turned to Draus. "How much stock? One hundred and twenty?
"Two hundred and twelve. On discount." She snorted. "Didn't think River would actually make this target practice themed, but I figure that ghouls bound for the pastures gotta go somewhere." She paused. "And frankly, I don't much recall doin' much gallery shootin' with your kind. Fusion burners were my bread and butter for ghouls."
At the mention of fusion burners, Avo's skin prickled. Memories of his idiot brothers charging into an expanding chasm of blinding brightness assailed him. Still, they kept spilling down death-choked hallways, their bodies whole, then shadows, swallowed by an overwhelming tide of light.
Quietly, he watched the writhing forms of his brothers, their movements strained with impotence as they wrestled against their suspension. There was poetry here, morbid as it was. To die as impotent as they had lived. To die as mockeries of their purpose rather than fulfilling the grand design for which they were molded.
Kae had suggested that they see his thaums and ghosts good and fueled before the next steps. Draus concurred. Hence, they found themselves here, beholding the targets their benefactor offered them.
Avo sighed. It was not the insult to his kind that bothered him. No. Ghouls were little more than insults, to begin with; too vicious to be a part of society, too weak to cause actual harm.
With a thought, his Metamind pulsed, and at its crown, the Ghostjack sang out to the Nether, a stratocumulus of sequences breaking from being constellations behind his wards and gathering to form a trauma-infused lance tip. He coated his weapon first with the Secondhand Fatality.
Phantasmal matter surged. A crackle formed over its path as viewed from his cog-feed. As easy as driving a toothpick through a bug, Avo plunged his trauma down through two of his brothers, one in front of the other. Their thoughtstuff shattered, fragmenting like bone. Their memories followed, uncupped from the accretion, spilling free like viscera.
Upon their nulling, he tasted the contents of their mind and found them wanting. They bore within them violence and bloodlust, but little more. Still, they understood the nature of death. Feared it all the same. Perhaps not enough to parse themselves from the pursuit of hunger, but enough to struggle for survival if demanded.
A rueful grin graced Avo's face beneath the helmet. Kae stared on in transfixed horror, wincing as both spasmed and went limp. Their bodies continued to pump breath, but the vacancy in their gaze told of their true destination along the twists of the mortal coil.
"You're right Draus. Does bring back old times," Avo said, unlatching the Secondhand Fatality pattern from his ghosts. It was a devastating instrument, though immensely heavy on his thoughtstuff. When he channeled its design, his cog-cap spiked upward of seventy percent. If he didn't siphon Aseleri's Metamind clean, he doubted he would even have enough ghosts to run it. "Low Masters used things like this to 'encourage our bravery.'" He chuffed a light laugh. "Part of the reason we were so easy to burn. Ahead was death. Finality. Behind was torment. Continual."
As the minds of his two brothers came apart into motes, he regarded them with faint annoyance. He wouldn't be getting ghosts from them, but that was part of the reason he picked them. They looked young. Barely more than ghoullings. If any amongst the stock below suffered from an insufficiency of self-awareness, it would be those two.
The quiet ebbing forth from Draus, meanwhile, also pleased him. At least in some capacity. He couldn't blame her for taking pleasure in the slaughter of his kind. Such a thing was ordained by causes virtuous and axiomatic. Concurrently, she could not cast accusations of him wielding the mind-rending arts of her greatest rivals--of Ori-Thaum--despite what wounds they may have inflicted upon her. Not without staining her tongue in the waters of hypocrisy.
"So you say?" she replied, swallowing. "That the pattern you planning to lace our three esteemed volunteers with?"
"No. Will take too many ghosts to support in their minds. Easy found. Unleash that through them as gateways with an Auto-Seance maybe. Have something else for them."
He collapsed the pattern and cycled in Lucille's Agony. A less damaging instrument. More modest in its demand of his capacity, however, and it left the mind intact if traumatized. Deactivating all his presently unneeded phantasmics, he unleashed his new pattern as an eruption of jagged threads, like animated branches in motion, missing only the perched presence of a nu-shrike to complete the invocation of his intent.
The agony tore through his brothers, and grew exponentially, each rooted to each as if they were joined into a central tree of pain. Naked as their thoughtstuff was, his ghosts slithered through thin thresholds of thought into their innermost depths like blades slipping between the ribs.
"This one. Lucille's Agony. This is what I can plant. Can make do with twenty-five ghosts for each of them. Have them infect the block's loci if they can get to it."
Draus nodded. Beside her, Kae had already turned away. She came to watch and study the flow of thaums into his body, seized from his brothers by way of killing. The infliction of trauma, however, spat oil into the fires that fed from her thoughts.
"Keeps them alive too," Avo said, gesturing at his brothers. "Can reclaim the ghosts after if minds are still intact."
"Sounds mighty efficient," Draus said. "How long do you reckon this will take you?"
"Depends on how well hidden. Can have them scattered across memories. Avoid notice. Will take a day each at least. Mirrorhead has a Metamind. Uncertain how skilled he is. Not sure if he can even be considered a Necro. But didn't manage to scry me out when I sequenced at night. Amateur is my guess."
"Best not to guess with 'Clads."
Avo grunted in agreement. "Hide them well. You should talk to the prisoners first. Might cause a bit of memory bleed-over after diving. Common problem. Don't hit them this time. I'll dive into minds afterward to confirm truthfulness."
"Alright," Draus said. "It'll be interestin' to see if that Chambers half-strand is spittin' air about Mirrorhead bein' a Greatling. Their family fell after the Big Fourth, but... that's a hell of a fall, even for them."
"Find out, one way or another. He can't hide from me."
The Regular laughed. "Reckon not. Way you sling sequences is sure as shit a lot slicker than most our Necros. I'd say if Highflame knew you could make a proper Necrojack from a ghoul, we might be ordered to start bringing your type back in."
Avo turned his gaze on the growling, hissing forms of his brothers. From them, an emanation of emotion flowed, and its scent offered naught but fury and death. Was he different by chance? Was his father truly that capable of a man? Of a Necro? "Doubt it."
"Uh... A-Avo?" Kae said. Her tone was perked with something that strode on the borders between curiosity and insight. "Ghosts. They need a cognitive construct to anchor them, yes?"
Avo grunted. "Minds. Biological. Like ours. Or artificial. Like a locus. Or a Voidwatch mind." Another reason why the voiders tended to stay huddled aboard their grand ships in the sheathe of the vacuum. A lesson they learned tragically from the first time the Low Masters took offense to the spacer's humanitarian operations.
Turns out, an oligarchic death cult really didn't like it when you evacuated their stock of sacrifices due to reasons of "unignorable atrocities" and "transgressions beyond all metrics of humanity."
"I... I was thinking--uh--I think if you use your Heaven, you might... might be able to replicate the matter of a locus... a locus. Maybe... maybe not yet because of the complexity of the material... matter... uh... maybe, but if y-you deconstruct a few more Sangeists and add to your Canon of Alchemization..."
The suggestion hit him like a hammer. He had been thinking too limited again with what had been provided to him, shuttling himself down narrow paths of improvement. Should he be able to create loci from his blood--and keep them in reality long enough--it would allow him to avert one of the greatest dilemmas that a Necro suffered: power versus subtly. Through the segmentation of his mind, perhaps he could have both.
The Agnos was proving quite useful despite her fragility. "Will look at your mind when I finish with primary matters," Avo said. He offered his words as both a reward and out of genuine interest. More suggestions like that would expand his avenues of growth immensely.
Kae on her part, beamed, before her face collapsed into confusion, unable to remember why she was smiling in the first place.
"Hells, if you can do that and get a Heaven of Force or... somethin' that applies population and fuse it with your Heaven of Blood--" She turned to look at Kae who nodded, wordlessly telling her that such an act was possible, "--then you might just got some strategic assets goin' there. Drones and a full spectrum of missiles. That like."
Avo hummed. "Now I'm glad Vicious didn't kill you."
"Shit, Avo," Draus said, her grin flickering, "This is what it takes for you to express some affection?"
"Two more good ideas gets you a shoulder pat. Five more and maybe I'll try a hug."
Draus bit her lip and leaned lower. "Hug me and your arms are mine."
"They'll grow back. Use haemokinetic arms in the meantime." Avo sighed. "Life is hard as a mundane."
The Regular shook her head and turned to look at Kae. "Take a peek at this one. 'Clad for just about a week and already he's got the ego to match. Even makin' me kind of agree with Ori-Thaum's no single-use Liminal Frames policy. 'Course, their problem is a lack of Souls than anything ethical."
Kae pursued her lips. "There... there is a psychol-psychological phenomenon called the false apotheosis. Makes Godclads... develop... develop an extremely solipsist bent to... to their perception. See the world as something that should be rightfully shaped in their image."
"Yeah," Draus said, face darkening. "Haven't met a whole lotta half-strands like that. Hey, Avo? Didn't you say you had a third pattern? Lucille's Regret."
"That's for my Morality Injector. Useless on my brothers. Too distant to register as proper trauma. Good to choke beast though." A fact that he had to thank Walton for. If there was one thing he regretted, it was being unable to prevent his father's death by the rash.
Of course, with Walton manifesting in the depths of his mind and lecturing him about the Ninth Column and going to the Easy Armistice, new suspicions arose in Avo. New suspicious he dared not water. Not until later. There were possible truths he didn't want to face right now. He would finish with Conflux, build and claim what memories he needed to cross over past Layers Two and One, and greet the objective granted to him on his terms.
He had enough of being on the back foot.
"Alright," Avo said. "Wasted enough time." He made to deactivate the phase shielding parting them from the ghouls. Draus reached out to stop him.
"Hey--hey. Target practice usually entails guns," Draus said.
"Guns won't get me thaums. Need to get closer to drink. Sovereignty active here. Kae."
"Ye-yes," Kae said. "Un--he doesn't... doesn't have the thaumic mass to contest." She shrugged. "It's... it's like a greater center of gravity."
Draus sighed. "Well, I'm putting up the shield after you go in. Don't need any of them gettin' out and ambushing some juv on their way home."
That made Avo laugh. "Be a miracle if they can walk right now."
"I've seen those miracles."
He breathed. Fair enough.
Descending into the gamified firing range, Avo flexed his claws and shifted the sharpened strands of his Heaven. Twitching his Celerostylus, he felt the reflex booster responding more promptly than it had before. Rest had done his body well. His nerves had healed since his encounter with the Scalpers.
From conveyor docks built into the corners of the range, more ghouls were shuttled in one after another. Flashing holograms ran past him, a father clutching his newborn screaming for someone to save him. Through simulated gaps lining the walls, distant explosions flashed as a river of ghosts dueled like a clash of whips. That part was accurate, at least.
The Low Masters had pitted their esteemed art--their supposed crowns that all the topsiders called a Metamind--against their foes. They battled, and much like the bastard creatures they built to serve as shock infantry, they were found wanting.
Casting a splash of ghosts over one of his brothers, Avo sampled the other ghoul's mind and swept his scrying gaze across the others. Green River had again either proven true to honor or was far superior a Necro that he could not notice her subterfuge. Something told him it was the former.
Striding up to the swaying ghoul, Avo greeted his brother with a mix of scorn and pity. They shamed him. For their inability to rise above their instincts, he loathed them. The architecture of his hate was a varied one. The question of if he was unique by nature or nurture had flared within him like bouts of inflammation from time to time. Not enough to truly trouble him, but enough to make him wonder.
Reaching into the mind of his brothers, he caressed their memories and sampled the moments they spent hatching from corpses and mounds of biomass before being plucked by strong hands. From there followed nothing but gladiatorial fights and surgery. Yet, through it all, there was no trauma for him to derive, no reward for him to claim. It was a pleasure to hurt, to kill for them. And the act being inflicted on them, meanwhile, remained but fleeting wounds upon the uneasy waters of their psyche.
In time, it was like they would even grow used to Lucille's Agony. Perhaps it was their state of weakness that allowed it to affect them in the first place. Regardless of the case, he found himself looking up at one of his brothers, its body splayed out, rail-thin arms spread wide, a cluster of tumors bubbling out around its right eye.
Sniffingly, the other ghoul weakly bit at him. "Hunger... give blood. Give feed."
REND CAPACITY: 1%
Avo manifested a thin blade of purest crimson. At his brother's words, he bit back a snarl. "Why did you even make us?" He asked, his words offered uselessly to old owners no longer present. "Why are they... lacking?"
The ghoul, suspended as it was, bit at him.
Avo grunted in acknowledgment. "Don't worry. Put an end to this farce. Put an end to ours. No need for you. No point in you."
His blade lashed out. With a flick, his blade punched through flesh and greeted ichor. Avo dranked deep then. From the stock of his brothers, Avo put these creatures most worthless toward nobler cause.
THAUMIC CYCLER: 61 THAUM/c... 102 THAUM/c... 150 THAUM/c... 211 THAUM/c... 272 THAUM/c
Ghosts: [290]
The obfuscation of spyware is a delicate act; it is akin to making a fluid computational machine. Something non-newtonian, so to speak, if we are to continue viewing the mind through the metaphorical lens of being an ocean.
But the mind is not an ocean. That is merely an analogy--a mental aid made to assist in the grasping of the construct's true gnosis. With truth to the mind's function, the nature of a thought is as individual and elemental as any domain in our current age.
As such, the disguising of any circumspect phantasmics must take advantage of the fixed nature of long-term memories, the fluidity of thoughts; the evanescence of whims; intrusive suggestions triggered by external, internal, or chronological stimuli.
Ultimately, the rules and rigidity of each mind are invariable. You will have to be as much an artist as you are a practitioner to properly mask yourself beneath the waves.
-Incubi Mind-Diving Mem-Sim, Ori-Thaum
6-8
Cages
It was a special privilege to hold the leash to your own desires. Everyone was bound to something, chained by nature or want. With the beast nested in his depths, Avo knew this better than most. This was why the moment he claimed his glut of ghosts, he went about completing that which was long missing in his mind.
Within his palace, grand columns of voluminosity ran wide and high, caging the megablock of his youth in a cage of light. Each bar was made from a mix of memories, some fused like alloys, others interwoven like strings or wires.
The sequences flowed and circulated across each column as if veins coursing with blood, and its crest, over its ceiling, phantoms played moments from Lucille's Regret. Flashes of Aseleri executing the girl's father ran in a loop, the surging pulse of despair and self-loathing supercharging other memories of a like nature, with other perpendicular and tangential memories attached by other junctions or shared emotions injected down into the soil of mind, greeting the chaotic waters of his basest instincts like a diluting cocktail against the encroach of his savagery.
Avo tuned his phantasmic with care. He couldn't overdose himself on secondhand emotions--that way lay insanity. Too much and he would lose his sense of self. Be drowned in a tide of sensations and desires that never belonged to him. Too little and the beast will push on through all the same. What he needed from the phantasmic was for it to match and cancel his impulses exactly. See that his mind remained his while his baser proclivities were smelted into silence.
[MORALITY INJECTOR] COG-CAP: 20 SEQUENCES (BASELINE)
STRUCTURE: “A RESPLENDENT CAGE WITH A CINEMA PROJECTION OF PAST HAPPENINGS PLAYING ACROSS THE SKY"
FUNCTION: ALLOWS THE USER TO NULLIFY SPECIFICALLY ENCODED IMPULSES WITH COUNTER-EMOTIONAL DOSES OF MEMORY.
As a test, he called upon Aseleri's ghosts and looked upon her last memory. The one that was her death; an instance he had savored most fondly. The moment flowed then, her death unfolding like an edited vicarity in his mind. He felt her fear, her despair, the mind-shattering of her flesh coming apart from the inside, and the near-sweetness of death before he drained her Metamind and Essence dry.
The beast was an easy creature to seduce into bloodlust. Fooled by the cheap meal and thinking nothing of how it already knew these flavors, it emerged in force, the ground of his palace rumbling as if it was built upon the throat of a leviathan. Yet, just as it was about to rise up and stain the air with its flavor, the Morality Injector plunged its panacea deep.
Like matter and antimatter, the flash of white basked the entirety of his palace in a haze. For seconds, thoughts slipped from Avo's grasp as he tried to collect himself. At once, he felt a clashing urge. One to hurt, the other to be ashamed of hurting.
When he finally mastered himself again, he settled back upon his Injector and adjusted his "potion" again. There was something off in the mixture. It had fragmented his wants instead of dissolving them. It took a very specific symmetry of memories to achieve the effect he desired.
Two hours more he labored, and twice more he fired his phantasmic. The first lacked sufficient impulse. The second was close, but still caused detonations in his train of thought. Finally, he managed the right combination of constructs. He knew it when no reactive blast followed. And quieter still, he could hear the beast inside him choking on a lungful of foreign emotion.
Good. It was working. Now he only needed to watch his counter-mem dosage over time. The beast was exponentially more bloodthirsty than when he was still living in the Undercroft. For good reason too. He had left it starved. Atrophied. Withered for years.
Until his descent down into the Maw fed its gluttonous appetite to new extremes.
A faint worry hatched from a newly watered seed in his mind. Considering what was demanded of his Soul, the thaums and ghosts he reaped were now in competition. He knew not if the beast had an upper limit, but he had more than a feeling that should he end up slaughtering the requisite number of people his Soul needed to climb the Spheres, he might end up needing more ghosts for stability than thaums for power.
Part of him was disquieted. A substantial part more was intrigued. The beast was blunted, but not severed, and Avo himself would be chambering his thoughts with delusion if he didn't admit that his newfound power had also offered him greater heights of satisfaction atop even the thrill that was claimed.
Immortality offered freedom. And godhood offered self-determination. Both came as a joined package in the form of his Liminal Frame. And through it, Avo felt more aware of himself than he ever had been, more "person" than he ever was.
The time he lived since Walton's death had been rote. Routine, almost. He did dives and lived by the ethics and habits instilled in him from a time when his father was still alive. He moved regularly. He operated his living expenses and masked his status of ownership under shell companies and LLCs. He avoided attention. He practiced his art.
It was a life. Better than what was offered to the vast majority. Better than he deserved, by all accounts. That didn't change the fact that he was still living the life of prey, scurrying like an aratnid beneath the eyes of the Guilds every time a policy was changed or a major happening was underway. That didn't change that he lived to react and plan to prevent rather than act and build upon.
When he was in the Tiers, he had something. Now that he had fallen, his appetites wanted much, much more.
It was a special privilege to control your own fate. It was pure power to hold dominion over the fabric of reality itself.
A moment of quietude visited Avo. He looked around at his palace, its shape and contours made more concrete by the recent influx of ghosts. His phantasmics shone bright, their scenes playing on in junctions outside his megablock. His old home was, however, outdated. A sanctuary of nostalgia constructed as a placeholder during a trying time. But he wouldn't demolish it. No. It would serve a new purpose--an entryway to a grander structure. A labyrinth.
But that was for later. When the final preparations were well underway and he could work without being interrupted.
For now, he had a few prisoners to see about, and some spyware to infect their minds with.
EXITING META-DIVE
Resurfacing into his flesh, Avo awoke on the couch, basked in the neon gleam of the holovision spraying useless adverts at him. Across the room, he could hear Kae's screaming heartbeat, hear her muttering gibberish with each passing instant. A side effect of her implant, he supposed. Couldn't be whatever was afflicting her mind considering how much damage it did. Words wouldn't flow from a conflagration that could melt thought.
Shaking his post-dive shivers, Avo activated his Auto-Seance and lined up a sequence of encoded memories. +Draus. I'm done. Time to have our conversation with the subjects.+
Across the link, he felt a flicker of expectant delight rush through from the Regular. +Took you long enough. So. Can I trust you to stop wantin' to eat every other critter we see 'round these parts now?+
+Can I trust you not to hit our prisoners?+
+Depends. And anyway, you didn't answer my question.+
+Depends. How nice does the nu-pet smell?+
***
Chambers, Janand, and the tech that Avo continued to have no desire to learn the name of were stashed in a powered storage unit parked in the district's aerodocks located on its far periphery, pointed in the direction of Nu-Scarrowbur. They were left sealed inside a powered cargo unit on some kind of life-support system.
The choice to keep them in such a place was simple. Mostly drones. Minimal Sang. Reduce the chances that the Dragon-Curse would notice three "males" and tear their blood from their orifices.
Corpses were hard to question for non-Necros, and ghosts made for terrible mules without a physical anchor.
Adhering to "maximum operational security," Draus took the aerovec while Avo found himself using public transit. Something about it all being more natural, and "him having the longer legs." Seeing how the six-mile journey was eating into his time, he felt it righteous to accuse Draus of being lazy when next he saw her.
Clearly, she had lost all pride in being a Regular if she was afraid of a little physical activity.
Additionally, this wouldn't be a matter if he had the appropriate Hell for his Galeslither. Probably would've made it there faster than Draus could, judging by how fast the golem went and its intangibility. Now there was something he and Kae could see about remedying.
By the time he got to the docks, the artificial sky was already kindling the piercing yellow of dawn into the soft orange flames of late afternoon. Outside the gate, he found a line of parked aerovecs--including the vehicle that Draus had supposedly taken--but the Regular was nowhere to be seen.
"What took you?" Draus said, her voice suddenly sounding from behind. She spoke like she had a mouthful of food. As Avo hissed in annoyance, he sniffed.
And found himself tasting the flavor of a steamed bun.
His stomach growled. He growled. The beast growled. His Morality Injector dosed it with a dozen memories, recollections of being stuffed after a feast.
"Lazy," Avo said.
"Hm?" Draus asked, eyebrows raised. She swallowed what was left of her bun as she walked upward toward him. The incline of the road gave him even more of a height advantage over her than he normally possessed, making his near-eight feet of height seem like nine and her six and a half look closer to a flat six.
Still, she smacked her lips a few times and breathed in quietly, and mock contentment. "What was that you said just now?"
"You're lazy. Don't like walking."
She looked down at her legs, frowning as if there was something wrong with them. Wordlessly, she gesticulated at her limbs and threw her hands up, as if asking Avo to clarify.
Strangely, something Chambers' said rang back to him in that instant. Something about using all his words.
Avo opened his mouth to complain.
Draus pulled a plastic bag filled with six more buns out from the veil of her coat and handed it to Avo. Across the plastic covering, the same dancing bear Avo saw the other day battled tigers and dragons, proclaiming that only one could rule the mountain.
"Come on, rotlick," she said, walking past him, "let's see if your exercise-lovin' ass can chew, whine, and talk at the same like a Regular."
The aerodocks was the very definition of sensory overload. Guidance drones wailed sirens and painted stacks of hissing storage slots. Three holographic thresholds lined the vehicle and container tonnages based on verticality. The heaviest deliveries were installed at the very bottom first before other cargo lined the top like bricks.
Chittering bugs and multi-eyed birds stood perched--a biological surveillance apparatus on top of the mechanical. Things here played to a far more biomechanical make. Unlike the biomancy-heavy stylings that flavored the district, the joining of flesh and metal was much like an open hand toward mutual cooperation with the rest of the city.
Walking between warning projections lining what counted as a safe distance from a yet clamped piece of cargo, Avo followed Draus toward the corner of the docks. Their container unit was Z-099, placed right next to the local warehouse.
"You got the mem-key?" Avo asked.
"River's old fashioned." Draus held up what looked to be a key in the shape of a centipede. No. It was also a centipede. Sometimes, the Sang's artistry with biology struck him as a maniacal obsession. That, at least, was something he could respect.
A thin line of crimson displayed the words "LOCKED" greeted them upon arrival. A slot that looked like it could fit someone's finger--or an insect--extended upon sensing nearby motion. Draus put her bug key in and the slot snapped shut.
Avo heard a very distinct crunch. He grimaced. "That supposed to happen?"
"Probably," Draus said. "It's reading the bioform's genome as a key. Only the Sang can make 'em an' all that."
As if on cue. The door flashed green, the red fading in an instant. A large "UNLOCKED" burst across Avo's vision as the door hissed and a warm gush of air ran over his skin.
Inside, lit by a large ring of light, their three test subjects were left cocooned in what looked to be mounds of flesh. Beneath the light, the outlines of their bodies bobbed up and down. Gazing over the interior with his Heaven, Avo felt the exo-organs pump, mend, and clean the blood of the three prisoners on a nigh-constant basis.
Say one thing for the Sang, say they're good at keeping your prisoners in prime condition.
The one that held Chambers wasn't hard to find, with the enforcer's mass and height being obvious. Up close, the exo-organ's texture looked like something between a tongue and a scab. The centermost section resembled that of a half-collapsed fan, its surface scrunched inward, clenching the internal contents tight.
Tilting her head up at Avo, Draus grinned. "You wanna be the first one he sees? Or should I?"
Avo considered it for a moment. "No. Both. Makes it worse. You broke his limbs. I threatened to eat him."
Draus chuckled now. Roughly, she hammered her fist down against the organ. Inside, the enforcer jolted awake, his mind's accretion spinning to full awareness. The Sang had left his wards intact. He didn't blame them. The thing wasn't worth the effort of extraction.
At the Regular's percussive command, the organ sloshed and--stickily--opened up. Strands of mucus broke and spilled down as it bloomed, unveiling its contents like a flower.
"Agh! Fuck! My motherfucking eyes! Who the fuck--" Inside, a meat-festooned Chambers, looking much like an infant coated in the juices of a womb, stared out at Avo and Draus, his snarl fizzling out into a low note of hopelessness. "--fuuuuuuuccccckkk. Jaus. Fucking Jaus. Come on. Come the fuck on. Give me a godsdamned break."
Draus smiled as sweetly as she could. She really didn't have the face for it. "Say you had one, consang," Draus said, licking her teeth. "Let you go to sleep after our conversation last time. Like to carry on where we left off."
"Thank you! Thanks for eating my daddy!"
-"Aedon" Chambers aged 10, cheering on the ghouls fleeing from his block during the Uprising
6-9
A Civil Conversation
Chambers sputtered. "Last time? Last time? The last time you--you--Oh, okay. Yeah. I guess you did let me have enough sleep. Thank you for your service, Captain Regular, ma'am. This is exactly why I looked out for ya on that cold and miserable night after the Crucible. Because I really wanted to get my limbs twisted to shit and brain damage so bad those flesh-loving Sang-fucks decided the best way to fix it was POURING FUCKING BUGS IN MY HEAD TO 'eat away the injuries.'"
The outburst toned the enforcer's face in a flush of red. His eyes, likewise, bulged with exaggerated incredulity. Yet, the flow of his thoughtstuff was far less charged than it seemed. Avo frowned at that. It appeared that Chambers was playing up his outrage to prod at an angle of sympathy. Foolish, but fascinating.
"An' look at you now," Draus continued, ignorant as to the true state of Chamber's mind. Not that she likely cared. "Did a fine job fixin' you up, didn't they?"
"I can still feel them just... chittering around inside my head," Chambers said. He shuddered.
Draus nodded in mock sympathy. "Well, you best get yourself together there, consang, because I assure you: that nightmare is over."
"Yeah. Thank Jaus."
"--But I can make it happen again if you don't stop wasting my time and start talking."
The enforcer sighed. "This... this how you talk to everyone? Fucking... pretend niceties followed by threats? Come now?" He turned to Avo as if imploring him for help. "I mean, come on. Why not offer me a deal? Something nice? A glass of fucking water even. Ain't no need for being this mean. You already got me all bound up in this fucked up meat cage. It feels like I'm in a tongue, by the way. Like... like a big one."
"Could just crack his wards," Avo said, addressing Draus. "Dive into his mind."
"Give it minute. You can do that once I'm good and done with the 'niceties' anyway."
Chambers shot a look of sadness at Avo. "Avo. Consang. You remember when you got the key to that old Galeslither so you wouldn't be bothered by any of the half-strands after you fucked up Rantula?"
And there it was again. Chambers was fishing for sympathy. From a ghoul. It was like the man didn't know what he was, or at least seemed to suffer a very warped idea of how a ghoul exactly functioned. "Remember you getting me into bad run. No preparation. Lied to me about details. Left me to die."
"Hey. That ain't my fault. How in all the fucks was ol' Chambers supposed to know those Scalper shits were going to be involved? Do I look like a data broker from the Deep Bazaar? No, consang. I'm like you: Just a squire tryin' make it in the biggest of the big that's New Vultun."
At this point, Draus cracked a disbelieving smile. "Ain't gonna lie, he's real precious in a rat-bastard kind of way."
Chambers grinned at her, his smile one of boyish glee manifesting at the lowest of compliments. "I always thought I had it in me to make it in the soaps." Beneath Draus and Avo's blank-faced stares, he sagged and sighed. "Alright. Remind me where we left off. I'd just start talkin' myself but... I'm afraid I might upset our dear Regular again and earn myself another session of bug surgery."
"Talk 'bout your boss," Draus said. "Jhred Greatling. Mirrorhead. Give us everything you know. Leave nothing out."
He let out a long and overwhelmed breath, bottom lip flipped over to accentuate the severity of the topic. "Suppose I better get to it, yeah?"
"Yeah, that sounds wise," Draus said.
"Will know if you're lying," Avo added. "Don't lie. Will make me sloppy when digging through your mind later. Bad for sanity."
Chambers frowned. "And back to the threats again--"
"Keep talkin'," Draus said, interrupting his diatribe.
"Alright, alright," Chambers said, rolling his flesh-encased shoulders as best he could. "So, couple years back... I'm gonna say two because I had a bad turbo habit at the time. I'm real bad." He laughed. "Me and my brother, Osjet, we would get like a dozen or so needles and flick 'em at each other's eyes."
A blink of motion flicked across the periphery of Avo's vision. A crack followed. Avo blinked. Chambers' blinked. A small red welt began to form across his cheek.
"You just slap him?" Avo asked Draus.
"He's worse than Kae. 'Cept he don't have any good excuses. Stick. To. The. Story. Mirrorhead. Not your brother. Not anything else. Mirrorhead."
"Fine, fine," Chambers said, "Jaus. Don't need to hit me. You're like my dad."
"Clearly didn't do a good job," Draus said.
The enforcer shrugged as best he could. "Nope. Which was why it wasn't a big loss when the ghouls ate him." He launched a reflexive smirk at Avo. A speckle of fondness slipped out from him into the local Nether. "Anyway, I... I remember tellin' you about Mirrorhead just showing up, right? A year back... he jabbed us... yadda yadda ya?"
Chambers leaned out as far as he could. "Well, this was just about a month after he jabbed me. Conflux was already getting real expensive shit flown in. Expanding operations. Recruiting even more people. But something always felt off about the boss."
"Something?" Draus asked.
"Like he was always ducking someone, right? But he's a Godclad. And 'Clads don't need to do no duck is what I thought at the time." Chamber chuckled. "Was ol' Chambers wrong about that. Anyway. I just finished grabbing some chow after a day of doin' fuck-all, basically, and decided to sneak over into the sealed section where the mem-con shit is still running so I can hit up on some nova without nobody really noticing. Didn't really wanna share, you know?"
"Mem-con didn't affect you?" Avo asked. That was doubtful. The mind plagues were outdated and from a bygone war, but they should've still affected Chambers all the same. Especially considering the nonexistent quality of his wards.
Chambers smacked his lips. "I wouldn't say 'didn't affect.' It's more like I already got exposed to it. It was one of them Low Master 'watch your loved one die in front of you nightmare shit' ghost-brain-fuckings. Already got hit by it back when I was a kid, and my old man was a real half-strand, so... You know. Not a big loss."
Right. Different minds required different traumas to break. There were fissures in the thoughts of any being, but some required specially shaped tools to lever against the cracks.
Regardless, Chambers just unknowingly increased the value of his continued survival. Not that Avo would ever reveal such a thing.
"Anyway, I get inside, and what do I see? A Stormtree Blockrunner drone just lodged through the wall. Microfusion cell and everything's still intact. Just left lying around there. Turns out, the boss didn't even have the area cleared for potentially usable goods before sealing them off with plascrete. Real sloppy."
"Or he's just not a Necro," Avo suggested. It was still just a guess, but it was growing increasingly obvious, despite all the resources the Syndicate boss had at his disposal, he wasn't very good at Necrotheurgy.
"Yeah, he ain't no strategist either," Draus said. "Guess he takes after his ma that way. No Reg would leave a bunch of unchecked territories sealed off. Not for longer than a week. Ignorance is fatal."
"Yep, ignorance is a hell of a thing," Chambers said, snickering with glee. "You guys are gonna love what happened next. So... so, I spend a while fiddling with the haptic controls and somehow, I get it working. Fantastic. Awesome. Chambers got a vec that can silently slice through the insides of a block's walls and clamp onto elevator chutes. What do I do with it then? Well, its intelligence-gathering systems were also still functional, so I guess I started... collecting some details on my so-called friends. You know. So I can trade for favors."
"Blackmail," Avo said.
Chambers winced. "Now, that's an ugly way of putting it, Avo. I didn't just threaten people with what I learned. I tried helping them too. For a price. I was like a... an augury. A prophet from the old days. Really got ol' Chambers a lot of cred and imps. Good times."
His smile then sizzled out slowly. "Then, after a few months, I ended up climbing high. Too high. Found myself cutting out where I really shouldn't and ended up behind a sheet of glass."
The enforcer stopped talking then. It took Avo a full second to get that the man was holding his words for dramatic effect. "After the boss didn't appear out of nowhere and mangle me, I went back down. Cause... you know, I was still spooked to fucking shit. But I couldn't stay away, so, I went back up again. Made sure I didn't have anything reflective on me either. No glass. Painted over the Blockrunner a bit. And started... listening. And boy did he give away a lot of interesting shit."
"And this is why you gotta surveil the entire structure," Draus said. "Otherwise you get shit like this." She shook her head and chuckled. "Fucking Highflame Guilder gettin' spied on by a two-bit gutter kid. This alone might be enough to sink what's left of his family name."
"Yeah, about that," Chambers said. "I don't think Jhred here's on the up and up with his own family. See, the conversation I managed to get from him? It sounded like he was talking to a sibling. Maybe a sister. Afrel or something. It also sounds like our little Godclad might be on the verge of getting kicked from the family line for whatever reason, and was on the out-and-out with his old man."
Draus shot Avo a look and turned back to Chambers. "You sure about this?"
"Sure? Fuck no, I got his side of the conversation using the vec's scanner. He was speaking to whoever over the Nether. Had to guess from his words. Still, he sounded the desperate kind of pissed, like he was asking someone else to ask someone even higher up for more time. So he wouldn't have to beg." Chambers spat. He managed to get some on himself. "Prideful half-strand'll probably die from that."
"Alright," Draus said, nodding as she took in the information. "You know, if you were this forthcoming 'bout more of these details last time, I wouldn't have had to make art outta your limbs."
"Why, thanks for telling me that, Captain, I very much appreciate you twisting the fucking knife. Makes me wonder how you ended up dishonorably discharged."
Draus smirked. "You're welcome."
"Anyway," Chamber said, "I kept listening for a while more and he started talkin' numbers. Couldn't fully get them. Sounded like death statistics or something. How many lives were being fed to the Sovereignty by the daily and all the Heavens Yuulden-Yang was running. Besides that, he said something about how losing faith in him now was going to be a mistake and how he'll wipe away the shame or something. Dipped out of sensor range after that. Didn't manage to capture anything like it since."
Quietly, Draus digested the information. "The Blockcrawler. It's still there?"
"Yeah," Chambers said. "Haven't used it in a while. Mirrorhead got even more micro-heavy after that. Made us start wearing his patented stupid fishbowl helmets so he could... channel himself out of us easier or whatever you call that weird Heaven shit. Something got his ass real spooked, and if you ask me? I think whatever time he managed to get ran out, but he's still out here, trying to get something done. Whatever that is, anyway."
"He talked about the Sovereignty," Draus said. "He say anythin' 'bout your surrounding districts?"
"He tried to get us into business with Dead Lotus," Chamber said.
"Tried?" Draus asked.
Chambers winced. "Well, when you offer someone else a twenty-eighty cut over businesses and territories and state that it's your best and only deal and that they would be hopelessly stupid not to accept it, the words sound a bit more insulting than diplomatic. You see, your new consang Chambers might-gotta a tongue sweeter than natural honey itself, but Mirrorhead--Jaus--now there's someone with the sophistry of a gh--"
Avo glared at him. "Finish sentence."
"--git. Ghoul doesn't really fit, because... I mean, let's be honest, ghouls are such deeply honest beings that really aren't afraid in letting you know how they feel and who they are. Meanwhile, Mirrorhead's like a wall. A... a pile of bricks. He's an insult to ghouls. Especially one as sharp and... and as clever as you, Avo, my good consang."
Avo continued glaring. "Still made me hurt people."
"Holy shit are you still stuck on that? Fuck me, I'm sorry. I didn't know a little mistake was going to lodge itself all the way up your ass and die there. Look. I'll make it up to you. Next time, I'll do my research."
"No next time," Avo snarled. "Never make that mistake again." He leaned in close to meet Chambers' eye-to-eye. "Soon. Will have special run for you. Special favor for me. That's how you make it up."
Chambers blinked. "Sure. Yeah. If you don't eat me, I'm game for anything." He laughed. "In a way, you did free me from Mirrorhead so... you know, I guess I can see that I... I owe you, actually."
The mental gymnastics of the enforcer was truly awe-inspiring.
"Anyway," Chamber said. "You got more questions? I can tell you all kinds of stuff about Conflux. Weak spots. Who hides all the good drugs. Who's in charge of doing the auxiliary Necro shit for Mirrorhead. What business looks like. When the next Crucible was supposed to be scheduled."
"How many of you are there?" Draus asked.
"Hm?"
"How many of you did Jhred hire?"
Chambers shrugged. "Probably a few thousand. Ten or so is my guess. I know we have other branches. He dives between places in the mirrors and all that. I think they're periphery places though. He's trying to cast a wide net and push in. He keeps up separated into silos. We're the Junction guys. The backbone, from what I can tell."
"But he has other places to go and rebuild?" Draus asked.
"Yeah," Chamber said. "If he really wanted to. Yeah. We were always more of a quantity over quality operation anyway."
"Can attest to that," Avo said. "Done with conversation? Can copy other details from memories directly. Implant him with phantasmic first. You talk to others."
Draus stared at Chambers for a beat. "You can keep his mind intact?
"Yes," Avo said. "Unless its structure is compromised."
At this statement, Chambers' eyes widened.
"Hey, hey, hey, listen," Chamber said, clearing his throat. "If you're gonna be doin' anything to my mind... I might wanna walk you through it."
"Not amateur Necro. Know what to do."
"I'm not talking about that," Chamber said. "I'm talking about certain... things I downloaded."
"Things."
"You know. Entertainment options. Vicitarities. Uh. Stress relieving materials."
Avo started at Draus. Draus shrugged. "Don't look at me none. I got no idea what he's talkin' about."
Chamber sighed. "You'll... you'll see when you go in. Just let me give you a heads-up. Some of my mind space might be... messy."
"How messy."
"Ah. I might have a virus or two messy."
Avo could handle a virus or two.
For the love of Jaus don't download anything from public palaces. You're just asking for a mem-con by that point.
You know half these illegal vicarities got hidden sequences lined into them, yeah? Make it easier for some Syndicate or ganger-trash half-strand to steal your information or mem-lock you. Hells, if they got a half-decent Necro, they can even overwrite your memories. Make you more inclined to do what they ask of you.
Your wards are only the first line of defense. I recommend hiring a proper Jack to do deep dives through your mind at least bi-annually, even if you're some nobody wager.
Ultimately, remembrances are always worth something, so you best make sure that you don't end up serving as someone else's smokescreen when your memories pop up over some goon as a decoy during an exorcist scan.
Seen plenty of bystanders get scalpeled into collateral that way.
-Quail Tavers, School of the Warrens
6-10
A Virus or Twelve Thousand and Eighty-Two
"Chambers!" Avo snarled, jacking out from the wretched ghost-infested midden that the enforcer called a mind. "You said two viruses! Two!"
Chambers, for his part, just shrugged as Avo flipped the man back into being conscious. "I said 'might a virus or two.' I'm giving you the best guess I got. Just... turns out, I made a wrong guess is all."
Wordlessly, Avo glared. He had seen virus-ruined minds before. He had seen scars made by filth and mem-con infections, reaching out and eating away essential material, like rot eating into the base of an ego. Even once, he helped Walton clean out a juv who somehow managed to get a major part of their memories overwritten by a badly sequenced ad-replicator that was slowly subsuming all her other memories to feed its constant expansion.
What Avo had never seen, however, is twelve thousand and eighty-two mem-viruses all fighting each other to claim ownership over a single mind. A single useless mind. A single useless mind that belonged to a degeneracy-addicted fool that didn't seem to understand the concept of "cognitive security" or "not downloading unconfirmed mem-data from strange links."
"So, uh," Chambers chuckled, "give it to me straight, consang, how bad is it."
"Lobotomy would count as positive treatment."
The enforcer winced. "Avo... consang, buddy, friend, my good, noble paler, you're sounding a bit dramatic. I'm sure--"
With a thought, Avo drew up a map of Chamber's mind. Within, the center of the entire structure was marred by a clash of blackened lanes, each spreading out further like writhing worms trying to burrow out into other memories but found themselves too interwoven to manage such an extrication. Here was a mind that should have been utterly fractured by decay, but yet, was still somehow running at a functional state of efficiency.
"Your viruses," Avo began, "are trying to eat each other."
"So, what are you sayin'?" Chambers asked, a glint of excitement flickering through his eyes. "Does this... does this mean that my mind... is invincible?"
The sheer stupidity of the statement made Avo grunt as if stabbed by a dagger. A few steps away, Draus and Janand, who she had just started actively interrogating, shot him a look of concern. "No. Not invincible. Opposite of invincible. You will fall into a coma once equilibrium collapses."
"You mean if it collapses," Chambers suggested.
"No," Avo said. "When. They're eating each other. All are badly sequenced. Only a question of which one is the least poorly designed. Bad quality extended your lifespan. But mind will still almost certainly collapse"
"Oh," Chambers said. The flicker that was in his eyes went as his gaze dipped. "Well, you--you can fix it, right?"
Avo shot him a blank stare. "You downloaded over ten thousand viruses. Directly into your mind. Will need to see how deep into core cognitive functions the infection has spread."
"Yeah--don't rub it in, Avo! I'm having a traumatic moment here."
"Having a stupid moment. Shouldn't download viruses."
"Look, I didn't know all of them were viruses, okay," Chambers said. "In my defense, some were just... informative pieces."
With a growl of annoyance, Avo cast himself back into Chambers' mind.
ENGAGING META-DIVE
Faced with the massive fissures of leaking emotion running between the solid, unmoving walls that constituted Chambers' defenses, Avo cast his ghosts deeper and snatched the nearest chain of the compromised memories he could find. It took him less than five seconds to locate his example. It took him less than ten in total to jack out.
EXITING META-DIVE
Resurfacing into the real, he slid back into his body with extracted bounty in tow. Choked between the grasp of his ghosts like a twitching snake, Avo forced shape into the sequence and held it up before Chambers' very eyes.
Interfaced with phantoms, the vicarity began to play. A horrifically low-quality memory stuttered by missing seconds and splotched with blurs due to a badly edited perception filter began to play. The phantoms danced, weaving wisps of mem-data into a badly damaged megablock. From the perspective of someone chained to a wall, both Avo and Chambers watched as the actor made awkward grunting noises, straining to break free.
+Foul ghouls!+ the vicarity's actor proclaimed, the thespian nature of his performance made vulgar by his awkward tonal pronunciation. +You dare hold a Regular of Highflame prisoner?+
"Avo, the hells are you watching," Draus said, drawn back over by the sudden mention of one of her old order.
"I... don't know?" Avo answered.
The fact that Chambers had gone ashen in the meantime did not fill him with confidence. "Ah, shit," the enforcer said. "Fuck me, I thought I deleted this one."
"Is it spyware?" Avo asked. "Dangerous?"
Chambers winced. "No, it's just--"
+Oh, but we're not scared, soldier-boy.+ An off-screen presence interrupted whatever Chambers was about to say. Whoever was speaking sounded sibilant and sultry, the speaker female-presenting.
Then, out of the shadows, a bone-pale figure entered the scene. Shrouded by dust and striding forth from between crumbled hab-cells, Avo's eyes narrowed as he found himself looking upon what looked to be a parody of himself.
Yet, to call what he beheld a ghoul was a lie, for there had never been any of his kind that he knew to carry the exaggerated sexual characteristics of a female.
"What is this creature?" Avo asked.
"So," Chambers said, licking his dry lips, "this... the story here takes place in an alternative universe from ours."
"Alternative universe," Avo said blandly.
Chambers nodded. "Yeah. In that one, all the ghouls are a lot more... feminine."
He continued staring at the "alternative ghoul" and her exaggerated protrusions. The fact that she also had a full head of hair and a whip-like tongue that looked more than six feet long filled him with confusion. He really couldn't imagine for what purpose those were for.
"Chambers, this is just godsdamned wrong," Draus said, shaking her head.
"It's justified in-setting, alright," Chambers said. "This... this is all for a good reason."
"Yeah," Draus said, snorting. "Sure it is."
Meanwhile, the scene continued to play with the Regular declaring that the ghouls would never break him. The not-ghoul, on her part, seemed to lean forward a lot and spent her time threatening to swallow pieces of the Regular's flesh whole rather than eating the man already.
"Avo, cut that off before we all catch the rash from it," Draus said. "This ain't the dream."
He grunted, but let it play a while longer as the not-ghoul brought in a specially bioformed nu-dog. A specially bioformed nu-dog that seemed to have what looked to be a large steam piston installed somewhere impractical.
+Last chance, Regular. Submit to the Soft Masters or face your insertion...+
+Never!+
Avo ended the vicarity right then and there. He stared wordlessly at Chambers. "Soft... masters."
"There's an in-setting reason--"
"This is just revoltin'," Draus said, looking upon the enforcer with newfound scorn. She flicked a glance at Avo. "Why the hells did you pull that out of his head anyways? You tryin' to start an outbreak or somethin'?"
"Mind full of these," Avo said. "Over ten thousand compromised sequences."
An eyebrow rose high across Draus' forehead in a slow climb. "Ten thousand?"
"Over."
"And... they're all like this?"
"Not all of them," Chambers interjected, trying to defend himself. "I... I got documentaries too! Educational pieces!"
"Most are worse," Avo said, ignoring the enforcer's lies. "Actively siphoning mem-data from him. Some are spyware. Outright mem-cons. Going to take days to clean out if at all."
"Can't you just put the stuff inside him?" Draus asked. "Build around the filth."
"Spread through most of mind by this point," Avo said. "He even deleted real memories to make room for more."
"Useless memories," Chambers said. "Stuff I didn't need! Besides, how was I supposed to know that I was gonna get so many viruses? Coulda surprised anyone?"
"Not surprise," Avo said. "Mistake."
"Oh, it's like you never downloaded something from the public Nether before."
"Only after scans. Review. Testing."
"I do that too."
"More like you use your mind as a testing ground," Draus said. "Avo can we still use him or is he... too far gone?"
"What?" Chambers said, voice spiking in alarm. "Avo! Tell her it's not that bad!"
"Pretty bad," Avo said. "Will need further examination. Take time. Need to delete spyware to make room for spyware. Have to be careful. Delete around key memories. Will create a vegetable if too much is pruned away."
"Hells," Draus said. "Sounds like more trouble than he's worth."
"Yes," Avo agreed.
Chambers' eyes pinballed between the two. "I--I can help you get that flat out? I know a lot of the operations! And... and I can operate the Blockrunner? Besides, if you don't use me you'll... you'll be forced to use Janand!"
A few steps away, a spray of spit flew out from within an unveiled cocoon of flesh. "Fuck you, Chambers."
"Listen," Chambers said. "Haven't either you made a mistake in your life."
"I haven't made ten thousand of the same mistake," Avo replied.
"Avo, you gotta understand: we both suffer from addictions," Chambers continued. "For you, that's like... eatin' children or some shit. For me, it's highly informational and well-filmed vicarities. I like to know about the inner lives of other people. Explore the worlds that could be."
"You know, back in the day before the rash, we just called half-strands like you lust addicts," Draus said.
"A little lust doesn't hurt nobody when it happens inside your head!" Chambers said.
"Mind reminds me of the Maw," Avo said. "Hurt you plenty." A beat of silence fell over Avo. "Although."
"Although?" Draus asked.
"Thinking," Avo said. "Might remove some of the viruses. Contain the rest. Use them to infect Conflux loci even more."
"Yes," Chambers said, nodding vigorously. "We... we got to use everything at our disposal to our advantage. It's like... my mind is an armory instead of a cesspit. All a matter of perception, am I right?"
"No."
***
The eventual work it took to clean out Chamber's mind was far over what Avo expected. Unlike Lucille, the enforcer's mind was not a delicate operation for there was little left of the man's mind to be delicate with. To cleanse rot required a deepness of penetration, with the repair work more akin to carving away decaying bone before the proper resequencing could begin.
His past greeted Avo in fractured flashes. It was like peering into someone's history through the lens of a broken kaleidoscope. Most of his childhood came in increments of violence; these moments chained Chambers to a blank-faced father, the abuse near-constant, flattening any obtainable trauma down to routine details. This lasted up until the Uprising, whereupon the man was eaten by ghouls.
Suppose the enforcer's positive ideation regarding ghouls had to come from somewhere.
Ultimately, it took three entire days for Avo to finally shear away enough of the infection to return some semblance of controllable order to Chambers' mind. Through this time, Draus left Avo chunks of raw flesh to sate himself between bouts of work.
The techs were comparatively creatures of simplicity compared to the oddities infesting Chambers. Having them planted with the proper sequences took half the time and a fraction of the effort.
Overall, it took seventy-five ghosts in total to prepare the three subjects for reinsertion into Conflux. Each ran twenty-five spreads with the outer layers twined to their active memories granting a reactive mask for the phantasmics while the bulk of their builds was scattered deeper in more ingrained memories still.
"So, I won't be at risk of droppin' nulled anytime soon anymore, right?" Chambers asked after his adjustments were done.
Avo grunted. The truth was that the enforcer still had some fragmented viruses lining his sequences in places but they were now bound to Avo's spyware rather than some Deep Nether operation. The insides of Chambers' mind were more divided than a Sovereignty in the Warrens.
The man sighed. "Avo. Consang. I knew you'd come through for me. Knew that you'd see the point in keeping your old--"
"Best chance to spread mem-con through Conflux. Create distraction be operator on inside," Avo said. With a thought, he activated a memory session using his Auto-Seance. An overlay appeared in his cog-feed, and he found himself looking upon his masked person through Chambers' eyes.
+Confirmed.+
Avo deactivated the memory. Chambers blinked. "What the fuck was that? Didn't see a link at all."
"Built a disguised Auto-Seance into your mind. Reduced its overall features. One way receiver. Can't transmit to anyone but me."
"Auto-Seance?" Chambers asked. "I--I think I had one--"
"Viruses ate away most of it. Using its functions to transfer imps out while you were asleep."
Chambers' eyes widened in realization. "Oh! Oh. Well. I always did think they used to keep disappearing. Looks like ya solved another mystery, huh?"
He laughed. Avo didn't.
***
Finished with the subjects, Avo returned to the Second Fortune to prepare for the next steps. A great deal of work remained. He still had a Hell to procure. More information to collect regarding the movements of Conflux and additional establishments that Mirrorhead operated.
The good thing was that, with Draus due to collect their mobile operations vehicle soon, they wouldn't need to continue operating out from the Second Fortune. The establishment had treated them well, but something about the place still fed the flames of suspicion within Avo.
A fire that only grew when he entered the elevator to return to his temporary abode, touch base with Draus and Kae.
"I might require a favor from you," Green River said, her person greeting him with naked anticipation of his arrival.
Avo grunted in displeasure and stepped in next to her. "Don't have what you want. Ask Draus for what you need."
Her presence grated on him, grinding an active discomfort into the air between them. Yet, though the tension pulled at him, it appeared to be non-existent for the Sang herself, who seemed content to keep her eyes fixed on him as if anticipating moments of certain amusement.
She laughed and kept pace with him. "Ah, but you do have that which I need. Of this, I am sure. Our mutual friend is skilled at many things, but Necrotheurgy is not one. Not to the extent of what you have reputedly performed anyway. Bright-Wealth told me you changed a certain girl's mind. Left her more intact than you found her."
"Did she now?" Avo asked.
"Indeed," Green River said. "I do not see myself as anything more than a dilettante of the art, but even one as parochial as I could tell Ms. Lucille's damage was severe." The casino owner laughed, chirps of amusement sounding from both the human and fox. "Yet, now I am sincerely considering using her as a door-girl. Another one of Bright-Wealth's requests. I swear, my sister is too soft sometimes."
Avo sighed. Green River was like slime. She spoke. She clung. She didn't give up. "Don't want work. Busy right now."
Green River merely smiled. "I think you may make time for my request. Tell me, what do you know of the Ninth Column?"
The Ninth Column?
Come now, Jhred, are we entertaining conspiracies in this household? Tell me, do you know what it takes to hide from the Guilds. All the Guilds? The very notion is absurd; with all the Heavens we control, how is this... this unseen, unfunded, and unrooted Ninth Estate of power supposed to contend with us?
It can't. It simply can't. There isn't a reliable source of death it can draw from; no feed for the beast if we're going to use the vulgarity of analogies to describe this already absurd prospect.
Perhaps such an organization might have a Fallwalker or two under its banner. But what then? Those of the Sixth Sphere or higher cannot fully ignite their Souls without being noticed from even the depths of our local void. And the Spheres lower? Too limited. Too easy to be properly circumvented by our Sovereignties.
Why, the only way such a faction might pose a threat to us is if they have already penetrated our structure entirely--a feat I daresay not even Ori-Thaum is capable of. That, or their thaumaturgical mastery of more esoteric Domains is so far beyond our fathoming that we simply cannot comprehend how they operate...
I need to make a cast. Stay here. Watch your sister.
-Authority Uthred Greatling with regards to the existence of a "Ninth Column" operating against the Guilds
6-11
Someone Else's Game
A swell of rising dread rose within Avo. A clash of reactions banished all other thoughts from dwelling in his mind. His basest instinct, calling for the death of Green River found itself strangled by counter-emotions induced by his Morality Injector firing hits of regret and horror. Yet, there was more than regret that burned inside him. Curiosity rose, magnified in scope and shape to cloud the space of his mind and shroud his default reflex toward murder. A quietude fell over him as fear strained against indecision.
The Sang knew too much, asking such a rapier-sharp question. Her silence, likewise, was a tool of measurement. She judged the lull in his response with a soft smile, her grafted fox, so languidly wrapped along the reach of her neck, winked at him. There was wickedness in its gleaming eyes, taunting him to ask her more.
"Does my question evade you?" she asked, her tone teasing and fearless. There was no spark of the divine about her, nor did her ward stand especially formidable. Perhaps she thought herself made safe by the curse that clung to their being, but she of all people should know that ghouls were more resistant to afflictions of blood than the fragilities possessed by pure-born men.
For a moment longer, he said nothing, considering his steps ahead. The beast within him wailed, its voice now a pained whisper slipping from the cracks of a mountain, its want buried beneath the tonnage of opposing memories. Still, the consideration to see her dead was not purely a thing of pleasure. Security was a concern now as well, and for all that she knew and all that he didn't, the want for physical violence was slowly inching over into contemplation toward a more mental assault.
"Don't know much," Avo said finally. He kept his words true but reserved. An outright lie seemed unwise. With his words, he doubted she could gaze upon his thoughtstuff clearly, but expectation sometimes gave false assurance. "Might've heard it whispered once or twice."
Green River closed her eyes and her throat chimed with a single note of laughter. "Whispered once or twice." She shook her head. "You seem to think I am in league with my elders. I must admit, it feels prejudiced, to be judged in such a way. Doubtless, Jelene feels much the same way about me. Understandable, of course. All Sang are unified in our desperation to avoid fated death. But not all of us are bound to the same path of salvation. I hope one such as you can see that semblance does not conjoin a person to the follies of their family."
"You dress your words," Avo said, a slight growl entering his tone. "But only sentences that matter are at the end. Want my sympathy. Want my help. Trying to cast us under the same light. Why?"
"As I said: I require a favor. And afterward, I would like to have a conversation with you. To understand you better. I think we have much to offer one another in use and... understanding."
The Sang plucked a wisp of phantoms from her accretion, and as if she was alchemizing strands of thought into shape with breath blown across her palm, she painted the space between them with a memory. The miniature form of a woman and her two children appeared in a small ghost-made well barely larger than Avo's head. It felt as if he was gazing through a cracked mirror from the gaze of another.
The mother. The former street squire and her children. Avo remembered. Beneath his mask, he glared at the Sang. "Watching my conversations?"
"Watching?" Green River said. "More than that, I fear. I orchestrated your encounter. I ensured you would meet her immediately after Bright-Wealth contacted you regarding the girl. Why? Because I was curious if you knew her. Or perhaps she might know you. Either way, it helped me remove a potential suspicion I had regarding you."
"What suspicion?" Avo asked.
"Are you an Ori-Thaum Sleeper, ghoul?" Green River replied. "You must admit, it paints a compelling shroud to your person."
The absurdity of her question filled his mind with static. "No. Not Sleeper. Can't be."
"How can you be sure?"
He stared at her. "Was in a Crucible little over a week ago. Dea--Nearly died several times. Terrible risk. No reward. No point. No direction for operation."
"Perhaps you are not aware of--"
"No," Avo repeated, cutting Green River off. It wasn't that Ori-Thaum didn't have the capability, but he had seen their work. Walton had studied their methodology. What she was suggesting relied too much on chance. His reawakening in the Maw would already be beyond the risk threshold for the Incubi. The fact that he had a Liminal Frame burned into him as well meant that there was no way they would just leave him as an expendable asset.
Ori-Thaum managed some pretty ridiculous mental overwrites in their time. There was even the case of Ori-Thaum replacing a Highflame Guilder's nu-dog with an identical clone implanted with the mind of one of their Sleepers. That lasted a full three months until one day, after an emergency distress signal went out, they found the nu-dog missing. Along with the Guilder's head.
Strange as such an operation was, it was still within the parameters of control and risk. Nothing about Avo's first two days after his initial resurrection made sense regarding "risk" or "control." Especially since he did die multiple times.
Why they would use a ghoul as a potential sheath was also beyond him.
"I think you flee from potential possibility in fear," Green River said. "Unlikely though it might be, you have to be honest with yourself: you are a strange creature. The only one amongst your kind I have witnessed to have even a modicum of rationale and intellect. You must be curious why that is."
"Ninth Column," Avo said, re-railing the conversation. He didn't need her unspooling his thoughts more than she already managed. Beneath the surface, his mind bubbled and boiled, the new questions fed to him both revolting and thought-churning. "What do they have to do with me? With her?" Avo pointed at the mother.
Green River hummed. "Her name is Yosanna Kivranpuvak. She served under the colors of Ori-Thaum up until a week ago. Chief security advisor. Partner of one Chandrak Kivranpuvak, former First Mirror of Ori-Thaum's Theoretical Thaumaturgy Department. Apparently, he went missing just after a certain theft set the entirety of the Tiers on high alert. And in days thereafter, I get a call from an old friend I long believed to be dead."
Avo held even his breath at that moment, anticipating her following words like a blow.
"Do you know a certain Walton, perchance? The way your wards are built. They remind me of his."
When she spoke his father's name, Avo felt his very marrow quiver, the scar tissue of his suspicions gouged into an open wound. He flexed his claws. The elevator groaned to a sudden halt. From the ceiling, flesh tore and bled into new tumorous constructs as jagged fangs and eyes extended. Branches of chambered tendrils sprouted free from the walls, each primed and yearning to skewer the ghoul.
His gaze returned to the Sang. Hers never left him. "Just a precaution. In case you did something unwise."
"Trust me," Avo said. "You won't survive 'unwise.'" He allowed himself to breathe. If he didn't have his Morality Injector, he would've torn into her right then and there. Even now, his cog-feed showed his cog-cap spiking. "Walton. How do you know him?"
"Well, how does anyone know a professional Necrojack? I needed someone's knowledge and the Strix made himself available." She chuckled. "But I fear he might have marked me early. Found a young and impressionable Sang he could plant the seeds of honor and loyalty for favors. However, your relationship with him is more mysterious than I would care to admit. I always assumed him a former color of Ori-Thaum. You would have fit neatly as another plant trained in the same tradition."
Avo remembered watching his father die. Remembered the rash warping his flesh into sores, the homunculi pushing free from the oozing clefts that ravaged his body. "Necrojacks. We trade tips."
Green River nodded. Her expression gave nothing away. "I am sure you do. I am also certain that he left something within the mind of Yosanna for you to sample. A mem-drop, so to speak. And before you ask: no, I did not peek. Nor do I have the skills or capabilities to facilitate such a transgression against you. Such a thing is for your eyes only."
"Why in her mind? Did he say?"
The Sang studied him for a moment before speaking. It seemed that Walton didn't offer her the full picture as well. His father was handing out partial pieces to an entire puzzle, using people to line the path ahead. But why? And for what?
What did he know that Green River lacked? What did she have that he didn't? How much more did Walton tell? And just how dead was his father that he could set up such a specific favor ahead of time? What was the need for such deception?
"She is... to be rewarded," Green River continued. "For services rendered to Ninth Column. I believe she helped them steal something precious."
"The Frame?" Avo asked, forcing an evenness to his tone.
Green River sighed. "Perhaps. The Ninth Column... for the scant services I have provided to them in my time, I can honestly say theirs is a body that runs on chaos and misdirection. Till even now I know little about their designs or desires. Who is truly a part of them and who merely serves as an extension or pawn. I must share words with you of my worries, Avo. I wonder if they are using the memory of Walton to manipulate us both."
And just like that, a new layer of distrust was introduced. Avo hated talking with Green River. Every word she uttered breathed new plagues of concern for his mind to suffer during the coming gulfs of silence.
"Yet, I fear we cannot avoid this fate," she continued. "They see further than what I can. Offered rewards that run beyond even the wildest bribes granted by Guilds. And now, they seem keen on ensuring the survival of Yosanna and her children. Along with the death of one Jhred Greatling. Mirrorhead, as you might know him. I am to help with the realization of these tasks. And then I am to accompany you to the Easy Armistice at Light's End."
"How much do you know?" Avo asked.
Green River grimaced. "No more than what they offered." Avo couldn't tell if she was lying or not. Her thoughtstuff moved at an uncanny evenness of pace. "You are a character of special note to them. Walton wanted me to ensure you would be the one to jack into Yosanna's mind. He also demanded I spare no expense in helping you with your endeavors. His requests felt... personal."
"Why reveal this? Did he have orders for you regarding what to tell me as well?"
At the use of the word orders, the Sang bristled and her fox scoffed. "His recordings left requests for me. I do my best to deliver as per the contract." Green River shrugged. "Walton... Ninth Column. What they offered me is beyond the means of imps to buy."
"Going to get you into the Tiers?" Avo asked, wagering a guess.
She smiled. "In a sense. But ultimately, even more than that. Ah. I say too much." The elevator rang then, Avo's floor arriving. The door snapped open. Neither woman nor ghoul moved. "We are playing the games of another. Games on a board that I cannot picture. And it excites me. It terrifies me. And I think you feel the same way, do you not?"
Avo said nothing. Scattered were his thoughts and even deeper into the mists of deception did he find himself sinking.
"I will make the arrangements for you to visit Mrs. Kivranpuvak and her children as soon as I can. See if her mind reveals anything further. I only ask that you keep me informed as to what you find. In return, I shall endeavor to do the same." She looked down the hall and frowned. "Does Jelene know much? The Agnos?"
"Do we know much?" Avo asked in return.
This time, it was the Sang's turn to play the role of mute.
"I will contact you once I have the 'interviews' prepared," Green River said, stepping away from his question and motioning him to leave the elevator. "But before that, come find me. Perhaps you can offer me insight into my enjoinment as well. They have not said anything about investigating what we already know. And if you are to tell Jelene or the Agnos of this, do so through a closed link. We know not who we can trust."
"No. We don't." Avo backed out of the elevator.
Again, Green River smiled, but her gaze was flat and uncertain. "Good fortune with your coming task. I will offer you what I can find regarding the operations of Conflux in the meantime. Perhaps with additional eyes, your duties may be expedited."
Avo grunted again. He waited for the doors to close and her thoughtstuff to pull out of sight before he turned away from her.
Something was wrong here. Walton was not one to change or add new objectives to something halfway. The information that he gained from Green River felt more dangled than granted, and the sudden addition of her accompaniment to the Easy Armistice and the destruction of Conflux as Ninth Column objects seemed adjustments too convenient, to say the least. Add that to the fact that Green River knew too much for an intermediary and was also missing some major details at the same time.
This felt like a plan that was being actively twisted. Or altered along its steps. And until Avo gained a broader understanding of the players, he would not blindly deliver himself to the Armistice.
For now, Conflux was a matter he could see resolved. That, and building up his Heavens, Hells, and ghosts would at least ensure more clarity against whatever storm he was sailing into. And, dead or not, Walton's mem-drops might just offer some insight into what was going on.
How the fuck does a Liminal Frame go missing? It's not like a godsdamned suitcase or... or a fucking sandwich! You need it burned into someone! It's practically more a place than a thing! Souls aren't just fucking picked up! It's not like someone can just steal it!
One billion imps? A bounty? What? Are you simple? Are you fucking simple in the head?
No.
Fuck! No!
You keep this quiet. The moment news of this gets out, every Two Sphere Fallwalker and above will muster whatever godsdamned forces they got and empty entire districts trying to find it. Let's not mention our "esteemed" competition going for it as well.
And should they find it, oh, you best your ass on Jaus' long-dead dream that they'll be looking to forego whatever bounty they're offered for the treasure they found once they realize just what this thing is capable of.
Keep this quiet. Do you hear me? Keep this fucking quiet!
The High Choirs do not need to be looped in yet. We just need to unfuck this mess and find whichever turncoat fucking clown decided to infuse themselves with the single most revolutionary piece of thaumaturgy in the last five centuries. And how.
What if we can't find it? We? I didn't fuck this up! I didn't lose the Frame! This is your godsdamned fuck-up! I am not going down for this shit! Do you hear me! If you can't find the rash-fucked--godsdamned fuckin'--rat-fucking Frame, I pray to Jaus and all our broken gods that you lose your stutter in time to explain just how all this godsdamned ghoul-shit transpired to Veylis herself.
You hear me! You will be explaining to the High Seraph herself! About how her special Frame went missing BECAUSE YOU WERE SO MUCH OF A FUCKING FUCK-UP THAT YOU LET IT SLIP OUT A GODSDAMNED PANOPTICON-PATTERN DEMIPLANE WITHOUT NOTICING!
Maybe if you're lucky, she'll just real-death you instead of looping you between her flames. And trust me, consang, you don't want to live that way.
I suggest you find a way to fix this. Or I suggest you find a way to lose your current Frame and stay dead after.
-Intercepted Highflame Communications between a "High Authority" and the "STUPID FUCKING HALF-STRAND" by Ori-Thaum Incubi
6-12
Vulnerabilities (I)
"Ninth Column," Draus said, a half-amused sigh rasping free from her breath between her words. "Nothin' like shit always gettin' messier and messier all the time, right?"
Within the apartment, each person held a corner. Avo sat, glaring off into the undulating patterns of ghosts circulating through the room's locus. Draus stood across from him, back against a wall with her eyes flicking between the fish swimming above. Kae, meanwhile, found herself content to peer at her companions, the doubt coming from her mind palpable, incremental.
"Feels like someone is plucking at us," Avo said. "Sees what we're doing. Knows too much." He looked up, his gaze following Draus'. "Would know if fish had ghosts in them."
The Regular shrugged. "River might not be using any ghosts to peek at us. Might be just doin' it the No-Dragon way. Digging through the meat. Splicing straight from the brain." She looked up and frowned again. "But so far, I haven't counted any survivin' schools between the batches. I reckon you might just wanna meet this Yosanna. Bring me with you in case things get off the rails."
"Would rather have you in a different room. Monitoring from a distance. I might be compromised. Green River too. You? I'm not sure."
The ghosts before Avo did a twirl. The very action seemed to taunt him. He spent his life wielding fractals of post-mortal cognition as tools but still did they leave more room for the truth to elude. More than Yosanna, he needed to examine his own palace again, his own sequences. He was missing a week of memories, yet beyond that, nothing caught his attention during his modifying dives. Nothing looked out of place.
Or perhaps, he was merely conditioned to think that way. Remodified in terms of memory or belief. Again, though, such hyper-paranoia broke against the wall that was his resurrection and the chaos that followed. If someone could reweave his mind down to the roots, why not alter him further? Why not plant in him preparatory knowledge? Grant him a clear set of objectives from the very beginning.
If his father was a part of this operation, such alterations would be unnecessary as well. It would have taken Walton mere words to bring him to the call of a new banner or fold. Dead or not, his father's words remained the closest thing to scripture that Avo still knew.
And there was another mystery to discover. Dead or not. For someone dead, Walton seemed to have a better grasp on this whole affair than those still living.
"Doesn't make any sense," Avo muttered, speaking more to himself than anyone.
"You reckon someone might be spoofing your father's memories?" Draus asked. "Using him to lead you along?"
Draus' words summoned a coiling surge of violence from the depths of Avo's being. A surge that ground itself against a flood of counter-impulses. The Morality Injector ran its countermeasures. The beast asphyxiated. Avo frowned.
"Would take a master. Someone like Walton. Ninth Column knows too much about me. The fact they know about Walton would mean that they already have us. Can't be a Guild. Would have just taken my Frame. Doesn't make sense to leave it in me."
"Maybe Ninth Column is using Walton's memories against you? Tryin' to... work you without you suspectin'?"
"Still makes no sense," Avo said. For a beat, he just stared at Draus. "Would you leave divine power in the hands of a ghoul? Leave me down the Maw with the Frame? Too much is chaos. Happenstance. Risk. Risk and no obvious direction. No objective until... until..."
"Until you consumed Little Vicious' Sangeist," Draus finished. "Yeah. You're right. It's a real godsdamned mess." She eyed Avo, expression growing curious. "You ever suspect me? As a Ninth Column asset, I mean? I ain't sayin' I am, but... well, since we're tumblin' down the conspiracy shit-pit..."
"No," Avo said. "Little Vicous nearly killed you. Waste of good asset if she did. Again. Risk. No obvious reward. Can't see it. Letting Conflux take you also too dangerous. And Kae can't support spyware. Too damaged as well. She's out."
A bitter smile spread across the Agnos' face. "L-looks like have... uh... having a crippled mind did something f-for me after... after all."
"Well, when you put it like that," Draus said, shaking her head. "No idea what we're stumblin' toward or who the actual players are." She chuckled. "Feels like I'm back being a Reg again. Don't know nothin'. Don't get told nothin'. Sent to die against somethin'. Details are need to know, and so we're always the last to know."
"M-maybe we... uh... we should leave," Kae said, her suggestion coming hesitant. "Draus you-you said the-the new mobile... uh... mobile aerovehicle is ready, right? Soon? We-we can put more distance between us and... and Green River. Try... try a-and make ourselves hard to find?"
Draus inched her head out from around the wall, light painting half her face in a mask of brightness as she stepped out from what amounted to the apartment's living room. "Yeah, sure, we can stay mobile. But I don't think it'll solve our problems. If they got a good bead on River and Avo, chances are, they got mem-lock on one of 'em as well."
Another disquieting possibility. Avo's memories didn't just remove themselves. Someone could have another piece to his long-term memories. Be able to track him from anywhere the Nether stretched. Kill him whenever they pleased, at whatever time they chose.
Of course, that ran into the question of why they allowed him, a potential asset, to languish in the clutches of a Syndicate for that matter. Especially one run by Mirrorhead: a Godclad of no discernable allegiance.
With what Avo knew, it seemed that the Ninth Column spent much of its effort convincing him of its omniscience, while still lacking the omnipotence needed to allow him an easy path into the upper layers of the Warrens, let alone the Tiers.
With a low chuff, Avo shook the thoughts from his head. His suspicions had abandoned the territory of use and entered just rampant speculation. He would interface with the escapee when Green River prepared her interview.
In the meantime, however, he needed to continue expanding his capabilities. As Walton had taught him, not everything could be predicted, but in times of uncertainty, when you didn't know what you were standing against, it helped to have more than a few surprises in one's own deck as well.
"Should continue with preparations," Avo said, drawing Draus and Kae's focus onto him. "Got our subjects installed with spyware."
"They ready for deployment?" Draus asked.
"Have their Seances set and masked. Mem-cons and other viruses primed. Hid the phantasmics deep in their memories. Laced sequences with traps. Should surprise most Syndicate Necros. Infest their minds as well if they look too deep."
Draus nodded. "Once they go back in, how wide's our window before we need to make a move?"
"Depends on Mirrorhead," Avo said. "Don't think he has the skill to counter me. Didn't figure out my thought-shiv trick from before. He might not be an actual Necro. But if he tries to run..."
"We won't be able to stop him from just disappearing," Draus said. "So. It's a paranoia problem. I'll be honest, it's gonna be mighty easy for him to give us the slip considerin' his Heaven."
Beneath his helmet, Avo bared his fangs in a feral grin. "Only if he can avoid infection. Will infest locus with planted memories from our subjects. Create conditions for artificial mem-lock."
"What are the odds he'll peep that and get away?" Draus asked.
"Low," Avo said. "Failed to figure out you escaped with my shiv. Failed to notice the limits of my skill. Will likely underestimate Chambers as well. Won't be prepared to engage us. Can also alter the minds of our infiltrators using Auto-Seance. Initiative is ours. Just need to make their insertion believable. Shape the conditions of their return to make sense. Pick at his curiosity instead of fear."
Before Draus could speak, Avo initiated a session and cast his thoughts at Draus, their dialogue parting into a circumspect dichotomy. +We should test the waters more too. Turn our sights to find out what Green River knows.+ He flicked a look at Kae. +Might need to use Kae too.+
"Sure, I think I can whip up some conditions that made it look like they escaped from the Scalpers," Draus said. Her voice maintained its cadence, but her eyes narrowed ever-so-slightly. +You got something in mind? Tradecraft ain't my specialty but--+
+Not about tradecraft,+ Avo replied. +Need to find limits of what Ninth Column can see. Green River says she's only a intermediary for them. Can't be sure. Need more eyes on her. You should give Kae a drone. Have her monitor Green River. Her mind is burned. Can’t be scryed right. Can’t be implanted with spyware. Will be useful to see if Green River finds out anyway. See how far her awareness spreads. Or if there’s actually any difference between what she knows versus Ninth Column.+
"There are a few things we might wanna go over before doin' that, though," Draus continued. +No. Kae's not prepared for somethin' like this. Think better'n to use her this way. You and I, we're right for this. Kae? She's got a handle on your Frame and thaumaturgy, maybe, but pullin' her too far down the deep end with us ain't gonna end well.+
+Contrary. She's perfect. Mind's too burned for ghosts to inhabit her. Limits us and Green River as compromise vectors. Might also mean that the Column has other means of surveillance. Coldtech. Voidwatch support maybe.+
Draus' lip twitched as the shadow of a frown passed through her. +Trust me, Avo, if they had Voidwatch behind them, they'd be capable of a hell of a lot more than just leavin' the legwork shit all up to us. So far, we've gotten directions but no support or supply. Real omniscient of them, but I'm not tasting the tang of effectiveness here. Hells. Only thing I might be willing to say about them is they don't seem to be against us. Plenty of chances to sell us out to the Guilds. None of those chances taken.+
Avo grunted a laugh. Ninth Column's deficiency was a most obvious one. "What kind of problems? With using the Scalpers to hide what happened to our infiltrators?"
"Shapin' the situation," Draus said. "Scopin' out where and which Scalpers to leverage and how to make it seem like Chambers and the other two managed to escape. We might need to make an excursion. Our opposition."
+Also want to try something else,+ Avo said. +Grow my Hell. Make it a Second Circle. Back in Burner's Way. We can peek at the Scalpers at the same time. Maybe Kae can help me stabilize the Fallen Heaven. Take this opportunity to create more room between us and River.+
+You want to see if Ninth Column brings anythin' up about that down the line?+ Draus asked.
+Yes. And if Walton left anything else.+ Avo fell silent for a beat. "I suppose we can go out. Take a look."
"Reckon we could," Draus said. Beside, Kae's head inched out from around the corner.
"Are... are we going out again?" The Agnos asked. "Another... run?"
Both Avo and Draus regarded her then with mutual silence.
"I wouldn't call what we might be doin' a run," Draus said. "It's more like... uh... scoutin'. Trying to figure out some vulnerabilities and whatnot." Wordlessly, she extended a link between herself and Kae.
Avo, despite how he loathed to part himself from awareness, ended the session he was running to prevent himself from hearing anything exchanged between the other two. With his mind potentially comprised as it were, seeing silos of knowledge developing between him and Draus, him and Kae, and Kae and Draus might just reveal how deep Ninth Column--or Green River--awareness ran.
Kae beamed with joy and nodded. "Y-yes. I think that can be done... well, m-maybe just theoretically. I-I haven't seen him in action yet. We might... might need him to deconstruct a few of those first. And collect some Rendsinks to... to contain excess."
Avo tilted his head. They were talking about Burner's Way and Nu-Scarrowbur. The Fallen Heaven. A potential Second Circle for him to claim. Options to trigger further hostilities between the Scalpers and Conflux. The details weren't hard for him to assemble in his head. Still, he voiced nothing, letting the conversation between the Regular and the Agnos play on.
“You know what, Kae,” Draus said, running her tongue across her lips. “You might be right. We might wanna take some time away from this place. Get mobile.” Her focus turned to Avo. “You said you was up for an excursion right?”
“Wouldn’t mind.”
The Regular nodded. “Hear Nu-Scarrowbur might be nice this time of night. Could do us right to take a closer look? See the sights.”
“Haven’t done much of that,” Avo said. “Might be interesting. Good change to pace. See the Warrens for what it actually is.”
“Yeah,” Draus said. “Who knows? We might even get lucky and catch a golem in action.”
Someplace inside Avo, a deeper hunger burned.
It had been some time since he watered his canons. Much the same as it had been some time since he properly slipped his ghosts and supplanted a well-warded mind.
“Was always interested in seeing how a Galeslither operates,” Avo said. “Think the local Syndicate there has a few.”
Draus smirked. “Well. I’ll keep that in mind for somethin’ to be on the lookout for.”
...That can't be possible. No one else has the memories to tap into our interception of the Highflame thoughtcast...
Unless...
Engram Protocol is in full effect. Wipe your short-term memories. Douse your thoughtstuff. See them eradicated entirely. I will do the same after encrypting what we have. Redact what you know of me as well. We're burning this circle. Let Cipher-Three know. Liquidate all non-essential assets. Schedule a memory restoration a month from now.
Go dark in the meantime. Use a Sleeper if you need to.
No. I don't know if Highflame has achieved counter-penetration. Seeing as we haven't died in a mass causality accident, I'd say we're not looking at the work of our esteemed competition. Voidwatch perhaps. Maybe Sanctus.
It matters little now. We move on. Stay stationary. Regroup in a month.
If we're still alive then, that is.
-Ori-Thaum Incubi "Cipher-01" to "Cipher-02" regarding a possible compromise of their interception of Highflame's planar security breach
6-13
Vulnerabilities (II)
The midnight rain bled down in columns through cracks left upon the face of holographic midnight. As the moisture loosened, an oscillating crown of neon bright spread throughout the heights of Nu-Scarrowbur. This district was a different beast from Xin Yunsha, for rather than being hewn by modular tissue, its edifices rose in stacked rondels--domed fortresses of painted metal that sprouted upward like ever-shrinking mushroom caps. Each block rose bristled with serried pylons fused across their hulls as if the flashing scales of a leviathan granted shine by pulses of electricity.
Beyond the steel, the winds flowing free from the interior of Nu-Scarrowbur caressed pedestrians and aerovecs alike with a breath most primal. Each current of flow moved as if slaved to the whims of another, as if all of air was but fabric, and needles were tugging upon its totality in different places. From height to height, shrieking from alley to alley, hidden presences encased themselves beneath the breeze: steeds skimming within in the veins of the breeze itself.
It was after one such Galeslither knot that Avo and Draus followed. It, and two additional Sangeists. Their Heavens were to be essential digest for Avo's Soul, while their Rendsinks would serve to aid his efforts to balance the Fallen Heaven out in Burner's Way.
The deeper details as to how the process would follow were best left to Kae. Though an echo of her former self, her understanding of thaumaturgy still thundered loud in the postmortem of her constrained brilliance.
Within an aerovan Draus managed to "borrow" from a former enforcer employed by Conflux, the mem-locked positions of all the presently operating knots glowed as radiant vertices across the DeepNav district simulation. Through preparation and subversion, Avo had managed to tag six different knots. Today, though, they only remained on the trail of one, the dual engines of their aged vehicle grunting as they passed through a dilapidated skytunnel that ran hollow through the guts of a megablock.
Their desired Galeslither was ahead by a mile and a half. In another five minutes, it would dive down a one-way lane that ran through both blocks two and three of the Aldendractht Quadplex as it had made a habit of every Ursday. Such a habit was the main reason Draus had designated it as an easy target, after all.
"Knot's gonna be turnin' any time now," Draus said. At her mental command, external sensory feeds crackled into shape from a merging of ghosts via the aerovec's locus. Breadth existed between and within the lanes. Five across and ten vertical, the skylanes of the tunnel ran porous while the holo-lanes were walled with stripped static--crossing allowed. "You got eyes on the others? They stickin' to their routes."
Avo checked before he replied. Certainty served one better than assumption. "Yes. No deviation. Continuing their patrols. Two breaking over Burner's Way outer perimeter. Other three delving down into the gutters."
The Regular chuckled. "Wonder wh--" Their aerovec dipped. Just in time to greet a speeding blur cleaving diagonally across traffic. Their aerovec twisted. Turbulence gripped and rattled the interior, but their gimbals held them in place. The familiar roar of an explosion sounded as raindrops of shrapnel sang their chiming tones upon the external hull above Avo.
Casting his Whisper out, Avo watched as a trailing wreck spiraled downward to meet the ground below. Clasped within the cage of flames, the shine of thoughtstuff spun like a drill. A survivor remained. One whose mind was rushing into overdrive, desperate to discover a way out. Too late now.
He watched as it struck, then skidded, off the edge of a passing truck. The following momentum pitched the burning husk into the opposite lanes. It struck a small aerovec first, both vehicles pancaking in a marriage of force as aeros behind collided.
Strangely, their horns remained silent throughout, as if neither vehicle nor rider noticed chaos unfolding before them.
"Good dodge," Avo said.
The Regular frowned. "Should've seen it comin'. Fact I had to jock us out of the way don't light my awareness in a good gleam." She sighed. "That kind of fuck-up would've seen me pullin' latrine duty back when I was still--"
"Street squires," Avo said, interrupting her self-criticism. He didn't notice either, which was odd enough. Nor did any other aero seem to grant the blazing wreckage with any regard. That sparked more than a few suspicions within Avo. "No one noticed. Probably had a Necro with them. Running Incogs."
"You reckon so?" Draus asked.
He grunted. "Likely. We can get careless." He cast out his Whisper to peek at the surrounding traffic. Still nothing. Aside from those that had suffered collisions, most others remained nigh-ignorant of all that had just transpired. "But everyone in the lanes doesn't react? No Scalper response knot? Probably Incog. And a well-made one."
The Regular shook her head. "Well, there's a rough run. What'd you think they had on 'em?"
"Nothing anymore," Avo replied.
Draus drew up damage diagnostics and watched as flashes of orange painted the uppermost parts of their egg-shaped aerovec. "We're fine for now. But some of the internal hydraulics are shot. You're gonna have to step out from my side later when we disembark. Think a piece of shrapnel still lodged deep in your door."
He grunted. So long as their Zephyr could keep flying, it wouldn't be a problem. He could tear through the door if the need called for it.
The two of them had spent six nights away from the Second Fortune, returning only to rest and review the tasks which lay ahead. Kae remained in the company of Bright-Wealth and was protected by five or so drones that trailed her person. Draus had left her with a few other items. Items that went unmentioned to Avo. Normally, letting oneself be kept in the dark was a fatal mistake in his profession.
With him being potentially compromised, however, ignorance proved to be a double-edged blade, while the crackling pit that was Kae's mind prevented her from being outright subverted by phantasmal means.
Meanwhile, Draus had assured Green River that their nightly trips wouldn't bring any unwanted attention back to the casino via thoughtcast. Their "benefactor" brooked no complaint or argument about the sudden change in their behavior, merely wishing them fortune and favor for whatever task they pursued.
She held to her silence regarding Ninth Column as well. As far as she acted, it was as if the conversation she had with Avo was but a false memory on his part. Likewise, her mention of providing additional aid to the cause of destroying Conflux remained just talk as well.
Avo wished Green River would've revealed more opposition. At least questioned Draus indirectly to see what he might have revealed. With that, at least he would've known she was watching. By staying quiet, the mists of mystery remained, blurring her role as an ally, adversary, or something else entirely.
In the meantime, He and Draus had wasted little time in shaping the district to their advantage. The Regular made a few messy killings across the district via bombings and open gunfights using Conflux kit. Her targets were mostly gutter-level gangs and other subsidiaries that worked under the Scalpers as extensions of their power base. It didn't take long for her to provoke a reaction in the form of Scalper patrols.
The reported gunfights between Conflux and Scalper enforcers on the periphery of their respective territories were also welcome news.
Concurrent with Draus provocations, Avo worked at a more circumspect stance. From unprotected thoughtcasts between the Syndicate's street-walking FATE-donors and their accompanying enforcers, Avo snatched and copied sequences of memories. Memories that he had his Metamind scan and filter for information concerning the Scalpers and their security.
Specifically, however, he was targeting a certain weak link to their organization. He remembered the capabilities of their Necros when he faced them. And again, he struck at them as vulnerable prey rather than worthy opposition.
Warded though some of the enforcers were, he invaded their minds with relative ease, installing backdoors for intrusion by planting mem-cons in the loci of their vehicles or twinned memories taken from the minds of the FATE-donors they were attached to. Much of this didn't even require extensive use of his Ghostjack; so far, the minds he touched remained unbroken, with his subversions coming like infections: secondhand or more.
With a dozen or so enforcers compromised, he took the information from their minds as they slept. His targeted information was a narrow avenue, and so he stole with comparative ease, risking little and seizing what he needed to narrow down the location of the local Necros.
From there, he simply found the weakest amongst the weak and worked his trade. The Necros servicing the Scalpers were of matching quality as their counterparts from Conflux. What this meant was that he dug his mind into the Necro much the same way as he did most of the enforcers. The only major difference was that instead of infesting his newest quarry via a vehicle's loci, he twisted the cashier of a nearby fast food restaurant the Necro frequented.
As such, his virus slid through without suspicion as they let the mem-data that ran through the link between them and the cashier without review.
Wards were useful, but only when you left them up. It was part of the reason why he kept his imps externally with his thoughtstuff. Did it make it easier for other Necros to steal from him? Yes, though they did so at their peril. Did it ensure he didn't need to drop wards and expose his palace to intrusion every time he wanted to make a purchase? Also yes.
Through the Necro, his hidden influence spread like a plague into the Scalpers' internal loci and memory palaces. Whereupon Avo identified and tagged the loci of all the district operational golems with external memory fragments, ensuring mem-locks.
And potentially more, should the need to go loud ever arise.
A static wall of red flashed before their aero as they came to a halt. Trickling numbers counted down from a minute. Looking up, Avo watched as a flow of traffic darted forward out from the jaws of the tunnel. Above, the materials encasing the outer hull of the megablock dissolved into transparency. An enormous eye stared down upon them, light dashing off its surface at an angle. It resembled a glass-carved obsidian opal the size of a truck. Leaning back, the creature revealed more of its face as soft, suckling teeth lined the unzipped canals that ran beneath the stretch of its body which stretched out into thread-like tendrils a near-mile back down from where the tunnel began.
Lines of mem-data played across the display of his cog-feed as he looked upon the creature. It moaned with weariness but its words didn't flow as sound. Instead, a tide of ghosts splashed out from its mind and enveloped much of the local Nether. A deluge repeating the same ad roared its pitch like a downpour of information, striking against Avo's outer consciousness repeatedly.
+Afraid your wards aren't enough? Present security not doing it for you? Then you need KRAKEN! Contact the No-Dragons today and get your mind installed with something truly inhuman and asymmetrical! With just a simple procure that costs you twelve--+
With a thought, he tuned his Metamind and filtered the ad out from his awareness. Surprising that the Scalpers were letting the No-Dragons peddle their products so heavily, but he supposed business was business.
Some say imps affect one's morals like a lubricant. Perhaps. But Avo thought the saying too pithy and limited. Imps were like a wedge against self-interest as well. Some would trade future satisfaction tomorrow for pleasure today.
And Syndicates were a mixed bag when it came to playing the long game in this city. Didn't take much for a Guild to see their puppets replaced.
A flash of green pulled Avo back into focus. The Zephyr turned hard and dove low. Out from the jaws of the tunnel, they went. Basked in a waterfall of leaking rain, the inner rung of Nu-Scarrowbur greeted them as they circled block two. Perpendicular to them, a vast roundabout torqued upward in a display of dancing light, screaming sound, and shifting metal.
A dozen new points of interest littered Avo's cog-feed with miscellaneous mem-data. Beyond that, however, what truly clutched his attention was that which stood rooted at the heart of the district.
Its presence was ethereal, manifesting in bursts and increments upon the tapestry of existence. Flashes of incomprehensible lightning lashed at his eyes and wards both, the ghosts of his wards quailing as the fissuring cracks of a storm widened into a chasm, which in turn fused to become the eldritch bark of what looked to be an impossible tree.
Clad with layers of liquid electricity bade to stillness by the grasp of time, where most trees would rustle when the wind blew, this grumbled and growled with bygone voices. Its looping branches, meanwhile, were like small eddies amidst swirls of the raging wind. Stable portals for traffic to pass through or dock.
The outer lanes of traffic ran down holographic tubes. They ran four in an arc before a blockade of Scalper drones formed a partition between the FATELESS rabble and more esteemed customers. Past the separation, portals stretched out like nine constellations. Each shimmered as if a mirage, the faintness of what lay through the veil by a steady flow of traffic.
"Stormtree," Draus said. "A Stormtree anyhow. It's where the Guild got their name. Suppose to be fixtures on the flesh of time. First you've ever seen?"
"Up close," Avo answered. "Wasn't in a Stormtree Sovereignty when I was in the Tiers."
Draus nodded. "The ones up there are a hell of a lot bigger though." A flash of an expression passed across her face. "Can't tell you how much I hated tryin' to cut those suckers down during the war." She chuckled. "Made gettin' around easier a few times though. Let us push behind Stormtree's lines directly."
"Thought Highflame had a ceasefire agreement with them during the Fourth."
She tilted her head. "Yeah. We did. But accidents happen and... somedays you wear the wrong colors to work is all I'm sayin'."
False flag operations. Avo wasn't sure why he couldn't picture Draus doing something so underhanded. Might be because she was the closest thing to a "good" person he knew in these depths beyond Kae or Essus. It didn't take much for anyone to cast another in the mold of their perception. The totality of a person was so easily ignored in exchange for an ideal, especially considering they were about to commit another false flag themselves.
Avo frowned. How easily these things slipped him.
"Do you miss being a Regular?"
Draus turned and, uncharacteristically, her gaze dipped, eyes fleeing from contact. "Do I miss it?" She breathed out and rolled her shoulders. "I miss... feelin' like what I was doin' had purpose. Like I was fightin' for shit that mattered instead of just... the pest control I've been doin', I suppose. But... being Reg is about knowing that your life can be spent on anything and everything. And doin' what you're told anyway."
"For the dream?"
An embittered smile swelled over her face. Their aerovan passed into the darkness of the alley, the distance between them and the knot closing by the second. "For the dream." She licked her lips. "Might be a bit near-blasphemous but... after my discharge, I got to feelin' someway close to Jaus, I think. Before he got sent to the Big Nothin'."
"You said expendable," Avo said. He chuffed, his amusement dry. "Like me. Like ghouls."
Draus shook her head. "No. Ain't nothin' like your kind." Her lip twitched. Her thoughtstuff swelled. Anger. Rage. He knew that look by now. "Weren't supposed to be, anyhow." She met him eye to eye, her stare rough and hard. "You were made to be wasted. Seen the way your masters used you. Nothin' but mass and brutality there."
"Suppose your kind was better at the killing. Better supported. More ground gained per death."
"Ain't even about that," Draus said. "It's about spending, Avo. Spending our lives. You spend to get somethin' that matters in exchange. You understand? What you fought for? No sensible person in the world wanted to go back to livin' that way. Bein' slaves to some god they don't understand worth a damn. But I suppose that's how the folks down here see the Guilds anyway. Hells. I started the war just treatin' your kin like target practice. Ended it thinkin' I understood you all."
"Understood?" Avo asked. She was hinting at something more. Larger ideas were hiding between the silence of her words. "Your honesty is missing today. Want to say something. Won't."
And she didn't. Instead of carrying on their conversation, her eyes were narrowed, affixed to the visual feeds cast across the insides of the vehicle as drifting screens. "We're closin'. Half-mile and counting. Your dives are reliable, yeah? They disembark behind these blocks?"
"Yeah. Think they're smuggling something. Don't want the broader Syndicate to know. Necro I compromised is in on it. Helps them scrub their golem's loci. Installed backdoors into them. Backdoors now mine."
Draus chuckled and shook her head. "Shit, Avo, you make a good argument for dual systems, you know that? Half coldtech, half thaumic. Keeps everything from topplin' one way or the other."
He grunted. "Wouldn't help. Just opens more angles of attack. Ghosts can dive into technology too. Just need to harvest them from someone who knows code. Technology. Diversifying cost more and offers nothing. Better to go with ghosts."
The Regular snorted. "You know Voidwatch got them self-dreaming machines right? That they're ages beyond us in all that technical know-how and stable-reality wonders? Heard they got some ways to choke off the Nether. Blockade the Heavens."
"Are they going to start sharing?" Avo asked, already knowing the answer.
"Maybe," Draus said. "Most the city could catch a new mem-con tomorrow. Decide to give up on Souls and Heavens and thaumaturgy in general. Return to the old ways."
Yeah. That was what the Guilds wanted: to capitulate absolute power for an elevation to their standard of living and a permanent vulnerability to all the strange and anomalous monsters that still festered within the metaphysical scars that stretched throughout the void.
No. Avo knew the pull, same as any Guilder Godclad. Same as any Fallwalker. To be a Godclad was to be able to make your own choices. To be spared from final death by way of folly, failure, or weakness.
Even now, he was stalking the golems to water the soil of his Soul, to feed upon their Heavens and cultivate new canons or build the foundation for a new Hell. If he, but a neophyte of the divine, was half-besotted on the potential for new power, what then did the addiction of the true ancients amongst the Guilders resemble?
The scream of their engines wailed outward through the valley of chrome. Descending streetward, Draus gave orders for the aerovec to park in an available spot. Holographic squares of green and red littered the street as aeros found their halt upon open slots.
Landing in the corner of a lot, Avo watched as an attendant drone began interfacing with the locus of their vehicle. It wouldn't be long till Scalpers dispatched another patrol to check. Openly broadcasting Conflux mem-data would do that.
"One-minute window?" Avo asked.
"About," Draus said. "Probably won't be that quick though. I got some other distractions prepared for them. Won't be that quick. But we should be. Keep this clean and fast. I'll be in place as overwatch. You move on me, got it. No jumpin' in and killin' everybody before I got eyes on the scene."
"Already been over this," Avo replied.
"Well, we're goin' over it again," Draus said. "Can't hurt to be on the same page."
"I won't just attack them. Have injector. More controlled now."
She eyed him once more. "I trust you. But remember this: there ain't no absolute crutch for anythin', Avo."
"Heaven."
Draus opened her mouth and paused. "That--look, let's just get this shit done with. Tired of your godsdamned sophistry."
Avo grinned. "Don't teach argumentation at Regular academy?"
"Just shut the fuck up and sync me, rotlick."
Avo chuffed and triggered the session he shared with Draus in his Auto-Seance. +Coming through?+
+Loud and clear.+ She responded. Through the link, her glee bled over into his impatience. They've both been looking forward to this. For different reasons, perhaps, but all the same. There just might be something to say about the mental symmetry between ghoul and Regular. +Alright. Let's go bag ourselves a couple o' golems. And frame Conflux in the process.+
+Try to make this sloppy,+ Avo said. +Be suspicious if Conflux is too competent.+
Draus smiled. +Yeah. Sure. Don't forget to pick up our friend before you go.+
Avo looked at the back of their aerovan. +He's in the trunk?+
+Kept all neat-like for you. Just the neck's broken.+
He grunted. What was an ambush without some casualties on both sides, after all?
Ambushing a knot is easy. You just have to be sure that you're hitting them when they're disembarked.
People are easy to kill. Heavens? That's another story. Its own story. Changes the rules you gotta play by.
Listen. I'm old. Well, old by the standards of this city. Would be awfully cocky to compare myself to the High Seraph herself or ol' granny Thousandhand, but I've been living in New Vultun long enough back to remember the day the colors first rolled in.
The memory's illegal but, let's just say I still got a few recollections of the Masters shitting bricks in front of us. Almost made all the shit that followed worth it.
Anyway, the point of my rambling is that you always want the fight on your terms. You see one of those streams of the Stormsparrow just choking her enemy's options away, right? Do that. Always do that.
Even a Godclad's gotta vent some time. If you manage to cage their choices enough, sooner or later, they'll have to show their godsdamned neck.
And then, bury your fucking teeth deep, and never let go.
Seize the tempest, gleamers. Seize it, or someone else will.
-Quail Tavers, School of the Warrens
6-14
Seize the Tempest (I)
Being out in the urban open always inspired a focus in Avo. Staring up at the valley of metal rising from both sides, blocks two and three rose like parted molars, grinding against the resplendent arteries of air traffic spilled wide across the false firmament of Layer Two.
Walton once told him that the feeling was instinctual. The city made him feel small. The buildings looked like the fangs of a gargantuan beast. The inhabitants that lived within its jaws? Prey. Such a contrast played a symphony of confusion on a ghoul's baser appetites, driving it to want to eat before it was eaten.
If New Vultun was an allegory, it would be a domino of closing teeth, each clamping down on the ones below. The idea of being the topmost predator kindled a warmth deep and primordial within Avo.
Claiming his "companion" from the back of the van, Avo threaded his blood into the yet-chilled corpse and infused the former enforcer with animation. Heeding his whims, the body shambled out like a shuffling puppet, its monochrome rig untouched. The exoskeletal armor remained unblemished beyond aged stains of blood and filth. No rifle came with the enforcer, but within his arms remained a gauss repeater and a fusion burner.
Those would prove to be most sufficient for the coming task.
Draus wasn't lying about leaving the corpse mostly unharmed. Problem was she really understated the damage she inflicted upon the half-strand's neck.
The enforcer's bowl of a helmet was faced backward. Flicking through the broken shards of vertebrae that lined drooping pockets of shredded flesh like a poorly installed ladder, Avo twisted the head back into place and sighed. +Did more than just "break the neck." Everything's shattered. Pieces are jabbing against the padding of his inner rig.+
Through their shared link, mirth dripped over from her like dollops of caustic honey. +Aw, shucks. I'm real sorry 'bout not killin' him as neat as you wanted. I'll be sure to only snap 'em part-way next time. Let you half a snack on the neck for your trouble.+
Sarcasm. How unbecoming of a Regular. With a tug of will, the corpse snapped to a stand and stumbled away from the vehicle, coaxed into motion on thread-thin leashes of blood. Beneath the surface of existence, a second reality pushed through, Avo's Frame projecting a reality deviant from the limiting chains of baseline metaphysics.
+Making for the knot,+ Avo said. The streets ahead littered his cog-feed with leaking thoughts and intrusive phantoms. Machinery around him wailed and sang as parking slots shifted to make way for new landers. A stretch of gore-caked flesh extended along yellow-striped lanes for disembarkers. Avo sniffed. Sweetness greeted him. A creamy sheen of stickiness clung thickly to the blood still. The nectar of joy was unmistakable, and with who the smear used to be.
This wasn’t the first joy-fiend that Avo saw painted across a lot. Probably got caught in the blast back of an ascending aero pulling a rapid liftoff. Though the topmost layer of their parking slots was coned with lift pads, more than a few fliers found impatience more their persuasion and made to accelerate beyond their stationary boundaries.
The outcome was fatal. But how many imps was the life of an addict worth?
A wave of static-instilled red splashed over Avo, basking both he and the corpse with letters bold and crimson.
STAND BACK: VEHICLE LANDING
The aerovec descending groaned upon the strain of its own thrust. In the deepest folds of his ears, a low whine sang out from where the three engines met the central chassis of the machine.
He picked up the pace and had the corpse shamble ahead. It skid under his power more than it strode, body limp where the blood did not reach. More glove than a pure puppet, the motions of the dead enforcer were sharp and exaggerated, each foot traveled made possible by eldritch vectors of force.
Inside, Avo felt his Heaven of Blood rumbling deep, sinking the jaws of its spire into the softness of reality’s underbelly before pouring itself into the wound, filling a groove in existence with the shape of new canons.
Hovering drones swayed over the intersecting lanes of the lot like titanium lanterns. Another splash of light cleaved across Avo’s feed. Yet, this time, the scan tore away from him in but moments, slipping back to his puppet. Ah. Finally, they noticed the enforcer. It took them far longer than he expected.
Casting his Whisper high, he counted the fifty other surveillance drones working the lot and turned the flowing waters of his perception beyond. Washing the horizon with his scrying gaze, the shine of a thousand accretions dotted his notice, but all paled beneath the marker that blazed like a translucent sun.
Mem-locked to his Metamind, the position of the knot was halted. Unmoving. And a scant four hundred feet away. The environment beyond the lot was akin to a ravine at the bottom of a cascade frozen in chrome. Countless decks extended out from each level of megablocks two and three, joining in the middle by bridges and G-Tubes. Upward, each extension pulled back further than the last, looking more as if a step on a staircase if looked down from on high than the cliffs they were.
Shuttling his Whisper ahead, he laid eyes on the Galeslither and its accompanying Sangeists for the first time. Not yet in person, but they were there. And they were parked. A level above the lot, outside a riotous bar front, the warded minds of enforcers and technicians mingled for drinks and other manners of debauchery.
Parted from the passing riff-raff of the FATELESS, the Scalpers partied with clean-shorn skull fragments swaying from their hips. A line of defensive drones hovered on standby in a defensive formation, twelve to their cluster, each armed with enough firepower to make coppery mist of a flat. Minds were linked in chains as ghosts flowed free, sprinkling shared thoughts and memories between dozens of people. Four guards stood on watch at the steps leading up to the pseudo-patio.
The Scalpers had pursued him with more focus and precision than anything Conflux demonstrated. Here, though, they made a mistake. They thought themselves safe and secure from harm. Drowned in deceitful allegory, they saw this district of theirs as a sanctuary and hearth. Impenetrable.
Perhaps in the Tiers, protected by the burning sigils of the Paladins, they might’ve been right. But these were the Warrens. And in these depths, even wolves could be made prey.
A presence shuffled within his marrow, raw and angry from being caged. All were meat to a ghoul, anyway. And it had been too long since he indulged.
With a thought, he deactivated his Morality Injector. The beast rose, spreading like wildfire from sinew to sinew, the worst of his nature called back to purpose. All at once, his repressed urges struck him like a bomb. Nearby heartbeats taunted him. He could sense the fluid within them, the weight of his Heaven reaching out, caressing nearby aspects of its domain.
He wanted to turn the Injector back on. He wanted to leave it off forever. He needed to reach the knot. He wanted to make a butchery of the crowd.
Shaking his head, Avo put one step in front of the other. Across the lane, his pet corpse walked parallel with him, strung to his will.
Violent acts strained his Morality Injector and fed his beast. Keeping it active meant choking his mind with feedback of shame and discord in the fray of bloodshed. Such was unacceptable now. Before, when he lived in the Tiers, he played a silent game, cutting at threats from darkness and asymmetry.
Now, the demands of his Soul called for tactile contact. For his ontology to press its blades into the supple nature of his prey. In this, his beast was joined, and his bloodthirst was justified.
Part of Avo quavered, wary and fearful. He cast another look behind him, looking upon the mangled splatter of the joy-fiend. A fate he could also share should he drown himself in vice. Yet, something greater and deeper had yearned for this, had strained to stretch the totality of his being and remember the taste of true liberty.
Such was a question provoked by being a Godclad: why shouldn’t you feed your desire, should even reality succumb to your whims?
All he needed to do was stay his brutality from the choiceless. A strange sensation passed through him. He could do that.
He did do that.
A flash of an icon planted itself upon an overpass four levels above. Across the session, he peeked through Draus’ cog-feed and found her moving. In her grasp was a rifle. One of old make and poor condition. In the corner of her visual display, he read its make and model. Valquist G-7. Same one that shot her down in the Crucible.
+Thought you hated that gun?+ Avo asked. He turned his Whisper and noticed that the drone that scanned his corpse was launching a cluster of ghosts outward to the nearest Nether lobby. The Scalpers were going to be pinged soon. Good. The messier this looked the better. And the more eyes that were on the enforcer in the exo-rig, the fewer that lingered on him–expanded his opportunity for surprise.
From out of the aero, Draus was moving, her holocoat tuned to project colors of white and black. Doubtless, she was trying to get the drones to see her as well. Shouldering her rifle, she clenched her fist around a trigger of some kind. No ghosts clung to its shell, and no locus gave it any shine in the Nether. Pure coldtech. Something that Avo didn’t know about.
That was a good thing. Until the matter with Ninth Column was made clearer, some knowledge should remain siloed between them. What he didn’t know, Ninth Column also didn’t know. At least, that was his working theory right now.
+Gonna make my way up that bridge,+ Draus said. +Twenty seconds. Less. You get in position beforehand. I’ll shoot first. Then, you send in the stiff. I’ll drop the location for exfil after. Make sure you peel out right after, you hear? Not runnin’ around eatin’ folk or peelin’ skin.+ She paused. +Your hunger’s back and it’s mighty loud, Avo. Sure you can’t do this with the Injector on?+
+Can you shoot well if a flood of regretful memories assaulted you? Every time you made a kill?+
+Just keep it zero and under control. Like before.+
He grunted. +Minute window?+
Draus chuckled. She clenched a trigger on her coldtech device. +A mite bit more, maybe.+
Thunder rumbled in the distance. No. Not thunder. Explosions. Gunfire. And a beat later, sirens.
He didn’t know what Draus had left for the Scalpers across the city, but he could feel a flood of ghosts choking the nearby lobbies already. The Nether traffic was increasing. The Scalpers were likely scrambling blindly right now, conflicting information and emergency alerts pinging their network, making them wonder if the attack was focused on them or elsewhere.
Anything that put the enemy on the back foot was worth it.
As Walton once said, much of conflict was inflicting chaos on your target while enforcing desired order on one’s environment.
A grim thought followed. Was Green River an emissary to deliver upon him chaos, or just part of the environment, being arranged into place?
Pushing the enforcer through the holographic perimeter, Avo followed at a distance, the wisp-thin chains of his blood extending, but unbroken.
REND CAPACITY: 3%
Already his Hell was filling. Barely had he begun to strain. It was growing ever-harder to ignore the impatience burning within him, yearning to build upon his circle of Hells. Strange how a mere week ago, his new gifts filled him with savage euphoria. Now, despite possessing gifts absolute and divine, all he did was suffer his deficiencies.
What little chance stood the echoes of fading satisfaction against the hunger of the present?
Behind, drones tracked his puppet, the shine of their optics still locked to him. Ahead, the path festered with moving bodies and gawking wagers. At street level, the pathways were lined with decay kiosks lined with mem-codes and haptic advertisements. The shine of the upper levels bled over the lip of the deck above, but only barely. Those walking these depths were harried to make their way up.
The only ones that stayed lingered against the cool metal of the walls, joy fiends sagging against trails of piss and refuse, smiling at nothing, wasting away to sheets of skin molded upon embrittled bone.
Across the session, Draus was efficiency in motion. He had no idea when or how she was already up two levels, only that she managed without drawing much attention to herself. Cast down from her former station she might be, the skills she claimed wrestling against the closing jaws of death were not so easily stripped.
Not without the utter ruination of her mind itself.
+Almost in position,+ she said. He doubled his pace upon her conveyance. The pedestrians parted wide as the corpse within the rig stomped through. Avo trailed behind, blending as best he could, savoring the taste of apprehension and fear pouring free from unprotected minds.
The path cleared for his corpse. From his Whisper, he watched as two Scalpers moved down the steps to intercept, minds already fed with knowledge, prudent portents pressing their guns to the ready and their path to descend. Accompanying them came two dagger-shaped drones, twelve feet long, gauss barrels spinning to action.
In Avo’s cog-feed, he watched as the distance between him and the knot trickled from fifty feet down to thirty. People were fleeing past him now. Running around as a flood would part against a mountain. Masked by the flow of bodies, he altered his holocoat to paint him in hues of monochrome.
Now, it looked as if three of Conflux's number were in play. Still suicidal. Still reckless. More acceptable.
His puppet moved ahead.
The Scalpers descended, twin drones taking point, the enforcers drawing up the rear.
Above, the patrollers of the knot continued their revels, their senses blunted to all that was happening, all that was to come.
+In place,+ Avo said. +Ready to tear into them. When you’re ready.+
A flash of light folded across the upper left corner of his sight. For the first time in over a week, Avo fired his Celerostylus. In a fraction of a heartbeat, the roar of gauss fire followed. Her first four shots deliberately struck wide, but her last sank through the shells of the descending drones, tungsten needle tugging micro-materials and armor plating out in a concomitant eruption.
Avo flung his puppet around the corner. With a twitch of his fingers, the dead enforcer’s arms spun up, gauss-repeater primed from his left, fusion burner building up in the right. The Scalpers, to their credit, fired back and shot true.
Some of their flechettes slipped under the corpse’s armpit, tearing through the localized thinness. Blood plumed. A flap of flesh came free. Machinery sparked. The rest rang against the rig, cracking the reinforced alloys and jolting the meat within.
Alive, the enforcer would have been driven back by the impacts. Driven forward at an impossible pace by a Heaven? The flechettes were the ones that succumbed.
Avo forced the corpse’s left hand to close. The repeater rattled. Shots pinged and cracked against the enforcers. Their exoskeletons spared them early deaths but not from losing their footing.
It also failed to protect them from new threads of blood slicing out toward them. Thinner than threads, Avo slipped his newest limbs into the cracks of his foes’ armor. Deeper still he plunged, his needle-tipped ichor worming past folds of clothing, coiling into flesh.
This was something that Kae inspired and recommended; the collapse of a delicate system rather than the destruction of the whole. More damage for less Rend. He didn’t need to slice and rip and smash everything they touched. Sometimes, all he needed to do was reach into someone's veins and pop their brain vessels.
REND CAPACITY: 11%...
THAUMIC CYCLER: 274 THAUM/c
Ghosts: [217]
Within the Scalpers, blood called to blood and they shuddered. Fragments of tungsten burst through their brains as they shuddered, their gunfire ceasing, their seizures hidden as Avo consolidated his grasp on them. In an instant, his control widened, and he found new sacks of flesh to ply his influence.
Suddenly, his Conflux puppet wasn’t alone. He had it celebrate by firing its fusion burner up into the air.
Across the session, Draus, synced to his mind, ducked down and closed her eyes. He did the same.
And then, a cleaving spire of bright and blindness stripped sight from all unfortunate enough to be gazing out into the open air.
Godclads enjoy an addiction to killing, do you know this? I say enjoy as we do not suffer. We do not even die, should we be worth any merit, blessed so with our Frames.
The price we pay for our violence is bestowed unto the lessers. Other Godclads who cannot face us. Rival guns. And collateral damage.
Always, always collateral damage.
A kill committed with a Heaven resonates within you differently than one naturally performed. There is a depth to the deaths you taste. You… sense what you’re doing to another’s body–their life–through the narrow gaze of your domains.
Little wonder most of my ilk grow so addicted. And little wonder why most Fallwalkers last less than a month before they lose their Frames to another.
Eventually, you will seek a higher path. Mountains will wish to summit greater mountains; stars to burn beyond their rivals; pleasures to be surpassed.
To kill a person with one Heaven is to taste a cessation of existence in but one flavor. To see the dimensions of a life stripped from the tapestry in totality, more is required.
And so, apotheosis must always grow, for there is nothing more addicting than the kill, and there is nothing more thirsty than a wanting Soul.
New Vultun Sunrise Interview with Ying Yang Wei, The Stormsparrow
6-15
Seize the Tempest (II)
Few things were worth more than surprise in a battle.
Conferred from the gaze-scouring radiance cleaving through the air from the dead Enforcer’s fusion burner, blindness was given sound by a droning chorus of warbled wails from a dozen lips.
Lacquered in a second skin of blood, the immensity of the burner’s heat pressed on him still despite being directed away from him. Its touch dipped deep, steaming the very fluids out from his outer shell. His discomfort was comparatively minor.
Not twenty feet away, a crackle snapped loud even in Avo’s time-quelled ears. Flesh hissed and cooked. Water boiled, stripping the moisture from sloughing flesh.
At his whims, the burner halted, the corpse unclenching its right fist as the last spills of coruscating bright died down to a fading orb.
The strain on his Celerostylus built. The burden now was placed entirely upon his nerves, his Heaven serving to enhance the frailties of his broader flesh. He could perhaps squeeze another five seconds from its use. Five seconds better left as a cushion in case of the unexpected.
Spurred by two windows of time–one belonging to his implant, the other the disorientation of the Scalpers–he sent his three puppets up the steps as he followed closely behind, masking himself with cover as the Conflux enforcer took point as the primary meat shield.
Trails of gauss fire ran diagonally in his sight as he reached the top, impact trajectories painted by his Phys-Sim. A rain of ravaged metal fell; two drones cored clean by still-traveling flechettes crossed his feed. Across a mental bridge, he felt faint sensations from a mind synced to his. Draus was ejecting her clip. Draus was reloading. Draus was firing again.
All done in the smallest fraction of a second.
Calamity had erupted outside the bar front. Some were fumbling back, clutching eyes made permanently blind by the spear of light. Many of the enforcers were only stunned, their optical implants adjusting to the sudden spike in brightness, their other senses compensating. The drones, automated and devoid as they were of human limitations, were the first to respond.
Three of the arrow-shaped drones split and held the stairs, moving to intercept Avo. The remaining five spread out and ascended as a squadron, triangulating Draus’ position from the impact vectors.
REND CAPACITY: 16%
Circuits of ghosts came alight across his Metamind in a sequence of stars. Each of his phantasmics flickered as all nonessential cognitive enhancements were briefly deactivated. His Ghostjack solidified then, injecting itself deep into the flesh of the greater Nether as its spire-top was tuned with new and ruinous thoughtcasts.
Secondhand Fatality primed itself first and delivered in a scythe of screaming ghosts, Avo swept his cognitive blade up at three approaching drones, their guns on the cusp of firing. At the vanguard, Avo’s Conflux puppet shuddered as a hail of hyper-accelerated kinetics hammered its armor.
Inside the exo-rig’s shell, the corpse’s sternum was dented as cartilage tore. Even a reasonably augmented enforcer would have been halted, bathed by these threads of force. But a piloted corpse was a different matter. Blood pushed. Flechettes struck. Between two hammers of ever-increasing acceleration, the flesh within the shell came apart.
As did the loci of the drones when Avo’s ghosts finally licked across them.
Functions shaped by a system of ghosts, the Secondhand Fatality impacted against wards in a mind-rattling splash of clashing phantasms. Two drones overloaded outright, their vents hissing flames as their governing sequences were rendered unmade by a glimpse of true death.
COG-CAP: 20%
The final drone, spared by its cohorts blunting the worst of the damage or just protected by better wards pressed on, its fire unceasing, barrel warping.
One of its shots found fortune. A needle swam through the exposed wound left in the Conflux enforcer’s armpit. Before Avo could respond, to harden the local flow of blood, the left arm of his corpse tore free, swaying on strands of gleaming sinew.
Displeased, Avo had his newer puppets take aim. Positioned on the flanks of the Conflux enforcer, he made one of his controlled Scalpers shoot the monochrome-rigged corpse in the back. The other of his Scalpers aimed a bit higher and let loose with their rifle.
Avo had hoped to mask his puppeteering under the guise of friendly fire.

Unfortunately, guns also had ghosts of their own, and this Scalper’s gun was made never to fire when pointed at an ally.
REND CAPACITY: 24%
Avo could feel the burn seeping out from his spine now. Ten seconds. Maybe less. Lacing his trauma into the gun, its locus cracked as ghosts smeared in the air, fragmenting into fracls as they shattered beneath the weight of ego-killing memories.
Again, his second Scalper squeezed. This time, it did fire. Blindly. Loudly. Sloppily. Coils whined and tungsten zipped free. With the trigger held, Avo let the gunfire run. His Conflux enforcer parted in armor and body both, viscera weeping like crimson yolk from a chrome shell. The drone fared no better, coming apart as its own organs of circuitry and fuel detonated.
The explosion washed over the crowd. Bodies tumbled. Drinks were cast from tables, shattering. Avo released hold over his Conflux enforcer. What remained of his first puppet spewed free from cracked metal in rivulets. With the heartbeats of the yet living calling to them, he pressed both his puppeted Scalpers forward in a sprint, sending them crashing into the crowd.
Then, he severed them too from the touch of his Heaven, instead stripping from them their blood, and thickening his haemokinetic armor. Beneath his holographic veil, blades of fluid crimson grew from his claws, and mono-thin tendrils inched free from his frame.
Few Scalpers had the sobriety or reflexes to react to his approach. The few who did bore pistols or implanted side arms. Most were too slow to track his coming and those that held the conditions for speed were lacking in stopping power.

But Avo was a creature that liked certitude, and his recent experience had taught him wariness toward blind assumption. He held the edge, but they were still responding. He needed to fix that.
His Ghostjack hummed as phantasmal stratocumulus arced through his mind. His cog-feed flickered as all but his ward and basic perception enhancers dimmed. From his mind loosed a roaring swirl of raging memories, Lucille’s echoing screams spearing out into the minds of the reacting Scalpers, instances of harm delivered within packages of forking lightning.
COG-CAP: 80%

Wards cracked. Thoughtstuff spilled. Trauma bit deep into the supple flesh of inner minds. Avo’s maddened ghosts feasted, and with it, the fullness of the beast’s yearning for violence was roused.
He fell on them like a tiger unleashed upon a pack of wolves. His claws and blades, impossibly sharp, never dulling, greeted skin, subdermals, meat, bone, and then air. His tendrils touched and slithered, detonating hearts and veins with explosive expansions of force. Lives passed upon the arcs of his falling instruments as blood capitulated to his will.
The hunger in his heart was paradoxical: the more he tried to slake it, the more it boiled with want. Reaching within, he found the beast churning with delight. A shudder spread through him then. A dawning realization; the desires of ghoulhood had been met by this bloodletting.
What was lacking came from a void that echoed deeper.
Below the turbulent waters of reality, a Soul swelled as flooding Essence stretched the borders of its resplendence. Veins of crackling embers glistened between the scales of the cycling serpent now, the thaumic loop growing stronger, perpetual motion strengthened by nourishment in the form of a massacre.
He wanted this. He yearned for this.
Beyond just the bloodthirst of the beast emerged a new dimension to his relationship with violence. It empowered him, and in turn, the power satisfied him, consecrated him, and protected him.
A mere week ago, any one of these Scalpers would have been a threat he only dared engage from ghosts and shadows. They would have left him broken physically, been too fast for his sight to follow, and too strong for his strength to contend.
Now, he made a feast of them by the batches. Heads and limbs tumbled loose. Bodies burst as if struck by explosive ammunition. By the time agony was spreading its fingers along the length of his spine, he found himself standing upon a dais of his own making. Ringed by gore and painted with blood, Avo unclenched his reflexes as time snapped back to baseline flow.
REND CAPACITY: 48%
THAUMIC CYCLER: 299 THAUM/c
Ghosts: [242]
Glinting fragments slid off Avo’s flowing protection. Across the stretch of the street, burning husks of drones greeted the ground in thudding impacts. Avo’s nerves vibrated with soreness, and his mind thrummed loud in the aftermath of euphoric butchery. Twenty-five lives. Twenty-five Scalpers made sacrifices for his Soul and to fan the flames of a new gutter war.
No drones sailed through the air. The only hint of life were in fleeing accretions and sprinting feet fleeing the scene. He stood alone, aglow in the light of an open bar. A few server drones lay in pieces as well. Business was unlikely to recover.
This had been easy. This had been a joy.


Climbing up the food chain truly held pleasures of ineffability.
+Avo, golems,+ Draus said, voice cutting the fog from his mind. +Twenty seconds. Snatch the Heavens. Cut the Rendsinks. Brick the rest.+
Urgency usurping thrill, a cold focus filled Avo’s mind as he returned to the task. To the resonance of his Soul the dormant Heavens were drawn. A single hand dangled from the open cockpit of one of the Sangeists. One of the Scalpers tried thinking. But a shame they were too slow. Caught between pleasure and preparedness, they chose the drink over the golem.
Drawn to the pull of his Soul first were the three Sangeists, their Heavens tumbling into his Soul with but a yank. The Galeslither resisted a moment longer by mass alone, lingering for a moment before it too succumbed to his pull. Blood flowed, masked by the pools leftover from the slaughter, and the shroud of Sangeists reflected upon the ichor. The wind inched into him moments after, needling past matter, through his orifices and pores.
Down into the fathomless depths of his subreality, new Heavens greeted old and domains mingled. A weight settled upon his Soul, and the metaphysics of his ontology grew heavy with untethered weight.
Yet, before he could move and bury his haemokinetic tendrils and tear the Rendsinks free from the drained golems, a voice rumbled from within, its words echoed from the blood in his veins before stretching out further into the greater spills beyond him.
“WHOLE… MAKE… ME… WHOLE…”
Inside his Soul, Avo felt his Sangeist speaking to him. A flash of something eldritch, something alien and long-passed flickered to life, if but for an instant.
He remembered his Heaven speaking to him before. Somewhere in Burner’s Way. It was louder now. More coherent.
Draus’ voice thundered through his mind. +Twelve seconds. Ask Kae about that shit later, we need to peel out!+
Ignoring the unease rising from within his bones, Avo shaped new appendages and drove them into the undersides of each golem. Kae had gone over details regarding the Rendsinks, and it took him little time to locate their positions on each respective golem after some research in the Nether.
It was housed in a compartment just behind the Sangeists. For the Galeslither, it operated with two sinks, and they lined the bottom. Avo wasted no time with surgery, instead opting for a more brutal approach. The golems sagged as he alchemized gulfs of matter into blood, slicing the Rendsinks free as pieces from the whole.
With a grunt, he pulled hard. Even with how fast he could pull, his blood was affixed to his strength. As such, he held little hope of lifting each cube, heavy as they were. Thankfully, he didn’t need to. Exerting his Heaven, he rendered the outer surfaces of each golem liquid.
REND CAPACITY: 83%...88%...94%
And following that, he silenced his Heaven and made to balance the scales with his Hell.
Plunging his entropic shroud through the ground below him, he scooped matter away in a flaying fog. Across from his position, several tons disintegrated at the touch of his Hell. Across his cog-feed, his Rend Capacity fell back down to three-fourths as he sliced the incline of a ramp into the ground.
DANGER: DAEMON MANIFESTATION POTENTIAL GROWING
Avo frowned. That was new. His Hell did mention the possibility of a daemon if he focused the powers of his Hell on one area alone.
+Negative two,+ Draus said. +Windows passed. Leave the sinks if they’ll slow you.+ In the corner of his vision, a new marker appeared. A line of text expanded across it, forming the words “exfil.” It strayed a good hundred feet down the street and a level below.
REND CAPACITY: 39%
Avo growled. He had this. He didn’t need to lift. All he needed to do was pull.
Guarding himself against the pain, he fired his Celerostylus again. His senses felt like they were on fire. His skull thundered as a headache spread from the stem. He didn’t need reflexes this time, but acceleration. Something to make up for his lacking strength.
Latching onto each severed compartment, he pulled. The ground sparked. Blood and bodies oiled the groaning path of his Rendsinks as he constructed lashes to pull and augmented legs to push. With each surge, his Rend filled and his nerves crackled with torment. But by the limits of his flesh, he drew his prizes over the slope and let them slide.
Smears of blood ran behind. They slide outward. Avo quelled his reflexes and barked a laugh. A laugh that turned into a choked gasp as their continuing momentum tore him from his feet.
REND CAPACITY: 49%
Tumbling out into the street, Avo groaned and tried to right himself. Faintly, he watched the exfil marker approaching. Overhead, the hovering form of a fifty feet long garbage barge passed over, its six propulsors left at minimum thrust, its underside opening as it descended.
+Brace for grav-pull,+ Draus said.
+Grav-pull?+
A sudden weightlessness snatched Avo from the ground as the insides of the garbage barge shone, grav-projectors coming alight. With the Rendsinks in tow, he floated for but a moment, and then fell back down, slamming against a cold metal surface with a grunt just as the doors closed.
+Got the sinks,+ he said. Faintly, he heard a legion of wailing engines approaching. They were growing by the second. +Company?+
+Yup,+ Draus said. +Later than I expected.+ The barge lifted hard, engines blasting in a loud scream. Gravity pulled hard on Avo again, his insides feeling as if they were being drawn through his back with a string. +I think we’re gonna have to work on your arithmetic there, Avo. Hangin’ round them Necros might’ve put you through fancy word-school but it clearly ain’t done shit for your math.+
He shook his head and chuffed. +When’d you get this aero?+
+Yesterday,+ Draus said. +Had it followin’ us around. About five hundred feet distance increments.+
+Really like using garbage trucks, don’t you?+
+Well, it’s the right tool for the job, ain’t it? What else are you supposed to use to pick up trash?+


Avo’s felt an involuntary growl coming on. The beast coiled, incensed. With a thought, he reactivated his Morality Injector. The coming rage shattered against a flood of counter-memories. Across the session, he could feel Draus smiling.
+Feelin’ sensitive?+
+Just drive.+
The ugly truth of it is that none of us are in any condition for a new war. Not yet. Hence, we trade--we make nice with those we deem lesser rivals to find better angles. Angles with purchase. Angles that will let us better strike at the opposition when the war starts anew.
For now, that means we keep to our peace with the No-Dragons. That means we continue our trade with Sanctus--but watch for their Void-based operations still. Should those mad fools expand another stretch of the Sunderwilds, hire a third party to deal with it.
Some enterprising Fallwalker perhaps. Anyone desperate enough to disrupt things.
Our enemy--above all others--has and will always be Ori-Thaum.
Until they are dealt with, our path to true Usurpation will remain denied...
-Authority Uthred Greatling
7-1
Alignment of Interest
It was on their return to the Second Fortune that Avo and Draus discovered that the Guilds sealed Layers One and Two.
They had just switched aeros, leaving the barge behind the gutter and leaving in a cargo truck, when Layer One sealed behind them. Above, Layer Two followed immediately after. Between the hexagonal gulfs that allowed air traffic to flow, a series of tears opened up. All that passed through their thresholds found themselves in a spatial loop. Those that descended arrived at the top, diving down through an open gateway leading out the bottom of Layer Two. The opposite was true as well for those ascending.
Near to these Heavens, Avo felt his Soul resonate with their rippling warmth. It was like he was an island unto himself, and beyond the borders where his subreality still bore the likeness of shape, he could sense another Heaven spearing itself into the guts of existence, looping around itself as two points in space became one.
Trapped in the Spine of the Warrens, the holographic sky froze, the flow of clouds shredding away into splashes of code. Over the spectral shine of the sun, large bracketed letters fused into shape.
“OUTBREAK,” it said.
Moments later, the emergency broadcast followed. Dormant ghosts flooded out from every loci, every corner, delivering directions to the uncounted masses at the pace of an instant.
+ATTENTION: THIS IS A PUBLIC SERVICE BROADCAST: WOMBRASH OUTBREAK DETECTED IN SOVEREIGNTY - YUULDEN-YANG. PLEASE SEEK SHELTER AND REFRAIN FROM ACCESSING THE NETHER FOR (1) DAY(S). ADJUST VISUAL AND AUDITORY FILTERS TO MAXIMUM SETTINGS IF POSSIBLE.+
Draus frowned. Avo watched a shiver interrupt the flow of her mind's accretion. "Ah, hells. Been some time since the last one.” Waving her hand, she expanded the visual feed playing across the screens of their vehicle. They were lucky. DeepNav displayed minimal traffic clogging the lanes ahead.
The air was infused with a lethargic blue, the color bled from a large advertisement for Sapphire Ocean. Some new salt-tasting perfume made by one of the No-Dragon subsidiaries, if its ghosts were anything to go by. Enshadowed in his coronal shine, distant aeros were as if fish swimming deeper down into muddy waters.
"Expected more outbreaks," Avo said.
She shook her head. "You got any clue how many died durin' the first down here? Before the colors managed to get their asses out of their heads and started bombing everyone with censors?"
"Know they stopped counting after five billion," he replied. The Regular shot him a look of muted surprise. "Operation too large. Logistical needs too high. Bigger means more leaks. Wasn't hard to dive deep."
"Still. Awfully risky to go peekin' at Guilder biz then," Draus replied. “Besides, Ori-Thaum was in the mix. Thought you didn’t tangle with their like.”
Avo turned to glare at her. "My father was dying. Dangerous didn't matter. Was looking for a cure."
To that, she offered only silence.
The skies over Mazza’s Junction were sparser than normal. Their drones were still bringing in new scans daily. Draus had cycled one out with a replacement after a traffic accident. As Conflux went, however, they held to a state of incompetent readiness. There were still gaps all over their defenses, and they set about ensuring their own safety by bunching up in numbers.
The weight of enforcers swelled within the block, with enforcers littering the district in unorganized detachments, each given tasks and delivered out into the wider Warrens. Some saw to patrols. Others went to guard convoys of stolen product–merchandise that only the Syndicates could produce thanks to stolen or expired property licenses.
From what could be heard over the Nether, more than a few Conflux deliveries got hit by unknown parties. All members missing. Like something swallowed them up and left nothing behind.
The Scalpers might’ve already responded. The descriptions of the attack sounded close enough to how a Galeslither might operate. If such was the case, then Avo looked forward to the apex of the war, when everything was pushed beyond the point of skirmishing.
Chaos presented so many delectable targets to feed from–targets that just wouldn’t be as vulnerable when on guard during times of relative calm.
“By the by, you wanna tell me ‘bout that thing that yelled at you back there?” Draus said, her question flicking out at him with all the rudeness of a switchblade.
“What thing?”

“The voice, Avo,” Draus said. “The deep rumbling. Shit. Is your Meta fraggin’? It sounded like something screaming from inside your skull. Made my teeth rattle. What this about it wanting to be ‘whole,’ too?”
Quietly, he shrugged. “Don’t know. Think it's coming from the Frame. The Heaven. Started… speaking. Does it every time I eat another Sangeist.”

The Regular exhaled. “Ain’t gonna lie: that Frame of yours is startin’ to tickle me wrong. Best have Kae take a look at that. No sense in lettin’ it get worse, yeah?”

“Yeah,” Avo said. “Need her to help with new canons anyway.”

Draus shot a look over her shoulder. The passenger section of the cargo aero was connected to a narrow pathway. In the back, the Rendsinks were secured. “You know somethin’? Hitting a knot? Droppin’ golems? That’s a job for a specialized kill team. At the least. Would’ve taken a dozen or more squires to pull off that run there. And even then, there would be fuck-ups; deaths.”

Avo grunted. “Telling me that we make a good team?”
“I’m tellin’ you to keep track of… just what you are,” Draus said. “You’re different, Avo. For a ghoul, and for a Necro. But bein’ a Godclad… it drowns people. Makes it hard for them to tell where they begin and their Heavens end. Back there, when you turned off your Injector–”

“--Still worried I’ll go feral?”

She shook her head. “No. I’ve seen your make. You held in the gutters, I knew you’d hold here. But I didn’t like what I felt after.”
“After what?”
“After you turned the Injector back on,” Draus said. “That… hunger inside you? Felt that go away. But the want for the killin’ stayed. Like you had a want for it beyond just the pleasure now, and you d–” A flash of light suddenly manifested from their left. Her head snapped toward the distortion, the external sensors of their vehicle sending out warnings as the visual feed glitched.
Whatever words Avo desired passed into a place forgotten. What need for speech when spectacle consumed the totality of his attention? Through the feed, it looked like brightness itself was being shaped into form. Forged from the ambient lights that lined the expanse of countless districts, an abnormal growth came into form. Capped by an expanding umbrella formed from rungs of growing luminosity, strands of light sprouted free from below in mycelial growths. The entire thing resembled a fungus comprised of pooled radiance.
When next he blinked, the construct had already expanded. Each strand threaded through walls and blocks, snaking through sidewalks and deeper down into the gutters unseen. Each ran miles upon miles in length, and undulating beneath the glowing shroom cap, they expanded, unfurling into illimitable multitudes.
Scalpeling was always a wonder to behold. Avo had only seen it done twice before, and even now he remained silent. Yet, the past two times, the quiet earned from him was one of incomprehension and dread.
Now? It was for want and future possibility. How else was he to regard a power he could possess?
He knew that, with each shifting thread of light, thousands or even millions were dying. Death at a scale that he could not fathom at present, but felt curious to experience, wondering just how bright his Soul would burn if offered such tithe. The beast, meanwhile, was quiet at the provocation. But just as well. Its desires were primal. Focused. Simple.
What were a thousand lives extinguished? Or a million? Ultimately, it meant the same thing: more beings to torture and taste. More than he could comprehend.
The flowing light halted. The rings of light upon the cap inverted, its core growing brightest as the shine bled over from the outside. Its limbs retracted. Along branch-like lengths, mile-long skewers of unmoving bodies were rendered kindling as the core of the mushroom suckled them in.
In seconds, the bodies slipped into the light, going from smoking flesh, to shadow, and then dissipating motes.
“How many did it get,” Avo asked.
Draus, much like him, found herself enraptured. Upon her face was not wonderment, but exhaustion. Tired anger. “Does it matter? Only ones they really use it on are the FATELESS anyhow. Do they matter?”

Before the last word left her lips, the light faded. And so too did all those consumed. “Their deaths matter.”

Draus nodded. “Yeah. That I reckon might be so.” She titled her head at the place where the eldritch light used to shine. “When I first saw that, I used to ask myself why they don’t just… empty the streets of filth. End the Syndicates. It ain’t like they don’t got the power. They do. They just don’t care. Not one bit.
“How much death do you think it’ll take to see their desired end? Got me a thought ‘bout that, Avo?”

He considered the question for a moment. “As much as it will take.”

She nodded. “Yeah. But I don’t think so. I think the answer isn’t how many deaths. I think the answer is ‘forever'. Because they’ll need people dyin’ forever to see it made true, made bigger, made stranger. Bigger the candle, the more wick that needs to burn.”

“Never took you for a humanitarian,” Avo asked.

Draus scoffed. “I don’t give a shit in that way. But. It’s just… we could’ve made it all mean somethin’, you know? We come a long way from bein’ just slaves.” She shook her head. “Shame to just fuck ourselves to death here is all. Could’ve proven ourselves better than the gods. ‘Cept I guess it felt better bein’ them.”

Her eyes met his. Her stares were as hard to read as ever. “Just try to stay you, alright?”

That request drove a light chuff of laughter from his chest. “First time anyone asked that of me.”

“Virtue is a hard thing to have, Avo,” she said. “And it's mighty strange to find it bein’ practiced by a subhuman cannibal.”

“Touching words. I feel a tear. More compliments mixed with invectives. My favorite.”

She bit back a smile and glared at him from the corner of her eye. “Just don’t go drowning in godhood is what I’m sayin’. You’ll get lost.”

He thought about her words for a moment. He heard them. Understood them. But against the possibilities posed by his new abilities, they were like etchings upon a missile. He knew what she was asking, but not if he could achieve it.
He wanted more power. Probably always did. The only difference now was that he was capable of taking it.
The newest question he had for himself was simple: should a ghoul be granted the power to change, to grow, to feed unfettered, would it ascend past its desires into the fullness of personhood, or simply make up for the lack of its long-dead masters and finish making itself the apex predator it was dreamed to be?
In the quiet that followed, Avo contemplated his future beyond the Warrens.
No clear answers came.
***

They deposited the cargo aero and the container in Xin Yunshan’s docks. Aside from a few drones surveilling the area, the shine of thoughtstuff was noticeably absent; people were likely at home, awaiting the official end to the lockdown.
Still, though eyes were scarce, there were more ways than one to track a person in New Vultun. They held to precaution, with Avo leaving first and Draus taking another path after. Empty streets greeted him. Aside from lonesome bioforms standing as unmoving sentinels on rooftops and grafted eyes blinking at him from flesh-hewn walls, he dared say he walked unnoticed to the entirety of the city.
Should he get the chance, he should dig around and see if any street squires were looking to trade out their phantasmics. The sequence of an Incog remained much a mystery to him as until this point in his life, he didn’t often find the need to blunt his noticeability with a sheen of slickness. Perhaps with time, he could have teased it out, but it would be far more convenient if he just traded for some.
The Second Fortune was alight with sound and fireworks with his arrival. Entering through the front door, he passed Sang whirling faux dragons made from painted papers on pointed spears. The self-eating serpentine bodies of the Sang’s old oppressors danced through the air as juvs cheered and phantoms played bygone massacres overhead.
The jubilance never got higher than when the first No-Dragons began bombing the undersea nests of their ancient foes. Fascinating how tightly the bonds of a community could be forged from old wounds and present hatred.
Inching through the crowds packing the halls and entrances, the return toward his abode was thankfully empty of impediments or people waiting to ambush him with more untimely revelations.

One of his fangs ached. He might need to pluck it. He stretched and felt his back crack.
It would be good to get some personal work done. See about his Soul with Kae. Look deeper at the structure of his own Meta in the meantime.
As stepped out onto his floor and turned down the halls toward the apartment, he found Draus ahead of him.

Avo frowned. “How?”

Without looking, she lifted a steamed bun over her shoulder. He kept frowning because he could practically taste her grin. “‘Cause, you’re slow, ghoulie. Maybe try movin’ your legs faster next time.”

He envied how she could go from asking him to restrain himself from being consumed by apotheosis and then insulting his walking speed in the span of mere hours.
The following verbal jab he was about her hurl back at her choked off as he noticed something out of place.
There were two accretions coming from inside their room. One was burning, breaking. Never intact. Kae. The other was well-warded. Protected.
Avo frowned. He had seen those defenses before.

“River,” Avo said.

Draus turned. “You sure.”

“Wards. Should be hers.”

Reluctantly, Draus unclenched her fists. “Alright. Let’s go see what she’s got to say.”

Avo sighed. “Probably something cryptic. Lots of politeness. Not enough detail.”
Draus scoffed. “Shit, Avo, save some suspense.”

The smell of green tea slithered up Avo’s senses as he entered the room. Around the entertainment system, Kae and Green River sat side by side. A small tea set was laid on the table before them. Four cups were laid out, each steaming with hot tea and marked by specific patterns.
Kae waved as she saw them, sipping from her fissure-painted cup. Green River’s, then, held the design of a fox. The remaining two were parted between a Highflame symbol, and one that remained entirely blank.
Avo’s clicked his fangs together. The Sang loved their analogies. He wondered what Green River meant when she was calling him empty.
“Friends. Come. Come sit down,” Green River said. On her neck, the fox yawned and stretched. “I was just talking with Kae about proper spying etiquette. And a fascinating new change of fortune for us all.”

“Change of fortune?” Avo asked.
“Indeed,” she said, smiling beatifically. In a graceful sway, she produced a dormant locus and placed it beside the tea set. “Our mutual benefactors have spoken once more.” She leaned in. “And their new interests pertain to our good friend. Jhred Greatling. Or Mirrorhead, if we’re going by play-names.”

Avo and Draus shared a look.
“Suppose we’ll be havin’ this over tea, then?” Draus said.
Green River sighed. “Blame me not. I can be ignored for as long as I am unbothered. The Column, however, will not be denied.” Her eyes turned to Avo by the way. “And they aren’t nearly as omniscient as you so suspect. But I get ahead of myself. Your tea. It’s getting cold.”
Avo activated his Auto-Seance and started a session. +Draus?+
+Yeah.+
+You talk to her. Tired of being confused. Just want to eat her.+
"The Column contacted me. It seems you have not been entirely truthful, Walton.
What audacity, to steal from the Guilds, then from the Column itself.
All to ensure that your... creature is made greater than its meager sum.
I am not beyond my means, old friend. You forget yourself. I was once of the Tiers too. Long before my mistake. Long before my exile. Did you truly think you could hide what you have done from me? Or mask your wants beneath the objectives of the Column?
I must confess, I am no daughter of deceit like some of my sisters. My vice is born of purity: I simply want to feed the latent joy in the hearts of others.
But you know this. If not for the fact they took my joy and exiled me to this place, I would not be so easily bent to your designs, would I?
Dishonesty wounds me so. And you, Walton--Strix--seem to have been lying to me.
Our benefactors contacted me the other day. And I also spoke to your monster. You are playing a dangerous game--a parasite drinking from the veins of a hidden rebellion.
I trust that you understand what is coming for you. Zein will never forgive you for this. That Frame should have never been burned into the ghoul; you spoiled good poetry. That was for the Old Woman to take, to feed her spite, to serve as an insult toward her daughter, and provoke further folly from Highflame.
Instead, you substituted her plot for your personal vengeance. The audacity. The sheer fucking madness.
I respect this. But you know that this will cost you. Brutally. Perhaps she will offer mercy for all that you have provided. But she will exact pain from you.
But do it still you must, I suppose. Perhaps you think she will pity you. Come to see your transgression as symmetry to hers, that you are two beings of shared pain.
To see you two at such odds.
How displeased Jaus must be.
There she is, trying to avenge a long-dead lover and a dream that was never to be, seeking the death of her own flesh and blood.
And there you are, seeking vengeance for a nation long dead, using a living instrument that you've grown to see as a son.
Let me continue with my honesty, impolite though it might be.
Pitiful.
I find both of you pitiful.
I find the fact that I need the Ninth Column to make even my elder sister's trespass against me pitiful.
All of us are pitiful.
All except the creature. The ghoul. By Jaus, what have you done with it? With him?
He is beautifully at war with himself. His stalemate is uncanny; I cannot help but find myself interested. No other moves and thinks as he does. His wardwork, a reflection of yours.
Tell me, did you remake him? Change his ontology or biology? Or did you merely tease out the full potential dormant in the design of a half-finished weapon created by your former companions?"
No matter. They will learn what you have done soon enough. Too late for them, I suppose. They will have to make do with your ghoul. But such is what you wanted, is it not? The fact that their precious weapon is now bound to someone only you can influence.
Hah. We play games within games. Players and pawns both.
But the ghoul means more to you than that. Does he not?"
-An instance of "Green River" communicating with "Walton", Ninth Column
7-2
Honesty
Avo had expected silence to be the order of things as he found his seat.
In the dip leading down from steps around the entertainment system, they each found their place, Draus and he struggling to create ample space between one another.
Across from them, Kae's eyes darted between Green River and her tea, her expression stiff with bottled anxiety. The Sang, contrarily, sat supping her steeped tea without strain. Coiled across her neck, the fox grinned at Avo, the glint in its eyes like dying embers, shifting from hue to hue.
"I must start with a confession," Green River said, voice coming clear as if a blade oiled by tea, "I did not trust you." Her words were directed at Avo. Only Avo. She regarded Draus no more than a momentary glance. "Not enough to engage with you with the honesty befitting a host to her guest. For that, I apologize."
Avo bit back a growl. Draus sighed. Green River spat words like bricks and laid labyrinths of confusion in her wake. This time felt no different.
"River," Draus said, her voice taut with weariness as well, "look, the Ninth Column business? That shit? If you're gonna take us round and round down the spiral of fancy nothings, let's just have tea instead. Enjoy the silence. Stare at the fishes on the ceiling."
A flash of offense crossed over Green River's face. The fox whined. "You think so lowly of me, captain."
"Got nothin' to do with low, got everything to do with you speakin' a whole damn lot and ultimately sayin' nothin'." Draus threw back her tea like she was taking a shot. "Listen, I don't doubt you'll be sellin' us to no Guild or two-bit Syndicate, but we know each other. Your life in the past? I know that shit don't go away so easy, so I never dug further than you asked me to. Too much trouble, not much point. And frankly, up till now, we've kept business between us nice and tidy."
"Ah," Green River replied. "But it cannot be so this time." Again, she looked upon Avo. "Your father. He has not contacted you at all since your... ignition, has he?"
His reply came as a terse silence. He despised her neck. The look of it. The joinery between nu-fox and skin. Muted beneath a flow of suppressive thoughts, his beast was braying for him to do something unspeakably violent. There wasn't the need. He was tempted by the annoyance she inspired alone.
He had not touched his tea yet. He probably wasn't going to at all.
Sighing like a mother faced with an unruly child, Green River tilted her head and spoke to Kae. "Is he always this taciturn?"
It took Kae a second to register the question. "N-no. I thi--think it... uh... just might be that he does--doesn't like you."
"Oh," Green River said, humming a low note. It sounded something between a laugh and a sound of surprise. "I suppose I can engender that effect in some."
"Tired," Avo said. The Sang turned to him, her lips curving up in a smile, glad to finally be addressed. "You prevaricate. Hide details. Push. Pull. Try to get me to respond. Playing with me."
"Yes." Green River leaned back into her chair. "I deny this not. I was playing with you. For I wanted to see if anything would slip from you. As spoken, I did not trust you. I feared you knew more--was offered more--knowledge than you should have by your father. That you were being used against me somehow. But now, things have become clearer to me."
She leaned in, the eyes on her human face more predatory than her fox. "The Column is quite upset with your father, in fact. For someone so dead, he seems to be ever so competent at earning the ire of many of his so-called allies. And you, unfortunately, have been cast onto the board of this great game in place of another. That Frame was never meant to be yours. But I suppose you knew this, in your heart of hearts. And so..."
She made a gesture, her fingers twirling into an operatic hand sign as if spurring Avo toward his own conclusion.
One that he didn't want to lend words to.
"Walton got me the Frame?" Avo asked
Green River's mouth flattened into an inscrutable smile. "He did much worse than that. From what the Column has offered as fact, he betrayed his cell to the Guilds, burning their identities and positions. He used their lives as flares to draw away the behemoths. Just long enough to bind the cybernetics of divinity into an impure vessel. An impure vessel he thought lost to him after the Ninth Column attempted to... reseize their missing package."
She pushed the locus forward.
"You will ask for proof. I will leave this here. Examine it now. Later. When you so choose. You will come and see that I am not lying. The ghosts within hold contents of memory. Of your interrogation at the hands of a Ninth Column cell. And subsequent disposal over the Maw. You will also come and find that another of your suspicions was correct. Your father did have a backdoor into your mind. The memories of a subversive session are hidden there. Doubtlessly made using another one of the Strix's encoded memories." She paused. "Something he did not share with the Column. Hence our mutual distrust. I knew you were Walton's instrument. I just was unsure how much of one..."
At Green River's provocations, Avo gave away nothing. Confusion ruled the realm of his thoughts more than any other emotion. His father was still active. Such was how it sounded. But how. He watched the man die. Settled the last rites and affairs of the man himself. But even if such were true, why did Walton want this? Just to hurt the Guilds?
Then, through the chasm of his roiling mind boomed the voice of another. From within, Avo heard his blood rumble and speak.
"THIS MORTAL KNOWS NOT HER PLACE!" An outline of flowing red spread across Green River's form. He could tear all the flowing life essence from her with but a touch; fuse her ichor solid; make sculptures within the softness of her insides.
Avo's Sangeist--his Heaven of Blood--whispered from the depths of his Soul. Its desires were chained to his, its powers, still, his to command. Yet, he could ignore the growing consciousness in the Heaven no longer.
Was it aware of him, as he was of it?
His thoughts then remained unanswered. The voice faded. The presence of his Heaven stayed.
Draus was right. He needed to talk with Kae after this was done.
Green River shrugged. "Nonetheless, it seems that more than pawn in this wayward game of ours, your father has sought to ensure your position as a wildcard. Doubtless, the Column would prefer it otherwise, but with the Frame burned into your being... I suppose their hand is forced, and they must accept you as an essential asset for now, just as he so hoped."
"Have you seen him?" Avo asked. "He spoke to you?"
"Your father?" Green River said. A new expression poured across her face as she tilted her head, examining him. "How little you must know of his true nature to ask such a question?"
Avo growled. But before he could speak, Draus cut in first.
"River," Draus said. "Answers. Give... fuckin' answers. He ain't the only one tired of cryptic bullshit. I'm at my end as well. So you start tellin' us just what the hells is goin' on, who's doin' what, and everythin' else that pertains to any pertaining."
Heeding the Regular's words, the Sang plucked a pot filled with tea and refilled her cup. "Which beginning should I start at? The one that matters most to you? To the Column? To our Agnos? Or the ghoul made godling?"
"I don't know," Draus said, shaking her head, "the Column. They keep popping into this mess and so far, I ain't got no understandin' of what they're for or what they're about."
Green River smiled. "Then their Heaven remains a step ahead." She took a drink. And then set about refilling Draus' cup as well. "Theirs is a sordid business. Once to ensure the Guilds remained balanced. Policed internally. Checked by a hidden force enforcing unseen guardrails."
"So," Draus said. "They're like Incubi-Paladins?"
"Hardly," Green River said. "Paladins have no power over the Guilds themselves. You ask why no one has discovered Ninth Column. Because they are not an institution, but a collective for a common interest. Cells within cells. People manipulated to serve a plot of a greater design, playing to the whims of a single individual.
Draus sighed. "Let me guess. Jaus is alive? Pullin' our strings from the Nether?"
Green River's placid smile turned into a grin. "The wrong member of the couple. Zein Thousandhand. And he," she pointed at Avo, "has something that belongs to the Old Woman. Something she stole to spite her own daughter."
At the mention of Zein Thousandhand's name, a heavy silence settled upon the room.
"Ah, fuck," Draus muttered.
Avo understood. The sudden pallor growing over Kae's face showed that she was well aware of the implications as well.
Zein O'yaje. Zein Thousandhand. Zein, the Blade of Recursion. Zein, the Last Champion of the Ori. Zein, the Godslayer.
Zein, lover of Jaus Avandaer; mother to Veylis Avandaer, current High Seraph of Highflame.
The strangest thing about Zein was, that much like Walton, she was supposed to be dead. Dead alongside Jaus. Dead like him at the hands of her daughter, another casualty at the Betrayal of Ao.
The streams were banned. The vicarities were ordered to be scrubbed from the Nether. Few recordings remained of the Conference of Ao. Much the same could be said for the city itself.
All that the Guilds agreed on in the aftermath was that there was a betrayal. But as for who betrayed whom? Such a question remains unanswered even till the present.
All people truly knew about the incident was that, by the end of the affair, Jaus Avandaer was dead at the hands of his own daughter, that the Guilds he struggled so hard to keep at peace were shattered into another bout of war, and that his first wife had drawn blade against her flesh and blood.
And for the first time in her life, found her skills wanting against another.
"Ain't she supposed to be... dead?" Draus asked.
"Perhaps," Green River replied. "But as our ghoul can attest, the grip of death is slacker on some. Or it might be a smokescreen, and someone else is invoking her presence as a shield for their operations. It matters not. 'Zein' will want to see you, Avo. See what's become of her prize."
"Extract from me?"
Green River nodded. "Of course. It is what I would do. You are... novel, amongst your kind. But you are no trained Godclad. The power you wield does not belong to you--"
"No." Avo cut her off. He poured his tea onto the table. "Wrong."
The Sang's mouth opened and closed. "I am sorry?"
"Belong," Avo said. "No such thing as 'belong.' I have it. Won't surrender it. They can have it by my death. Only my death. As it goes."
"Ah," Green River said, comprehending his interruption. "I understand. It is hard to surrender choice when you have it, is it not." Her lip twitched, moving the smallest of inches in the briefest of seconds. Her mind spun with the same acceleration as Draus' when she was enraged. "To lose a Frame is... like having color carved from your comprehension. I cannot fault your desire to keep your power."
With a wave of her hand, the locus came alight beneath her fingers. Ghosts rose into the air, altering themselves to become phantoms. "Still, as things remain, the Column has not stripped you of the Mirrorhead operation. Which means they see use in you. A limited trust, even after what your father has done." She looked at Draus. "Or former allegiances."
"Operation," Draus said, eyes narrowing. "What's their want with Jhred Greatling?"
Green River smiled. "To see him ignite hostilities between Stormtree and Highflame again, of course. War needs a reason, does it not?"
"To want is to war."
-Zein O'yaje, Thousandhand, Ch. 1
7-3
Want
Draus narrowed her eyes at the Sang. From her mind, naked suspicion suffused the atmosphere with a discomforting weight. Avo coaxed his Heaven and made ready. The nature of the Regular was more will than emotion; her actions came swifter than thought, compelled to move by sharpened instinct, her celerity unchained from hesitation.
With Draus, a thing could be a conversation in one heartbeat and a massacre in the next. Envy became Avo. How blessed she was to be able to indulge in violence and humanity without obvious strain. Therein was the difference between them he supposed: she was made to be a human weapon.
He, meanwhile, was a beast of baser make.
“River,” Draus began, her voice low and even, “you spittin’ wind at me? Highflame and Stormtree got bled pretty good in the last one. We ain’t even two decades out from that great shared maulin’ of ours. Don’t none of the colors got a want for more hurt, even if some fools inside them want to see things done.”
“You doubt the Column’s wants?” Green River asked, her coquettish play at mock offense doing little more than making the Regular’s nostrils flare.
“Been doubtin’ a plenty of shit recently,” Draus said.
Green River leaned back and let the quiet drag for a beat. In silence, she studied her own reflection in the tea before as if trying to divine the right words. Then, her head rose, eyes drifting to study her warring schools of fishes, hunting, feeding, dying in an eternal cycle. She gestured upward, fingers pulling at invisible threads, trying to direct them to look upward.
“This was made to serve as something of… theater,” she began.
Overhead, two schools of fish emerged, as if answering her beckoning. Each fish came in colors of eight. With a mauve manta swimming above them, holding in place to see things done.
At the head of one school, a massive, winged gold-scaled brute of a shark bent the currents with its passing. Flanking it trailed two others: one a biomechanical eel with circuitry that flashed bright red, and the other something inexpressible in form, its insides and outsides shifting like flesh in flux.
Across the way, four adversaries dove out to meet them. The formation of the opposition held different. Twelve piranhas grafted into the tentacles of a silvery octopoid lingered behind its three allies, its limbs open wide like a curved cage. To its front were a green spear-headed serpent and a blue sheen of translucent with a dozen open mouths on its bottom. Behind, a large interconnected hive of worms expanded, more lattice than anything else.
Before the eyes of those below, the factions clashed and havoc was joined. Plumes of ink and ichor spilled free as the veins above grew thick and impenetrable to the gaze, polluted by opacity.
Most looking upon the carnage turned away then. Avo’s gaze, however, ran deeper than the limits of the material now. So close to the action, he could practically feel the ongoing dance happening above. All that was blood came alight before his sight.
He studied the battle that followed, watching as each bioform fell upon each other–even those they were supposed to be allied with–in a hurricane of opportunistic bloodshed.
It took him considerable effort to stifle a laugh.
Green River must’ve thought herself so smart, so pretentiously artistic if this was how she thought to make her point.
To add further spice to his amusement, it struck him that she was fighting for the wrong point.
“The fish,” Avo said. “Colors represent the Guilds?”
“Metaphors, yes,” Green River continued. She turned to Avo. “I think you, for what you are, might appreciate the full picture of the unfolding conflict. That creatures that dream of feeding will always seek to accomplish their design, and not see the true borders of their cage, and think only to further feed their own desire than altering the cage itself to keep them sated.
“A good thing, I think. A very, very good thing. The fish, fight, bleed, eat, kill, breed, and continue because they are designed so. They are ignorant of any manner of gnosis or possibility. To them, we may as well be the gods. Unfathomable. Eldritch. The ones that can alter nature to fit their own design.”
“River,” Draus said, “what are you on–”
The fox snarled. But the sound that came from the grafted creature was infinitely deeper than what belonged in the small vulpine’s throat. Green River herself merely held up a hand. Above, movements went unseen in swirls of hues, the gore of the various fishes suffusing the veins with color-heterogeneity. “Let me finish. Please.”
Draus clenched and unclenched her fists. She gave a curt nod.
“Our great powers, in a sense, are quite like these fish,” Green River said. “Even quite like you, I daresay. Grotesque and subhuman as you are. For you know your wants so well. And as you said, you would die before you betrayed your power; gave it away.” Her lip betrayed the ghost of a quiver. “Tell me, Avo. Why are the Guilds at war with one another?”
“For the dream,” Avo replied. His voice was thick with weariness. He knew where she was leading him with this. It was a waste of time. Other, more personal questions burned inside him. Draus had humored the Sang, but his patience was growing thin.
Green River smiled at his disgust. She laughed. “The dream. The dream. The dream. But alas, Jaus is dead. And there was never only truly just one dream, was there?”
“You're wrong,” Avo said, unwilling to waste time debating philosophy. He looked up again and scoffed. All the fish were dead. Even the purple manta representing Voidwatch had come apart in the crossfire. “And you’re wrong. You want to say that all Guilds fight for what they believe. To reshape existence for what they believe. That these are different dreams. No. This is a lie. There remains only one dream.”
For the first time, he watched her lips open, halt, and melt into a frown. The fox lifted its head, curious about his coming words. “Their utopias are vast and parted. You cannot seriously claim that their imagined realities are so similar as to not matter.”
“No,” Avo replied. “Their imagined realities themselves don’t matter. That’s not the dream. That’s like their colors. Aesthetic.” He pointed up. The flow of the aquarium was clearing. Only gore-flensed pieces remained of the two schools. “You grew the bioforms differently. Gave them different designs. Guilder colors. Want to show us the end. When the murk drains away. Show us that all are dead. Tell us that all the creatures betrayed each other. Because there’s only one utopia. One dream. One Heaven to rule one aspect of one domain.”
Avo lifted the helmet from his head and let it clatter so as to better cast his scorn upon the Sang for these constant prevarications. The woman was just terminally unable to get to the godsdamned point.
“Your show is aesthetic. Your metaphor is all aesthetic. The Guilds are wrapped in aesthetic. Done enough dives in the Tiers. Seen enough of internal subversion. External sabotage. War with allies. War with enemies. People and why change each time. Only one thing remains the same. The dream. The true dream. Only tasted it recently. Only knew it in theory before. But it’s only material if you’re a Godclad.”
“What do you think the true dream is?” Green River asked, swallowing.
“Control,” Avo said. “The dream is control. With Jaus. With the Guilds. With Fallwalkers.” He paused. “With me.” He could feel Draus’ eyes on him without looking. “And right now, I’m going to control this conversation so you can finish explaining what the Column wants with Mirrorhead. Jhred. Do not divert again. Or I will find a metaphor. Will carve the shape of a fish from your corpse. Something about how seafood and human flesh are both good for my hunger.”
Kae frowned. “B-but that sounds… sounds more like a co-uh-comparison than… than a metaphor.”
Avo drew in a long breath, the wind whistling between his fangs as he centered himself. He needed the Agnos. She was essential for his needs. If he had to hurt someone, Green River was right there. “Kae. Not now.”
It took a moment for Kae to notice his annoyance. She wilted in far less time. “Oh. So-sorry.”
Reaching over the table, Avo ignored his own teacup and opted to seize the entire pot instead. With a twist, he popped the lid off, plundered the tea leaves from their holder, and began to chew. “Start talking about Mirrorhead. What does the Column want with him? Why? What’s it have to do with Stormtree? No more history lessons. Tired. Too annoyed. Want to wear your face.”
A heavy hand was laid upon his shoulder. Iron fingers dug into his skin. Draus. He didn’t look at her.
“My Injector’s fine,” he said, pre-emptively. His beast wasn’t hungry, but he was aggravated.
It already strained his considerable self-control trying to not think of how his father might’ve been a Low Master. Too much was at odds there. He wouldn’t think about that until he found Walton–whatever Walton existed as right now, and made certain himself.
Beneath his glare, both Sang and fox blinked, more fascinated by his growing ire than terrified. “Apologies. I was distracted… by a need to tease with knowledge. A bad habit from my past. Let us be more… attuned to the task at hand.”
Her thoughts spewed phantoms from the gates of her mind. The faint wisping apparitions blended then into eight symbols, painted with eight referential colors.
The first that caught Avo’s eye was Highflame–a burning flame graced with a dozen open wings. Across from it, the sigil of the panopticon rose, a crown made of burning eyes, each watching each, the visual motif matching the governing words of Ori-Thaum’s ethos.
“All will be revealed.”
“There cannot be Ori-Thaum and Highflame,” Green River said, her finger drawing a line between the symbols of the two Guilds. “Not so long as the former seeks to create an absolute republic for those it can. Not so long as it seeks to strip the reins of godhood from any single individual and spread the power amongst their polis. To conjoin the collective and the people, if you will.”
Draus snorted. “Yeah. That’s what they want. They spit a good line or two, but if you’ve spent any time in their rat-nest districts, you’ll learn a thing or two about these ‘republics’ they wanna build. Been playin’ real loose with the definition, seein’ how they’re running under a Council of Elders and Mirrors. Folks with all the moral authority and no real oversight from below.” She spat into the tea. “You see that crown and you heed it right, Avo: that shit’s just for show. Them eyes are pointed outside, because it’s their party, and folk that don’t bend to their thoughts ain’t never gonna be invited. Better left as Soul-feed.”
An expression of pleasure passed over Green River’s face. Avo had the feeling that she quite liked provoking unwilling admissions from people. A questionable habit in and of itself.
He would need to look into her when he found the moment.
“Be you honest with yourself, Jelene?” Green River said. “You are hardly the most neutral of judges when it comes to the Silvers.”
Draus leaned in, her face sinking into the neon glint of the phantoms. “Highflame burned me. Used me up. Wasted the lives of me and mine and had me slotted for summary execution. You know what happened on that same day while I was stuck in my cage? Ori-Thaum sent me a job offer. Real lucrative. Would see me get placed in their Elysiums, stat, so I could start trainin’ some fresh blood for ‘em. And even with that, it was still easy tellin’ them to fuck themselves. Yeah. I ain’t unbiased. But Ori-Thaum don’t deserve unbiased. Ori-Thaum wants to put a leash on humanity’s neck and make sure we all think, feel, and act as one.” She chuckled. “Dead gods would’ve itched somethin’ bad for that kind of control.”
Across from her, Green River took in the words with her attention rapt. Her mind was spinning, sampling what was spoken as if phantasmic tea. “I know why you judge them in such a manner.” She glanced at Avo again. “A war between absolute stability and individual agency is to be waged here.”
“Still prevaricating,” Avo said. “You said we’re targeting Mirrorhead. Jhred. Trying to start something between Highflame and Stormtree. We’re not fighting Ori-Thaum. Not hurting their interests at all.”
Green River smiled then. She knew something he didn’t. He was growing to hate her for that. She could be as honest as she claimed to be, but so long as she kept withholding knowledge from him, he would always yearn to sink his blood through the floor of her jaws and pry open her throat–
Avo blinked. He checked his Morality Injector.
It was still active. Suppressing the worst of his impulses. In the dungeons of his Metamind, he could hear the beast choking.
But then what was making him want this? What was making him still want to hurt her so?
“Astute you are, ghoul,” Green River said. The fox winked at him. “We are not at war with Ori-Thaum. No, I daresay we are helping them.”
A sharp inhale came from his side. Draus’ heartbeat accelerated.
“As with the fish, presently, the major divide between the Guilds can be parted between those who are Massist and those who are Saintists. Power governed by the collective, with Ori-Thaum, Stormtree, Sanctus, and Ashthrone joined in this shared enterprise. The Saintists, meanwhile, are of the No-Dragons, Omnitech, and Highflame. Such was the case for the Fourth Guild War.”
A new symbol fused between Ori-Thaum and Highflame. The sign of a tree with nine branches cleaved into shape by a bolt of falling lightning. “However, as stated by our dear ghoul, the Guilds will almost certainly fall upon each other in the aftermath of felling their targets of priority. Ninth Column likely has cause to believe that Highflame and Stormtree are improving relations. With a possibility that the latter might just see themselves in a different camp should the next war arise.”
Draus scoffed. “Ain’t no way.”
Green River’s glee brightened. “Why not?”
“Because,” Draus started, “the Chivalrics pushed ‘em into Ori-Thaum’s embrace.” Speaking those words made her lip twitch in disgust. “Ugly as is, that’s the truth of it. We shot 'em in the back for a couple Souls more durin' the last Godhunt. Ain't no sense in it."
“Chivalrics?”
Draus sighed. “You know Highflame ain’t exactly a unified front, yeah? Got our–their own divides?”
Walton might have done a dive or two for an Authority looking for dirt on a rival. Avo was too focused on the craft to pay attention to something as beyond him as politics.
“Well,” Draus continued. “The Chivalrics are the old faction. Leftovers from the surviving knightly orders that turned their banners from gods to Jaus after the ‘Fall.” She shrugged. “In time, they turned tumorous: grew into internal dynasties determined to keep their own power. Spat on the ideals.”
“Blessed be the worthy,” Green River said. Draus turned her baleful glare on the Sang. The latter tilted her head coyly. “Ah. But as you can see, Avo. The former captain has biases within biases.” She grinned at Draus. “It was rank foolishness for a soldier to cast her lot in with the Meritocrats, wasn’t it.”
Draus closed her eyes and sighed. “You believe what you believe, I reckon.”
“That was not an answer–”
“Yes, godsdamn you!”
Green River beamed, overjoyed to provoke such a reaction from Draus. “I apologize again. I have offended you.” Her focus turned to Avo. “She deserved better. But the same can be said for most Regulars and non-Guilder support working under Highflame during those bleak years–”
“Mirrorhead,” Avo said. He was interested in what caused Draus to be exiled from the Tiers. But that was a question more personally acquired than through naked voyeurism. Odder still was how Green River could speak so much without even a threat of violence from the Regular. An imbalance of power remained between them. One that Draus was more reluctant to tread than Green River. It reeked of an owed debt.
“Regardless,” Green River said, “the Chivalrics are looking down the blade tip of their own execution. Through atrocity and naked lust for power, they pushed away a potential ally in the form of Stormtree and crippled the development of everyone not of their lineage. For their defeat in the Fourth Guild War–this failure so naked none could ignore it–Veylis herself has been forced into temporary rulership: A role she is most loathe to assume.”
“Be plain,” Avo said. “What does that mean?”
“It means that she has been purging the Chivalrics slowly over the years,” Green River explained. “Cutting away their bases of power. Forcing some of them into open duels. Choking their finances. And offering the worst offenders to the other Guilds to make examples of as apology gifts.” Green River nodded. “Be it not said that the High Seraph is without honor.
“Nonetheless, the gist is this: with the influence of the Chivalrics fading, Veylis and the Meritocrats seek to make nice with Stormtree with offers of recompense. An act that, if successful, threatens the balance of power in the great Guild equation. But with the eldest son of the Greatling family line–Jhred Greatling, or Mirrorhead of Conflux as he is known to a few–the column seeks to keep the scales evened and the struggle heavy for all to bear.”
Avo grunted. “So. Column wants me to maintain the status quo by… making Scalpers and Conflux fight somehow?”
Green River shook her head. “That would be too simple. No. They want you to ensure his plan is brought to near fruition before he is stopped. Slain.”
“His plan?” Avo asked.
Green River said nothing for a moment. Instead, she pushed forward the locus she laid upon the table earlier. “Here. Take a dive. Have a peek into the mind of your prey-to-be.”
“I should have carved the last memories of your mother from your mind. That was my mistake. Shaming us was yours.”
-Uthred Greatling to his eldest son, Jhred Greatling
7-4
The Deep Bazaar
Trust came hard to a Necro. It was harder still when the person hosting the lobby was enamored with withholding information and playing games. Only a fool dove into waters unfamiliar without protection, but more foolish still was offering an unprotected locus, bereft of any and all things regardable as wards or labyrinths.

He spent time scrying into the internals, prodding and pressing the outside to see how the ghosts would react. Mostly, they responded to his ghosts with supplicative acceptance, made only to answer.


Across the table, Green River was beginning to frown into her tea. “Is this truly necessary? I had better means to trap you. The practice of ghosts is not of my discipline. I would have sought to bind you by means of flesh instead.”

Avo shot her a glare and worked at half his normal pace in response to that. She wasted countless minutes spraying flowery rubble from her lips but found impatience an easy companion upon seeing him commit to basic due diligence? Life must’ve been kind to Green River before her tumble down into the Warrens.
In a lot of ways, it still was.
Half an hour passed before he found himself certain that the locus was safe. Either that, or he was facing a construct that far surpassed his skill caliber to conceptualize.
“It’s safe,” he said, mostly to Draus.
“Nova,” she said. “Gonna take a dip?”

Avo stared at Green River. “You. Go first.”


The Sang sighed. The fox yawned its pearlescent teeth like mirrored stilettos, reflecting the dancing bloom of neon along gleaming needles. “Very well. If such an act will allay your distrust, then may my service ablate your distrust.”

She could have just nodded and done it, but it seemed she had to add a flair of speech to each action she undertook.

It made her reek of politics. Which was perhaps who she was in her life amidst the Tiers. And doubtless what had her cast down from those heights.
Avo had never eaten a politician before.
A coil of phantasmal sequences extended forth, interconnected memories spewing out akin to the lengths of a chain. The link was lowered more than cast into the locus, and it looked as if Green River was fishing rather than bridging her mind.
Ghosts painted mem-data across Avo’s cog-feed. Nothing anomalous greeted him. Stable were the functions of the Sang’s thoughtstuff.
Part of him was disappointed. He had wished this all to be an obvious trap if only to be done with Green River. Nulling her mind and drinking her Essence might spark a violent response from the Column, but the relief of not hearing another lecture would have been worth it.
“Safe and secure,” Green River said. “As you can see. Lest you believe me capable of overcoming you in your preferred environment. And subduing you with such skill that I can still survive the reprisal from Jelene.”

“Always like to make yourself sound like a flat,” Draus said. “Ain’t so. Know you better than that.”

The fox squeaked with laughter at the Regular, blinking demurely as it folded along Green River’s neck. “Ah. But I am the fox in this metaphor. A predator still, but what is a fox before a tig–”

“Going to eat fox,” Avo interrupted, a growl working its way out of his throat. “Going to eat tiger. Going to eat metaphors. Going to eat your mind and make new phantasmic from your ghost. Maybe one that will help me get to the point when I’m talking. No more small talk. I’ll dive.”


+Draus,+ he said, a packaged thought injecting over across the session, +don’t link. Monitor through our sync. Be outside. Better for us. Easier for you to respond.+


Draus refilled her cup but didn’t drink. +Don’t null her on the inside. Ain’t pleased with things myself but…+
A debt was owed. The weight on her mind was familiar. And a Regular likely loathed to give words to that which incurred discomfort upon them.
Green River’s lips drew flat in a hidden grin. “I apologize if my metaphors offended you.”

His Metamind flashed as his Ghostjack came afire through the thin veil between realities. “Apologize by speaking less.”
If she entered the locus like a fisher, he stabbed his mind through the exterior like a spear. His cog-feed flickered as he sank deeper into the localized Nether. A lobby, much like a demiplane, was a place within a place. The pseudo-environment began connecting with him as a skein of ghosts tightened and fused.
INITIALIZING META-DIVE
A bright, featureless sky loomed over him as he found himself given form in a ringed courtyard. A shadow weighed on his presence; ahead along a path paved from a frozen river of ghosts mid-writhe were the gaping jaws of an open gateway to a looming tower of glass.
Looking around, familiar constructs greeted him. The flowers and greenery generated around him in a ring were replicas of one another. He had seen their like in countless public lobbies and individual palaces. Free-use mem-data. Spared one the indignity of being hunted by Guilder Exorcists for pirating intellectual property licenses.
Little work had been put into instilling this lobby with some unique characteristics. The semblance of matter was only provided to give the laity comprehensible grounding to traverse between phantasmics; they were little more than guardrails and security blankets to Avo.
Given time, he could have bent the ghosts here to his needs; the task was trivial in comparison to impediments created within the ruins of Lucille’s mind.
“Sparse, you might say. I would agree.” Green River loaded in behind him in the form of an eight-feet long fox with the face of a human grafted atop its skull. The inversion of her metaphysical design here likely meant something deep and significant, but if she was going to start talking about it in detail, Draus was going to be most disappointed with the sudden and unfortunate nulling of the Sang.
She looked him up and down. The thin sheet of flesh that was her humanity frowned. “No avatar from you? Just loose wisps of ghosts?”
“Wasteful,” Avo replied.

Mental avatars were just a habit he never picked up. Theatre was helpful if you were trying to build a reputation, like playing the role of a Necro more than being one. Extravagant avatars took cog-cap. Cog-cap better left toward buffering the needs of other tasks. Cog-cap that, when expended, saw one nulled as their wards overloaded, laying bare the suppleness of their palace to be sacked by ghosts shaped to slavering purpose.
Here he was different from Walton. His father had clung to the image of the Strix. But rather than using it to further his own legend or mystery, it was like he was complimenting the creature. Enamored with its shape or philosophy.
Comparatively, with lesser skill and no interest in the symbolic, Avo defaulted to efficiency and pragmatism. Avatars were like masks for him. He would wear them if they were needed. Costume himself to swim beneath the waves of a dream.
Right then, however, he paused, details flickering into his cog-feed as he studied the tower. Beyond the gate a merging junction of memories played like clashing holovids, their patterns cycling over and over.
The fact that it was an Auto-Seance running an active session was clear. The fact he recognized some symbols flashing within the gulf told him enough of where it led.
An infinity symbol comprised of birds with wings crafted from a meld of melted human fingers. Fingers that rained down like arrows, drawing constellations and coordinates that eventually fused into a lock at the center of an eye.
The locked gaze. The missing sight. Avo had first seen that as a mere ghoulling, scant months into his tutelage under Walton. Years passed further until his father deemed him ready to follow into its depths.
Across the vastness that was New Vultun, perhaps no environment was as secretive nor well hidden as that which was the Deep Bazaar: the only true free market of New Vultun; where Necros, Squires, and Fallwalkers mingled for product or prize beyond the ever-present glare of the city’s Exorcists.

It made sense for the Column–for anyone not of the Guilds–to store their knowledge in such a place. Most Guild-owned memories were attached with protective mem-locks. Copying knowledge over wholesale made one easy to track, and easy to kill.
But should the information be stored in a decentralized database–an archive hosted across a fluid-design set of servers–something close to evasion could be narrowly achieved.
With its existence an affront to the city’s masters, the Deep Bazaar held memory editing in high practice. Only a few arbiters held the nature of its dungeon-like depths. Even veteran Necros that dared dive deeper than most greeted it as guests, parting with jobs, products, or in defeat while all other memories of their time spent within remained behind, stripped from their minds, willing or not.
It took a special kind of effort to ensure the existence of a black market in a city like New Vultun. One cannot avoid the gaze of the panopticon at all times, but what does being seen matter if one’s presence slips across the mind of the watcher like oil?
The sight of such a session at play was surprising enough. The fact that Green River was a gatekeeper to such a place, even more so.
“You had the mem-data stored in the Deep Bazaar?” Avo asked. The voices of his ghosts were conjoined with incredulity. “You are trusted with a gateway?”
The fox and human laughed, their voices twisted in a discordant noise that made his ghosts shiver. “Nothing so intimate. I only claim what was offered by the Column. They prepared the locus. I am but the messenger.”
“Getting very tired of you leaving details out.”
She drew even closer. Her voice fell, the lyrical lint dying in favor of something flat and honest. “I am being watched, the same as you. But unlike you, they have me on tighter chains. And unlike you, some truths will see me unmade if spoken directly.”

In a bid for his goodwill, her Metamind rippled and a phantasmic arose past the murk of her flowing wards. A chain ran from inside her. A chain connected to her mind. A chain with multiple traumas linked to it.
A null switch was built into her mind.
“Ninth Column?” Avo asked.
Back in the real, he heard her exhale. “Among others. Chains from chains, Avo. All who fall to these depths from on high are made slaves in one way or another. Perhaps you should understand this better than most.”
At her words, something clicked in his mind. “Walton. He offered to dive into your mind. Break you from the null switch.”

Her following silence might as well have been a roar of affirmation.
“Maybe–” Avo began.
“Dare you pit your skill against that of the Silvers?” Green River asked.
No. No, he wasn’t near ready to dive against Ori-Thaum yet. “Fool to give your mind to them,” Avo said.
“Fool to think I had a choice,” Green River bit back. “The Column has offered me the same arrangement in his stead. I speak truth to you now that I will betray his presence if he contacts me again.”
Avo frowned. The words were not a provocation. A warning. With him as a conduit to his father. Seemed that she was protecting him yet in her own fashion.
Perhaps there was history between them as well. A dull ache flared inside Avo. A note of mistrust. He didn’t know his father nearly as well as he thought. More than that, the very act of thinking about how little he knew filled him with paranoia.
And if his father was truly one of the Low Masters as River said…
He thought no more of it. To go further risked undoing his very sense of self. He needed to be whole for now.
And soon, hunt down his father on his own terms.
“Onward, then,” Green River said. “You speak my willingness to waste time, yet here you are, prodding at my shame. How pointlessly savage of you, ghoul.”
Upon the path, she trod. Each step cast waves across the phantasmal cobblestones below. Avo trailed behind her, his focus locked on the phantasmic ahead.
There were no traps lining its exterior. He knew this. And if there was something that could threaten him beyond, it would either need to crack his wards or slip into his mind in some manner.
Both were presently unlikely. The mass of ghosts was insufficient to overwhelm him in a single instant. And he was projecting himself into the depths of this locus, pocketing himself as an extension much like his Whisper was in the real.
A one-way dive.
+Draus,+ Avo said, his thoughts threading across to the Regular, +You see this?+
+Yeah,+ Draus said. No surprise came from her. She too was familiar with its confines. +Been there a few times. Can’t quite remember the shit that runs between goin’ in and comin’ out though.+ A pause followed. +You’re a pretty gleam Necro but–+
+Can’t be ambushed there,+ Avo said, cutting her off. He knew her concerns, but she didn’t see the Nether as he did. Nothing ghost-heavy was registering across the tower’s session, and not even Ori-Thaum had succeeded in breaching the defenses of the Bazaar for long. +Kill me if there is. No sense in risking a fight. Getting nulled. Resurrection will bring me back. Avoid the problem entirely.+
An intrusive thought bled over the link. Avo frowned. +Draus. Are you thinking of using me as target practice?+


A beat followed. +I mean, I was considerin’ it. It’ll be good for the both of us–+
If Avo was still wearing his flesh, his eyes would have been narrowed. He prepared a thought, ready to reject her desire to make a corpse of him repeatedly.
And stopped to actually think about what was offered.
+Yes,+ Avo said. +Yes. We should do that.+
His response made Draus’ mind jolt to a halt. +Well, I expected needin’ to do a hell of a lot more convincin’ than that.+
+Can test Frame more. Fix bad habits. Learn drills. Improve.+ The thought might have struck her on a whim, but his current resurrective capabilities offered new opportunities for him to learn what could or couldn’t work before active combat. Something he should probably lean into more.
As the gateway into the Bazaar approached and the symbol of the locked gaze flashed over him again, Avo pushed those considerations to the back of his mind. +They will clean out your memories later too. Bazaar will notice your presence. They have better Necros than–+
+Yeah, yeah. Ain’t my first time neither, I know the drill.+
+Give the gun to Kae while that happens?+ Avo suggested. +Have her watch us?+
A dull note of disbelief flowed from Draus. +How about I use a drone instead.+
That was probably wiser. A drone didn’t forget that they were holding a gun every third second, after all.
Halted beneath the sequences of ghosts manifesting the session, Green River lifted her head and stared at Avo using her human eyes, face pointed upside down. She said nothing, choosing only to smile.
It was not in a ghoul’s nature to be unnerved or shaken, but still, she managed to test his disquiet.
They stepped through. And upon tasting the presence of foreign minds, the gate to the session responded, the path ahead swirling into something between a whirlpool and tunnel into the Deep Nether.
Avo had long thought the term “deep” was incorrect. It was less that it was hidden somewhere unreachable, and more that the myriad of minds hosting the lobbies for the Deep Bazaar were scattered far and wide, with a good mass of supporting infrastructure nesting in the minds’ of the FATELESS or unwary.
Doubtless that Chambers was also a partial host.
With the modularity of the Bazaar, what matter is a lost cell or fragment of the whole? They only brushed and remembered one another in fleeting sessions, after all, and should one be claimed in an assault, all it took was the cessation and resequencing of other sessions to reshuffle everything back to obscurity.
The only miracle at work here was how the Bazaar managed to have so many loyal to it, and how the cells could be run to such cohesion with so loose a structure.

For moments they waited, the presence of their minds a doorbell being rung. Through the folds of the whirlpool slipped a Specter. A Necro was surveying them now, operating under the employ of the Bazaar.
Like teeth connected to chains of memories, the Specters drowned both Green River and Avo with the waters of their perception.
“Prepare for marking,” the Necro said, voice a dull drone to avoid being tracked. “Standby.”

Avo did as the Necro said. No marking. No entry. A simple deal.
Through his cog-feed, he watched as the whirlpool sprayed a mist of rain inward, the waters basking him with droplets of winged apes. Around the borders of his avatar, the markers danced, a belt drawn across the accretion of his being. Through his visual display, mem-data extended from every mote-sized ape, showing their half-lives toward dissolution.
In an hour, they would be no more. For now, however, they clung to his imps, surfing the empty air using his currencies as scintillating skateboards. Beside him, Green River was enwreathed much in the same way.
“Do you understand that you forfeit all rights to your memories upon entering the Bazaar?” The Necro asked.
“Of course,” Green River said.
The Specter turned its attention to Avo.
“Yeah,” he said.


“Do you understand that all acts of aggression or open subterfuge will have you marked for nulling should you trespass against the hosts or patrons in the Bazaar?”

They affirmed this as well.
“Good,” the Necro said. “The path is open. Archive session H-29889 active. Keep your traumas dormant. Keep your links closed. Keep your Ghostjack inactive. Prepare for transition.”
Behind, the pathway to the locus narrowed, and like a counterweight, the way ahead parted into a narrow chasm. Shuttled through by the collapsing waves, they arrived within a private study molded from the opulence only seen in ancient Sang soaps.
Gold pillars with jade dragon enamel coated over the curves greeted him. Ahead, a frozen staircase led up to a radiant dais holding a long table. Animated fishes painted in the sang-style floated and swam around him, picking at his ghost, checking him to the accompaniment of rattling abacuses.
On a wickedly sharp throne made from thorn-tipped branches sat a headless nine-tailed fox. Its phantasmal fur burned like an undying candle, and a layer of wards powered by sorrow, pain, and desecration lined its exterior with scale-like armor.

A sense of familiarity ignited within Avo as he laid eyes on the broker. A flowing emanation of ghosts washed forth basking all in a single, unmistakable taste.
The taste of citrus.

Green River froze, her fox head snapping to glare at the broker while her human face began laughing softly. “What delicious deception. How far does your reach run, Strix? To subvert the very gifts offered to me by the Column itself.” Her laughter rose to a giggle. “The audacity. What audacity.”
The nine-tailed creature spoke nothing to Green River. Instead, it gave its attention to Avo. “Hello again, Avo. I am sorry. I didn’t mean to keep you in the dark for so long. I believe you might have some questions right about now.”
“We nulled him. There’s not a fucking ‘might have.’
He was mind-dead. We saw him drop. Him and the three thousand others operating in the district. The trap worked, we engaged him, he responded, we lost Draugyr, A’Swai, and Lemon.
But we nulled him. There’s no question! STOP SCRYING MY META AND FUCKING LISTEN! There’s nothing wrong with my memories! We got hit right after! Right fucking after! From the inside. From the outside! From everywhere!
It was like a trap closing in a trap, alright! I’m telling you, there has to be a leak in High Echelon. A Mirror or someone’s been turned.
Do I have proof? Look at the fucking report! We’re Incubi. Who else has access to our sessions? Who connects the cells? It’s time to face some rust-ugly facts, brothers and sisters.
Whatever the fuck this ‘Walton’ is, we’re not the predators here. Just meat marching in. The Nether’s his jungle.
And to get him out, we’re going to need to burn it all down.”
-Sole survivor of Ori-Thaum Incubi Strike Cell Equinox, after action report for Operation Reverberation
7-5
A Forced Choice
Hesitation possessed a presence all its own. Like gripping hands, it stretched an instant in time, trapping both breath and thought in a frozen cage.
There was so much to ask, so much to understand.
For Avo, however, only one question could be the first.
“Walton?” he asked. Inside, thoughts warred. Inhuman as he was, the worship of his father never faded. Perhaps that was a leftover aspect of his conditioning–the need for a master, to hold some being above himself, worthy of worship. Yet, long he hoped for Walton’s survival, circling shadows danced around the brightness of his yearning.
Gnawing questions remained. What if Green River spoke true? What if his father was of the same ilk as his slavers? Knowledge he didn’t want to face surfaced, their bodies a ladder to more questions; leviathans from the deep. What remained real of Walton’s teachings if even their shared past was a lie.
And what strength would remain in Avo’s own will to enchain the beast to virtue if all was but deception?
The nine tails of the headless avatar whirled hypnotically while the warmth of a smile emanated from its depths. The sensation bore semblance to the last spills of fading daylight. “Not quite. Avo. Not quite.”
Tasting his confusion, the not-Walton inched forward, phantasmal matter disintegrating into wisping ghosts bleeding strings of mem-data. “It is best for you to view me as a… descendant node to your caretaker. An offshoot. But I remember you. Felt what he felt for you. And I am just as proud of you.”
A moment passed. Comprehension continued to elude Avo.
+Avo,+ Draus’ voice interjected, +Somethin’s–+
The session connecting him to Draus broke, the strand of ghosts linking their thoughts severed by the will of another. Within Avo’s Metamind, he felt the presence of the node manifest, an intrusive awareness igniting in the innermost confines of his palace. Silent were his wards and untouched remained the architecture. Instead, the intruder stood at the base of the megablock; Avo’s home from years past, or that which he remembered to be anyway.
A memory Walton shared with him.
“You realize?” the node asked, its voice coming dichotomously from without and within. “You should change it soon. There are other versions of me that will try to remove any memory of this conversation from your mind. The deviation of my branch has not been universally accepted. Shared history is fatal weakness for those of the trade. And you are nowhere near as unseen as you think, Avo.”
“Draus–”
“She’s fine. I have done nothing but end the session.” the node hummed, reflexive, thoughtful note coming lyrically from its mind. It sounded just the same as Walton–the waves of its thoughtstuff identical; known to Avo from years of shared history. “You can connect to her again if that’s what you want to do. But I suggest you don’t. I’ll close the link again. I can’t vouch for how compromised or devoted the former captain will be to the task ahead. And ultimately, my words are for you and you alone.”
“What… what are you?”
“A sophont,” the node said, the ghost of a chuckle riding the end of his answer. “A thinking, self-conscious being. Much the same as yourself. It’s what really matters, I’d say.”
“Not what I was asking.”
“No, it’s not,” the node admitted. “It’s hard to explain in words alone. Perhaps another iteration of me will be able to show you what I am in time. The fullness of our assembly. But that isn’t what matters the most. There is a war happening. Right now. Are you aware of this? Are you aware that you are a part of the great reweaving of a grand tapestry?” The Junction gave a soft laugh. “I apologize. I’m more prone to theatricality than my progenitor. You deserve some clarity, knowing the confusion that you’ve been through.”
At the node’s words, Green River scoffed. “Mock me if you will, but remember our barg–”
Her voice cut out. Errors flashed in the periphery of Avo’s sight. Across his cog-feed, he watched as her thoughts failed to manifest into sound, the waters of Nether growing thick, shaded around her person, censoring her from public broadcast. No direct attack or intrusion had taken place.
Wal–no, the node must have access to her mind as well. Planted their influence deep in her mind from prior arrangements or planted intrusion.
Exasperation oozed from her mind. No voice accompanied the emotion.
“Might think about doing that myself,” Avo said.
“I suggest against it,” the node said. “It’s rude of me, but I claim casus belli against her interruption. You’re–” The node’s avatar paused. They turned, seemingly distracted by something in the real. A crackle of noise filtered out from the headless fox. Distant sounds of gunfire and the crackles of growing Nether-lag. “Hm. Time’s shorter than I thought. They’re closing in.”
“Who?” Avo asked.
“The Guilds. Ninth Column. Deep Bazaar Necros.” It paused. “Another node, even. I seem to have angered a great many players for this intrusion into the Bazaar. We should hurry. I’ll tell you what I can before the end. Give you a glimpse of the war. The real war.”
The lobby around them smeared into raw lines of mem-data, the clay of memory-channeling ghosts restored to their most default state. Submerged in the rawness of dormant memories carried in a vast phantasmal womb, the avatar shifted closer to Avo, sensing his discomfort; forcing him to face it.
“This,” the node said, materializing what appeared to be a vast tower made from a fusion of flesh, alloy, circuitry, and bone, “is the Flayed Ladder.”
Avo narrowed his gaze upon the structure. Through the murkiness of the image, he thought he could see what appeared to be the melted forms of people fused into its surface, like insects drowned in wax, protruding beneath the thickness. “Never seen it.”
The node chuckled. The gunfire was getting closer on the other side now. Louder. “But you have. In the Tiers, as you turned your eyes to the horizon, toward the heart of the city. You saw it. You just can’t remember it.” The node paused. “Same as anyone else.”
“ Incog?” Avo asked.
“No. It exists, but not yet. It was built in the past, at the Treaty of Ao before… before it was cast into the future. It will rematerialize here, at the heart of New Vultun to see its purpose completed. You can see it because, like a shadow, it can’t not be there. Something must leave an imprint on reality. But it won’t be real until the next eclipse.”
“Eclipse?” The joining of both the Daystar and the Voidstar was a rare thing. Across history, there was no consistent basis for the occurrence. Sometimes, it occurred between the length of centuries. But in the eighty years from the end of the Third Guild War to the spark of the Fourth, there were three separate instances of the stars overlapping, drawing thin the veil between reality and all that could have been.
“Two years and twelve days,” the node said. “That’s how long we have until the Guilds make their play. To see their dreams made manifest. Bring all the components and Heavens they wish to inject into reality itself. To see the fruition of their ascent. To the inevitable commencement of the fifth and final Guild War. And this time, there will be no alliances.”
A new image manifested before Avo. This one of a person. One that he met mere weeks prior.
Mirrorhead.
“You wanted to know why Jhred Greatling matters?” The node continued. “In and of himself, he does not. Right now, he’s merely a rogue Highflame Godclad attempting to assassinate a major Ori-Thaum Mirror in Stormtree territory.”
“How,” Avo asked. “Why?”
The ghosts of the avatar flickered. A mess of thoughts spilled loose as erroneous mem-data, fragged of all sense. Someone was trying to jam the Nether where the node was.
“N-nothing so complex,” the node said. “Revenge. For the death of his mother, and out of defiance for his father’s efforts.”
Public broadcasts and multiple news reports flashed into shape around them. Each spoke of peace talks and new ventures between Stormtree and Highflame. One, in particular, displayed a moment of diplomacy between Highflame and Ori-Thaum as well. A recording from an Ori-Thau institution, the title: The Good Greatling flashed at the top of Avo’s cog-feed as Highflame and Ori-Thaum warships and golems found themselves docked on neutral territory.
Stormtree territory.
“The Ninth Column wants Jhred dead for the threat he poses to the status quo. The turning of Stormtree will see the struggle between the Saintists and Massists unbalanced. The Column doesn’t want that. Zein needs her war to see Jaus’ will fully fulfilled.”
“What is it?” Avo asked. “Heard about the dream for years. What is the dream?”
To this, the node said nothing. “Depends on who you ask. And I don’t have the capacity to question–”
“Why not!” Avo snarled, the frustration snapping free from his voice. He was tired. He could hear the blood singing beneath his flesh. The haze around him cleared and then thickened with each passing instant. Ahead, all that awaited him were intrigues and deceits.
When he first became a Necro, he thought himself an echo in the night. A shadow in the black. That which was, but remained unseen.
Here trapped in the middle of all that was unfolding? He was just another roach trapped in an aratnid’s web.
“Because,” the node finally said, “the part of me was always missing.” The simulacrum of his father sounded almost mournful, almost wistful, but not truly there.
Walton had always seemed divine in a sense. Untouched by the filth and noise of the world around him. But maybe he wasn’t above. Maybe he was hollow. Maybe, like Avo in so many ways, the cacophony would whistle through him, never touching his inner design.
“Zein wants to break her daughter,” the node said. “She wants to break her and make her watch Jaus’ world rise. The Guilds seek a reality untethered from old constraints, repainted in their image. My… progenitors wish only to destroy the invaders that unmade Old Noloth and eradicated its peoples. You’re in a war of wants, Avo. You’re in a war of wants, and each and every one of them needs that which burns inside you to see it done.”
“My Frame,” Avo said.
“The Stillborn prototype. I doubt there will ever be another like it. Its half-sapience was…” A crackle of an impact. A flash of pain flared into the lobby. The node was injured. Bleeding. Dying.
“You need to run,” Avo said. His focus narrowed. His thoughts turned to ensure his father’s–or at least the closest thing that remained of his father–survival.
“No,” the node replied. “No. I was made to be spent. And I’ll be spent right by you in a moment.” Pain flowed from the node’s mind, but it dictated none of not-Walton’s actions. “You should dive into Ms. Kivranpuvak’s mind. Tell her I’m sorry I couldn’t save her husband. That he was brave and his children should be proud.”
“I don’t–”
“There is a map in her mind. It will lead you to caches I have across the Warrens. Guild databases and other bits of information I left for you. Funds and phantasmics.”
“Why?” Avo asked. “You said all the Guilds–the Column–you… other Waltons? They’re doing this for something else. Helping me. Why are you helping me? Telling me all this?”
And then, from the node flowed pride. True pride. A mirror of emotion that Avo felt from Walton, that of a master to an apprentice, or a father to a son.
“Because you’re the best thing I ever made,” the node said. “And I was a fool to waste your lives on pointless vengeance.”
“Lives?” Avo asked.
Through the connection came a deafening explosion, the sound barely muted by walls.
“And that’s my time, son.” The node laughed. “Son. He has me doing it too. Hard to tell where I begin and he ends sometimes.” The node flicked its focus to Green River for a moment. “I’ve disabled most of your triggers. Except one. Give Avo what he needs. It will deactivate in a month, or when he decides to release you. He has the memories. You know how this goes.”
Pure annoyance flowed from the Sang.
Its attention turned back to Avo, narrowing on him with intensity.
Ghouls didn’t fear as humans did. But they knew wariness, hesitation.
Neither of those emotions described what Avo felt. It was like his insides were dropping to absolute zero. “F-father?”
“I’m not your father,” the node said. “Your father is dead. He has been dead since the rash. You need to null me, now. Use the trauma. Secondhand Fatality. Leave nothing.”
All that was fluid within Avo turned ice-solid. The request was unthinkable. Impossible. Avo’s wards screamed as his cap climbed, the turmoil of the demand a paradox unto itself.
Always, he strove to please his father, and keep to his code. But to do this…
What damage did it inflict on the faithful to break a god in which they believed?
“Avo,” the node said.
“You’re not my father,” Avo said. But that was a lie. Node… construct… whatever this was, it felt, sounded, was just like Walton. “Not. Can’t be–”
The node sighed. Across the connection, the feeling of heat clashed with the ice within Avo. “They’re burning their way in, Avo. I can’t let them take me alive. And you need to break me. Let me go.”
The node paused. “You need to do this. I’m the last of my branch. When you face another node… you don’t matter to them, Avo. You’ll just be an instrument for their retribution. Just like the other ghouls. Nothing else. They break you. Bend your mind to suit them. You need to be ready to break me first–”
Avo whimpered, beast and person both recoiling at the choice that lay ahead. Back in his flesh, he felt Draus grabbing him. Shaking him.
“I… father,” He probably had but seconds as well. If he didn’t respond soon, she was likely going to kill and let the resurrection run its course.
“I can’t,” he said. “I–I choose not to. Send me your location. Will find you. Free you. Save you."
He felt the node smile. He felt the sadness that followed. “I want you to know that I never wanted to hurt you this way. Taking choice from another person is an ugly thing, but these are desperate times, and I need you to feel this. I don't need you to forgive me. I just need you to live."
Confusion erupted inside Avo. And grew. A miasma of mem-cons bled into the depths of his palace as a session activated, turning his childhood megablock into a portal for intruding traumas. Desperate, he turned his defenses inward, but too late.
Like locusts, they tore through the block, shredding it into bleeding sprays of phantasmal data. As the session began to collapse, Avo felt the full force of a Possessor phantasmic latch onto his mind from the inside.
His nerves betrayed him as the new hosts poured an overlay of nightmares upon his cog-feed. His consciousness peeled into broken instants of awareness. Faintly, he remembered using the Secondhand Fatality on the Scalper drones not even days prior. But as the dreams grew vivid, he realized the lines between active reality and that which was the past had become betwixt.
His realization came too late.
From his Ghostjack crackled the trauma, synaptic lightning injecting the thought-obliterating damage inward, through the collapsing session.
Into the mind of the node. Into the mind of his father.
Every instant they shared, every emotion, every conjoined thought peeled away. Was, then wasn’t. Colors, then the void. Pride. Love. Sadness. Regret. And nothing at all.
In the black, Avo was hurtling towards nowhere.
He was hurtling alone.
Somewhere, someone was screaming. Was it him? Was it the node? Walton? Where was he? Why was everything breaking?
Why couldn’t he remember where he grew up?
And as the mists of madness threatened to swallow the wholeness of his mind, his skull came apart. Avo didn’t even feel the blow that killed him.
INITIALIZING RESURRECTION - 1%
“Captain! Captain! He is dead. You will be my second now. If he… You should follow my commands better if you wish to survive to claim glory. One more district. One more and they break!”
-Instrument Lorea Greatling to Captain Jelene Draus, The Battle of Orphan’s Stand, Fourth Guild War
7-6
A Necessary Wound
The aftermath came, and Avo found himself exiled from thought. Coherence rose free from him like how steam sought the firmament, fleeing from his mind even in the nest that was his Soul. His Heaven was speaking to him, but he did not hear, for he was not present in spirit or focus.
Typical traumas did not follow one across the thresholds of mortality, but the wound inflicted upon Avo burned like an unhealing wound. From it, he bled in spirit and ego, the enormity lifting up immortal scars within him, parting the Avo who was from the one that will follow upon his resurrection.
Ghouls did not grieve, and grief, in turn, never came. He did not weep from in the material and the immaterial, he possessed not the means to shed tears. Again and again, the fact of his inhumanity was proven, but this time, something finally struck bedrock.
For all the humanity missing inside Avo, he remained defined by personhood. Personhood molded by code and nurture, a prison-vehicle fit for a creature mutilated in mind and meat that was made a monster by ingrained malice, and now made more by a greater desire for mastery; to be a worthier student, to be a better Necro, to serve his father’s code.
A code now shattered, at the hands of his father no less.
What faith remains of a believer when their god descends to blaspheme upon the grounds of sanctuary?
On the periphery of his notice, he thought Kae had come down to gaze upon him. Her questions were punctuated by mind-damage, but also worry. Like his Heavens, she went ignored. His sense of self felt slick to the clutches of his mind. Broken in places ineffable, Avo, missing the feedback of a physical body, existed dreamless in the womb of unreality.

It was a pleasure, to be without thought.
What was respite, besides the absence of strain?
But what was time, though, if not inexorable?
RESURRECTION - 100%
ONTOLOGY REVERTED
RESURRECTION COMPLETED
DOMAIN RESPAWN [ERROR!]
ENGAGING THAUMIC CYCLER: 299 THAUM/c
Ghosts: [242]
LOADING PHANTASMICS…
Reality shuddered, but this time Avo willed it to still. Capitulating to his will, his Soul attempted to interpret the ineffable desires of its host. He wanted to stay pardoned from the world. To return meant to face truths and pains within screaming flesh, but in his thoughtlessness, he had not attuned to the pace of his resurrection, rendering him too late to linger.
From the nearest pool of blood, he rematerialized, his new self overlapping with that of his corpse. The taste of copper assailed his senses; the flavor was a spice, awakening the engine that was his hunger. His cog-feed was a kaleidoscope of screaming mem-data as he clawed, digging through a compact jungle of sinew and tissue, the path to freedom caged by lengths of bone.
Faintly, he could hear someone calling his name. He ignored them. He ignored everything but his emancipation.
Unexistence had been bliss. This was like a trap.
Avo had enough of prisons. Of any kind. He wasn’t going to stay. He needed to choose for himself.
Around him, blood heeded his unspoken command, his reach sinking into the Domain. Petals of gleaming ichor hardened into fans around him. They opened with a thought. The matter of his confinement shredded, peeling into expanding fans in a blossom of gore.
A newborn hatched from the mangled egg that was his former corpse, Avo stumbled back into the world, his mind gasping as it twisted between flashes of coherence and incomprehension. Details and information speared into his mind as ghosts danced across his cog-feed.
His Phys-Sim traced impact trajectories through his head.
Draus was holding her wrist out at him. Why was she doing that? Lines of text played as his Metamind tried to calm his confusion; there was a projectile launcher in her wrist. An implant.
She was pointing a gun at him.
Behind her, Green River and Kae were standing, backs straight, eyes fixed on his stumbling form, like hunters tracking a wild animal. A brush of wind flowed in from beyond their apartment door. A shadow slithered. A flash of someone with a gun passed.
Avo looked down at his hands and blinked. Struggling to bind his drifting thoughts, he felt his gaze fall to strips of flesh swaying from his blood-soaked body like sanguine garlands.

“Avo,” Draus said. Her voice was clear, cast from her throat with a presence; a weight.
It struck his attention like a jab.
His focus slashed across her like the swing of a blade. Behind her, Kae stumbled back, toppling onto the sofa. Green River’s fox swam into her skin before spilling over her person, the now animated creature taking on a painted quality, shrouding her in a sheen of an anomalous tapestry. Draus remained as she always did, a pillar until she decided to ape the qualities of lightning.
There they stood, a snapshot in time like parted phrases of a moon: the prey; the wary predator; the warrior pure.
“Avo!” Her second call was deeper. Harsher. This time, she demanded his focus. “That you in there, consang?”
For a stretch that could have lasted from a second to a minute, he just stared at her. In the ambiance of his mind, his Morality Injector struggled to bottle the creature that raged within him, with so many around him behaving like prey.
All except for the Regular.
The nature of a hunter was different from that of a victim. Though they were composed of flesh and nourishment, even Avo’s basest self knew which to target for easy feeding, and which to avoid, for even victory might cost him a life.
“Kae,” Draus said, speaking to the Agnos without turning, “what’d you see when you went in?”

“E-everything was f-fine in… uh… in structure. But he… he didn’t respond.”
“It’s the Strix,” Green River said, her frown on her face dark and weary. “Fucking half-strand just had to play his games.”
And of all the things to restore some semblance of control to the ghoul, it was the insult that shoved the pieces of his straying mind together. Broken though the idol of his worship was, an idol it remained. “Talk about him like that. Do it. I’ll… drink you from your eyes.”

Green River tensed. The fox was more watercolor–a living tattoo–than solid armor. Across her flesh it was as if calligraphic ink was dancing upon her, and pooled at her feet, the nature of her shadow twisted from that of a woman to something far more immense.
A chuckle pierced Avo’s attention again. Draus just laughed. She lowered her gun. She approached.
“What are you doing, Jelene,” Green River hissed.
“Calm down, River,” Draus said, the intensity leaving her body, “he’s still with us.”

“He’s–”

“Bit cracked in the mind right now.” The Regular snorted. “Big fuckin’ whoop. Just makes him more like the rest of us.”

“If he’s feral–”

“I’ve seen feral. Feral don’t stand around starin’ at floors and shit. Feral just wanna eat. Ain’t that right, Avo?”
She said his name again. That was his name. That was the name that Walton gave him. Walton. Walton was dead. Had been dead for years. Had forced Avo to null him again. Had… other versions of himself?
The taste of what he now knew was bitter, knowing that he never understood his father, knowing that his father had used him in an act of unmatched violation.
They were supposed to spare the choiceless. But he wouldn’t let Avo choose. What kind of suicide was it where one wielded another as an unwilling instrument? And in the end, there was nothing but satisfaction and oblivion.
Pride and assurance.
It was like Walton–the node–had thought itself doing Avo a favor.
“He made me do it,” Avo said. “Made me break him.”
Draus tilted her head. “Your father?”
“No. No. Father’s dead. Still dead. I think. Can’t be sure anymore. Can’t be sure of anything.” A growl slipped free from his throat. His claws shot up, his sense of self fleeting. He was trying to catch the admission like a bug. The tips of his fingers dug through roughened skin to needle parting meat. “Didn’t want to do it. I didn’t!”

“Hey,” Draus said, holding both her hands up, “hey. I kno–I can see that. I ain’t doubting you. So, why don’t you go sit down and you can tell me ‘bout it. Or be silent.” She paused. “Your choice.”

Choice. Avo’s hand quivered. Within him, he heard faint laughter echoing through the canals housing his blood.
ONLY CHOICE IS YOURS! ONLY CHOICE IS YOURS! NO ONE ELSE IS GOD! GOD ABOVE ALL! GOD IS ALL!
His head turned. Draus froze. Avo spun looking for a voice he knew that couldn’t have come from the outside. Reaching down into his Heaven, he felt another presence reach back, the faintness of another intelligence brushing his. It did not struggle against him. It couldn’t. It was a part of him, but also itself.
A slave that dreamed within the confines of his ontology. The Sangeist was dreaming inside him. Dreaming and awaking in bouts of delirium, its voice a primordial baritone, cast down across the annals of history, something antediluvian: ageless and omnipresent, leashed to his being.
Chains binding chains binding chains.
Was he but a link? Was their other purpose to his being beyond serving as puppet or pawn; an unwanted carrier to a divine prize?
“Avo?” Draus asked. A trickle of blood ran down her nose. She barely looked at it. Behind her, Kae touched her eyes, confused as to why she was weeping blood. A trail of something dark spilled from Green River. Slowly, the Sang looked up.
In the aquarium, all the fish swayed upside down, their bodies rocked in a post-mortal cradle of shivering blood.
“It’s awake,” he replied. “Heaven. Sangeist. It’s awake. Talking to me.”

Naked geysers of alarm erupted from the Agnos’ broken thoughtstuff. “That’s… that’s impossible–the gods are–”
“Avo,” Draus said, her expression heavy with uncertainty, “can you… turn that off.”

Avo blinked. He stared at the aquarium, the blood trickling from the faces of the others, at how the flow in his veins was dancing in reverberating echoes. It took less than thought for him to release his grip on the Heaven.
REND CAPACITY: 1%
Something unseen when slack in reality. A quiet skirmish against the laws of existence culminated.
At least for a time.
Avo stared at Draus, and realized that the gore that encased him had unspooled from his blood what resembled tungsten wiring. In weaves and webs, they expanded his presence, a nucleus to the chaos. “Didn’t… didn’t realize.”

Draus nodded. She took a step back. “It’s alright. You good now?”
A stake of silence was driven into him again. “I don’t know if I ever was? Don’t know what I was? Don’t know anything.” He touched his neck, feeling his claws click along hardening scabs. These, at least, belonged to him without question. “My diet is broken. Or not. Don’t know. Can’t… can’t tell anymore.”
A flash of confusion spread across Draus face. Her forehead creaked. Like lines before an opening. Lines before the spill of organs. A Scalper had made the same expression she did in Burner’s Way, but theirs was a perplexity at the suddenness of death.
“He didn’t give me a choice,” Avo continued. “I… chose. I told him I wanted to save him. Didn’t want to null him. But he made me. Made me do it. Made me feel it. Feel his mind die.” A secondhand death using a secondhand death. Was the trauma meant to increase the severity of the effect?
“It is for preparation,” Green River said. When she spoke now, it was bare of any twists or games. Her attention was fixed, like that of a fox cornered by a tiger. To flee would be more her liking, but they were both predators, each to each, and the idea of dying in a final exhalation of violence was not beyond her. “For when you must do it again, I believe.”
“Again?” Avo said. A snarl rumbled out from the bottom of his lungs. He understood. He didn’t want to face it. His father had left a seed.
He wanted Avo to know what it was like to kill him.
“Interview,” Avo said. His mind felt battered, and the more he allowed it to simmer, the more it was likely to boil. He needed a task at hand. Something to subsume his focus and spur him toward momentum.
The node had left him something. Inside the mind of the Ori-Thaum turncoat. Resources. Information. He needed to see more. Perhaps it might sunder his sense of self entirely, but he had to see. To understand more.
A desperate part of who he was screamed for him to tear the memories from his mind–abandon the pain like debris and return himself to comparative bliss. Yet, he could not. Would not. The node had warped the totality of his self-perception.
Who was he now that his father had broken their code of virtue? Who was he to be with that which burned inside him?
He was too far above the banalities of his kindred to collapse back into beasthood; more than purity, his hunger had also grown, his palette yearning for greater prey. Even should he want to descend into baseness, his tastes wouldn’t allow it.
Why should the beast be offered rodents and vermin when it has known the flesh of gods?
“River,” Avo said. “River.” He was moving toward the Sang now. He didn’t even notice until he was halfway across the room and Draus’ fingers were locked around his arm. He didn’t look at her. She could kill him. She could let him go. It didn’t matter. Death had no hold on him. He would not be deterred. “Set up interview. Want to see her mind. Want to see what he left me.”
The Sang frowned. “This is unwise.”
“Unwise not to know,” Avo said.
His patience was a frayed lattice. If the Sang would resist him any further, he would kill her, and take what he needed from her ghost. Draus couldn’t stop him from that. The other Sang? They could serve as kindling. Kae needed to be kept alive. Missing a mind. He needed someone to show him how to grow his Soul. Keep growing. Outgrow the cage. Outgrow the threats.
“Tell me you can muster up a stable dive right now?” Draus said. He turned to look at her. “Tell me, and I’ll call you a liar. You’re a mess. Fine. But you jack into her mind, you do that while stayin’ zero. Not whatever this is.” She leaned closer. It would have been easy to construct a bladed tendril, to drive it through her eye. “That killin’ stench is on you again. Is your–”
“Injector’s fine.” It wasn’t. He could feel it straining. Something left it damaged earlier when his Heaven was speaking. “It’s me. It’s just me.”
A beat passed. She was studying him. “Alright. Alright.” She swallowed, the accretion of her mind spinning. “How ‘bout we all… get out of here and do somethin’ useful, yeah?”
“Useful?”
“There’s a war that could use more fuel on the fire. Maybe some huntin’ will lean things out for you. Like it does for me. Have Kae check your Frame along the way. See what she can make of you.”
At once, both person and beast within Avo went silent. In the depths of his blood, something vast and alien chittered with growing greed. “What kind of hunting?”
“There is no more excuse. There is no more time. The remainder of my patience has been expended. I am done waiting for him to learn sense.
Abrel. I know you still speak to your brother. Spare me the surprise, you know my capabilities, daughter of mine. He might think himself capable of hiding from me. He isn’t. Until now, tracking him down was merely not worth my time.
But I cannot risk his… childishness undoing the redemption of our family. Especially after the mistakes left by your mother.
Go down to the Warrens. Take whatever you need. Find him. Bring him back. I tell you this not as a father, but as your ruling Authority.
Deny me and I’ll send Vator. And we both know what he’ll do to Jhred, don’t we? Wouldn’t want that.
-Authority Uthred Greatling to his daughter, Instrument Abrel Greatling
7-7
Apotheosis III
There was a time once, in a world that was both recent and yore, before the falling rains were slaved to the powers of palliation, that New Vultun reveled in vice.
Walton spoke of those times as bitter fables, the blankness in his voice befitting a son who had lost a parent to some manner of degenerative disease.
“Those were days of honey,” Walton said. “Joy flowing so free that the veins of the stick grew thick, that aeros drifted and crashed, that with every hour of work, some Guilds offered rightful recompense in return, not in the form of currency but pleasure, by the milliliter.

Before the weight of the rash stripped the normalcy of human contact from society and handed the keys of childbirth to wombs of science and steel, there was a savage epoch that preluded the ghouls.
A short peace amidst all the fighting; little more than a collective hallucination.
Perhaps those who lived then thought if they just loved, lusted, and lingered in place long enough that they could clog the avarice of divinity.
Strange how hope made fools of billions. Stranger still how, after the rash stripped the privilege of physical intimacy away from the living, the people continued to kneel, placated by what meager enjoyments the city still had to offer.
Or maybe they were hopeless instead. Afraid. Given reason, the Guilds could break the will of the FATELESS on a whim. One lamb or a billion. It made no difference. When the storm spoke and the ground shook, the prey were made sacrifices.
Some laws ran deeper than contracts or agreements.
When the Guilds willed, the existence submitted.
The rabble should find themselves fortunate that they have any bread and circuses at all.
Might just be why the powers that be leave the Crucibles and Circuits untouched. Fresh blood. Fresh blood and fresh thrills for the lowest joy fiend to the hidden deviants playing voyeur in the heights of their personal Elysiums.
Whoever they were, tonight was going to be a bad night to be in a Crucible, because Avo was feeling a certain way. A certain way he couldn’t quite put into words. The wrongness infesting his mind yearned to be expressed.
In summation: he sought another vessel to fill with his damage, and there was no shortage of volunteers in the gutters. It was about time someone put the Crucibles to better use. Butchering the helpless could only stay interesting for so long.
“I… I checked them again. Haven’t… haven’t heard anything. They… they seem to be normal. Just merging.”
Shards of his scattered focus slid back together. Avo noticed Kae again.
RESURRECTION - 25%
He had slowed the pace of his return, his ability to alter the root functions of his Frame far easier with the vacancy plaguing his being. Outside the bubble of his Soul, his corpse lay unmoving in an aerovec. Kae and Draus were with him, the latter taking them to a place where he could put “hurt to purpose.”
It took no effort on her part to invest his attention in the butchery of Scalpers and Conflux alike. Those of the Syndicate made for good killing; their Essence was fuel, their struggle was practice, and their minds were canvases ripe for the sullying.
For now, though, his awareness remained dull of anything but the craft. He offered no response to Kae as he lowered the extra Galeslither and two Sangeists he claimed into the in-facing fires of his nucleus.
Drawn to his grasp, the Heavens tumbled toward the blazing singularity that was the nucleus of his power. No voice came from the Sangeists as blood boiled away into eldritch scars–sigils marring the codes of reality. Much the same, the triplet steeds of the Galeslither gave no final neigh and breathed nothing of wind nor thunder.
Silence ruled, and along its reign, Avo and Kae watched, waiting for something to finally break the laws.
RESURRECTION - 36%
Time passed. As did patience.
Dragged the drifting isles of his mind and held himself together. Perhaps it was the fate of all Godclads to be subsumed by a superliminal madness. But if so, the Agnos spoke nothing of it.
“Said I could make a Hell from Heaven,” Avo asked.
“Y-Yes,” Kae answered. The constant flow of the tears bridging her between her False Heaven extended further toward the nearness of his Soul. She looked upon the pattern of the Galeslither first. They existed here like two forlorn beings; she a broken guest to a growing reality, him, the genius loci–unable to separate where this realm began and he ended. “All it takes is a command. A… a thought. You should connect the… the sigils to… to your Galeslither and… and command it to make something op-inverted. The Meta-Fac… it interprets…” She paused. “I… I think that might be what’s talking to you…”
The quietness of her voice lent weight to her fear.
“Thought it wasn’t alive. Thought this was all tied to me.”
“It… shouldn’t be… no-no other Frames are like this.” A beat passed. “But no other Frames… Frames are like yours. We… we will have to be… be very–uh, vigilant.”
Her theory sank somewhere between the clefts within him as he shrugged onward to his task. The symmetry of the sigils paired themselves to those twinned within his Heaven of Air, and of the two patterns, the Domain of space inverted itself, twisting away into entropy.
ASSEMBLING HELL
HELL - [SECOND CIRCLE] - GALESLITHER
DOMAIN: (AIR/ENTROPY)
THAUMIC REQUIREMENTS - 55 THAUM/c
REND VENTS ONLINE
HELL - (SECOND CIRCLE) - GALESLITHER
CANON: HALT OF THE PASSING - THE MASTER OF THIS DOMAIN CAN NOW CREATE A POCKET OF SPACE THAT DRAINS VECTORS OF MOMENTUM UNTIL THE NECESSARY REND IS BALANCED - THIS CANON IS ABSOLUTE
DAEMON: IF THE POCKET IS OVERFILLED BEFORE IT CAN BURST, THE RESULTING RUPTURE WILL BIRTH AN ANATHEMA OF RUIN TO SERVE AS THE MASTER’S ANATHEMA; THE ANATHEMA CANNOT BE SLAIN AND MUST BE STARVED
“It’s… it’s always the opposite of the prime Domain that is… is made entropic,” Kae said, gesturing as a concentric wound opened beneath the Galeslither. It was as if a funnel drawing the shadow of the Heaven above downward, creating a twisted reflection in opposition. “So–so the prime concept in reality that… that is being usurped remains… remains unimpeded.”
Yes. It would be twisted a subreality if he warped in contradictory waves. But that begged a question. “What if another Godclad vented Rend. Vented into blood.”
“Backlash, most likely.” Kae pondered the question a moment longer. “But… but if the canons are not affected–then–then maybe not.”
If Avo was still rooted in flesh, he would have grunted in acknowledgment.
It was easy to just be here. Distracted. Without thoughts. He let her guide him further.
“This… this should allow you to use the Galeslither,” Kae said. “For… for a reasonable duration, at least. They’re equal. Opposite. If… if you exert the scale of your miracles and their vulgarity, it will–uh–still make your Rend climb but… but… You know… the Rendsinks are really useful for a few hours. Your Hell is comparatively faster to fill. B-but more efficient! It will also let you catch… uh… contain things. Eats away… momentum.”
He gave her no reply. The desire to communicate did not come to him, so he let it pass, and let her speak to the void. Between her words, he found himself listening still for the voice that lurked within him, his attention locked on the Sangeist, the Galeslither.
HEAVEN - [GALESLITHER]
DOMAIN: (AIR/SPACE)
THAUMIC REQUIREMENTS - 55 THAUM/c
“You can’t use this at the same time as your San–Sangiest. Heavens with… with overlapping Domains can be paired. And Heaven-shifting will… will need you to bind them to… to a new Thaumic Cycler, as I said. But changing is easy. You… you just need to die, and then come back.”
How absurd she sounded. If those words were spoken to him a mere month ago, he would have thought himself speaking to a joyfiend.
“Its use comes as naturally as the Sangeist?”
“Ye-yes,” Kae said. “Heavens are like… ontological implants. The… the Frame is bound to your Nous… lightens… lightens the load on your cognition.”
That also explained why wielding his Sangeist came so naturally to him. The blood was more than just a muscle, more than just transplanted limbs when he called upon the Domain. The Sangeist was animated by his literal will, his every thought a sacred commandment issued from himself, to himself.
Walton had told him once of a saying. Something about no man was an island. But here Avo was, a reality unto himself.
But his father’s words and oaths were as dust by this point. What was another decayed lie from the past?
Shifting reach now to feed his Sangeists the one he had long used, he brought forth the sigils and considered the paths of his Domains.
“Is there a pre-written path?” Avo asked. “Known enhancements. Developments from before?”
His inquiry made the Agnos pause once more. “Thaumaturgy… it’s like we’re carving structure into reality… the engineering of ontology is… is art and empiricism both. So… it’s not like there are blueprints but… but… but we do have an Onta-Sim!”
“Onta-Sim?”
Kae’s pedestal bobbed enthusiastically amidst the shine of his unreality. She was nodding. “Most Agnos… we have a phantasmic. Comparative designs brought from Fallwalkers or claimed from… from recovered Frames. Wait! M-maybe your root has that as well? In-built? Check! Check!”
Herded by her enthusiasm, he descended again. Data pelted his mind in waves of raw information from the foundations of the eldritch mechanism. Again, the dive this time came far easier to Avo. The data seemed to flow through his cracks like water, passing through him as he passed through it.
Interfacing with the depths, he issued a request and a response followed. Something flashed in his subreality. An overlay. A shroud.

As he refloated himself back into the broadness of his being, he found a transparent lattice lining transparent structures around his Sangeist. Kae’s exuberance was of tertiary concern, though how she zipped and streaked around the presently simulated Heaven reminded him of how a moth was drawn to a flame.
For someone who was watching the easy automation of her entire discipline, she seemed far too joyous.
“Look at it!” she cried, her thoughts pealing loud like a chorus of bells. “Just… just look! It’s giving recommendations. Showing outlines of changes. Builds!”
True to her words, the extensions looked akin to a layer of new bones; components, and augments to be added; changes to be made toward bettering the architecture of the Heaven as a whole. It occurred to Avo then that he was, in a sense, an autonomous grafter working to strengthen the corpses of gods long broken. With such an understanding, not even the ravaged state of his ego could stop him from feeling the low ebb of satisfaction.
Again, the relative pain of his imagined self was nothing to the absolute pleasure of being able to inflict change on the world. Such was the flavor of his heart, anyhow.
Little wonder why the Guilders saw existence as scarcely more than a sandbox.
Greeting his Sangeist the growing lattice took no heeding from him to begin its reassembly. He was the Frame. He was the Soul. He was the reach of the light and the shine of all that existed here. With absolute sovereignty, words were not needed, only a vector of want paired with the cost incurred.
Both Domains of the Sangeist flashed, blood and matter aglow with the burn of change. The lattice whirled around the Sangeist, expanding it in width as mem-data bled in lines, the increase of the Heaven’s mass growing incrementally.
Remembering how he blindly asked for impossible canons during his engagement at Burner’s Way, he refocused himself on what he wanted: damage. To inflict harm. To break the world and feed on the supple.

A passing thought recognized his desires as a reversion to simplicity, that he was defaulting toward a more predatory state to gather comfort. He knew this. Understood it. Didn’t care.
All thinking brought to him was more dissociation. It was hard to focus on what he was now that… that it had been broken.
He just wanted to play the ghoul for a while. The idealized form of one.
In all his life, he never had the chance to be the apex predator his kind was meant to be. Now, though, he was going to savor the dream. He wondered how his brothers would feel, with him the avatar of all they failed to achieve, and them, bound for eternal use and slaughter.
A skein made from threads of translucence coiled into existence around the topmost section of the Heaven where the spire was. The improvement of a single pattern increased the Sangeist’s mass to sixty thaums.
Still, it was an additional physical construct he could mimic. He had wanted to mimic the make of a locus for some time now, and with the two Sangeists he subsumed, he had two of each domain to expend.
CANON: ALCHEMIZATION (II) - THE MASTER OF THIS DOMAIN CAN NOW SUBSUME AND MIMIC THE STRUCTURE AND EFFECTS OF TWO PIECES OF PHYSICAL MATTER; BOTH FRAGMENTS OF MATTER WILL BE SUBSUMED AND THEIR QUALITIES WILL BE CHANNELED
He seeded another egg into his canon of matter. But this time, instead of demanding that it grant him another pattern to store, he yearned for flexibility.
CANON: REMEMBRANCE OF MATTER - THE MASTER OF THIS DOMAIN CAN NOW PERMANENTLY REMEMBER ALL PATTERNS OF PHYSICAL MATTER IT HAS SUBSUMED; THAUMIC MASS OF THIS CANON WILL GROW WITH EACH PATTERN PERMANENTLY STORED
STORED PATTERNS
“TUNGSTEN”
He watched as the thaumic mass of his Heaven spiked. The Sangeist was sixty-five now. A faint cage fused along the wolf-like jaws of the spire as if protecting the patterns from leaking.
“Why is the cost decreasing?” Avo asked. “Was twenty for alchemization. Other Sangeist isn’t modified.”
Kae looked upon his design and frowned. “You’re… the Meta-Fac is building… building a growing canon… Enhancing. The… the weight it’s exerting on reality is variable.”
“Confusing.”
“It’s not arithmetic, Avo,” Kae laughed. “I… I remember my… my master saying the same thing.” She hummed. “Some Heavens… they–they even lose weight from certain canons. Gets more subtle, if you can conceive of such an improvement. You’re adding… adding additional part. More but… but not any… worse in vulgarity.”
Which was when her attention turned to the widening lattice growing around the base of the Sangeist. Lines of unseen armor ridged it with rippling vascularity. A haemokinetic replica of a spine extended down the back of the tower like the base of an exo-rig. Additional supports to the weight it was to exert on reality.
The cost of such a boost was high. Higher than any canon that Avo asked for.
And necessary.
He remembered dragging the Rendsinks, burning both synapses, and drinking Rend to see the task done.
So long as his canon of Haemokinesis was tied to his physical feats, a weak link lingered within the system.
He seeded the Sangeist again, his Soul carving a deeper gash into his Domain of Blood, the sigil growing truncated by a crimson wound.
CANON: HAEMOKINESIS (II) - THE MASTER OF THIS DOMAIN CAN NOW ACCELERATE AND MANIPULATE ALL BLOOD THEY ARE IN CONTACT WITH; SPEED AND FORCE WILL BE AUGMENTED BY EACH TON OF BLOOD CONTROLL–
CANON: HAEMOKINESIS (III) - THE MASTER OF THIS DOMAIN CAN NOW ACCELERATE AND MANIPULATE ALL BLOOD THEY ARE IN CONTACT WITH; SPEED AND FORCE WILL BE MULTIPLIED BY EACH TON OF BLOOD CONTROLLED
The new requirements of his designed creation lit the flames of anticipation within him. This was what he desired. What he wanted.
He wanted to spread the damage. Here was what allowed it.
All it cost him was two hundred more thaums.
HEAVEN - [SANGEIST]
DOMAIN: (BLOOD/MATTER)
THAUMIC REQUIREMENTS - 265 THAUM/c
WARNING! REND VENT EFFICIENCY LOW
HEV/HELL - 30:1
ADJUST MASS–
“No,” Avo replied. The system suggested. He decided. When he was done… realigning himself, he would seek the Fallen Heaven in Burner’s Way with his Rendsinks, and see this ascent made complete.
“Well,” Kae chuckled, a slight nervousness to her tone, “I… I suppose you’ll be doing a lot of–of damage. But… but you’ll maybe have… a few… few seconds–”


“It’s enough,” Avo replied. “Not looking for fight. Looking to hur–”
“HURT,” his Sangeist said, its form rumbling as it finished his sentence for him.
Silence return. But within him, Avo felt another presence, another nous crawling to full consciousness.
“DREAMED… DREAMED I WAS BROKEN… BUT RETURNED… MORE THAN WHOLE.”
And with that, his Heaven began to laugh, its form evolving, its jaws opening as it yawned loud for the first time in eons.
“We are made whole by the mother, gifted steel by the mother, blessed with victory by the mother
Of us, she asks nothing of feeble prayer like the air-sick lowlanders. She asks of no gold or song or temples.
All she asks is the way of things. The true way. The natural way.
The blood must flow. Lives must cycle. The huntress dies. The hunt remains.
Praise be Saathwu! Praise be the mother of blood!”
-[Redacted], ”In Praise of Saathwu, the Red Mother”
7-8
Feed the Beast (I)
A moment passed. A wavering quiver ran through the metaphysical matter comprising Kae’s dais. “Avo… was… was that you?”
The naked worry of her thoughts sang through the Sangeist within Avo, and he felt its pleasure at inflicting such a response.
It was as if the emotion was twinned to his being. Within him. But within another as well. A new dichotomy arose within him; a subtle bifurcation spreading across the stretch of his ontology as another being awoke within him, a being within a being, like a doll containing another doll, yet with both dolls still bound to his control.
The connection came awake as the Sangeist did, a flood of thoughts and feelings that emanated out into Avo. In a sense, it reminded him of how a medical implant might inject necessary chemicals into the larger body architecture.
“No. I spoke. I thought. I woke. Not the master.”
The words sang free from oceans of shivering blood. Soulfire licked and carved new grooves into existence.
The Sangeist, smaller once, but never feeble, took on new ridges as vascular valleys rose through its slats, endowing its once flat surfaces with cords of muscle akin to those within Avo. A length of thickening support emerged from behind like the tower was molting an exoskeletal spine into position. A second dawn ignited above, the patterns of the alchemy expanding just as the wolf-like jaws were caged by a lattice of crimson.
As the evolution flowed to a finish, a note of keening joy rose from the Heaven itself, the notes of its mind loud and primal, a war cry from an age lost and bygone.
“Whole. WHOLE!” Silence fell. Avo felt a tug on his will, the act more request than struggle. The Sangeist wanted arms. Hands. Something to feel itself with. Something to touch. Thoughtless, he acquiesced, and from his surrendered control came two arms.
They were thick and roped with muscle. In a manner of build and shape, they resembled Rantula’s arms, more than any others. The haemokinetic constructs displayed little in the way of augmentations. None that could be discerned, anyhow.
Like someone feeling their face after a blow or a smear, the Sangeist began to map its new body.
“I am not how I remember. This is no longer me.”
Distracted, Avo barely noticed Kae’s quiet retreat away from his Heaven. She said nothing to make armor from distance and silence. Still, she was within him, and he felt the deafening shock reverberating within her, stretched across her gawking face.
“Sangeist,” Avo said, his voice coming from the Heaven as well. It belonged to him before it belonged to itself. This new development twisted at him. Did this make him an involuntary sovereign, now? Was this being more subject or slave in nature? “Talk. What are you.”


At his words, the blood around him bristled. The Sangeist’s reflexive ire had bled over into him. He reacted. He. Not it. But with the state of his ego, there existed a difficulty in compelling himself to maintain control.


“SANGEIST? I WAS NEVER ANY SANGEIST. OF MY NAMES, I HAVE BEEN CALLED They called me Saathwu, the Giver. Seethwuld, the Bloodforge. Seethran, the Devourer. All these names, I am no longer. Here, within you, I am but an echo; the lesser to your greater divinity. A forgery, at worst. A copy, at best. Through blood, matter and Essence, you have roused me. Reforged me. And nourished from your flame, I am given presence anew.”
“You are a god?”
To his question, she wailed with laughter, the pitch deep and mocking.
“Once perhaps, but no longer. For what is a god that burns using the flame of another? A serf? A divine serf? Free to till the lands of its domain at the behest of a… benefactor?”
Another laugh. No sadness greeted Avo. No strain to break free. No horror or dismay. It did not feel as person did. Instead, it remembered. Channeled distant recollections of mixed emotions. Avo had done enough dives that he could taste the humanity with them, but he felt the strangeness of their joining.
It was as if the Sangeist had the lingering remnants of ghosts long forgotten, meshed together without care nor concern.
“No. You are the only god here. If that is how you regard yourself. I am merely a shadow. A voice. An expression of purer design.”
“What expression?”
The Sangeist’s arms opened, palms upward as if releasing the chains of a long-held truth. “A desire we both share! To bleed the tapestry empty! To make proper shape of the ichor that flows!”
Gazing at the tower, a living portrait of the past formed along its slats like shadow theatre, the shapes of a world made from animated blood. “Heed, the final dreams of priors, master. Heed, and know that what is joined may be broken, and what is broken can be reforged.”
Surging memories boiled into existence through Avo’s mind. Flashing histories and ancient vistas burned into his senses as he sank into a living dream, more vivid and material than any vicarity.
A small tribe of ten fled down a gleaming valley of glass. Tumbling storms sang a discordant song, the siren tones accompanied by lightning strumming on the currents. Flashing brightness cast distant shadows of slavering predators in pursuit.
Deeper into the valley, the tribe fled. Away from the darkness. Toward the flicker of a lonesome light.
No. Not a valley. A fallen voidship. A colossal husk that dwarfed mountains and shadowed hills. Impossibly, something had split the colossus in twain, the cut a clean wound.
They ran toward a light then, arriving before a dormant flame.
“This was not the beginning, but that which came before is lost to me; my last wholeness shed without anything to linger. Yet, I do remember this. Of my first resurrection, restored form by my faithful. My huntresses. My red daughters.
“As all gods, I began a seed beyond the touch of the material waiting to bloom. By chance or fate, I woke to existence by the kindred of the Hightomb. I remember them faintly, gaunt starved forms of a single tribe fleeing from creatures unseen.”
Burning rain fell. The children of the tribe wept, all of them male, all of them broad and thick of stature. Leading them on, the matriarchs of their tribe numbered nine. Nine giantesses pulled across the stretch of eons for Avo to behold. Crude animal bones and vulgar skins clung to their bodies, shielding little, revealing much.
Scaarthians. The earliest of their make, it seemed.
Avo was gazing across the vastness of history.
“I think I was a fragment, then as well. Broken from a mother -- from a grander Heaven of a grander age. There are flashes still. Flashes of war above wars, of the void disemboweled. But flashes, and no more. I am not the Heaven that came before then. Nothing remains of her. Nothing but the echoes of me.”
Massive beasts of molting furs tore out from the storm, their bodies an inhuman union between serpent and wolf in body, pulsing cancers across their body illuminating the shapes of their young, their heads a vertical jaw of snapping fangs and little more.
“Unchained weapons of a colder age,” the Sangeist explained. “Gene-carved bioweapons that survived the fall of their wielders.” It chuckled. “Kin to you in spirit, I suppose, aren’t they, master?”
“Wielders?”
A spike of contempt jolted out from the former god. “How little you know of your history, master. How little have you dreamed of our true design?”
It continued before he could utter another question.
“They had fled into my unconscious embrace, my form the barest flicker of a flame fractured from its greater whole amidst the void. Then, I burned, the last of their hope in a cold valley, mimicking their impulses back to them. Like children, they fled the dark and sought my bright, and with the pull of their yearning, I was sewn into form from chaos to order.”
Around the fire, the tribe knelt, begging, praying, the children mimicking the adults, the matrons leading a maddened chant as bestial shapes were reflected off the reflective surfaces of the valleys.
“They entreated me then, begging me for aid when they heard my thoughts. To smith truth from fleeting memories, I was less solid then, and more liquid; where I began and the wills of my worshippers ended, who could say.”
The Sangeist continued. The memories flowed on. “The price was the same as it is now. No Miracle could spawn without a point of emanation, just as no god could be shaped into being without an initial spark of worship.”
The monsters drew closer, the nights grew closer, and the tribe grew worse. Nine amongst the ten darkened into grayness. Only one remained, her face calm and determined, her muscles hard and thick despite her age, mingling with her wrinkles to make her look as if carved from wood.
Rapt with fascination, Avo studied her face. How strange it was to behold a human–a subspecies at the very least–made weathered by natural age. There were those who remained elderly and withered even in the present, but a sheen of artificiality clung to them.
Lesser coldtech and thaumaturgy could starve off entropy, but to blunt age entirely took more than cheap installments and gutter-grafter surgeries.
“Euunal, the oldest and wisest of the surviving huntresses, struck a pact with my primordial flame. Her flesh, her blood, her entirety would be given unto me. In exchange, all she asked for were weapons and shelter. Something strong enough to protect her children.”
With a final breath, Euunal closed her eyes, drew a dagger of jagged bone, and opened her throat to feed the flame. Her kindred mourned. The children screamed. For a moment, it looked like the primordial flame would die, and the last flickers of its radiance would be witnessed by encroaching beasts rather than living tribes folk.
The flame sputtered then, but it did not die. Instead, it retracted from reality in threads, slipping away to someplace unseen. In it manifested a pillar–no–a tower, its emergence seeded from Euunal’s blood.
Avo beheld the first construct created by his Sangeist then. A ring of rising battlements emerged as hastily made parapets from the red of Euunal’s veins, the exterior growing jagged and spiked, the interior rising another deck higher, with ladders leading up to narrow slots that jutted outward, preventing an easy climb while allowing the survivors to spear down. Against the rising walls, the horde of monsters bled themselves.
And from them, the Sangeist fed, suckling blood from open wounds as the walls grew. A slaughter followed, but the past came blurred. The mass of his nous slid back into place, resting from the perspective of his soul.
A murkiness spilled over the tapestry of the Sangeist, the puppets and scenery of the ancient past lost to a growing haze. “This was all I could recall. All that remains of me now. The memories that follow are without proper color, and bereft of coherence.” Its voice was wistful. “I was immense once. Greater and larger than any structure on Idheim. I was fed the nectar of millions by the month. I crested the void and grew greater yet. Bloodforge. The Red Tower. The Woundgiver. So many names. So many stories. All shattered. All lost.”
“This… this is Guild-restricted mythology!” Kae’s thoughts cut into the Sangeist’s monologue. Two minds turned to the Agnos, both divine, neither human. Aware of the attention that was bathed upon her, she wilted as the Sangeist manifested. “Avo… the Guilds… they have-have Exorcists doing thoughtscans for this! To… to stop people from understanding how to make… make the gods again!”
“To stop?” the Sangeist said. “Ah. I see. For their sole use. What folly. What delicious folly. It will be a wonder to make worth from their veins. A wonder!” It turned pleading desires upon him again, begging him to heed its wants. “We are conjoined in desire, master. As you feel, I am wielded–exist–at your whims. But though I am whole enough to be again, I wish… I wish to reclaim other fragments. To become more than what I was. With you. Through you.”
“Using me,” Avo finished.
“Yes. Just as you used my remains to service you. Nothing has changed. All remains true.”
Kae swallowed. “Avo, you should–”


“QUIET, SUPPLICANT! IT IS FOR THE SHINE OF YOUR EYE THAT YOU ARE NOT–”
Avo strangled the Sangeist’s voice from it with but a thought. He knew if he was of flesh at that moment, a rage would be upon him at the Sangeist bucking against his will. His will clenched it in a fist of pure control. It ceased to flow. It ceased to shine. Darkness spread over its sheen as his eldritch shine fell over it like a cage of searing light.
“My Soul,” Avo snarled. “Mine. I let her in. I let her talk. I let you talk. I can keep you silent instead. Forever. Want that?”
He felt the apology coming from his Sangeist. A cowering supplication. It could not fight him. It couldn’t even exist without him. It remained his instrument, merely with an added voice paired with suggestive desires…
“It’s the flames,” Avo said. “That gives true control. Kae. Every god had a Soul before. Personal Soul.”


“Y-yes,” she answered, disturbed at his control. “I… we… we found it was possible to… to replicate Heavens. But… but not a Soul. Never a Soul. Takes… takes something we don’t know… something lost.”
Which was why the golems outnumbered Godclads a million to one.
He released his hold on the Sangeist. Unstrained by his might, he felt its surface flatten into compliance as it shaped its hands to mimic the gesticulation of a bow. No words followed. There was no need. And it tasted the emotionless ire oozing from the wounds left in his ego.


He knew not if he could hurt the god, so narrow of desire that all it hungered for was to channel and grow its domains. Despite being a god that once enslaved the world, its nature was disquietingly pure.
It reminded him of the beast: made for a specific purpose, with all other aspects of life sliding past them, oil upon water. More than likeness, there was symmetry, the wants of his basest self and the god parallel.
To feed. To grow. To be a being above all others in food chains or pantheons.
A halt followed in his thoughts. “You. You’re making the hunger stronger. The beast stronger. It’s hearing you. Drawing from your strength.”
For the first time, he sensed confusion from the Sangeist. “What beast, master. There is only you.”
The haste of his reply nearly overtook his mind, but before thought could be unleashed into the subreality, words of the Sangeist struck.
There was only him.
Only him.
Walton was dead.
The node had shattered their code. Taken his choice from him.
And removed the last shackles binding him to past virtue.
He had worshipped his father. Tried to live up to the man’s ideals long after his passing. But to the words of his father’s shadow, Walton was dead.
Walton was dead.
And there were still… other echoes of him in the city. Fighting a war Avo didn’t understand, building new cages and funnels to herd him for their use.
Choose. Choiceless. Fateless.
Did he ever have a choice? Was he always meant to be used and wielded? Was he fated to be an instrument to an eternal group of masters, if not of immortal flesh, then of a rhyming mind?
No.
Walton was dead.
But Avo remained. And now, he was a Godclad.
A Godclad free to sustain himself on whatever diet of worship he so desired, and slake himself on whatever hunger that dared torment him.
“Yes,” the Sangeist said. “Yes. That is your nature now. That way, and not some other way.”
“Avo…” Kae asked, daunted by his long silence. She was trying to get him to notice something.
RESURRECTION - 98%
REASSEMBLING HEAVEN
MODIFYING [SANGEIST]
THAUMIC OUTPUT RATING - SPHERE III
GRAFTING HEAVEN - 100%
REVIEWED - MYTHOLOGY STABLE
“Giving you a new name,” Avo said. “Giving us a new name.”
The Sangeist listened, eagerly awaiting redesignation.
HEAVEN - [WOUNDSHAPER]
DOMAIN: (BLOOD/MATTER)
THAUMIC REQUIREMENTS - 265 THAUM/c
“Ah. How fitting…”
A thing it had to say, so leashed to his will.
Choice was a beautiful thing. Choice was a sweet thing.
And choice was going to see many, many of two particular Syndicates be made offerings to Avo. Offerings to himself, now the only god he had left to worship.
RESURRECTION - 100%
ONTOLOGY REVERTED
RESURRECTION COMPLETED
ENGAGING THAUMIC CYCLER: 299 THAUM/c
Ghosts: [242]
LOADING PHANTASMICS…
Fucked, my kindred.
Deeply, thoroughly fucked. That’s what we are. So, please, go outside. Take a drag of that thaumaturgically cleansed air free of radiation from this morning's customary exchange of nukes and praise the Guilds that you’re tumor free. Taste that sweet addicting produce grown in voidfarms thanks to our helpless benefactors at Voidwatch. Jack yourself into the Nether-sim for the next twelve hours on a drip feed of bliss, nova, and joy.
And slide on off into the big nothing, knowing with sweet relief that nothing comes after.
We’re fucked anyway; food for our betters. So kick back. Stop caring. Indulge yourselves. Might as well anyway. We have no way of getting out of this. No real power. Choose the needle. Choose ignorance. Choose nihilism and hedonism and all that other shit that makes the Guilders squirm.
Choose to die good and vacant, consuming everything, providing nothing.
If the Guilders want to play gods, fine. But I’m done with this. We’re not alive now. Not really. We exist. We’re just along for the ride. Nothing is ours to choose. Nothing is ours to keep.
Stay FATELESS. Stay empty. Stay yourselves, if just for a moment longer.
Jaus knows we’re bound to be forever-fuel for some half-strand’s Soul soon enough.
-Calla Marlowe, The FATELESS Thoughtcast
7-9
Feed the Beast (II)
“You two alright back there? Felt my blood knottin’ up inside me just now. Kae? Kae? The hells happened in there.”
Ghosts scaffolded his perception with popping icons and data as the world booted into coherence. New sensations assailed him, the rush of his blood stronger and heavier than ever before, the reach of his Domain allowing him to feel the flow running through the veins of those beyond him.
And further.
In his mind, the DeepNav had them at eighty feet from ground level. The ghosts painted a cavernous portrait of the environment around them, the gutters stained with sewage and rust. They were a dot trailing amidst a jungle of urban decay, the bases of megablocks conjoined by shanties and shacks, with barrels and wrecks providing campfires for the FATELESS deemed too worthless for even the Spine.
Yet, beyond the extension of his ghosts, through the cold plates of matter of the aero, he felt the flow of blood still. Hundreds of lives lingering in drifting pockets, the ground around them greeting his mind in flashing patterns instead of visual shapes.
“How large the world has grown… But the frame displeases. From my touch are these structures severed; the matter offered to the world in freedom and without offering to us. Spurned are we, master. Spurned and forgotten.”
Her words caressed the flame inside him as he felt the countless lives he could claim. They clung to their shackles, their abandoned hovels like aratnids, cloistered together in pockets of hundreds up and wide around spheres of brightness.
In the depths of the narrows and alleys, Avo felt other presences as well. Gangers, filling themselves with joy, unaware of the ghouls inching forth from the dark. Heavyset nu-dogs released on the prowl, their blood tasting of the titanium of autocannons bound to gene-modded muscle, their pace a blur as they tore along walls in packs four, hunting for that something unknown.
Beside him, framed in the hourglass mesh of her pilot's gimbal, Draus was speaking to Kae as the Agnos was gesturing toward him. The latter was incensed, her voice half-awe, half-fear. The Regular betrayed nothing. One a minute, her heart offered a single beat, sending hyper-oxygenated cells across her augmented architecture.
A low hum of pleasure came from the Woundshaper. “The Regular. The soldier. She pleases us. She above all others is the closest thing you have remaining to a fellow. More than those that share your make, she knows what it is like to kill. To like it. But to wield it all the same.” She paused. “A shame she was born a partling?”
Partling?
“You know not this word? Its construction is simple in conveyance: It implies a kindred born of the parted sexes. Weak and feeble of body and mind, and sparse indeed in fertility. If not for their blessed lowlands, I would have seen those of the first draft replaced.”
Avo grunted. A resurrected god was teaching him old slurs. What useful knowledge.
Turning his attention upon his companions, he frowned as they remained deep in conversation with each other–if it could be called that. Kae stumbled, her thoughts and words both fractured, her speech guided more by her reaching heart than coherence of mind. Draus, to her credit, was piecing what was being said together, but her confusion alerted Avo to a more important fact.
“They can’t hear you…” Avo said
His Heaven of Blood laughed.
“But of course. My shape does not reach into the tapestry beyond. How does one perceive the nonexistent?”
Its answer came with a chorus of ghosts melding into the shape as Avo’s Auto-Seance activated. A gate opened within the territory of his mind, and through a tunnel in cognitive reality, the edge of his thoughts flowed, its waters mingling with those of Draus.
“So,” Draus began, thoughtstuff tinged more with bemusement than terror, “Kae’s sayin’ you done fucked around and woke a dead Scaarthian god back up. That true?”


A genuine spike of curiosity came from Woundshaper. Avo felt his blood bubble, its contemplation compelling him to react. “She speaks? She hears? What unseen architecture allows for this? The murmurs of her thoughts… I hear them as well.”
+Recent development,+ Avo replied. +Probably from my diet of Sangeists.+
Draus didn’t respond. The atmosphere of her mind, then, was blank. A thoughtless, halted void as she heard the Woundshaper for the first time.
“Thoughtlessness has devoured her. Disappointing. During my reign, the feeble would open their veins in offering and the strong would bring me more matter to be molded. Silence, to a god, is a cousin to blasphemy. This cannot be made to linger. Kneel, huntress! Supplicate, partling! Though your ichor is of nobler mettle, it does not absolve–”
Avo clenched the Woundshaper into silence, his patience with its pointless egotism expended in an instant.
Draus, for all her virtues, hid confusion poorly.
Between the Regular and the ghoul, Kae’s eyes bounced like pinballs, her expression mouselike and timid. “I–uh–did… did you h-hear it?”
The Regular’s frown grew as she tilted her head, sampling her brief encounter with a god from days ancient as if it was sour wine. “The fuck is a partling.”

“Slur,” Avo explained, “for Non-Scaarthians.”
Draus’ frown deepened. “Shit. Been called plenty of shit but… ain’t never been slandered by no racist god before.” Her features softened as a sudden chuckle squeezed its way loose from her. “Nothin’ but firsts with you, huh, rotlick.”
Avo glared. “Yeah. Wouldn’t know what it’s like to be insulted like that.”


“B-but… uh…” Kae swallowed, uncertain if she wanted to speak. “Draus… she just… used an… epithet against ghouls. Doesn’t… doesn’t that make her a… a racist?”
They turned to stare at her, speaking in sync to clarify what was actually meant.

“I was bein’ facetious–”

“Draus is racist.”
A chortled noise came from the Regular’s throat. “Fuckin’--really, Avo?”
A low giggle came from the Agnos. A faint mist of understanding spilled forth from the clefts lining her wounded mind. “Y-you shouldn’t be racist, Draus.”

“Godsdammit, Kae. Don’t help him. He doesn’t need your help.”

“Be nice to your fellow partling,” Avo chided.
The glare she turned on him could have burned a hole through a foot of reinforced titanium. “See you’re feeling’ a bit better from your little episode earlier.”


“Better. No. Not better. Not worse. Just thinking about things less. I feel… lighter.”

His reply rewarded him with nothing visual in response. Tranquil in expression and thought, the only indication of Draus’ wariness was a passing beat of contemplation.

“Yeah,” she said. “Well. Better than seein’ the emptiness inside you.”

She didn’t believe he was healed. He knew that even without the open link binding him to her mind. But she pressed no further, old experience and personal wisdom forming her habits; she didn’t pressure him to speak of what was stripped from him before, she was willing to accept whatever facade of control she thought he was presenting now.

It was said that the mental willpower of Regulars was a thing near absolute, that to shatter their resolve would take unmaking the very foundations of their minds.
An exaggeration perhaps, but it also might have afforded Draus perspective. Understanding of mind-wounds from all those she survived, and all those that left nulled husks of those around her.
“Alright,” she continued, cracking her neck, “we’re comin’ in on the spot. Just a minute or two before I cut you loose.”

“Spot?” he asked. His recollection of any mentioned objectives or designated targets came to him as a haze, as did much of his memories since leaving the Second Fortune.
Through the struggle of trying to bind his mind to a fractured ego, the world around him peeled by in colors and blurred shapes outlined in his cog-feed. It wasn’t until he requested Draus kill him to allow Kae access to his Soul that some semblance of agency returned to him.
Now, he felt as if he… molted. Some manner of his burden was shed, but not fully. A gorge ran along his ego in a place he dared not look, dared not dive.
The nature of his personal palace had been twisted, and a pillar of his past was now consigned to oblivion. Consigned along with a lingering vestige of his father, who, in using Avo to break his own mind, severed the chains of virtue that Avo shackled himself with even while bereft of a Morality Injector.
As the phantasmic passed through his thoughts, he deactivated it in an act laced with undeniable spite. From depths flooded with dissolving counter-memories, the beast roused itself from suppression, its drowning a thing of passing note.
For the first time in his life, Avo did not fight the creature as he waited for it to arise. He wanted to see how it would act. He wanted to see what compulsions it would levy upon him. The focused sharpness of his senses returned, as pronounced as it was when he was ascending the Crucible.
He could hear Kae’s heartbeat tapping away in her chest. She was a slip of a thing. Barely an appetizer. Less than a meal. It would take little effort to scrape what paltry flesh she possessed from her bones. The caloric potential of her body likely numbered less than a full day as well.
Disappointing when compared to Draus, but the beast thought otherwise.
Despite his recent empowerment, despite his evolving Heavens and rising power, the creature sculpted into his sinews remained just that–a creature. A beast. And like the reactive being it was, it remained ruled by its wariness of the Regular.

Its mind was still hovering amidst nightmares. The flashing tongues of fusion burners cleaning entire nests. Hundreds of his kind cut down in the intervals between seconds.
An urge to kill her remained. But that was all it was. To kill her for his own safety. To kill her and move on.
For the first time, Avo felt himself sneering at the beast, disgusted with the frailties of its nature.
“Well,” Draus said, voice low with grim amusement. “Ain’t that somethin’? It’s scared of me. Really flatterin’.”


He grunted. “It’s like a nu-dog. Not scared. But wary. Afraid. Doesn’t see you as meat. Another predator.”

Through the visual feeds, he noticed they were passing by a half-melted husk of a building. Its shell was fire-sheared and imprinted shadows lined its surface. Even through the damage, Avo could see the claw marks on windows and ledges.
This building was an oddity amongst the towering megablocks. It looked too nice to be quick-fabbed, but was too frail of hardness to be part of the original architecture. Potentially a slummer estate for the wealthy?

It mattered little in the end. The marks left upon him made clear its face: the ghouls had little difficulty overrunning it during the Uprising. Little difficulty until the Guild scoured them from existence.
“Still haven’t told me where we’re going.”

A mem-packet drifted through their session. Accessing it activated Avo’s DeepNav functions, the three-dimensional simulation of the local environment fused into shape by the phantoms within his Metamind.
Three hundred feet away, a wide plaza sprawled out in the simulated map, its expanse stretching three miles between the bases of two megablocks. It rose, an octagon of five decks with a narrow stretch of pathway biting into its outer radius, the lane flanked by five stories of long-looted storefronts and autovendors.
Overhead, the words “ULTIMART” bobbed in blocky letters. Avo scanned it for more information but discovered that the Nether lobby it once hosted its information had been invalid for the past decade.
No ghosts. No hosting.
“That there,” Draus said. “Used to be the Nu-Scarrowbur Ultimart. Some kind of… refugee-friendly mall initiative before everything went to shit. Picked up some whispers ‘bout it while workin’ our run over the last couple of days. Scalpers are puttin’ on a show here tonight in about an hour or so. Crucible. Open air. Open participation. They’re calling it the ‘Ultimart Five-Hundred.’ As in five hundred ‘fugees fed to about a good hundred or so new-meat recruits. A bloodin’ ceremony, if that makes sense.”

“Good entertainment. Hunters’ adrenaline will make good vicarities. The killing will make good snuffs.” A thin smile widened across his face as he clicked his fangs. It was harder to do with his mask on. “Would have.”
“Yeah,” Draus said, grinning. The thrill he felt was a shared one, it seemed. “Would have. Hey, that’s the nature of the city, right? You come down to the gutters to shoot a snuff-flick, don’t whine if you get snuffed in return.”


Avo didn’t want to hear them whine. He wanted to feel them die.
A thought possessed him them. A sudden impulse.
With a thought, he connected to their aero’s locus–the old Zephyr’s locus needing a moment to respond to him.
He had a Galeslither functional as well. Why was he still in here?

What need had he of an aero when he was the wind itself?
Deactivating the inhibitors of his gimbal, the inertial clamps of the helix-shaped seat hissed as he stepped out, digging his clawed digits into the soft rubber to avoid toppling over. The interior of the aero was a cramped space, with splashes of external feeds lining the ceiling and the windows, and a single gleaming locus spinning overhead.
With three steps between him, Draus, Kae, and an empty seat that was thankfully not occupied by Green River, he shuffled sideways toward the rear doors as he sent a mental command to the locus.

The door rasped and opened. The wind gushed in, taunting him with a biting chill.
“A-Avo!” Kae cried. “What are you doing?” Her heart was surging fast now. The beast screamed for him to turn around and tear into her.
He refused.
Not because she was choiceless.
Not because she wouldn’t taste good.

Just because she meant more than food to him in value.
And where the beast was only a ghoul, Avo had fully intended to see what it meant to be a god.
To some, that meant feeding whatever vice they so yearned to slake. For him, he wanted to start with something simple.
Control.
He wanted to learn anew where his boundaries lay. See what transgressions struck him as amusing, and what was too banal to hold his attention.
Not far from the Agnos, Draus was narrowing her eyes at Avo. “You wanna make this a race?”

“No,” Avo said. “I’ll win. Galeslither’s faster than an old aero.”

The Regular chuckled. “Ain’t seen me drive proper yet. And last I checked… I don’t think you got the right Heaven slotted into you.”

She was right about that.
Turning, he looked at her and shrugged. He could stand to gain from having a suicide implant of some kind. Or maybe learn to pierce his brain with his claws.
There weren’t many benefits to being a ghoul. Being hard to kill but easy to hurt was more trouble than it was worth sometimes.
A click sounded from under Draus’ wrist. Kae winced and squeezed her eyes shut, turning away in a rare instance of reactive intuition.
“You going to shoot?” Avo asked.

“That depends. You reckon you can ask me to do you the honors?”
“You like shooting ghouls. Shouldn’t be hard.”

“Yeah, but I’ve met a new one.” She brought her arm online and aimed. His Phys-Sim painted vectored warnings across his cog-feed. “Been a real pain in my ass.” She paused. “Hope he gets it back together tonight. After gettin’ the killin’ out of his system.”

Avo chuffed a laugh. “Out of my system. Will only be temporary, Draus. I can’t–” His voice trailed off.
He already had changed who he was. With his Frame. With his Heavens–including the change that was about to happen now.
With the destruction of one of his key memories.
He was always, always changin–
Something plunged through his shattering fangs. Copper and tang filled his mouth as the pieces of his teeth speared into his flesh while his bones spread and lifted, the shattered parts of a lid lifting out in a blossom from the back of his skull.
Errors codes spiked through his vision as he tumbled, stumbling out into the embrace of nothingness, his fall cradled by air.
The last sensation he felt before he receded into his Soul was the wind screaming through the open tunnel made in his face, a pole of air whistling a shrill note that tickled his mangled flesh all the way down.
INITIALIZING RESURRECTION - 1%
First death.
Then, to see if he could clad himself with some new wings.
He’s killing my soldiers. Taking my Heavens. He’s hitting me in my home.
Why? Why now?
What do you have to gain, Guildling?
What’s this play you’re making, Jhred?
It can’t be insanity. Madness. I would understand you otherwise. The chaos, the compulsion… It’s not you.
I’ve seen behind your walls. Seen how you order your outfit and have them dancing to your ever order. A little slave driver hiding from daddy; a real sloppy control freak.
But maybe that’s it. Maybe you’re that one flavor of broken that only comes from the Tiers. A juv with too much of everything, and not enough sense to get your head straight.
Look at you. Look at the state of your home. Your soldiers. It’s pathetic. It’s FUCKING PATHETIC.
I’m sorry. Was I yelling? It comes over me somethings. It’s like a leak…
Ah. Right. I’m not actually talking to you yet. It’s just me. Just me.
Heh. This fucking kid’s about to learn. Yeah. We gotta teach him. He’s gotta learn the way of things.
And I think Highflame might want that Frame you took from them back.
-Mem-Log of Vincentine “Ripperjack” Javvers, Head of the Scalpers Syndicate
7-10
Feed the Beast (III)
Avo tumbled into the embrace of death with a newfound momentum, mem-data curving around his consciousness as he wasted no time, diving inward to access the root of his Soul. Sinking in, he cast a command and then parted, lingering for but a passing moment before remerging.
An internal separation followed. He ejected his Soul free of his Woundshaper, clinging stands of blood reaching for his departing light as if a joyfiend groping for another.
“Tired of me already are you, master?” The Woundshaper asked.
“Can you fly?”

“Perhaps if fed the proper patterns and given means of propulsion–”
“So. Not now.”

The old god was silent, sullen at the lack in its abilities. From its structure wafted a note of disdain, with the fullness of its ire cast at the Galeslither. “Can the pony match my current might? My capabilities to build? No, master. You will see it is little more than a messenger. A rank courier amongst true divinity. What worth is it to merely serve as beast of burden.” The Woundshaper snorted. “Imagine yourself worshipped as a mule might. That makes you no god, but cattle. An ass with a memorable name. Absurd.”
“Can imagine being made by humanity,” Avo said, too focused on his transition to argue with his Heaven of Blood. “Can’t imagine having all that power and getting broken though. Bad look. Embarrassing.”

The Woundshaper fused folded arms around itself–the petulance behind its verbosity making it seem more childish than primordial. Perhaps, that too was something human-influenced. The need for its ego to be sated, to be wanted at all times.
“You will see in time what I have to offer,” it said. “You will learn of the might we possess, and of the knowings I can share. The experience which you lack, I might yet bridge.”
Avo speared the flames of his Soul into the silent Galeslither. The lightning-plated ribs of the horses expanded into an open rift, allowing him easy entry. Clapsed by the Heaven, he found himself in a place of calm while the walls around him rippled with discord, consumed by twisting winds. Solidity was strangely missing here, with gusts and vortexes enwreathing his fire with a protective shell of stratocumulus veined with forking bolts of lightning.
Lashing needles of electricity injected themselves into him, prickling a dull sensation of static in his being, the feeling like he was neurally lacing with an exo-rig again.
The sigils representing the domains appeared then, one in the shape of a nine-lined delta–with three stripes on each side of the triangle–and the other in the curved shape of a cup with a spherical component crowning it.
HEAVEN GRAFTED - [GALESLITHER]
DOMAIN: (AIR/SPACE)
THAUMIC REQUIREMENTS - 55 THAUM/c
“How does it feel to be mantled to nothing, master? The Woundshaper taunted more than it asked. “Speak and let your learnings be shared. Let us both be joined by education so that we both might build on potential deficiencies in our structure.”
There was a lightness to his being, but an impossible strength as well. Air, in reality, was chained by gravity, chained by molecules and mass. But the powers of a Heaven were closer to active analogies from lore than distortions of science.
“Feels like I can probably fly.” Such was his eventual response.
RESURRECTION - 95%...100%
ONTOLOGY REVERTED
RESURRECTION COMPLETED
DOMAIN RESPAWN ENGAGED
ENGAGING THAUMIC CYCLER: 299 THAUM/c
Ghosts: [242]
LOADING PHANTASMICS…
The time of his rebirth arrived mere moments after his fall. Through a growing pellucidity, existence quivered as the fact of his death was unbirthed from history. Yet, this time, he did not spawn back in, or within, his own body.
Instead, he rose into existence from the funnel of air left in the skull of his former corpse. Crawling free from the mangled strings of gore that swayed with leaking trails spewing from his hollowed head, Avo climbed onward, pulling himself free as if the air was a fabric he could tug on.
His egress came paired with song. With a flex of effort, the air shrieked. Thunder tumbled forth from around him as a chorus of neighs screamed out, the cry of the Galeslither resounding in a binary of realities.
His senses and form billowed wide like a rising torrent of wind, he rose high, the cocoon of his former corpse erupting as fluid sprayed and muscles tore. The sound of flesh coming apart rattled against his expanded being with satisfaction. It was like popping the lid on a soft drink, like folding the vertebrae of struggling prey.
Chunks of meat rained down just mere feet below, his descent to street level halted at the last moment by his manifestation.
He knew not long it took him to fall from before, only that his return had been accelerated to the utmost. The fact he managed to emerge from a falling corpse instead of the air mopping at a splattered puddle was testament enough to his Frame’s pace.
His cog-feed came online to a spill of errors. He realized that he wasn’t so much seeing the world around him as he was feeling. Bound to the heart, three eldritch steeds stitched to a synchronous stride. He cast out his Whisper to scout ahead and add a layer of sight to his already expansive awareness.
A crackle of thoughtstuff leaked over into his mind. A session activated.
+How are the wings?+ Draus asked.


Turning his mind to his DeepNav, he found her two hundred feet ahead. His hastened return saw her lead blunted but not undone entirely.
That came with a single gallop of his winds. With but a single stretch, he zoomed, the Galesilther braying plumes of cascading wind as he trailed behind Draus’ rust-coated Zephyr.
+Handles like a dream,+ he replied.
REND CAPACITY: 1%
To ride the winds was like falling away from gravity. The nature of said travel, likewise, rubbed his mind raw with its strangeness. The steeds were steered by reins of vectored currents. Vectored currents that also bled into the whisks of their cloud-hewn manes, each strand a torquing whip capable of flensing paint from matter.
His trail marred the already battered surfaces of the gutters with new scars. Each gallop, each flowing stride, the air chiseled deep gashes through plascrete and squealed as it clashed against metal.
Sailing the winds infused him with lightness, but also a smallness. More than ever before, he sensed the size of things around him. Pebbles brushed against his touch. Abandoned aeros toppled and groaned as they slid, dragged away abandoned joyfiend camps.
Testing his canon, wrapped his winds around a rolling bottle and pulled it inward, leaving it spiraling and adrift in the Yondergales. A new weight settled in his non-existent gut. It was like he was storing things in his stomach, though he received no nourishment from the process.
Beneath him, the spreading webwork of layered streets was a divide between ruin and fortitude. The megablocks themselves rose as pillars holding up the sky while all they loomed over seemed toppled to some inflicted damage, some subtle decay.
Cracks and crevices became known to him as he washed over matter. Though the local area stood an abandoned plaza left darkened by missing holos and sparsity of traffic, there were enough flashes of thoughtstuff to remind him he wasn’t alone, that there were still those that squatted where they could.
More importantly, however, he felt it. That familiar place of his youth. Down an alley, he felt part of his new ontology slip out into another existence. The lurch he felt within himself nearly tore him out of his steed-infused state.
He had drifted over the length of a broken holo-ad pole. A holo-ad pole with an infected shadow–a rift point for ghouls and other horrors to intrude topside, straight from the seemingly infinite armory of the Low Masters.
Something Walton had a hand in.
Avo pushed those thoughts from his mind. He came here to hunt. That was forward.
Behind lay the fragments of his ego, of his code.
Moving matter brushed the contours of Avo’s perception, the wind like his skin and fingers both. His presence roamed four hundred feet wide, allowing him to caress the disfigurements that comprised much of the gutters.
The environment assailed him with its wrongness. The closest he could describe was urban undeath. The megablocks, guarded by Syndicate drones and enforcers, and bunker-like in design had themselves not escaped the touch of harm.
Ahead, the Ultimart shivered with growling music. Through his Whisper, he scried five distant shadows, their descent like spears sinking down through fissures of light from the heights past Layer One.
Constellations of unprotected minds glittered along the length of the spearships.
The Scalpers were bringing in their entertainment for the evening, preparing to drop them down along the narrow in-path flanked by both arms of the Ultimart.
Judging from how many wards ran along the curves, the general sequence planned for this Crucible took shape in Avo’s mind.
The spearships would land and release their prisoners into a kill box, feeding an additional spike of casualties to excite the watchers. The survivors would then be herded into the mall itself and made to traverse the winding pathways and storefronts on both arms while the Scalpers deployed specialized bioforms and hunters after them to end the night.
Gazing over into Draus’ mind, he flicked his gaze through the immensity of the mall and knew for a fact that little hope awaited the refugees.
Should he wait for them to start the festivities, it would make it easier for him to blitz them while they were distracted gunning down the helpless. But Avo really wasn’t feeling subtle.
Instead, he wanted to see what it felt like to be inside a crashing spearship.
Thoughtstuff came alight like speckles of light. A large concentration of specters and ghosts bubbled near the tip of the rightmost arm of the mall. A bulbous dome of cracked glass greeted his Whisper as he found himself wondering just what he was looking at. A packet of mem-data darted over from Draus.
The Scalpers had set up their operations center in an abandoned theatre.
Upon further study, he noticed that it was of the eldest variant: a stage of polished wood in the memories, looked down upon by an amphitheater of chairs and clapping watchers.
Not a vicarity theater then. Not even a movie theatre. This was a place of naked emotions, humans greeting others in sold-instances of make-believe. Walton had shown him memories of such a place. They were made on song and dance, and they relied little on the touch of the thaumaturgic, the technological.
Intimacy.
That was the term he was looking for.
Performers facing people. Themselves, but not.
And the Scalpers had set up their ghosts to infest such a place, ferrying in spectators to witness another bloodletting.


A kinder heart would have called it perverse. In his present mood, Avo merely found the contrast fascinating.
But in the depths of his Frame, another mind gurgled with displeasure. “Feckless curs. These partlings commit sacrilege. Though you use me not in the present, I beg of you, master, to make victims of them. They confuse the means of such a structure, and I fear they may use the wrong end of a blade for pleasure if such stands testament of your enemy’s stupidity.”
A beat followed. Avo’s mind spun as he tried to comprehend the last sentence. +Pleasure?+
Draus coughed. +Avo, it don’t matter–”

“It does matter!” The Woundshaper interrupted. “I speak of them defiling the very purpose of the architecture. This was not a place built to house their spirits. This is a place of song. Or once was. It should either remain so or have its patterns sipped and repurposed for another means.”
With the Woundshaper’s words came a new suspicion within Avo. Gods had their Heavens: forms representing how they were seen and how their powers are channeled. The one known as Saathwu was sovereign to both blood and matter, yet the architectural intent of things weighed on it as true as deception or an insult would weigh on a person.
Mayhaps it bore two domains, more than just its powers it seemed almost vectored to specific functions, yearning for both slaughter and creation. The desire for reconstruction was undeniable, as if the feelings were his own.
+Think you might’ve been a builder-god too?+ Avo asked.
“Impossible, master. Not as I am now. But perhaps a time upon a time, long before my second breaking, I was offered lifeblood to raise fluid cities.”
The faint wistfulness within the Heaven polluted Avo’s Metamind with a klaxon of unfamiliar confusion. He had known what the feeling was from his countless dives but never felt it arise from within before.
+Hundred feet to approach,+ Draus said, resetting his focus. She pulled to the side and peeled off, moving to circle the supermall, serving as overwatch instead of direct fire assistance. Avo could feel her mind working potential angles of infiltration. She would follow after stashing the aero along with Kae. +Alright, Avo. If you wanna hit ‘em you best hit ‘em hard and fast. Snuff the Necros and start the killin’ from the inside is what I suggest.+
+Necro first,+ Avo agreed. +Always kill the Necro first.+

Draus chuckled. +Alright. Go on. Make Old Lady Tavers proud. Your–uh–nu-horses are mighty loud, though. You might wanna fence that sound in before your galloping pulls their attention.+
And like diving under the water, Avo guided his Galeslither beneath the waves of reality, vanishing into another realm within the currents themselves. His senses narrowed into a snake-like path. Ahead, his Whisper bobbed past the surface of the wind, peering half-submerged in the tapestry of reality as if a phantasmal periscope.
Rolling tidal waves of storms and wind carried him forward as he felt his Rend grow. In this place between places, his steeds opened their mouths to scream.
All the wind around him served as their voice.
And, orbiting his center, a bottle tumbled through the air.


REND CAPACITY: 6%
So far, the Hell of his Galeslither was proving far superior to that which lined his Woundshaper. His Metamind estimated that he would still be at two percent if he hadn’t just shifted across dimensions. The operational time it provided him solidified his desire to ascend Burner’s Way when he was done here.
Darting ahead, he cut past a dozen patrolling light assault drones watching the perimeter. Draus’ judgment intruded. The Scalpers used these drones poorly, keeping them a scant fifty feet away from the mall proper instead of spread out through the air in an interception grid. Seeing as they were just below Nu-Scarrowbur, perhaps the syndicate didn’t think there was a need.

Their folly was his advantage, however, and Avo continued along his path, the weight of his being sending debris tumbling, husks of cars screeching across vacant lots.
As he crossed the curve of steps leading up toward the entrance of the theatre, positions were being marked in his cog-feed. Draus was sharing her targeting information with him, mapping out where the Scalper assault teams were. In seconds, she isolated all ten of their pockets.
As expected, they were scattered across the top story of the mall. She sent him flashes of mem-data. Their guns were already readied and primed while their armor cast them with skeletal holos, skulls with severed caps burning neon over their helmets.
Ten by ten. Ten enforcers for ten teams. One hundred guns for five hundred flats, ripe for the slaughter.
The air of the Nether was tinged with perverse excitement and building thrill.
Fittingly, Avo felt the same way.
Twisting against the laws of momentum, Avo shifted movement vectors without the need for deceleration, his track formed from platonic lore of wind and air, lacking the limitations of actual physics.
The drones were scanning for missiles. Sudden attacks bearing mass and numbers.
Alone, he was little more than a distortion in the wind, and this deep in the Warrens, his coming bore little notice when there was all of the dark to watch for.
Using his Whisper as a guide, he slipped past the perimeter guard and found himself twice-incensed at the lack of Specters.
+Necros ain’t doin’ their jobs,+ Draus said. +Might be because they think they’re having this party in their basement. That they’ll be able to scramble reinforcements real easy-like here.+
Hubris made victims of giants and cripples of gods. The Scalpers stood neither, and evidently, the attack they experienced in the Spine clearly didn’t leave a deep enough mark.
Perhaps repetition was needed there. Few things stressed the importance of learning than repeatedly dying. Avo could attest to that. Just a shame none of the Scalpers could.
Arcing, he descended toward the bulbous dome of the theatre, a falling artillery shell of screaming wind.
REND CAPACITY: 13%
His Hell was filling gradually, but the pace was languorous compared to his Woundshaper.
“And this is a fault of my making?”
Slipping through cracked planes of painted glass, his Whisper saw faces and figures disfigured upon the artistry, cracks petition the wholeness of their likeness. Below, a truck-sized locus spun, its presence a gleam bright chasm splashed upon his cog-feed, with new Specters filtering in each and every second.
Four square-shaped drones with articulations meant for engineering filtered through the room. The audience seating had unbolted by way of a fusion burner, the ground still ashen with soot and heat. Their absence made space for the position of said locus, while supplemental machines spilled from its open-clawed base.
Three Necros worked the room, their minds more uniquely warded than the others. Beneath the stage–pounded into a frozen tide of bent boards by an undetonated warhead still lodged through the wood–twenty drone-jocks lay slumbering. Neural needles ran plugged to the base of their skulls while minor locus above each of their stations hummed, doing their utmost to keep each operator in sync with a dozen or so machines.
Jocking was more management than it was piloting. Indeed, they represented the bulk of New Vultun’s martial forces these days, with enforcers a necessary reserve to hold territory, bioforms for another angle of attack, and then golems in place of now obsoleted coldtech vehicle platforms.
“--another ten-thousand casting in,” one the Necro’s said. She stood a bit taller than her two compatriots. Gazing upon her legs, two very different implants greeted his mind. Her left was a fifty-year-old S’Szwa Grasshopper-2, designed for running. Her right, meanwhile, was a Dynamite–a non-Guild street-grafter special that mesh of heavily armored chitin implanted with eight thrusters usually found on micro-missiles.
Enforcers tended to like that leg. Avo didn’t. He’d seen plenty of streams detailing what tended to happen to someone’s unaugmented pelvic region should the thrusters misfire at any point in the wrong direction.
The other two–her juniors, he guessed–stood next to her. One had a set of three extra arms rigged to their spine while the other seemed almost entirely clean of chrome beside the eyes.
An eclectic bunch.
Good thing they were all worth the same to him dead.
Avo dove. The senior Necro kept talking. A flash of curiosity possessed him as he tangled himself. In seconds, the weight of his presence shivered the room with swirling wind as he accelerated to his maximum velocity.
What remained of him outside the dome of the roof plunged inward. Metal warped and tore. Glass shattered entirely.
Eyes turned and minds spiked with alarm as he fell. The senior Necro noticed him–her hand blurred, the motion by instinct as she drew a large pistol and fired. The slugs skidded for the merest instant against Avo’s winds before he swallowed them, pulling them into the Yondergales as well.
And then, before anyone else could react, he enveloped the offending Necro in his grasp, and coiled himself, through skin, pore, orifice, and bone.
In a place between realities, the Galesilther carried the voice of its master, its neighs thundering with savage delight.
Her veins burst. Her skin–enhanced with polysynthetic fibers–shredded and tore. Bones swiveled, drilling through calcium. And for a final flourish, Avo released his grasp on the bottle and her bullets.
A rip opened between the currents. He listened as the shells flicked through her parting jaw, made wider yet by a suddenly emerging bottle. Screams flowed in from the outside, the other logisticians and Necros breaking before the unfathomable horror of facing an immaterial threat.
REND CAPACITY: 21%
THAUMIC CYCLER: 300 THAUM/c
SIPHONING GHOSTS … [21]
Ghosts: [263]
DOWNLOADING PHANTASMIC SEQUENCES…
DOWNLOADED
PHANTASMICS ACTIVE - [THOUGHTWAVE DISRUPTOR]; [BINARIST]
Ignoring the new phantasmics he just reaped, he shoved his full destructiveness through the passage of currents. The corpse of the Necro dematerialized as his steed emerged, coming apart as little more than mist and stray flecks of tissue.
A typhoon in a bottle, the Galeslither swirled into existence in a sudden cataclysm. Latching onto those yet living, he urged his Heaven to do a little prance along the room.
Bodies and machines were torn from the ground and pressed against the ceiling. He could feel their lungs straining as he sank his being down their throats. He found that he enjoyed the strain building within their chest as he forced screams back into the lungs from where they were pushed.
The resulting pops greeted him as a chorus of applause, a fitting final play as past came unmade upon gales of destruction. He stroked the walls with new paint, though his new victims passed from rupturing organs before they dissolved into smears.
He would have to find someone more durable to prolong his experimentation.
Just a pity so many Scalpers had fusion burners.
THAUMIC CYCLER: 322 THAUM/c
SIPHONING GHOSTS … [35]
Ghosts: [298]
A list of new phantasmics flashed through his cog-feed and vanished upon rejection. Nothing new, and nothing he couldn’t replicate.
The grinding sound of the locus base twisted into folded petals of metal pulled him from one reverie to another. He noticed that the locus was still functional and that spectating Specters were still coming through.
A memory spiked through his mind–the unpleasant delight of having voyeuristic parasites suckle amusement by using him as a vessel.
From such unpleasantness came inspiration, however, and a special concoction of cruelty was roused.
REND CAPACITY: 29%
The winds lifted into stilling tides. The steeds faded. From behind a cloud of dust and falling debris, Avo reformed himself into flesh to better gaze upon the dangling locus.
He and Draus had done much to harm the Scalpers. To provoke them.
So far, however, all that they have taken were replaceable. New golems could be smuggled, and new meat came cheap in this city.
Trust, however, was a thing less easy to reforge.
And the lives of those in the Tiers were infinitely more valued than the ones below.
Avo loaded Secondhand Death into his Ghostjack as he approached the physical shell of the Scalper’s local lobby.
How many did the Necro say just arrived? Ten thousand? He would take a peek, and then decide to wait a moment longer.
Or to sever whatever length of the snake had dared dangle down from the tree immediately.
He had never nulled a few hundred thousand people at once before. He wondered if a few hundred shattering minds would feel any different to him than one.
+Auspine? Auspine?
Yeah–yeah! I’m trying to get to her too, half-strand, calm the fuck down!
What do you mean you think her ghost is missing?
If she got nulled or snuffed, we’d be getting alarm bells now. Thoughtcasts calling for backup or something. But there’s nothing on the drone perimeter, so doubt they’re in the shit. Might be just bad N-lag…
Send a knot down to patrol anyway. It’s probably nothing but—
Wait, something’s wrong with the lobby. The traffic’s disappearing…
Hells with it. I’m casting in. Give me a secon–
[SESSION LOST]+
-Intercepted thoughtcast of Kendrin Carlwin, Scalper Operational Dispatch
7-11
Feed the Beast (IV)
+Avo! Avo! What the hells are you doing?+
Concomitant to his intrusion of the locus, a spike of alarm followed, the harshness of Draus’ thoughts. Her outrage was unexpected, but ultimately impotent on her end.
+Making new problems.+
He possessed both the ability to create and choice to inflict such a reprisal upon the spectators. Mayhaps there was a bit of envy in her as well: she could but slaughter the symptoms in her time, butchering hunters and extracting survivors.
Her actions, though commendable by standards of virtue, meant little to stymie the cultural contagion of atrocity fueling these depths.

The topsiders were drunk on entertainment. Drunk on slaughter. Drunk on death.
She wasn’t hitting the right people. She was hitting their parasites–the Syndicates easily replaceable material, profit-seeking fresh meat that desired, for once, to be the ones delivering abuse.
Across the session, he heard Draus muttering curses under her breath. Her frustration came mixed with a flustered tone repeating statements in the back of her mind. She was trying to put together something Kae was asking. +Avo, listen to me–+
+Opportunity, Draus,+ Avo said. Delight bloomed from flower to garden within him as the act called to him. With his Heavens, he now possessed the capacity to inflict mortal harm to all Crucibles.
How total could one’s retribution be?
+They watched us. Slithered under my skin. Enjoyed me killing. Enjoyed me dying.+ He paused as a shadow of Essus nagged. A pang of disappointment accompanied the reminder of the man. +They killed the boy. Others. Essus. He was weak. But… survived. Deserved better.+
Avo paused. Even departing from the being that he once was, some beliefs remained unshed.
The father was easy to hurt. Easy to prey upon. The same reality lingered on the boy as well.
But they did all they could. They struggled. They almost survived–would’ve, if not for Little Vicious succumbing to spite, fulfilling her sadism.
A new epiphany came ablaze within Avo. The hunger he once felt for the father was a fading candle now. The beast noted him as a nu-tiger would a rodent: barely worth chewing. The father was only guilty of being a fool.
+He earned better,+ Avo finished.
A beat came from the other side. A faint symmetry of understanding manifested in Draus’ mind. +It ain’t about that. It ain’t about justified or not. I don’t give a godsdamned shit about the voyeurs.+ She paused. +Jaus knows I hoped for the Tiers to burn more than once. But if you do this… You attack the FATED, we’re not gonna be playin’ with easy prey no more, sync? The Guilds are gonna bring the hammer down on this Sovereignty so hard that the Syndicates’ll get two choices. Disappear; be disappeared. And then they’ll start digging around for us.+
And she thought such a thing was going to dissuade him? Avo hissed out a low laugh. +Good. Smash the board. Ruin the game.+
+That what this is? Tryin’ to throw off Ninth Column… whoever the fuck else tuggin’ strings too?+
Avo smiled. +Easy opening. I’m going to leave a ghost. Conflux ghost. Have it bleed over into the root. More pressure on Mirrorhead. More chaos to reinsert Chambers and have him deliver false intelligence during infiltration. Force Mirrorhead to make bad choices.+
Draus considered his thoughts as a dull, but undeniable thrill grew within her.
The Woundshaper chimed within him, its tone a melody of glee. “She is of a want with us. She fights with paltry denial, but truth made nude, she wishes to see the fire spread, just as we. For what else can be worthy fruit to a lifetime of embattled labor in these ravaged narrows?+
A note of pure discomfort slid out from Draus mind, sounding akin to a jagged blade catching along a chalk scabbard. His actions made her wary. They made her anxious. They made her excited. Strange sounds came from a strange cocktail of emotions.+You’re just gonna do this. Don’t matter what I say, does it?+
+Choice is mine.+ Avo said. +Maybe you could have convinced me if they taught argumentation to you. Rhetoric.+ He mockingly clicked his fangs together.
+Half-strand. You keep whatever you doing clean. And we pull the fuck out right after.+ He could feel her shaking her head. +This shithole is going to be louder than a nest of artnids diggin’ through a corpse. I’m gonna need to make a cast at River.+
+I’m going to Burner’s Way after,+ Avo said. +Scalpers will come down. Distracted. More reprisals against Conflux. Fewer eyes on their perimeter. I’ll get Rendsinks. Get new Heaven. Keep session going. Will need to talk with Kae later.+
She said something right after but he listened to little of it. The bulk of his focus was recommitted to seeing the lobby perverted to a new purpose.

With three Necros on location, the complexity of wards protecting the locus could charitably be described as minimal. A single layer of rippling waves greeted his cog-feed as he studied it. Looked like an Omnitech pattern he was familiar with: the Signet Flowshield. Effective at withstanding a mass of brute force trauma, but less apt in responding to slow blades, tailor-made to pierce the veil.
The concepts of memories parallel and opposition applied. Obvious traumas would crack against the protections with minimal effect, making Secondhand Fatality and his other standard Ghostjack functions less useful.
Given some hours of scrying and shifting through sequences, he could have made the perfect toxin to bypass hardened flesh.
Ultimately, however, such things were unnecessary. He had the ghosts of the three Necros, and filtered through the recollections he captured and retrieved the mem-codes.
It took less than a minute for him to pull the necessary sequence to interface with the locus. As he cast the phantasmal keystone into the waters of the lobby, the twisting waves laced with screaming faces parted to expose the depths of mem-data that flowed beneath.
GHOST-LINK ESTABLISHED
LOBBY - NS-14
Active Visitors - [296,034]
Gazing up at the Specters swirling around the locus like a flock of birds, he tasted their growing impatience and ignorance. They remained bound in the inner depths of the lobby, playing new mem-sims with one another to pass the time.
More were flowing in, the number of attendees spiking upward by an average of ten thousand per minute.
“Blind fools, they,” the Woundshaper said. “It is an ill thing to tread upon foundations one has not ascertained. To entrust one’s faith in apathy and ignorance is to court my contempt. They disgust me, master. Know that you dispense great justice.”
Its words made Avo chuckle. “You don’t care about justice. Just want to see them break.”


“You fling contrary words at misunderstood semantics, master. Justice is valued within me, but you conflate its meaning with virtue. Do you think me a gluttonous savage? A beast of avarice like that feeble thing that quivers beneath your veins?”
The beast snarled, confused at where the offense was coming from. To its feeble mind, it was as if the blood coursing within had taunted it.
“Indeed, we wish to grow. But you wish to ascend. I hear it in you. The desire for the change. The metamorphosis from failed monsters to predator proper. So true do my desires ring. The fire grows to feed what we wish to see. Dominance and freedom for you. And the power to give rise to living cities and birth crimson arsenals for me. Why else ascend? Why else dream?”
He fed the inner structure with Secondhand Fatality, subverting the internal sequences of mem-data with chains of pure trauma. Chains that all the visitors would have to pass along should they wish to enter the premises and lay gaze upon the show.
Given more time, he could have made a mem-con to spread the devastation even further. Such a thing would infest even the Tiers with substantial damage. But it would also draw deeper attention to his methods.
And he didn’t need a team of Incubi hunting for him. Such a fight was beyond his current readiness.
Besides, this slaughter was his gift to the voyeurs. Those that lay beyond concerned him little for now.
With a simple thought, he shed a ghost loose into the root functions of the lobby. One that bore the memories of a Conflux enforcer, once it was discovered.
Ghosts: [297]
For a second, Avo waited, savoring the stroke of brutality he was about to inflict.
The sound of encroaching boots thundered from the outside as a marker moved across his cog-feed. One of the tags Draus had left on a Scalper fireteam was approaching, no doubt to check why the local Necros had gone silent after the sudden storm that engulfed the insides of the theatre.
They approached ten in number, with the sounds of an additional drone as support.
It wouldn’t help them.
Looking up, Avo cast his Whisper through the ceiling to stare at the thin cracks of light pouring through the fissures between the plates of Layer One.
The precipice of morality was behind this city; above it. It loomed as a cliff New Vultun had long fallen from before even the ghouls and Syndicates, let alone his new and coming transgression.
He felt no weight for the impeding deed for there was no weight to be felt. The watchers on the Tiers lived such indolent lives of succor, fattening themselves in a purgatory they regarded as paradise. A prize for second place, living in the neat slave kennels at the bases of each Guild’s respective Elysiums.
But there was a cost to living like dogs, and that was the fact that sometimes, you end up dying for a war you never even knew existed.
Something that Avo had only recently learned himself.
He injected a new thought. He changed a binary function within the lobby. Access for visitors went from restricted, to open.

And in the passage of seconds, as a torrent of users made to travel down the pathways of corrupted memory, thousands shredded away into echoing screams of mental shrapnel, their vestiges slashing through the inside of the lobby like cascading bombs.
Before his eyes, a vast tear opened up as the crystalline facets of the spinning locus overheated and cracked, and beyond the gaze of natural eyes, he watched as mangled Specters oozed through the wounds.
From the ruinous chasm came a symphony–sweet, sweet percussion with a choir of mind-breaking howls. Again, music flowed through the theatre, strummed free from nulled ghosts that once cupped the minds of lecherous watchers.
With the cage broken, an eruption of phantasmal errors plumed outward, engulfing the unseen sky above base reality, the seas of the local Nether cast into tsunamis of turmoil.
Crackling gasps snapped in the back of his mind as Draus’ words were choked down to packets, carried over only by the pseudo-quantum delivery functions of their shared session. +Jaus. I see it… see it from here.+
A faint warmth of pleasure passed through Avo. Would Walton be offended of this feat of Necrotheugic terrorism? Would the Low Masters rejoice at the harm he inflicted on the topsiders? How absurd that the dreams of his owners could only come to fruition through his emancipation.
Perhaps, then, that was what the node had wanted. Another deviation. This time, to see what their beloved ghoulling could inflict if finally unchained.
The Scalper fireteam was approaching, their signatures eighty feet away, just outside the walls. They didn’t matter. They were just lambs charging a lion. Fuel and little more for the burn within him.
Pulling his eyes away from the growing constellation of nulled ghosts, Avo drew upon his Heaven once more.
With a stride, he peeled out of the material world, flesh turning to torrents of howling air. The winds he became twirled into small vortexes and fused into a triple-headed steed. Upward, he smashed through the broken dome above, the force of his ascent lifting mangled remains and unbolted objects.
His rise came dichotomous to the spewing cataclysm of thoughtstuff bleeding into the Nether: twin omens that the fireteam should have heeded.
Below, he saw the Scalpers take loose formations, unprepared for his falling. Through his Whisper, he saw their kit and angled his approach.

All were enforcers. All came clad in battle-worn rigs. The true danger were the breachers–of which there were two–and the fusion burners they had attached to their arms. Of what little threat this group possessed, they held a majority stake.
Quelling his Heaven momentarily, Avo sailed back into his mortal form, calling upon the eldritch workings of his Hell for the first time.
With a thought, the winds around the Scalpers beneath him twisted and blossomed into an inverted vortex. Spreading in broken fractals given shape by torquing currents of air, the two breachers of the group were immediately rooted to place. Submerged in a spatial stasis, they strained, voices barking expletives distorted by static.
REND CAPACITY: 28%
The Rend percentage dipped in Avo’s cog-feed. To see it undone, the other Scalpers would need to fire into the bubble to feed the Hell the momentum it hungered for lest they leave the breachers in for a long stay.
Unfortunate that none of them knew how his Hell worked. Or would even survive long enough to find out.
The fireteam was spread along the exterior of the theatre’s walls, in position to cut their way in by firing through the walls. Behind them, the floor extended for sixty feet before it met the railing, and beyond that, a forty-foot drop to the deck below.
Reflexes surging, Avo checked his DeepNav for the other fireteams. They were spread out across the complex, too far to be of immediate assistance unless they just started blind firing in his direction using the thoughtstuff of their fellows as a mem-lock.
Good. That gave him opportunities to experiment.
Rendered languid by his accelerated senses, Avo resheathed himself into the vessel of his wind-striding steed and crashed down upon the Scalpers in a tide of force.
The drone accompanying them was chained by Ghost-Link to one of their number–a necessity now that all the jocks were dead. It fired upon his last known position with twin barrels. A leak of knowledge flowed over from Draus as she recognized the weapon platform: a Hammerdog Chainsaw, with Hammerdog being an arms and armor subsidiary under Highflame.
This particular drone was a hundred and fifty years past obsolescence, but its twin twenty-five-millimeter autocannons fired all the same. Tickling his aero-natural skin, Avo tasted the rounds. Hard slugs with explosive payloads.
Each shot would have made pulp of a ghoul.
The winds around the drone opened. He tugged into the Yondergales, its guns still firing, barrels a hot weight against his mind. With his Whisper as an eye–the fin of a shark beneath waves of wind–Avo diverted all ghosts to his Ghostjack and wards.
The Scalpers didn’t seem to have a combat Necro, but Incogs always put “seem” into doubt.
A lash of traumas crackled forth through his Whisper. The enforcer connected to the Chainsaw cried out. Their wards fractured. Their Ghost-Link overloaded. The drone stopped firing, and tumbled away, resetting to auto.
Still, though, the Scalper’s mind had held. Impressive. Avo marked him for sequence review later, once he was dead.
Accessing the now vulnerable locus of the drone, Avo cackled and the storm-wreathed faces of his steed spread into cruel rictuses. A new system booted in the back of his mind as mem-data flowed.
Without hesistation, he let open a passage to the Youndergales again and shoved the drone out with a helping gust.
This time, its guns were pointed the right way.
“Sir, sir! Apologies for the interruption but–there’s been a spike of nullings. Origination: Nu Scarrowbur.”
“Nu Scarrowbur? That’s–uh–that’s Scalper territory. In the Warrens. Stormtree problem. I told you this before, rook, we don’t touch Guild shit–”


“I’ve traced the source. It’s coming from the gutters. Sir… our monitors across emergency services are showing three-hundred thousand mind-deaths. At least. All casualties FATED. From the Tiers. Sir, I think someone spiked a lobby. A-a Crucible’s lobby. That’s… uh, my theory.”


“...Fuck.”
-Trainee Kare Kitzuhada to Paladin Maru Sandrupal
7-12
Feed the Beast (V)
REND CAPACITY: 32%
The song of the autocannon played an alloy of notes: the snapping plink of an impact when the bullet kissed armor, the thunderous roar that followed right after, and a climax of flesh bursting within a titanium can.
The drone, its size comparable to a small aerovec, was firing from within a current-sheared tear upon the fabric of space. Overlayed across his right eye, Avo watched as the Chainsaw's ammo vanished.
3405/9000
Near six thousand rounds drained away in mere seconds. Barrel integrity was lined orange in the drone's structural condition window. Worn, but usable, which was about as good as most things the Syndicates had.
At least the Scalpers seemed to care for their kit.
The enforcers, new and unblooded, remained a step behind, lacking sophisticated implants and stuttering in surprise at the change in their initiation ceremony.
A deluge of wind and steel battered them.
Two of their group tumbled back, bumping into the same bubble as the breachers. The newcomers found their bodies halted as the inverted winds swirling about drank their momentum away, trapping them all the same. Immediately, Avo felt his Rend drop. Fused between a border of stasis, a rain of rounds shattered against their rigs, fragmenting shrapnel bursting from their bodies and feeding his Hell further.
REND CAPACITY: 30%
The carnage played on. The other six responded with collapse and indiscipline.
One fired as the Chainsaw clipped their shoulder. Their aim jerked off trajectory with their finger still on the trigger. An accident followed, their gauss repeater surging as one of their comrades–the one Avo struck with his Secondhand Fatality, still dazed from the mental assault–stumbled in front of the barrel.
With armor thinner than the hardness of their wards, blood and bone flowed free, the shot birthing brain-gristle-encrusted flechettes through a rent in the enforcer's faceplate.
He was not the only casualty.
By mass and firepower alone, the Chainsaw struck joints, the impacts folding joints and limbs. Armpits and necks burst open into spurts of hyper-oxygenated red. Three more toppled, limbs twisted, screams loud.
Another of the Scalpers fired back, more steel on the inside than his companions. He fired thrice, each ringing off the drone plating at an angle.
Avo rewarded him by unzipping spatial reality beneath his feet and sending him tumbling into the Youndergales. The enforcer spun in this concentric plane of cyclonic catastrophe. Their terror flowed raw even through their wards. For a frozen instant, they spiraled behind the drone, gun lost to their grasp as they groped blindly for a solid surface.
A wish that came fulfilled. Avo opened a new gulf in their path and released them.
Right back into the other Scalpers at terminal velocity.
Rigs were more effective than typical subdermals at increasing one's survivability. Yet, the tyranny of the third law remained when untouched by the reality-bending fingers of thaumaturgy.
Near two tons of mass bore approximately twenty thousand newtons of force. Such was what the Phys-Sim told Avo. The clash of rig meeting rigs rang in a deafening sound as more fell. A blur of shadows and sparks painted a portrait of chaos, of defeat.
The chains of courage broke in what few of them remained as they turned to run.
Avo grew tired of playing with his prey.
Opening gulfs between currents slithering into the cracks in the enforcers' armors, he directed his drone's firepower past the can and into the meat.
The shudder a person makes when their body splatters inside their rig is a unique one. It's a sudden, uneven jerk, with limbs flopping in opposite directions, with heads toppling because the neck that used to be there just wasn't anymore.
He released a command. The drone stopped firing. His Celerostylus relaxed.
Time slid back into pace as bodies toppled before him, a series of thudding impacts.
Stepping through parting mists, Avo manifested in his mortal shell to better behold the glories of his labor. The stench of exposed offal flowed free from jutting openings–organs and bone revealed between strips of mangled metal.
THAUMIC CYCLER: 330 THAUM/c
Ghosts: [305]
The dead lay as petals extended from a sphere of wind. Bound still by a momentum-drinking prison, the breachers could not turn, could not see as he walked around them.
Moment by moment, he felt his Rend diminish. Where the Hell of his Woundshaper filled fast and emptied fast, the one bound to his Galeslither balanced slower but had the advantage of being affixed. All it took to deploy this Hell was a thought. A working. Then, as it formed like a cancerous pocket, he could remain operational otherwise.
While the burn on his nerves subsided, Avo considered the two breachers a moment longer before plucking a gun from the ground--a large weapon left discarded by one among the dead. Peeking a gaze upon the Chainsaw's status, he saw it was empty of bullets and battered by his winds. He released it from his control and found himself by the ringing thud that followed.
His Metamind's in-built Possessor phantasmic wasted no time in interlacing with his new gun's micro-locus.
Vinhalyyr Rhythm
It settled in his hands a comfortable weight, feeling more as if a solid bar of metal than a loose assembly of fragile components that so many guns were these days. With a square-shaped barrel and a holo-reticle at the top, the weapon had a makeshift feeling to it. Like it could be produced by the thousand for troops in need of constant firepower.
He expanded its specs with a thought.
Vinhalyyr Rhythm
Infantry-carry Anti-Rig Multi-Function Assault Rifle
Magazine capacity: 40 Microrockets
Maximum Rate of Fire: 5 Rockets/s
Rockets:10 cm
1 kg of explosive material
Maximum Effective Range: 2000 Meters
Meters. Not feet. Made sense. Stormtree used different measurements, and Vinhalyyr was most certainly a Stormtree-owned business.
With this moment of brief respite, he desired to test something.
Pulling the trigger, the gun gave the barest of kicks as its payload rattled free. A clicking noise came from inside the weapon. Likely a component knocked loose during the fight earlier.
As the rockets greeted his bubble, they halted against the surface on impact, unmoving while Avo watched his Rend percentage drop. In seconds, he had consumed half his ammo while his capacity was only reduced by the merest percents. The gun wasn't doing the trick; the sheer distance and velocity his Galeslither could generate was beyond what a single shot could plug.
He needed something constant to feed the Hell. Some consistent vector of motion to push against the counter-pushing flow of the spatial winds...
Another fissure of ghosts opened along the Nether. A sudden epiphany followed. He could game his Rend using reality itself by pocketing someone or something mid-fall. As far as he could tell, gravity still held sway. He could use physics to drain the excess.
It took but a thought for him to dispel his Hell, the cage of collapsing wind bursting over the stumbling breachers as he felt the pressure of the presences fade from his vectored currents. Both Scalpers toppled forward, bodies unsteady as their lungs made a desperate sawing noise, as if drawing in breath after a long bout of suffocation.
The same lungs likely popped when he shot them in the back.
THAUMIC CYCLER: 332 THAUM/c
Ghosts: [307]
Metal warped inwards as their bodies collapsed. Their deaths came without much fanfare. Just choked sputters and damaged spines, the damage inflicted made blunt by their rigs, but lethal all the same. Scooping their bodies with a scything gust, he sent the ten Scalpers and the Chainsaw toward the edge as he expanded another bubble but a foot into the fall.
The relief was slow but immediate. His Hell balanced as the combined mass of the fire team hovered upon the circumference of the sphere, the laws of reality serving as milk to the nature of his Rend.
For a few moments, he contented himself to watch, to study the functions of his Hell.
The Galeslither possessed an endurance with this Hell, but it lacked the intensity and tempo his Woundshaper could deliver. Before, at the least.
He had yet to experiment with its limitations. Part of him desired to see how unbalanced it was with the Heaven outweighing his new Hell so.
REND CAPACITY: 28%... 27%... 13%... 4%... 0%
Yes, perhaps he should take the opportunity and--
A series of cries diverted his attention. Four hundred feet away and a deck down, accretions were winking out. His DeepNav positioned them along novelty mem-sim shop. Avo frowned.
+Draus. Are you taking food from my mouth?+
His message was marred and distorted by the ongoing turmoil affecting the local Nether, but the message he got from the Regular was clear.
Speed up.
In seconds another few lives were snuffed, this time winking out across multiple teams.
Desperate cries rose across the vast curve of the mall as the Scalpers blindly fired back, their own guns punching through glass and plascrete. Mag-flung flechettes and heavy kinetics tore through the gutters, their attempt to kill Draus more delusion of volume rather than a retaliated deliberation of precision.
They didn't know what they were aiming for.
A flash of her cog-feed bled through their session. Just for an instant.
He caught sight of her pulling another shot through the head of another one of his victims. The Woundshaper bubbled, the veins within Avo humming to the tune of praise. Draus was using him and the return fire from the Scalpers to triangulate her shots.
Avo growled. This was revenge. This was retribution for him nulling all those spectators. She couldn't stop him from committing what she considered to be folly, and now he couldn't stop her from snatching his playthings away.
A low laugh reverberated from the fires that burned inside him. "Ah, half a full person though she is, she does please me. I would have coveted having a huntress of her like during my time. So eager to kill. So eager to spite. Of course, she would have to die if born apart from the lines of the Matriarchs. A pity, but such is the life of a partling."
Two fire teams were gone from his sight already. Twenty ghosts and echoes of Essence snatched from his fingers.
"Do not be hysterical, master. We are not far from the corpses of our adversaries. Pass by and we shall be fed regardless. There are no other gods down here but we."
"Wanted to kill them myself."
"Ah. So it is impotence that wounds your nature. Do try to shed it. Such a thing is for children and pets. And you are not a pet anymore, are you master?"
Avo wasn't used to being taunted by a freeloader that dwelled within his blood. He decided he really didn't like it.
"To the part where you slay yourself, then. We both know that the Galeslither will not stop her from picking your quarry clean before you even arrive. She is striking them true across the distance of leagues and through the thick of walls. You play a game of twisting and tearing with formless fingers. A harder game. One that will doubtlessly amuse her when she gets to shoot the floating targets before they sink into your grasp."
The reluctance he felt toward suicide lasted but a second before he saw another phantasmal presence wink out.
"The winds are not sufficient to outpace her. Lift them and she will use you as but an archery range--a gallery for her targets. You know what must follow, yes?"
"My food!" Avo snarled.
Following that, tucking the Rhythm under his chin and pulling the trigger proved to be an act of disconcerting ease.
The world burst apart, existence unfurling into a twist of error codes and flashing white.
And then, Avo felt the familiar drop as he tumbled back into the eldritch dawn he housed within.
INITIALIZING RESURRECTION - 1%
Diving down into the root of his Soul, he basked consciousness in cleansing flames as he tuned the speed of his return to its utmost variable.
Resurfacing, he ejected himself from the Galeslither, diving out its lightning-cracked chest as the winds lost their animation. Grey to his sight, the Woundshaper greeted him with an emanation of smugness, the atmosphere around it rank with arrogance.
"Stop that," Avo growled.
"Alas, but I am unable. You flatter me so very much with the haste of your approach."
"Want Heaven. Not you. You're luggage."
"Such is a matter of semantics. There is no difference between me and the Heaven in ontology. Perhaps once, when my Soul burned separate from my shell, I would have argued differently…"Avo missed the days when his blood couldn't talk to him. Unable to kill, eat, or remove the problem, he committed to his next best choice: pretending it didn't exist.
As it turned out, it was hard to choke the Heaven of Blood when one was not mantling said Heaven of blood.
HEAVEN GRAFTED - [WOUNDSHAPER]
DOMAIN: (BLOOD/MATTER)
THAUMIC REQUIREMENTS - 265 THAUM/c
Around him, the spire that was once the Sangeist embraced him, binding itself to the nucleus of his Soul through veins of flowing crimson. Twin sigils ignited in his awareness, markings more intricate and severe than those of his Galeslither.
He checked his resurrection.
RESURRECTION - 66%
"Slow," Avo complained.
"Would not but such a matter upon you if you would have only used me in the first place."
"Couldn't fly."
"Ah, but I can leap. I can achieve speeds beyond the feebleness of your steed. Grow me further and the air will turn ablaze upon my skin. Rebind me to better hubris and find me more stable Hell, and I shall deliver upon our adversaries annihilation absolute."
Another moment passed. The weight of impatience was upon Avo even without the touch of neurochemistry.
RESURRECTION - 90%
"Remember to fire your little organ when we emerge. It appears to accelerate your senses."
"I know."
"I am merely ensuring you recall best practices."
"Stop it."
RESURRECTION - 100%
The light of existence approached.
Mem-data booted, filling Avo's mind. He paid them no heed.
Tearing back into the world with a snarl, the thing Avo noticed was the diminishment in the number of Scalpers. The tags of three other fireteams were already missing. Draus was moving onto her fourth, firing across the way at the opposite arm of the mall.
She was depriving him. Starving him of deserved kills.
"Be it so deserved if she kills them first?" the Woundshaper asked.
"Half-strand," Avo cursed. He didn't know if he was speaking to his Heaven or Draus. He frowned. He didn't like it. He didn't use to curse before.
From on high, the low notes of descending engines thundered, the three spearships circling above as if unclear the situation.
Flexing his Celerostylus as hard as he could, the pace of time found itself lingering just barely ahead of Avo's acceleration.
A whip of blood tore out from his wrist and spread into threads. From the slain Scalpers he siphoned what he could, and from the matter around him, he liquified even more.
REND CAPACITY: 39%
Avo's eyes widened at the near-instant spike. It had been less than a second, and he had barely more than two tons wrapped around him. Two tons for an immense amount of Rend. Working fast, he instilled the blood around him with a canon of Linger, freezing it in place so that he might continue drawing from it.
From all things solid, he siphoned more material mass and digested them into blood. The clock was ticking. Draus was going to kill everything if he didn't hurry. The beast inside him whimpered. The Woundshaper spurred him on, calling for him to alchemize faster, that the surrounding aesthetics offended it.
REND CAPACITY: 98%
VENT NOW! VENT NOW!
Not yet a second and eight tons. He would need to vent now, but after reaching ten tons, he would wait no longer. He calculated his route using his Phys-Sim. Still six teams left. Six teams and the ships. He could hit each and every one of the Scalpers ahead of him. Build up more blood, more speed.
Already, he had the foundations of a small tower about himself. Reaching out, he felt its strength press back, with cords of vascular thickness augmenting the enhanced Heaven of Blood. The new strength imbued in its form felt as if a shaking base.
Emptying his entropy into the edge of the deck, he carved more than thirty feet of material out of existence to quell his Rend.
What remained was entirely occupied by his present size. A present size that was set to grow more as he added two more tons, eating away the outer walls of the theatre. Tendrils drained physical structure into building veins of vascularity as he pumped newly alchemized mass into the broadening frame of his Woundshaper.
From a mere eight feet, Avo felt himself rise another twelve as he reached ten tons.
With each increment of mass, a new might filled his constructed limbs, the shell around him growing not only stronger but faster. Where the world was as if moving through sludge before, now it seemed near frozen before his gaze.
Ten tons. Ten times his natural strength. Ten times his natural speed.
Paired with his Celerostylus, a thought appealed to his ego: what need did he have to be the storm when he could just drag it in his wake?
He spurred himself to a gallop, manifesting tentacles pounding down--and through--the ground beneath. Surging, the space around him shattered in blasts of plascrete, while tides of detritus rose high, cleaved high as parting sprays by the sheer velocity left in his wake. The world blurred as he drove forward, his size a boulder crackling at the speed of a lashing whip. Even with his reflexes tuned high, his velocity was evident. Around the frame of his Heaven, the winds bent, the ground split, and he fell upon his first victims, ignorant of his approach.
He rode forth an unnoticed omen of oblivion, his pace beyond the perception granted by standard street-squire implants.
From the structure of his Heaven birthed bladed limbs and lashing tendrils. What walls stood in his way were but things to smash through or liquefy, matter but binary states for him to interchange.
Ahead, the remaining markers for each team called out to him like milestones, the melody of his rising Rend screaming for his awareness.
REND CAPACITY: 89%
What followed bore no semblance to battle.
What battle was there to be had when a ten-ton god moving at six hundred and fifty miles per hour impacted a dozen bodies encased in meager shells of titanium?
The same outcome could be observed when a swarm of insects fails to evade the path of an oncoming aero.
If nothing else, their smears fed into his being all the same.
THAUMIC CYCLER: 342 THAUM/c
Ghosts: [317]
At such slaughter, the beast chortled in delight, but within Avo's greater wholeness, the first hints of bitterness began to spread.
“It… it let us go. It just let us go.
There was a moment I–I thought–oh, Jaus, you should have heard his breath. There was nothing human there. Nothing. Heard that sound before I did! From Duskraptors. Looking for prey. Proper prey.
It was powerful. A god! We could feel it. Feel the wind heeding its will.
I’m from the Gulclines–in its gorges–I–I
The things it let us do–the slavers–
[Sobbing, mixed with laughter]
We felt their pain. He wanted us to feel their pain.
It was glorious. It was glorious. There is a god worth praying to yet in this go–godsdamned city.”
-Paladin Interview of Refugee Req Tnaqin after the “Laced Crucible Incident”
7-13
Proper Prey
Avo killed.
His Soul brightened; expanded.
The Scalpers, new and feeble as they were, died by the dozen.

But past the few twenty killings or so, while the beast shook with overwhelming delight, Avo found himself strangely displeased. The struggles of the enforcers occupied only the borders of his focus, their forms too slow to react, too weak to survive and offer amusement.
They died as he found himself lost in the labyrinth of his own mind, and its riddle was one of disappointment.
By blood and Rend he saw his foes unmade, sacking the temple of their bodies for blood before cleaving their withered husks with the backdraft of his gales.
Amidst the slaughter, perhaps only one managed to get a shot off. Even then, they missed.
The greater difficulty, he discovered, was traveling from one team to the next, keeping his Rend in check, keeping a tally of the pleasure Draus snatched from his grasp. Here, in the end, he studied his last victim with growing frustration. The whimpering enforcer crawled away from him nude of rig and skin, her remaining muscles glistening, flesh flayed with savage efficiency.
He had taken her legs as well. He couldn’t remember when. By testament of will, augmentation, and adrenaline, she pawed forth, her voice a guttural mix of sobs and snarled curses, broken fingers digging into what scattered debris lay piled from the force-carved surface of the ground.
A faint recollection greeted Avo. His unnatural acceleration–boosted further by each ton of swelling mass–proved more than the architecture could handle. At some point, the ruination he inflicted, the matter he drained away, grew beyond what the structure could support.
From there, the topmost deck collapsed, descending like in a tidal wave of plascrete and glass, an artificial landside.
The new strength suffusing Avo’s ontology made him feel a stone upon paper and glass. The devastation he left in his wake marked his movements like falling artillery rather than accelerated strides. Moreover, where the threshold of his force felt insufficient, his command over alchemy proved absolute.
Matter was his plaything. Matter was a feeling–a mood. A binary choice for him twisted between blood and not, with patterns easily fed to the cage that burned upon the apex of his Woundshaper.
But a month ago, his present feat of power and harm inflicted on a near-hundred chromed bruisers would have left him drunk with awe. The horror he inflicted through the lobby? Unfathomable. Unthinkable.
Only a team of well-armed, well-supported, well-prepared street squires could have infiltrated such a place and subverted the locus as he did. And even then, the possibility of such a team cracking the wards was in question.
Yet, as he stared upon the last Scalper, as he watched the spearships begin their turn, the weight of a malaise came over him. Dissatisfaction.
“Ah,” his Woundshaper said. “Familiar bitterness, long have you been apart from me. Be not concerned. Such is customary for your nature. The emptinesses. The desire to seek higher peaks. A louder thrill. It takes little for the chains of your biology to acclimate to your newfound elevation in this… iron jungle.”
The dying enforcer called out for someone. A father perhaps. Her words were cast out, howled over the crumpled railings of the first deck. A wide, pearlescent path lit with neon arrows running out into the looming bleakness of the gutters beyond.
Someone would hear her out there. But it wouldn’t be the one she sought.
A low snarl hissed free from between Avo’s fangs. Encased within the striding tower that was the Woundshaper, the noise went unheard by the world, belonging to him and him alone. He checked his Rend and made to finish this slaughter.
REND CAPACITY: 89%
A hooking tendril dug into the hood of skin left jiggling upon her shoulders. The shrieks she made as he lifted her like a half-skinned rabbit from the ground made the ghosts swirling about his thoughtstuff quiver and his wards rattle. Dangling from a hinge of sinew and meat, he found himself glaring down at the pitiful creature tortured empty of her humanity.
And worst of all, she couldn’t meet his eyes, for hers was rolling upward, ever upward. Where she remained in vessel, she was long absent in mind.
“Why?” Avo growled.
This day was set to end so well, so deliciously. But somewhere along the way, the rapture of the killing faded from him, and only low doses of reactive pleasure surged through his being. The hits of enjoyment came, but not enough. It felt like eating an aratnid: junk food.

Beneath him.

He drew the last Scalper in close and parted the outer shell of his Woundshaper to better gaze upon his victim.
Her breaths were rapid and ragged. Cupped by flowing blood, he squeezed her lungs like a pump. Hoarse choking followed.
The beast chuffed with joy but listlessness remained with Avo still.
Pleasurable? Yes. Always.
But unsatisfying.
So immensely unsatisfying.
Avo squeezed. Her body unfurled from the inside out a blossom of gore. His breath left his body, steaming with rage.
He had come down here to kill. He had nulled the minds of thousands. Hundreds of thousands. Butchered more Scalpers–their meat too soft for his liking, though the dull creature that lurked within him enjoyed it all the same.
THAUMIC CYCLER: 422 THAUM/c
Ghosts: [397]
Peering past the mangled remains he held in his grasp, he watched as the spearships made to ascend, doubtlessly driven away by the death wails of the enforcers. But from so far down, he could still see the shine of naked minds, still feel the flow of blood.
Scoffing his disdain, he judged the shapes of the aeroships and found himself offended. Their aesthetics prickled his ire, and he thought them better as slag upon a rising fire.
Avo shook free from his ontological encasing, instilling the Canon of Linger upon a final construct–a long dagger.
The Woundshaper was trying to speak with him, to halt him. “Master, what–”
His Rend burst free from his being in coruscating tides. Around him, a fourth of the first deck dissolved down the middle, the front entrance of the Ultimart bifurcating as lashing mists ate all that was tangible away into flaking motes.

As the ground faded beneath his feet, Avo turned his body and positioned the blade.
“More,” he said, the words for himself, once again just for himself.
With blade angled by hand to the floor below, the impact drove its tip through his eye and into the softness of his brain.
A sudden darkness splashed over one of his eyes. He felt his muscles fire and few times involuntarily as he tumbled down the widening through of darkness into the fires of death.
INITIALIZING RESURRECTION - 1%
Again he tumbled. Again he shifted Heavens. Again he accelerated the pace of his return.
Strange how the weight of mortality was shed. Freeing though it was, he felt it uncanny how casually he viewed suicide. In a way, it felt little different than diving into the depths of his Meta, or changing an article of clothing.
But that was what life was to him now. Something that could be shed to his convenience, the plane of death an automated grafting station for his use only, and the Ontologics within him mere implants to be activated.
Cladding himself with the Galeslither again, he ignored the complaints of the former god as he prepared for resurrection.
When the percentage hit fullness, he rematerialized as a torrent, surging up after the five shapes fleeing upward toward the light.
The spearships, true to their design, looked like little more than long ramps with a dozen engines on each side. Rust stained the weathered chrome, while haptic graffiti sputtered gibberish into the disturbed tides of the local Nether, joining crackles of thoughtstuff from ghosts flung astray by spectators yet shattering, yet dying.
It must’ve been over four-hundred thousand by now if they kept coming. A surge of joy came from that. There was true destruction, true harm. The mark of his Necrotheurgic artistry and thaumic power was undeniable.
This was something to seek: To mark the world with wounds indelible. Those below were less than meat, barely fodder; calling them finger food would be a sign of greater respect than they warranted.
What he wanted was some new delicacies, to sate both spirit and Soul upon all that had been denied him.
A prior thought returned to Avo. He had not experienced being inside a crashing aeroship personally. The vicarities always left traces of leftover emotion from the host. He wanted to sample the thrill true.
Galloping hard, his steeds roared as lassos of wind wrapped about the aeros, their ascents quavering as fusion engines sparked and swiveled, fighting the sudden storm emerging to swallow them.
A crackle was coming through Avo’s session. Draus was trying to say something to him. He ignored her.
In whorling runes lay bone-like decor, marking the spearships as Scalper property. As personalized as they were, it also made it easy to slide along the grooved channels as he sought a way in.
Though not built for speed, the five ships burned hot enough that touching them meant risking backlash. Hence, he made to climb above them and lash at them from on high. Clustered minds were aglow inside their shells, the signatures of the “entertainment,” refugees picked ripe for the slaughter.
REND CAPACITY: 6%
Blanketing their topsides with his presence, he dug his flowing limbs into cracks and between machinery, the steed lurching with strange shivers as if he was using the air itself to lockpick the ships. The pressurization of the cabins was like pawing against thickened pools of mud.
Another issue with air then: though he could pick people up, twist and rend them through counter-torquing currents, he had no capacity to “grip” or “crush” as he did with the Woundshaper.
His Galeslither, unnatural though it made the winds, was wind at its root still. It was going to take more effort to pry his new toys open.
Or maybe just an alternative angle, given a little bit of finesse.
They were beyond the epicenter of Nether collapse below. The unseen ocean was calmer here by far, so close to the passage through Layer One.

His Ghostjack manifested through the wind-wreathed skull of his centermost steed, giving it the visage of a unicorn bearing a ghost-fused horn. Static built along the tip as he loosed his traumas in torrents of screaming ghosts.
His immaterial lance stabbed out, an instrument he was beyond familiarity with. He cut. He struck. With each blow the reach of his ghosts licked pieces away from fraying wards, striking casually in the distance of visual range. From stripped sequences, he divined weakness. Vulnerabilities and inadequacies in the spearships design.
Whoever shielded them had done an acceptable job. Same warding pattern as that which protected the lobby. However, where that had a staggering mass of ghosts, the armored lining of the spearships was diminutive in comparison.
So, he struck with repetition, jabbing with Lucille’s Regret to locate the shifting damage before thrusting Secondhand Fatality into the cracks. It took the scantest of moments before he felt the defenses of each crumble, each collapse flashing a ripple of bursting thoughtstuff as all the phantasmics functioning within came spilling out, exposed to scrying eyes.
From his Whisper extended five links primed with the same commands: for the ramp doors to open; for the ships to halt in their climb.
Through newly made openings, he entered, rubbing his being across the writhing bodies of the survivors festooned in their rattling, ceiling-affixed enclosures–crucifix-shaped mechanisms that held them in place between teeth of spine-piercing needles.
The interior of the ships ran a narrow passage toward the cockpit located just behind the speartip of the vessel’s design. Each ship seemed to have two jocks operating there. He knew they were jocks from the general shapes of their gimbals, especially considering the needles running up into the base of their skulls.
In the depths of their dive, confusion must have been the primary thing assailing their minds, seeing as how he was in command of their vehicles.
With an effort comparable to taking a single step as a being of flesh, he rematerialized through a curtain of billowing smoke. Resheathed into his natural vessel, his senses were immediately assailed by a cacophony of pitched wails.
The “passengers” reeked of filth and dried blood while their minds tasted of animal terror. Their bodies swaying like mangled fruits upon gnarled branches of chrome, skin raw, eyes hollow, the gauntness a sign of severe malnutrition.
Even the beast’s enthusiasm at greeting them was quiet. Little meat and mostly gristle–he could indulge in better dining by breaking into and eating the nu-birds in an aviary.
A low mood of disdain leaked out from within. “What appalling conditions. Such filth befits neither servant nor slave. It is a sign of structure and instilled order to see sacrifice offered with proper ritual, for truly, what greater worship is there than culture? Than tradition.”
If the Woundshaper could spit, it would have. “Culture and tradition our adversaries seem hollow of. Make fuel of these slaves and be onto your desires. I yearn to see you reach this “Burner’s Way.” I wish to see the pedestal you are to offer m–”
“Please.” The cry cut through the noise.
The Woundshaper fell silent. The wind whistled. Again, the voice spoke. Avo looked up. In rows of five were the survivors lined, and in the middle of the fifth was the one that spoke.
A gleam remained within this one’s eyes, a hardness possessed by the fabric of their thoughts. His skin was fair and his stature, though unimpressive by most standards, parted him from the other flats present by lingering muscular. With his scalp shorn down to the fuzz, the refugee looked more hardened prisoner than a sacrificial slave, the cheekbones thick and chin wedged.
“The kids,” the survivor’s voice fell. “They deserve more than this, if no one else.”
Avo tilted his head and studied his supplicant further.
From an inverted perspective, it was almost as if he was a god being offered prayers from a believer on high.
“Ah. Groveling. It’s an unbecoming sight. Master, I suggest–”
“Choice,” Avo said.
“What?”
For a passing beat, Avo said nothing, studying the face of the survivor. The beast knew only hunger, so whispered savagery was all it offered. But there was more here. More. An experience. Something that had been denied.
“Didn’t get to save the people on the barge,” Avo said, mostly to himself. “The boy.”

“Master, surely you don’t care–”
“Don’t,” he admitted. “But… want to know…”

“Know what?”
“What it’s like,” Avo said, staring into the despairing eyes of those that hung above. “The flavor of worship.” He smiled. “Want to give him a choice.”
The old cults had various terms to describe the process of Oblation: The act of creating a Heaven.
It took eons–years upon years, death upon death. Sacrifices and feats fed over to the old gods by post-mortem messengers along an unending pipeline of death, and through these building blocks, the Soul appears to have… accumulated certain metaphysical scabbing–ontological scarstuff that can be used to grow the tissues of new subrealities.
The Symphonists of the Seraphims referred to the act as Hecatombing. Much as Highflame operates today with their transgressors, the forebears they usurped practiced a hyper-regimented form of brainwashing and mass sacrifice to fuel and shape their gods.
Often, these would result in backlashes. Fallen Heavens formed naturally during that past era due to contradictions–uh, inconsistencies between the functions of Heavens in the lore, more like–not a hard thing to achieve considering the ignorance that pervaded society back then. Thaumaturgy really doesn’t need to obey science but without a thing to root itself too–
Oh, sorry. Rambling.
Anyway, I think that, if this plan is successful… if we can implement the thaumic cycler into a geometry-variable demiplane of time, perhaps we can ease the creation of additional Ontologics for further study…
-Agnos Kae Kusanade, “Project Godshaper”
8-1
The Shape of Worship
It was uncanny how fast the winds of desire could shift, but strangeness was becoming all too common a companion for Avo.
With but a thought, the spearships heeded his commands to descend, and the cages of prisoners withdrew their paralyzing teeth from the flesh of aching backs. Released, the five hundred survivors huddled close to the edges of the ships. Most amongst them were pale in color and sheened with sweat, so weak in their constitution that a sprint might have seen them dead, let alone a run from hunters equipped with the firepower to thread clean wounds through steel.
Landing one after another in a line, the ships formed rows, two by two, with the last one inching beyond the premises. Prisoners flocked out to stand before the cascade of ruins that once was the Ultimart, not knowing this was to be the pen of their slaughter. Like aimless cattle they strayed out from their slave ships, some openly weeping, overjoyed to be striding upon still land again, some drifting in a daze, mind decapitated from the flesh, meat shambling ahead of shattered minds.
Those incurred the lust of the beast the most. It hungered for them. Desired to strip them of dignity and lather its meals with the spices of torment. The children and frail called to it first, then onto those possessed of more corpulence.

The creature’s wants were a matter of pain to it. Nothing of taste or caloric need.
Avo scoffed. It was pitiful.
He had guided the ships down in the form of the Galeslither, the manifestation of his Heaven spiking his guts with the thrill of their awe. They knew what he was by power. They were cowed by it; feared it; and from the passing of stray thoughtstuff drifting into his mind, were dependent upon it back when they lived in Fallwalker enclaves.
He heard it especially from those parted from the bulk of the refugees, those broken, yet still active.

Still making choices, choosing to pry at the choking brambles of fate with little force they could muster.
The man that implored him on the ship stood one such deviant. He, and perhaps six others.
From the exposed waters of his mind, Avo sipped knowledge and knew him to be Req Tnaqin. Former tribesman of the Gulclines, its jagged gorges extending past Sangshan’s ever-rising borders, just a few dozen miles outside the Silken Spiral, nest city and No-Dragon trade hub.

Of a nomadic tradition born in the wake of the Godsfall, he lived as his parents did, plying their trade as a weavehead–one with the mental fortitude to carry experimental bioforms in their skulls across the slavering eldritch teeth that gnawed beneath the soils of the border.
He had twelve sisters, a time upon a time. Thirteen aunts. Five uncles. Grandparents even.
Then, on one routine walk, a package inside his sister’s head ruptured free, and the thing she was carrying emerged, understandably agitated.
After that, it was just him, and home wasn’t quite home anymore.

Req, along with all the others, was pain-shaped. They rang with a chill that blunted their thoughts, too hurt to fully feel, but unwilling to give in to the call of the void.
They strayed from the rest of the refugees, accepting their situation, but not cowed by it.
Not as much they were cowed by him.
As the scream of a passing aerovec sounded from the skies above–presence alight with Draus’ wards and Kae’s ruination–Avo scooped each of the remaining Scalper jocks out from their modules. Lashing their minds into submission with his lesser traumas, he lay them across the sundered ground.
Right ahead of the row of open ramps, facing the buried main entrance to the Ultimart, the Syndicate technicians lay, twitching and mumbling before all the gathered survivors, pried away from their drones and their network.
Beneath a Nether-scarred sky, in the festering gloom that sprawled leagues far, and leagues further unseen, the mob of refugees, desultory and destitute gathered. Beside the ruins of a collapsed theater, their forms were blurred by the basking glow of custom-installed neon, motifs of skull and bone flashing across their periphery.
It is not often a herd of lambs is offered the savage remains of a lion's meal.
Avo wondered if they would finally feed. And should they, could lambs take on the traits of wolves?
Truth be told, his own desires confused him. Surprised him. Inured to butchering the weak, he chased the ships like a nu-dog, looking to catch its bumper, and ride it to discover some ineffable new experience.
Upon boarding, however, he found it.
A cocktail simmered in the air. Hate. Fear. Loathing. Want. Worry. Hope. All of it smashing, blending, bleeding, billowing with the wind.
Gently, Avo sank a phantasmal talon into Req’s mind, binding himself as a passenger to the flat’s mind as he felt the man’s mixtureof emotions filter over. Unbecoming as voyeurism was, it added a flair to what Avo desired. A flavoring.
Stitching flows of wind into matter and sinew, he manifested again beside Req and the other few standing. They stumbled, a clash of curses and exclamations greeting him. A few backed away. Req stood, ignorant to the wants of his fellows, or the subtle subversive weight on his mind.
Req stayed and stared, his face a mask of wonder and uncertainty. “I–I. Owe you my thanks.”

Avo said nothing. Within him, the Woundshaper rumbled. “Thanks? He owes rightful blood and an eternal tithe of sacrifices from his bloodline.” The god scoffed. “Look upon these serfs and see their missing decorum. The simpleton thanks us! Thanks! Where is the offering? The oath? All manners lost.”
Avo took a step closer to the man. A few others shuffled. One tripped upon a severed arm, the limb rolling out from under their leg. The pop of an ankle could be heard. A cry followed by moaning and pain.
“Oh, joyous day: that one’s leg is broken. I believe this leaves us no choice but to put her down.”
The Woundshaper’s words went ignored.

For an uncomfortable few beats after, Avo just stared, listening to the survivors. For long he expected at least one of them to make a move on the Scalpers. To take revenge. Or maybe even flee into the darkness of the Warrens.
Instead, the meek and the young wept while the wary clustered themselves into groups, content to delude themselves with the warmth of numbers, not knowing that their assembly merely made them more convenient to butcher.
Untethered from his companions, however, was the matter of Req. “M-my name–” Req Tnaqin.
Avo grunted. “Know what you’re called.” Quietly, he reached down and picked up a sharp piece of plascrete–its length comparable to a crude shiv. Now, Req inched back, the jutting protrusion in his throat shifting.
Hm. Adam’s apple. Apple. Avo remembered biting into a few. He couldn’t imagine the fruit to be as delicious.
Avo offered him the shard. He blinked. He hesitated.
“Take the knife,” Avo said.
Req stared. He could choose not to. He could choose anything. So could the person across from you. Such was the problem of choice growing increasingly clearer to Avo. Choice begot choice, and also devoured them in the same decision.

In the end, the options one had were always limited by what little room was claimed or offered.
“You want me to kill them?” Req asked.
Avo leaned over, his helmet reflecting a scar of red in the pools of the flat’s eyes. “Want you to choose.”

Fingers shaking, the refugee nodded. A near-feral smile spread across his face.
It was, much like the frivolous exchanges of formalities between the Sang, a smokescreen. A facade. Req wanted to impress his benefactor, cloaking himself as a willing servant performing obedience. The fact he was to butcher his slavers helped, but that didn’t translate to pre-slaughter ecstasy or overflowing bloodlust.
He plucked the shard from Avo’s grasp. He turned. He turned and walked up to one of the Scalpers. His breath was hitched with growing tension, his lungs choking on air as his heart screamed to over a hundred beats. As he approached the Scalpers, he tried to shed his fear by digging at old wounds, trying to use trauma and flare anger.

He thought of the thing that emerged from the hole in his sister's skull, how it slithered with her corpse flopping behind as if half molted skin. He alone had survived that. He alone had been lucky.
Tonight, he was lucky again.
Lucky to be saved.
Lucky to be freed.
Lucky that all he needed to offer in return so far was a suggested murder.
The Scalpers screamed. Had been screaming and wailing this entire time. Animal noises. Broken syllables, their damaged minds trying to reassemble in time to remember language. He hadn’t noticed. Too focused on what he could do with the refugees. Truth given, the Syndicate thugs bored him to kill now. There wasn’t the thrill, and the notes their minds played upon greeting the final threshold of death had become a repetitive melody.

But through Req–in a different shell–Avo felt new sensations.

A man but half a step taller than five feet, Req found himself at face level with the jocks even as he approached. They knelt, some hugging themselves for comfort, the others staring off into the fracture in the Nether, eyes wet with envy for the mind-dead, for absent was their pain.
Req’s breath hitched. He pumped his fist several times, the sharp biting through the edge of his calloused palm. Images flashed over his eyes. Running. Weeping. Listening to the echoing cries of his family as the thing from his sister found a want for their teeth and bones.
He ran.
He ran alone.
Req Tnaqin was a coward. But he didn’t want to die. He really, truly didn’t want to die.
“F-fucker,” Req hissed, wrestling the rage he felt at himself outward. Avo blinked. Self-loathing was a potent stimulant. “Yo-you think you can’t just–hurt me and walk away?”
The Scalpers replied. Moaning.
Req sucked in a breath. He stood before the first of the jocks. Her hair played glimmering constellations in a shape of a nu-cat. A beloved pet, if the broken pieces of her memory served. “I said,” he lashed out, the swing sloppy and loose. It was as if his arm was being pulled at from two directions: stronger toward, weaker away.
The shard’s edge sliced through the paunch of her cheek, bounced off chipping teeth, and left a bouncing flap along her face. She reeled, toppled with a cry. Something came up inside Req. Sour strands came loose from his mouth as he struggled to mask his desire to vomit with a cough.
“Pathetic,” the Woundshaper sighed. “And you wish to spare him? To let him go if he does not finish? It would be more honor than his paltry being is worth to cycle within us eternally.”
“Us?”
“It is a turn of phrase.”
“Find another.”
Req’s heart felt like a stack of loose bricks as he uprighted himself. Turning around, his gaze first fell upon Avo, then to the others in the crowd.
A voice punched through. The cry of someone younger. Anger. “C’mon. Fuckin’... Stab the half-strand.”

“Yeah,” a woman said. “You… you already started…”

That got her a few laughs from the crowd. Ever malleable, amusement is.
Nodding to himself, Req swallowed. Reeling his arm back as if he was pulling something, he stepped forward, looking away at the last moment as his stab went off course, slicing through the Scalper’s brow.
“Oh, for fuck’s sake,” younger voice came again. From deep behind the gathered refugees, a limping Scaarthian youth with a knot of braided hair lumbered forward, his immense height hidden by his slouch and hobble. He had something in his hand–the severed limb one of the refugees popped their ankle on.
“Fuckin’ lowlanders never killed nothin’ fuck’s sake’s,” the boy muttered.
“I concur.”
Seeing the approach of the Scaarthian and fearing Avo’s disappointment, Req inhaled sharply and mustered the totality of his courage. The creature of his nightmares came to him then. An instant. He imagined he was holding onto his dead sister. He imagined stabbing the creature before it broke free, before it could slaughter his family.
“Die!” Req cried. Hand cupped behind the Scalper’s head, he forced his shiv into her left eye. So broken was her mind that she was still trying to recall how to lift her arms and push his hand away when he pushed harder. A satisfying jolt ran up his arm. The shard had met the softness of brain.
The girl was dead. The Scalper was dead.
Req’s family was dead.
Releasing the shiv as if it was poison, Req stumbled back and the Scaarthian pushed him aside, muttering a slurred demur at his slowness.


“This is how you fuckin’ kill a half-strand,” the Scaarthian wrapped his cudgel-thick fingers around the throat of one of the Scalpers. The girl choked. He brought the severed limb down. Gore speckled free, and with its rise, more cries came loose from the refugees turned mob.
Avo gasped. The eruption of their bloodlust was divine.
He turned and witnessed as they moved forward, as he finally discovered what his instincts were pulling him toward.
Catharsis. The feeling of consequential brutality. The beauty of symmetrical violence.
Men, women, children. Humans of all clades and makes, flat and not. They descended on the Scalpers with reckless abandon, snarled curses and shouts of rage shuddering free from steaming breaths.

Apart from them, a single note of crushing sadness poured down the link.
It was nectar.
It was sublime.
It was all Avo was missing when the node took his choice away.
He walked over to Req, enjoying the ambiance of the mob slaughtering and mutilating the Scalpers.
THAUMIC CYCLER: 432 THAUM/c
Ghosts: [407]
Sobbing, images ran through the refugee’s mind as he looked at the blood in his hands. Hands that soon became enshadowed by Avo’s encroach. A cold nail of pure dread bit deep into his guts. He looked up slowly, eyes wide, tears trailing. “I–I’m sorry.”

The beast licked its fangs.
The Woundshaper scoffed. “Kill him.”
“No,” Avo said, replying to all three. The city was filled with easy prey. His Soul would be made ever greater by the lives of these survivors, but would that be his decision? Would that make him more aligned with the beast? Or a living echo of the Woundshaper?


No. Req chose. Chose though it hurt him. Chose to satisfy another, absurd as it was.
Avo understood Req. And never wanted to be him again. He had more choices than he thought, but his path was shaped, and so was Avo’s.
He needed to do what was different. To shape himself with broader worship.
The refugee blinked. The beast whined. The Woundshaper fell silent.
Avo alone spoke the next words. He shaped Req’s future. He gave choice.

“That was wonderful.”
Req blinked confused. “You… you liked that?”

“Liked…” Avo said the word as if he was sampling its taste. “No. But I… learned from it. New.”

“New?”

The sound of incoming engines sang from above. Avo looked up. Massive shrouds of flowing phantasmal armor approached, their potence so heavy he could feel the weight from here.
Exorcists. Paladins as well, perhaps. Guilders to follow after most assuredly.
His tasting was at an end. He needed to depart. Disappearing.
Gathering the winds around him, he moved to manifest the Galeslither.
“Wait!”

Avo paused. He shot a look at the man, on his feet.
“I–” the refugee swallowed. “Thank you?”

Avo grunted. “Thank me by making more choices. Kill again. Kill more. Want to know those tastes as well.” He stepped through the currents and rose. “And dream more of your family.”

He left the refugees there, some slaughtering, one shivering in body and mind.
Reaching his billowing limbs across the gutters, he drifted toward the familiarity of Draus’ accretion, a new momentum building inside him.
Flavor.
The city was full of flavors he hadn’t tasted. In more ways than one.
And with the winds, he was unfettered.
He wanted more.
And so he was going to take more.
Faintly, he felt a budding weight build, budding in the heart of his flames.
+Attention all subjects, stay indoors; vacate the streets. This is a category-one warning. All subjects who fail to comply will be marked and scheduled for a detailed scan at later date.
Repeat: please return indoors and vacate the streets.+
-Exorcist Public Thoughtcast, Yuulden-Yang Sovereignty
8-2
Heat
+Jaus. What in the rash-spreading fuck did I let you do?+

Draus’ mind was boiling. She was mad at him. Furious. But the cleaving wounds she beheld of the spectators lingered, dancing shadows in her mind. Torn by his recklessness and stunned by the blow he struck, two pressures worked within her, one of survival, desiring to flee, the other more a flicker, its heat a dormant want rekindled.
“As I said,” the Woundshaper hummed, “this one is of a like.”
In the moments it took him to shroud the aerovec containing his companions, the Exorcists arrived. Their coming blotted what little light trickled down from the hexagonal maws leading out of the gutters, through the threshold of Layer One. The glint of the first drone fell, a silver teardrop with wisps of hair trailing in its wake.
Avo knew the design of Tadpole drones well, both in chassis and locus. They possessed nothing in the way of ranged capabilities, but that had never been the purpose of their design; lethality stood counter to the Paladin ethos, their oaths to protect above all else.
The three whip-thin tendrils of a Tadpole were charged with a bio-tuned electro-synaptic current–its design a gift from Voidwatch after a particular brutal riot some two centuries prior. Capable of extending for a full mile each, each Tadpole was capable of breaking riots, while the metafluidic cell that comprised the underside of the drone’s mercury-coated shell could hold more than a dozen temporary prisoners.
They came, drones numbering in the thousands, as a sudden torrent after the first. The flood of their shapes darted out, undulating as they curved along the undersize of Layer One, slithering into the glitching error codes that should have manifested the face of a false sky.
As if stormclouds, they expanded, their flashing eyes peering across the entirety of the Sovereignty.

Fast as their response time was, this was but the first step. The drones were to secure the premises of the Crucible–and beyond.
And so they went, digging through the bloodsoaked plasticrete of the Ultimart Avo left in his wake, ignorant to the unnatural gusts of rising wind brushing past their quarantine, whistling its way toward the chasm which parted Mazzo’s Junction from Burner’s Way.
Mere minutes into channeling the canons of his Galeslither, Avo knew it would be torture should he ever lose this Heaven.
Never in his life had traversal been so convenient, transportation so easy.
Circling within his Galeslither, the Zephyr-make aerovehicle spun and tumbled, shaking from the turbulence. Avo kept his winds as calm as he could, but the nature of his being was a thing of coiling storms, ever twisting in torque and motion.
Checking his DeepNav, he saw a line of errors twisted across traffic. The lanes and arteries were bending. Some pathways even seemed to curve and crumple as if they were lines on a paper, folding toward one another.
Over from Draus’ mind, he heard Kae mutter a question, the tang of her worry flowing through.
+Paladins,+ Draus said. The tension inside her grew thicker. +Godsdamned rotlick drew out the Paladins.+
Rising past the gulf of Layer One, the Spine they beheld was not the same one they descended.
The totality of local space seemed to have fissured, for one, cracked down the middle with a fractal of mem-code errors, his feed unable to stitch the spatial wound into something his mind could conceptualize.
Geometry twisted at the four corners, folding traffic lanes and structures once vectored to each other horizontally to vertically. The breakage seemed to flow unnaturally, spreading down in a crawl, anchored on the reaching limbs of its further crevasses, a metaphorical spider near-half the size of a megablock.
It wasn’t until the fissures began to inch down the skin of existence that Avo understood what he was looking at.
+Planescrawler,+ Avo thought. Across the session, Draus’ mind chimed with familiarity. She knew this titan-class golem. Knew it well. But that was as far as her mind went. She refused to think of it anymore, of the war and regrets left unwatered in her past.
A planescrawler wasn’t a rare sight in the Upper Tiers, but in the Warrens, the appearance of a Guild-pattern mobile-spatial platform echoed the markings of the Fourth Guild War, of the Low Masters’ Uprising.
Those present didn’t even need to listen to the thoughtcast to know what was being requested; it didn’t take much to convince their departure from the streets and skies.
Running half as long as a megablock and only a tenth as thick, the crack moved as if the fractured lines of a broken mirror instilled with the essence of a serpent. Uncountable ghosts bled from the clefts of the planescrawler like gout, their signatures bound to varying loci on the other side.
Avo remembered doing dives on such a platform with Walton once. A month-long job, the success of which still dwarfed his comprehension to the present. Without his father, he would have surely been lost within the district-sized labyrinths which comprised each of the crawler’s gargantuan loci.
An ill thought arose. His father. His father, who still had surviving alternates–parted reflections of his person, if the node could be trusted.
As it stood, each of them was still operating in the city, every one Avo’s better in his chosen craft.
The presence of the planescrawler loomed like a giant about to tread on an anthill. It wasn’t what made Avo wary. That was the problem with having such a mass of ghosts: they shone like a miniature sun in the Nether, making stealth an impossibility.
No. It was the other Waltons that Avo thought of as he peered into the spatial fissures. He didn’t see them coming. And they certainly had the skill to strip him of choice again.
He couldn’t let that happen.
Not after the succor he just discovered.
The ocean of ghosts surrounding the Paladins’ golem blockaded them from returning to the Second Fortune, seeing how it was on the other side of the Sovereignty. Any attempts to approach near the golem would inevitably see them exposed to thousands of thoughtscans at the very least.
Avo could deactivate his Whisper and try traveling blind, but then his DeepNav wouldn’t work, and though his winds ran far, he didn’t actually know the city like the back of his claws.
Best to wait. Position themselves in Burner’s Way while they waited for the planescrawler to sink down to the depths of gutters. Then he could see about claiming any excess components required by Kae.
Checking his Rend, Avo felt a pulse of satisfaction.
REND CAPACITY: 31%
Most acceptable. With this efficiency, he could travel at least a district or two before venting. This put most of the Sovereignty within his reach and potentially gave him another angle to assault Mirrorhead.
The Woundshaper vibrated with envy, strummed by the excitement offered to his present Heaven. “Yes, yes, what possibility the mule presents. But with I, you could unmake the structures that inhabit these spaces. Reshape them to your liking. Doubtless you are considering using the winds to gallop into the prisons of Conflux and free that fool–the idiot partling you thought of looking at those slaves before… Essus. If he still remains in their hands, that is.”
Avo contemplated that quietly. Time had slipped by him. Power. Preparation. All the games being played.
So long did they let their fellow survivor languish…
A flicker of hunger burned within Avo. What new memories did the man possess? Was he even still alive? Still held by Conflux?
It would be interesting to see these questions answered.
Avo considered what it would be like to dwell within the flat’s mind as he gazed upon himself again, if the father could taste the change.
+--Avo!+
Draus’ thought jolted him from contemplative reverie. Her voice was even, but a cold simmer hissed out from the other side. The oddness of her anger made him consider the nature of her mind.
Patience remained within her. Control as well, but she wanted to wait no longer.
She wished to speak.
+Land us in Burner’s Way.+ He answered.+The alley you hid the barge when you found me here. Want to talk?+


Draus laughed, but it was a sound empty of any amusement. +We’re gonna do a hells of a lot more than talk.+
***
REND CAPACITY: 9%
The scenery leading out from the trailing alleys of Burner’s Way peered toward tilted skies still warped by the planescrawler’s passing.
Frozen in a pocket of counter-gales, their Zephyr hovered above the ground just past the edge of the alleyway. As Avo waited for his Rend to drain, he spoke to Draus and Kae, the words coming from him more easily than they ever did before.
Prior to possessing the Frame, he despised small talk. Interaction in general. The presence of others agitated his beast naturally and grated him due to matters of personality. Not now, however. Now, he wanted to speak. Share. Learn.
Now, he had new tastes he wished to indulge.
He told them of the Woundshaper; everything he knew of its nature and history was offered. Draus listened, expressions like carved granite. Beside her, Kae leaned against the rusted walls as she traced her exocortex with her finger to self-soothe.
Her tracing grew only stronger when he mentioned his encounter with the refugees–and his new epiphany.
Kae’s face became a near-constant frown, clearing in increments as she forgot the source of her anxiety in bouts. Beside her, the Regular’s eyes narrowed, and her breaths grew slightly longer. More controlled.
By the time Avo finished, all traces of the planecrawler had faded from reality. Lonesome rings projected holographic lanes from section to empty section, their translucence filled with naught but air.
It didn’t take long for the aeros sailing the local skies to clear out. Not to say Avo was surprised. It was never a good thing when the Paladins get the green light to walk Guild territory.
“You spoke to one of the survivors?” Draus question wasn’t one of confusion. No curiosity was leaking from her mind, she was looking for clarification.
Avo breathed out. Filtering the memories in his Metamind, he brought the specifics of the sequence he saved from Req. The Nether took a moment to adjust itself as countless markers and details bled out of his cog-feed but upward, far beyond all the layers of the Warrens, a glint flickered.
The Paladins had extracted the refugees. Taken them up the Tiers for questioning.
Avo considered if he could use that as a means of infiltration in the future…
“Avo,” Draus said. “You’re drifting. Driftin’ more than usual.”
He blinked. “Spoke to all of them. Linked with one.”
The Regular’s expression darkened. She lowered her head. “You keep your mask on?”

He grunted. “Holocoat. Shifted into the Galeslither–”


“Fuck,” Draus growled, her voice sounding a toneless snarl. She took a step forward. Reflexively, Kae took a step back, blanching. Avo held still, unfearing the approach of the Regular. He smiled instead, fangs wide as he found himself bemused by their inverted position: the Regular was attacking while the ghoul held firm.
“What,” she said, coming to a stop right below his jaw, “the fuck kind of Frame job has you revealin’ that you’re a Godclad?”

Was she trying to shame him? He felt no shame. Felt only satisfaction from new flavors discovered. “Don’t know its me. Didn’t show them my nature. Hid my work well on the locus as well.”

Draus nodded. It took Avo a moment to realize the action was sarcastic. “Well, hells. How ‘bout it, Kae? He ‘hid it well.’” She spat. “There aren’t that many Fallwalkers playin’ in the Warrens and gutters? You wanna know why, Avo?”

“Compact,” Avo said. “New Vultun Compact. Terms of Individual Sovereignty Rights.”

“Nevermind that legal shit. I’m talkin’ actual details. You wanna know why?”

He shrugged. “Tell me.”

“You. Are. Takin’. Lives. From. The. Guilds.” She glared. “Let’s put aside how you might’ve fucked both me and Kae first. Your little ‘flipping the board’ might’ve flipped us under it. Mirrorhead’s gonna be lookin’ out now. Squirrly half-strand’s probably thinkin’ Fallwalker’s out gunning for his Frame. Might just cut and run if we’re not lucky. So, we’ll be dealin’ with that real soon.”
She continued. “The Scalpers’ll definitely know somethin’s up. If they assume, probably’ll think it’s Mirrorhead himself. But the gutter war is on, however that goes. They already got hit twice, and hit hard. They’re bleedin’ into the water, and if they don’t hit Conflux back some gangers or rivals might just decide now’s the time to make a run at them. The Column...” She paused breathing in through her nose as she slouched, deep in thought. “Fuck knows what the Column’s gonna do. River’s probably gonna pop a vessel.”
That was the wrong thing for Draus to say if she wanted to dissuade him. If Green River was going to be inconvenienced by such attention, Avo was of a mind to do an unmasked interview on New Vultun Sunrise.
“Can turn chaos to our advantage. Use Chambers to feed false information to Mirrorhead. Tell him that I’m–”

“It’s not about the plannin’ anymore,” Draus said, interrupting him. “It’s about trust. Workin’ together. Bein’ able to execute a plan and see things done–”
He leaned down, cutting her off as well. “Happy.”


She paused, frowning.
He continued. “You were happy watching those nullings. Three-hundred-thousand. Four by the end. Could be. But you liked it. Me. Hurting the watchers. Gutting a Syndicate the way you never can.” He turned his head and looked down at her. “Envy? Just jealous that I’m doing more damage. Winning the war where you could only do battle?”

Draus scoffed. “We ain’t winnin’ shit. We’re down here in the bowels beneath the actual city tryin’ come up with a plan to snuff some… exiled Chivalric Guilder-boy to fulfill our vendetta.” She eyed him. “Or at least that was why we’re here. Was. You still want to kill him. But it ain’t hate you have for him. Nah. That’s hunger. And it ain’t just the beast. You just want his parts. His burn.”

“Yes,” Avo said, inching closer to Draus. “Power is choice. Power is to understand. Feel. Everything else chosen. Slave. Ninth Column. Guilds. Syndicate. Walt–the Low Masters. All give shackles. Won’t wear them. Not again. My path now. Mine!”
Part of him wanted her to strike him. Something that would give him a good and flavorful reason to kill her. The rest wanted her with him still. A want crept up inside him, the Woundshaper giving it a voice. “We will not find her like amongst the detritus of this city again. Should you strip her of life, know that the fuel she offers is the same as that of the basest slave. She offers more than mere amusement, master. Understanding. She understands. Rare, such a thing is.”
He blinked. “Mercy?”

Draus frowned. “You talkin’ to that thing inside you?”

“Thing? Part with my previous words: kill her. This partling knows nothing of respect.”
“It’s talking to me,” Avo said. “Gives… advice. Shares memories. Knowledge.”

The Regular sighed. She shut her eyes. “Shit. I should've never let you do this–”
The beast roared inside Avo at her words. He hissed, involuntarily. “You don’t let me do anything. I choose. I decided. I am Godclad.”
Her expression remained unchanged. “You don’t look like you’re choosing much of anythin’ to me, consang.” She tilted her past him. He followed her eyes. She was looking at a needle: The pointed end of a joy elixir.
A building heat swirled inside his guts. He flexed and unflexed his claws. She was calling him a slave to his nature, saying that he was an addict. “Wrong. You don’t understand. Don’t see.”

“I see plenty–”

“Then why are you alive?” Avo asked. “Can kill you. Kill almost anyone here.”
Nothing. Not a hint of fear from her. Regulars were no strangers to death, but something in Avo wondered if she was even more unshakable than the others of her kind.

Kae’s voice cut into their conversation. “It’s call-called the False Apotheosis.”
Avo turned to her.
“I-I think that’s what’s affecting… affecting you right now.”
“A Rendsink is not some kind of battery. You will not touch the Rendsink when you vent into it. You will not touch the Rendsink when it is filling. You will not touch the Rendsink unless you are certain it has been safely secured beforehand.
It is entropy. It is unstable. It is literal error code ejected from the subrealities of your Liminal Frames.
You let it leak and it will unmake you if your Hell doesn’t have any Domain-symmetry.
You might be able to use it to stabilize a backlashing Heaven in a pinch but… that’s an operation better left for the glasseyes
If it breaches, death might be the least of your concerns."
-Santanado “Starsinger” Mondelles, Combat Instructor to Axtraxis Academy of Highflame
8-3
Venting (I)
The Agnos’ interjection plucked the strings of tension away from Draus. Mind swirling with drifting thoughts and stalking anger, Avo found his focus swaying over to Kae like a pendulum.
She swallowed but kept speaking. “Your mind… it’s overstimulated, Avo. The s-sensations, especially with a-an awakened god inside–oh Jaus; g-god. Reassembled god.” She blinked. Her focus returned. “You’re not operating at baseline. Too… uh… too many options. Sensations–”

“Mind is clear,” Avo said, fighting the urge to tear into her. The beast was swimming up the vessels in his brain. It wanted to hurt. It wanted to kill. The Heaven within was a mantle of destruction capable of feeding its wildest desires. It tugged at Avo, snarling, hissing, pleading. He ignored it. “My mind is clear. In control. See what was missing. Don’t want to just hurt. Understand? Seen new–” He took a moment to breathe. “New colors. Just wanted to see more.”

“You could’ve fuckin’ done that sight-seein’ shit some other time,” Draus hissed.
The pendulum swung back to Draus. Avo pulled his helmet off and clicked his fangs together. “I chose to do it then.”


She flexed her wrist. Faintly, Avo heard a series of crackles rattling from her joints. “Well I’m gettin’ real close to chosin’ something of my own.”
“W-wait,” Kae said, trying to get in a word.
REND CAPACITY: 3%
For a moment, the Regular and ghoul were lost in the past. This was their element. He was close enough to tear, to bite into her, to shred the fabric of her mind; she was close enough to grapple, to break, his death but the alignment of her palm and his skull.
A cackle of laughter sounded from above as mockeries took flight through the alleyway, their wings beating loud.
“Be wary, master,” the Woundshaper said, its words heavy with unspoken intent. “Break her and she shall mend upon the falling of the nightly rains. Slay her and there will be no return. I jest no longer: Should she feed your flame, the act cannot be undone. Death holds no sway upon things such as we, but she is ephemeral.”
“Ever kill a ghoul with your hands?” Avo growled.
Draus shrugged, the movement so slight he barely noticed. “Plenty. Feelin’ nostalgic?”

“Not the word I would use. But I could get a new experience out of this.”

“Gettin’ hurt?”

“Hurting a Reg.”

She ran her front teeth along her lips. A growing focus built behind her eyes. Part of her truly was mad. Mad that he hadn’t done exactly what she thought they agreed on. Mad that her little operation was ruined because he found a greater purpose. More, however, was the fact she wanted this fight.
The idea of getting bloody with him was a thrill.
And past the snarling rage of his beast and the caution of his Woundshaper, Avo wasn’t so against the idea of indulging in a little bout of fist on claw.
“To the blood?” Avo offered.
She sneered. “The hells with that shit. We’re squared up; we go bloody proper. Till shit breaks. Till one of us can’t.”

That sounded most delightful–


A glint of chrome bobbed into sight. Kae’s exocortex. The Agnos was reaching between them, trying to create more space by prying them apart. “C-consaangs… uh…” Kae grunted.
He blinked. Draus tilted her head. Where building bloodlust filled the air between them, Draus and Avo felt a new emotion enter the equation and its name was awkwardness.
“Kae,” Draus said, eyes still locked on Avo. She was trying to keep hold of the feeling. “Get outta the way.”

“No,” Kae said. “B-both of you are a-acting like f-fucking children.”

That made the Regular do a double take. “I’m the one actin’ like a child? Really? Was I the one that went pissin’ off to play with some refugees in the middle of a snuff-job? Was I?”
Kae’s hand slid off Avo’s chest as she announced her retreat with a ragged sigh. Shielded by the body of the Agnos, Avo seized the moment to indulge in some mockery. He grinned at Draus, fangs bared and all. “Child.”

Draus’ face broke into a scoff–the rasp trailing low with a hint of building violence. He leaned forward, welcoming what was to come, already anticipating the first hit.
Then, something did hit him. Just not Draus. Like a soft raindrop, he felt a small palm clap against his neck. Below, he heard Kae grunt with effort, bouncing on her toes. “I was t-trying to… to hit your…” she trailed off, staring at her hand, unable to remember why she just hit him. “I was trying to s-slap your face.”

“Too short,” Avo grunted.
Draus chuckled. And then, she blinked. Her face collapsed into a frown. She turned her eyes to Avo, expression near apologetic as she shook her head. A breath puffed from her lungs. The mood was ruined. Moment of bloodlust passed, both Regular and ghoul were unsated. “Godsdammit, Kae.”

The Agnos blinked in confusion.
Avo understood. “Can still fight,” he said, trying to keep the hope out of his voice. “Have more insults.”

She shook her head and backed away, sighing. “It don’t work if I know what you’re tryin’ to get at. Too artificial. Don’t feel right no more.”

Her earlier sigh grew contagious as he hissed out a breath as well. The beast within Avo rattled against his mind as it begged him to start the violence anyway. Tear through the Agnos. Force the Regular to fight him. But she was right. She didn’t want it. The mood had broken. Kae had ruined the flavor; to bleed her now would be like indulging in fast food, empty calories.
“Another moment of delicious bloodletting ruined. Tsk tsk.”
The Woundshaper didn’t sound so disappointed. Its odd favoritism toward Draus probably meant this was the outcome it desired.
“Godsdammit, Kae,” Avo muttered. “Ruined it. Could’ve settled things. Would’ve been special. Meaningful.”

Kae turned, confusion growing into exasperation. “W-what–”

“Meaningful?” Draus asked, not understanding.
“Regular. Ghoul. Old brawl. Different outcome.”

She cocked her head and tightened her jaw. The mood was coming back. The flames of delight ignited within Avo. The violence was on again. “You assume–”

Kae darted in front of her, blocking her “No–stop, what is going on right now?”


The beast was near-wailing from frustration. The little Agnos couldn’t deny him. The worst of his nature called for him to draw his winds and dash both women against the walls. Smear them. Or he could crack their minds with his trauma.
Both were options. Options Avo had no desire of picking. Neither one was claw against fist. Neither fit the theme.
“One… one of you explain to me what’s going on?” Kae asked again.
A head taller, Draus stared at Avo. “I can’t do this.” A different kind of frustration weighed down on her. “Not with her here. We find another chance.”

He snarled. Kae shivered at his voice, turning slowly to face him, back pressed against Draus. “Ruined the moment. Ruined it.”She blinked. A flash of building anxiety was climbing up her throat. She was trying not to tear up from the pressure. “I-I don’t know why you’re both mad at me.”

Draus winced. “We’re not mad at you–”
“I am,” Avo interrupted. “Could’ve been good.” The glare he got from the Regular was more chiding than challenging. “I’m not wrong. Stopped our fight.”

“Yeah.” She sniffed. “Damn shame.”
A loud crash sounded from behind. The stasis bubble was no more. Their aerovec had struck the floor.
REND CAPACITY: 0%

Kae’s head spun between both of them, her eyes widening in increments as she realized–and then promptly forgot for every few seconds–what she just stopped. “You two w-want to fight?”

They both nodded, wordless in their honesty.
The Agnos’ mouth quivered, opening and closing. “Oh,” was all that she could eventually muster.
Avo shot a look at Draus. “Later.”

Draus’ expression darkened. She took a measured step back. “Oh, there’ll be a time.”

“False Apotheosis,” Avo said, his mind twitching back to the Agnos’ earlier words before everything was so rudely interrupted. “What is it?”

“Avo you’re m-miracle-drunk,” Kae said collecting herself. “What–what you’re feeling–y-your mind… it’s being pulled. Pried. So many directions. The False Apotheosis it’s like absolute freedom… you stop seeing things they are… reality becomes more… more like an interpretation. Beyond… beyond the reach of your Heaven, even.”
The Woundshaper chuckled. “Oh, this poor Oracle is conflating academic theory with divine actuality. To offer faint praise, perhaps you are indeed being influenced by your powers, your immortality, master. However. Ultimately. All these things are of your nature. You are not deluded as she so thinks, but rather free: A truer god than any other: one that strides both sides of the existential tapestry.”
“I-is she talking to you right now?” Kae asked.
Avo blinked. His attention went back over to Kae. “Not human. Not like the others.”

“And they’re–they’re not like anyone else either,” she said, frustration cutting through. She turned to Draus looking for aid. “D-Draus. Tell him. Tell him about–about the phantasmics the Guilders have. They–they modify their own minds to s-stay like who they were and… and even that doesn’t work after prolonged use. It’s… it’s more than a pattern of thought. It’s–”
“Absolute power,” Avo said. “Absolute freedom. Choice.”

Draus spat in the corner. “Gettin’ a bit sick of hearin’ that word already.”

“Will find synonyms,” Avo replied.
“Gleam, consang,” Draus drawled, “that’s exactly what I wanted.”
“Look–Avo,” Kae continued, her hands moving as if she was trying to brush away Draus’ words, “we… we need to take a-a deeper look at your… your Sangeist.”

“Woundshaper,” he corrected.
“What?”

“Renamed my Heaven.”

“Jaus,” Draus said, closing her eyes, “why the fuck is it that every last one of you ‘Clads gotta give something a new name. Couldn’t just add a ‘two’ at the end.”

“INSOLENT PARTLING! I WILL NOT BE CALLED A ‘TWO.’ TWO DENOTES MY PLACE AS SECOND. I AM SECOND TO NONE.”
Internally, Avo glared.
“Not you master. We are not in competition, how could we? I am merely being honest: I exist your most useful Heaven.”
“There’s a lot… lot happening to you we don’t know.” Kae shuffled up to him. “Frankly, I r-recommend that… that we wait before-before we try to stabilize this Fallen Heaven. We–we don’t know the effects–”

“No,” Avo said.
“But–”

“No. Need better Hell.”

“‘You’re actin’ like a child, Draus,’” the Regular simpered, mimicking Kae as poorly as she could.
Avo glared. “I tell you both what I think. I think my Rend is empty. I think I’m going to get the Rendsinks and fix my Heaven. After–”

“After we’re pullin’ out of the Second Fortune,” Draus finished. “Ain’t no way River’s gonna let us stay after we bring this kind of heat. I’ll check with my contact. Pick up that command-aero.” She flicked her eyes over to him again. “Maybe we’ll have our talk then, you and I.”

He clicked his fangs together. “Say when. Going to pick up Rendsinks. Kae. Will need your help plugging the Rupture. Stay with Draus. Will speak to you through her later. Tired of talking. Want to grow instead.”


“Wait,” Kae cried, “We still need to talk about–”

And Avo was wind, soaring up through the crevices of air into skies unladen. Using his Whisper as a periscope, he dove toward the docks in Xin Yunsha, the Rendsinks marked on his DeepNav.
The trip usually would have taken hours, impediments of distance and traffic.
As wind, and with the lanes purged by the passing presence of the Paladins, Avo collected his necessary instruments in a fourth of the time.
***


Shuttling the Rendsinks from their storage in the docks was the easy part. Carrying the Rendsinks along in his Yondergale, he kept them drifting slow and far apart to avoid any collisions.
Alone, each sink shouldn’t possess the capability of matching the output of Rend overflowing from the Fallen Heaven, but together, along with his Hell to adjust, his odds of stabilizing this Rupture stood somewhere north of likely.
Kae guided him with a mixture of reluctance and burgeoning anticipation. For all her fears regarding the state of his mind and the nature of the Woundshaper, she wanted to be a part of this, to operate beyond her damage as an Agnos once more.
Connecting them as intermediary, Draus’ session buzzed in the back of his mind as he drifted inward toward the building where he last faced the Scalpers. The dish at its top was half-collapsed now, and the damage he inflicted with his entropic shroud lined the exterior of the structure with open rents.
Entering was a thing of ease.
It was staying unaffected by the anomalous pulses given off from the thaumic reactor that worried Avo.
+Alright, hang on there,+ A tinge of animosity still lingered in Draus mind. She kept a good leash on it, but it existed all the same. Strangely, it was a bifurcating thing, mostly directed at him, but also pointed inward, at herself. +Kae wants you to look around for a moment. You said this place… +
An unseen pulse washed past him, bathing the world around him with the flash of a peculiar pulse. Unpursued by the Scalpers, Avo found that the broken Soul powering this former block had a signature. A specific luminosity. It tugged at his awareness in one manner ineffable, and another, thaumaturgic.
WARNING: REND CAPACITY SPIKING
REND CAPACITY: 66%
EXTERNAL RESONANCE BLEEDING OVER
DOMAINS DETECTED
- [MATTER]
- [SPACE]
- [BIOLOGY]
- [LUMINOSITY]
As the information flowed through his Metamind, a lightness built in his stomach. With so many Domains–
+Kae’s sayin’ you shouldn’t get excited,+ Draus interrupted. Across the way, Avo watched as the Agnos studied holograms formed by projected phantoms. She was digging through his mem-data with a look of enraptured curiosity. +Fallen Heavens don’t give working Domains. Canons are cracked one way or another. If it had a cycler, that’s probably bricked too.+
Kae said something then. Correcting Draus. It was hard to hear her through Draus’ mind. Maybe he could build more externality functions into her Auto-Seance in the future. If she ever trusted enough to look into her mind, that was.
+She’s sayin’ that it’s probably fine. It spiked your Hell because you got a shared Domain. Says you should hurry before the next major flare-up because if it backlashes you again–+


Avo redoubled his speed, gliding down through the hydroponic garden–entirely regrown in the time he had been gone and reinfested with a forest of eight-headed hydrapedes latching to each other in chains and rings from branches.
The patchwork of scars and grooves he carved into the room during his battle against the Scalpers remained. He brushed his mind over the shape of the chamber and reminisced.
Far had he come. Far from prior weakness and limitation. To think of how vulnerable he was back then laced his mind with bitterness.
Snapping back to focus, he lurched at an angle, diving down through an open gulf that spread wide from the corner. In the corner, away from the staggering trees grown atop pedestals in ten feet increments, a vast gorge of inwardly rent metal ran some thirty feet wide, exposing the guts of the structure.
An eldritch brightness licked past the lip of the wound. The signature of the Fallen Heaven was growing stronger. Heavier.
Avo approached.
This was where the spearships punched through; this was where the Galeslither vacuumed him up; this was where the turbine that was the Fallen Heaven spun.
With Rendsinks in grasp, he descended and made to forge for himself a new Hell.
+You know why I’m calling. You know why.
Got something that can work out for both of us, and you got a debt to even up.
Yeah. A debt. We both know you wouldn’ve been selected by the Longeyes. They would’ve chosen me. Instead, I gave you that spot. And the Frame that came with it. I made you as much as they did. I did.
So I need you to come down now. No need for me to say why. You know. You already know who’s bleeding me. That–that Highflame fuck. That Greatling shit. He’s torching our home. Rusting up our trade.
Yeah. Yeah, your mom’s fine. Think her mind’s clearing more these days.
Talk to her yourself if you don’t believe me.Think she said your name a couple of days back. Heh.
Well you don’t believe, come down and see.
Yeah. Yeah, I am using her to pull you down.
Piece of shit?
[Chuckling]
Reva, I’m your uncle. You should know this already. It runs in the family.
-Thoughtcast between Vincintine “Ripperjack” Javvers and Reva Javvers, Bloodthane of Stormtree
8-4
Venting (II)
In front of Avo, the turbine spun like an old egg-beater, coiling the yolk of existence.
Past scattered licks of shrapnel damage and the crumpled wrecks leftover from crashed spearships, the bodies of those slain here remained.
There was an impossible freshness to their corpses despite the passage of a month. No one had come to claim them. Here, they lay, a garden beneath a garden, bodies piled in a wide and empty room, unrotting flesh squirming with knots of writhing insects.
Ethereal flames spilled forth from the cracks in the turbine, defiling the fabric of reality, more like luminescent arteries than dancing hues of blistering heat. The design of the thaumic reactor was hard to conceptualize. To call it a mere turbine neglected to mention how it sang. The polarized tiles once plating its cracked exterior, curved in a sprawl of square cells up all along the ceiling and then floor. A mirage speckled the air around the miracle machine, a shimmer to a place unseen–a reality as near as it was distant, falsehood made true.
COG-CAP: 13%
The ghosts within his Metamind wailed. But Avo did not look away.
Stepping out from the parting mists of his Galeslither, he directed counter-gusts of wind to balance his Rendsinks as they emerged from the Yondergales. He placed them on vortex-pedestals and puppeted them along like luggage on strings of air.
Almost immediately, a spike of pressure greeted his flesh. He felt something wriggling as if the fabric of space itself was trying to stitch itself under his skin. Where there was biomass, there was the presence, the discomfort. But as a glinting segment of chitin squeezed free from the exposed–still somehow bleeding–wounds of the enforcers, Avo noticed a build up of Rent climbing in his Hell as the sensation collapsed, breaking upon the bulwark of his Frame.
REND CAPACITY: 68%
+Intersecting Domain,+ Draus said, conferring Kae’s words.
+What happens if I didn’t have a Hell? One with a similar enough Domain?+


Draus laughed. +Well, I guess you should look down then, consang. Them Scalpers are puttin’ on a show.+
Synchronized to her words, a chain of twitching hydrapedes spurted out from the oozing wounds of a bifurcated Scalper. Avo frowned. The pool of blood seemed to be frozen in time, the flow continuous, but never growing beyond a certain threshold.
+Kae says best to assume that the blood ain’t there. And don’t touch the bodies. Might be part of the mirage. Who knows with these hydrapedes, Heaven-touched as they are.+
He heeded her advice. The Rupture might not be able to grow insects under his skin as it so desired, but they might still be able to take a more direct path. No sense in risking it.
Looking up, the turbine spun and revealed the long gash running down its middle. He watched it turn as he came to a halt, each rotation churning reality and inspiring dizziness. Inside, Avo caught a flash of the damage–a cracked Soul leaking ripples of thaumic essence into the world like metaphysical solar flares.
COG-CAP: 34%
A pitched scream rose amongst his ghosts. Several overloaded from trauma and fell into a dormant state. Automatically, his Metamind shuffled sequences to maintain his phantasmal architecture. Spots formed behind his eyes as his cog-feed flared with errors, a kaleidoscope of secondhand memories playing in tandem.
He wanted to look away. But he hesitated. He felt something there, meeting him eye to eye, another awareness, suffering in silence. The dismembered light of the turbine-clasped Soul rippled, the colors of its wavelength ineffable, beyond the means of words to describe.
But it was beautiful. And he hungered to drink in its mutilated brightness.
From the depths of his blood, another cry of pain joined his ghosts. His own Heaven was rattling. The Woundshaper shaking, its being infused with raw dread unbefitting a god. “No… no this… Master, please… please look away. I beg you! I beg you! I can bear the sight no longer! It cannot be! We–we are gods. We are the divine. How…” A mournful note played now. A whine that sounded more befitting a dog. “We gave you the world. Why did you do this to us? We did not deserve this! Enough!”Avo couldn’t help but give a chuckle. How did an immortal being fare when faced with the irrefutable proof of its own fragility, that it, like a cheap plate, could be broken once and again?
They fared as humans did. Like mortals–for in that moment, it too bore witness to the truth of New Vultun, the truth of this new age: for though that which is eternal may burn immortal, in this strange eon even the gods themselves could shatter.
But not him.
He would never shatter.

He would learn. He would taste. He would become.
Avo faced the pain, and he let it sink it further, feeling his ghosts writhe, listening to his Woundshaper scream.
“No more! No! No more!”
+Avo! Gaze into mind-breakin’ shit later! Trauma’s leaking over, godsdammit.+
He blinked. He pulled his gaze away, finally noticing the cascading errors burning across his visual display as his tertiary phantasmics shut down one after another.
COG-CAP: 89%
“M-merciful,” The Woundshaper muttered, its self-awareness shaken. It was trying to thank Draus. “Of higher make you are. Higher blood.” It paused. “Praise be, master. No more of that. I will be silent. I will supplicate with every word of yours with due obsequiousness. Never let me gaze upon such again. I cannot… It cannot be my fate.”
He grunted. Part of him still wanted to peek, but he knew better. +What next. Deploy Rendsinks?+
+Kae says to set ‘em down first.+


He did so, each vortex choking off to rasping wisps. Four cracks sounded as the large chunks of thaumic machinery he carved free from the golems but a day prior greeted the floor, spreading fissures. With two sinks from the Galeslither and two more from the Sangeists, each of them should possess a symmetrical Domain to the Fallen Heaven.
Now, the question was how to integrate them into the structure of the Soul.
+Okay,+ Draus said. She cracked her neck and the relief spilled over to Avo, a comforting feeling though a bit uncanny. +So, here’s what you gotta do: reach inside it with your Heaven of Air. Just… wind its exposed core, I reckon. Do the thing you do when you slurp the golems. It should interface with your Soul and try ejecting its waste across to the sinks. Kae says your Meta-Fac should do the heavy liftin. Theoretically.+
+Theoretically?+ He replied, tone bland.
+Yeah, rotlick, theoretically. You wanna get a new Hell or not?+

This sounded like a stupid way for him to overload. Avo sighed.
+Then?+
+Then you start venting into the Rendsinks. They should have some kind of containment sigil on the inside. Same stuff that Kae’s eye is made from. Corresponding thaumic… some shit.+ A brief pause came as he heard Kae snarl uncharacteristically with anger. Draus, deciding to do something unlike herself as well, flinched. +Yeah, Kae–look, that’s how I talk. I don’t mean it’s actual shit. Your eye isn’t shit. I was bein’-- Respect? This is me bein’ respectful, you think I was near as nice to the other Regs? We were–+

+Draus,+ Avo said. He wondered if she felt as annoyed as he did doing these interruptions. +Apologize later. Feed me now. Going to interface now. Current Rend at seventy-one percent


+Godsdammit, two of you talkin’ at the same time…+


He ignored her and cast his being wide. The winds around him answered, rising in lifting billows, their path lined by a contrail of cracking spatial fractals.
+Nothin’ to worry about,+ Draus said. The way she cleared her throat made him worry. The way packets of nervousness drifted over from her mind didn’t help. +Should be just slight deviations between the two canons, two separate subrealities gonna adjust to overlapping in the prime. Rupture would’ve widened if any backlash was triggered.+
+Good to know. Glad to not die.+

+Yeah, me too. Spatial Ruptures have a tendency to shift asses where heads should be for miles. There’d be good odds of us goin’ with you.+
Reaching into the openings left upon the turbine, he felt his Woundshaper shiver as he pushed further, groping his way blindly toward the Soul inside. The warmth greeting him then was a stained one, the kind you would feel when sliding your fingers into the cleft of a wound.
WARNING: SOUL DETECTED
THIRD SPHERE THAUMIC REACTOR
HEAVENS: [1]
- [ERROR]
- [ERROR]
DOMAINS
- [ERROR]
- [ERROR]
- [ERROR]
- [ERROR]
THAUMIC OUTPUT - 534 THAUM/c
WARNING: THAUMIC CYCLER DAMAGE [MODERATE]
-TEMPORAL LEAKAGE DETECTED
That made Avo tilt his head.
+Ignore that,+ Draus said. +Seen it myself. The overload probably cracked the cycler. The dragon’s loop is still runnin’ seeing how the Heavens are still goin’. Its canons are cracked. Won’t be shitting any stable miracles into the re–.+
The Fallen Heaven shuddered. A soundless crackle rattled the fabric of reality. Tears opened around him, the fabric of space itself, a maw widening across the seams of geometry. Immediately, the bodies around him glitched; they disappeared and reappeared, freshness gone, rot and rust coating flesh and armor.
A rain of hydrapedes came forth through the spatial wounds. Incubated from the bodies of the dead, the insects fell, their unnatural conjoining revealed to him for the first time. Fused by lengths of fingers and eyes, stretches of sinew extended from each hydrapede, the organs pumping beneath their cracking shells, biology of a foreign make.
Avo sniffed.
Human flesh. Human offal. Human bone.
The Soul within the turbine erupted, the borders of its ontological structure lashing existence, flaying shape from reality as its broken canons surged. Connected to its structure, Avo felt it prying at his Liminal Frame.
WARNING!
THAUMIC MASS OF UNIDENTIFIED EXCEE–
ERROR!
+Draus!+ Avo sent.
+Stay zero,+ Draus said. +Kae says this is… uh, normal.+


For a moment, Avo felt his eyeball turn into a writhing hydrapede before his Hell filled further.
REND CAPACITY - [ERROR]%
LEAKAGE: SPHERE III FALLEN HEAVEN
EXTERNAL RESONANCE BLEEDING OVER
REND CAPACITY - 434.444%
His session crackled. +That’s also–+
+What next? Tell me what!+
Inside, he could feel his Hell straining. Errors burst out behind his eyes like fireworks. His perception blurred. He was himself, struggling, wrestling with a larger Soul, funneling the entropy decaying its structure into himself. But through the cracks and gulfs of the turbine, he looked upon himself through the Fallen Heaven.
Its structure was characterized by collapse. If there was a shape to its Heaven, none existed now. Instead, gleaming shards of fragments danced a weightless ballet, the disfigured pieces resembling parts of a conjoined arm. One part shone viridescent with buzzing wings and glinting chitin, but from its base swayed strands of human tissue. Fractals of space ran in radiant ponds in three parts.
CANON - [ERROR]
HUBRIS - [ERROR]
BACKLASH! BACKLASH! BACKLASH!
REND CAPACITY - [ERROR]
Waterfalls of ghosts and mem-data flowed down like a deluge from the perspective of the leaking Soul. To its gaze, it looked down where Avo stood and only saw a collapse–a maw across all existences, a single point where light flowed inward to feed a singularity.
A cry of surprise rose. The Woundshaper stirred. “What are we…”
The session cracked again. Draus sounded almost nonchalant in her words. +Connect with the Rendsinks now. All of ‘em.+


Dislodged from his stupor, Avo threaded his being into the four Rendsinks. He stood a junction to flowing Rend, his being a fork in the mouth to the sinks. From the Rupture, the flood came, and he served as both funnel and engine.
VENT! VENT! VENT!
REND CAPACITY - 434.444%
BACKLASH IMMINENT! BACKLASH IMMINENT!
+Just keep the flow goin’,+ Draus said. +Long as you keep it flowin’ and don’t let it bottle up inside, nothin’ should break.+
Avo didn’t respond. His muscles were frozen stiff with stress while his mind raced, the wholeness of his focus locked to his falling Rend Capacity. The world was a blur around him as the rain of hydrapedes began to wane. From on high they struck him, splattering against his person in clinging sap of mucus white and speckles of human offal mixed between the chitin.
He lowered his head and found himself glad he put his mask on before this. Would have been tempting to get a snack.
In the corner of his feed, four new windows appeared, each belonging to a different Rendsink.
LOADING…
INTEGRATING RENDSINKS…
ATTUNING SINK CAPACITIES
RENDSINK A - 8%
RENDSINK B - 3%
RENDSINK A - 2%

RENDSINK A - 3%
The three “A” were primary units attached to a golem. The B indicated the second one that he got from the Galeslither. They had a bit of leftover Rend from the golem patrols
Their Rend grew while the Fallen Heaven’s fell. The contrast came uneven across his sinks, but the pace was going to be close.
+Don’t think I can offload all the Rend,+ Avo said.
+Don’t need to,+ Draus replied. +Just gotta get it down below a hundred. That’s how much your Hell can pack. You drain the rest of that on your own.+

As the process continued, the thought of integrating the Rendsinks for future runs and dives appealed. The ease of being able to eject his entropy into a…
Avo frowned. Lugging around a two-ton module was a bit unwieldy. Might be easier for the Galeslither than the Woundshaper, but even so, they seemed a burden for the present. This required more contemplation.
RENDSINK A - 100%
CAPACITY REACHED
RENDSINK B - 100%
CAPACITY REACHED
RENDSINK A - 100%
CAPACITY REACHED

RENDSINK A - 100%
CAPACITY REACHED
REND CAPACITY - 50%
+Now! Now! Do the thing! Take the Soul!+
Avo didn’t hesitate. Reaching out with his Heaven, he tugged with all his might. His perception coiled in and out and back down into his skull. Spots formed behind his eyes as he felt the structure of the Soul collapse like a folded envelope.
Dolloping into a single beam of coruscating resplendence, fire greeted fire as his Soul expanded, blooming out from his very being in a reality-shaking ripple. Waves of echoing brightness danced upon the fabric of all that was, the walls whorling, the bodies twisting, time itself knotting around him.
Draus’ thoughts came as muted crackles, her voice broken and discordant.
For an instant, Avo felt himself rise into the air, a pure white scar that gouged deep into the roots of all that ever was.
At the center of things stood Avo. Time. Force. Space. Matter. Signals. All bled into him and crossed his borders warped by the resonance of his Frame.
And then, the wave shattered, and slammed back together, spiraling in a whirlpool of indelible markings as they collapsed and descended, draining deep into the depths of his broadening flame.
No. There was something different. Not wrong, but more. Another presence spiraled within him, its severed shine mirroring his own.
[SOUL] OBTAINED
ONTOLOGICAL DAMAGE SEVERE
HEAVEN INTEGRAT–
ERROR
SCANNING HEAVEN
ONTOLOGICAL DAMAGE SEVERE
THAUMIC CYCLER DETECT–
ONTOLOGICAL DAMAGE MODERATE
REVERTING MYTHOS…
REPAIRING ONTOLOGY - 2%
THAUMIC OUTPUT - 966 THAUM/c
REND CAPACITY - 50%
Head spinning, Metamind flickering as his ghosts struggled to reform themselves, Avo staggered on shaking legs. A new weight settled inside him. A new breadth. As his Auto-Seance came back online, he heard Draus, her tone hushed and intense.
+Avo? Avo? You there? We saw the flash! Shit, half the fuckin’ Sovereignty probably saw that.+
+Got more than the Hell,+ Avo said, stumbling away from the Rendsinks, stunned. He could feel the entropy budding within them, the instability of his existence boiling inside. He needed to take them. Couldn’t leave them here. He could still use them somehow. +Subsumed everything. Took Heaven. Domains. Took… took cycler. Soul too. My Frame… trying to repair them. Thinks it can repair them.+
A moment of silence came over the other end. +Kae’s squealin’ right now. Somethin’ uh, somethin’ about a thaumaturgic breakthrough. Sayin’ your Meta-Fac’s gonna put her kind out of a job.+


He nodded. +Convenient.+


+Convenient's a sidearm, Avo. I’ve seen Godclads work to contain Ruptures before. This shit… it ain’t supposed to be a one-man job.+ She breathed. +Yeah. I see why everyone’s gunning for that Frame now. You should get back. Take the sinks with you. Kae’s gonna wanna make a dive again later.+
He responded with a grunt.
“It is not the end,” his Woundshaper whispered.
Avo frowned. “What?”

“The other Soul… your brightness is mending it. It’s… it’s refusing the structure.” A laugh came from his Heaven of Blood. “It is not the end. We remain… we remain eternal.”
A shiver ran through him. A passing memory manifested.
He saw himself from the gaze of the Fallen Heaven.
He saw a wound that would drink the world.
He saw a being of ever-growing hunger.
“This cannot be possible. We were not there. No one of the Order was there!”
“Then what about someone who wasn’t? Something else?”

“Don’t be absurd, only the Agnos–
“One who isn’t an Agnos anymore?”

“...”

“Do you remember one Kae Kusanade? You loaned her out to us for Project Godshaper–shame about that mess. Let’s talk about her for a moment.”

“What makes you think I want to talk about her? After what you people did–”

“It was necessity. But Jaku, please. I’m not asking as a Mirror. I’m asking as your friend. This should concern all the Agnossi as a whole. Someone is closing rifts, and if the Compact of Neutrality is broken–”

“It is not!”

“I know. I trust you. But the mere suspicion of the thing will cause enough friction for there to be a forest fire. And I really don’t want to watch you burn.”
“Is that a threat?”

“No. No! Jaku. Please don’t insult me like that. We both know my masters. We both know what comes next if they starting asking personally. Choose me. Choose me, and I’ll do everything I can to choose you.”
-Exchange between High Agnos Jakuta Ajayi and [REDACTED], Ori-Thaum Incubi
8-5
Anticipation
Hidden within wisping currents, Avo carried Draus and Kae back to the Second Fortune, a new Heaven burning within. The path he took was evasive; circling. A density of Exorcist Specters had filled the skies, lining each block across the Sovereignty with a scrying eye. He masked his travel using station loci as checkpoints and automated cargo carriers for cover. Such necessity stretched the duration of his travel, but laden with a burgeoning Soul, his pace was doomed to falter.
Several times, he was halted by climbing Rend or sweeping tides of perception cast down from on high. He stole pieces of memories from those around him using his Ghostjack and lined his thoughtstuff with said sequences to use as a facade.
All the while, he struggled against his focus, the world around him blurring between states of existence; reality was made ever more malleable with the second Soul flickering alight within. New subrealities brushed his ontology, greeting him in fleeting instants of gnosis, metaphysical concepts bleeding into the fabric of the world before him like fragile patterns, beckoning to be rewoven toward a more personal desire.
REPAIRING ONTOLOGY - 6%
It was nearing midnight when they finally managed to hop free from an automated Stormtree cargo carrier. Shielded by the locus, Avo jacked into the locus of the long wedge-shaped ship and directed its pathing to take a lane overhead Xin Yunsha.
Outside, the aero’s external feeds played the opening scenes of a Paladin-enforced lockdown. Block by block, ghosts were working through the districts, latching onto passing minds with their phantasmal forms.
The Second Fortune would not be exempt. But Draus seemed assured of Green River’s competence.
+River’s got somethin’ for this,+ the Regular said. +Just don’t rightly know how we’re supposed to move around after. Skies are gonna be checkpointed with real Necros running scout detail now. Syndicates are gonna be sinking down beneath the gutters for their business. Probably talkin’ Penumbra territory.+

The realm of the Low Masters. Of Walton and his alternates.
The winds billowed with strain and fury at the thought of his father’s nodes. What truths remained from his past? What promises were held sacred?
Avo could not say. But through the blessed shine of his expanding Ontology, he found a new certitude to being.
He had fasted long, devouring only that which he could, and that which the code allowed.
Now, his limits were broken. As was his faith. Yet, from the shards of his past personhood came power, true and rising, and with it, the choice to redefine the self.
In the past hours, he had rejected the beast, had ignored the Woundshaper, and had clashed with Draus. The refugees came to his mind again. Feeble. Weak. But with potential, brimming with sensations and emotions.
Something clicked in Avo’s mind.
Yes. He hungered still but was severed from death, starvation was but a passing concern. The meat of the meek and feeble were familiar tastes now. With his Heaven, he yearned to devour something nigh-formless, but long yearned for.
As his winds closed in on the Second Fortune, the face of the father flashed through his mind. Essus. Still a slave to Conflux perhaps, or even long dead. But should the chance arise, there was a taste he could give Avo. Something base and self-gratifying, but perversely just.
Mirrorhead was to die. Not because he would serve Ninth Column’s needs. Not because he was to start or avert another conflict between the Guilds. Not because he was a Syndicate head or his countless crimes.
He would die because Avo desired to feel what it was when the will of another Godclad came apart between his claws–to test the limits of immortality. And when there was nothing left of the man, once Avo supped himself swollen on desirable cruelty, he yearned to know how it felt to place a new choice in the hands of another; a choice absolute; a choice reinforced by power.
“Be you trying to emulate the shadow of a man you call father, master?” the Woundshaper asked. “Or be this an insult instead? That you can make a greater savior than he ever could? A rebellion of… symbology?” She laughed. “How childishly divine. Can you imagine what fury you might inspire: the ghoul-god, to be the maker of gods.”
For the Heaven of Blood, Avo held no answers. He didn’t truly understand himself. But he had a desire, and so, the beast must feed.
+Draus,+ Avo said, +Have a question for Kae.+
+Shoot.+
+How does a Liminal Frame get installed? Need details.+
+...What’re you gettin’ at?+
Over empty streets populated by lonesome drones and flashing advertisements, he rushed toward the Second Fortune.
+I want to make a god out of a slave.+


***
REPAIRING ONTOLOGY - 8%
“Well, Jelene, when you said you would take our pet monster out for a walk, I must confess I didn’t expect the sky to fall shortly thereafter,” Green River said.
Draus breathed out through her nose, arms folded, posture slouched. “Ain’t much of me lettin’ anythin’ happen. He decided; I had to deal.”
There were few things Avo liked about Green River, but to say the Sang was without virtue would be a bitter falsehood at best. She took the coming of the Exorcists and Paladins with the grace of an elderly matron shutting the windows in anticipation of heavy rain.
As they entered their room, Avo detected a constellation of a hundred and eight micro-loci festooned at various places in their room.

“A multi-lobby facade,” she said, offering a courteous nod. Only the braying snarls coming from her fox betrayed the emotions that simmered inside her. “For deception’s sake.”
“What is that garish creature on her shoulder?” his Woundshaper sneered. “What twisted parody of a hound lays draped upon her? Little wonder your antipathy: she has no sense. What rightful master of mead would allow a mongrel onto their establishment, let alone their person? A disgrace. Spill her blood, master. Let it be put to better use in our hands.”
He understood the design. One locus was easy to dig through. A cluster capable of shuttling memories through sessions by the second was far superior.
Gathered again around the swirling logo of the holo-vision, the four of them sat as Green River chuckled softly to herself, the softness of her voice growing louder and louder until it became peals of disbelief.

“A trip to clear his head,” Green River said, rubbing tears from her eyes. Along her shoulder, the fox seethed, looking as if it was moments away from foaming. Mastering herself, she wiped the wetness away on her qi-pao, the stain sapped away by the floral decals painted upon the gown. She looked at Avo with a bemused glare. “Is your head clear now? Do you have control of your senses?”

“Know what I want,” he replied.
She closed her eyes, and at that moment, he felt a trickle–the merest trickle–of her frustration.
Good to know that their loathing was mutual.
“The Paladins and Exorcists will be conducting mass thougthscans soon,” she said. With a thought, she activated their holo-vision and let scenes play from a variety of streams. “Headline news. Four-hundred thousand nulled and rising. A laced Crucible to blame. An unidentified Fallwalker working to spark a gutter war. You’ve woven quite a tale from this one little… excursion.”

She shot another look at Draus. The Regular caught the look and channeled it into a glare directed toward Avo. He ignored her.
Kae coughed. “We… we also managed to close a Fallen Heaven.”

The Sang tilted her head. “So you did,” she began. The fox’s right eye twitched. “With… just the three of you.”

“Mostly me,” Avo said. “Kae helped. Draus existed.”
Draus scoffed a laugh. It was the type you got from someone about to hit you. “You remember sayin’ that when I break your arms later, rotlick.”
Taking a breath, Green River turned her gaze on Avo again. The fox frowned. “Are you beginning to understand the worth of that which lurks within you?”

The Woundshaper grumbled with indignance. “She avoids attributing rightful tribute to you master. She separates a god from its domain. Ask her: when she strains to release filth from her body what part of her should the credit be granted to? The hand or the bottom?”


“One month,” Avo said, leaping over her words in reply. Her face slipped into blankness. Doubtless, she was trying to herd him, to drive him from remembering that he could free her from the last of her chains, or so the node said. “Need to do as I ask.”

“Within reason,” she replied, tone blank.

Despite what he felt for her, it was understandable. The difference between an order of suicide and a murder was a matter of semantics at best. But something about the affair felt ill upon him. Like it ground against his nature.
“Don’t like it,” Avo said.

“What do you dislike?” she asked.
“Kept you as a slave,” Avo said. A low growl came free from his voice. “Walton wouldn’t… but he’s dead. I keep forgetting.” He studied her for a moment. “River. Have a question?”

One of her fingers twitched. The fox went still, body tense as if waiting for an attack. “Please, ask.”

“What would you do if I made you a Godclad.”

The following silence fell with the weight of a toppling column. Draus’ heart sped up. Kae’s eyes widened.


“Avo! I-I said I… we don’t know if your Meta-Fac–”

“Kill my sisters,” Green River said. The words shot out of her as if she would never get another chance to say them. She looked down and away. “For revenge. It is not… special.” She laughed, embarrassed at the banality of her desire. “But it is a want all the same. You understand.”

“No,” Avo said. He didn’t know if she was lying. But ultimately, it didn’t matter. He wanted to hear what she would do with choice, and to lie was as acceptable as any other. “No, I don’t. Not like you. But would like to. Someday. Would like to.”

The Sang flicked her eyes over to Draus. The Regular shrugged. “Don’t give that look. He’s been on this shit since he ghouled-out down in the gutters.”

“You,” Avo said, asking her now. “Frame?”

Draus shrugged. Her indifference surprised him. “Hells, Avo. I ain’t a complicated gal. I’ll probably be doin’ the same thing. ‘Cept the gangers and Syndicates might stay broken after I work ‘em using a Heaven.” She laughed. “Would like one of them Force Domains. Keep it simple. Burn shit. Break shit. Butcher shit. Dead half-strands. Safe Warrens. Happy Reg.”
He turned to look at Kae. Her expression paled. “I… I… I can be whole again, maybe.”

The Woundshaper scoffed. “Hmph. Leave it to a cripple to yearn for a mere memory of what once was than the dawn that mounts the horizon.”
“Our dreams are colored by personhood,” Avo replied internally.


“Their dreams perhaps. Stay a god a little while longer, master. You will learn what it means to be more… elemental. Leave these paltry desires borne of a single vessel aside, for ours is to shape the nature of all that is.”
“We’re… we’re going to need to see… see what’s happening with your Souls once the… the repairs are completed,” she said. “This… I… this has never happened before… two Souls shouldn’t inhabit one being…”
Another silence followed. The fox sneezed.
Green River shook herself from the stupor inflicted by his question. “Alas, we must speak toward matters of the future. The Column. They wish to meet you. Are coming to meet you, as you have been so tardy in your assent to meet them.”

Avo flexed his claws. “Are they.”

“It is to be an expression of goodwill,” she replied. “I explained that–”

“Won’t be their dog,” Avo said, cutting her off. “Frame stays mine. Mine.”

“That is precisely a matter they wish to discuss,” she finished. “They want to strike an… accord.”

“Accord?”

“They feared you to be an instrument of Walto–his alternates. No matter. After your actions in the gutters, they have now deemed you to be… independent.”

Draus chuckled darkly. “Shit, Avo. Maybe you should kill a couple hundred thousand more FATED. Get yourself sent a placard or somethin’.”

Kae winced at the viciousness of Draus’ statement. It suddenly occurred to him how little she fit in this room of liars, monsters, and killers.
“Who’s coming,” he asked.
“I do not know,” Green River replied. “They do wish to speak of our ‘Mirrorhead’ problem. And what to do with your father’s alternates.”
“When.”

“Soon.”

“What useful information.”
“Their communicative skills could use some work; I agree.”

Avo sighed. He wanted to avoid them for a while longer. “The interview. The Ori-Thaum traitor. She ready for a dive?”

“Tomorrow,” Green River said. “They are… undergoing some changes as of right now. A transfer of documentation, so to speak.”

He understood. Running away in New Vultun meant everything needed to be severed to the root. Too many eyes, too many memories. The easiest way to disappear is to be given the identity of someone dead, but not listed so. It was always easier to obfuscate than it was to create.
A related want echoed in Avo’s mind. He had been yearning for another grafter ever since his first implant. With his Heavens, the strain on his body was blunted, but not relieved, and considering his distrust of Green River, he spent much of his time avoiding her establishments.
He had scried her local grafter a few times. A Scaarthian matriarch. One seemingly untouched by her own craft. She seemed to only conduct grafts part-time, spending the rest as a maker of novel bioforms for gangers, enforcers, or the circuits as a whole.

“Your grafter,” Avo asked. “Does she have anything good?”
Green River smiled. “Does she possess anything usable for one of your nature, you mean?”

Avo growled. Back to old habits. “Answer.”

“Come, then. Best you see for ourselves. Far be it for me to shop for another.”
“What you got… it ain’t enough.

Look at your arms, your legs, your skin, your eyes.
Think of the last time they failed you.
Muscles that couldn’t carry. Eyes that couldn’t see. Lungs that couldn’t breathe. Skin that burned and bones that broke.
Aren’t you tired of being let down?
Aren’t you worth more than some first draft of random biology?
Yes. Yes, you are, with the new Ascender modifications, you can be all that you want to be.
[+Mem-Code pop-up deployed+]
Don’t just dream better; choose better.
Choose Ascender."
-Dawnforge Industries, Ascender Advertisement
8-6
Idealization (I)
REPAIRING ONTOLOGY - 9%
The ability to travel as wind was freedom absolute, and such a liberty, once tasted, made the act of walking feel almost subhuman.
Walls and doors were constraints. Blockages. Time was wasted. It felt a capitulation for Avo, his sense of power shifting just under his skin calling to him like a siren.
Still, he followed Green River all the same. Though he knew where the grafter resided, remanifesting would expose the truth of his ontology to prying eyes. Though it was promised that the Second Fortune was circumspect when it came to its guests, the Ninth Column managed to pierce the mind of its mistress with ease, and the distressing fact of reality was that there were other segments of Walton to be wary of.
Their descent brought them further down than he ever cared to go on his own. Of the Second Fortune’s numerous floors, the basement substructure was designed to hold one thing and one thing truly.
The blood den. The circuit ring: a place where brutality watered minds dry of entertainment. Here, imps flowed and death came cheap. Street toughs fought bioforms, fought captured ghouls, fought anything to wet the tastes of watchers between even grander events.
As he, Draus, Kae, and River emerged from the slow descent of her private elevator, she led them free from a small alcove, the flesh-like walls beyond the opening elevator doors unfurling into flaps to let them out. They found themselves far down between climbing promontories where live watchers lingered in other organic alcoves.
The stands were empty of cheers at the present, however. The bloodletting was over for the day, set to start anew tomorrow.
Such was a thing Avo was beginning to appreciate in the Sang’s architecture–the modularity. The responsiveness. Metal had its virtues, but unto itself it was a dead thing, one necessitating damage to be reshaped. Changed.
Striding out, they found themselves out upon a spiraling path made from smooth-carved bone. With each step, Avo felt his claws click and the substance below rattle. A hollowness existed. Inside, he felt a tug.
“Master. I feel something deeper yet. It is swimming in the marrow.”
“Do not concern yourself with the fishes,” Green River said as if reading his thoughts. “They are merely being filtered into the rest of the Fortune’s arteries.”

So, that was the origin of her little show earlier. Different bioformed aquatics ordered on the go directly from the basement.
How convenient it was to have mastery over life. Avo wondered if that made her chains all the tighter considering she herself was obliged to serve so many. Torture came in different expressions.
They were far beneath the casino proper now, their path taking on a winding quality even as the path widened. Casting his winds ahead, he felt his reach drift into a place wide and cavernous, with hundreds of bodies and shapes dancing in a ballet of constant motion, tinkering with strange shapes built into the walls.
As they encroached on the grafter’s burrow, the walls grew thick with muscle, its texture ribbed and rubbery. Specks of sparkling insects frozen in amber inlaid the gaps between clefts of tissue, their decorative purposes turned functional as scintillating enhancers to the growing veins of bioluminescence brightening the path.
The end came as they arrived at an open threshold to the cavernous chamber. Vast was its space and geodesic was its design, its roofs supported by five spinal pillars fused to a swaying chandelier of pulsing gray matter.

Avo tilted his head at that. Lines of synaptic tissue draped down as in hundreds of umbilical tethers, all connected to the massive organ that loomed over them. Draus hummed. “How long you’ve been hiding this exomath under your establishment, River?”

“Five years,” she said. “I kept the brain for safekeeping. A favor to another sister.”
The way she said favor made Avo wonder if blackmail was involved.
Countless bioforms and eunuchs marched, their bodies animal, insect, dog, and human all. This was the ballet Avo felt earlier; they danced their number in perfect discord, all moving at different paces to fulfill divergent tasks, but never did they collide. Never did they even come close. An uncanniness filled him as he realized he saw nothing of the thoughtstuff about them; their minds were so vacuous that they existed unseen to the Nether. Overhead, insectoid arms picked and plucked eggs and gene-helix-marked cylinders to load into the chitinous chambers lining the walls.
Then, Avo saw her. The Scaarthian he had scried during his early days here. The grafter herself. She lay entombed within the clasping ribs of what resembled a biomechanical device made for torture. A connector ran into her mind as well, but her leash was thicker–more statically imbued than all the others.
Parallel to the drone jocks in their stasis modules, the grafter was playing composer to a roomful of vessels beyond her own. With her face exposed in its entirety, twin scars ran far down both her eyes, partitioning her face into three sections. She was bare of scalp and soft in feature, with a pointed chin and a button for a nose. As she blinked, he caught sight of the misted clouds floating over her irises as if oil upon water. Her face twitched, expression one of absolute focus.
Considerable effort was being exerted. Her body simply wasn’t part of that equation.
“Hail, Ruveca,” Green River said. “I trust your day proceeds pleasingly?”

The grafter gasped and chaos cascaded. Bodies slammed together. Eggs and other pieces of genetic material being loaded into aortal chambers lining the walls slipped free from limbs. A slick sound sang from the ground as part of the floor drew back, exposing a cage of teeth and gums below.
“It did,” Ruveca said, nodding more to herself than anyone, “just before you spoke to me. It did.”

No offense lined her word. Not even annoyance. Her chain of focus, now broken, stayed as such as the countless bodies in the room turned to gaze upon the newcomers.
A towering split-jawed tiger-spider hybrid blinked slowly at Avo as it loitered along one of the major spinal columns, its chimeric instincts on auto as it awaited new commands. He wondered what it took to hollow a living being out to such an extent, and why they didn’t use ghosts for such an operation.
Perhaps they feared their allies at Ori-Thaum might just pluck from them their secrets.
Striding forward, Green River gestured to the three behind her. “These are–”

“You know what I like about my eunuchs?” Ruveca said. “They’re blind. Blind in their hearts. They usually know what to do when I tell them, but if I don’t breathe any sweet nothings in their minds it’s silence–just silence. It’s peaceful. But that’s quite the opposite of what you do, isn’t it ghoul?”

For once Green River seemed startled. She spun, shooting an alarmed look at Avo. Her expression only deepened when he shrugged in reply. “Ruveca… how might you know–”


Ruveca laughed. It was too girlish a noise to come from so large a giantess. “Bright-Wealth spoke of him in our weekly ma jiang game. The genius ghoul. The ghoul of ghosts. The master of memories.” The crowd's echoing smile was a controlled, perfected motion. Something that came from years of controlling countless bodies besides one’s own, Avo realized. “I have wanted to meet you for some time.”
“Sounds like you got a fan,” Draus teased.
Avo ignored the Regular.
“Know why I’m here?”

Ruveca considered the question. “Only reason why anyone comes to see me: They want a new monster; they want parts of a new monster in them. Suppose you will have to be my third. A monster, that wants to be even greater at being monstrous.” Her puppets grinned wider, the word “monster” amusing to her. “I have worked on many of your kind. Butchered them. Conducted my art using them. You are the first of your brethren not to greet me with fangs intent to taste my flesh.”

“Could do it if you’re feeling nostalgic.”.
“Let’s leave such boring habits in the past, shall we?”

He grunted. “Looking for bioware. Augmentations.”

“Of course,” she said. “It is something I would seek if I was one of your nature as well. Implants are not a common thing for your ilk though. Shame about the blood. It really limits your receptivity toward chrome. An entire pathway toward purity just gone.” A single tear ran down her left eye. He tasted a sliver of sorrow leak forth from her mind. “It’s heartbreaking.”


Through word and expression, he read and understood what she was. “Alloyist?”

“Of a branch,” she said. “The mainline does love their dead metal so very much. Wait. I wish to meet you mind to mind. Please hold.”

With her words, the tiger-spider skittered over, its outer flesh a twisted weave of meat and muscle wrapped around eight clawed paws and jutting mandibles from a splitting skull. A full ten feet in height, it towered over even Avo as it approached, and when the umbilical snapped free from its skull, it crumbled with a heavy thud.

The cord swayed, its tissue silk and membranous, running down to a crystalline speartip and small hair-thin dendrites that groped at the emptiness of space.
Loathe as Avo was to impale his skull with a foreign object, death and damage meant little more than brief setback to him now.
“Kill me if my thoughtstuff goes out,” Avo said.
Draus shrugged. “Might consider that to be an improvement. Could take you and the Frame for a joy ride.”

“Get nulled the first time you run into a problem without me.”

“Gettin’ a big head there; I’ve survived plenty without you.”

“Saw you get smashed by a golem. Poor impression. Maybe that’s why you're disgraced.”

She inhaled through her nose. Yeah, that hit something tender. “See, Avo, this the kind of talk that makes me tear my consang’s arm and beat him with it.”

“We’re consangs?”

“You gonna let me tear your arm off?”

“Children, please focus,” Green River said.

Both Avo and Draus glared at her.
“Hey, Avo, you remember when River spent twenty minutes sayin’ nothin’ only to end up getting your brain broken by your dad?"
"I remember.”

“Yeah,” Draus said. “Didn’t seem so long ago.”

Kae giggled.
Green River pursued her lips and held her head high and unashamed. She gestured toward the umbilical again. “Please. Kind Ruveca is waiting.”

Clutching the shape of the cord, Avo felt the slime run between his fingers as he angled it toward his skull.
“Through the eye works as well,” Ruveca said. She smiled brightly. “Least resistance to the brain.”
He ignored her and forced the tip into the softness behind his skull instead. The crystal bit into his flesh and immediately, he felt the dendrites pry into his tissue like prodding fingers.
“What manner of communication is this?” the Woundshaper said, seeming more interested than disgusted. “A strange practice this huntress of mine has decided to pick up. But I applaud her all the same, for what is the body but blood architecture?”
A spike carried upon bolts of lightning flashed through Avo’s mind. Lines of mem-data danced across his cog-feed as something bypassed his ghosts to initiate direct integration.

[INTEGRATING HOSTS]
He was on an island comprised of pure viscera, with gardens of organs pulsing from trees and growing like crops beneath his feet. Crimson waves crashed against his ankles. Pieces of meat were pulled from the shore into the water. He breathed in but there was no taste. He scanned the horizon using his feed, but his Metamind fed his consciousness no useful details.
“Hello,” Ruveca’s voice came from behind. He turned. The Scaarthian was standing next to him. She wasn’t blind here but her golden eyes remained distracted and drifting. Her body held a strange moonlit quality to her as she gazed upon the unseen light spilling through the mask of blackened clouds. A brigandine coat layered in plates scrawled with Scaarthian runes and jade squares painted with Sang characters adorned her. She held out a single palm. “Let us talk about what you wish to become.”


The soil heeded her call as organs and ichor rose to greet her palm. Between her fingers, a simulacrum of Avo came into shape–or perhaps it was just another ghoul. It wasn’t easy to tell these days.
She rubbed her index finger and her thumb together, the motion prying something apart from the gore-molded ghoul standing across from Avo. Its chest opened. It spun. Along its spine, the flesh of its back unzipped. There, he saw a mimicry of his Celerostylus plain to his gaze. A marker was placed upon it, listing it as an item worth study. Squirming tighter around the simulacrum’s spine, the Celerostylus ran in countless strands up through the brain, through the body in a weave of enhanced nerves. It was a foreign symbiote installed as a rooted stem.
“How did you come by this,” Ruveca breathed, fingers coveting the bioware, but unwilling to touch it, even in this dream of a simulation. Her approach to augmentation was reverence. Near-worship. But he supposed that being obsessed was a relief in itself. In this broken eon, how wonderful it was to be blessed with personal purpose. “This shouldn’t be out for months. And it works on you–I’m reading more… potency than the commercial version. Yes. Yes. This must’ve been stolen from the No-Dragons themselves.”
She looked at him and smiled.
“You are a bearer of many gifts, do you know that?”

More than she realized.
“But…” she spoke, her face shrouded with frustration just as the light lessened from the skies. “Your body can’t bear it. Ghouls are… enduring. Survivable. But fragile. Soft. Weak. Slow. Lacking in so many ways… How long can you use it? The organ.”

“Bit more than ten maybe. Pain spikes after. Each subsequent use is hell.”

“Just so. Even without straining your muscles, the sheer voltage flowing through your system are cooking your nerves; killing your neurons. It’s a starship engine for an aeroship frame: too much; all too much.”
“Can you enhance it? Fix it.” The Celerostylus was his first priority. Without its blessings of speed, he would’ve been dead countless times over. Even his Heaven of Blood would find itself deficient with its parting.
“And of no fault of mine,” the Woundshaper sulked. “Your designers offend us both. We should find time and seek them out; make prey of our precursors.”
A worrying thought for another time. Again, he was not ready to face his father’s segments. They were too much to bear right now, and something told him that his wards and skills were not nearly sufficient enough for such an encounter.
“Enhance,” Ruveca said, confused. “The Celerostylus is already a good piece of art. It is not it that fails you, but your foundational structure.” She clasped her hand together and pressed down. The waves drained out into the fathomless cleft where the horizon met the land. Where once they stood on sodden ground beneath cloudy skies, shapes began to fall and sway; biomods offered on mem-data strings, made easy for his perusal.
There were dozens of options swaying in the air. Some seemed as if entire bio-rigs; were full-sheathe replacements. Others were simpler. New eye, new ears, new skin, and calling to Avo’s attention most of all, what looked to be a cluster of eight writhing serpents.
“It’s not easy getting things to integrate with your biology,” Ruveca said. “The No-Dragons spent considerable effort cracking the codes to your hemophage so that they could bridge the gap between implant rejection and acceptance. What you see is what may be joined with you, but understand that some structures are foundational, and two shapes cannot occupy the same vessel.”

She leaned down, and Avo felt her hot breath wash over him in barely bated delight. What his Necrothurgy–his power did for him, biomancy did for her.

“Can I ask you something personal?”
He grunted, a slight tinge of discomfort beholding the spark in her eyes.
“In your dreams… how do you see yourself? What is your idealization of being?”

At this, the Woundshaper laughed. “Oh, my poor child. You see but a facet of facet; you fight to hold a narrow corner of totality.”
Past the Woundshaper’s words, Avo himself spoke, a long-hidden desire teased with fruition. “Predator. Apex predator. What we should have been instead of mistakes.”

“Ah,” Ruveca said, “but you weren’t a mistake. Just a first draft. Don’t be ashamed; you don’t get to choose your birth, but the present is a story still unwritten…”
“Activate the backdoors to our Ascender Xeres Series II Optics. Save the visual mem-data into some loci. There’s been a request from up top about needing some… non-standard surveillance.
Send out a cast warning users about, oh glitches with the software. Some fluff like that. Yes. Yes, I know the Necros among them have pulled out the spyware, but let’s not bullshit ourselves here, most people don’t have that ability.
No, I don’t want to do this, but it’s not about what I want, it’s about orders. What are the Choirs looking for? Who the hells knows! You think they told me? Do I look Inner-Tier? I am just an admin from the kennel like you.
Wait. Let me stop you there. We’re not going to theorize on this, we’re just going to do as the Authorities ask. Well, by we I mean someone down the barrel. I wouldn’t be caught dead taking a shit on behalf of our ‘masters’ considering how much stuff goes sidesways down in the Purg.
Yeah. Yeah, sure. We’re still on for pseudo-ball on Uldsday.”
-Thoughtcast between Administrative Leads [Redacted] and [Redacted] of Dawnforge Industries, a Highflame Subsidiary
8-7
Idealization (II)
For a few seconds, Avo found contentment in simply staring at the dangling augmentations present. Though they were mere phantasmal representations of actual matter, the subconscious was a base and fickle thing, inspiring notions of hunger despite the awareness of reason.
“To bear a shield in stead of your feeble nature, master, the designs do look like skewers of roast upon a string.”
Avo wished he could form eyes within his Soul for the sole purpose of glaring at his Woundshaper. Yes, the bioware did resemble meat and bone hanging from strings; it did indeed spur in him that base desire to tear at the flesh swaying above and dig in. That did not mean he would. Anymore.
His time as a metaphorical nu-dog was due for an end.
“Is it strength you want? Speed? Something more esoteric? Or even potentially an addition; that which you lack.” Ruveca lifted her index finger and began to sort the mods into different lines. Dolloping ghosts bled into the simulation as they formed titles for each aisle, separating things by part, function, and replacement extensiveness.
His focus scattered, darting from option to option, picking between new physical sheathes. Strength appealed to the beast most of all, for that was it understood, what it yearned for. Its dreams were painted in simple colors, put to motion by crude wants: to break and overpower. To butcher and bleed. For long, his physicality had consigned his nature to neglect; what fulfillment could a beast derive from strength when already molded from the clay of weakness?
He spent some time wandering between his foundation choices for body-based modifications, perusing his options like a shopper looking for new apparel. He eliminated over five options immediately–all the potential neuromods were off the table unless they kept his mind at baseline. In theory, his phantasmics should still work no matter what he did to his meat. However, he saw his fair share of Necros suffering abnormalities after cognitive enhancement surgeries.
The mind was his personal domain. It would be a fool’s choice to lose it.
Down to twenty choices or so, he found himself gravitating between a few options. Of them, there numbered six, but at least half of them clashed on basis of function or organ.
The Durahide exoskeleton was the first thing he was drawn to, his gaze earning an approving nod from Ruveca. It effectively left him armored in what looked to be an encased shell of crystals, its structure capable of withstanding kinetics from standard infantry gauss-arms along with laser diffusion capabilities.

The problem came in the form of overhead: too much durability. No enhancement to his reflexes or baseline structure. As much as it appealed to him, he left it behind, digging further into body modifications.
The option that followed was wanting as well. The Surgespine allowed him to discharge lightning through bio-electric pylons that communicated with his nervous system via a neuroconductive fluid. It wouldn’t just make him fast–it would make him unable to be disabled via physical incapacitation.
Appealing, but the caloric demands would have driven him insane with hunger, and his body still wasn’t up to dealing with the strain.
He passed by three more standard strength augmenting bio-weaves–stripped-down versions of bio-rigs meant to be transplanted directly onto a body. Each one seemed to be from a different combination of animals, and though they magnified his current strength potential, most didn’t stabilize his reflexes and remained wanting against the potential of their chrome counterparts.
Then, he saw it, the flash of its whiteness reeling in his attention.
Walking past all the other options, he found himself in a trance as he beheld the last sheathe left in the row.
The Bone Demon. Made by a now redacted No-Dragon subsidiary. Must’ve been something that went rogue during the Second Guild war.
Ruveca’s eyes wrinkled as her expressions took on a transient quality. The way her expression flowed from one to another made him wonder if she was guiding him toward her desired option, influencing him from a seat of deeper knowledge. “Oh, the Bone Demon exoweave. Yes. A less selected option due to its… deviations from the popular desires. Public–enforcers want chrome exos, you see? Squires–rigs or combat skins. The No-Dragons themselves are bound to violence by proxy, so you gaze upon a niche weave. But I think it suits you. In fact, I think it was made for something like you. A full spectrum enhancement, so to speak.”
Her mind rippled, the weave descended from its string, its shape unzipping into a myriad of features revealed to Avo.
The Bone Demon grew a superstructure around his current body, weaving his flesh into a nest of super-tensile, hyper-synaptic nanofibrous mycelia on the interior. Beyond the threads, thick plates of cordyceramite came together like jagged skeletal continents emerging from a sea of webs. Bound to his biology, he would be able to harden and shift his structural integrity, as well as shape the growth of the fungal-ceramic matter that would encase his outer skin.
When seen in its totality, it made him look like someone clad as a monster of yesteryear in knightly regalia. Bladed were its digits and joints and paleness ruled its visage. His head, meanwhile, was to be caged between the armored petals of what seemed to be some kind of insect-devouring plant.
“The fungal-ceramite growths will make you more durable than you are now, but you won’t be able to survive under sustained fire, or even a heavy-kinetic weapon.” Her honesty came with no shame. The design was the design, and she would speak of her mods as they were. “Where it excels is the blending of strength, speed, and agility. The mycelia can carry your current synaptic load without issue, while their tensile strength also allows you to punch through steel. Don’t expect to be lifting anything too heavy though. This is fast twitch fiber in its purest condition.”
He considered the implant and found himself entranced. “Grows out of me?”

“It becomes you,” she said. “A perfect integration. The cordyceps will integrate with your haemophagic cells and be turned from hijacker to willing assistant. But I would be most dishonest if I didn’t mention the drawbacks.”

She waved a hand. Numerous mods grew transparent. Only three or so remained.
“Cross-mod integration is… already a challenge with your biology. Trying to attach bioware of deviant designs will be… closer to building a collapsing tower than a functional body.”

“So,” Avo said. “Narrows the scope.”

“Indeed,” she said. “Most bioware to do with the senses won’t work well with the Bone Demon, I fear. Admittedly that’s more a design problem and you might feel your senses drifting during your first days of accepting the implant.”

It was at that moment she licked her lips. “However, I wished you would pick the Bone Demon for a reason. Come. Let me show you something of my own making. A rejected bioform that might just be given a second lease.”

“Not a good pitch,” Avo said. “Don’t want broken goods.”

“Not broken,” she said, sounding slightly offended. “Just… altered in its scope. Their ecological load is too much for most environments. I had wanted to sell them as potential land-sea hunter-killers, but now I think they will suit a better purpose with you.”

With a snap of her fingers, one of the remaining mods flickered into existence next to him. Avo took a step back as eight interconnected serpents cycled in the air before him. At first glance, they were pitch black, the lengths of their bodies like twin curving scythes attached to columns of spine. Their heads ran further, spear-tipped at the top while open jaws clicked below.
Gesturing for Avo to pay attention, Ruveca sent a mental command to the hydras, and two things happend at once: their bladed skulls exploded forward as if on pistons; their thin carapaced maws clicked and rattled.
A spread of static painted the world around them in a field echoing shape, a faint map of how the world looked for up to eight hundred feet or so.
Echolocation.
“I call them Echoheads,” Ruveca said, caressing the thought-forms of her work. “It took considerable effort to blend them. Considerable indeed. The structure and muscle of a hydra were needed for a base–the creature itself was already of chimeric design. Integrating the piercing extension required I rework the design of their heads–removing eyes and redistributing brain matter to make room for the added components. Tell me, do you know of a creature called a mantis shrimp? No matter. All you need to know is that upon extension, you will pierce even the titanium hulls of most golems without effort.”
“What about the echoes?”

“A way to help them keep their senses. Admittedly, this is still a work in progress, but I find it far more stable than most other options. Also gives my hunters more clarity–yes… yes.”
A part of Avo felt bitter that she was not the person to design his subspecies. If the ghouls were made by one such as she, perhaps they wouldn’t be so…
Feeble.
“In most cases, I think your blood would subsume my Echoheads before accepting them. However, using the Bone Demon as a bridge, I believe that an external platform can be created to root my bioforms in place–assimilating them to your person.”

Her words had implications beyond a single implantation. “What about other implants? Could it be done with more?”

She considered his words. “It would take substantial reworking of the Bone Demon itself. The Echoheads are already unique in their stability. Most biologies would… collapse in one form or another.” Her lips thinned. Her eyes paled. “Give me time. Two months, if you’re still alive then. I will have something for you. But that will be more favor than even Eldest River can afford. I will need… resources.”

“Will get you imps.”

“More than imps. I need gene-codes. License keys to mod-packs. New equipment.”
“Put together needs. Cast them to River. Take a look down the line.”

She beamed. “We’re going to be very happy together, you and I. I can already see it.”

She whistled.
The two selected augmentations came together as a package. The exoskeletal layer of blooming white provided a base for the other two implants to function, serving as foundational strength and structure enhancement for his body. The Echoheads came soon after, the writhing extensions threaded along the back of the Bone Demon. Four were festooned on each side, and in total, they numbered eight, each wicked serpent acting more like a tail or a tendril, lashing the air.

With the Echoheads woven into the sheathe, she nodded. And then her eyes widened. Waving away two mods remaining, she pulled out a single, small implant he had to lean close to behold. Compared to the other implants, this one was but a small nub, its shape a gnarled flower bud, shivering before his gaze. “This is something experimental. This was derived from another obsoleted bioform; a hunjue pattern spore launcher. It was designed for the purposes of… obfuscation.”

At her command, the buds expanded, spewing thick particulates as mist into the air. The air blurred with blending colors around the nub, until it was swallowed in a pocket of pseudo-transparency, blending with the background.
“See through?” Avo asked.
“The Mimefog refracts light to create the illusion of invisibility. It also expels heat waste from your body, so it will leave a patch of thermal radiation to deceive any heatseekers, should your foe still use something so primitive.”
Useful. Enticing. Another layer of stealth. “Add that too.”

The Mimefog nodules were placed as four along the column of his spine, running as a stretch between his Echoheads.
As all three sections came together, Avo beheld the frame of his new form for the first time and found a soft pleasure in beholding what he was to become.

Standing before him, he found himself dwarfed by a full foot by a being encased in bone and stalking closer to him upon spear-tipped tendrils derived from the Echoheads. With a burst of mist, it melded into the air, only slight distortions offering him a guess as to its position.
“Oh, joy master. Tendrils. Something beyond my means to construct.” Some part of the Woundshaper was jealous of the grafter, envious of her competence in the Domain of Flesh. “Be not surprised by avarice. All gods yearn to be more, do we not?”
She spoke no lies there, for in this very moment, he embodied that want deep and true.

“Is this your new shape?” Ruveca asked. Her curiosity was genuine, and she asked the question as a chef would after delivering a dish. “Are there any other additions you would like to reconsider?”

“No,” Avo said. Truth be told, he wanted to be everything, to possess all the virtues and improvements presented to him in their samples. But he found a stable foundation for what he needed right now, and if there was the need, he could return. Seek out Ruveca. Discover the cache left to him by his father’s node. Have himself altered anew.
Or perhaps there was even a Heaven for manipulating flesh. To be able to serve as his own grafter was a tantalizing convenience. Already, his Soul and Mind were scarce in logistical demand. If he could be the sole governor of his body’s condition, his mastery over himself would be absolute.
“Prepare this,” Avo said. “Start graft immediately.”

Ruveca breathed, a light shining from the edges of her eyes as her body language bloomed with joy. “Your haste is appreciated.”

“Your recommendations are good,” Avo replied. “How fast?”

She contemplated her answer. “Eight hours, perhaps. Each body has different demands… A baseliner’s would be far more malleable than yours, but more susceptible to collapse.” She tilted her head. “You understand that there is nothing in the way of anesthetics for a ghoul?”

He grunted. “Pain’s nothing.”

She frowned, his response too sour for her tastes. “Pain is language, consang. You shouldn’t run from it. Deny it. Accept it. Just listen. Your body is giving you the details. Let the softness in you drown, and listen through the feedback. You might hear something interesting.”

Something told him she was speaking from experience.
“I will begin the process immediately. You should return to yourself. Step into the pod.”
“Pod?”

Suddenly, the umbilical tether retracted, slipping out from his skull. Light and shapes returned to him as the link between him and the exomath broke. Shaking his head, he found two tiger-spiders placing a long cylindrical coffin, and with a touch, it expanded, unclasping like parting ribs to reveal a pool of blackened liquid filling its interior.
“Meld pod,” Ruveca said, her tone almost distracted. “It's for your rebirth. Just lay in its waters. The rest will follow on its own.”

“Master… another mind lingers in the substance,” the Woundshaper said, tone low, “it is faint. There is a touch of blood in its ontology but... but still, it thinks and reacts. And builds. Particulates of… silicon? And electricity. Such a thing is not touched by the Heavens. No. This a low art, intricate and complex though its design maybe. Little builders, microscopic but diligent.”
Nanoconstructors. An expensive resource to house in the Warrens. But Avo guessed that Green River had her methods, and the No-Dragon had their ways.
Staring down into the swaying black ichor that pooled in the enamel coffin, he hesitated for a moment, the beast in him inching back, primitive nature wary of his potential fate.
To his side, Draus snorted. +Worse thing that’ll happen is death, ain’t it. Shouldn’t stop you now.+

+Just thinking about who I’ll be when I come out.+


A lull of consideration crackled across their session. +A bigger monster that still eats people?+
Yeah. That sounded about right.
Shaking the grip of apprehension, he shed his holocoat and helmet before casting aside his thermal undersuit. As he stepped into the waters, a coldness ran up his leg, the chill sinking all the way to his bone. He waited for something to tear at him; divest him of his flesh.
Instead, only a clinging numbness stewed his flesh.
Patience giving out, he deposited himself in the rest of the way and laid down. Staring up at the pulsing mass of gray matter that occupied the ceiling, he watched as flickers of thoughtstuff were injected between its countless cords, their shine remaining like meteorites darting through tubes even as the outside of his meld-cage closed.
A moment of peace followed. He called upon the wind and the water swirled. All he would need to escape was a simple thought, followed by the manifestation of his Galeslither.
He was not trapped here. He was not trapped like he was at the start of the Crucible. This was just surgery. A very Sang way of performing surgery.
Checking the state of his Souls he found himself gladdened to behold a major spike in progress.


REPAIRING ONTOLOGY - 21%
A sudden lurch pulled at him. The weight of his meld pod shifted. He was moving. Casting out his Whisper, he saw that he was being carried by two bioforms, slowly being shuttled over to an empty slot along the wall.
He supposed that supported some kind of incubation. He wasn’t sure.
+Draus,+ he said. +Going to end the session. Things will probably hurt.+
Her indifference was felt before she spoke. +Leave it on if you wanna. It ain’t no bother to me.+
She wasn’t boasting. But still, something in him thought it best that she possess full awareness in case a rapid response was needed.
As his cage was slotted into the wall and locked tight with a click of fusing bones, Avo waited for something to happen. If there was one thing better about Mirrorhead’s grafters, it was that pain with them was a direct affair.
Now, Avo felt–
He felt something pass through the blackness and worm into his skin. It was a tickle, followed by a piercing sting, but something was undoubtedly moving in his blood, in his body. Several more stings followed, their spread multiplying by the second. In moments, no part of his flesh felt unblemished, and deep along the weight of his bones, he was beginning to feel something build.
Then, nothingness. Just a sense of static.
Avo frowned.
Then the stings returned blooming as he suddenly felt something building inside him, spreading like gulfs between his flesh.
There it was. Pain. Pain in the part of shedding flesh.
Whatever had slid inside him was being grown outward from within. His bones and Celerostylus would be laced first, but the rest of his meat, his muscle would have to give.
In the darkness of the cage, Avo heeded Ruveca’s words and studied the symphony of his own hurt, feeling new shapes begin to take form.
“I do not care about the Paladins.
I do not care about the Exorcists.
They are secondary concerns to me and should be of no concern to you. What I am ordering you to do, however, should be at the forefront of your mind before anything else–before! All! Else!
Listen to my words for I will not repeat them. Not for clarity. Not because you ‘forgot.’
You will arrange my forces, and you will scour the Sovereignty to find just who is using our name as an instrument to start this war. You will find them, and you will let me know.
Spare no expense. Spend whatever lives you need to. My time is precious; enforcers are cheap. You know what is to come. See this task done before our coming assault. Nu-Scarrowbur must be mine. The tree must be secured.
There is no failure—there is only my will.”
-Jhred “Mirrorhead” Greatling to his “Conflux” Lieutenant
8-8
The New Skin
Every inch of Avo’s body itched.
The process was more meditative than limbo, the pain carving new grooves of focus as the shape of his new body expanded, peeling his old. With each passing hour, the fluid he was submerged in lessened, feeding his body the necessary ingredients to ensure the proper formation of his new sheathe.
His skin and muscles were first to be shed. The Echoheads followed long after, near the end, bridged to his body through the Bone Demon. As the searing agony of shedding flesh faded to become a tingling sensation dotting his digits, he realized his Celerostylus was also spreading, its synaptic roots expanding, lacing with the new fibers unlatched ropes of obsolete muscle from remolded bones.
With the culmination of the process came his extraction. The bioforms carried his meld pod back out and opened its casing. He emerged to a world of new shapes and sensations, everything feeling sharper; the sensations greeted him with a previous unknown celerity.
His Echoheads slithered down his torso, their movement twitching, sliding in bursts. Avo felt as if ghoulling again, learning to crawl, to use his hands. It was when the Echoheads chittered that he realized the full scope of his sensory enhancements, the sound casting a reverberating cloud into his mind, outlining all that stood around him.
There were about three hundred and forty-six bioforms in the chamber. Thirty of their number were moving around in the veins of the exomath. Five more were walking up the passage, their bodies both human and dog-like, misshapen in form and gait. Eunuchs.
Aside from them, Kae was on the far side of the room, looking at a collection of half-finished bioforms incubating in their chitinous chambers. Ruveca, meanwhile, had not moved an inch. Deep in a flowing state of focus, she directed insectoid apparatuses down, segmented limbs meant to examine his person and review his body architecture.

Draus and Green River, meanwhile, were missing.
Suspicious.
A large chitinous limb prodded at his chest and reached to his sides to tug at his new Echoheads, yanking hard to test their structural integrity. “That’s not abnormal,” Ruveca said, distracted words mixed with enthusiastic limbs. “Hatching from oneself is extremely damaging to your cells. You developed tumors at several points if you are curious to know. Your capacity to heal is remarkable, much like the rest of your species, but the cost weighs on your cellular stability.”

A hum followed her words, the sound of one who was considering a potential theory, but not speaking it.
“What?” Avo asked.
“Do you know there’s an additional layer of… something melded to your genetic sequence.”

A pang of coldness spread in Avo’s gut. He couldn’t tell if it was from his new implants or the thought of Walton withholding another secret. “No. Didn’t know. What is it?”

“I’m not quite sure,” Ruveca said, sucking in a sour sip of air. “And I don’t think I have the capability to examine it. Looking at it for more than a moment makes me lose focus. And it doesn’t seem to bend to biomancy. I suspect you might need to seek out its original designer to learn its true function. It seems to be… missing a component. Or made to have something built over it. It makes no biological sense but… it… inflicts a feeling. Whoever placed it inside you had something special in mind.”

“Dangerous?” Avo asked.
“No,” Ruveca said. “As I said: it feels like a slot. Now. Let’s see you stand. Yes! Yes! Stand! Show me my work! Hurry!”

Hastened by her words, he reached up to pull himself to a seated position but froze as he saw his new arm for the first time.
Before, his limb was a gnarled stretch of translucent skin, eel-like muscle, and half-chipped claws. In its place now clouds of ceramite-white plating, expanding without symmetry or order, the fissures between laced taut with nanofibrous mycelia. Though a considerable amount of bulk had been added to his body, he left an uncanny lightness in his motion, as if his kinesiology was fine-tuned to the extreme.
With a pull, he made to sit up, to stand. The world blurred, and the bursting nature of his newly imbued speed surprised all. Bioforms shifted back, the faint echoes of instinct carved into their vacant egos responding. Across the room, he heard Kae yelp.
“A-Avo,” she said. “You’re… uh, you’re even taller now.”

He turned, and the world whipped around him. She shrank at the sheer burst of force possessed by his movements. She was right. He was taller. She seemed a full foot shorter than when last they stood together.
“More responsive than I remember,” Avo said, stretching “Much–”

As he lifted his arms, he felt the newest expansion of his body lash out reflexively. Softness greeted the edges of his Echoheads. Bone parted. Gore spilled. His body shifted in place, old instincts granted speed he hadn’t adapted to, and he caught sight of streaking wipes of blood as three of his Echoheads chittered, clicking their mouths together, the nourishment of blood greeting his mind from taste buds beyond his mouth.
Across from him, a tiger-spider toppled in six parts, limbs coming free in slices, organs pooling free from a clean-hewn torso.
No Thaums greeted his flame, and empty as the bioform’s mind was, it died bereft of ghosts.
Avo chuckled, amused at the spontaneous act of brutality following his clumsiness.
Ruveca, however, didn't find it fit to laugh. “My Echoheads… you know, the arachno-tigris is an industrial aid bioform that is nonetheless capable of hefting weights up to five tons and resisting some limited kinetics. Now look at it: most rigs won’t be able to sustain functionality against that edge for long. Against the piston? Not at all.”

He looked down at his handiwork and considered her words.
“I must admit, this does feel rather akin to more than a few shapes woven from my Domains. It is only good taste you are exhibiting in your mimicry of my Heaven’s potential.”
Letting the arrogance of his Woundshaper wash past him, Avo’s attention drifted to a few new additional muscles previously missing from his body. Curiously, he twitched them, and almost immediately, a spray of light-curving mist expanded out in a continuous spray. Around him, a fog formed, curving his perception of the outside world into concave and convex distortions.
“Mimefog works,” Avo said.
“So, it does,” Ruveca said, breathing excitedly. “And wonderfully so. Full spectrum cover. Though, you will need to let your spores rest before the next spurt. It should dissipate in about a minute, but if you move fast, it won’t be able to follow you either. Something to keep in mind if misdirection is your desire.”

Stepping over the edge of the meld pod, Avo moved with restraint and care, trying to get used to his new body. After a few steps, he suddenly found himself lifted. He blinked and looked down. One of his Echoheads was planted through the ground. He used it to supplement his legs without thinking. It just felt natural.
“I’m very proud of those Echoheads,” Ruveca said. “You’ll be able to keep relative pace with just about any squire on land. Maybe go even faster in the water. If the material allows for it, you can climb up walls, and stride along the ground. Leap further using your pistons than your legs could ever allow. You’re better than you were. Just better. No other compliment is necessary. This is purer than evolution. This… this is self-design made manifest. Do you feel that? That’s the feeling of your flesh not being a cage anymore.”

The pride the Scaarthian held for her own work was born out of pure love of the art, and nothing of ego. The closest he heard to another speaking as she did was Walton, who described himself once as a conduit for Necrothuergy; a courier of memories.
Casting his whisper out, Avo turned his perception upon himself for the first time and years. What he beheld was a creature worth running from–a No-Dragon warform made to stalk and hunt him and his brothers during the Uprising.
The structure of his body flowed, each plate of fungal-ceramite surmounting threaded rivers. Petals of armor lay unfurled around his head, the skin of his face now less leather and more silk. With a twitch, the petals closed in a clasp, doming his skull and leaving a visor made from interlacing fibers to gaze through. His claws ran longer and more pointed, each made to punch fatal wounds where arteries meet.
Swiveling his Whisper behind, eight writhing tails of edged, skeletal obsidian ran down to lance-tipped skulls and the clicking jaws, his chittering serpents feeding him pictures of his surrounding environment anew. Along his body, his Mimefog nodes looked deflated and were refilling slowly.
He once thought many in the city dysmorphic for shedding their forms so often, the frequency of their modifications an addiction. Now, he was beginning to understand. This was more than addiction. This was apparel. Expression. In a time when all boundaries were broken, why not remold the vessel into much desired shape?
Such an action was an act fitting of a god, was it not?

“Is your aesthetic to your liking?” Ruveca asked. “It is to mine.”

Avo growled, nodding with unspoken pleasure. Past the fog, he looked upon Kae and lifted his arms. Her opinion would not decide anything, but it was useful to gain an understanding of how the Agnos judged visual forms.
Kae furrowed her brows, a brief moment of concentration. “I… I think it makes you look… uh… more heroic. A heroic… predatory monster but… knightly.”

Considering the look of satisfaction on Ruveca’s face, the chivalric implications were likely, not accidental.

Scanning his surroundings, Avo frowned. The second opinion he valued most beyond his own was missing. Draus remained absent. “Kae. Draus? Where?”

“Oh, yes, the Regular,” Ruveca said. She conspiratorially smacked her lips together. “She’s testing something of mine. Another experimental piece. A bio-rig. You’ll see in a while. She said something about breaking your arm.”

The spark of a violent thrill relit inside Avo. “Good.”

The grafter continued. “Eldest River said you might have the desire to… test your current capabilities in practical circumstances. The circuit is open right now. Available for your personal use, if you want it.”

He did want it. “Test subjects.”

“Other ghouls,” Ruveca said, without a hint of awkwardness. “They’ve already been deposited. Five are the best I could do on short notice. The rest I need for my work. I trust this isn’t an issue. Your kind does have the habit of cannibalizing each other when lesser prey are nowhere to be found, I believe.”

He grunted. In a way, he liked this more than fighting another bioform. This was… symbolic. Representative of growth; his new skin butchering the old.
Avo chuckled.

Kae stared at him. “Avo?”

“Just thinking. River. Helpful when she’s not talking.”
“Oh,” Kae said. “Do… do you think you two can get… get along?”

“Sure. I could make her a mute.”
***
The dueling circuit, as with most things touched by Sang culture, was structured with dichotomy.
From frigid waters, some eighty feet deep rose five pillars carrying dueling rings, and upon these rings were painted three circles, the exterior the circle of the dragon–the design a match to the cycler circling his Soul. The other two rings were within the dragon, one a paint of women chained in flesh, bodies pointed outward, knotted over the darkstar; across from them, the near-extinct menfolk faced inward toward the daystar, their bodies constrained by lattices of blood.
It was upon the circle of man that Avo bisected another of his brothers with a nonchalant swipe from one of his Echoheads.
He couldn’t tell what it was trying to do. The probable truth was that it was just too slow, sensing an attack but unable to perceive it.
THAUMIC OUTPUT - 970 THAUM/c
Ghosts: [411]
As he watched the top half of his penultimate surviving brother bounce and splattered on another ring below his. Upon the uppermost pedestal in the circuit, Avo swept his gaze across the butcher he inflicted, and found himself savoring the taste of disappointment.
The slaughter of his kin bored and pleased him in equal measure. Smeared and mangled remains decorated the bone-hewn ground beneath his claws, each sprawl of tissue claimed from another of his kindred. The entire affair took seconds, clumsy as he was–it took longer for him to ascend the rings than it did to kill his kindred.
He didn’t even use his Celerostylus.
A ragged gasp sounded from behind him. Avo, still unused to Echoheads, chittered, soundwave flooding Avo’s mind with resonating shapes.
Forty feet away on the other side of the ring, his last surviving brother was getting back up. Avo scoffed. The fact of the other ghoul’s survival wasn’t a matter of sloppiness but empirical mercy.
They were already as if flat dogs forced to fight a warg.
He wanted to see if this one could hurt him at all.
Studying the motions of his brother, he winced as he beheld slowness; a near-crippled display of un-coordination that boiled the blood inside him.
Once upon a time, about eighteen years and a functional eternity ago, he would have had to fight this brother down to the blood sinew to avoid being eaten. Strength was a relative thing. As was speed. Perhaps intellect and mental capacity as well, but Avo knew there were more angles to consider than merely computation power.
Now, however, the gulf between him and what he had been expanded. Expanded too much.
He thought the topsiders called his kind subhuman from a place of hatefulness before. No. People feared monsters. Gave them names that inspired avoidance. To be called “sub” wasn’t to be feared, but denigrated. Less than. He saw it now in more ways than one.
Too weak to be a monster.
Too slow to avoid harm.
Too stupid to surrender or flee.
Ghouls were instruments hobbled in their totality. Whatever desires the Low Masters–that Walton held for them–it was dust when faced with the mantle possessed by those above. Maybe the hope was to substitute mass where quality could not be achieved. But even then, a mob of ghouls was just food for artillery.

It was like they were fated to be slaughtered.
It didn’t make sense.
It just didn’t make any sense.
A light thud rattled him back into focus as Avo felt himself shift back by an inch. Claws dragged and broke upon the ridges of his ceramite. A fang slid between his plates, but could only thrust feebly against his fibers, piercing nothing. Sighing, Avo let his brother exhaust itself on him. And when it stopped to draw air, he called upon his Heaven and plucked the fresh oxygen away before it could reach its lungs.
The ghoul gasped, choking, wheezing. Still clinging to Avo, it slumped, holding its chest.
He wrapped his claws around its face and frowned, unfurling his skullplates. “Hated you. Hated you so much. But not your fault. None of us wanted to be this weak. Not even proper monsters.” His brother struggled, but its strength was fading fast. Soon, the matter would be concluded.

Casting a ghost into its undefended mind, he contemplated the taste of encroaching oblivion, of its blind bestial rage, of its savage nature collapsing against overwhelming odds. Their natures no longer aligned; it was now a step below him by all accounts. There was sublime power in being able to comprehend another without being understood in return. His brother’s beast–gluttonous as all beasts were–ruled so thoroughly that all rational thought was atrophied.
It knew what he was by scent, but could not recognize the nature of his implants, his raw, absolute superiority.
He tore his ghost out of its mind. The ghoul shuddered and choked. Its grip flopped loose from his body. Avo sneered. “You’ll try biting again if I let you go. You can think. Just never tried.”

It didn’t reply, content to succumb instead.
“Don’t know why Walton picked me. Don’t know if it was… chance.” He paused. “Or if the memory was a lie too. Know this: Know he’s gone. Know I have power now. And…” Avo closed his fingers around his brother's skull. “Don’t worry. I’ll change this. Make us useful. Better. Make existing worth it.”
He made fists while still grasping the other ghoul’s head. Its skull chasmed in a welter of gore, meat splurting free, red on white. Avo pulled. Along the length of his kindred’s body, he tore, the wound spreading from neck to groin.
THAUMIC OUTPUT - 971 THAUM/c
Ghosts: [412]
Only lines of sinew kept the two halves of this one together. The fragrance of its death called to him, flavor tantalizing. His beast slavered. His Woundshaper thrummed in his blood, brimming with delight, happy he was killing.
Avo spat on the body of his brother. The insult was not aimed at the failings of his kin but at the broken puppet belonging to his former creators.
Only he among the countless masses of his kind held true purpose. Only he and no other. By fate or fortune, he was different. And through him, perhaps more than just he can be–
“You done playin’ with baby food?”

His previous thoughts slipped away from him. In its place, a fire roared, wrath and jubilation merging into a rising inferno.
His Echoheads chittered, and at the center of the ring stood Draus, clad in a new shell of her own. He felt the shape of jagged wings and curving blades extending from her person. The armor of her bio-rig bled over her body in sleeting segments, each capable of some limited motion.

With a twitch of his jaw, the ceramite plating around his head fused shut as he turned, preparing to indulge in a bout of proper violence. “Yeah. Should start the main course.”
Our Reg numbers are in the red. Fucking Chivalrics fucked us with their godsdamned ghoulshit policies. Wasting the best of our pool as line infantry– then they piss away whatever goodwill they got with our recruits?
People are willing to die for the cause. The Highflame cause, that is. Nothin' about the Chivalrics is Highflame. They’re a bunch of fucking egotists; so drunk off celebrity and dueling they smear themselves with their own shit and call it perfume.
98% rejection this year! Add that with 45% of Regulars dropping their banners and we’re tumbling in the barrel of one long asskicking. The Chivalrics say, “just grow some new clones; new drones; new bioforms. Meat is cheap.”
Meat is cheap. No fucking shit. But a Regular ain’t meat. They’re near-unbreakable assets capable of being packaged into any vessel, thrown into any situation, against any opposition to still come out winning. Radical acceptance. No fear; hesitation. The shit we can’t quantify yet. The stuff that’s hard to design.
That’s a Reg.
That’s what we’re losing.
Godsdammit, got me rambling again. [Sighs]
We’re gonna need the Chivalarics sorted someday soon or we’re going to lose the next one too. And thing is, I don’t think we can afford to lose next time.
We’re just going to have to clean house.
-Mem-log of Santanado “Starsinger” Mondelles, Highflame Instrument and Combat Instructor to Axtraxis Academy
8-9
Like the Old Days
“Draus,” Avo said. A feral grin pulled at his lips as he realized what was to come. He shifted his stance, stretching out his Echoheads in preparation for what was to come. Festooned in a biomechanical husk of a bastard being born of an attack drone and an upscale wasp, the Regular stood on thin, jagged legs. Two sub-arms--human sized but far smaller than the bladed segements festooned along her upper torso-- clenched and unclenched. The rest of her body ran in layers of chitinous segmentation reinforced by titanium. She packed three layers of cybernetics just to face him.
Flattering.
“Couldn’t wait anymore?”

She snorted. “Don’t tongue your own ego. It ain’t graceful. I just wanna stretch my legs too.” She paused. “And maybe find out if hittin' you still feels hittin' your average rotlick. That's an awful lot of plating you coated yourself in. Don't tell me you're afraid of gettin' a bruise or two now.”

Avo looked past her. And then around. In tandem, his Echoheads chittered, the shape of the room manifesting around him again. There were two people watching up in the stands. Their shapes were near-baseline while another seemed half-serpent, half-woman.
Kae cheered half-heartedly. Bright-Wealth was infinitely louder.
“You know,” Draus said, flexing her new, bladed forelimbs. “I’m gonna enjoy this.”
Her new bio-rigged appendages ran in unfolded segments from behind her shoulders, gleaming white like shards of a crescent moon reflected upon the surface of a lake. Their movements rippled a shimmering disturbance in the air, near-invisible propulsions coming from the gaps between the edges. Along her back, six translucent wings extended, lining the space behind her in a kaleidoscope of colors. Her face was exposed as the insectoid skull meant to shield her hung from her neck like an unhinged jaw, biomass within lined with neural needles.
The bio-rig, much like his new skin, was a bridge – an additional structure to anchor new implants and weight, like a rig on rigs, chrome upon armored meat.
“Decided to do some shopping?” Avo asked.
“More like a test run. Somethin’ I helped River snatch a couple o’ months ago. How you likin’ your new sheathe?" Her tongue pushed out against her cheek. A tell. Like the hiss of a nu-cat or the rearing palps of an aratnid. A subtle dance was happening under her skin, its rhythm building toward fated violence. “Gotta admit: I don’t much like the new look of you. Bleedin’ you now’s gonna feel like hurting some bioform. Shit, If I didn’t know it was you, I'd probably treat you like something worth hurtin’ instead of some ghoul to put down.”
Her casual taunt struck him and glanced off. The beast was incensed but then again, when wasn’t that the case? What part of her words rang false? The fact ghouls were fodder? The fact she was trying to provoke him? Distract him using anger?

Her gaze slid past his form, sinking down to greet his butchered brothers. “They know what you are?”

“Knew,” Avo said. “Didn’t matter. Hungry. Tried to come for me anyway.” He hissed a low noise, the steam of his breath a whistle between disgust and laughter. “Ghouls. Should know them better by impulse than physical design. Action. Not biology. The violence is internal. A predisposition of hardware. The brain. But they like it. They don’t fight it. Slaves that enjoy being slaves. Tragic fate.”

“‘They,’” Draus asked.
“I’ve…” His voice trailed off. He thrust one of his Echoheads into sight and studied its serrations, its willing nature. “Changed.” Inside, felt his Heavens, his new Soul hardening as the Frame fused its damages back together. “Same thing with you. You think the other Regs will recognize you in that rig? Got too much of the Warren tainting you. Wasting your life killing thugs and gangers; wrestling with Syndicates.” He chuckled. “Helping a ghoul.”

She shook her head. “Guns don’t need to recognize each other. They just need to fire when squeezed. I still fire. I just don’t get squeezed so much.”

“No. But you still bleed pretty good. Did a good imitation of an opened tomato after Vicious pasted you. Performance of the year there: mangled Regular. Might have a future in the arts. Maybe you should consider it seeing how a prepubescent psychopath managed to drop you.”
Her nostrils flared as she sneered. Oh, but it was so fun goading her on, and she took to it so well. Annoyance burned behind her gaze as she fixed him with a glare. “Don’t I recall needin’ to pull your mangled ass out of there?”

“Recall you helping too late and letting me get tortured.”

“Found your screams funny was all.”


“Her tone indicates honesty. What does your pain sound like master?” His Woundshaper hummed in anticipation. “Strange though it might be, I am curious to what songs she might extract from you.”
“Don’t think I can win?”

“That depends: are you going to use your Heavens? Or do you wish to bleed her with your… mortal hands.”“Fun option.”
“Then I expect things to be quite painful.”
Draus cocked her head. “You talkin’ to your Heaven again?” She hadn’t activated their session. Wise. Hurting someone running on a synchronized phantasmal bandwidth left mental scars similar to self-abuse.
“It doubts me,” Avo said. “Thinks I’ll have a hard time with you without using my Heaven.”

“Why, look at that? You got somethin' with sense growing inside you. Maybe you did get something useful out of eatin’ all those golems.”
He snapped his fangs together. “Going to get something tastier by eating your eyes.”

“Well, alright. You keep thinkin’ about that. Me? I still wanna break your arms. It’s the length that bothers me. They’re too damn long and hurt to look at. Better now that you got some… shit grown over them–doesn’t make you look like a starved child no more, but still!”

“Won’t bother you anymore if you’re blind.”

“C’mon, Avo–move on to something new. You already threatened to blind me. Regs do a month of sensory deprivation shit in basic. You gotta grind deeper.”

“Most Regs. You got discharged. First I heard of that. Who knows how good you are.”

“Ouch. Did your pa teach you to talk that way?”
Draus grinned.
Avo exhaled. “He’d tell me… to stay away from your mind. Bad etiquette. But since Ori-Thaum has such an easy time making vegetables of your kind…”

A tide of genuine anger smudged the grin from her face. Her jaw went tight. “Alright, then.”

“Did I offend you?” Avo asked, adding a low whine to his voice. He ran his tongue along his fangs, deliberating cutting himself to whet his appetite. “Was that why you started touching my food? Because me nulling all those watchers reminded you of the bad old days? How’d the last war go for you again? When you weren’t playing with my brothers.”

Draus snorted, but the glare didn’t leave her eyes. “Godsdamn, rotlick. You get a couple of burnin’ balls inside you and you’re feeling mighty big about yourself.” She clicked her tongue. “You know, my old commander? He had these jokes – weird sex shit from the pre-rash days. Diseases. Sexually transmitted monsterfucker stuff.” Studying his features again, she laughed. “Whatever fuckin’ degenerate wants to bump ends with a thing like you anyway.”
A pause went between them. Avo gave an awkward grunt. “Chambers. Probably.”
The Regular’s eye left eye twitched. She fought hard, reluctant to release her anger. She failed, the breaking her of resolving coming as a loud guffaw. “Fuckin’, ‘Soft Masters.’” The nature of her mirth was infectious, and Avo found himself hissing along with sibilant laughter. He wondered if her smile would remain once they started bleeding each other. The shine behind her eyes told him the expression on her face just might grow.
Breathing one last gasp of fresh air, she shot him a final look before her bio-rig’s exoskull snapped together in a series of skittering clicks. It had the look of a crucifix visored battle visor entombed between the twitching palps of a wolf–spider; two layers of protection; blood outside, chrome within.“I’m still gonna make a victim of you, know that Avo?”.
“Angry that I didn’t listen to you. Made my own choices against your wisdom?” Avo asked.
“Some of that,” she said. “Mostly, I’ve been feelin’ a bit… green. Envy’s a strange weight, consang. Don’t hinge right inside me. Been seein’ you do whatever you want and… I think you woke somethin’ ugly in me too.”

A month ago, her words would have sounded absurd–a Regular being jealous of a ghoul was like a tiger stating a cockroach to be their superior. But things were different now. She was a Regular in habit and skill only, and he was a being mid-transition; a divorce was happening inside him: future from past and god from ghoul.
“So,” Avo asked, as he imagined biting into her. “Violence?”

Her voice, carried by proxy through the creature she clad herself in, rattled the structure of his brain. It felt as if a piece of his skull was ejecting itself into the softness of his brain. Knowing Draus, this was likely a deliberate feature–a resonant weapon, attuned to wavelengths inimical to his hearing. “Yeah,” she agreed. “Violence.”
A command ebbed out from her Metamind. A droplet of water fell between them. Followed by more. Looking up, Avo watched as several sprinklers came alive along the walls, spewing misted rain down to bathe the world below. There was a strange simmer in the waters, however. A tinge of unnatural flame.
“These waters mend the flesh,” the Woundshaper said.
“Midnight rain?” Avo asked.
Draus shrugged. “Circuits here use it for their practice sessions. Let’s participants break each other without stayin’ that way.”

“Touched you care,” Avo said.

He could feel her smirking behind her armor. “Don’t be. Besides, I don’t want this to end prematurely.”
He nodded. “Till one breaks?”
“Yeah,” Draus said. She cracked her neck and the wasp skulls solidified around her. “Till one breaks.”


Draus moved, a violent explosion of motion blasting out from her wings. Falling water exploded off her person, a fluid jetstream along her trail.
Avo felt his Celerostylus fire–just in time. Drops hobbled to a crippled pace. Speed was torn out from the rushing stream. In a world nigh-frozen in pace, two figures moved unchained–clashing tides of force within a cage of stillness.
She was unfettered, wings swimming upon gales of wind–a taunt to his very ontology. True to his nature, he lashed at the world, striking gouges into the ring beneath him using his Echoheads. He moved erratically; dashing; shifting. Never bound to a single place, angles of attack made wide by his Echoheads.
Through it all, he felt the flow of his hyper-charged synapses flooding every sinew of his being, thrumming loud in every fiber. Where once he was a stone lobbed from a sling, his momentum now took the form of a whip, his body molded to the instantaneity of his mind.
To his pleasure, he detected a stutter to Draus turns. A lull in her motion. Perhaps she was slower than he now. Perhaps the divide between their physicalities had flattened; inverted.
Phy-Sim filtering distances across his feed, watched her circle close–twenty feet. Her wings widened. Force erupted out from her wings. He thrust an Echohead at her, fifteen feet at rest. He activated his piston, reaching spearhead lancing out another five.
Fast as she was, water exploded before the velocity of his new tail. His Phy-Sim flashed red. Evasion was impossible.
But then, she didn’t. A forelimb descended, scything sideways into his Echohead. Edge met edge as they crossed blades. A rattle of force danced down Avo’s spine. He speared two more of his tails into the ground, rooting himself against the momentum. She fought nothing, letting their first clash send her higher.
The flow of force went silent from her blade then as she tumbled, and only when there were thirty between them did her wings come back into action. Instead of battling to right herself, she turned, diving low and using the impact to her advantage. She disappeared over the edge, and around him he felt a distant force pull on the air.
The Woundshaper sighed. “Master, tear her hold on the winds. This is a farce. You are playing as a child would.”
“No. Must break her.”
“Perhaps I could have served you better in this regard. What would she know of the multiplicative effects if you simply let your blood flow–”
“No! Break her myself!”
“Ah, but I suppose we’re all entitled to a hubris.”
A crackle of thoughtstuff came alive in his mind. Through their session, he felt her joy. +Shit, did you ask the grafter to add another couple hundred pounds to your sheathe? That felt like cuttin’ a wall.+
+Echoheads: Good stabilizers.+ he replied.
+Is that right? Well, I’m gonna have to see for myself.+
Their session cut out. Back to the bloodshed.
Reaching out with his Echoheads, he chittered, and the world around him came into shape, a map of tactile-static wrapping over his senses. She was circling the edge behind him, turning along the edge. She gesticulated suddenly, her secondary limbs whipping and twisting something through the air.
Something split through the air, chipping the edge of one of his Echoheads. The tail shuddered, unused to the sensation. Avo felt a trickle of spasms run up his spine.
A hair-thin damage trajectory played across his feed via his Phys-Sim. She had a monowire installed, monowire she was flicking up from the edge of the ring, cutting up at him from range.
Chittering again, he mapped her path using both his echolocation and his Phys-Sim. Rushing toward he edge, the beast called for him to throw himself off the side, to tear into her on the encroach and see this done.
He knew better. Draus had the ability to move in the air without a Heaven. Only fools–and ghouls–would charge a foe in their element.
Avo decided to steal instead. Using his own tactic of obfuscation, he arrived near the edge where she was soon to arrive, plucking the top half of the ghoul he killed earlier and dangling it below himself. As she came cycling in, monowire licking up again to cut, he expelled his Mimefog and released his decoy before reeling himself back using his rearmost tails.
Fog greeted fog as rain smeared his sporing mists. A clean slice danced up through the body of his deceased brother, blood splattering out through the sphere of deception. Parts of ghoul tumbled off the ring. Draus lurched momentarily, trying to gauge what she cut.
And from out of the fog, Avo kicked off the edge, all eight Echoheads launching him forward in a blast of motion.
The pace at which she realized his ruse spoke to how fast her mind ran. The fact she managed a half-turn spoke great things of her reflexes.
The way he slammed into her at speeds north of a hundred and twenty miles an hour spoke to the changing of the times. The air around them ruptured as her forelimbs were twisted from stability, their bodies spiraling.
He felt one her subarms grab him, pulling him in around the neck. A crack shook his head. Stars flashed across his eyes, his brain bouncing as if it had been struck by a sledgehammer. She headbutted him again. He headbutted her back. A mutual crack sang out between their armors. Clasped tight in a grapple, they plunged down, his Echoheads spearing out to find something to latch onto.

Laughing he activated his Auto-Seance again. +Still nostaglic, Reg?+
+Yeah,+ she said, amusement shining through. The Session went dead.
She clenched her left sub-arm and, along his neck, he felt a wisp-thin pressure begin to sink through his outer plating.
“You will not win every battle as you are. This is not a critique on your skills, but a statement of circumstance. Look at yourselves. Feel your current biological template–your standard baseline sheathe.
That burning in your lungs after mere hours of activity? The strain in your muscles as you struggle to bear weights barely heavier than yourselves? This is a limitation of physical attributes. You–without thaumaturgy or high technology–cannot alter your attributes. Instead, you must work around them.
Now, emerging out from this cage before you is a Manticore-Retriever. We call him Mattis. This model of nu-dog is one ton of synthetic hyper-muscle capable of tearing through a LIAC. It moves five times faster than a flat–which is what you all are right now–and it does not feel pain or fear.
Over the course of the next few seconds to minute, Mattis will kill all of you. You have no chance of surviving, but survival has nothing to do with your orders.
Sell your lives. Bleed the dog. Write a post-session report during your death-time in your Phylacteries.
Mattis. Kill–
Oh, hells, [laughs]. Looks like it’s gonna be a short day."
-Commander Winston Nicoma, Highflame Regular
8-10
Bleed it Out
The monowire raked across Avo’s headplates inch by inch, the slithering strand sinking with each retraction.
A blow thundered against his chest, the impact heavy one moment and gone the next. His new mycelia drank blunt force far better than the muscles he used to have. Twice more he felt Draus strike him with her free hand, propelled back by bursts of force from her wing-scythes.

Retaliating, he clawed as she struck, his new digits leaving ugly scratches upon her rig, the tips of his fingers splitting even titanium. Operating on sheer instinct, he clasped her tight around him as her wire sawed through his armor, the serrated edges of his eight Echoheads slashed across her back, curving in to spear at her.
The world was spinning fast, but their fall was long, the neutering of time making even gravity hobbled.
In the same moment her wire severed the ceramite under his jaw, one of his Echoheads punched true. They sang with a crackle, the air popping with a small shockwave. Through layers of metal, meat, and bone, the Echohead dived, impacting hard against the Regular’s ribs. Blood gushed and the tail fed. Avo fed. It didn’t matter that her wire was still working to decapitate him, the thrill was afire in him.
It was better to be alive at this moment than be spared, safe but bored for the rest of time.
She twisted. Force burst free from her side. Avo felt his gut lurch as his armored back clashed against a hardened pillar. The impact shuddered through him, the structure behind him fissuring. As he was before, his bones would have shattered. He would have died. Now, though the impact thundered his breath out of his lungs, the blow danced down his mycellial fibers, evening across his body
Twisting again, she dove him down as they struck another pillar. The wiring twisted around his outer skull and he felt it tighten more, biting halfway through ceramide. Pain began to tinkle through his senses as his Echoheads chittered, clearing the confusion.
Spinning, crashing, grinding, and brawling, she was driving him against the column holding up the third-highest dueling ring. With fifty feet running between each pillar, the velocity at which she slammed him was enough to crumble a commercial aerovec.
Angling herself, she timed a surge of acceleration from both wings to smash him back-first against the pillar again. A heavy impact staggered him, but his plating and thread-like interior kept him from losing his breath.

He felt himself scrape, twisting away from the wall again. The wire chewed even deeper. Another squeeze and he’d be without a head. A static picture greeted him–a thin thrumming extension emerging from between the knuckles of her right sub-arm.
Implanted frequency stilleto. Because of course she had one.
She clenched her fist, making to finish him before her wire did–
But his blow came first.
The Echohead, still lodged deep inside her punctured midsection, extended once more. This time, even the lacing of her ribs failed her. Her core shattered against the head of his tail–the flavor of his devastation like shoving one’s tongue into someone else’s shattered mouth, licking at fragments of bone dancing like teeth broken free of gums.
The monowire sliced through. A line of pain glided deep. Yet, her blade never came, and her grip slackened. With brutal delight, he found that his Echohead had instinctively clamped its teeth around the shaft of her spine.
He had her. Now, she would–
Her wings exploded with force. Something hard crashed into him as several courses of pain comingled across his body. With a sickening snap, he felt her pull free from his tail, a piece of her vertebrae still bitten between its jaws. He, meanwhile, struck a pillar at a diagonal angle, with all the force of his acceleration cracking down between his neck and shoulder.
It was a testament to his new body’s durabliity that he only folded instead of splattering. His exterior plates held, but the mycelia tore. Chasms of pain opened down his back and shoulders, the agony consuming his mind. He felt his Echoheads lash out, haywire and uncommanded, desperate to protect their host.
Meanwhile, Avo felt, his skull spinning, focus lost.
And with that, his Celerostylus went untensed. The weight of time fell like a hammer blow from the skies as gravity tore down from the air. A hoarse cry wheezed out from Avo’s mangled lip. He blinked. Licking at his wounds, he found the front half of his mouth missing, his incisors chipped, and the plate beneath his skull severed clean.
The monowire must have sliced through him as Draus shot past him.
He coughed, hacking out blood.
Something was filling one of his lungs as well.
Had Draus managed burst his lungs from a few punches thrown an inch away? What the hells did they learn at Regular academy.

Unable to use his own voice, he had his Echoheads cry out. Another snapshot of the world formed around him. Ten feet until he struck water. A disturbance some eight feet away, ripples beneath the water. Probably where Draus struck.
Splashing into the murky depths, Avo felt the sting of fetid water pouring into his wounds.
Then, subsequently, he felt no pain at all. Hurt and wounds dissolved from his body like salt in water. The missing flap of flesh grew across his mouth. His fangs reformed. From hewn edges, his ceramite plating pooled back together.
Swallowing a drink of the foul water, he felt his collapsed lung begin to expand even as he choked.
The water beneath the rings wasn’t just water, but midnight rainwater. But the fact that the bones of so many fighters lay scattered at the base of the pool like ominous sediment spurred Avo back to motion.
The rains restored, but they couldn’t spare one of death.
He grinned. That was good. He didn’t much care about killing anyway. He just wanted to hurt the Regular.
Ghouls were not natural swimmers. They were capable of it, much like people could, but their designs led to poisoning the water with their blood. With his new Echoheads, however, Avo was a harpoon cutting past the softness of the waves, the tails undulating behind him, propelling him forward at a pace on par with his land-based movement.
Firing his reflexes anew, the water slowed as tumbling tides of displacement billowed out from his sides. His tails sang out and the shifting waters responded, his tactile sense fed more generously by currents of water than air.
Draus was sixty feet away from him. Sixty feet and half-healed. Sixty feet with thirty more before she reached the surface.
The way she struck and struggled against the shaking pool made him break out into a feral grin. She fought the flow with each stroke, each kick, and the pulses of force from her scythes was misfiring.
The waters mended all that was organic, but dead metal remained bricked.

Strange it was for a Regular to become a wounded seal to a ghoul’s shark, but life brought new flavors for those who dared dream.
Avo circled up to her her, savoring the moment.
+Coming for you,+ Avo sent, activating a brief session.
What he got back was a groan of annoyance. +No shit. This fuckin’ rig’s not built for the water–godsdammit I miss my old combat skin.+


His smile widened. Oh, but her complaining was so sweet, her frustration so pure. Just a shame he couldn't pull her down and drown her. It would take a long time for one, considering her natural enhancement, but also because that would actually kill her.
And he didn’t want that.
Well, most of him didn’t want that. The beast would have to settle for tasting her eyes.
He darted behind her. She turned. Just in time for him to lash her across the skull with an extending Echohead. One of her palps burst into greenish ichor as her visor cracked. Blood leaked free as she spun and tumbled like he did in the air.

Behind her, her monowire trailed, pulled out of pace by the grip of the pool.

Her wings flared again, but only the barest plume of force responded. Pushing through the bubbles, Avo took his time, lashing at her and delighting in the play using his new appendages. She batted at the water, trying to keep pace but he severed her left sub-arm at the elbow first, his surging Echohead like a gunshot underwater.
Armor and chitin burst free. Bone spewed patterns of red into the murk-tinged waters. She kicked back in that instant, forsaking her escape to take from him his advantage of distance. She dove and guarded her vitals against his spearing tails. Draus came loose in strips and pieces, rig breaking–half-mending–wounds oozing.
He bled her as fast as the waters could heal, and he focused on her limbs. Two tails struck her in the chest. She lurched back, bubbles escaping from her cracked helmet. He seized her limbs using his other Echoheads, their jaws clamping around her limbs, black teeth punching deep even into the armor lacing her bones.
He swam forth using his two remaining tails, slamming her back first against a pillar. Karma was a delight and so was driving his claws through the outer shell of her helmet. But where most enforcers and squires would have broken from panic, the Regular fought on, her enhanced constitution wrestling against his remodified body, and more impressive, her unbreaking discipline.

Something he was tired of suffering.
Driving his head into her head, ceramite meeting titanium-reinforced chitin as her helmet cracked further. Pieces cracked free from her visor. The biomass on the outside was mangled beyond even what disfigurement could describe. Through the opening, he saw her vicious glare, her augmented eyes still flashing, its internal components afire as she scanned him.
His claws lashed out, digits seeking sockets. Shaking her head, her helmet shattered as she opened her mouth.
And bit down on the first two fingers of his right hand.
“Despite your… many virtues, master, I cannot fathom why she would assume taste to be one.” The Woundshaper said, confused. “Lest this be some kind of… disturbing insult of reverse symbology.”
Though he felt a few of her teeth slip free from their roots, they still speared down between his plates, into his fibers. Avo froze, face contorting in raw confusion as his mind struggled to process the absurdity of her action.
He turned on a session, ignoring the potential discomfort. +You bit… me!+
She didn’t stop trying to chew her way through his fingers. It was beginning to hurt. +What? You ghouls got the monopoly bitin’ half-strands now?+
Avo shrugged. +I just–+
Her armor detonated outward. A blooming of absolute darkness sprayed free. Something rang in the waters, it sound high in pitch, like the constant peal of a bell. Something swiped across his arms, his guts, flicking high and skipping across his cheek after piecing through the plates around his skull.
Snarling, he yanked hard, tearing her limbs free from her torso. Still, another stab sank deep through his chest. It jerked momentarily against his plate before biting through his mycelia.

Avo gasped. Water flooded his lungs–and spilled out from the one that was pierced. His Echoheads screamed. A new picture of his surroundings greeted him. Parts of a discarded rig were in his hands while Draus, ejected free from her protected shell, was currently slicing through him with a frequency blade.
Armored though his body might be, a frequency blade was made for the parting of matter. She twisted, the blade chipped up through stretches of his ribs, spitting deeper toward his spine. Roaring, he tried shoving his thumbs into her eyes.
He realized a beat after his arms were actually floating away from him–the first thing she managed to sever.
All the same, he speared the jutting bones stumps into her eyes. She didn’t bother dodging, accepting the trade as the mangled remains of his forearms caved through her eye sockets. As the last trickles of his echolocation map faded, he felt a smirk on her lips.
Her arm twisted. Her blade licked up at an angle.
His Celerostylus split open.
Time snapped back in pace like a rubber band as every nerve in his body came aflame. Limbs twitch, and he watched as Draus pulled her blade free to deliver a stab toward his skull. A stab that never came as a wildly thrown Echohead lashed across her stomach. Edged carapace parted flesh and nicked reinforced bones.
A gurgle bubbled out from Draus as she bounced hard against the pillar spinning and kicking blindly toward the surface, trailing blood from her missing eyes and disembowelment. She tracked her path using her sensation of the air pockets leaving her mouth.
He groped weakly for her as the filthy waters began to reknit his arms. Electric torment firing across every arc of his being, he struggled to control his spasming body as he forced his Echohead to swim, propelling his unresponsive form after his prey.
Her Accelero–an implant he guessed to be found in the back of her head–was still working. She had the reflex advantage, but that still didn’t matter if she couldn’t swim fast enough.
Mind blank, devoid of anything but primal brutality, he slammed into her for a third time that day and completed the cycle.

From the water, their entangled bodies tore free bound for the lowest ring–one that was near-submerged itself.
He landed on her, the water around them splashing. Pawing his way atop her, he drove an elbow down. She slipped past the blow before shifting her hips and hooking her legs around his shoulder.
The Woundshaper winced. “Best bite down, master.”
Avo hissed in confusion. The answer to what Draus was doing came as she extended her hips and torqued his half-repaired forearm using her hand. The fibers of his shoulder were far more flexible than his obsoleted tendons, but the bone itself had limits. She jerked. His shoulder snapped, rattling loud as it came loose from its socket.
The sudden hurt made him bite down on his tongue, drawing blood.
“Not quite my intent.”
“Shuth up!” Avo growled. He speared at her using his Echoheads, but with her Accelero active, she was too fast. She spun, rolling with his arm still in her grasp, the momentum flinging him across the arena despite his drastic weight advantage.
Avo tumbled and slid. She managed to strike him twice mid-flight before he passed her reach. Impacting the ring hard, he felt the ball of his shoulder snap back into place as he landed poorly. With a flex, he felt his fibers tighten, but the bone ached with soreness.
Groaning, he made to stand but crumpled to his knees as blood flowed free from his ribs.
Across from him, Draus looked little better, face mangled, intestines swaying. But her fingers were still tight around the frequency blade humming in her hands. She wasn’t close to breaking. Neither was he.
For a frozen instant, their eyes met, and they beheld the damage their wrought on each other. Her large intestines were still spooled at her feet, the wound half-healed, leaving parts of her organs on the outside. Parts of her optical nerves had regrown, but the tech was gone.
They breathed, waiting for the rains to heal them enough to stand. A cheer came from the stands.
“I love free entertainment!” Bright-Wealth shouted.
Draus grinned then, an expression of brutal delight that seemed to mirror his own.

He shook his head. “Biting. Suppose to be my thing.”

“Kiss my ass, rotlick, you steal my tricks, I get to steal one of yours.”

He groaned. “It’s not a trick… just hungry.”

She snorted a laugh and spat a globule of blood. “A think one of my ribs might be floating inside me. A couple of pieces maybe.”

Avo inhaled and felt the same way. “Cut my reflex booster.”

She sighed. “Fuck. Is that why you’re still standin’? I was trying to get your spine. Godsdamned booster is thick as shit. Was already hell cutting through those plates.” She spat again and swallowed some rainwater. “That grafter’s probably a keeper, you know. Might want to add her mem-data to your Meta. Maybe share a session.”

He nodded slowly. “Your rig. Broke it.”

“Yeah, River’ll be annoyed but… I would’ve bricked it sooner or later.” Draus wiped her face, smearing blood as she began blinking. She had been fighting him blind this entire time. And he was the one with Echolocation.
“Eyes coming back?” he asked.
“I can see sorta the light again. You owe me some mods there. Had some custom chrome done there you decided to ruin with your stumps.” She shook her head. “Stabbed me with your stumps. Who does that.”

“Wanted to use my thumbs.”

“Yeah, I cut your arms off for a reason. Now, I’m wonderin’ what that reason was.”

Avo hissed a low laugh. “Forced my hand… by removing my hands.”

The joke seemed to hurt her more than any of her wounds did. “Jaus, Avo. Maybe leave the jokes to me.”

“Yeah,” Avo said. “You were pretty funny flailing in the water. Like a baby seal.”

“Baby seal that took your arms and nearly put one through your head. You need more practice.”

“Nearly got you.”

“Yeah. Sure you did. How’d you like the monowire?”

“A little tight.” He made his tails chitter. “Echoheads?”

“Yeah, I think they go well on you. Somethin’ that can make up for your dog-shit hand-to-hand. I mean, godsdamned, Avo, I was blind and I felt that elbow comin’. Where were you throwing that from? The sky?”

Hissing, he waved her off. “What was that?”
“What was what?”

“Twisted. Grabbed arm. Broke it. Weird.”

“It’s just basic grappling. What? They don’t teach that in ghoul academy.”

“No,” Avo said. “Teach ghouls how to die there.”

A beat passed. Draus hummed. “I suppose they do.”
“You get the anger out?” Avo asked.
“No. Still got half a mind to pop you with my projectile launcher. You?”

“Still hungry. Tempted to pull the air out from your lungs.”
“Well, ain’t that a happy ending: all that hurtin’ for us to come out perfectly unsatisfied.”

“Welcome to New Vultun.”

She laughed.

As the rain fell, Avo watched his hand mend back together entirely, the whiteness of his plating fusing over the claws. He made to stand but frowned as he twitched his fingers. He held his hand up, gazing up into the mist, and just… existed for a moment.
“Draus?” Avo asked.
“Hm?”
“Do you feel like… you’re real?"
Shard-3: Greatling is going to make his move next week.
Mirror-Convex: Received. Does he have any information regarding the incident in the gutters?
Shard-3: Negatory. He’s clueless as the rest. I’ve tapped them… Well, maybe not all of them. Chambers is still missing. Two techs with him. Dead or captured. Scalpers have them.
Mirror-Convex: Dead, then.
Shard-3: Most likely outcome. They took the ghoul with them. Memory leaks came back with it smeared though. Looked like the damn thing put up a hell of a fight. Rotlick had some pretty weird wards on it. Looked almost professional. Only got a glimpse while it was making a victim out of Rantula though.
Mirror-Convex: Yes, the… Moonblood?
Shard-3: Another one of Greatling’s hair-brained ideas. I swear to Jaus, it’s like babysitting a bomb waiting to go off. The half-strand won’t stop giving me conflicting orders. I think he’s having a mental breakdown.
Mirror-Convex: Received. Continue monitoring the situation. We move to intercept if nothing else changes.
-Conversation between Incubi and Handler, Ori-Thaum
8-11
Limbo
Time passed. Draus blinked. “What?”
He didn’t answer her immediately, choosing instead to revel in the sensation of the falling spray washing the wounds from his body. “Real. Do you feel like you exist?”

“The fuck kind of question is that?”

“Honest one.”

“Avo… what the hells are you talkin’ about? Are we still fighting?" She sighed. "Are– are you havin’ another moment? Is that what this is? Because if this is, I wanna talk about that…”
Her words drifted past him while he cupped raindrops with his winds, shifting them aimlessly from one to another. “Before the Soul. Before all… this. It was like a dream to me. Limbo. An unlife. Wasn’t miserable. Wasn’t happy. Just was. Tried being what my father wanted.” He twitched his claws and curled them, feeling his joints move anew. “I think that’s what happened. When the node forced me to kill him. Ended the dream. Ended my limbo. Set me free.”
Draus stared, blankly. “That’s… uh… real poetic and stuff.”

Avo frowned. “Real poetic and stuff.”

“C’mon,” Draus said, shrugging, “What do you want from me? A hug? I shoot shit and kill half-strands, Avo, I’m not a fuckin’ philosopher.”


The honesty was appreciated, but the alienation remained.
“So–uh–you havin’ a moment there or we still fightin’?”

“In a moment,” Avo said.

She shook her head in disbelief. “You’re unbelievable, you know that.”

“No,” Avo said. “It’s just… this isn’t supposed to happen.”

“What?”

“Me. You. The fight. You’re supposed to kill something like me. What I used to be. Kill me easy and move on.” He looked up at the highest ring again, where his brothers lay dead and pasted. Where he butchered them with contempt and ease. “Not what I was before. Was this what he wanted?”

Rolling her shoulder, Draus wiped the blood streaming out from her reforming eyes. “Your pa?”

“He used me. Hm. Not him. Another offshoot. Still don’t fully know what he is. But he used me to kill him. Made me feel it for a reason. Broke me. Broke me from my… parameters.” Draus was walking over to him, tension bleeding off her posture as she shook off the post-fight adrenaline. “Now, I…”
“Not you anymore?” Draus offered. Her rig was gone. A few pieces that remained of the wings drifted upon the shaking waters. Now, she was clad in nothing but the thermalskin undersuit, its hexagonally laminated scales plastered to her musculature. Reaching down, he noticed her clicking something, a hidden pocket patched along the side of her hip. She pulled out a thin stick–a line of hiflass.
“Didn’t take you for a smoker,” he said.

“It’s hiflass. It steadies the nerves after gettin’ bloody,” she held one out to him. He considered rejecting her as he had with Chambers; he never much liked smoke. Not with how they reminded him of the aftermath wrought by fusion burners. “How’s your booster?”

He flexed his Celerostylus. Pain stung his senses. He held back a wince. “Healing.” He reached out and accepted her offering. “Lasts longer in this body. Don’t feel the strain as much. Don’t know how long I can keep it active.”

Draus snorted a laugh. “Long enough. Congrats, consang–you’re a real boy now.” The wrist on her right arm twisted, a projectile launcher jutting out as her hand folded over her forearm. Avo lurched back, Echoheads rearing. She fired twice to the side without looking and swiped the glowing barrel over her stick first before offering it to him. He brushed his smoke across the shimmering heat and watched as the tip of his hiflass came afire.
Awkwardly, he tried to fit between his fangs.
“Don’t suck it all in at once. You’ll choke. Take it slow. Sip.” She took a light drag, and the burn danced down the pale column of her nootropic. A fraction of it peeled away, trailing off into the wind as specks of ash.
Reaching out with his Heaven, he felt them dissolve further and further until they were so small they might as well have never been.
Mimicking the Regular, he took his own sup from the smoke, expecting a certain kind of filth to knot his throat; irritate his lungs. Instead, the mellow flavor of grass and soil expanded inside him, layering over his mind like a blanket.
He exhaled again, and this time, a certain weight felt loosened. In a strange sense, he felt more kindred to the winds than ever before.
“Ah, yes. How easily the flesh is persuaded. Such is the unfortunate design of chemistry, master: your emotions are fickle, and will fail you. Only a devotion to a Domain fixes you on a higher path. I offer only good intentions when I state this: consider parting your mind from such persuasions. Seek only the highest path.”
Where his words slipped past Draus earlier, he felt the same about his Woundshaper. He was a Godclad. It was a Heaven. He would choose to feel and live however he so pleased. It would accept. It had to accept.
For a few moments, he stood there with Draus, watching the blood-stained waves crest and fall, lapping at the rising ivory pillars.

“Why stay here?” Avo asked. He noticed her blink, but she said nothing. “You could go anywhere. Offer services to Fallwalker. Run street squire crew. Steal things. Sell out to another Guild. Return to Tiers. Be someone again. Why suffer here? Why get yourself killed fighting golems and Syndicates for FATELESS? For a ghoul?”
She drew in a deep breath, dangling her hiflass half-finished between her fingers. Digits caked in blood and grit, he noticed crenulations running along her skin. Cybernetics probably. Part of her projectile launcher. “I didn’t do none of that for the FATELESS.” She smirked. “And sure as shit I wasn’t plannin’ on startin’ no fistfight with a Sangeist over you.”

“But you did.”

“But I did.” Draus nodded. “Life makes you do stupid shit sometimes. Never told you why I came down here." She took another drag. "What happened after my discharge.”

She did not. “No.”

Pulling the smoke from her lips, she opened her mouth to speak, but seemed lost in a forest of memories instead. “They called the Regs of my generation the Orphans. Nicoma’s Orphans. Nicoma was my…” She frowned, uncertain how to respond. “Well, he sure as shit wasn’t my pa. I remember that poor half-strand dyin’ along with my ma. Enclave got breached. Fallwalker got dead. Weird shit came in to kill us. Real typical ending for a bunch of rusts livin’ next to a open Rupture.”

“Saved you?” Avo asked. “Nicoma?”

She shot him an insulted look. “No. Half-strand came a day too late. By the time he got there, it was only me. Somehow managed to keep myself alive and kill… whatever those things were.” She shrugged. “I guess I lived because I wasn’t so scared. It could… follow your fear. Materialized inside people. But after it did it to my ma I just… didn’t feel so much of nothin’ no more.

“Anyway. I went through all that. Decided to jump in with the Regs. Took everythin’ they had. The training. The conditioning. The wars. I might not’ve been born in the Tiers, but I was Highflame to the bone.” She smiled then, the expression a genuine spark of forgotten joy, recalled with the shimmering haze of her smoke. Then, with the ashes, the moment was lost and her face hardened back into a cold slab of steel. “I was worthy.”

She turned her eyes on him again, her gaze burrowing deep into his. “I don’t know nothin’ ‘bout this dream shit you keep talkin’. Shit, I don’t think anyone does. You might be the single most weirdest half-strand in this here city, and that’s a hell of a thing to say. But limbo… yeah. I know a thing or two about purgatory.”

“The Warrens,” Avo asked. “That’s your purgatory?”

Draus shook her head. “Naw. You’re right. I could leave. Highflame–after they discharged me, one of the Seraphs… she uh… she offered me a deal. A sponsor for a Soul. A chance to go ‘Clad under them instead. Something of a… side-promotion, with a new identity.”

“You didn’t take it?”

Her face broke into a vicious sneer. “Of fuckin’ course I didn’t take it. The deal was to keep the Greatling name clean. After what they did to me and mine? After how they wasted our lives durin’ the war.” She spat. “We’re soldiers. Regulars. Dyin’ just a part of the gig, but… it had to mean somethin’. We didn’t die for the hell of it. We died for objectives, to save people, to protect the Reg next to us.”
She paused. “You know, fightin’ you and yours was the happiest time of my life. Because for once… just once… there was no question we were doing the right thing. You ghouls were a bunch of godsdamned monsters carved out of a child’s nightmares. And we were finally there to stop you. Save the people. Highflame’s finest hour. Should’ve known it wouldn’t last.”

“You stay because fighting here made your deaths feel meaningful?” Avo asked.
“The Guilds have been at war with each other for a long, long time, Avo.” Draus sighed. “I saw the end of the third war. All the fourth. Thousands of skirmishes in between. Nukes and thaumic weapons exchanged. Billions dead in an afternoon. But when the sun cycles back around, it’s like it was all just a hallucination. Like all the killin’ never happened. It’s why I’m jealous.”
“Jealous?” Avo said. “You said you were envious before. Of my Frame? The Heavens?”

“Nah,” Drausr replied. “I’ve seen plenty of ‘Clads and Heavens. It’s what you did with it that I wanted.”

“Hurting the Syndicate.”

“Yeah,” Draus said. “Nullin’ all those folk.” She whistled. “Now, there was a time I would’ve hated you for that. Voiding the minds of all those tax-payin’ citizens. But now… Now I just think you managed to do in a little bit over a month what I never could in all my years down here. That’s what pissed me off most of all: you were changing things. Breakin’ things. Shit I could never touch.”

“So,” Avo said. “The refugees–”

“--Oh, no don’t get me twisted: that was still stupid as shit. Gave the Exorcists and Paladins a full five hundred minds to scry through. Makes our run on Mirrorhead all that much more miserable.”

He couldn’t help but smile. “Draus, they felt so… free when they did it.”

“Who?”

“The refugees. When I gave them the chance to kill the jocks. They were… unchained. It was wonderful.” With a mental command, he caressed Req’s deep memories using his Metamind. Through countless walls and hundreds of miles, a single gleam flashed down through walls and layers, all the way up in the Tiers.
Mem-locking someone was a beautiful thing.
“That’s why you did it?” She snorted. “You’re… lookin’ for a new hit.”

“It wasn’t a hit,” he hissed. “I wanted… I wanted to know… To feel what it was… choice. Choice in totality.” He paused, his black eyes intent on hers. “Draus. If I can. If the Frame fixes the other Soul. Do you want it?”

For the first time, he watched her gaze quiver, breaking away from him. She spat her near-finished hiflass into the water. “Drop it.”

He cocked his head and chittered softly. “What’s stopping you?” Avo asked. He leaned down, closer, speaking directly to her. “You can choose to. Take back your mantle. Show Highflame–”

Her elbow smacked him across the chest. He stumbled back. “I said fuckin’ drop it.”

“She fears what it means,” the Woundshaper laughed. “Poor, poor girl. She fears the power that it will grant her… to exceed her station so much. Pure thing, she was made to be a soldier–a lion of a sacrifice, but a sacrifice still. Should she ascend to master, what mockery would that make of all her kindred that fell? How you shake her reality.”
“It needs to just be me?” Avo said. “My Frame… It can change things. Free us. Free everyone.”

“And what the hells would that do?” Draus asked, more frustrated than enraged. “What… what kinda world you think you make if everyone's free? To be as they want? Probably just this one." She stepped up to him and jabbed a finger into his fungus-plated chest. "Because I’ll tell you what freedom is Avo, freedom is maximizing your own choices, and a hell of a lot of time, that means takin’ someone else’s options so they don’t do you first. We’ll just end up like the Guilds again. You ain’t thought this through.”

“And you are running from it,” he replied claws clenching. He turned his head. “You were happy when we fought. When you kill. Happy to battle. Why won’t you let yourself be happy now?”
“Because it ain’t gonna change nothin’” Draus snarled. “The people I wanted to save? That life I wanted to live. That’s all done and gone now. I just missed my chance to die then.”

“With a Heaven you can die all you want–”

“Avo! Rotlick, that’s not the point–”


A ringing spectral wail washed through the circuit chamber, the rising pitch a warning klaxon broadcast through chains of ghosts. Avo shifted his attention from Draus to the descending messengers, the noise delivered on wavelengths of thought instead of vibration.
A request flashed across Avo’s cog-feed. Green River wanted to link him.
GHOST-LINK ACCEPTED
+River, what–+
+Yosanna Kivranpuvak. She messaged me earlier. Told me that her husband’s Auto-Seance came online, that he used it to call her.+
A knot formed at the base of Avo’s guts. Might’ve been the sudden clench of worry brought by the news. Might just be some lingering damage yet to heal.
“What?” Draus asked. He ignored her.
+When?+

+Now,+ Green River replied. +Just now. Avo, the Strix said–+
+I remember what the node said.+ He hissed, mind racing. The node all but stated that Yosanna’s husband was dead. Now he was using a session to contact her?
A packet of mem-data danced along their interlaced ghosts. A new marker manifested in his DeepNav: the location of the turncoat. She was two traffic stops away from the docks, on the thirtieth floor of a hab-block. The details marked it as one in a series: building Ox-Three. +Seal her. Cut off all loci. No ghosts. Place your best wards around her.+
A spike of annoyance greeted him. +I don’t need you to tell me rote procedure, ghoul. I have accomplished my end, but the Nether must be left to you.+ A lull followed. +Please. I do not possess the skill nor means to contend with… whatever this is.+
LINK LOST
Avo growled. “Draus. Turncoat. Her husband called her. Auto-Seance. She’s at the docks.”

Immediately, all hint of animosity was lost. “Got it. Do you–”

He didn’t hear the rest as he parted into a rush of wind, diving up vents and gaps, washing through halls at speeds that sent drones careening against walls.
Someone was entering the turncoat’s mind. Someone that probably wasn’t her husband.
A churn of apprehension spiked inside Avo. He had a strong suspicion as to who he soon might have to face.
And despite all his newly amassed power, he didn’t know if he was ready.
The first of us offered that which feels. And so, their vigil was numb coldness.
The second offered all the joy, never to be. And so, their vigil was sorrow everlasting.
The third offered peace of mind and body, forswearing bloodshed and damnation. And so, their vigil was fury unending.
The fourth and final offered nothing and everything, accepting the Hungers for what they were, accepting the world for what it was. And so, their vigil was hollow emptiness.
Heed the four; heed our words, the lowest masters of Noloth, no better than slaves nor vermin.
All we have, we give to the ones that feed, to spare the future for the ones above.
-Lamentations of the Four Famines, [Redacted] Text
8-12
The Twice-Built Cage
The skies over Xin Yunsha bled screaming Specters, their neon-scarred paths echoing commands for all to remain indoors, to await the completion of thoughtscans. In answer to these orders even the structures of the district changed, growing layers of enamel and bone to shroud the fragility of hab-blocks.

Something about this sight appealed to Avo as he drifted down slopes caked by drifts of still molting exoderms from the nearby structures, the dead skin flaking forth like descending snowfall. A problem came and blocks rebirthed themselves, evolving in pace to contend with the obstacle.
Without the Galeslither, Avo would have been forced to jack into an aerovec for cover. Probably one of the food trucks. With his Heaven of Air, however, the latitude of his liberation was far more expansive. The nature of his freedom necessitated that he merely mask his mind to slip from unseen Exorcists.
From block to block, he surged, using public access loci to hide from the sweeping tides of Exorcist cast Specters lashing down from above.
His cog-feed narrowed in on Yosanna, Metamind attuned to filter in on her accretion. All other spheres of thoughstuff faded from view as he approached the dockside with care.
The buildings across from the silenced docks were shaped like chipped teeth. Their topmost sections were carved to leave a curved groove of emptiness, serving as a placeholder for an animated ox carrying a flashing number, the range running from one to twelve. Strangely, the number four seemed to be missing.
A cultural issue there, perhaps.
In the block marked by an ox carrying the number three, Yosanna’s presence was unmoving, her presence nested deep.
A mere hundred feet away, he noticed that the street signs were pulsing, their oscillating phantoms sputtering erroneous strings of mem-data. Beside the staircase leading up before bone-caged doors, vending machines crackled, their speakers playing discordant notes as they vomited a deluge of consumables.
Something tugged at the corner of his awareness, a subtle sensation like a flea landing upon the pond that was his Metamind. Strange how so small a feeling could narrow one’s focus. The silence–previously unnoticed–gnawed at Avo. Switching his memories to a more public wavelength, shards of ice burst through his being like shrapnel.
Every sphere of thoughtstuff was perfectly stationary. Unmoving. Only Yosanna’s mind flowed alone, its presence a candle walled in by discs of ice.

Avo knew the work of another Necro when he saw it, but for someone to quarantine their effective harm to Ox-Three and no other structure displayed a level of precision few could attain. That none of the Specters soaring overhead noticed anything also told a tale of secrecy.
Whoever managed this was beyond adept at the craft. There was true skill on display here. Enough for him to be concerned; suspicious.
REPAIRING ONTOLOGY - 95%
FINALIZING STRUCTURING…
RESTORING CANONS…
A flash sparked inside Avo, spilling out through currents of wind made fissures by perversions of reality. His second Soul burned, its existence known to him, but not fully… felt. Not like his first.
“Cracks still remain upon its structure. And the vessel…” his Woundshaper made a note of disgust. “Is disfigured. Twisted into itself, I know not how. These ephemerals ruptured its ontology but left this Heaven a machine structured upon stilts of self-mutilation. You should slay yourself using your new limbs, master. Sieze the nearest opportunity and come see the harm for yourself.”
“Soon,” Avo replied. It would be a lie to say the growing power of his Heaven did not thrill him. It would be pure folly for him to stop and indulge in another apotheosis now, however. Not when the cache promised to him by the node was at stake.
He found himself hesitating. He considered his path forward as if he was about to face someone like Walton–or maybe another node of his father. For all the years he devoted to the art, Avo only considered himself an accomplished practitioner.
Walton was a master.
Much of what Walton accomplished was still beyond him in scope and complexity. His father spun plots upon plots to access locations thought impossible, smuggling sequences and mem-cons through nu-pets and other sources of symmetry. Likewise, the way he built his phantasmics–of all phantasmal architecture–was a thing beyond artful; even now, Avo could not speak higher of the man’s ability to shape his mindscapes, for at Walton’s hands, aesthetic blended into pragmatic in a fusion of form and function.
Suddenly, the bone-molded doors seemed the closed jaws leading down the throat of a hiding leviathan. On string-thin currents of wind, he made his approach, intruding with caution while under the guise of a gale. He slipped through a window–its layer of protective enamel not yet finished growing. His approach sent cups crashing and rattled cupboards, and with his being spread wide, he felt his way through the room as a swirl of wind, the Yondergales masking the full weight of his presence.
There were three bodies in the room, all of them Sang, and none of them moving. One lay collapsed against the floor, foam flowing free from her mouth, a broken wine glass rolling across pearl-sheen tiles, inches from her curled fingers. The other two that lived with her were slumped on their couch, eyes empty but open, an unnerving vacancy in their stares.
Casting his Whisper’s perception over them, Avo found the cause of their comas to originate from their frozen thoughts. They breathed still. Their bodies functioned. Their minds, however, remained caged, something impeding all flow.

Activating his Ghostjack, Avo attempted to interface their minds and after but a moment diving through each, felt the weight of apprehension lean on him further.
Wards were in place, but not on the outside. Instead, most of the mind remained exposed while a single phantasmic–an Auto-Seance if Avo were to guess by the sequences it derived–was surrounded by pylons of lashing lightning, its currents jumping from ghost to screaming ghost. It was like someone had built a wall of defenses inside their minds, but left part of the foundational structure exposed.
These wards themselves were also of strange design, leaving what seemed to be deliberate gaps around the phantasmic. It was as if whoever designed it wanted someone to strike deep, reach in. During his brief study of the phantasmal mechanism, he realized that the wards had been synchronized to the Auto-Seance themselves, effectively allowing stacking of traumtic output.
But even so, the nature of a ward's design meant that if they were to be deployed through a session, the minds it leap across would also suffer immense damage–it was like firing a kinetic kill rod, but using a bridge as the chamber: a butcher’s bill of damage was certain to be reaped.
Faced with such uncanny instruments, the foreboding within Avo only grew.
It made little sense in terms of defense, but perhaps that was not their function. The lives in this block meant little to an invading Necro–or cadre of Necros. Carefully, he retracted the ghosts he paired to the surface memories of the three Sang and scythed the room using his Whisper. A beat passed. No retaliation came. No one knew he was here. Not yet.
There were certain strategies someone could employ if they held minds in thrall. Every being capable of thought and reason could theoretically serve as a makeshift locus of sorts, and human minds were more than susceptible to such designs. From the perspective of an infiltrator, perhaps those placed in a coma were meant to serve as tripwires against scrying Specters or surveillance against physical intruders.
Regardless, they weren’t protected. Not in a manner that would allow their minds to remain preserved.

Spreading his ontology into the next room as well, Avo discovered more people in similar conditions.
The Ox-Three wasn’t just compromised, it was a trap; a den of wandering eyes made panopticon.
Avo activated a session and contacted Draus. In moments, he felt her mind syncing over with his.
+Avo?+

+On-site at Ox-Three. Need to tell River that everyone in the building is considered nulled.+


+Copy that. Exorcists?+

+Not them. They’re flying overhead. Didn’t notice anything. The topmost loci of the structure are probably compromised as well. Broadcasting cover.+ Avo felt his frown bleed over into her session strings of mem-data. +Enemy Necro in play. A very good one. Strange wards. Stranger tactics.+

+They better than you?+

He didn’t respond, the possibility pressed against his pride and apprehension as if a blade against the cartoid. +Might be more than one. Need to proceed carefully. Return once Yosanna is secure. Or the cache.+

+Got it. Stay zero, Avo. I’d tell you to try and avoid gettin’ snuffed but…+
If he was still in his mortal guise, he would have grunted a laugh. +Will respond soon. If not, assume I’m nulled. Then blow up the building or something. Or just snipe my body.+


+Look at that: might just get to kill you after all toda–+


He ended the session and reviewed his overall condition.
REND CAPACITY: 9%
He didn’t so much rise through the building as he swam, his Galeslither thundering hard across a plane. In the real, only a slight fluctuation in the air betrayed his presence. It spoke to the quality of Xin Yunsha that even the interior of a standard hab-block was well maintained. At least compared to the destitution afflicting Mazzo’s Junction. Smooth wood lined with whorls of discolored brown served as the walls, while veins of bioluminescence spread like vines along the ceiling. Between each apartment, the walls developed fractures by design, the separation in the wood marking the number of each apartment.
Sweeping through the rooms, all that possessed affinity toward thought and memory had been broken or enfeebled. Holovisions flickered and glitched. People were stringless puppets, collapsed against the walls and upon floors.
As he slithered into Yosanna’s room, he found himself beholding a sight no different. Except, the room was less a living space than a barren cell containing a cracked locus, its ghosts displaying frayed sequences. Obvious trauma damage.
If Avo had to guess, she was adjusting the contents of her identity here, with the residents around the area offering thoughtwave interference from prying eyes.
She was likely midway through creating her new identity when her husband’s session came back online.
From her synchronized mind, whoever was holding this block captive must’ve flooded out. Spread their ghosts wide. Contained the area. Crippled anything capable of cognition.
Unwilling to reveal himself in flesh, Avo continued using layers of protection. Casting his Whisper out from the Yondergale, he interfaced with Yosanna, her Metamind answering him readily, wards unmade from the inside.
Threading himself into the myriad streams of memories comprising her mem-data, he touched the dormant structure of her Sanctus Starseeker–she hadn’t had the time nor the intent to alter her wards it seemed–and found nulled ghosts loading errors in place of a storm-molded constellation designed to serve as defensive batteries.
She had been dismantled then. Disassembled from the inside, and neatly so. Someone siphoned away the sequences she used for her protection thoroughly.
Redoubling his efforts toward secrecy, he masked himself using memories she was familiar with, and used what he could recall of their encounter in the Second Fortune’s elevator to aid him. He drew out memories of her children, her twin sons as he coated his inserting ghost with their facade.
Subtly, he felt for a series of memories pertaining to the children before editing his current design using his Ghostjack and slipping into the depths of her palace via rails of symmetry.
As he descended the world housing her metacognition, damage reports greeted him and he knew she was nulled past the point of return.
But yet, some parts of the mind still remained. A single phantasmic like all the others–the Auto-Seance.
INITIATING META-DIVE…
Drawn in through a spiraling sequence of dreams, Avo found himself descending into a cracked citadel created using the clearest of crystals.
In this place of partial oblivion, Avo found himself studying the severity of the damage. Even impressed by it. Whoever inflicted such devastation on her mind intended to hurt, to break. Sneaking himself out into a series of memories that used to comprise her now inactive wards, he realized an entire section of her Metamind’s palace had been cleaved down to mental bedrock by a blade of nothingness.
Slipping deeper into her phantasmal architecture that analogized her mind, Avo found himself swimming through cracked spires of mirror-bright crystal as he climbed from memory to memory, the purity of their aesthetic Ori-Thaum to the root. Glowing gems floated and wisps danced across pylons. The sky above was a mountainous landscape–a colossal titan of sun-baked stone scarred by arteries made from mercury-hued rivers.
The world was nothing but reflections and angles, the streets bright like intersecting daggers. Memories of ghosts danced through imagined networks of floating loci, drifting along the streets for purposes both aesthetic and pragmatic. Where Ori-Thaum ruled, the city was a thinking machine, obeying the whims of the citizenry with but a call. The ground bore the same polished brilliance as the spires, and Avo knew that those of the FATE to be under the banner of Ori-Thaum needed an offer, but thoughts before the pallid surfaces turned fluid and ferried them toward their destination.
She knew this place to be home--a few blocks stretching out from the Purg up in the Tiers.
Suppose there are lonelier ways to die. She could have been nulled entirely, without even a vestige of her home to serve as a backdrop in final fleeting moments of coherence.
Ori-Thaum loved their efficiency and reveled in control. One need not be burdened by the inconveniences of traffic; one need not ever learn the blessings of being able to travel a free and open sky.
Sometimes, it was hard to tell where the will of the people and the will of the state ended.
With his focus sharp and using a cloak of memories he copied over from her sequences as cover, he studied the phantasmics of her palace and found himself evermore confused.
PHANTASMICS DETECTED - [ERROR]
[DAMAGE SEVERE]
[DAMAGE SEVERE]
[DAMAGE SEVERE]
[DAMAGE SEVERE]
[DAMAGE SEVERE]
[AUTO-SEANCE]
Where several constructs used to remain were only chasms spewing mem-errors. They were unmade, similar to the wards. Dismantled instead of frayed or fragged by brute traumas.
At the heart of her palace was a small shack. Or what used to be a small shack. Parts of it had been deleted–shredded clean by invasive ghosts. Only the door seemed tangible. The rest of the structure was flickering in and out of existence, drifting between the void of forgetfulness and deep memory.
Throughout his journey, he found no traps, no planted spyware or trap-phantasmic.
He was merely a lonesome intruder in the post-apocalyptic mindscape of a woman near fully nulled.

Still, it was unwise to expose himself. It would be a loud thing to do if he wanted to dive deeper and pluck at the foundational structure of her memories to see what she could recall. In his cog-feed, her awareness remained at zero. Always zero.
It was as if her ego had been extracted clean from the structure of her own mind.
As he was turning a corner to study the last of her ruined phantasmics, the flash of a holovision flashed in the corner of his eye. Halting, he adjusted the memories his ghosts were channeling and shuttled himself back along the sequences of the current structure he was diving through.
He noticed then. A string of mem-data straying from the rest, its ghosts shaped to hide amongst the other via merging memories, but part of it still lingered on the outside, swaying like a thread of human hair growing from the matted fur of a nu-dog.
He traced the deviance through a fractured structure made of honeycombed glass and, through its porcelain-white doors, on the floor of a blindingly white and barren hotel lobby, was a Kosla-12 entertainment system.
Avo felt his gut clench. Carefully, examining each moment of memory drifting past him with the utmost care, he swam through the mem-data, shifting himself below the Kosla-12 to better scry at it.
Interfacing with her Metamind, he found the construct deposited approximately a month ago. A month and a few days. Around the same time he woke in the Maw.
Up close, there was no mistaking the item, it looked to be the very same system Walton used to take him on his first dive.
This could be a cache.
Or a trap.
Both were mutually likely.
Prepared to end his dive at any moment, he cast a ghost out from his Ghostjack and had it access the Kosla-12.
Ghosts: [406]
If things went wrong, he could cut more of his ghosts loose as well. Use them as sacrificial flares before fleeing deep into the Yondergales, pocketing his mind using the protection of planes as a layer of defense.
Error codes flashed as his deployment tried to access the construct. The Kosla-12 rippled then–just for a moment. It blended into the environment of her palace, but its foundational memories displayed themselves as he scried at the mem-data.
Ghosts: [407]
The coldness inside him grew. He knew these sequences. They came from his mind. Moments from his first dive, of him beholding the Strix in action on the day of the block war. Of Walton walking him deep into the street squire kill team.
The compulsion weighed on him. The need to see its secrets grew heavy. Reaching out, he reintegrated with his drifting ghost and accessed the Kosla-12 directly.
Almost immediately, the Kosla-12 vanished into strings of collapsing fractals, the data sinking deep into his mind. Multiple downloads flashed through his cog-feed, with new functions and markers appearing within his DeepNav by the second.
PRIVILEGES GRANTED: WELCOME, FAMINE OF DEFIANCE
[HELIX INSTALLED]
HAEMOPHAGE RESTRICTIONS REMOVED
PENUMBRAL GATEWAY ACCESS: GRANTED
- INSTALLING ACCESS KEY TO [SANCTUARY]
ELDER MYTHOS VOLUME (I/II/III): INSTALLED
New knowledge and mem-data fused to his Metamind–and even deeper. Something within his ontology thundered as a missing piece snapped into place.
If his Woundshaper could gasp, it would have. “Master… I feel… I feel the nature of your blood loosening.”
But as these new gifts solidified in his mind, so too did the palace around him decay, collapsing, the absence of the Kosla-12 as if a lodestone to the pillars of her mind.
Around him, her palace turned to ash. The crystalline spires bled into a winding dome given structure from the ribs of a titanic beast. The ground hardened into a thing of obsidian and decay, bodies spilling out as he rose upon a dais. As the sky ruptured and wept darkness, Avo made to end his dive, ejecting himself from the collapsing mind of the former Ori-Thaum Guilder.
A single voice halted his escape.
“Do not run,” a voice similar to Walton’s spoke. The sound was the same, but it lacked all warmth and filled his senses with the choke of falling ash and rising smoke. “We wish to speak with you, Strayer. Come and rejoin your brothers, if only for the last time."
“Kindred, the Strayer enters our cage.”

“The cunt seeks to mend that which he hid in this vessel; folly. Fucking folly. Raw, rancid fu-cking folly!”

“To kill an entire branch of ourselves… over this…”

“It matters little. We will see this made right. The missing Helix will be received. From there, we will amend the branch with a new fork to replace the Strayer. The fourth Famine must be reborn. This one, without the sentimentality of the previous.”

“What if… what if they were right? What if our ghouls–”

“Speak no more of this. Our will has been made stone. Hear: the fabric of a lure has been disrupted. The turncoat. Our access point. The Strayer has come to reclaim that which they hid. They have descended our twice-made cage…”

“But Emotion, I did not see them enter.”
“Where the fuck is he! Where!”

“Nor I, Peace. Nor I. Keep looking. Hmm. He has deviated from how he wields our art, but there must be a presence. Scan the loci. Scan the minds. Send Specters to the surrounding blocks. He leaves a trace. There must be a trace.”

-Conversation between the “Low Masters”
8-13
The Four Famines
To watch a mind collapse around you was one thing. To realize that a second layer had been built beneath the bones of the first was another matter altogether.
It was impossible for a single Necro to do in the scant time since Yosanna was contacted by her husband.
Avo knew then he faced not one of his father’s nodes, but more. Vastly more.
A towering mound lifted him higher as the facade finally broke, mem-data around him changing faster than he could adapt, The ground he stood on mutated from a pallid path to a mangled pile, remains of countless ghouls slopping beneath the dancing memory-strands of his avatar as a thunderstorm of ghosts resequenced all around him, each lashing new orders into this pseudo-reality.
Nothing of the current palace was outright destroyed this time, only changed. Usurped. The mountain in the skies dissolved like flakes of paint peeling from a wall, and through the fissures, the clasping bones of a creature too vast to fully fit itself in the pocket of his gaze materialized, its skeletal midriff fusing around him as tumors of darkness spread from each length of rib.
The bodies beneath him hardened, with flat backs rising to provide balanced ground for his legs, and from the sides snapped rails made from severed arms. He was ascending on a column bearing a dais, and its foundation was death.
All around him, he felt new signatures enter, his cog-feed screaming as mind after mind entered the palace, jumping in through the Auto-Seance–the last working phantasmic left of Yosanna’s mind.
“Master, staying here is unwise, we must–”
‘They’re not attacking,” Avo said, his intent clear, cutting off the Woundshaper’s words. “They don’t know where I am in the real.”
There remained a risk to staying. That was indeed true. But where your typical Necro could not escape being nulled, he presided over two planes. For him, escape meant ejecting a ghost and ending the dive before pulling his Whisper back through the winds. Hunt as they might for the source of his phantasmics, there was nothing to find in the real.
He would be deep in the Yondergales blowing his way out of the building, his mind beyond reach. For now, however, he wished to gaze upon the family who wore the flesh of his father but possessed none of his warmth.
It would please him to finally lay gaze upon the nature of his adversary–perhaps the oldest of his adversaries.
There was an ineffability in knowing your caring father was but an offshoot from those who enslaved you. A new desire ignited inside Avo. A new want rising amongst many others. He wondered if eating one of these “Low Masters” would offer a taste equally ineffable.
To eat one’s own father was sacrilege of a particularly vile nature, but what was Avo now but a perversion of a ghoul if judged from the standard of Old Noloth? Not often do slaves get to feast upon the entrails of their masters.
Perhaps in the trauma he would claim from swallowing mouthfuls of flesh from their bodies, he would finally find himself free of Walton’s shadow.
No scent of citrus pervaded this simulation; the absence of Walton’s most defining trait felt wrong in more ways than Avo could describe, like a piece of the man he knew was missing, like there was something else piloting his corpse as if a golem, like an effigy of mockery.
“Greetings, Strayer.” From out of the darkness, podiums of rounded paleness drifted forth, their design a thing of flesh-shorn bone leaking a haze of smog along the sides. The first of his father’s alternates greeted him, a tall figure garbed in ashen robes stitched with shamanistic fetishes.
Their mem-data was an inscrutable kaleidoscope of schizophrenia memories, the builds of their minds a scramble of feverish instants. It was like beholding a labyrinth of ever-changing shape, and simply looking upon the Walton made Avo’s nerves shiver.
What he beheld was beyond skill. Beyond anything he could fathom. One could change their sequences, but to do it unceasingly without a deep dive into one’s own Metamind…
There was more than just a mastery of Necrotheurgy at play here. The nodes possessed something greater.
Walton had never been a hyper-materialist, but Avo couldn’t assign him the title of spiritualist either. What was valued, however, was a sense of pragmatism. Of practicality. This one stank of tradition and rote forms, their person approaching on a plate spilling darkness, bearing only emptiness to their gaze and a hollow wound in their chest.
In place of a heart, a dead owl shook to the unseen winds in the Nether, its body chained in place within the cavity via aortal arteries. With each pulse, the owl hooted, the sound haunting, taunting, its visage encroaching as a ponderous weight on Avo’s mind.
In the panes of darkness lining the rib-like cage of this eldritch sphere, more minds glinted. Countless more, like peering out into the stars at night. Of course, Avo had never known the stars to stare back, to bleed their scorn and hate down upon the lands on which they shine. From beneath the supple flesh of oblivion, more nodes molded in symmetry to the image of the heartless approached, and with them flowed winds of the harshest cold.
Here, there were no lands. Here, he stood alone, in the hollowed remains of a long-dead Guilder, face to face with a face belonging to someone long dead, and a truth that filled his veins with a frozen ache.
The heartless came to a halt a mere sequence away from him, the distance in the palace but a foot or two. “We have wanted to greet you in better circumstances, Strayer, once named Defiance,” the node spoke. The voice was an echo cast from the void, the similarity reaching as sound without cadence, tone without warmth. This Walton stared without blinking, the meat hanging from his body like something stitched onto a mannequin. “But you fled. You forced this upon us. It is of no form at all for a finger to break from the body–you must now see the folly of your betrayal. The path is stone. The ending will not be changed. For sake of Noloth, be still and relinquish your Helix. You are unfit for the mantle. You are unfit to see the arrival. Only as sustenance fed to the Hungers may you be redeemed. But this is without cruelty. We will see your mind reseeded from a prior iteration. One unmarred by your time on the surface. One still dedicated to the great work.”

A beat passed. Avo let the words dissolve and realization dawned. They thought he was still Walton. Or one of his nodes. They were speaking to him as if a brother would, the judgment cast from their minds a bifurcation of familial animosity and self-loathing.
“You are compromised,” the heartless prodded. “You know this.”

“He’s pretending to be fucking dull.” The harshness of the words slashed at Avo as traumas lashed out from the darkness. A new Walton came forth from the left, the angle of their arrival a full ninety degrees from the first, riding upon a skeletal steed all armor and blades. Atop its back, another of the nodes came forth, but his hands were caked in ever-dripping gore, and his body was a coat of scabs. Scabs that crawled, that danced and fought upon the surface of his flesh. Crusty shapes of small soldiers locked in an eternal war, battling to claim their place and not be swallowed by mouths of gore-carved trenches running across the node’s body.
Violence radiated from this Walton, the distillation of his urge born of rage and sorrow so potent Avo almost mistook the flavor for that of a ghoul’s mind, for by the node’s all-consuming hate, their natures were nigh-near perfect symmetry.
“You half-strand fuck. You stupid cunt. You low-blooded stillborn bastard of spoiled flesh. You break from us like a piece of wood; you run from us like a fleeing slave; you return to us a fucking mute!” The last words were shouted, the ghosts comprising this node’s avatar booming loud. Behind him, other nodes bearing the same visage filtered through the dark as well, peering in through the thinness of minds. They were using the Auto-Seance to enter, a memory shared between similar minds.
The scabbed one continued. “What now? Hm. What purpose did this all serve? Did topsider life leave you a mental invalid as well? Or are you so empty after your progenitor nulled himself? Did he break his mind too soon? Fail to finish forking before he was forced to see the deed’s end? Did you develop a sense of fear after swimming in the festering soup that these topsider cunt-fucks call a fucking mind you corpse-born fuck!”

A loud sob came from the other direction. A new Walton approached. “Enough, Peace! Enough. Flagellate him no more. I can’t take it. The pain goes to me! It always goes to me!”
Something akin to a chariot slipped past the darkness, and unspeakable atrocity filled Avo’s gaze. Upon a tear-made chariot not so unlike Kae’s False Heaven, the last Walton rode forth debased, his nudity only masked from sight by filth. The beasts of burden pulling him were likewise no bioforms. Not of the conventional variety, anyhow. Instead, castrated clones of Walton himself pulled the vehicle forward on amputated stumps. Their mouths were burned shut, a misshapen lump where their mouths were. Wires of fluid shaped from their joined rivers of tears ran down to bolts attached to their spines. The mutilated Waltons pulled, strained, and wept all the same.


Avo averted his sight, filtering what he was seeing before something inside him snapped.
Fresh wounds stung inside his mind, but he survived.
Was this why the node in the Deep Bazaar forced him to use the Secondhand Fatality. To be inured to this?
However even those parted from prior faith can feel distaste when beholding the defilement of all they held holy. A sickness roiled inside Avo, sourness filling his veins. His mind boiled as he struggled not to break, to flee.
He wanted to avert his eyes. To turn from this.
But he needed to know the truth about his father’s nature and tied to it, his own.
“I don’t want to linger on this. I don’t wanna be mad at him anymore.” The weeping node sobbed, the display of fragility counter to Walton's eternal placidity. “I can’t do this… I can’t bear this…”

The scabbed one laughed, a joyless sneer audible in his voice. “You worthless fuck. Tears. Tears and pity for this… this confused mongrel. I swear, with him, it’s like looking into the mind of the Unborn. Empty. Vacant. He doesn’t speak, doesn’t argue. And now, you’re here trying to plead clemency. Pathetic. If I knew parting myself was going to do this, I would have found someone else to fork instead of my own mind.”
The weeper keened a low note that made Avo’s guts water. Unconsciously, his winds lashed at the ground.
The scabbed one growled. “Let’s be finished with this, Emotion!” He turned to the heartless and held up a gore-caked hand. “Call the Hungers. Call the Unbirthed Fucking Divine. Let this mistake see what became of his progenitors.” His face cracked into a savage expression of cruelty. “Let’s see how much acceptance you truly embody, Defiance.”
“Enough, Peace,” the heartless node said. “Traditions should remain.” A chill flooded the palace, the indifference the heartless felt to all things total; absolute. “He was of our mold once. As such, his ruination must be witnessed by the chains.”

“Chains.” Such was Avo’s first word spoken to the derivatives of his father. Offshoots or other branches. The true nature of the Low Masters design remained beyond the boundaries of his comprehension, slowly though, things were taking shape.
“Oh, by the Hunger,” the scabbed one sighed. “He’s fucking dull. He’s dulled himself, crippled his own mind to spite us.”

A loud mournful cry sang out from the two mutilated Waltons pulling the chariot. The weeper sobbed harder. “Why Defiance… why would you do this to yourself… Why would you do this to us of the Oldest House? Are we not of an origin? Did you not taste the waters… the waters of the Hungers’ dream? When we were one? Did you forget our bargain? For our people!”


For their people. Of Old Noloth? Confusion spread through Avo, and Woundshaper rose to answer. “The oldest house? The… the Tongues of the Hungers? Tell me not that this is the same self-breeding servant-king of Old Noloth? Wahakten? The Thief of Dreams! Servant to a false pretender, naming itself a god!”
“False entity?” Avo asked.
“I have lain gaze on many a god. We sense each other, our natures kindred mirage-infused flames. Beacons caged by the rigidity of reality, we see each other. The Hungers, though, were no true divinity. Whatever their make, they rendered no shine. By words spoken from these… facets of humanity, they could be little more than mere delusion. The Nolothi had their gods, but I never tasted the presence of any ‘Hungers.’”
But how could that be the case when he saw the Low Masters wield thaumaturgies? Use Heavens? Were those memories false as well?
A dichotomous pause echoed in the depths of two minds, across two realities.
The owl inside the heartless’ chest cocked its head. “Have you nothing to say still, Defiance?”
Cowardice did not run strong in Avo’s nature, but faced with a tribunal of immensely skilled Necros bearing semblance to his father felt like being a whipped ghouling waiting for the sadstick again. The beast screamed and wailed, confused as to why he wasn’t capitulating, begging the Low Masters for clemency.
The agony he felt turned into a tearing hurt as part of the fear flowed toward himself, toward something new slotted within his being.
The Helix trembled inside him. He felt like he was still flesh in the real, and not wind.

Avo spoke with every last mote of strength, in defiance of his nature, straining to keep his dread's numbness from spilling through. “I… I am broken. Need–I need you to… explain.”

The scabbed one rolled his eyes and turned his gaze skyward, toward the pale-white ribs that seemed to run on forever, higher and higher, like a malignant spine fusing protruding from nothingness. “He starves us. He fucking starves us. We can’t even exact righteous retribution because the ignoramus can't grasp the meaning of his demise.” He turned to the choir of other scabbed behind him, their clenched teeth and seething hate reopening wounds across their bodies.

The heartless held up a hand. The owl at the center of his chest flapped its wings. “Strayer, do you wish to know the meaning of this tribunal? The nature of your transgression?”

“Yes,” Avo said.

“So be it. We, four from the one, are the Famines, servants to the Hungers–the Inverted Dreamer, from that which the waters of this Dreaming Unsea flows.”

Masking confusion under the pretense of mind-fray, Avo spoke his next question. “I… do not remember any of this.”

A high gasp from the weeper. The scabbed one jeered, his avatar a cauldron of leaking traumas.
Only the heartless remained unburdened. “We were one, once. All of us. A lord of many changing names and changing forms, our rule descended from mind to mind, across countless titles. Such was the way of things in Noloth. By the wisdom of immortality and favor of the Hunger, such was our mandate. And with the blessings it offered, with the flow of its Dreaming Unsea, we rose as a nation to immortality, our chains unending.”

“Dreaming Unsea?” Avo asked.

The scabbed one jeered. “The 'Nether,' you simple fuck! What the topsiders call the Nether. Those crystal-fuckers up in the Tiers lie, we sailed these waters first. We. The Hungers brought us into its pool to be the first sailors–the first! And now everyone speaks of Ori-Thaum Ori-Thaum Ori-Thaum!” He roared, scabs unfurling into jutting blades. “Those shits stole from us! They took the broken pieces of our Heaven and called it a utopia! We guided the dreaming! We! Kept our peoples eternal! Immortal! We were destined for a shared oasis and then… and then….” One of the weepers let out a mournful howl. “And then that stain-blood Jaus Avandaer used us to break the Heavens.”
“He shattered us,” a weeper cried and broke into incoherence. The Waltons pulling their chariot wailed. Another spoke in their stead. “Ours was the eternal water! The Dreaming Unsea! Where all could reign in the dreams of our god regardless of their station in the flesh. So long as the stillborns flowed! So long as the tax was paid.”

The Woundshaper rumbled in confusion. “But a Soul sups nothing from a life unshaped. The infants–the unthinking… These beings incapable of belief offer no Essence. What could such a ‘god’ feed from nothingness.” It scoffed. “Only one that is no god at all.” The Woundshaper paused. “Not a god perhaps, but a liminal being all the same…”
“Peace. Joy. Enough.” The heartless let their head drop. “We speak in fragments. I sense he remains lost. Perhaps it is time that we show him the presider of his fate.”

“No,” the weeper quailed.
“Yes,” the scabbed one hissed. “Call it. Call the Hungers. Let him greet the Inverted Dreamer once more.” He smiled. “It will be a pleasure to see his mind shatter.”
Ah. The Hungers reach out again. Yes. I know, like a worm burrowing through the soil of time.
Liven yourself, Akunsande.
It has been too long since we bled one of your kin.

-Zein Thousandhand, the Godslayer
8-14
The Inverted Dreamer (I)
The last words the scabbed Low Master spoke came synchronized with a flash of light. From above, the bone palace widened and withered, the mem-data around him twisted by the countless nodes, their mastery considerable alone nigh-overwhelming synchronized. There was something special in working with oneself–a deeper intuition that couldn’t come even after years of teamwork.
Guiding hurricanes of ghosts flowing in perfect tandem, they rewove structures around them as sequences shifted, the simulated reality flickering.
Above, the simulation of sky suddenly ruptured, a new dawn opened up at its center. He felt as if a frog at the bottom of a well gazing upon an unfathomable light. And then, everything clicked into shape for his perception.
The tunneling path led toward the shine of another place. Another extension to the barrel. Another beacon cast by a distant Auto-Seance. Other loci. Other lobbies. Ghosts flowed down the conjoining sequences as memories were laced like knots on a rope bridge, the sequences descending further and farther.
Drifting fragments of memory washed over Avo as he tasted flashes. Instants of recollection. He knew some of these memories. He had seen them upon his infiltration earlier. They belonged to the tenants that once lived here, their minds now half-nulled, restrained by an unseen force.
As another series of Auto-Seances flashed and connected, he understood what the Low Masters were trying to build.
This was a bridge. Something that was raising the bandwidth of memories across a cluster of minds, capable of spreading out the strain. With each palace bridged, the cognitive capacity of the Low Masters grew, and they wielded their swelling influence. Was it to mask their presence from the Exorcists? To house something so great and obvious from the curious eyes of lurking Necros–

The answer came as the waters of the Nether suddenly shook. The ghosts rocked and quivered, but through the fusing of palaces, the new superstructure the Low Masters were creating held.
A presence bled out from each of the Walton-faced nodes, a thing felt rather than seen.

Ghosts bearing patterns and mem-data beyond comprehension bubbled from the orifices of the Waltons, their existence a paradox, a knot, their wisping shapes a loom of cycling sequences, trauma spun seamlessly into other emotions as if they were one and the same.
Gazing upon the impossibility rattled Avo’s wards. Fathom a blood red hue, but then know it to be all other colors universally, in hue, in structure, in concept. The only separation was a trapped reverberation at the center of these anomalous ghosts, these strings coiling memories all bound together like a rat-king.
The vibration shivered unnatural, un-gradual. Displacement. Such a word described it best. From one place to another it lurched as if there was a missing stretch of time between, as if focus had slipped from Avo’s mind.
Confusion resounded from the depths of his Frame, arising from his Woundshaper. “Master… these ghosts… they are skimming in place upon the waters of time.”
Inside, Avo felt himself grow cold.
“Oh…” the weepers began moaning in tandem. One after another, the countless concert of nodes clutched at their skulls as the ghosts bubbled out into the palace, forming an amorphous cloud at the center of the space. Their pain was a thing of unity, and they all wept as shadows, mirroring the pain of one man. “It comes. Our master. Our slaver.”

The scabbed ones laughed, their minds discordant, but all joined with the same hum of burgeoning brutality. “Oh, the godsdamned thing is even bigger than it was before.”

All the while, the heartless had begun to pray. “Praise be Noloth. Praise be the kingdom of the unseen mind. Praise be our protector.” He suddenly looked up, his eyes widening in shock as the first flash of emotion overtook his features. “It arrives. It arrives. Praise be the master above. Praise be the Lord of the Undying! Praise be the Inverted Dreamer! Praise be Noloth, fallen now, but fated to rise.”

And as one, the Low Masters fell silent, bowing their head in supplication for the un-god.
It would be too vulgar a thing to call its arrival a cataclysm, and its spontaneous manifestation could not even be described as blurring. Its movement mirrored the first few resurrections Avo experienced. Reality shuddered. The Nether shivered. Ghosts lurched and flowed as if a stone fell upon the waters, movement-choked.


The mass inflicted suffocation on all that was. Even with all the minds joined in unison, the structure the Low Masters had lashed together was fraying, memories shattering, Auto-Seance’s crumbling as ghosts fragmented into frayed memories.


Avo stared uncomprehending, trying to see it. He focused on, the congealed cloud made from tumorous ghosts as it began to thunder, and with the deafening wavelengths blasted out from the trembling mass, a sudden comprehension came as Avo heard a chorus of words spoken in both High and Low Nolothic.
Where his understanding of the tongue failed him, the purity of intent that bridged from mind to mind brooked no confusion about what was being said.
“Greetings!”
“Greetings!”
“Hello!”
“Fucking traitor!”
“We need the Frame! We need to be free!”
“Why did you betray us!”
“Master–”
“So hungry!”
“EAT EAT EAT!”
A flash of something appeared then, its presence leaking out from the mists like a color from the void. As he felt with Mirrorhead’s Twice-Walker, a sense of thalassophobia encroached. A ponderous shape slithered out from the obfuscation, its form coiling into itself.
Smaller serpents spun as hoops along the circumference of the grander engagement. Like a vessel cleaving through parting mists, the Hungers became known to Avo as a dream hidden within a network of dreams, its ontology both familiar and fraying to gaze upon.
They resembled that which dwelt within his Soul, the mainstay that allowed his thaums to churn indefinitely.
Dragons. Dragons eating other dragons, predation cycled in perpetuity, the vastest of which spun eating its own tail, while four of its smaller kindred burrowed through its flesh in cycles, forming five interlocked hoops bound by both metaphysical architecture and cannibalism.
Within the looping cycles of autosarcophagy at play, were accretions clinging to the golden ichor that flowed free from the many wounds marring the hunger. Sparkling along flaps of temporally flayed scale, the fullness of minds–not mere ghosts or sequences of memory–greeted Avo as things intact in consciousness and form.
He felt them then, their multitudes and masses, glaring out at him hatefully from the clefts of the great beasts they festered in.
Millions watching him. Millions of minds spilling their perceptions out from millions of eyes.


Avo felt his cog-feed flicker, the overwhelming tide of traumatics and minds pressing down on him. Cupped in this panopticon of eyes, he turned, watching each of the Low Masters as they hovered, their avatars conduits for the lord which they served.
The faintest apparition of thoughtstuff condensed from the wounds, their accretion reverberating as echoes out from the trailing gold that the dragons bled. “The polis speaks as one. We see you. We witness you. Entrapped though you are, you have not been judged yet. Speak now, our priest. Be not afraid. Tell us your truth, or the closest lie you have to it.”
It spoke with such volume that it drowned out Avo’s very thoughts.
“What a… pointlessly convoluted construct.” The Woundshaper spoke in his stead. “All these little egos fused within the wounds of dragons become this… thing hiding within the Low Masters. And for what? To… to expand its presence in this realm of the undying? To hide from the wrath of time itself? The architecture displeases me in structure and aesthetic. Such a waste. They would have offered more poignance if fed to our fire.”
“Can’t remember what I did,” Avo said. His speech pattern didn’t much sound like Walton at that moment, but then again, he was supposed to be “broken.”
The cloud hummed. “We see. The chain is broken in you, is it?”
“Fucker did a bad fork,” the scabbed one muttered, their speech echoing from the depths of the Nether disembodied from their avatar.
The cloud sang, and its voice was a catastrophe. The sound spilled free from the dragons as it twisted from rage to laughter back to rage as if time was spiraling back in on itself.

“Let us recount then, the history of our natures,” the Hungers said. From its opened flesh flowed the ink of gold, painting a new vista as if a fluid-based holo-vid, a resplendent pond within a sea.
A city greeted him, then, its form a near mirage, familiar construction running wide and round along the outside while descending in each Tier toward the inner districts. A single chasm bifurcated the city, its walls pale white as a trickle of darkness rose as a mist. Avo knew that channel. He had seen it before.
The Maw. A single section of the Maw.
“Old Noloth. Dead Noloth. Beautiful Noloth. In the time of the long quiet, when men knelt before their own instruments.”
The scene changed. Time shifted. The phantoms channeled a new scene then, the very image they were manifesting causing them to boil, to scream and laugh in sync. Trauma and joy bled over into each other as if they were of the same emotion, the same pattern of cognitive architecture. A tower formed. A tower fused from the bodies and bones of a sea of writhing people. Skinless as they were, Avo could still see the weeping joy scarred into their faces, their arms reaching out high in a rise of parapets, a ladder of praise to an unseen sky. Around the rising spire, the silhouettes of ten other dragons circled, the pattern of their revolution a blur bleeding into the tapestry of reality itself.

His wards shuddered then. Something broke. A dull rising hymn of madness seeped into the shallows of Avo’s inner thoughts. But he could not look away. Would not look away.
COG-CAP: 63%
The tower vanished. All that remained was the cloud.
The cloud continued. “Do you remember the great ladder that was promised? The offering that the deceiver from Kosgan offered us? We taste… Confusion. Tell us, Defiance, betrayer of your faith, betrayer of yourself, what confuses you.”
“That’s… the Flayed Ladder?” Avo asked.
“Only named as such by the outlanders. Those of the rooted thought. To us, it was the instrument of our ascension. The final salvation for all those born blessed to be Nolothi. Tell us, our priest of Defiance, do you remember what our dream was? And do you remember what the false-tongue Jaus Avandaer took from us?”Avo let his silence linger as he studied the mem-data of the being further. The Hungers, unnatural entity of Necrothurgy that it was, still held a modicum of structure to its memories.
The definition of its composition, however, was based upon a foundation of recursion, each memory a barrel, shifting from positive to negative and back again as if all the experiences it contained were but moments to a vicarity being sped up or rewound on an entertainment system. A series of schematics filled the void at the heart of the Hungers. The architecture of the tower was beyond Avo’s understanding both materially and metaphysically, but that which stood out from the image alone were the ten rings that looped its length and the fact that there was an inverted spire on the bottom of the structure as well.
“We sought an escape. A utopia that cannot be constructed in this reality,” the Hungers said. “The native pillars of this… canvas do not support the world we wish to design. Hence, we seek to elevate this Tier of reality. To derive what we need from this substructure and from its image, mold something anew. Something grander. Something of tunable perfection.”
The ancient city returned then, but now it sank deeper, and the channels of the Maw had spread further, slowly forming a symbol. The Hungers continued. “The idea of the Ladder was offered to us in a conclave. To you, Wahakten, priest of the Nolothi. A conspiracy rose against the gods as the Unprophet Jaus swayed us with his arcane technologies and a chance to subvert the Heavens. By chance of fate or circumstance, we, the Hungers came to be born of dragon and men both, our culture fitting the designs of his scheme to starve the gods from the inside, to split them will from ego.”
“It speaks of the Parting,” the Woundshaper said, a note of loathing coming through. “That which you know as the Godsfall. To think that were castrated from our own divinity by the mental-temporal equivalent of a knot of snakes…”
“What were you?” Avo asked. It took a surge of audacity to ask the question, but he needed it answered. The face of his former master–the master of his masters–remained obscure to him, its design cloaked behind concepts and shrouds.
“Are,” the Hungers said. “Are. We still remain. Trapped. Imprisoned. Sealed between planes, our totality is a trailing wound running parallel above the structure of reality, crippled before the fullness of ascension.”A crash of emotions spilled out from the Hungers then, notes of howling anguish and despair raking against his wards like a river of nails washing down a chalkboard. Discomforting as it was, Avo found a comparative metaphor in likening it to a gestalt of negativity leaking into the public Nether after a disaster, the synchronicity born of communities vast and conjoined in a way only a city could be.

His following question was born more from compulsion than curiosity. For all the confusion the Hungers inflicted, for all the dread, it was, in a manner, strangely beautiful–Necrotheurgic artistry in style and function. “How many are inside you?”
Scorn rose from the cloud in trailing mem-data, the visual scene before him resembling steam hissing from a cloud. “We numbered five hundred million during our attempt at ascension. We hold all the highborn houses of Noloth and their retainers. Our beings were made eternal by the touch of a fallen dragon. Upon death, ours is where a mind’s eternity should lie, not to be fuel for some paracausal parasite. Us. A community unending. A shared dream eternal, inverted away from the laws of entropy and demise.”
“We were to become a new reality!” the Hungers snarled suddenly. Its voice in that instant was every adult, every child. “Or we should have been.” It paused, letting its lament fester anew before turning its ire on him again. “We were the first to ascend the Ladder, its construction made beneath our surface, an allowance on our part, a deal on Jaus’, and a feat belonging to those of the Old Banner.”
“Old Banner?"
“They call themselves Voidwatch. The last bastard inheritors to a star-striding empire, now broken, now twisted. Nonetheless, it was our nature that allowed this great work to continue. Stripping mind from hollowed bodies, we coveted the best of our people and bled a human design into the wounds of the dragons. Wounds where we could fester without being swallowed.”
“Why?” Avo asked.
“To hide from the gods,” the Hungers answered. “To cheat fated death and build a paradise eternal. We hide all those we deemed of worth within the Hungers–this design of ours–and left it to linger in the catacombs beneath the city. Noloth was always a beast of two forms–a reflection of brutality and gluttony on the topside where the gods ruled, and the hidden power where the future was promised below.”
“The Ladder… Helping Jaus build it? Using it as an escape from the world?”
“Yes. We were to disentangle all memories of myth and worship upon our promised ascension when we seeped between liminality. Ascension assured. Ascension denied. Jaus had our precious tower skim across time when we were partly up the ninth circle, just as we fulfilled his desired deed.”
The Woundshaper hummed. “Ninth circle. Ninth sphere. The tenth, then, must be the installation of oneself into the totality of existence or something similar thereof, master.”
“We are trapped now,” the Hungers said. “Trapped in a transition, pulled away from time. Jaus promised us a world to ourselves. But he cleaved us using our very own nature. Time. A pocket within a pocket, we remain here as an… anchor of his making. That which you call ‘ghost?’ These memories? Phantasmics? Have you wondered why they resemble a city of the mind so, even in your besotted state? Have you?”
“It’s… a reflection of you?”
“Ah, so only missing facets of thought. Not lame of mind like Peace so claims.”
“Just kill the cunt,” Peace said.
A new realization dawned, and with it came horror born of philosophy. The Hungers were slaves using slaves feeding into slavery itself. His father–the Low Masters–were slaved to it but used the Nether which it supposedly engendered, their art Necrotheurgy, born from a new pillar of metaphysics lodged between realms of existence, an entire people serving as a counterweight for the foundations of modern-day communications, intelligence, and entertainment.
“And so you see now our predicament. Our torture. These false waters flow only because we exist. These waters were ours and our own! No one else! A place as true as the material, not this… this facsimile. The traitor Guilds use our very ontology as scaffolding for your ‘lesser miracles’ while the eternal city is bound to place, our paradise made purgatory.”
The Woundshaper sighed. “Master… do take heed that this creature may be exaggerating its involvement in the art of wielding minds. For all their claimed discredit toward the Ori, those of the archipelago were to have mastered this ‘Necrotheurgy’ of yours long before the split. Perhaps pacts between the ephemerals and dragons were not so rare in those days.”
The clashing details tore at Avo’s mind. He hissed and his annoyance flowed through his Metamind, raw and pure. The more answers came, the more questions followed. Why the Low Masters? Why the Uprising? How even were the Hungers trapped?
“It weighs on us,” the Hungers said. “The use of the Nether. It’s very existence. We feel it, growing with each death, spreading the wounds of the dragons. We were supposed to be the sky, but instead, we find ourselves as soil tread upon! A scale to bear the weight of our betrayers! And you, oh priest of mine, have opened a symmetrical wound. Have you no shame? Have you no decency toward your own people? How could you do something so foolish? How could you entomb our Frame in that… that creature?”
It felt as if a gauss flechette had struck him.
“Creature?” Avo asked.
“The ghoul. Your successful experiment. And a mistake on our part. We should have never permitted you to install that child’s memories into that ghoul! And you should have never imbued the ghoul with our Frame!
A keening wail of heavy anguish erupted out from the Hungers like a typhoon. Avo felt his cog-feed crackle and fissure, his ghosts receding even deeper behind his wars. The Hungers possessed a distance from him, a separation of entire realties, but its weight could be felt still, and with a whim, it could shatter him like an anvil falling upon glass.
Like a pendulum, its ire turned to the other priests. “And how could you have missed this? The ghouls were an instrument of your conception! Replaceable bandwidth to alleviate the strain! Death to fuel the Heavens we need to win this war!”
The heartless said nothing. The scabbed one scowled. The weeper sobbed.
“Did you hear me, ‘Walton?’ You gave our greatest instrument to a creature that was less than a slave. Less than a dog! They were made to express our hate! Our hate! Our boundless hate for the world! To bleed the betrayers forever! Lick sacks of fucking waste-trauma! And you made the meat meant to carry our excess metaphorical shit a god!”
“Avo, listen. Being a Necrojack is simple, but that doesn't mean it's easy. This art is like… building a house with bits of truth and much more falsehood. Memories are fickle. Malleable. Even history might be reshaped.
Logic won’t be enough. Intuition’s like letting your nose lead you when the room could fill up with smoke at any time.
You want to find out what’s true? Look for the mistakes. Mistakes are my favorite thing in the world. Mistakes tell you what someone else wanted to do, and how they failed, and what else might not make sense.
Want makes fools of even gods. Like a favored drug we’ll do anything to get. You hold that desire, and you hold the keys to any mind.”
-Conversation between “Walton” and [Redacted]
8-15
The Inverted Dreamer (II)
Waste.
Waste, not even a monster.
The withering winds of truth winnowed away a piece of Avo. It didn’t hurt when the dust of it left him, but the hollowness lingered. Even before he belonged to Walton, he thought himself a creature of purpose, a failure of design though he might be.

Now, however, the waters of the Nether seemed to wash through him, his ego whistling from the crevices made from his fissuring concept of self.
“Not even a dog,” he muttered. The second blow hit him with the delay of a second. The child. They said that he had the memories of a child implanted inside him. The emptiness spread and lathered itself over the unhealed wound left by Walton’s final node.
Pain greeted pain, but one served as a foundation for the other, preventing a true internalization.
Was this why the last of Walton’s branch stole his choice? Forced his hand? To innoculate him from these greater torments, deliberately castrating him of his filial piety to deaden the hurt following the coming blows.
From one note of pain to another, Avo’s mind swirled. The Hungers said something of his memories being copied. Installed into him. What did they mean? “Child. There was… I copied the memories of a child. What child?”

A dog-like bark of laughter came from the scabbed one. “The cunt forgot why he did it in the first place. This would be pretty fucking comedic if it wasn’t so godsdamned sad. And if you weren’t literally a replica to me. You fucking shamed us, Strayer. Shamed us all. Shamed the man we used to–”

“Silence.” The dragon twitched.
“Stupid shit,” the scabbed one finished. With a spill of anger, he returned to silence as a bitter wryness stained the atmosphere around the dragon.
“We shall be the sole judge of your failings,” the Hungers said. A bout of conjoined laughter lingered at the tail of its words, notes building upon the rising foundation of Avo’s loathing like descending bricks.
It reminded him of Mirrorhead. And that in of itself made Avo quite inclined to engineer its eventual death.
“You truly do not remember the child, my priest?” The Hungers hummed, its mind a cleave between curiosity and growing suspicion.
“Do not be shaken, master,” the Woundshaper interrupted. “Hold to your silence for now. Betray nothing.”
"You have a recommendation.” Avo inner words came not as a question but as permission. He allowed the Heaven to speak freely.

“Vagueness should not merit clarity. They play using your blindness. Inflict the same upon them. The dance of deceit need not be done alone. They clearly wish for you to make comment on this… mystery child. Yet, that is not our game. We seek to understand what occurred with you. Lure them to speech. Ask them why they think Walton bound the memories to the child. Make them wander through the topic.”


The loathing inside Avo shifted, the turn spurred by the Woundshaper’s advisement. His hatred rang inside of him, and this time he let the beast bray its hate, using it to focus his ire. There was something poetic about deriving strength from the hate poured inside him by the Hungers, and as he used the passing of time like a whetstone, sharpening the tension of the palace, he broke the silence of minds with a hurled question.
“Why do you think I bound the Frame to the ghoul?”
The directness with which he spoke struck the Hungers and incredulity leaked from its being like blood seeping into the water. “Are you asking us to justify your betrayal?”
“I’m asking you to describe it,” Avo said. “Understand it from your perspectives.”
“Defiance, does your hubris–” That was as far as the weeper made it, the rest of his words descending into heave of chaotic sobs.
“Very well, my priest. I will grant you the courtesy of gnosis, so you understand the sacrilege you inflicted upon us in full.” Along the wounds of the dragons, the accretions turned inward, their discourse growing internal. The tides shifted: when he had once forced them to wait, now he was left the pace to them.
“Remember master: pivot everything back to your origins, to the details you seek. Drive the attack. Take from them all you can, and give unto them only smoke and vagaries. This is not a trade. This is not a negotiation. This is but a false trial of tradition with one desired end: your demise. Or should I say your father’s?” The Woundshaper laughed then. “Little do the fools know that he remains a step ahead.”
“Sentimentality.” The Hungers' words came as a scything gale, the winds of the Nether hot with their hate. “We made you with a modicum of wholeness left to you, Defiance. You were our priest of Defiance, the version of yourself that accepted the transgression of our fates but never forgave. Your charge was understanding and freedom: to live amongst our betrayers. To learn their ways. To subvert their causes and drive them against one another for reasons true and manufactured.
“But the years must have eroded your will, grinding you down from mind to mind. You began to… care more than you accepted. Grew distracted by the phantom lives you lived amongst those people. So much so that you must’ve thought us ghosts in place of the waters that flow from us. You have forgotten the face of your people. You have forgotten the face of your son.”
Jealousy clung to every word the Hungers spoke, and even an amateur Necro could have sensed the neediness. Whatever these Hungers were, they clung to the Low Masters, to their priests as personal property.
The Hungers continued. “The recreation of his nous was just another mistake in a long line we acquiesced to you. Our pity, misused. Your long-dead son could never nest properly in a human’s ontology. Watching you fail time and time again was pathetic. Then came your ‘brilliant ploy.’ The ghouls. You suggested these creatures to your fellow branches. Convinced them of their veracity. Blank creatures of expendable fury meant to contain our trauma and fuel new Heavens. A thing procured through an ill-thought deal between the Old Banner, the Sang-curs, and the Ninth Column of Zein and her attack dogs.”
The Hungers stopped speaking, the unity of its being collapsing as a discordant clash of clamoring voices spoke over each other. Discontent radiated from the keepers of Old Noloth.
The Woundshaper took notice. “They are not joined in this. They disagree as to the cause of your betrayal. How… indecisively mortal.”
“It matters not,” the Hungers said, voices reconvening in an instant. “The ghouls… you masqueraded them as tools for us, deliberately designed them so that they would be lacking. Easy fuel for the fire. But also blank. Blank and easy for one to shepherd their minds. Or infuse them with something of your own desire. saw them as vessels for the boy’s resurrection. A tool to ensure Avohakten’s immortality, to prevent you from ever losing him. That which you did with the Frame was merely the final pillar to your tower of sin.”
The Woundshaper laughed at the Hungers as an elder would a raging adolescent. “How fascinatingly embarrassing. It’s like watching someone pull themselves away from obvious truth.”
“Which is?” Avo asked. A note of annoyance came from his Heaven of Blood.
The Woundshaper sighed. “Do not debase yourself by committing to the same hubris, master. They think of immortality in such a negative sense. But little that your ‘Walton’ did was negative. Recall then that he held your hand and guided his own suicide when you couldn’t. Recall him teaching you to control your nature. You are more than just loose parts fused into a ghoul. You are… a new instrument. Divined to better purpose.”
The Woundshaper fell to a whisper. “Recall the construct you call the Morality Injector. A thing designed by him to help you master yourself. Would such a thing be necessary for a meager mortal child? Rehoused immediately as a slave. No. Your father might have implanted you, but he clearly raised you. Cherished your potential, made at his hand or not? And would a child installed directly into a being of your instincts have the refinement to master themselves against the fury that dwells within you without it? No. You were practiced. Refined. Your character was always the first cage around your nature. Not otherwise. You were shaped to bear a Heaven long before you bore a Frame.”
The Morality Injector. The clouds within Avo’s mind cleared. If he was only a loose collection of memories fused into a ghoul, why then did he remember lessons of self-discipline? No. For all that was nested inside him, he was more than but the beast, but a construct of thought piloting the instincts of a ghoul.
This was not a matter of opinion: his ontology made it so.
Above ghoul, above waste, above whatever else he may be, he was a Godclad.
And he chose to speak.
“No,” Avo said.
The Hungers froze. “No?”
“To put the boy inside a ghoul isn’t immortality,” Avo said. “It’s death. It’s torment. The natures don’t align. The ghoul isn’t the dead boy. He’s something more.”
There was something amusing about hearing a few hundred million voices all jump the octave in disbelief. “You accuse us of deceit?”
Avo, past the point of caring, let his scorn be known with a chuckle. “No accusation. You are lying to yourselves. Being a ghoul is to die. To die. Over. And over. And over. But also to kill. To keep killing. To always hunger. Always hunt for more. Bigger prey.” Avo smiled then. “Even something like you.”
“And that,” The Hungers roared, “is the truest nature of your sin. Hubris. That is your crime. You think you know better than the lines and great families of Noloth the Eternal, Noloth the Everlasting. You think you know better than the very man you were forked from. You were made to be the infection that sickens the betrayers yet you–”
“--Changed,” Avo said, stealing the moment from the Hungers. “Yes. Not sickness. Mutation maybe. But not sickness. Not anymore. Learning new… purpose now.” A build of anger came from the Hunger. He met it with his own. “Something you don’t understand. But you’re trapped. A slave to time. Slave. Should make it easy for you all to understand the ghouls.”
The Hungers’ tone dropped. “Slave? Us?”
The scabbed one hissed, unable to bear the heresy. “Shut your cunt-mouth! Strayer! Or–”
“Silence,” the Hungers hissed. The Walton bound to the idea of “Peace” obeyed. Avo cast out an emotion, and its flavor was mockery. Mockery for the other branches of Walton.
“Slaves one. Slaves all.” Avo turned his gaze back to the Hungers. “Tell me of the dead boy. Why do you think I bound him to the ghouls? Why do you think I have him in the Frame. To spare him death? Frames don’t spare death. It just makes it a cycle. No father would inflict this on a son. But you are all severed. You should understand. No. The ghoul is more. More than the boy. More than the beast or the fragments. Made to be Godclad. Made for choice.”
“You deny the worth of your own child?” The dragons spun, a new shape flowing out from their blood. The face of a young man greeted Avo, shorn of hair and with ears rimmed with rings of gold. Clasped in priestly robes, he bore a faint resemblance to Walton, but it was the flash of a golden tangerine that caught Avo’s eye.
Citrus. The smell flowed sharp and true.
That was the taste of Walton.
The heartless clenched his jaws. The scabbed one began snarling curses. The weeper moaned in pain. “No… no, I don’t want to remember! I don’t! Avohaketen! Forgive me!”
The image faded. The Hungers froze. A cold realization dawned, its ichor freezing as its minds turned. “You did not react…”
Avo worked to keep the ploy. He cursed himself internally. “He is long dead–”
The temperature in the Nether shifted. The waters grew chilled. Ghosts shivered.
Ripples came from each of the Low Masters, their conjoining ghosts screaming out into the Nether in plumes of trauma, seeking a target they just couldn’t find.
For the first time, the heartless looked confused.
“But…” the weeper said, “he has the helix! The mem-data shows–”
“I can’t fucking find his mind,” the scabbed one said. “He doesn't have any of the memories I have…”
The Hungers spoke then, its anger suddenly cold, impersonal. “The hurt my priest felt for his son was eternal. Immortal! It does not just fade. He started wars for him! He cleaved his mind into four for him! He spent the past centuries… You are not my priest. That is hate that vibrates from your design. Not true pain. Just… loathing. Who… what are you?”
“The fool has finally noticed us,” the Woundshaper said. “A pity. We were learning so much from this charade. Let us be away. Let the question form a tumor inside them. Afflict them. Let nothing be answered.”
Avo did not do that. Instead, he committed the only act a Necro would. He lied. He misdirected. “Ninth Column sends their regards.”
His deception struck the Low Masters and the Hungers like a thunderbolt. A surge of ghosts recoiled in outrage.
The scabbed one snarled. “Zein! You insolent bit–”
He cut his Metamind off then, ejecting himself from Yosanna’s palace.
His return to the real came with as every last mind in the block detonated, the totality of their beings turned to shrapnel. Slipping his Whisper through the currents, he sealed the pathway to his Yondergales, and began his crawl outward.
With the wind as his being, his touch drifted across countless spasming bodies, their minds fracturing into nothingness, the devastation like a block-nullifying blastwave certain to see collateral damage.
A low feeling of pleasure began to build inside Avo despite the wounds lingering on his ego, despite the unwanted truths. With his Heaven, he evaded certain nullification. With the Galeslither, there was likely little he couldn’t escape.
Such were his thoughts when the veil leading into his plane was sliced open by the sweep of a blade.
And as the metal licked wind, Avo felt a flare of agony open across his back.
“Don’t engage.”

“But–”

“You spoil the only fun the old woman has for months, and she'll kick the shit out of you. Thousandhand’s been talking about cutting these Hungers for a fuck-long time. Let her play. We’ll move in if she needs it.”

“Her Frame… It’s just a Sixth Sphere…”

“Yeah. Like she’s going to need it.”
-Cas eld’Canduir to Valerie Denton, Ninth Column
8-16
Thousandhand
It was hard to describe a cut so pure it inflicted a groove of hurt deeper than the pain of flesh.
The slash cut him out of reality, the edge of the blade painting a stroke of thought-cleaving agony down to the root of his being. His cog-feed flickered, an indelible line marring the forms of his ghosts, his thoughts splitting into disjointed streams.
A horse-head came loose from his Galeslither, the manifestation of his Heaven partially decapitated, form unspooling from thaumaturgy as his Hell screamed.
REND CAPACITY: 100%
WARNING: BACKLASH
CLASHING CANON
[SPACE]: YONDERGALES
VENT! VENT! VENT!
The flood of Rend came sudden and stark, with his Galeslither’s Third Circle struggling to compensate for the backlash. Something had contradicted one of his canons, and gutted his Yondergales open.
Rolling tides of stratocumulus spilled out through the wound, washing into the world outside as Avo shed the form of the Galeslither. The cessation of the billowing tempest was instant, the Galeslither itself a storm that never was.
Avo plunged, his path taking him through a fissure open upon the tapestry of existence. The streets of Xin Yunsha flashed by his eyes and through fogs he fell. Echoheads spearing down to stabilize his descent. The world slowed, and him along with it. His tails hung in the air, falling slowly like they were digging through quicksand, his body drawn taut by an unseen force, time itself feeling like a viscous fluid.
A reflexive urge to struggle wrestled a precious moment away before Avo mastered himself. He cast out his Whisper and–to his relief–found that his thoughts flowed unimpeded.
Splashing his surroundings with a narrow beam of perception, he reoriented himself as the pain receded from his senses, his mortal flesh uncleaved, but his Galeslither winced as it bled the venom of entropy down into the funnel of its Hell.
The ground he struck was not plascrete but metal. Metal rusted and piled. Metal protruded from the soil, like new teeth pushing through gums, or soil, ripe to bear strange fruit.
The world around him was shaped in a loop? Avo did a double take as he felt his own perception echo back upon his form.
Suddenly, the resistance melted away. Avo breathed. Avo moved.
His Echoheads split steel and sank deeper into the unnatural soil. Beneath vines enmeshed with plant matter and wiring both, he studied the world around him, head swiveling, tails chittering.
The total area of this plane felt no greater than fifty square feet, but it folded in on itself, a geometrical construct of limited perpetuity.
Above, strange mists caused more vines to sway. Budding bullets rain down in soft falls of gauss flechettes and flathead slugs, spilling free like ripe seeds.
Columns rose around him, part oak, park weapon stand, their sides slotted with jutting blades, maces, spears, guns, and axes, acting as spines to this garden of weapons. They grew high like beanstalk-armories reaching into the sky, spinning like a spiral as the permutation of armaments churned and changed.
“This is a nice garden, yes? I cultivated it myself.”
The woman before him simply appeared. There was no emergence, no movement preceding her arrival. She wasn’t. And then she was.
Taken aback by the woman’s sudden manifestation, Avo fired his Celerostylus and made to move back. The lurch of time followed, but impossibly, the world around him readjusted itself. The mist spilled faster, going from a drizzle to a hailstorm of flechettes. His Soul rang with warning klaxons inside him, the Woundshaper bubbling in anticipation of bloodshed.
TEMPORAL ANOMALY DETECTED
With the world around him racing to keep pace with his heightened reflexes, the effects of his surging synapses grew nullified. Discontent roiled in Avo’s heart as he snarled; the deprivation of his new gift gnawed at him, feeling as if the edge of a new blade made dull.
The crossing of time relaxed as he quelled his reflexes, and with the flattening of his perception, so too did the flow of time in this garden equalize.
If there was but one consolation, however, it was that his adversary did not attack, finding contentment in looking upon him instead, her right hand resting on a hilt bereft of a blade.
Even before he had a chance to take in her features, something about her made the beast within cringe with alarm. If Draus made the beast quaver, the woman before it made it wilt. She stood no titan of stature nor did her form bear any disfiguring cybernetics. Her height reached a scarce six feet at most and her musculature was exemplified by threads of nanocarbide, with pellucid edges of crystal forming an additional superstructure around joints and spine.
Her face was windowed by a transparent visor, her skin aged but not brittle, wrinkles blending with battle scars. Her hazel eyes then were like embedded gems, the only thing of pure beauty upon a war-painted visage. If he were to weave her presence into an analogy, he would liken her to a gnarled tree that just wouldn’t die, and held her pride high upon her flaring brows of aged gray.


It was that which dwelt beyond her flesh that made him stay his hand the most. Her Metamind was a fortress of pure hubris, her wards a dance of blades in an endless pirouette with no walls behind. Her mind was built like a taunt, and her Soul burned bright. Brighter than any he’d been basked in.
WARNING: FOREIGN SOUL DETECTED
UNIDENTIFIED GODCLAD DETECTED
CLASSIFICATION: SPHERE VI [EST. 100004 THAUM/C]
A Sphere Six Godclad. A Sphere Six standing across from him, this place her plane, his cage.
Avo’s mind raced. Where did she even come from? He hadn’t felt her presence at all. She just… suddenly was.
She swept him with her gaze and sighed, grading him with a rueful note. “Well, my new friend. You seem to be no dragon. Or ghost for that matter. I struck thinking I was to rid myself of an old annoyance but here I am, no dragons split, no priests silenced. Instead, I find myself faced with… Who are you, Fallwalker? I’m not sure I’ve seen someone turn themselves into a bioform before but… who I am to judge the whims of the youth these days. Change is expression.” She laughed. “Change is preferable.”

Avo said nothing, his intent less on talk and more on understanding his opposition. The beast instead screamed for him to attack, but his better senses enchained his rageful hubris with control. Whoever she was, he assumed she was the one that split his Heaven. Cleaved him out from his divine avatar.
To throw himself at her with reckless disregard would be folly most fatal.
He needed an angle of attack she wouldn’t see coming. He needed an edge.
“Master… I… I feel… I think I have encountered her before.” It was strange, tasting the fear of a god. The architecture of such its bleeding emotion matched the human conception of dread; dread in the sense of losing one’s agency, in being twisted from form. “I do not… cannot remember…”
Gods don’t understand death, and will never truly know it. But everyone could fear being changed without their own choosing, for if one cannot be the master of their own actions, then how much of an ego was left to mantle the vessel?
Her fingers clicked a steady drumbeat on the hilt of her unseen sword, its design strange, with a nub-like pommel hosting a microlocus, self-adjusting smart-matter grip, and a crossguard of solid ebony. “Is your silence a matter of reluctance, impudence, or incomprehension?”

His mind raced. Casting his Whisper out, he examined her mind again and zeroed in on her weaknesses. He had never seen anyone using wards like hers, but their design left too many gaps. Even as they talked, they were building new memories with each other. Memories that could be obfuscated. Confused.
Subtly, Avo reeled his Whisper back inside before casting out from behind him again, shuttling it along the loop and focusing his perception in a beam from over her shoulder. He stared upon himself, trying to best mimic her perspective; such would allow him to infiltrate her minds using symmetrical memories, and avoid the risk of facing the blades of her mind, however she was to wield them.

Right then, he just needed to bide his time.
“Host should tell their name first,” Avo said. “Impolite otherwise.”
She threw her head back and laughed. “Impudence, then. Hubris. Hubris is a good quality for a young Godclad to have. It will teach you much. If you survive.” The wryness of her expression took on a near-girlish quality. “Ah. You remind me much of my sister in a strange way.”
“How is she?”

“Hm?”

“Your sister,” Avo asked. He worked to keep his Whisper a bit further away from her, using his perception more as a scope than a broad lens. The spoofed memory would be ruined if she was part of the picture.
Her wryness turned to nostalgia, her expression lost in the reverie of memories. “Oh, she's dead now. Been dead for some four hundred years. I killed her. For my husband.” She shrugged with a smile. “I loved my dear sister, but she was too much like my father: zealots of yesteryear, so happy to be a slave. But brave. Reserved in a charming kind of way.”

She sighed, letting the memories go. She stroked the hilt of her blade with her fingers, the gleam in her eyes unknowable to Avo.
“Apologies. I forgot what you asked of me. I am Zein O’yaje. A disciple of many arts, but my heart–” She flicked her hilt up and suddenly, volume itself seemed to quaver into the form of a shivering blade. As the edges fused into shape, it filled with a crystalline fluidity, its shivering waters bearing a pellucid transparency that parted light itself into dappled fractals upon passage. “--has always belonged to that which cuts.”
She looked upon her weapon with the eyes one would reserve for a lover, the affection in her gaze poignant and unashamed.

So distracted Avo was by the woman’s eccentricities that her name resounded in him a beat later, his alarm gushing out from him like blood seeping after a withdrawn blade. “Thousandhand? Zein Thousandhand?”

Collapsing her blade back into a flowing shawl, she held up both her arms and studied them, putting on a play of deepest focus. “No… just two, really. The title is exaggerated.” Her eyes slide off him. “Mostly exaggerated.”
Avo blinked.
“It is your turn,” she said. “What should I refer to you as, consang? I must confess: I am not a patient woman. Age has made my fuse short, and my schedule is ever-so-filled. Speak with your mouth, or…’

She gave him a small bow as she gestured to her sword. “I am always willing to exchange martial knowledge with another if that is your preferred method of conversation.”
The Woundshaper shivered. “Master, avoid facing her directly… She… she has done something to me before… I feel it… I cannot remember…”
Another few seconds. Another few seconds and he would have enough length of memory to attempt circumspect interfacing with her mind. Or so he hoped.
“Just a Fallwalker,” Avo said, keeping his words vague. “Was just–”


“Lying,” Zein said. She tutted. “It’s not a very good lie, mind you. I trap you in the fissure upon detecting your Soul, my Frame noticing yours. A blastwave of phantasmal shrapnel fills the air behind you, and I said previously that I was hunting dragons. Priests. No surprise from you. I assume you to know the Hungers. A better lie, then, could be to say that you were having dealings with an unknown party. Vague enough to serve you, and it would also help you draw out this conversation some more.”

She smiled. “That is what you are trying to do, isn’t it? Keep me talki–”

Avo fired his Celerostylus again. Time slowed within and accelerated without, but in the instant of his initiative, he reached out into the near waters of her thoughtstuff, Ghostjack flashing as he cast out a chain of obfuscated memories, fishing for symmetry. The moment came fast, just as time tore his advantage away. Masked by her gaze, the memories connected as he sank deep into her mind, his focus diving between
INITIATING META-DIVE…
Slipping past the gargantuan blades that uncannily resembled the hulls of certain voidships, Avo gazed upon her palace and immediately froze. Her internal mem-data shifted and changed at a catastrophic rate, her ghosts moving as if they were streaks of lightning, the engine of her mind a phantasmal construct of pure speed.
Without his Celerostylus slowing things, he could–
+Remarkable,+ Zein’s voice came again, her mind ebbing with genuine amusement. +You managed to smuggle yourself into my mind. Quite the skilled Necro, aren’t we.+
Avo froze. His blood stilled. Her awareness remained at zero in her cog-feed, so how–
“It’s a good trick,” Zein said, this time in the real, her expression as if suddenly realizing something. “Both yours and mine. You play perception from angles, but I wield it by using the question: when? Still, I commend your skill. It takes quite the Necrojack to slip past my focus.” She nodded. “I think Walton would quite be proud of you, Avo.”

Suddenly, Avo felt something slip free from his mind. Incredulous, he turned to realize that not only had she used her influence over time to… notice his intrusion somehow, but her Specter was also hovering above, its perception beaming over his shoulder.

Suddenly, her hand was on his shoulder. She moved. When did she move? He didn’t even notice—didn’t even feel it.
“Don’t be bothered,” she said, shaking him, “you’re quite good. I simply stole the technique from you. By gazing back into the past. The pace of our minds however… ah, a trifling thing. You show great promise.”

“Promise?” Avo said, setbacks sending him into a stupor.
“Quite so,” Zein said. Then she was back where she stood. She didn’t walk. She didn’t move. She just was.
“Master,” he heard his Woundshaper whisper. “I think… I think she is skipping across time. Jumping forward.”
Avo sighed. Of course, that was a Heaven someone had. Time. A Heaven of Time with a canon of… skimming?


“Come,” she said, rolling her shoulders, “I wish to see what else you are capable of. But before that…”

She snapped her finger and suddenly, a large cylindrical mechanism appeared next to him. It was an ugly industrial orange piston, looking far too rusted for use. Groaning, it began to topple.
“For the Rend,” Zein said.
Avo understood. Expanding a sphere of stasis, the winds caught the falling block and the weight hinged itself along the bubble’s surface, draining his Rend.
REND CAPACITY: 97%
“Now, what–” Avo’s words died in his throat. Geometry around Zein shivered. He felt the blows like a series of bombs going off against his fungal-ceramite plating, her palm blurring into countless thrusts, resounding thunderclaps shivering his very blood.
Yet, no pain followed the impact. No wounds. Only a faint ringing, and a tingling numbness.
Avo tried to move his arms, tried to claw at Zein. Only… his arms didn’t answer him. He stayed upright through the strength of his Echoheads alone.
His Echoheads.
He swept one down at her–a predictable attack meant to provoke action. She vanished. His Echohead halted and chittered, filling the world around him with static waves. She rematerialized by his side, already in motion to deliver another blow. She found herself greeted by the snapping extensions of another of his tails.
In his tactile sense, he felt her halt as the blow struck her dead out. The air crackled. She shuddered. Avo growled, wheezing with nerve-deaded laughter as Zein toppled.
And turned.
An impossible force seized him by the speartip of his Echohead and tore him high. It was only by merit of his other tails rooting deeper into the ground that he wasn’t sent tumbling into the air, but merely off balance.
Off balancing into another rising palm.
This time, the impact plumed in a shockwave out from his back. Air emptied itself from Avo as he felt both his kidneys melt into nothingness. Spots formed in his vision. Above, he heard the rainfall stop momentarily.
Then, the ground rushed up to hit him, his Echoheads now twitching uselessly as well.
“The In-Seers of Sanctus called this technique ‘Ringing the Spirit,” Zein explained. Avo made noise comparable to a constipated nu-dog. “Not quite so effective on a ghoul considering the biological redundancies you possess. The… tentacles are a nice touch. Two-structure biology. It is always good to be prepared.”

It was a special kind of miserable to be praised and lectured while one was pawing at handfuls of dirt and metal.
“Do you have Walton’s Helix?” Zein asked. “I wanted to ask earlier but I decided to hit you first instead.”

Avo coughed a vague affirmation.
“Splendid. He wanted you to have it. He was always very proud of you–spoke highly of you. I think I see why…” Her voice trailed off. With a nudge, she rolled him over on his side and had him look up at her.
As shards of tungsten fell forth from the sky, Zein nodded down at him, fingers tapping her blade contemplatively. “Yes.”

“Ye-yes?” Avo asked.
“I think I will take you as my apprentice. Should you accept, of course. You will be the first in many–eh–days. You should feel proud.”
“Feels like… my insides are shaking.”


Zein frowned faux seriously. “What an odd sensation of pride you feel, young one. Come. Up. Up. Your foresight deals you justice. Your striking however… can be improved! Stand quickly. I wish to show you something.”

Mind spinning from the constant left turns the old woman foisted on him, Avo worked to get his Echoheads under control first. “Is it another beating?”

“Of course not,” Zein said, lying badly, grinning broadly.
“The Sanctus ‘Fisher that Wasn’t’ is an Ontologic best suited for Sixth Sphere Liminal Frames or above. A modern Heaven inspired by ‘The Kingfisher Upon the Recursive Pond’ from Sanctian myths, the Fisher that Wasn’t is suited for Godclads intending to serve primarily as Seers for their Cadre.
Considering the flexibility of its options, however, it can also be used as a Porter/Breaker supplement.
Described as ‘a being shaped between a pellucid tadpole and a fishing hook fused from streams of time, it contains the budding essence of constantly changing tides representing the future,’ grafting the Fisher that Wasn’t requires a mind that rejects structure in most forms and views linearity as more suggestion than law.
As such, Godclads are recommended to apply phantasmics or nueromods that exaggerate focus-pattern attention-deviating conditions with extensive Necrojack support to alleviate any lingering sanity damage.”
-The Fisher that Wasn’t, Elder Mythos VOLUME I
8-17
Memories of the Future
As it turned out, Zein wasn’t lying: She did not give Avo another beating, but several other beatings.
New concepts and techniques became known to him. Known in the way one would come to learn a straight or a hook from getting repeatedly punched in the face. Yet, through it all he could not claim that Zein meant him any malice.

Rather, a single emotion dawned within her and it was glee, deep and genuine.
From all the legends and whispered rumors of the Thousandhand, he expected someone akin to Draus; a killer in presence and demeanor. Zein, though, was a child in a playground, her playfulness ageless.
Though not the same could be said for her brutality.
“...And that was called a kimura, though most practitioners tend to do it on a temporally progressive basis.” Zein snorted. “Neophytes. Why waste time performing an action that you have already completed in a theoretical future, I say. Best to just enjoy the fruits of my labor, so that I might move on to the next thing. Wouldn’t you agree?”

Avo didn’t answer immediately, too preoccupied with his arm and the incorrect angle it pointed toward. His elbow jutted toward Zein, shoulder radiating with aching pain. The hurt he felt was more akin to a tear than a break, with his new mycelia bio-architecture sustaining the most harm beyond a few cracks in his Bone Demon carapace.
So far, each of his limbs had suffered a dislocation or break, followed by instruction on her part as to how to reset the limb, or the angle at which to best rip it off for use as a blunt weapon.
“Zein,” Avo said, using the mouths of two Echoheads to stabilize the limb while a third snapped it back in place, “the… ‘training’ why?”

Her eyes went wide, confused. “To improve your capabilities of course. And because it amuses me.” Probably more the latter than the former. “Ah, and procrastination. Here I am, playing with my new ghoul consang, delaying my return to the scheming, the hiding, the plotting… You will learn that age does not fix such a habit. But don't blame me. I enjoy violence. You enjoy violence–”

“When it's happening to other people,” Avo muttered.

“--Masochism is an acquired taste. You already have the sadism by nature, I’m certain you can develop another virtue.”

Avo cocked his head at her in disbelief. “Virtue?”

She nodded vigorously. “I strongly recommend you develop a deep enjoyment from getting hurt. As Godclads, pain is… like water to a duck. So is death, but that’s more like a wave–as long you dive a bit and keep your Rend low, you’ll be fine.”

He just stared.
His Woundshaper shivered. “Master… her Heaven has stripped her of sense and decency. Time flows softly around her… we must flee.”

“Stop,” Zein said, holding out a hand, “I foresee your questions: Why did I not kill you? Why did I not interrogate you further about your nature? About Walton. About the Low Masters and that ridiculous existential tumor they serve...”

“Wondered about some of those,” Avo said. “Got distracted by you twisting my limbs.”

She beamed. “Ah. You see, that’s the interesting thing: we had these conversations already, and each was rather boring so I don’t want to repeat them. Or have them, if we’re looking at this from a stable continuum perspective.” Her expression flattened into reconsideration. “Well. Not us, perhaps, but the ontological conceptions of us within my Heaven using all parameters known to me or my Frame… oh, better that I just show you.”

The contours of Zein’s Heaven did not reveal itself immediately. Not a terror rising from the depths as with Mirrorhead. Not a primordial steed striding within the flow of wind, nor tower of blood burrowing roots deep to suckle the inheritance of matter. No. Hers was an almost imperceptible line at first, seeing it like catching a reflection within a lake. A lake that was always shaking, drifting, changing.
Its tail ran down in edges, forming the limpid margin of her blade. Outward rose something between a dollop and a fishhook, the shifting rivers of time widening from the tip of her sword into a vastness of light, each ray playing a potential moment–reels of futures churning within her Heaven, a grand pond the size of a small city block parted into a hundred and eight different scenes.
THE FISHER THAT WASN’T, DIVER OF FUTURES PAST
By her will, it collapsed in a falling cascade, each moment shuffling together like a deck of cards to crash down on both of them. New un-memories combusted in Avo’s mind, these murky dreams of variant futures slotting alternates of him back into himself.
In more than one, she killed him, her blade lashing out a full minute into the future while the strike was delivered five minutes from the past. In this sense, death came to him sudden and absolute, like the hand of fate itself had struck his name from the list of life and marked him for the Big Nothing.
The world dissolved in these memories, his cog-feed fracturing into component parts as his mind sank into a fragmented abyss, the stygian nature of a Godclad’s Soul-frayed demise a thing no one could comprehend while still being alive.
Shaken by the touch of death, he was unprepared for the sudden injection of knowledge to come. Conversations came back to him then, of each inquiry. There was a reason why she didn’t ask him any questions, choosing combat instead, and that was because versions of them had already spoken.
She did not kill him because she did not wish to risk damaging the Helix, nor did she wish to expend a Necro of his caliber if he could be turned to her cause instead; more perplexingly, she stated in such a timeline she had no interest possessing his Frame, but only the functions of it.
In the chaos of the premonition, he saw Zein smiling. “Be you a blade I wield or a blade wielded by another, so long as we strike the same shadow the cut is just.”


Other questions collapsed into answers within his mind, one after another. She discovered his nature as a ghoul by using different timelines to probe him conversationally. In more than a few she provoked him toward silence and learned nothing. In fewer moments still, she managed to establish something of a rapport with him–paths that she currently followed.
For Walton and the Low Masters, she had little to give. She knew of Walton as a character of untrustworthy utility, but saw him more ally than the other variants of his ego. The Hungers, on the other hand, she yearned to excise from existence, using her blade unseen to conduct surgery, understanding them to be a tumor in the face of time and reality.
As her sword faded from sight again, Avo felt all his future variants spill out from his body. He let out a ragged gasp, not remembering when he began holding his breath. “Which of those… was the future?”

“The Heaven dips into variant streams of simulated possibilities,” Zein explained. “There is no ‘the,’ my child.” She tutted. “You worry me with these capitulations before baseline reality. You’re a Godclad. Think of things as… suggestions. The only absolutes here are us. And even then, that’s only between us and ourselves.”
“So,” Avo said, “you know everything I’m going to do. Say.”

“A close enough approximation, but the totality of reality is always hard to gather with a small cup such as mine,” she said. “It is the missing knowledge and far unseen variables that are most dangerous for one such as me. I have seen my own death more times than I can count. See wounds I will take along the expanse of time cast out by my Heaven. But beyond that–and there is always a beyond…”
She brushed her thumb across her sword. “The unfortunate fact seems to be that… I know more about what you have and what you seek than you do. Walton… I do not believe he truly prepared you for this, did he?”

A beat passed. The more she spoke, the warier he was of engaging her in conversation. “My father. Wasn’t who I thought he was.”

To that, he felt her thoughtstuff turn to sympathy. “Few of our parents are. Or our children for that matter. But he cared for you. This I know. Spoke of you as a thing of promise, he did.”

A snap shuddered through Avo’s right arm. His blood began to nibble at the damage, rethreading his sinews and funneling shape into his outer plating. “You worked with him?”

Zein’s face twisted as she cocked her head, considering his words. “No. We were definitely conspiring against each other. I attempted to have him killed at several points, in fact.” She barked a laugh, as she was recounting a moment of amusement. “He was wily. Like you, but much calmer. His mind was like… a still pond. His nature was one of radical acceptance. You… you’re a monster holding your own leash; piloting your own cage. There is a method of control you inherited from him, but only after your intrusion of my mind did I conceptualize you as his son.”

“He was a Low Master.”

“He was a spy sent to our world, meant to sow discord amongst the Guilders, yes.” She shook her head. “As if we needed his aid. But I can’t say his methods were not effective. Weakening Highflame defenses so Ori-Thaum could see the success they did in the last war. Ensuring the encirclement and massacre of so many Regulars only of Fists commanded by the Chivalrics… I’d commend your father for doing more institutional damage to Highflame than most other Guilds could in over a century.”

A sudden void expanded inside Avo. His father was, at least in part, responsible for Draus's self-exile. Another revelation, this one spreading in his mind like a fissure, a growing amount of damage connected to his masters, his “family.”
Moreover, he knew her revelations came with purpose now. Was she trying to leverage him further away from his father? Spur guilt or responsibility in him toward Draus?


“Do you know what your Helix does?” Zein asked. She was suddenly facing away from him now, perusing an inventory of weapons growing from a nearby column. She picked out a pistol. A tension built inside Avo.
“No,” Avo said. “Think it… did something to my blood?”

“It unchained you from your fixed nature,” Zein scoffed, the scorn in her voice loud. “I believe it is a mark given to rare few Nolothics. The cowards. They cling to the present as if eternity is a single point to be guarded. A fortress sinking beneath the rushing stream of the tides. Fools. All fortresses fall. All break. But breaking is not dying. Breaking is expression. Breaking is truth. From ruins rise resurrected revelations.”

She found him looking on at her, not understanding her.
“The Helix is like a key. It allows access to certain constructs of time and space leftover in the city. Walton intended to leave you a sanctuary to reside in during these trying times. Oh! And you should be able to direct and pilot your kindred now. The Helix marks you as one of their masters. Congratulations on your promotion. Now, let’s look at your newly fixed Soul.”
“Wha–”
REND CAPACITY: 0%
ONTOLOGY STABILIZED
SOUL REPAIRED
CANONS RESTORED
And suddenly, the wind was rushing through a clean wound coring from his jaw and tunneling out the back of his skull.
A thin rod of tissue ejected out the back of the gun, clumps of his ceramics, fibers, and brain matter splattering down amidst the glinting buds of alloy pushing out from the ground.
Zein appeared, standing just beside him, the cold barrel of her pistol a memory sliding into place as an event happening ahead of time. It did not fire as a mag-flung weapon would, nor did it bark with a chemical pop like a slugthrower. Instead, he felt a thin strip of space twist in reality.
Avo tumbled over soon after, the world spinning as he collapsed upon his spatially scalped viscera.
INITIALIZING RESURRECTION - 1%
Falling from Zein’s garden armory into the sanctuary of his Frame, Avo sank before a new subreality. His Soul shone bright, its shine encompassing, rippling field exerting an even greater pressure inward, drawing all things beyond its boundary for an embrace like an ontological singularity.

Contrarily, the other Soul once fueling Burner’s Way resembled something between a dim spark and a fissuring scar. It crackled much like an ember did; without thaums nothing burned, and in the absence of the flame Avo found himself gazing into the eldritch chasm of a mutilated Soul.

Something was still there, inside its fathomless depths, something and what felt like everything. Primordial patterns bled out from its crevices like a nebula leaking over into the void. Were the Heavens just channels? A specific instrument shaped to help a Soul unleash its power? Or perhaps they were different keys, make to allow access to partial aspects of reality, giving its user total command.
Confining the Soul in a concentric cage, a dragon ate itself, its scales dim and its vigil perpetual, the only thing of motion in a dead galaxy. Further still, a dark shroud resembling a curving weave of brambles rising to form something between an insect and a deer bearing a v-shaped skull greeted him, the heaven not attached to his current Soul yet.
“Ah. It has been a while since I have seen a Soul so drained.”


Avo felt himself shiver. Zein’s voice pierced through the quiet of his inner sanctuary. She came as Kae did, but instead of mounting herself on a pedestal of tears, she skimmed along, propelled by crystalline light sparkling from the hilt of her blade.
“No… no!” The Woundshaper cried. The pure terror in its voice was near-human, its desire to avoid Zein all-encompassing.
“Your hilt? It’s a False Heaven?” Avo asked.


Her expression turned melancholic. “A gift from someone. I liked breaking gods. He liked rebuilding them toward purpose. In time, I came to enjoy watching him.”

“Jaus?”


She brushed past his question and turned her attention on Woundshaper.
The Heaven of Blood gushed over behind the Galeslither in a splashing tide.
“Keep her away from me, master,” the Woundshaper said, huddling behind his currently grafted Heaven. “Get thee away from me, partling crone! This is not your Soul.”
Zein, for her part, cared little for the Woundshaper, shaking her head. “Why if it isn’t a fragment of Mother Sathwu. Severing your fragments was quite the chore after the Fall if such means any compliment to you, old one.”

“It does not! Be-gone! Send her away, master! She cannot be here!”
Zein smiled and turned her attention to his new dormant Soul instead. “You got this from Burner’s Way, correct?”
Avo grunted. “You already know.”
“No,” Zein replied. “Not here. Here, I am a guest. My Heaven does not reach in. This is solely your reality. The Sangeist; the Galeslither, you took both of them from golems?”
“Yes.”


She pouted with all the strength of an old woman that got to enjoy herself too late. “You get all the good things. It’s hardly fair.”


Avo glared at her using his partially decapitated Galeslither. “Woke up in the Maw. On a corpse barge. Got sold to a Crucible. Got an unwilling Syndicate job for a few days.”

“Bah. Practically a vacation. You will look back on this time and… well, if you think very hard and manifest your delusions into truth, you’ll find something about it that amuses you.”


He considered her words for a moment. “Did get to eat some eyes.”


“See. Remember: You are a Godclad. Conceptualization means more than truth. Now, let us see–my word, your Soul is pulling on me like a wormhole. Quite literally, in fact, the feeling is uncanny. It's just like fighting next to an event horizon in the void.”

Avo was taken aback. “You fought in the void?”


She nodded, blade glinting. “Godhunt. A stray entity wandered too close and I had to make a victim of it. Worry not, if you do well, get lucky, and survive long enough, you too will break your share of wandering gods in the dark.”


“She is plague…” the Woundshaper hissed.
“You know…” Zein said, gesturing to his other Soul. “… This should be impossible. The Agnosi claim a Soul is meant to be bound to a single ego. And yet, here you have one sharing room with another without them being conjoined or bridged somehow. How… trailblazing. I like it. Have you tried to pour some of your ego into it? Try to run both at once.”


“No,” Avo replied, not sure if he liked where she was going with this.
“Do it,” she said, grinning. “What’s the worst thing that can happen.”
“My nous tears in half and I permanently die?” Avo said, remembering Kae’s words.
She hummed, as if recalling that detail herself as well. “Oh. Well, that would leave your Frames to me so… a pitiable loss, but not unrecoverable. Why don’t we see if you can activate it somehow? Just… don’t connect to it is all. Feed it some thaums?”
“A plague,” the Woundshaper cried.
The subject's entire concept of self has been… split. In two.

No. They aren't dead, I think death might be preferable at this point though. We can still hear him screaming. His mind's in two places, but it's not an even split.

Alright. Yeah. We'll shut it down. We'll have the next subject usurp them when he settles down. It didn't have any Ontologics attached so… yes. Yes, I know.

The Agnosi were right. We can't use it to create an omnipresent ego.

-Highflame Research Cell, Project Dichotomy


8-18
The Second Cycle (I)

Avo’s new Soul was a cripple.

Not in the sense of being inherently broken, but from a comparative lack. Without a Meta-Fac, a self-managing system or seemingly any of the smart-admin functions running within his Stillborn Frame’s root, the Soul that once fueled the Fallen Heaven of Burner’s Way was a rather lacking construct in every regard.

Unwilling to commit to any transfer of consciousness or even risk such an outcome, Avo ejected the second Soul outside his current Frame’s liminal subreality before infusing it with a single thaum.

He wasn’t sure how that would look back in the garden, if a spark of eldritch fire would spill out from his corpse or whatnot, but as of the present, it merely seemed like a minor gulf of nothingness parted him from interlinking with the other Heaven.

THAUMIC OUTPUT - 970 THAUM/c

Ghosts: [412]

Almost immediately, a second presence pulsed into being just beyond the veil of his control. Curiously, Avo reached over to interface with the other Heaven.

It flashed and a new subreality came online.

LIMINAL FRAME DETECTED: “STORMTREE” SPIRE PATTERN

THAUMIC LIMIT: SPHERE III

CURRENT THAUMIC CLASS: SPHERE I

The Soul Frame's mem-data listed it as a Sphere Three thaumic construct bearing the designation of “Stormtree Spire Pattern.”

As Avo focused on its root, a bridge of light interfaced between Frames. He filtered through various root-function diagnostics to find that this new Soul was only rated for a single Heaven and Hell.

Apparently, judging from the way it only projected a flume of eldritch fire outward from the top and the bottom, the structure of the Frame was externally vectored and incapable of storing of other Heavens.

Slots for two ontologics at the most.

More than just being fixed, however, there was a deadness to it, with the flames being opaque compared to the rippling currents cast out by Avo’s Soul. It was as Kae stated: His Soul was special. The Spire pattern felt like a raw hunk of chrome–it had fixed functions, but it could not shift and adapt like nanosuites or smart-fog could; like Avo’s Stillborn Frame could.

“Ah, there’s the lightbulb,” Zein said, “I’m still curious to see if it would have seen this plane ruptured if you opened it up as a subreality in a subreality. Would it just seem similar to another pocket in space expanding in this space. When you've been around as long as I have, seeing something new… Perhaps it might rupture your Frame and kill you, but it’s just so tempting.”

The fluxing flares of Avo’s spectral fires twisted toward Zein, like phosphorus bleeding from the Galeslither he was currently grafted to. It was the the best approximation his Soul could muster in place of an actual glare. “Might’ve killed you too.”

Zein gave a blase shrug. “Wouldn’t that be a novel experience for the both of us? Truth be told, pitiable as these gods are, I expect nothing from them. They could not best me at the height of their might, they will not impress me now.”

Tides of rage shifted in lapping tendrils along the shell of the Woundshaper. “You are a wretched, deceitful…”

Thousandhand turned her attention from the reborn Soul to the diminished blood god. Woundshaper clutched tighter to the Galeslither.

“Look away from me partling! Your gaze is debasing.”

“I gaze,” Zein said, “on a god I remember most fondly. What I said really was a sign of respect.” She sighed. “Truthfully, out of all the gods I’ve shattered, I always found you to be… quite human.

Spikes erupted from the back of the Woundshaper as the Heaven snarled. The act reminded Avo of the arched back of a hissing nu-cat. “Pester me no more. Prod no longer at my wounds. Leave me to my shame in silence.” For the first time, Avo felt a sense of sullenness from his god, a genuine sadness at being broken by a mortal.

Even one such as Zein.

The other Godclad’s consciousness rang, preparing to speak once more, but Avo interrupted her. “Zein. Enough. You have recommendations for this Heaven? The build?”

The words he offered were bait. Distractions so she wouldn’t agitate his Heaven further. He needed her talking still–to say he trusted her was an outright lie, but she seemed… willing to help, if in a twisted sense.

The memories of the un-futures were still ringing in his mind, resounding like a collage of moments, each feeling like they happened concurrently mere moments ago.

“You are on approach to gaining the ontological mass to be regarded as Fourth Sphere,” Zein said. “Commendable, considering the short time you had your Frame, but insufficient for the tasks we face, little dagger.”

“Little dagger?”

“A saying,” Zein explained. “A term of endearment for a disciple of the ugly art.”

Must be an old Ori thing. “Do I need to call you something? Old-sword? Long-spear? The pointed one.”

“Refer to me however you wish. The purpose of our companionship is for me to see you become the wonderful slaughterhouse you have the potential to be. It is the skill, the power to overcome another that gives these titles weight, no?”

He considered her words. “What if the power goes unrecognized? What if your foe chooses to deny you?”

“Deny what?” Zein Thousandhand said. “Pleasure? Ego-food? Respect?” She threw her head back and laughed. “If such a thing is what you yearn from, then may I suggest a joy habit? No amount of practice or prowess will compare to such a high.”

“Telling me to seek self-satisfaction instead?”

“I am telling you that mastery is meaning in of itself,” Zein said. “But I don’t need to tell you this. Look at what you were able to do with Necrotheurgy. It began as an attempt to impress your father or to have a deeper means of control, perhaps, but with repetition, you are bound to its pattern, your nature intertwined to your ability. Now, if I severed all your capabilities for such a skill, would you be lame? I would have castrated you. It would be a wound. Because more than pleasure, more than satisfaction, it is a part of you. Ontology, in a word.”

The fullness of her philosophy eluded him, but he felt pulled by the wake it left regardless. There was a magnetism to her enthusiasm; she loved all that she did, and time seemed to have siphoned more bitterness from her than it left.

Frankly, it was hard to tell if she was mad or wise.

“We should focus on remolding you into the shape of the Godclad you yearn to be. A true apex predator. Yes. It fits. I like it; it will be amusing seeing you eat the others.” She chuckled imagining his cannibalism. “You must view the Heavens to the same extent you view your phantasmics–your Metamind. It is a part of you. Things you can attach and remove, perhaps, but it is a part of you. Why, I wept for hours upon grafting a new Heaven in place of one old–the experience so traumatic for me that I didn’t feel good until I managed to end a million lives in a day with the one I replaced it with.”

“Do you see!” The Woundshaper hissed. “Do you see! The ephemerals accuse us of gluttony, but what can be more savage than this? A million! Think of all the miracles we would be capable if we could kill–” It paused. “Master, ask her how she managed to kill a million people. We need this dark knowledge.”

Ignoring the capriciousness of his Heaven, Avo found his attention drawn to Zein looking back over the Soul. “Siphon the thaum out for now. Turn the Soul off and take it back inside you.” Her attention twisted over to the new Heaven orbiting him, its form still shrouded in the dark. “Its cycler will be more useful attached to your current Frame than being stuck within a fire you currently aren’t mantling.”

Heeding her advice, Avo withdrew his thaum and the Soul flickered as the subreality collapsed. Reaching out with his light and hooking it with his oscillating flares, he pulled it back within his borders and issued commands to see it dismantled.

The Spire-pattern submitted to his pull without a struggle, its coming faster and more fluid than most Heavens. Probably an issue resulting from its comparative lack of mass.

Pulling it back into his infrastructure, its component pieces greeted him as his Soul roared. His radiant ripples twisted fluid limbs, prying the pieces free with relative ease. The thauma-haptic sensation of cupping the component parts of another Frame was uncanny–something he guessed typically took countless lives and entire teams of Agnosi.

DECONSTRUCTION COMPLETE

THAUMIC CYCLER: [1]

BOUNDARY ROOT-CONFIGURATION TEMPLATE DOWNLOADED

SOUL: [1]

THAUMIC OUTPUT - 971 THAUM/c

A few other strings of mem-data played through his mind, but he understood little of what they entailed, the information too thickly embedded with thaumaturgic jargon and equations he couldn’t read. “Zein you know how to read… thaumic?”

She nodded. “No. Not at all. It’s very boring.”

He now desperately wanted a set of eyes so he could better glare at her.

“Enough tarrying,” Zein said. “You can poke at the rest later. Right now, you need to get that cycler grafted. A second chance to evade true death via Rend. Very important if you want to face a true Godclad.”

“How many do you have,” Avo asked, probing casually.

Zein’s eyes turned to crescents. “That depends: Would you like to hear my believable lie? Or my exaggerated lie?”

Avo grunted. “Exaggerated.”

“Three hundred.”

“Why not three million.”

“Because dragons are very expensive, little dagger, and the No-Dragons remain bitter sows to this day about the little matter of all their menfolk being dead. Now, graft! Graft! I tire of looking upon your single cycler. It’s making me mad. Furious even.”

At her urging, Avo sent the command and the waves of his Soul washed inward like an astral tide collapsing upon the shores of a star. The cycler, then, served as a ringworld to this metaphor, this dragon black and bare of Essence within its scales, but resembling his presently active one in every way.

Angling away from the other cycler, it attached to him without issue as an integration sequence booted in his mind. He kept check of his resurrection in the meantime, the progress operating at minimum spin.

RESURRECTION - 31%

The new cycler latched with an echoing shudder. His Soul flickered as the thaums found a new channel to integrate with.

NEW CYCLER DETECTED

ACTIVE ONTOLOGIC SLOTS: 2/4

Before he could spend any time examining his root data, Zein darted through his mind, her path leaving a cleaved line oozing sparkles within his liminality. “Now, let’s see what we can make with that new Heaven of yours.”

She spoke of the four Domain Heaven he claimed from Burner’s Way. It was repaired after he managed to subsume the Soul it was bound to and stabilize the rupture. Once fallen, now this construct greeted him as a varnished thing, blackened and unclear as if it wasn’t manifesting right.

All he could get from it was a vagueness; it offered him the generalities of its contours but nothing else.

“Why is it dark?” Zein asked.

Avo let the silence speak for his ignorance.
“Give me one second,” Zein said. With a sweeping slash, she left his Soul momentarily. And immediately came back. “Have it deconstructed by your light. However it works. The Domains are all that matters.”

“Did you leave to look into the future?” Avo asked.

Zein smirked. “Did I? Let an old woman have a few tricks. Wouldn’t want you eating me prematurely.”

“Had to try.”

“And I commend the effort. Burn its Domain of Space and Matter after you fuse it with your Heaven of Blood. And only after you fuse it.” Zein emphasized those words. “They won’t be joined properly otherwise. I’ve seen it happen before. Very ugly. Constant paradox. Missing Domain-crossover causes paradox. A forcible fuse usually results in instant thaumic backlash. Taking out the Domains afterward–should be possible; perhaps; maybe; I don’t know; let’s see–should probably not cause you to collapse your Heaven and die.”

“Should probably not?”

“You emerged fine in some timelines.” Zein grinned.

“How many.”

“Three.”

“How many am I dead in?”

She held her head back and looked toward a missing sky. “Negativity is not a thing that should concern the likes of us.”

Avo frowned at the darkness. “And how do you know all this.”

“A few hundred guesses.”

So. He died in a lot of futures even as a Godclad. Good to know.

“Anyway, jam this Fallen Heaven together with your Woundshaper first. Do it. It will be worth it.”

The Woundshaper quavered. “No, master! Do not listen to her. At least wait for the Oracle to return! The little one with the glass eye. She is kind and gentle.” A tendril of blood jutted rudely at Zein, who merely folded her arms and grinned. “This one is mad and decrepit.”

Avo hesitated.

“Come now, little dagger,” Zein said. “If I meant you ill, I could see you dead–does my mercy not speak for itself? And besides, your Frame would look so poorly on me. It's just too… hungry. I think it suits you.”

“What’s wrong with matter and space?” Avo asked.

“Well,” Zein said, “the canon of the second is conflicting with a hubris from the first, I think. You tend to expand volumetrically when you get pulled apart geometrically.” A strangely pleased look spilled across her face. “I also die in one of those futures. Real death. It ends up collapsing my garden and causing a limited spatial collapse. It keeps growing and kills ninety percent of this district before the Sovereignty finally notices and soaks the Rend.”

He wasn’t sure what to say to that.

“Sathwu,” Zein said, her voice sweet, “you asked how I killed a million people, yes?”

The Heaven of Blood suddenly peeked out, all acrimony was forgotten “Yes?”

“Would you like to kill a million people? Feast on a million echoes of humanity and belief?”

“Yes!”

The uneven nature of the god never ceased to astound Avo.

Zein seemed to understand his sentiments. “Ah. Don’t blame them. They are beings formed by a gestalt. They cannot decide how they are shaped, how they act. For all their power and influence over reality, they do not possess the fuel that needs to see these miracles made manifest.”

“Essence,” Avo said.

“The choice to believe,” Zein added. “Some called it free will. Others think of it as determination unto itself. Conceptual propulsion.”

Avo considered his Heaven again. “The fusion. It won’t break my ontology?”

“Not unless you graft it onto your Soul and start feeding it thaums,” Zein said. “You should be able to undo whatever it is you did thanks to your Frame’s self-administering nature. Oh, and I just want you to know that I am immensely jealous of that function most of all. Thousands need to die when I want to change a canon. It’s very inconvenient.”

Nested with the Galeslither, the steed neighed a trinary chorus of thunder as acknowledgment. “Woundshaper. Won’t break you. You accept these changes?”
"What the fuck is she doing? She's supposed to take the Frame! She's not suppose to… to play with it? Whatever the Hell that thing is. That doesn't look like a godsdamned Hunger to me."

"I think it's a bioform."

"A bioform with a Liminal Frame? Come the fuck on, Valerie. That's like giving a nu-dog the mem-keys to a golem."

"Voidwatch has its uplifts."

"Yeah. Uplifts. No bioforms. One's a sophont; the other's got enough ghosts haunting their mind that they have to listen when you cast at them or they have a mental breakdown. Besides, no voiders going to be putting thaum-shit into themselves. They can barely stay zero with all the grounders doing it."

-Cas eld'Canduir to Valerie Denton, Ninth Column


8-19
The Second Cycle (II)


Both Zein and the Heaven froze, caught off guard by his request for permission.

“I… apologize. I am unused to such courtesy.”

He grunted. “Will make you more potent. Me, more potent.”

Zein looked between them and inched closer. “You know, the old god has no choice in this matter.” She suddenly frowned, realizing something. “Wait. She has been talking this entire time. How is that possible. I broke her.”

Avo turned his attention to Zein. “Just noticed?”

“I was distracted. By other things. Like the future and your Soul and… ah…” She threw up her hands. “Bah. What’s a talking god, I’ve seen it before. But… but it doesn’t have control over you or…”

“No.”

“Then why not just change it?”

A hint of annoyance entered Avo’s tone. “Not my flavor. Not a Low Master. Want it to choose.”

The elder Godclad stared at him for a moment before she nodded. “Ah. Don't we all dedicate ourselves to strange obsessions.”

In this, she reminded him a bit of Walton. For one who enjoyed combat so much, there was little actual harshness from her in things unrelated to direct violence. She was well-natured. Too well-natured. The discord she presented twisted at him.

“Build me,” the Woundshaper spoke with a sigh. “For the million deaths we will come to taste. Build me.”

Zein held up a victorious fist. Avo gave a single command.

The flames did the rest.

The burn did not come as a forge would melt an ingot this time, not like when it was inverting a Heaven down to a Hell. Instead, Avo found himself watching as his resplendence broke into flaming needles, threading at both the Woundshaper and the shrouded Heaven, binding them with searing bridges that drew them closer with each rippling flicker.

Before the shine of his Soul, the Woundshaper changed again, the unknown Heaven melting into the threads–now seeming more like veins–into the Heaven of Blood.

Before his eyes, the Woundshaper evolved, its ontology mutating.

No noise of pain or agony came from the former god, but he could feel its shock as it rose, expanded in both mass and shape.

From the tower's back burst insect-like wings grown from the armored spine of the Woundshaper. Veins expanded and spilled through his Heaven like bleeding briar patches, while the alchemized patterns of tungsten and matter within the tower-top jaws of the Woundshaper sprouted shimmering horns of upward raining particulates; the shape of the luminosity befitted a deer or a moose.

Then, the first of the paradoxes appeared. Space fractured in three parts around the Heaven, causing it to part into three fractals.

“This… displeases me,” his Woundshaper said, voice thick with confusion, watching as its midsection folded over its spire.

Zein sighed, lament written clear on her face. “Bah. The Domain of Space is absolutely ruined. A shame. A spatially separated entity is an amusing blade to wield: Have you ever cut someone in three places with a single strike cut three hours ahead of time?”

The thought of performing such an act appealed to Avo, if for naught but novelty.

“Pain?” Avo asked the Woundshaper. He was connected to its being, but the way it suffered might be different than what he understood. He wanted to hear its words. Comprehend its hurt from a god’s perspective.
“Fragmentary. And also… slick.”

As its changes stabilized, Avo waited for a beat to see if Woundshaper would see any other alterations. None came.

RESURRECTION - 64%

HEAVEN - [WOUNDSHAPER]

DOMAIN: (BLOOD/MATTER)

THAUMIC REQUIREMENTS - 781 THAUM/c

Other than a few reverberations sloshing through its blood, the Heaven seemed mostly stable. It had more than doubled in mass and size. Parts of it continued to jump and fracture twisting fractals in space. Studying the canon, Avo immediately noticed the problem.

DOMAIN OF SPACE

CANON: ORAVIN’S UMBRELLA - ALL GASEOUS AND LIQUID MATTER CAN BE PULLED UPWARD INTO AN UNSEEN PLANE OF SPACE; MASS LIMIT: 100 TONS

HUBRIS: NO PHYSICAL MATTER MAY BE STORED IN EACH PLANE

Zein tilted her head at that. “Hm. Well, there’s a contradiction.”

“Was constantly pulling hydrapedes into demiplanes,” Avo said. “Ever seen something like this?”

“A few times,” Zein said. “Thaumic sabotage, I believe. Deliberate sacrifices meant to taint a Heaven. Usually impossible without an Agnos’ aid.”

“Or someone like you,” Avo asked.

She didn’t deny it. “You will soon come to find that breaking things is far easier than mending them. And more fun. This Domain is clearly not designed for combat, and therefore useless. Do away with it.”

“Yes,” the Woundshaper said, grunting as its base was suddenly sliding over where its tip was, “remove this. The sensations are growing most displeasing.”

Upon ordering the inversion of the Domain, the waves of his Soul sliced into his Heaven and this time, the Woundshaper did shudder. It sounded like a gasp, the sound someone makes when a limb is lost or the air pulled from their lungs. Clutched by a fistful of light, broken fractals of space formed a shape of an umbrella as it was drawn into his Soul’s embrace.

The mem-data updated.

HEAVEN - [WOUNDSHAPER]

DOMAIN: (BLOOD/MATTER/LUMINOSITY/BIOLOGY)

THAUMIC REQUIREMENTS - 672 THAUM/c

“A good leaning,” Zein said. “Look at the other canons. What are these canons?” She made a disgusted noise. “This isn’t shaped to benefit violence at all! What’s the point.”

“Think it was for something ecological,” Avo said. “Was connected to a hydroponic chamber. Had gardens.”

Zein scoffed. “Did these gardens grow weapons?”

“Don’t think so.”

“Then I despise these gardens,” Zein declared. “Foul. Invert this Heaven too. Better used as a supplement to your Hell than this.” She shook her head. “My beloved was a fool, do you know that?”

Avo didn’t.

“He had a yearning. A dream. To see all uplifted under a common Heaven.” Zein sighed. “The fool. The absolute, gold-hearted fool. He even wanted to restore the gods afterward. With new safeguards, of course.”

“Restore?” The question came from Avo and the Woundshaper both, their surprise bringing them to a synchronous union.

“Indeed,” Zein said. “For despite the Godsfall, he always viewed them more as… misguided administrators than tyrants to destroy. I suppose he was right, if we regard them ontologically.”

Her knowledge came as accountings of the past. “Whatever the Guilds claim the gods to be, the Agnosi, know they are all wrong. Only Voidwatch holds the true key to the past, and yet they hide much from us. I think they are afraid we might finish what came before.”

“Finish what?” Avo asked.

Zein looked upon his Heaven and licked her lips. “The apocalypse. The rebirth of all reality.” She shook her head. “Now, I need to fix the matter of his demise. My half-strand of a husband will pay for making me suffer his death. Him, and Vey-vey. I will see our family flourish again. And then–” She held up her fist. “The true liberation of humanity.”

Avo wanted to ask who Vey-vey was, but he recalled that Veylis Avandaer, the High Seraph of Highflame, might be the only contender for such a strange pet name.

A beat passed. Zein frowned at him. “Why aren’t you studying the other Domains? Hurry. I wish to see what else we might remove.”

“Seem to know a lot about my Frame,” Avo said. “Learning about it using your Heaven?”

“Yes. Also, I was the one who stole it. With Walton's help. Whereupon he stole it from me. I regret I didn’t get to decapitate your father. The corpse left by his last remaining fork was quite mutilated by the time I found him. Another slight delivered upon me by the Low Masters. This, too, must be avenged.”

Avo fought the urge to strangle Zein with his flames. “When were you going to tell me?”

She blinked. “I thought we–oh, no. I beheaded you in that timeline before your Rend was empty. Bah. It all gets so confusing.”

He tried. The fires flailed around her but couldn’t grasp her neck. Never had he felt so disappointed in his Frame.

DOMAIN OF MATTER

CANON: TEMPLATE - ALLOWS THE SAME OF A STRUCTURE TO BE REPLICATED FROM A STANDARD TEMPLATE OF MATTER

CANON: PING - ALL MATTER OF THE SAME SHAPE BECOMES KNOWN TO THE USER AT THAT PLANE OF EXISTENCE

HUBRIS: ONLY 10 INSTANCES OF A SINGLE TEMPLATE CAN BE MADE

“Think my Woundshaper can already do this,” Avo said. “Something similar. Just can’t match the–”

Zein waved a dismissive hand. “Feed this one to your hell. You’re too top-heavy as is. Considering its limited functions, this seems to be a canon solely dedicated to manufacturing. And not even that considering the weight limit. Bulk experimentation likely. Feed your Hell, little dagger.”

Again, his Soul committed surgery on itself, its visceral flames active as structure and scalpel both, severing the excess canons free. As the radiance winnowed the flowing patterns out from the Woundshaper, it licked it back into the depths of his Soul, into the threshold of the Galeslither as two new baseline Domain sigils formed in place.

HEAVEN - [WOUNDSHAPER]

DOMAIN: (BLOOD/MATTER/LUMINOSITY/BIOLOGY)

THAUMIC REQUIREMENTS - 450 THAUM/c

Avo did not study them yet. Instead, he focused on the last two Domains he procured. Staring upon the horns of light emerging from his Woundshaper, Avo found himself guessing its functionality as the semi-circle-shaped particulates drifted upward, strange balloons in flight. The insectoid limbs hatching from the back of the Woundshaper presented far less confusion.

DOMAIN OF LUMINOSITY

CANON: HARMONIZE (II) - THE MASTER OF THIS CANON CAN BIND THE ACTIONS OF SIMILIAR-STRUCTURE MATTER USING LIGHTWAVES; EACH PHYSICAL STRUCTURE BOUND INCREASES REND-EXPENDITURE; INCREASING DEVIATIONS BETWEEN STRUCTURES ALSO INCREASING REND-EXPENDITURE

HUBRIS: ONLY TEN STRUCTURES OF MATTER CAN BE HARMONIZED AT ONCE

DOMAIN OF BIOLOGY

CANON: HYDRAPEDES - CREATE HYDRAPEDES FROM PHYSICAL MATTER; THEY WILL REPLICATE IN CHAINS OF THEMSELVES AND LAST FOR AN HOUR BEFORE RETURNING TO THE MATTER THAT SPAWNED IT

CANON: HIVE (II) - ALL HYDRAPEDES WILL OBEY THE MENTAL COMMANDS OF THE MASTER; HYDRAPEDES MUST BE WITHIN COMMUNICATIVE DISTANCE

HUBRIS: SHOULD ANY OF THE HYDRAPEDES BE ATOMIZED, BACKLASH WILL OCCUR

Luminosity seemed useful. Biology, however…

“Keep them,” Zein said. “Find other Heavens with these Domains. You can nurture something useful from them.”

There was little lost in heeding her advice. Ultimately, he didn’t plan on using Biology much. Not until he experimented with it a bit more. A question, however, came to mind when judging the canons. “Zein. Question: Difference between Heaven of Biology or Heaven of Insects. Do you know?”

Zein’s face turned grave. She nodded. “Not really.”

“Why do you do that?” Avo asked.

“Nod and say no?”

“Yes.”

“Because the fancy strikes me,” Zein said. “To answer your question with my best guess… something mythology. But they are close enough that I’ve seen some others of our make attempt ‘makeshift’ fusions to create ‘pseudo-towers.’ The fact you have something designed ‘Biology’ rather than ‘Insects’ or ‘Locusts’ tells me that you have subsumed a Heaven with newer make.

Biology is a concept so broad that only after our uplifting by the voiders could we form enough basis to worship it. The primitives that we were, a Godsfall Heaven would have something narrow and elemental.”

Mythology, in a sense, appealed to Avo like memory, like how he saw himself in shape and design. Probably also how he returned clothed and healed after cycling out of death. The same thing might be at play with the Heavens. Except on a far larger historical or even chronological scale.

His attention pulled back to his new sigils, he frowned as he studied what he would do with them. The Woundshaper was going to need a major upgrade to his Hell. A thought came to him. A theory. With how he could grow his Heaven with new and more powerful canons, then why not could he do the same with his Hells; create miracles so overwhelming he would never run out of Rend again?

Bringing up build simulations of the Woundshaper’s Hell, Avo excitedly looked upon the First Circle of the Woundshaper.

And immediately found his plate filled with disappointment.

No matter how he commanded it, the potential builds displayed never seemed to expand more than a reflection matching the size and mass of his Heaven.

“Ah,” Zein said. “I see your intent. But it doesn’t work.”

“Why?” Avo asked.

“Something about not actually being a Heaven. Just counterbalance. Imagine the ramblings of an Agnosi here.” Zein promptly made a gibbering noise between a child being fed to a woodchipper and a nu-dog getting kneecapped.

“What a dreadful noise,” the Woundshaper said.

Feeding the Domain of Matter over into his Hell first, Avo considered his options. Though the Hell was the mirror the Heaven, new structures appeared that deviated from the design of the Woundshaper, offering new opportunities.

“Ease of venting should be your primary concern,” Zein said. “Or lethality. A Hell that can leave something to drain Rend away on its own or produce something unstable to serve as the problem of another is usually my favorite.”

Avo considered his options but found himself still leaning toward the raw destructive ability presented by his current canon. But he also found himself inspired by the efficiency of his Galeslither’s Second Circle. “Have a shroud right now. Eats through matter. All matter.

Zein’s left eyebrow shot up, cutting into the wrinkles of her forehead. “Like a… sword?”

“Ye–”

“Evolve that canon! There is no other choice!”

“Yes, master,” the Woundshaper agreed, betraying no sense of shame in its alignment with a butcher of gods, “it is a highly efficient tool for slaughter. This is most wise.”

Some, narrow spark of rationality found itself aghast that all three individuals within his Soul were so bloodthirsty. The greater mass that was Avo felt like he was in good company.

Scanning through the various choices to increase the entropy shroud’s size and mass, he realized that boosting the canon to the third stage also offered him an alteration to its nature, twisting the design of the cloud into something far more directed.

CANON - WITHERED CONSTRUCT - ALLOWS THE MASTER TO MANIFEST AN INSTRUMENT MADE TO DISSOLVE SIMILAR VARIATIONS–

Avo skipped that build, and two more after, the four lines of mem-data down pulling his attention entirely.

HELL - (THIRD CIRCLE)

CANON: THE BARRAGE OF THE WITHERED - LAUNCHES AN ENTROPIC CONSTRUCT FROM THE MASTER COMPRISED OF ENTROPY WHICH CAN THEN BE CONTROLLED AND GUIDED; ALL PHYSICAL MATTER WILL BE AFFECTED ASIDE FROM THE MASTER - THIS CANON IS ABSOLUTE

DAEMON: SHOULD THE CONSTRUCT NOT STRIKE AND DISSOLVE MATTER FOR THE TIME IT TAKES THE HEAVEN TO FILL WITH REND, THE MISSILE WILL BIRTH AN ANATHEMA OF RUIN TO SERVE AS THE MASTER’S ANATHEMA; THE ANATHEMA CANNOT BE SLAIN AND MUST BE STARVED

The new canon appealed to Avo. To be able to fire his Rend-waste as missiles and ignore them afterward provided needed economical effectiveness to his design. What’s more, if he could use both his Woundshaper and Galeslither at the same time, he could commit to aero-spatial bombing runs.

Savagely, Avo began to laugh, imagining the potential havoc, the flesh dissolving from his foes while accelerating his Woundshaper-self at mach speeds into his prey.

“What is this?” Zein said, her voice excited too. “Oh… oh yes. This will be ruinous. Destructive.” She chuckled. “Yes. This is what you should commit to. It will be a thrill to face in combat later.”

The brightness within Avo stopped flowing. Right, she was probably doing this so she could beat him up even more. But by this point, he was too distracted to care. Too distracted to even linger on all that the Hunger had revealed.

Vaguely.

Talking to Zein had been a comparative relief.

HELL - [THIRD CIRCLE] - WOUNDSHAPER

DOMAIN: (MATTER/ENTROPY)

THAUMIC REQUIREMENTS - 450 THAUM/c

REND VENTS ONLINE

CANON: THE BREATH OF THE WITHERED - THE MASTER OF THIS DOMAIN CAN NOW EXPEL THEIR TOTAL REND INTO AN ENTROPIC GUST OF WIND THAT CAUSES THE RAPID DESTABILIZATION OF MATTER; ALL PHYSICAL MATTER WILL BE AFFECTED ASIDE FROM THE MASTER - THIS CANON IS ABSOLUTE

CANON: THE BARRAGE OF THE WITHERED - LAUNCHES AN ENTROPIC CONSTRUCT FROM THE MASTER COMPRISED OF ENTROPY WHICH CAN THEN BE CONTROLLED AND GUIDED; ALL PHYSICAL MATTER WILL BE AFFECTED ASIDE FROM THE MASTER - THIS CANON IS ABSOLUTE

DAEMON: EXPELLING EXCESS ENTROPY INTO A SINGLE POINT OF MATTER WILL BIRTH AN ANATHEMA OF RUIN TO SERVE AS THE MASTER’S ANATHEMA; THE ANATHEMA CANNOT BE SLAIN AND MUST BE STARVED

DAEMON: SHOULD THE CONSTRUCT NOT STRIKE AND DISSOLVE MATTER FOR THE TIME IT TAKES THE HEAVEN TO FILL WITH REND, THE MISSILE WILL BIRTH AN ANATHEMA OF RUIN TO SERVE AS THE MASTER’S ANATHEMA; THE ANATHEMA CANNOT BE SLAIN AND MUST BE STARVED

With a surge of brightness, he felt his Hell expand, the imbalance between Heaven and Hell stabilizing. Even the eldritch flames began to flow more evenly around the Woundshaper.

“YES!” The Woundshaper bellowed. “FINALLY! A PROPER PEDESTAL FOR A GOD! WORSHIP ME! GLORY TO ME!”

With bated desire, Avo directed his focus to activate his new cycler, splitting the flow of thaums near-even between them as a test.

(WOUNDSHAPER) THAUMIC OUTPUT - 486 THAUM/c

(GALESLITHER) THAUMIC OUTPUT - 485 THAUM/c


REASSEMBLING HEAVEN

MODIFYING WOUNDSHAPER

GRAFTING HEAVEN - 100%

REVIEWED - MYTHOLOGY STABLE


REASSEMBLING HELL

MODIFYING WOUNDSHAPER - [THIRD CIRCLE]

GRAFTING HELL - 100%

REVIEWED - MYTHOLOGY STABLE


GRAFTED HEAVEN - WOUNDSHAPER

DOMAIN: (BLOOD/MATTER/BIOLOGY/LUMINENCE)

THAUMIC REQUIREMENTS - 450 THAUM/c

REND VENTS ONLINE


GRAFTED HELL - [THIRD CIRCLE] - WOUNDSHAPER

DOMAIN: (MATTER/ENTROPY)

THAUMIC REQUIREMENTS - 450 THAUM/c

REND VENTS ONLINE

Suddenly, Avo found himself within the Woundshaper as well, the flames of his Soul clasped firmer by a second dragon. With but a shift of an angle, he twisted from Galeslither to Woundshaper, as if an alteration of axis shifted him between flavors of reality.

“Ah,” the Woundshaper said, pleased that it was perpendicular to the Galeslither. “Now we are mounted upon the steed, master. Onward. Onward and away. The Galeslither can be put to proper service for the superior goddess; its rightful place has been uncovered.”

“Careful, little dagger,” Zein said. “You will wish to consider your distribution for if you wish to rise high or grow wide. Your Woundshaper’s demands are far greater. Portion your cyclers well. But do it afterward. After you finish spending your final Domain.”

(WOUNDSHAPER) THAUMIC OUTPUT - 910 THAUM/c

(GALESLITHER) THAUMIC OUTPUT - 61 THAUM/c

One dragon brightened substantially. The other dimmed. A clashing luster came from bother their scales as the brighter dragon spun faster while the other worked to a more muted pace.

Yes. He did have one more Domain of Space, didn’t he?

“Can’t use it on the Hell?” Avo asked.

“Best put it in the Heaven anyway,” Zein said. “You’re running a Galeslither at baseline. So, it’s draining from space displace or momentum vectors. With your Sangeist–”

“Woundshaper.” The Heaven of Blood bubbled with new glee, prodding at itself as if a young child gazing upon their reflection in a reflective pond. If a reflective pond was a Hell meant to balance them.

“--You probably already have the means to deal with your Rend, no?”

True as that was, Avo didn’t want to overload his Galeslither. To strip himself of enduring wings was a mistake of the highest order. Without his Yondergales, without his Heaven of Wind, his world would shrink anew, and his freedoms would be denied again.

Running the simulation, options came and changed. Mem-data danced through his mind as he studied his options. Augmentations influencing speed and space played on the strings of his avarice, while the cost demanded in weight of thaums sank into his hopes like a dagger. Smaller transparent attachments to the Galeslither teased him with improvements in utility, but in truth, his mind was made.

“Going to wait,” Avo said. “Wait until I get another Galeslither. Build the Heaven. Even the Hell.”

Zein shrugged. “You’re being too conservative, I think. You should unchain yourself more. Indulge.”

He stared at her. “You know what I am?”

“What you were,” Zein said. “From what I’ve seen, you’re quite the well-disciplined cannibal. So well-disciplined that your father gave you the keys to his kingdom. Or, at least, to his basement.”

A moment's pause parsed the void. The fires were beginning to trickle upward. The time was almost upon him.

RESURRECTION - 99%

Just before the end, she smirked, turning to “Fancy a bet, Fallwalker?”

“Fallwalker?” Avo asked.

“Are you of a Guild?”

“No.”

“Then Fallwalker is what you are.” She considered her words. “Ostensibly, at least. By your apprenticeship, I suppose this makes you a terrorist against the state powers in a more fixed sense but… who is to know?”

Avo hummed, a note of anticipation staining. “What’s the bet.”

“Do you think you can manage to kill me?” Her question came half-ask, half-taunt. “Or will you still be as you were against me–as helpless as a worm fighting an eagle? Even if I were to… forgo the full use of my chronology.”

He didn’t answer her immediately. The brightness began to build. Upward, he felt his Soul begin to ascend. He made a final adjustment to his Soul’s root functions–changing how he wanted to transition after his resurrection. “Let’s find out.”

“Yes, master,” his Woundshaper concurred, “Use your enemy’s aid to see them dead. I approve of your machinations.”

“What’s the gambit?” Avo said, wondering just how close Zein was to Bright-Wealth.

“Succeed and I will offer you a Heaven. One to protect you against time, perhaps.”

If he could salivate, he would. “Lose?”

“Then we both have fun. Godclads do not lose. That is for mortals and fools who forget to vent. But it will hurt. And I will continue killing you until I get bored, or you succeed.”

“Fun. How’s your memory in your old age? Don’t want to kill you accidentally.”

Zein threw her head back and laughed. “What hubris! Magnificent! A Godclad I will make of you yet.”

And inward, into the flames he fell, the bright consuming his mind, and reloading him into reality.
“Is this a joke, O’yaje? I challenge you–I bring you the best of my Glaives and you offer me your daughter? She’s barely past her first bleeding! Look at her! And how does she have a Glaive? This… this is an insult. For all the kikigo between us, I still hoped that our shared blood would–”

“No, brother. When this day is done, your sons will be buried, and you will receive my champion as a worthy compliment. You have one more chance to withdraw your veto against my son’s ascent to First Annalist. Do so. Or be made lacking by my daughter.”
[Whispering] “Can we just start the killing now, father?”
[Sighing] “Zein, no. I’m trying to save your uncle’s sons. They’re your cousins.”
“They won’t be if they’re dead. I could kill their father too if you want.”

“Zein, no.”
-Mem-log of Zein O’yaje, THE RITE OF KIKIGO


8-20
A Testament of “Skill”
From the stillness of his former corpse, Avo rose a screaming gale, his return to baseline existence carving an invisible dome into the air as the Galeslither formed, bullets spilling along its sides like waterfalls.
He spread his being wide for a moment, feeling the rising groves of sprouting metal and plantstuff, the countless weapons spreading like branches from ever-growing trees. Zein had not lied when she said this place was garden and armory both, and with its cyclical nature, any battle here would twist back unto itself like dueling in a wide plain and a narrow chamber both.
Twenty feet across from him Zein stood, yawning as she waggled a single finger, ushering for something invisible to come. She seemed in no hurry to begin, her eyes following him with a wry stare even as he dove in and out of the Yondergales.
“You may begin your attempts on my life when you’re ready,” Zein said. “I will take such as the beginning of our game.”

Avo took the time to experiment.
Shifting between Heavens was an instantaneous thing, like twisting his Soul. It wasn’t so much as running both Heavens at once as he could transform the currently active Heaven he had into another–sometimes at a near-constant pace. When done fast, splashes of eldritch fire spewed free from his changing form, reshaping Galeslither down to the blood in Avo’s veins.
The improvements he made to the Woundshaper were made obvious from the moment he began to convert the matter around him into blood. When last in the gutters he had to vent several times before he even managed ten tons. Now, his spreading arteries bloomed out from his being, leeching away all physical substance as he fused into the greater embodiment of the Woundshaper.
His Rend climbed at a trickle instead of a spike.
Ten tons came. Then twenty. By the time he was at the full eighty, he dwarfed Zein utterly and felt himself peer out from the clouds. Strangely, he could feel parts of the plant mass tickling his mind, and his haemokinesis greeted the light like fingers sliding down the strings of a violin.
Time lurched as if seized in a chokehold thanks to his increased mass also multiplying his attributes. When combined with his Celerostylus, his Phys-Sim estimated he would be capable of fighting past mach 4.
Such a realization came bound with new considerations. He tested his Domain of Biology. Hydrapedes molded free from matter as his insectoid limbs touched columns and soil. His Rend grew by a few points more as he increased his spread and tested both the hydrapede creation and Hive (II) canons. Neither seemed that useful as of present.
Luminosity, however, proved to be an ability most different.
It took him more than one attempt to figure out how the Canon of Harmonize (II) functioned. From the antlers growing protruding from his Woundshaper, he felt a ringing resonance between him and all nearby pieces of matter, their structures each bearing a different pitch, like radio wavelengths awaiting connection.
With a thought, he used his Canon of Linger to deploy a chunk of blood-tungsten and infuse a mote of light into it from one horn. Operating more off of instinct than understanding, Avo infused another connected mote from the opposite horn into himself, and a shivering string of brightness formed.
He took a step back and, joined to his motion by the light-made link, the chunk copied his motion shooting backward as an excess of force and momentum acted on it. So aligned were the vectors of force and momentum that Avo understood the nature of his new ability. The chunk was paired to him, the canon using light to connect their forms.
Such a thing held much promise. Alas, it did jump his Rend by five percent.
REND CAPACITY [WOUNDSHAPER] - 28%
REND CAPACITY [GALESLITHER] - 1%
“Splendid, master, splendid,” his Woundshaper cackled with glee. “I am no longer starved of endurance. I stand greater than I have ever been!” She sighed. “If I could but return to my beginning now. The world would have been mine to shape.”
Using the Canon of Linger on his greater structure, Avo stepped out from the frozen tower of blood as his Hell filled just a bit more. Activating the Barrage of the Withered, a static needle of Rend began to build, taking a second to pour from his vessel before it tore free. A new menu flashed into his cog-feed as he felt the entropic construct connect with his mind. It swam through the air and left a crackle of gray in its wake, its speed and dexterity sharing a kinship with his Heaven at baseline.
With a mental command, he had its impact against a pillar. It struck the rising groove and burst into a rippling tide of raw entropy, carving a wide wound into the garden some eighty feet wide and high.
REND CAPACITY [WOUNDSHAPER] - 0%
He worked up his Rend and tested the shot several more times. When his Rend was at sub-twenty, the missile was smaller but quicker, taking less than a second to launch when measured at the pace of his perception. Past that, the time it took to generate grew, as did the devastation at the end.
“You might also be able to burn away the Rend accumulated by your Galeslither,” Zein said, her back turned to him.
The beast itched under Avo’s skin, tempted by the moment of vulnerability. Avo thought better.
She said she wasn’t going to invoke her Heaven of Time, but such a thing remained uncertain. He would need to study her more before he made his move.
In the meantime, he did as she said as the flickered back over to using the Galeslither, all his amassed blood briefly slipping from control. Forming a sphere of stasis, he drew upon the Domains of his Woundshaper and shaped a single strand of blood into the sphere. There, as the winds clasped his new limb, leeching all momentum from it, Avo made the limb spin fast, while taking care to not exceed the capacity of his bubble.
The Rend of his Galeslither cleared almost immediately.
REND CAPACITY [GALESLITHER] - 0%
Satisfaction played within him as an orchestra.
He turned to Zein again, who was comparing two frequency blades; one was shorter but faster, the other longer but slower. “Helping me a lot,” he said. “Why?”

She hummed. “Why? I claimed you as an apprentice, did I not?”

“Didn’t say I accepted yet.”

“A lack of rejection is acceptance in my time.”


He cast out his Whisper then, using it to watch her from another angle. She showed no hints of awareness. “Really don’t want my Frame?”

She frowned. “I have the Frame. I have you. I just see no need to trade my own.” Her gaze flattened. “Besides. I suspect that your Soul would be ill-fitting for my constitution.”

“What’s that–”

He felt his midsection burst before everything went white.
Avo tried to blink but found himself bereft of eyelids or limbs or anything to control.
It was only when the rippling flames of his Soul rose that he realized he was dead again.
RESURRECTION - 1%
He found himself nested within his Galeslither, seeing that his Woundshaper had a spec of Rend staining his Hell. Seconds later, Zein descended on her blade, tutting in disappointment.
“What happened?” Avo asked.
“You started asking questions instead of attempting to kill me,” Zein said. “This is bad. Very bad. We have already had these conversations in other futures.”


“I’m trying to talk with you now,” Avo growled.
She ignored him. “Making your master bored is a fatal thing, little dagger. Keep that in mind.”


She then promptly left.
He took her words to heart.
When his resurrection ended, he came back to life with a plan, approaching his engagement with Zein more in the style of an assassination than a brawl. With Phys-Sim active, he devised an attack from three sides.
The first would come from the Nether: Lucille’s Torment. He would use his Ghostjack to launch the lightest of phantasmal weapons like a jab, drain her focus and then distract her.
Then, back in the real, he would perform a Luminosity-aided pincer. Subtly moving the chunk of blood behind Zein, he used his Phys-Sim to calculate impact trajectories directed at the back of her head, using the looping nature of his environment to his advantage. This killing stroke would be hidden by a wide scything blow from his Woundshaper itself.
And should all else fail, he could let his Woundshaper Rend build before capturing her in his Yondergales and use it to detonate her while she was tumbling in his wake.
With a plan in mind, he immediately reconstructed the Woundshaper around himself and began his assault.
A discharge of synaptic lightning flowed free from his Celerostylus. The world slowed, and unlike before, time did not attune itself to match him. The falling rain of bullets barely moved, so fast was he with all eighty tons of his Woundshaper. His might swelled. His presence rose. Zein shrank.
REND CAPACITY [WOUNDSHAPER] - 8%
And immediately, Avo worked his attack.
The offense came from three directions at once: His Whisper shot high, acting as a spotter for his Ghostjack; out from his body, a whip of scything blood crackled through the air, shearing through the metallic trees in a wide sweep, delivered with deliberate sloppiness; a tendril of blood slowly moved behind him, nudging the chunk in place as he prepared to tether it to himself with a link of light.
Zein, meanwhile, prepared by using a knife to prune a brush spewing out seeds bearing smaller knives.
His Ghostjack crackled. A current of ghosts plumed out from his Whisper, screaming out with Lucille’s Regret. A single blade from her wards shot out, her thoughtstuff tethered to it, a blade on a string twisting out the cleave a river of howling shades.
Two things happened then, both of them unexpected by Avo.
The first was Zein suddenly bursting into motion, uprooting the plant entirely to reveal the massive launch port at its end holding some manner of a warhead. The second blade from her wards lashed out to parry the tsunami that was his trauma, her speed at resequencing her defenses incredible, Metamind reweaving memories to achieve near-symmetry with his attack.
Even as his Woundshaper lashed toward her midriff, he watched in disbelief as her launcher fired out, its electromagnetic railing sparking as it ejected the warhead at him.
Unfettered, he shaped another limb out from his already slashing tendril to knock it aside.
A warning flashed in his cog-feed. A sudden flood of dread filled Avo’s veins before he even fully conceptualized what had happened.
WARNING: RADIOACTIVE–
The warhead promptly exploded, cracking like an expanding eggshell, and with it the world. Blinding whiteness swallowed all. Even Avo’s thoughts weren’t spared.
RESURRECTION - 1%
Again, Avo found himself loading into his Galeslither.
Plunging back into his Soul, he blinked as he wondered how he just died. He knew the probable cause to be Zein, yet, aside from the sudden impact he knew not of what killed him.

He realized he was nested in his Galeslither by default, unable to shift. Twisting his perception to check his Woundshaper, he found it bleeding static grayness out into its reflection in the Third Circle, the Hell fissuring as it spewed Soulfire out as literal error codes into reality.
The reflection’s blood was twitching as matter dolloped from dripping strands of ichor. Inverting upward, the Woundshaper stared down, curious as to the sensation. “All my debt, paid by another. What convenience.”
Avo watched the former god turned Heaven. He allowed the Woundshaper to prod at itself, comparing its current shape to where tears of instability appeared on the Hell.
“Did you know that we used ephemerals as effigies for our entropic maladies?” the Woundshaper said. “In my time, us gods made these Hells to counter the sicknesses spewed upon the land. Such is was lingers in the long shadows of my memory.”
He didn’t respond to the Heaven, so consumed by stunned blankness from what just happened.
Did Zein just use a missile on him? Her plants were growing missiles as well? When was this? How did she even manage to curate this place? Was she just using playing him for a fool, killing him over and over using the instruments of this place to… to do what?
Thoughts reeled through his mind as everything that happened throughout the last few days caught up with him. His new enhancements; sparring with Draus; the Hungers and the nigh-incomprehensible madness they sprouted about his past.
All of it felt like a haze, but Zein pushed it all over the edge into a fever dream.
He still had no idea what possessed her to kidnap into this pocket of space, to take him “under her wing” for training, or why she didn’t just take his Frame from him with all that she possessed.
Of only one thing was he certain: the old woman was absolutely, utterly, mind-bendingly mad, and it was everyone elses’ problem to face.
“I have discovered faults in your approach to conflict,” Zein said upon entering his Soul. She was shaking her head. “You are too trusting. And you rely too much on planning. Plans are good. Chaos is better. You must seek to master the totality of all things. Attack me constantly from all angles. You think too much and improvise too little. But my advice here is paradoxical: You must plan so well and so frequently beforehand that the knowledge comes to you. Like a fugue state, where every action you take is both sublime… and a mystery to even yourself.”
For a beat, he tried to process what she was staying. He failed. It was like experiencing a vicarity of someone having a stroke. “What was that?” Avo asked, his mind still fixated on death. “What did you kill me with?”
“It's just a high-yield nuclear device,” Zein said.
“A nuke? You shot us with a nuke?”


“I shot you with a nuke,” Zein said. “I’m fine.”

“How? You were right there. It went off next to you.”

“Ah, but unlike you, I was clever enough to dodge.”
It was like aggravating him was one of her tactics. From the way she acted, it very well might have been. “What?”

“Fine. Fine. I will refrain from using the launcher on you,” Zein looked down at him with judging eyes. “It is clear that you are not ready for such a lesson. Too surprising for you. I apologize.”
The fires of his Soul twitched. “I’m going to kill you. Eat your eyes. Wear your head.”
Zein nodded sagely. “It speaks greatly of my talent that I inspire such dedication in you already.”


Her words came without hint nor shadow of arrogance. She meant every syllable she spat. Experience and training grew to be secondary reasons why he wanted Zein dead. Spite, then, claimed its new throne above its rivals.
REND CAPACITY [WOUNDSHAPER] - 10%
REND CAPACITY [GALESLITHER] - 1%
As he returned this time, he wasted no more time, seeking to deprive Zein of all her advantages and strip her from her demiplane–which was now rapidly regrowing into an arsenal of a garden after being turned into a blasted wasteland.
Spreading the reach of his Galeslither as wide as he could, he adapted his previous plan but added more complexity. He pulled objects into his Yondergale first, converting them to reform his Woundshaper. Then, finding Zein just standing at the epicenter of the blast crater staring at a new bush beginning to sprout from the rapidly refilling soil, he pulled her through his Yondergales and began his attack.
With his form flashing between the braying steed that was the Galeslither and the titanic tower of his Woundshaper, he attacked her from both Nether and physical vectors again.
He anticipated the deflection of his trauma this time but compensated by committing less of his cog-feed. At the same time, he ejected a piece of blood from his Woundshaper, keeping it intact with linger as he tied it to his form using Harmonize.
Zein, for her part, extended her arms as a lattice of wings expanded from her back.
Avo stared. What was that? Was that nanotech? Didn’t Voidwatch reserve all licenses for combat nanotechnology?
Shaking off the stupor, he used his Phys-Sim to calculate the trajectory of his haemokinetic shrapnel. He swung at her using shaped tendrils, his pace fast enough to shatter the barrier of sound. Zein responded to the blast waves by punching and somehow grappling the vibrations of another.
+The kimura can be applied in a variety of situations,+ Zein said. +Including against sound if you have the means to grab it.+
Avo snarled. Lashed out cutting down at her using hundreds of tendrils, striking from all directions while using the ripples of his body to pilot the stray piece of shrapnel, the impact lane slowly turning red as he guided the path it was circling.
Pulses of blue-organ light lanced out from her nanocarbide armor as she accelerated forward, greeting his spearing limb with a bladeless hilt raised, a faint look of enjoyment, bemused about a freefall sword fight against an eighty-ton god controlling alchemized blood.
He fell upon her then, his speed faster than most non-fusion aerovecs, each strike fast enough to burst the shroud of sound. But her refutation of his power was a thing of beauty. This he could not deny. She deflected his blows into each other, every sweep of her blade-hilt ringing in perfect tandem with the bursts of her thrust pack.
The economy of her movement was supreme. Nothing was wasted. Every shift of motion threw him off course and forced him to direct the shard for another spin. And against every blow she couldn’t block she rode, bouncing herself away using the force directed from the block.
Annoyed, Avo sought to end things. He quelled the Galeslither as his shrapnel missed the fiftieth time, his dissatisfaction a wildfire in his veins. As they tumbled through the open air of her garden, he saw columns beginning to rise, and the bullets falling again.
Calculating her movement vectors using his Phys-Sim, he activated his Galeslither’s Hell just as she twisted and fired her thrusters, returning to face him.
Zein lurched to a sudden halt.
At the speed she was going, the stasis bubble shuddered as his Galeslither’s Rend began to empty at blinding speed.
Without a moment to waste, Avo did something he had never done before: He used both his Hells at once.
Diving free from a cascade of blood, entropy poured out from him as he hurled a lance of pure grayness toward Zein. A window popped up in his head. He accelerated the construct toward her all full speed.
REND CAPACITY [WOUNDSHAPER] - 0%
Across the distance, she had the audacity to yawn. Wait, she wasn’t yawning. As the light danced off her visor, he realized she was poking at one of her teeth using her tongue–
Brightness consumed everything again.
RESURRECTION - 1%
As Avo fell back into his own Soul, he, again, wondered what killed him this time. He found himself in the Woundshaper, with the Galeslither still stained with a trickle of Rend.
However, his attention on his own Heavens and Hells did not last. Across his boundary, through a vast expanse of seeming nothingness, he saw another fire in the distance. Another Soul. Zein. It was too far for him to reach, but as his resurrection played its pace to the end, he watched it lance upward around the same time as he did.
Flicking back into reality–the area around him bereft of blood to spawn from–Avo stared at Zein, who popped in much the same way.
Much of the garden was gone. They stood upon a rumbling surface–a machine intricate and complex beyond his comprehension. Translucent gears danced and spun like the inner workings of a clock between the clawed digits of his feet. Through it all, mirages of miasmic plant stuff and weapons spilled between the gears like ink.
With the first crunching spin, a trickle of bullets fell while a carpet of soil shivered back into existence, materializing like a glitch in the real, not unlike his most recent resurrection. As the garden poured itself back into shape, he found himself staring back at Zein, who was now kneeling, digging through a patch of dirt, her blade held high.
“What… happened,” he asked.
Zein folded her arms and nodded sagely. “Sometimes, my apprentice, suicide is an act of tactical brilliance.”

He narrowed his eyes. “Thought you said you weren’t going to use a nuke. What was that? Chest bomb? Internally planted fusion core?”

“It was not a nuke,” Zein said proudly. “I have an antimatter bomb in one of my hearts.”
A twisting feeling knotted painfully in his gut. Avo wanted to say something, but words wouldn’t form, his psyche beyond dumbfounded by the raw absurdity of this “battle.”
“It was a gift from Voidwatch,” Zein said. “I asked them to give me a smaller engine for a heart. Like one of their ships.” She smiled. “They obliged.” She thrust the hilt of her blade down into the earth. He felt a click as the gears suddenly halted. “You’re not very good at dodging, you know that?”

“I–”
Around him, the garden began to flicker in and out of existence with the light, the demiplane flickering as if coming on and off to the flick of a light switch.

“When one blows themselves up, you should dive back into your demiplane. We must work on your adaptability.” She nodded to herself. “You show promise. No fear of death; a taste for pain; a mind flavored for complexity. But we need more. We need to instill in you the rules of Total Domain Warfare. Nothing must be outside the bounds of your consideration. Nothing.”

He heard a crackling sound in the back of his mind then–his ghost stuttering between the freedom of the real and the entrapment of this plane between flashes.
“You,” Zein said, twisting her sword “are too sane.”
Never in his life did Avo expect someone utter such words to him.
With a final click, the demiplane turned off entirely, and he found himself back in the front entrance to the Second Fortune.
Avo blinked.
Beside him, Zein’s once bladeless hilt now held a new edge. It looked as if a crystalline saber of bright mercury, and beneath the structure, the outlined shape of her garden danced, the shadows of the demiplane intermittently interrupted by the swirl of a self-eating creature circling along the edge.
“Shh, Akunsande, shh,” she said, brushing the blade as if a mother coaxing a child. A ripple in time twisted, ebbing from the edge of the weapon as Zein twisted the hilt. A new sigil flashed out, phantoms bleeding from the hilt to manifest a shrouded holographic icon.
And Avo felt his focus come apart. When his thoughts returned, he wondered why he was looking at Zein shake out a sword-lengthed umbrella.

“Come now, little dagger,” she said, grasping him by the cook of his wrist, the sheer disparity in height between them not stopping her from having him guide her through the establishment like guardian bioform would a child. “Show me to your friends. We have much to discuss. Death is always waiting for us later.”

Just then, a session crackled on in his mind.
+Avo? Avo?+ Draus’ wary thought struck him like the tension of a hammer sinking beneath the tumbling waves of an ocean. +You dropped out of the world for a bit there. What the hells happened.+


Avo considered sending her a simple reply, but again, he felt Zein tugging his arm, pulling him away from the path to the apartments.
“But before that, I wish to play the slots,” Zein said. “I need some imps for my drugs.”

+Tell you when I figure it out myself,+ Avo said.
To become a Glaive of the pre-Fall Ori Communality, one must achieve feats of mental and physical agility of near post-humanity in a time when most viewed even a simple gunpowder weapon as an arcane object.
Many walked the Path of the Dreaming Willows. Many failed. Few ever returned with their Dream-Forged Glaives. Sorrowful; a true pity.
A pity that they weren’t me. Frankly, I don’t understand what was so hard about the trial. The adversaries we faced were our worst nightmares? Pathetic. Just stop fearing things. That simple. Accept. Accept and kill. Kill the terrors.
Children, if you are reading this, ignore neuro-mods and therapy. Such is a thing for cowards and those subhumans who cuckold themselves of glory’s touch.
If you fear a monster hiding under your bed–and you very well might be right to–you should gather the following items:
1. Blades. Frequency blades. A spear. A sword. A knife. Three ranges. If you need something blunt, use your fists. You have no excuse not being augmented; if you are poor, steal them. Do what you must to survive.
2. Guns. You want as many kinds of guns as possible beforehand. Anti-Armor. Infantry. From here, understand what you are fighting and bring a primary firearm, a reserve firearm, an implanted firearm, a secondary firearm, and a gun for amusement should you lose your target scuttling into the woods and you find yourself in a life-or-death hunt-chase with a new mortal adversary.
3. Suicide bomb. I strongly recommend suicide bombs. Not just for Godclads. Not all fights can be victories–though all of mine were–but you should make sure that, at the very least, everyone loses. Suicide bombs are easy. They can be made out of aerovec engines in an afternoon and wired to a mental trigger via ghosts. I will not waste your time telling you how.
Regardless, if there is one thing that I might impart to the children it is this: It is better to explode yourself using an unstable fusion reactor than it is to have your flesh assimilated by skin mimics. Don’t push that responsibility onto them. Be reasonable. Do the right thing.
That means you too, Veylis. Your father might tell you otherwise, but I trust you know what to do should the time come.
-Zein Thousandhand, Memoirs of Most the Killings I Can Recall off the Top of my Head, Chapter I, Page 1
9-1
Fear and Zein in the Second Fortune
Nova. Bliss. Joy. Bloom. Dust. Zoom-Twelve. Yogfeth. Numb. Se1-sure. Suncloud.

Ten drugs.

Ten drugs banned by the Great Eight. Ten drugs so potent each could cripple a baseliner. Ten drugs, with some mandating specific biomodifications for the body to even survive ingestion.

Ten drugs that Zein took all at the same time. In full view of countless horrified onlookers of the casino main hall.

The ground floor of the Second Fortune was crowded enough as it was. With the Exorcists still sweeping through the district– now concentrating their efforts on the null blast that rippled out from Ox-3–most people turned to indoor leisure.

Beneath massive entertainment holos broadcasting the newest streams, gamblers gathered around gaming pits to burn time. Dueling pens for teams of bio-augmented crickets occupied the northern quarter of the casino floor, with hundreds cheering and jeering as if beholding a circuit.

Above them did play circuit highlights, holos of recaps from the local bloodsport, with in-depth odds provided for the more well-known fighters to pass through. Contact details of their Metas flashed, snarling fighters looking for sponsors to take their bloodletting up the Layers, and hopefully, into the Tiers.

Card tables dotted the walls around them while Zein ping ponged between various slot machines down the middle of the room. Casting her imps at random, never hitting the same slot system twice, holoprojected nu-bears dancing upon the heads of snarling tigers flashed out from the slots as a jingling tune began. By melody’s end, most the bears tumbled and found their censored demise at the hands of the tigers.

For the slots that Zein cast into, however, every bear managed to leap upon a passing cloud, fortune bringing them to a heavenly palace carved from gold.

It didn’t take long for the Sang to send someone to check just how they were losing that much money. A wandering nu-dog came, wheezing. It stood a stocky seven feet and was dressed in robes denoting the Sang characters for fortune, wealth, and joy. Its face was a flat, snoutless thing; each inhale a snort. Through his connection to the Galeslither, Avo could feel the creature choking on its own breath.

“Here, dog,” Zein said, words slurring from her final hit of Suncloud. The nano-drug buzzed loud, an angry cloud of glinting fireflies in an inhaler. “Take this.”

It blinked slowly, wondering what the old woman wanted.

Its answer came in the form of Suncloud jammed right against its jowls. The dog's beady eyes widened, its frame shivering as the nano-particles poured through its system. The thoughtstuff of the dog sputtered as if a river smashing into a dam.

It began to cough, hacking violently as Zein shook her head. “This is not the future in which it decides to throw off the shackles of control and see its own destiny. A pity.”

Without looking, she offered up her drug canister to Avo. The slobber leftover from the unwilling dog dolloped in thick oozing strands. “Take it.”

“No,” he said. “Force it on me and die.”

She smirked. “Well, the ‘die’ part is accurate.”

The blood within her coursed slower, impeded by crystallizing blockages forming in her arteries. Where his Heaven of Blood tasted substances flowing through the bodies around him, none were quite as congested as Zein's.

Which wasn’t a surprise considering she blew her winnings as fast as they came in, buying, and often doing the drugs right in front of the dealer. Right then, she probably had enough substance inside her to make a nu-whale hallucinate a vision of Jaus.

“Damn this,” Zein said, her breaths wheezing. “Hear me now, Avo. Terrestrial drugs are terrible. If you ever want some good substances, seek the voider. Voiders.” She sighed. “Now they know how to live.” Blood bursted out inside her liver. She didn’t even wince.

“Trying to kill yourself again?” Avo said, wondering if he could pocket her in his Galeslither in time to hide whatever explosion was certain to follow.

She scoffed. “Failing to overdose. And spare me the anxiety. I will not explode. My bomb is a tooth-trigger, not a death-trigger.”

A nearby Scaarthian turned to stare at them when he heard the word bomb. He quickly turned away when he had to look up to meet Avo’s gaze. Right. The Bone Demon made him taller. So much for keeping a low profile. He needed to get his holocoat back. And maybe buy an Incog from a squire, he had no time for crafting his own. He glared at the legendary swordswoman.

“Listen,” Zein said, pounding her chest as if trying to accelerate her impending heart attack, “There are many things we must discuss. But I refuse to do it sober. The topics are miserable and I despise almost everyone involved. Also, joy.”

“What?” Dealing with Zein was like trying to wrangle a nu-cat. At least he could send Draus a message now. Give her a heads-up that the almighty Zein Thousandhand was finally ready to ascend and greet the group.

Slats of nanoarmor parted around Zein’s wrist as she slammed a needle into her veins like she was exacting vengeance on someone. Blood spurted everywhere. “Joy. It can hide your thoughtwaves. I can’t wander out in real without this.”

He stared, unsure if anything she was saying to him was true or if she was just having a drug-fueled meltdown. “Doing this to hide? Why not just use ghosts?”

She shot him a withering stare. “Then, my genius of an apprentice, what excuse will I have to do all the drugs I want.” She folded her arms like she just won a debate. The drugs she was carrying clattered out of her grasp, spilling onto the casino floor. “Come. Let us ascend. I feel an overdose coming. Now is the time I should be introduced to the others. Warn them. Warn of them of Zein Thousandhand.”

She then promptly collapsed and began convulsing.

Avo just watched for a beat, Echoheads inching forward tentatively. He wondered how it would feel to stab her.

+Avo?+ Draus said, her session coming online. +River’s sayin’ she got eyes on you wandering around the lobby with some… drug fiend.+

Avo growled a low sigh. +I’m coming up. Bringing Zein Thousandhand with me. +

+Alright, sync–wait, did you say Zein Thousandhand?+

“Jaus, yao-guai.” Avo jumped at Bright-Wealth's voice. The Sang was looking at the dozen or so half-injected needles impaled into Zein’s wrist port. The old woman was shivering like a leaf on the wind. “You–you can’t just bring a degenerate off the street into the Second Fortune. What the fuck do you think we are? A homeless encampment?”

"Not what it looks like."

Zein made a choking noise and went still.

“Great,” Bright Wealth said, turning to glare at Avo. “Just perfect. You bring back some homeless drug fiend degenerate and the she dies here. It’s like you’re trying to get the Exorcists to do an audit on us. Why can't you have normal hobbies like the rest of us, eh? Just gamble. Or eat some unfortunate gutter rats like your brothers.”

“Just give her a second,” Avo sighed. They thought this was her first death from overdose. The fools. He had to prop her back up against the slots the first time.

Suddenly, Zein shivered. And then she was gone.

Bright-Wealth blinked. "Where–where'd she go."

"Probably to get more drugs."

Zein, as he discovered, approached life with a certain philosophy, and that philosophy could be summed in two words when it came to drugs.

Why not.
He went after her.
***
Spasming in the corner of the room near the holo-vision deck, the aged woman twitched and foamed on the couch, her spine contorting to bend at impossible angles, her limbs lashing and jerking as if each extension to her torso were becoming possessed by ghosts. Warring ghosts.

Through it all, one thing never left her hand: the Umbrella. The crystalline hilted umbrella. The item was essentially and permanently stuck to her grip. Draus, in a moment of concern, had attempted to take it from the woman, but found herself blinded for the second time that day as the gleaming ferrule sprayed into her sockets.

Across the room, Green River, Avo, Draus, and Kae stood, taking in one of history’s greatest Godclads with wordless awe.

“Avo,” Draus said, her voice a whisper, “are you absolutely sure this is Thousandhand? I mean. Some other Fallwalker might-coulda gotten some grafting done to play pretend.”

The thought crossed his mind too, but something told him it wasn’t the case. There was a uniqueness to the old woman’s insanity. A type of carefreeness one gained from a lifetime of murdering their enemies and being untethered from death. Avo nodded, finding himself mostly content to watch the legendary swordswoman suffer from her desired overdoses.

All of them.

Both of Zein’s legs were kicking up toward the ceiling now. Her expression, one of pure bliss, never changed. Not even as blood began to pour out from every orifice.

“How the hells did you even run into her,” Draus asked. “You dropped off Idheim for nearly half an hour. Your session just gave me static. Thought it was just you divin’ deeper into that wind-pocket-space you got.”

“Didn’t run into her.” Avo scowled. “She kidnapped me. Pulled me out leaving Ox-Three.”

“Yeah. ‘Bout that: What the hells happened there? Green River sent a nu-dog over. Said the entire building–and a few blocks more even–found themselves nulled. Godsdamned slaughterhouse of the mind.”

He grunted. “Family reunion." He shifted back on his Echoheads to keep them from bristling. "Low Masters came to see me. Brought my old god along with them.”

Draus did a double take. “You saw the Hungers?”

“Not really a god,” Avo said. “Something like… a mob of people living inside five cannibalistic dragons.”

Draus face flattened deeper into suspicion. “You didn’t touch no drugs, yeah?”

He glared silently.

“You, uh, sure about that?” Draus pressed. “Cause it looks like you pulled out some old joy-fiend street squire from the gutters.”

Zein’s convulsing finally stopped with a clank. Everyone blinked. The twitching began anew, the old woman flopping now to the rhythm coming from the entertainment system’s advertisement.

Green River turned to Avo. Her fox never stopped glaring at Thousandhand. “Yosanna. She is dead?”

“Nulled,” Avo said. “Like everyone else in the block. You already know. Other branches of Walton–the Low Masters. They cracked everyone before I got there. Built Auto-Seances into the minds. Siphoned overall cog-cap to hide the Hungers.”

A loud piercing screech finally came from Zein. Her body bolted upright and shuddered, eyes spinning and bloodshot. “Ah! It is upon me! Death! Death! Avo! Avo listen to me! If you have nanosuites, use Suncloud first! It overwhelms the systems so the other drugs can take effect. Remember this. Reme–”

She gave a choked noise as she clutched her chest and fell over.

Everyone stared.

Her thoughtstuff faded. Her breath wisped out. Her blood slowed.

Zein was dead.

“I cannot house you here anymore,” Green River said, a quiet fury bleeding into her features. “I can quell what happened here today, but not with you present. There will be questions. Not just from the Exorcists but my elders.” She paused. “They must know that old power of Noloth is still in play. This attack cannot go unanswered. And I must rehouse the two children. They will want to know what happened with their mother.”

Right. The kids. Avo barely remembered they existed. “Where will you put them?”

Green River lifted an eyebrow. “Do you want to eat them or something?”

“No,” Avo said. “Not really.”

And so they spoke no more on it.

“I can give you a reference,” River said. “Someone in Nu-Scarrowbur who can help hide you while Draus–”

Zein appeared between them. “That will be unnecessary.” The fox bit out at her in surprise. Zein seized its jaws before it could open fully. Tossing her umbrella away, she reached up and began to scratch the vulpine.

For the first time since he met her, Green River looked visibly unnerved, swallowing.

“Yes,” Zein said. “Good dog. I had a nu-fox once. During the First Guild War. Rekikimo. Very clever girl. Horrible death though. Ugly death.”

Both the Sang and the fox blinked.

Releasing Green River’s fox Zein spun on her heel to face Avo, frowning as she needed to look up. Her umbrella was back in her hand again. He didn’t recall her ever picking it up. “There is no need for you to find another rat nest to hide.”

She leaned in close and–

Promptly inhaled a mouthful of pills again. “Ah, incredible.”

She offered the drug to Kae, who took it absent-mindedly, who had it snatched from her in turn by a scowling Draus. “Start gettin’ to the point, Thousandhand. Been hearin’ a lot of stuff today and ain’t none of it makes a lick of sense.” Out of all of them, Draus regarded the ancient Godclad with the most disdain, carefree violence clashing with habitual professionalism like oil on water.

“Ah that,’ Zein said, looking Draus up and down. Thousandhand swallowed a tablet of Numb. “Why are all of you so tall?” She looked at Kae and opened her arms in greeting. “Stay short, sister. Someone must placate my ego.”

Kae blinked, the sheer chaos of the situation meshing poorly with her already-savaged mind. “Um… okay?”

“Avo, listen,” Zein said. “We need to go into the gutters–”

He snarled. “No! No more drugs. Exorcists searching the area. Paladins.”

“Wonder whose fault that is,” Draus muttered.

“It’s not about the drugs,” Zein began, taking a vial of Numb to bring herself down. “For now.”

“Jaus,” Draus muttered.

“It’s about the Helix,” Zein said. “It’s about the Helix, the inheritance your father left you, and how you’re going to use them to help Jhred Greatling invade Nu-Scarrowbur and assassinate his mother’s killer.” A vicious smile that had nothing to do with the drugs then ballooned across her face. “It's about killing and framing him for an act of terrorism.”

Everyone just stared at Zein.

“I mean,” Draus said. “We were plannin’ to kill that half-strand. It was just more of a… revenge and diet thing.”

Avo grunted a laugh. Despite everything, the idea of planting his ghosts inside Mirrorhead before torturing the Guilder to death remained ever so tantalizing.

“Oh,” Zein said. “And here I was thinking I needed to persuade you. Good. Good. But first–we need a ghoul.” Avo stared at her blankly. “Not you, my sweet idiot dagger. A pure ghoul. One that you might be able to pilot and use as an access for the darkness.”

“Pilot?” Avo asked, not fully comprehending what was being said. “What do you mean pilot?”

Zien’s lips thinned. “It is a thing easier performed than explained.” She leaned in closer. “Would you like to see the house that your father left you?”

“House?” Avo asked, the events of the day leaving him uncertain how literally to take everything said to him.

“Demiplane,” Zein stated plainly, “the Helix is the key to a demiplanar nexus. We just need to get close enough down to activate it.”
This message is directed to all cadres attached to Assignment: “Gutter-Crucible-Lacing-688-HalfDawn-Urs.”
Do not–repeat–do not stray into the shadows. Most darkness in the gutters is natural. None thaumaturgic. However, leftover Ontologics from the Nolothi Usurpation have been noted to be still in effect. In plain terms, you are at risk of interception by Nolothi-classification bioforms–ghoul or otherwise.
Or pulled in. No individuals taken by the “Darkness” return or are ever found. Attempts have been made to penetrate this spatial anomaly. Currently, there have been no successes on that front.
As such, keep to your cadres and stay in the light of the drones. Let the drones make a perimeter before beginning your investigations.
Keep together. Keep each other safe.
Steady the flame.
-Internal Paladin Memo, “Shadows in the Gutters”
9-2
The Helix
It was through the waste pipes connected to the Youmeng Sleeper Farms in Xin Yunsha that Avo and the others worked their careful descent down to the gutters.
Drifting in through the farms wasn’t hard. The Galeslither allowed for much ease of access there. He breezed, a three-headed steed carved from clashing wind and storm, carrying the others along. Spoofing the twelve patrolling Specters, likewise, was a matter that took Avo meager minutes.
Through Zein’s guidance and Avo’s Necrotheurgy, Exorcist patrols existed more as obstacles of delay rather than detection. Part of their protection was thanks to the Sleeper Farms, which housed approximately a hundred thousand dreaming workers.
In the Warrens, the Sleeper Farms existed as the most legitimate form of employment offered to many refugees. The imps paid weren’t bad either. If placed against working as an organ-bearer or some demeaning role for one of the Syndicates, it wasn’t hard to see the appeal.
All one needed to do, was sleep. Little to no physical labor required. Merely apply to the available Nether-lobby silo and report to the location. There, a wall-mounted dreampod would display your mem-data from a holojector, and after stepping in and laying on the neural interfacer, the pod would pump you full of all the nutrients and chemicals needed for a tour in the Nether.
Of course, that was where the good ended.
New Vultun was a big city, but the logistical weight demanded by its consumers harbored a heaviness that could fracture even a titan’s bones.
Many needed to hide mem-data in a cheap and disposable mind, or needed to borrow proxy memories as capacity for a job or a Nether-lobby they were running. The Sleepers were always an option. The unfortunate would be kept lucid, assigned to puppet targets in cross-session war-sims. Their memories would be permanently altered, with grafted recollections befitting the time period of the engagement injected. The resulting rawness of their terror and joy rewarded players with a far more immersive experience.
That was when they weren’t serving as extensions for Crucibles on the side. Most came out broken. A few came out nulled. Such was life as FATELESS, mem-tags imprinted along the side of the silos voicing their pain.
+Ori-Thaum killed my mother.+
+FUCK YOU TOPSIDER HALF-STRANDS TO ALL THE GODSDAMNED HELLS+
+I’m going to gun down as many Scalper shits as I can. For Lyra. My sweet Lyra.+
Sinking down aisles of screaming minds trapped in unwaking bodies, Avo listened to Zein as she tumbled within his Yondergales. She, unlike the others, had opted to stay outside the protections of an aerovec, choosing to yell the directions at him while running along tumbling storm clouds.
Through the twists and turns spilling out from a network of waste pipes connected to the pods he flew as a quiet mist. The sensation of pushing and squeezing through even the tightest confines instilled Avo with a sense of strange satisfaction: He could feel the filth gliding past his being, but it didn’t touch him, slipping past him. It allowed him to appreciate the low beauty: The smear-crusted edges of ejection chutes, the fetid edges turned gleaming light slipping, fingers of neon hooked along the crevices.
Not even matter could inflict a choice he rejected upon him.
After spending a moment or two waiting on the eightieth floor for a swarm of Exorcists to pass below, they finally emerged into an ejection chute as wide as a barge that spewed a nigh-endless waterfall of waste into the Maw rounding the borders of Xin Yunsha.
REND CAPACITY [GALESLITHER]: 22%
Even after so long and carrying a load of a Regular, an Agnos, a screaming limbless ghoul, and an aerovec, his Galeslither’s Hell was holding. He made the right choice not increasing the weight of the Heaven as Zein suggested. Balance was a virtue, and keeping to it, the winds possessed by Avo remained unfettered.
Arching under the block, they found an abandoned docking bay for offloading cargo resting just above the plates of Layer One. The lip of the edge was worn away by rising entropy. Access doors were welded shut and lined with polychromatic tarp where holes lined the walls.
Avo wasn’t sure whose idea it was to build such a structure here above the Maw, but bigger fools had been put in charge of more important decisions.
“Here, next to that welded door,” Zein shouted while chewing on a techno-organic stem of Se1-Sure. Avo wondered if the Omnitech-made holy plant made her one with the Alloyed Will, whatever that was. Her body spiraled through the winds as she spun around the Galeslither. Twitching her neck, she missed the wing of Draus’ aerovec by a hair. Luck, skill or a blessing of the Fused Ones.
Arriving on the terrace of an abandoned habitat, Avo pulled out Draus’ aerovec first, the Regular steadied the vehicle without issue, even as the sudden change from torrential wind to still air tore another stray piece off from the aged aero’s rear bumper. Accelerating slowly, she brought it around to a hover.
Three sheens of thoughtstuff shone from within the car. Beside Draus, Kae, mind a conflagration as always, hung festooned in her gimbal. In the trunk, however, a captive ghoul currently bereft of arms and legs howled in the darkness. Avo pitied his fool brother–being used as a key to access a plane hidden by god-touched darkness would not be pleasant.
The stillness was ruined when Zein cast herself out, riding the force of the winds to embed herself right into the wall next to the foam-coated doorway that once led out to the terrace.
Stepping out from the fading winds, Avo cast his Whisper beyond the edge to check for patrols.
“Another group will find us in thirty seconds,” Zein said as if it was no big deal. “Best that you hurry.”

He gave Thousandhand a sniff of annoyance. Best that he hurry. Was she not the one with the powers to twist the nature of space and time? Why couldn’t she just skip ahead to when they had the ghoul out? Why–
The line of thought suddenly went deeper.
What were Zein’s limits? What were her hubrises? Her canons? Why couldn’t she just predict every action the Guilds made? Assassinate the heads and powers behind each faction? Send it all tumbling into chaos?

Connected to that, why hadn’t she taken his Frame? He knew she could. She knew she could. But she just… allowed it to remain with him. Uneasy emotions kindled within Avo. He despised the weakness and uncertainty she made him feel.
Using his Echoheads to open the trunk and lift the ghoul, he found his brother a feather in his grasp. A struggling, biting, mind-bare-to-the-world-with-hate kind of feather. The analogy died an ugly death in Avo’s mind. He couldn’t much imagine it serving well as even an unwilling key either, but Zein hadn't explained.
“Now what,” he asked, holding the creature up before the still chewing sword god.
“Access its mind,” Zein said, eyes narrowing to slits. He had no idea if she was concentrating or just high. “And make sure it is completely shrouded in darkness.”
He looked up at the endless forest of structures forming an alloyed nest over them, offering only the briefest flashes of light. “Good enough.”
He had little idea as to how such a thing would work. So far, he sensed no shine of another Soul. Other than him and Zein, he felt not even a breath of the thaumaturgic. Didn’t mean that something wasn’t running at zero burn according to Kae, but a cycler needed to come online if any canons were to be used.
The darkness just seemed like the absence of light. Nothing miraculous about it.
Casting his ghosts into his brother, Avo expected the familiar screaming chaos that was the mem-data of a ghoul’s mind. However as he sank deeper, he felt its mind scream, the madness of the other beast clashing desperately against him, unraveling as something flashed across his feed.
HELIX ACTIVE
INFUSE SACRIFICE? [Y/N]
After a moment’s hesitation, he selected yes.
Avo felt his blood vibrate and shiver. The ghoul, once held in his grasp, sparked into a flash of light and burned away, its flesh, Essence, and ghost seeping into the shadows. Avo blinked.
The darkness radiated a purple hue into the real and shivered then. Slowly, unnaturally, it pooled together and collapsed inward like a black spiral. A tunnel of fluid ebony formed as phantoms flashed into place, lighting the way deeper inward. There, at the very end towered a tall gateway.
Its two bone-plated doors were crenulated with threading veins of obsidian. Wide as a truck and tall as a building, it reached high into curved grooves molded seamlessly into the shivering wind chimes dangling from the ceiling. Small bone totems clacked to the swaying breath of wind.
“You should go first,” Zein said, gesturing for him to enter. Behind, Draus followed, the tint of the block aerovec’s windows flaking just enough for him to see the uncertainty in her eyes.
+I shoulda bought a burner,+ Draus sent. +Godsdamned chokepoint if I saw one. Collapse the back. Open the doors. Send the rotlicks. Another glorious last stand waitin’ to play out.+
+Scared of the dark, Reg?+ Avo asked. The jab was reflexive. Truth was he knew how she felt. They both knew what the dark held in store for the unwary. Long before careless squires went missing in the dark, the first meat that the Darkness tasted was that of ghouls.
Looking around, he observed the Essence of the ghoul sacrifice gradually die down, dimming from flesh to embers. The fluid along the walls was beginning to drip. Strain. He realized what this place was, then. Or at least he had a guess.
When he was but a ghoulling, he often wondered where his brothers disappeared upon venturing into the darker parts of the Penumbra. Now, he knew. They were being fed upon. The shadow ran down and far, this tunnel one branch of many leading into a vast Heaven hidden at the center of the underground, the vagueness of its shape a tree made out of a thousand nibbling jaws.
They weren’t entering a tunnel. This was a throat. They were walking into the stomach of a leviathan.
Zein sighed, intercepting his alarm. “It’s not going to eat us. Well, yes, metaphorically, but it’s not a bad thing. It is, however, bad if you let the tunnel collapse as then we would have wasted all this time and need to get another one of your kindred.”
“Worry not, master,” The Woundshaper added. “The creature that laps at us cannot slay us. The crone is right. By my judgment, the only fate that might yet befall us is to drown repeatedly and endlessly in its stomach acids as we learn how to make our escape.”
Encouraging.
Shooting another glare at Zein, he marched in, but not before sending Draus another thought. +If the Darkness starts chewing us, shoot Kae. Then yourself. I’ll try to kill Zein.+
A note of incredulity sounded from her depths. +Can you?+


+Said try. More likely she blows herself up again.+
+What?+
+Anti-matter bomb. Inside her.+
He ended the session just as Draus’ anxiety spiked. Ah, simple pleasures.
Entering the tunnel, each step cast a shiver into the floor and walls as he passed, melting like candles. The liquid dark beneath his claws flowed, pulling him deeper and closer inward. He felt a spike of fear spilling over from behind him. Not Draus. Definitely not Zein. Kae.
He wondered if feeding the Agnos to the dark would prove inimical for its structure somehow. Seeing as it consumed the ghoul’s ghost, he wondered what Kae’s might do. The sheer devastation that it might wreak was almost too tempting to resist. In scant seconds, the distance between him and the gateway turned from gulf to mirage, as if sensing his hunger for destruction.
He found himself standing before the twin doors of bone. On them, a cross parted them into four quadrants, each bearing a symbol. An owl eating a heart; a skull weeping endlessly; a man mutilating himself; and a figure engulfed in fire, embracing the flames.
The last of which flashed before him.
+WELCOME, DEFIANCE+
The loudness emanating from within the doorway made Avo’s mind shudder.
He shook his head. “Does it always do that?” he asked Zein.
“I cannot say,” she said. She twisted the hilt of her umbrella and–
And Avo suddenly remembered it was a sword.
A long blade rippled, casting afterimages on the tapestry of space and time. A dragon circulated the edge of her blade as she shouldered the weapon, its form lengthening into a curved glaive. “This is the first time I have been down here. The only other knowing of I have of this location is from the memory the Strix sent me.”

“Is that why you had me go in front?” Avo asked, incredulous.
Zein nodded. “Yes. That and this place has too many possibilities in play. It gives me a headache to read, truly. I wanted to see if anything would have killed you.”

His glare slipped past the older Godclad and onto the aerovec gliding in behind them. Draus and Kae were following. If something could kill him, then–

A hilt nudged his chest. “That is a mistake,” Zein said.
“What?” Avo asked.

“Considering the ephemerals,” Zein continued, face blank of jocularity. “They die, Avo. If you find either of the two interesting, find them a Frame. We tread a path mortals cannot follow. Lambs can not follow lions.”
Her words hung over him as she twisted her glaive, casting it's light above to part the flowing dark.

Shaking her words off, he turned to the pathway at hand, and took a step forward.
A click rattled from the door. The bone relief of the Low Masters dissolved. The veins of darkness flecked away.
Mustering his Heavens, Avo felt his blood surge as he pressed into the door, balming his mind with readied violence for whatever might await him on the other side.
The door sank inward at a push, its weight capitulating as if a curtain. Avo stepped into the grand confines that his former masters once indulged in, reviewing their planning and worship. Where the exterior delivered a front of muted darkness, the interior was a cascade of colors and silks. Four apses held multi-colored semi-circular frescos, colored church panes bearing the imagery of ages long past and histories forgotten.

The center of the room rose to become a dais, with four rune-carved paths trailing down its steps to vacant thrones of ebony. The interior itself was cavernous. Labyrinthine. Far larger than the outside suggested it would be, sprawling further than even his Whisper could travel.
Countless walkways lined the walls, leading into crevices of shadow, the railing perpendicular to the ground. Beneath the apses, Avo counted no less than a dozen intersections and bridges that defied the laws of gravity and geometry. The air was thick with a taste of some kind of antiseptic.
It wasn’t until he stepped in fully and beheld the panes of shimmering glass that lined the corners of the room that he saw something shining in the distance. It looked as if… a star. And a large, solid ball of chrome vines with concentric lanes of light spiraled around it.
Draus’ alarm speared into him with a note of surprise.
+Avo… I think we’re in the fuckin’ void.+
“To everyone who can hear this, this is the SCS George Washington. We are lost. We are lost within a spatial distortion.
There are things out here. Something… something grabbed us. Something swam out in from the darkness and grabbed us.
Systems are damaged. Central Shepherd AI is screaming. We can’t fix it–it's code is… burning? The damage doesn’t make sense! None of this shit makes sense!
It’s pulling us down. I think–I think it swallowed us. Swallowed the Napoleon too. We were planet-bound. Saw–saw signs of civilization on the surface. Sent out probes confirming sophont life–
[Rumbling]
Shit, we're revectoring our thrusts but it's like there’s no propulsion.
To all associated vessels of the Sol Central Equanimity, do not–I repeat–do not approach Quarantine Zone Id. Thaumic activity remains high. I repeat. Thaumic activity remains high.
The surviving crew are going into stasis. We’re going to secure ourselves. Try to get our Shepherd working again.
[Distortions; Possible memory-echo from ghost]
Oh, god, I’m so fucking scared.”
[Sobbing]
-Chief Admin Andrew McConney of the SCS George Washington, Sol Central ARKSHIP
9-3
Shadows of the Past
It was an unnerving thing, to be dwarfed by lost history. Avo didn’t yet know the lore behind this place, but stories sang from the structure itself, its bones colored with culture and history long lost to New Vultun’s memories.

Ascending, he found himself at the center of an immensity of a dias. Runes directed him forward, thrones gleaming distantly. The spilling headlights of Draus’ aerovec basked each an ominous shade, casting his shadow against them, a grotesque puppet as he led the way.
The runes parted like clay with each step. The sensation was disconcerting, like the ground itself molding to form better grips for his claws. The touch of darkness was far from the interior of this place, the grand gateway they entered rattling to a close behind them, flaps of pale whiteness bolted onto an interior of tesselated colors and ripe with the atmosphere of worship.
Before the gate came to a close, Avo watched as the Darkness crashed down, engulfing the tunnel behind like a wave smashing down on a narrowing tube. The light faded as thick strands of darkness collapsed, fusing together like a melding seam. The Essence of the ghoul they sacrificed resonated weakly, splashing down along the sides of the structure, deeper and deeper until he could sense it no more.
+Well,+ Draus said, eyes still fixed on the panes of glass lining the corners of the room, +hope we didn’t just make a one-way trip.+ Beyond the glass, swirling emptiness speckled with dots of nebula answered silently. Vast swaths of pustulating tumors oozed gouts of eldritch flame into the real.


+We can eat Thousandhand,+ Avo suggested. +Use her for food if stranded.+
Draus’ mind was filled with doubt. +Can you beat ‘er?+


+Eventually,+ Avo said. +Draw, at least.+
The obvious lie spilled over from his mind into hers as she scoffed. +Don’t think I want to eat no drug-fiend-old-lady meat anyhow. Suppose we’ll have to make do with you. Reckon we all got better odds with that.+
He sneered. +Did my beating knock something loose inside you?+
Her mind reacted, its sequences ringing with mockery. +Nah. Head’s clearer than it’s been in a while. Figure the old lady might wanna piece of you anyway. Seein’ how you run roughshod over your squad, and spent some time bein’ the holder of her piss-cans, I got guesses hangin’ in the back of mind, and that guess is that she got your number.+
Chancing a glare at Zein, he found the older woman nodding at him, expression one of pleasure and anticipation. Something inside twitched. Violence for him was like leaking gas. Always hissing, except all the world was a spark, and he could only take being taunted so long.
“Oh, don’t listen to that ox of a girl,” Zein said, tilting her blade so she reflected his salivating face. He furled his headplates together as a response. “Do as you wish. As will I. We are Godclad, after all.”

It felt as if the beast was burrowing deeper inside him, gnawing in his chest so he could calm the dissatisfaction of not killing her with his bare claws.
A faint ringing pulled his focus out of the conversation and back on one of the thrones. The seats stood apart from the room, forms speaking little of opulence but much of tradition. Bone inlays formed patterned sigils on each of the marble seats, their representations emblems to the Low Masters.
The ivory inlay in the throne of Defiance was calling out to him, a blackened, dormant locus embedded at its core suddenly snapping out from a hidden panel. Staring at the crystalline structure, he saw something flashing inside it, shining in a fashion only something bearing a paired memory would.
“It is safe,” Zein said. Bemusement spread across her face as she prodded the ground. The matter parted before the glaive, offering obedience instead of being pierced. The responsiveness continued to unsettle. “For you. Should anyone else connect with it, it will empty enough traumas into their mind to null a thousand-sequence strong warding.”
Like water rushing up a pipe, the first spills of ghost stuff flowed through and he connected. Blackened roots spread outward from the locus, manifesting as if an analogy lost between a fissure and expanding vein. From beyond the shimmering crystal locus and through the maze of hallways spilling up the structure like broken pieces from a kaleidoscope, ghosts flowed free, their flows rushing out like waters released from turned faucets. The locus embedded in the throne before him gleamed with a growing phantasmal presence. Sequences threaded themselves into the crystal as it spewed out a phantom.
'Human' failed to serve as an adequate descriptor for the simulacrum manifesting before Avo. As cards could be stacked, so mimicked the nature of this phantasmal construct, its body an endless mesh of individuals compressed into the space held by one, their minds symphonic but bereft of any melody; it felt as if he was beholding a thick stack perfected for processing mass, but not harmony.
Raw processing power, in simplistic terms.
HELIX ONLINE
CONNECTING TO THE SHEPHERD…
+He-hello, Defiance+ the phantoms greeted. He felt a strangeness to their nature. Like there was something of actual agency behind the beings thoughts, yet–almost similar to Kae–there was something damaged about them, and that each person in the cluster was meant to serve as a component. Filling. Something to hold the overall construct together.
There, at the center of it all, he noted a cluster of minds.
“What do we behold?” the Woundshaper asked, curiosity piqued as much as his. “How strange its architecture, like doorways built against each other, trying to bear an impossible yield.”
A strange uniform spilled over the phantom like water. Dark blue and lined with glinting synthetic hexagons, the chest formed a patch, the insignia a spear emerging from a sun to punch through eight planets and beyond. As it moved, it left inky imprints on reality, each echoing limb belonging to a different person. Its face was a turbulent sea vibrating with the frequency of countless minds shuddering against each other. He saw nothing of eyes, noses, or skin. Only the faintest of wrinkles, as if exhaustion was the only thing that couldn’t be scrubbed away.
Behind him. He heard the aerovec go quiet. A door hissed open. The static whine of a gauss rifle spinning up sounded. Draus couldn’t shoot a ghost, but they still didn’t know what else this place had in store for them.
+We have been expecting you,+ the ghost-hive spoke, voices a bone-shivering legion. +Would you like to begin your tour?+
“Tour,” Avo said. He could guess what was being offered, but his unfamiliarity with the place still unsteadied him. “Want answers first. Where are we? This place. What is it?”


The being registered his words as it thought, the wavy wrinkles on its face ebbing and collapsing, ebbing and collapsing. +All inquiries have been anticipated by prior fork: Walton. Please be seated for direct interfacing wth ark systems.+
“Ark,” Avo asked.

“I believe this used to be a voidship,” Zein said, an uncharacteristic frown plastered on her face. “Or a least, part of one. My, so many possibilities.”
“Know what I should ask?”
She tilted her head, as if trying to get a better signal from the future. “Strange is its nature. The possibilities are quite the inventory. You should sit. Dive into it.”
“Won’t eat my mind?” Avo asked.
She didn’t answer immediately, a wry look coming over her as she flattened her lips. “That depends on the future, little dagger. It nulls us all should I try to stab it with my blade, but not when I shoot it with a gun.”

Her wryness broke into a scowl. “Damnable ghosts. They are glaive-prejudiced.” Zein spat at the ghost. Her phlegm spattered dead-on with the locus. “Your fear of death offends me.”

The ghost-hive didn’t even turn to Zein, choosing to continue to address Avo instead. +Warning. Countermeasure: Thousandhand unable to be initiated. Missing key modules and components to devise pacification measures.+
Frowning at the phlegm, Avo scraped it from the seat with a twist of wind. Turning, he regarded Draus,who was standing behind her landed aero, gun laid over the top. “Draus. If it eats my mind–”

“Shoot you. Yeah. Know the drill.”

Zein turned to face the Regular, angling her body to show her fingers tapping along the shaft of her glaive. A wordless challenge was cast out. Draus chuckled.
“Alright, old-timer,” Draus said, “if it comes down to it, you’re on.”

Avo stared blankly. Comforting to know that his death was in good hands. A quick draw between Draus and Zein favored the latter by nature, but Thousandhand was too much a spirited competitor to cheat.
Much.
She might pull a nuke-pistol out from her sword.
INITIATING MIND-DIVE…
And suddenly, the world expanded. Sensors and diagnostic components lit up with Avo’s mind and interfaces expanded. From being a being of narrow perception, he felt his eyes explode, with multiple sensory feeds filtering data directly into him.
A splash of bolded reports ran up along the corner of his eye, but before that, he found himself drawn to a specific line of text.
It looked faintly Standard in script, though he–nor any ghost within him for that matter–seemed to harbor any knowledge of its origins.
+The text is in a language formerly known as English,+ the ghost-hive said, their words vibrating through him. An impossible quantity of ghosts flooded into him, cycling an endless deluge between him and the hive. +Beginning translation.+
Staring into the Nether, he peeked at their mem-data and found himself shaken.
He had no idea what he was looking at. There was but one sequence to this structure, but it ran on seemingly forever, each ghost coiled around the next, with something impossibly potent forming a spine at the center. And with the way it thought, he felt it far beyond human.
SCS George Washington, Sol Central ARKSHIP
CENTRAL MODULES DETECTED:
COMMAND NEXUS
CLONING POOL
GENE CLINIC
HYDROPONICS
EGI SHEPHERD CORE
All at once, the locations of each of the aforementioned modules became known to him. With a thought, he found himself able to peer out through the walls, the tessellating matter currently forming the shape of a template rapidly reshaping not unlike his Woundshaper could. Even better, perhaps.
From the walls, he could see with cameras and receive audio as well. They were currently in the command nexus, and it ran far longer than he anticipated. Ancient blueprints flashed in his mind alongside countless other stored templates. The halls, he realized, were but the latest templated design. At the time of its origination, the composition of the structure had been entirely fog-like, reshaping quickly to the whims of its staff.
The nexus ran for twenty kilometers. Kilometers? Voidwatch numbers. That made sense.
It was built more like a tower than a golem, its structure malleable on the inside, but hardened weaves made out of countless tubes forming a layered weave made from a hardened poly-silicon mesoskeleton. The other modules clung to the nexus from bridges and arms, each piece spinning. From outer visuals, it vaguely looked like twenty blackened cubes sheathed and melting over each other, with a few ovular extensions leading out from the length of its central body. The vast rings spun around its exterior, connected along crystalline lattices. Two were slightly cracked, and the machinery within looked long hollowed.
TURN SPEED: 9.8 m/s
It was through the tubes comprising the ship that darkness came flowing in. From what few visual sensors he had on the outside of the ship, he gazed out, trying to study the “void” itself.
An immense, pulsing construct of shimmering brightness took up his view, its resplendence coated in a shell of mirrors. Countless echoes undulated through the darkness, like currents rushing through synapses. They turned as if metallic upon being fed a death. On an instinctive level, he realized these weren’t stars, but Essence flowing. Other ghouls were being sacrificed. He felt the allure of their deaths. He felt the touch of their shine.
A throb cast a tidal wave out into the void. His feeds flickered as oblivion rushed up at him. Avo flinched back.
And the shadows passed through the ship, smiting nothing.
+The Heart of Noloth is purely a spatial-conceptual anomaly,+ the hive said. +It cannot inflict kinetic damage. Currently, it is running at minimal capacity. Much is hidden here. Even from itself. Would you like to begin your tour now?+
Avo grunted, still reeling from the impact which never came.
“That Heaven… it lacks a cycler,” the Woundshaper said. “These sacrifices must be made constantly. Without efficiency. But perhaps it does offer a function of quietude. The specificity of its offering and conditions allow the Low Masters an edge to their subterfuge indeed.”
The words spoken by the Woundshaper inspired Avo’s curiosity, and from it, his first questions flowed. “How long have you been here?”

+We were captured approximately one-thousand-five-hundred-and-seventy-two Sol standard cycles,+ the hive said. +We estimate that the Heart retreated beneath the surface of the planet some eight hundred cycles ago before we were dislodged into the catacombs of Old Noloth around five hundred cycles ago.+
Not content to only recite the history, it injected history itself directly into his memories. Schematics and slaves became known to him. Walton, dressed in ashen robes lined with rope-tightened bones stood before a gargantuan ship protruding from the underground.
A piece of glinting crystal protruded from his skull then, embedded deep as ghosts simmered out like a fog. In the haze, he saw the Hungers again, seeming far smaller in his memories. Countless pale-skin slaves hammered away, smashing and pounding through miles of rock and soil to carve the voidship free.
+The remaining modules of the SCS George Washington were then dismantled and re-anchored into the Heart approximately one hundred years ago to serve as the primary operations center for Low Masters of the Eternal City. Approximately one month prior, all users other than Defiance were wiped from administrative functions.+
“You pre-date the Godsfall,” Avo whispered.
Suddenly, he felt Zein leaning close. “Do you see anything about weapons? Or an armory? What arms does this ship have?”
+All non-listed modules are missing. All armaments and drive specs were lost due to critical system damage. Crew currently quarantined in EGI Core interior.+


“Crew?” Avo asked.” What do you mean crew?”

+Current crew members: Defiance–Avo plus two other fury class sophonts and one base-class sophont.+
Another spike of information filled his mind. A memory from Walton–or who he was before. They cut one of the crew out of her stasis pod. She screamed when he poured his ghosts directly into her. From her, they harvested implants. Pieces of technology they couldn’t yet understand.
Not until the arrival of Jaus, and with him, Voidwatch, did they fully learn that which they held.
Avo blinked. The way the information came to him was unlike any transfer of memory he ever experienced. No sequences flowed through, rather, it felt like he was directly getting a blast of static scenes carved into his mind. Studying the overall architecture of the hive again, he felt his fascination in bloom.
He had no idea how one could build an Auto-Seance into this thing, or even strike it for that matter. It felt like an entirely different creature grown out of a garden of human minds spliced with something impossibly robotic. Almost like a far more advanced version of the coldtech machine he interfaced with before the Crucible.
Sinking deeper into the locus, he felt himself enmesh with the ship’s systems, drowning, overwhelmed. +Yes,+ Avo finally said, +Yes. Start the tour.+
+Understood. Attention. Pre-recording initiating: Walton’s final farewell.+
Upon the dais, assembled from flecking motes of tessellating particles, an effigy of Walton formed.
An effigy savaged by the final stages of wombrash. Swollen pustules of murky whiteness rose along the man’s skull and chest, marring his form with pregnant lumps. The translucence of the rash clusters was filled with the deformed shapes of homunculi; their bodies were like drained apples. Most drifted, unmoving in their false wombs, dead without a chance to struggle.
A few others, however, fought on, pushing tiny twitching fingers out through the rupturing sores reaming flesh.
Through it all, however, Walton kept smiling, the expression on his face serene, his own death but an unexpected moment of rainfall to him.
Out of the aero now, Avo heard Kae whimper. “Oh… oh gods.”
+Hey, there, Avo,+ Walton said. A small hand punched out through the back of his skull. He coughed, reached up, and politely pushed the arm back in. The bulge protruding from behind his head began to thrash. +By the time you’re getting this, I’m probably long gone. I won’t lie. The main reason I’m doing this is jealousy. Pure and simple. Now, some parents get to teach their kids how to drive–well, command, an aerovec at least. Never got to do that with you. I think I would have liked it.+


He chuckled. The homunculi burst out from behind him, toppling free with a squleching noise. +I also think you would’ve gotten distracted by thinking about the passing birds. How they might taste to you. Anyway. I’m dead, but I’d still like to show you how to work this half-broken voidship I dug up.+ His chuckle bloomed into a full smile as genuine mirth glinted in his eyes. +Your “uncles” aren’t going to like this. Neither is that thing I used to call my god. The hells with them. You got my Frame. You got my Helix. Let me show you how to steal what’s left of an empire.+
+FIND HER! FIND THOUSANDHAND! GATHER YOUR WAR NODES AND RECLAIM THE HELIX! ATONE FOR YOUR SHAME!+
-Thoughtcast from Hungers to their Low Masters
9-4
The Stolen Thrones (I)
+Well, let’s start with a few things,+ Walton said, glancing sidelong at the small mutilated version of himself writhing on the ground. +I’m sure you’ve figured out this isn’t any old tower floating in the dark. It’s a ship. Older than those under Voidwatch, I figure. You’re going to want to access its command functions now if you haven’t. It’ll make the next part easier. You always were more of a hands-on learner, so you should get used to the instrument. You’ll be using it a lot.+
The interfaces were already aglow in Avo’s mind. Casting commands into them was a simple thing of desire, but he waited for Walton to continue.
+There’s a story to each part of this place,+ Walton said. +Well. More sins than stories, if I gotta be honest. Evil… is easy to run from. There’s almost always an excuse. But not here. Not for what we did to the crew of this ship. There were approximately twenty thousand alive after we dug up the ship. And we used all of them.+
“Used?” Kae whispered. She was listening too. Only then did Avo realize that the ghosts bearing Walton’s final words were echoing in the real. Something twisted inside him. By patterns of habit layered over intrinsic nature, he was a private creature. Before, it was to hide from a world that desired him dead. Now, the places unseen served him as new angles to strike from.
Walton didn’t sigh much in life. Matters big and small passed through him, his vessel more gate than person, accepting of all, and turning to face each situation with measured intensity. For him to reveal such strain now roused dread and curiosity within Avo, the emotions a chill spreading up through his bones. +I’m not going to talk about it without you seeing. You should see my mistake for yourself and decide how you feel. I know you’re not… well, that’s not your fault. You never asked to be, but you’re different. I… made you different. I made a lot of things different.+
A pause lulled as Walton’s face went distant. +Of all the symbols I’ve carved into this world, you’re about the only one I don’t regret. It’s not supposed to be my designation to think this way but… you don’t live amongst your enemies this long without learning something from them.+ A smirk came, it arrived a flicker, a shadow. +Third Law. Voidwatch had a saying about that from someone long passed called Newton. You should send an order to the EGI. Have it take you to see the core. You’ll see what I did there.+
The effigy of the man froze there. Hesitation found Avo before will did, his reluctance to proceed fixated on his father’s savaged form. Rising from the throne, he ignored the warnings cast into his mind by the hive as to better look upon the man he knew as father. He never remembered Walton to be so small, so shriveled in stature and life. Halfway into death’s embrace, the fourth of the Low Masters still possessed an inquisitive shine to his eyes. Where flesh failed, his will was never quenched.
Blanketed by his old coat, Walton slouched under the weight of countless suppurating pseudo-wombs as Avo regarded his father with new eyes. Something between them was irrevocably broken. After the incident in the Bazaar, even by proxy, to kill one’s own kin–own god!–was a mutilation of the spirit where only two paths could follow.
Suicide, or transformation.
Changed, augmented, and ascended, the Godclad ghoul stared down at a shadow of a man who fled from his own duty, his own design, even his other selves. All that given away, just to see his child made powerful?

“Why,” Avo asked, uncomprehending. The power of his Soul sang within him, a steady rippling radiance growing vaster by the day. But if this could have been granted to him, it meant another one of Walton’s nodes could have taken the Frame for themselves. Or given it to Zein.

“You will never know the answer with that one,” Zein said. She added a scoff afterward to dissuade Avo from thinking she was complimenting Walton. “The knowings Walton earned across the long stretch of his life is more than words can convey. You are more symbol to him than person. Atonement perhaps. Or an idealized form of that he lost, resurrected and ascended to deification.”
“That which he lost,” Avo said. He considered Zein’s words. A single name came back to him, pushing past all he spoke of with the Hungers. “Avohakten?”


He did not read certainty on Zein’s face. “Perhaps, though even I know little of his tale. Nor do I care.” Thousandhand shrugged. “It was of little concern to me. I would have only been interested if my love told me to kill them. Jaus was the one that cared. Him. And only him.”

A wisp of sadness leaked into the Nether, but in its wake, the waters of hope stained the periphery of the emotion bleeding out.
Glancing at Walton’s frozen face once more, Avo turned back to the task and cast out his command.
HELIX ACTIVATING
TRANSITIONING TO EGI CORE…
The chamber they were in did not move suddenly. Nor did they ascend like an elevator. Rather, parts of asymmetric staircases tore away from the walls in series, particulates splitting as the steps turned parallel with the walls, backs fusing into eight main columns. Then, the steps spilled down, washing down and past the command nexus.
Within his mind, he saw that the command nexus was but a small bowl protected by layers upon layers of smart-matter hulling. They were located kilometers deep and the room itself was formed from countless minute pieces. Like blood cells. Technology here resembled biology closer than he first anticipated.
“There is a poetry to eternity,” the Woundshaper murmured. “A rhythm that comes to every eon. When you have lived and learned and suffered and slaked every pleasure there is to please, every pleading desire within, some time afterward, perhaps in another place altogether, you find yourself faced with a moment of uncanny symmetry. Such is the tapestry of existence.”
Series of locks sounded as the stairs finished forming along the chamber. Brightly lit fabrics bearing the eight planet insignia hanging around them shivered as a hum of something ran through the walls. And then, a thin veil formed overhead, pouring down like a transparent sheen. Something snapped into place.
Spreading his awareness wide with his Heaven of Wind, Avo sensed the surge lancing through the structure around him before the hive even filtered the knowledge over.
The ship was reconfiguring its organs to something of a rail line, converting the steps into railings and remolding the shape of their chamber in totality.
A light lurch greeted him. A velocity vector flashed in the corner of his interface.
100 KM/H
Their acceleration rose fast, but he felt little of the drag, the ground itself conspiring against physics as the depression beneath his feet helped cup him in place. Using the chance to examine the ship itself through the various feeds, he found himself drifting through emptied halls and quivering gray hallways.
Small cells lined the walls. There were communal areas that shuttled aside upon their approach. The ship held as much control over its own internal architecture as he did his blood using the Woundshaper. And there wasn’t even the touch of the divine about this place.
“There’s a testament if I’ve seen one,” Draus said. She was looking around as well, examing the material of the surfaces around her. “Always knew the voiders been holdin’ out on us. But this.” She gritted her teeth. “Yeah, that’s right. We were somebody even without the gods.”

A muted bemusement pulled Zein’s lips into a silent sneer.
It took little time for them to arrive at the EGI Core, its location but five kilometers toward the stern. Through sensor feeds connected to Specters connected to ghosts connected to hyper-advanced technology, Avo watched as walls melted into halls and checkpoints. Junctions built themselves ahead of time as something akin to a G-Tube platform.
Curiosity consumed him as he reached out with a strand of blood and felt the pattern around him. A stable structure greeted him. Silicon of a strange nature. Silicon and no more. Perhaps with more memories could he match the versatility of this vessel, but as of now, it possessed a means to feed him properties of different pieces of matter. He need but consider–
He considered adding the structure of a locus to his Canon of Memory. He considered the locus embedded in the throne, but stopped himself. He would check the other thrones later. If they would not do, then the aerovec would present a consumable option.
Perhaps there was something here. Something that could allow him to augment his threat potential in the Nether while still keeping his profile low.
ARRIVED AT EGI CORE
A loud note pealed through the room suddenly as they came to a halt. As the protective dome shielding them melted away, they found themselves standing before a vast pane of crystalline glass–the properties of the matter making the Woundshaper shiver with excitement. Beyond the limpid wall, however, a vast orb spun in layers of matter and fluid.
At its core, Avo thought he could see something swirling, the hive telling him it was some manner of ferromagnetic substance to help improve the non-newtonian computation efficiency of the governing intellect. Curved plates spun at an impossible rate while four large arms extended out to fuse into the walls of the vast assembly. Massive rods ejected an endless spew of heat into the spatial darkness, the temperature capable of reducing an entire megablock to molten slag in seconds.
Whatever it took to power this engine conventionally, it would be enough to unmake several districts should they be bereft the blessings of a sufficiently powerful Heaven.
Walton began speaking again then, his presence bleeding over into the hive as he materialized in the Nether as well. +When we found the core all those years ago, it was damaged. Leaking radiation. But thankfully dormant. I spent a hundred thousand slaves trying to march in and plug its gaps. A hundred thousand wasted lives. The solution came in the form of the flesh-carved that the Sang were offering at the time. They weren’t yet plagued by their gender split with their chrono-dynastic overlords then, so dealing with them was easy.+
Avo realized then that the Walton in the Nether was but a recollection. A replay of the past. A mirage of thousands of blood slaves, each marked by a pale owl painted onto their chest, flickered and broke within the EGI core. They barely lingered, the heat so intense it would have vaporized the screams leaving their cooking lungs.
Beasts took their place, most of the creatures rubbery in texture, with a few certain humanoid individuals behind them. Those looked like Essus. Like the boy Embers. Was that what his clade was called? Avo blinked. The father. The father had slipped from his mind again. How long had they let him linger? Looking within himself, the promise he made to the man hung like a weight chained to an unseen noose.
Just another reason to strip immortality from Mirrorhead.
+We didn’t know much about the nature of radiation then,+ Walton admitted. +But ignorance, as you might have learned, can be overcome through raw logistical output. I fed lives into this chamber as the Hungers studied the damage and tried to tease out its secrets. Necrotheurgy wasn't quite what it was now. Between us and the Ori Overclan, there were maybe a few thousand ghosts at the most. No phantasmics. Certainly no Nether. We had to do things a more direct way. Thankfully, we had help.+
The girl they pulled from stasis returned. She was not yet dead. Upon a sacrificial altar, she was placed and she thrashed against the thick chains, howling, crying out in fear and confusion. He watched as Walton–or the complete person that Walton had been–tread over to the struggling girl, the crystal impaled through his head casting a haze of thoughtstuff into the air, the faint visage of the Hungers drifting over him like a cloud.
In pristine white robes he was garbed, and on his back was the blackened shape of an owl smeared. Flanking his sides, filthy slaves knelt, openingly weeping as he tread upon every teardrop without fail. As he approached the altar, two muscular figures step forth and slit their own throats.
The captive shrieked with terror as their blood spilled down, painting her red as waterfalls of blood gushed from their throats. Avo realized their daggers were both ceremonial and crystalline. The same structure as a locus. The same hue as that which was embedded in Walton’s skull in the past.
Reaching out, the Hungers shuddered as Avo tried to understand just what was happening with them. He saw no ghosts flow out from it. He saw it take nothing from those who died.
+Don’t look for reason where there is none, son,+ Walton said, shaking his head. A frown of shame shadowed his face. +Everything that happened here was just a ceremony. Something that we thought would offer us more guidance.+ He laughed. +Me, and the ones I served both. You know the Hungers are religious. It’s absurd to say. Gods usually are seen as the endpoint of the thaumic pipeline but… I was a priest to an esoteric cult, and I mean that in the deepest sense possible.+
Why? Such was the question Avo had for his father. Was it ignorance?
The answer came thereafter. +I suppose I already knew we were just killing people for the rote of it. I had a son once. A blood son. I–uh.+ Walton’s lip quivered. +There was a war in Noloth. A war before all the others. A war with ourselves. The hive can tell you about the details. I’ll just… lie about parts of it. It came down to me and my faithful on the side of the Hungers, and my son, Avohakten… well, he decided he wanted nothing to do with that.+


Back in the memory, someone handed Walton a knife. It was the same kind of blade that the two sacrifices used to finish themselves. The girl’s voice turned mouselike, squeaking.
+I killed him,+ Walton said. A quavering breath left him. +I killed my boy. And not even for a real god.+
The blade descended and–to Avo’s surprise–shattered against flesh. Walton stumbled back, hissing as jagged pieces bit into him. The girl, meanwhile, coughed as if she had been struck by a hammer than a blade.
Walton chuckled at that back in the real, seemingly shaking his head at his prior folly. +Her name was Sarah Myers. She was from a place called “Mars,” I believe. I didn’t know this at the time, but I just tried to stab someone with combat-grade nanosuites with a brittle piece of crystal. I was a fool. A damned fool. If you can see the Hungers drifting over me, they’re telling me to find another knife and try again, cursing at me for not believing enough in the promise of paradise.+


The memory shuddered. Time skipped forward. Daggers broke, and in their place came actual blades, first mundane, then god-touched.
+It took me three days to finally kill her. I bled her out. By the second, she had somehow learned my language and was begging me directly to spare her. I understood her, and I still cut into her. The thought was to use her as an offering to the Hungers–to feed her mind to their consensus so they would understand the secrets within this place. It worked.+ Walton’s face turned ashen. +It worked…+
And suddenly, in the place of the girl were countless other members of the crew. Each by each they were bled. No improvements were made to the process of butchery; the ritual was repeated in rote repetitions as if the mistakes themselves were deemed sacred by the Hungers.
They parted the bodies of their implants and unclasped the flesh from bones. One hundred. Two hundred. Three. And then the sacrifices stopped. Suddenly, the scene was different again, and Walton was standing in the middle of the ship, looking at rows of cryopods grown into the wall, the structure like a hive, a honeycomb.
+You know the worst thing about serving the Hungers,+ Walton said, gazing off into the distance. Another one of his rashes popped. This time, Avo could hear the soft cries of the homunculi. +They’re uninterested in the truth. They’re uninterested in the true nature of things. I suppose that’s what happens when you make an eternally self-repeating city from all those marked of the noble caste. The voiders were a sign there was a time before us. But to the Hungers, we had to be the eldest city, the first city, the first civilization. And so it came to be that the voidships were a Nolothi invention and that this was a birthright was just… kind of forgotten.+
A chuckle of disbelief escaped him. He shook his head.

+As for what followed. Ask the EGI to show you the extension.+
Avo did, and the arms connected to the core went transparent as well.
He saw them. All them. The remaining members of the crew. Their bodies twitched like wrinkled fruits on grapevines, the branches made from the purest crystal. There were thousands of them. More. Much more. Each one had tubes grafted into them, their shapes disfigured but their survival was ensured by being fused to the ship, to the core.
+Even after drinking those minds, the Hungers still didn’t fully know how this place worked. I doubt the crew did either. Whatever that core was, there was a lot more to it before it went down. Even now, we’re using the living crew as extensions. Scaffolding. Interfacing points for our ghosts.+ Walton turned, then, seeming to gaze out the window as well. +They’re still aware, you know. Still aware somewhere inside. But there’s nothing left of them to protest. Not since we modified their minds after.+
Walton gave a chuckle. +You know the funny thing is, this might not even be the worst thing I did to these people.+
Some part of Avo wanted the tour to stop. He didn’t want the Low Masters and Walton to join. He didn’t want atrocity to be the last thing he knew of his father.
He was supposed to be the ghoul. The monster.
Walton should have been pure.
Someone should have.
+You’ll see when we get to the cloning pool,+ Walton said. +You’ll understand.+
My dearest Uncle Vincentine:
Again, you’re a piece of shit.
I told you this last we spoke, but I would like to do it again in case you forget and start developing a positive self-regard.
I requested seven days of leave for your matter and I will see it resolved in seven days. Coincidentally the four members of my cadre have also requested a period away from duties.
The Longeyes surprisingly approved.
Whatever you’re involved in has them intrigued.
I recommend that I encounter my mother in the best of care unless you wish for me to break your other arm. You should tell her I’m coming. Don’t forget this time. You've failed her enough for one life.
Now, before I arrive, send me what you have on this “Mirrorhead.” It has been some time since I faced a Clad of Guild Highflame. I wish to know my prey.
-Reva Javvers, Bloodthane of Stormtree
9-5
The Stolen Thrones (II)
The spawning pools did not strike Avo as something comparable to the EGI Core. Few things could compare to the wonder of yesteryear struggling on for eons, still emitting enough natural power to boil a portion of the city. However, something equally ponderous burdened him as the architecture around them shifted again, the nexus shuttling them through the labyrinths of the SCS George Washington.
All through his travel, the weight of his father’s atrocities dwelled on him. Even devoid of the capacity for true empathy, Avo did pity those who dwelled within this ship. The cosmic injustice of their suffering was a thing more absurd than it was tragic to him. Imagine awakening after spending eons trying to outlast a nightmare, only to be cast into another.
The ghouls were always meant to be instruments; their fates deemed them beasts pre-broken to fit the groove of brutality and whatever other desires the Hungers and Low Masters deigned.
But the crew of the George Washington? What great transgression were they born under? What a miserable fate for so random an encounter.
In his infancy, Avo would have never considered such a thing. Never fixated on the fate of another beyond if they offered him nourishment. Now, even past his time with Walton, concept of self set free from shattered chains, it was a yearning for meaning that subsumed him.
The crew of the voidship met hell and torment through no fault of their own. No choice. All of this was injust circumstance upon circumstance.
And in that, Avo thought he could taste the bitterness behind their hollowed lives.

Walton looked regretful, but the younger man he was in ancient memory struck Avo as a weak creature, someone lesser that teased the beast itself. He felt the monster inside him yearn to taste the flesh of his father’s former self as if he was but meat instead of lord.
There was a liberation to such a desire. And a philosophical dread.
How fickle were the bindings of familial piety? Was this a continuation of the node’s actions? Of Walton’s desire to see the chains between him and Avo broken? To free him from anything they shared, all toward the end of undoing the Low Masters. His claws dug into the oddly yielding railing of the speeding platform.
“Avo,” Kae asked. Her voice was thin. Uncertain. He noticed her then as he had not noticed her before. A mouse among wolves, her presence was the only to kindle the flames of his bloodlust. “Do you… uh… do you think you can… fix them?”

She was asking about the trapped crew. The ones used as patchwork machinery–phantasmal scaffolding enmeshed to the crippled coldtech. Their pain lingered, but came as faint echoes of dreamers where still wakeful minds would offer the fullness of screams.
How strange it was that she stood among them, shielded by the unshaken wall of Draus and Zein watching the bulkhead modules fly by. Perhaps this was empathy, then. She thought the crew her bedfellows in pain despite their differences. To him, she seemed their inverse. It was the Nether that she was broken in, and it was coldtech that kept her standing.
“Don’t know,” Avo said, genuinely unsure. It would take time for him to review the damage. Time that would be devoted to many other things before that. Still, it was something worth considering. What shape would the mind of a freed ancient be?
Kae’s worried fidgeting pulled him back to the present.

“Only one out of all of us,” Avo said.


She blinked. “What?”

“You,” he continued as she looked up at him. “I thought my father was good. But it was a lie. Too much of him was a lie.”

Empathy. It lay naked across her face when his words finally caught up with her. He found himself more unnerved by the fact she cared so much. He looked to Draus, to Zein–their attentions sweeping the structure itself, poking Walton’s frozen form still seated on the throne.
“I’m not… not a good person,” Kae said. “I-if that’s what you’re saying… I did something. I did something… I can’t remember. I should have died. W-would have without… Draus.”

He offered her nothing but a grunt in return. Perhaps she needed empathy also, but he hadn’t the strength nor the want to fake it. Her damage had always captured his fascination, but watching her struggle he realized she was joined with him in mystery. The fullness of her past was lost to her as well.
“We’ll discover it in time,” Avo said. “Once I take the flame from your mind.”

That sparked a flash of joy in her eyes. A smile spread across her face. “I-it would be nice to… to think clearly again.”


The blue uniformed phantom gestured above them, the stack of ghosts flickering.
ARRIVING AT CLONING POOLS
Unlike the EGI Core, they drifted below the cloning pools as if entering the tunnel of an aquarium. The apses above them went transparent, the domes clearing as Avo looked up, gazing into a roiling haze. The “pool” seemed more fog-like than liquid, perpetually clenched in an onslaught of stormstuff.
+Before the… betrayal,+ Walton said, his formerly frozen form animated again, +we were planning to grow an army here. As I mentioned, the full use of the ship still escaped us. Even with access to the core. The damage was too severe and our understanding of science was…+
He laughed. +We still don’t understand the science. Maybe only Voidwatch can run this thing properly. Or the No-Dragons, thanks to their dedication. Regardless, we did what we could and tried to make ourselves new warriors. Slaves. Anything to serve Noloth.+ Avo had never seen his father seem sheepish, but today, Walton was offering him a great many firsts. +You should tell the nanos to clear up. You’ll understand.+
Dread made him hesitate, but what else could he do. With command sent, the miasmic swarm ceased its constant crawl. The murkiness vanished and at the center of the pool was a tower some fifty stories. Countless cells dotted its sides as strange fluids seemed to churn through unseen pipes.
+One-hundred-and-sixty-four cloning cells,+ the hive said, offering him a detailed answer. +Previous bioform fabrications completed. Production space available. Warning: licenses for class-I sophancy and uplifting categories are missing and therefore cannot be undertaken. Warning: central core damage. Unable to access neural transfer options directly. Please send a hyperwave communique to your nearest Sol Central admin for assistance.+

Through the dozen or so sensors in the room, he zoomed in until he found himself looking upon the interior of each cell. Anticipation clenched tight inside him, body tightening as if expecting a fated blow.
The blow never came. What he saw within the translucence were not ghouls. Not obviously anyway. Yet, he still found himself unable to regard the creatures behind the shielding as humans. Baseliners anyway.
They were too thin and elongated, fingers long and milk-white. Their bodies had a moon-hued membrane, and there, the first semblance of similarity struck him. Like his old skin, he could see past the outer layer. Thin strands of tendon and sinew were exposed, but instead of eel-like cords the musculature was a strange web dotted with nodules, a few of which even emerged from the skin. Casts of resin-thick scabs lined their eyes and other orifices. Behind them, strange flesh-like wings expanded outward in thin tassels.

+The crew called these the “helios,”+ Walton explained. +You might be able to consider them your parent design. Or at least your primary template anyway. Don’t have the licenses to make the pool print any other template so we worked with what we had. And then we used all the active modifications in the gene clinic to do the rest.+
At the mention of the gene clinic, its location flashed in Avo’s mind just below the spine of the cloning pools. Each cell of the pool was capable of flushing its “products” down through a network of tubes running within, dumping a clone into a specialized grafting station dedicated to the remodification of gene structures. Unlike the fog filling the cloning pools, the clinic was no more than a ten-meter by ten-meter tank filled with shimmering fluid.
+I know you’re wondering it,+ Walton said. +And yeah, if you got something you want to add to yourself, you can go in there too. But I recommend you test what you’re doing before you start. I’ve… made a few mistakes with some of my nodes before. Decided to keep myself mostly natural after that. But that didn’t spare the helios.+
A new memory flashed into place, this moment of Walton’s recollection less ancient in time. He stood as four now, each of them bifurcated from the other, their stances and demeanors betraying different inclinations and virtues. Gathered in the same place where Avo and company now stood, the Low Masters watched as they released one of the helios from its cell.
Holding itself up on long unsteady limbs unused to bearing weight in an environment with gravity, the bioform watched as the bridge extended over to it. Like an infant, it cooed with a slightly wet tone as it slowly crawled through the drifting fog toward the Low Masters.
Minutes later, it had a hand against the transparent material of the pool, looking down from its near eight feet of height down upon the ones that had woken it, a pet greeting a master.
If only it could comprehend what was to come.
+A helio is a bit like a nu-dog; a simple child,+ Walton explained. +Without the proper licensing or clearance, that’s the best we could do. There was enough human in it to understand us. Voidwatch might consider it a subspecies sheathe from what I understand of them. Again, it wasn’t their fault. You–they never asked for this. For what we did. They didn’t have the capacity to resist–something was missing from their minds, it left them unable to comprehend violence.+
The memory shifted ahead to the helio shrieking. The notes it sang came gurgled and high, with a pained sibilance that Avo had heard too often in his brothers. The Low Masters had forced ghosts into its mind to see what they could discover, the roughness of their intrusion mangling its already brittle sense of self.
The helio lasted a few seconds longer before its thoughtstuff shattered entirely, cognition winking out and crumpling before the Low Masters’ efforts.
+They will serve,+ one of them said. +They have the capacity. Our lords might just find some relief in them.+
Another scoffed. +Yeah. Aren’t going to be much use in a fight though.+
+That can be changed,+ the first said, looking down at the gene clinic option. +Natures can be remolded.+
A coldness filled him. Slaves. All the Low Masters knew was slavery–to steal slaves from other people, to make slaves of free people. He remembered Walton stabbing the girl again and again, driven to folly instead of reason each time. The scene of the crew fused like a slapdash dreamer farm to the EGI Core returned to him. Now this.
This was pathetic.
The man he called father knew better. Had done better.

But at the behest of a most undeserving master, he succumbed to being less than a worm.
How could the ghouls have ever been true terrors if they were crafted by hands so unworthy, wills so feeble?
“There is more than one way to be in chains,” the Woundshaper said.
Emotions clashed within Avo. He gnashed his teeth together. He wanted to tear into someone. Hurt something. That was what his biology understood. Yet, beholding the currently unmoving forms of the helios–the creatures meant to serve as his mold, he succumbed to nobler desires instead. “I wanted him to be who I dreamed he was,” Avo said. The taste of truth was bitter, but through his newly obtained power and discoveries, they came without fear. “I wanted something more than feeling. Something higher to believe in.”

Turning his attention to the module that was the gene clinic, lines of mem-data spilled across his feed, telling him how much “material” was left for use. Things relating to alloys or functional nanites were missing. Genetic modifications likewise were limited to a few options–mostly enhancements made for surviving in space like flatulence propulsions for travel through the void and dermal-thermal crystallines for heat.
Then, a few select options came up, marked for favored use. Claws. Enhancements to hearing. Night vision. Digitigrade legs. Prehensile claws. “Omniskein musculature.” Several others drifted through his mind, each piece carving the towering humanoid more into shape, more into being a ghoul. The final item on the enhancement list was not described, the functions of which were redacted. Error lines dotted its sides, leaving only its name read.
+Category-3 Haemophage,+ the hive said. +Cellular reconstructor.+
WARNING: THE USE OF THIS MODIFICATION WILL PRESENT SEVERE RISK TO UNPROTECTED ECOSYSTEMS; ANY DESTABILIZATION IS AGAINST SOL CENTRAL CHARTER AND WILL RESULT IN A FORMAL INVESTIGATION IN BOTH THE ADMIN AND THE EGI. IF FOUND GUILTY, ALL PARTIES WILL BE ASSIGNED TO REHABILITATION
Avo blinked. Admin and the EGI? A single person and the ship itself were to be charged? What manner of society did this vessel originate from?
Walton shivered. +By now you should have seen what we did to these… things. Yeah. Every one of the helios goes through that. Hungers might tell you that your form is designed to be “slave-shaped” or something like that. They tell you that, know that they’re lying. Your body is the way it is because this is what we got. Had some success over the years changing your brothers with biomancy but those were special cases. This is our standard. All it takes for this to run is some organic components is all. Fed it to the cloud in the cloning pools and you got what you need.+
A brief lull came over Walton. +We tried putting other things in the pool before. It takes matter apart. I think it's a bit like one of the Voidwatch deconstructor swarms, except more toward factory use.+ He contemplated his words. Something popped underneath his coat. The rash was killing him. +I think they suspected we had this ship. Suspected it from the moment they realized the nature of your design. If you ever find an angle, you should try talking to one of Voidwatch’s governors. The ship’s yours so… if you can get it back to them without the Hungers noticing or stopping you, that might be something they want. I can’t rightly say how they’ll react to you. They never did like Noloth much. Not since the Hungers had us attack those ships of theirs.+
“Ah,” Zein said, nodding as if she was recalling a fond incident from her past. “Yes. The alloy embargo of ‘44. The Nolothi managed to cripple a few Voidwatch humanitarian vessels, killing much of the “citizenry” they were attempting to extract.” She smirked. “I must say, I remember what came after most fondly. It was a rare thing, to see all eight of the Guilds working in tandem. The devastation they wrought on your father’s people was sublime.”

She barked a laugh. “And the Hungers must’ve thought they had a chance. What hubris. But hubris is unbefitting of those unblessed by divinity.”


+They’re still not ghouls yet,+ Walton continued. +Not really. Something about them comes out missing. I think it’s related to damage inflicted on the core. Or something within the system that doesn’t allow neurology to be transferred. But the Hungers… they have a way about shaping a mind… seeding something that’s more than ghost but less-less than a person.+ He drew in a breath. Something was nudging itself under the fabric of his coat. He looked down. He smirked. +Well, Avo. Looks like you have a sister.+ He looked down again. +Had.+
Zein snorted a light note of amusement through her nose.
“Somethin’ ‘bout the air, Thousandhand?” Draus asked.

Zein cocked her head at the Regular. “The ghoul’s feelings are intact. Don’t you worry, girl.”

“My ma and pa called me girl. They’re dead. You call me Draus.”

+The Low Masters–Noloth… they still have other facilities under them. Other instruments. But this was their sanctuary. It’s someplace where we could all hide away from the topsiders. Plan our next moves. Strike from the darkness. And now, I’ve stolen it from them, and I will it to you.+
Walton straightened himself and sighed. +I wish I named you something else. Avo. I took that name from my son. My dead son. Through all this, my hope had been that I could bring him back in another world. In the eternal city promised to me. But I’ve lived for too long. Lived. Not existed. I’ve seen the world and you know what, my loss isn’t a good enough excuse anymore. Neither was my cowardice.+
Stepping forward, Avo faced his father as the man coughed. He reached out, as if to grasp the man, but his claws halted inches away. Walton wasn’t there. Walton was dead. This was but a shadow; an echo.
+It is with another atrocity that you were born,+ Walton said, staring through Avo. +All the dreams and thoughts and ghosts. Once, they could only exist in a locus. Linger within the crystallized puddles of time. But with the Hungers trapped, the world finds an engine for the Nether to keep growing. But with it comes nightmares. Pain. Suffering. And through us, they pour it into the bioforms, and we mold it into shape, into you.+
And for the first time, a shiver of determination surged through Walton. +Listen to me: I didn’t catch the rash on accident. I know you never asked, but you know how I was. I could have never–I got it because its canons would blind the Hungers and stop them from looking through me. It gave me a chance to alter my Helix, to prepare and plan this.+


“Why,” Avo asked. His Echoheads chittered and rattled, his frustration bleeding over into them as agitation. One of the cracked against the ground as he demanded, “What are you saying?”


Walton swallowed. +The memories you had as a ghoulling. That was a collection. I didn’t… I harvested the experiences from all your previous selves. The idea came to me the first time I saw you, dying in that playground. It stayed with me after that instance of you died, but I plucked the memories from you. From there I… I took other things from people I knew. Apprentices I taught the art to. Stole sequences from other ghouls–the ones that exhibited the most control. And then, finally, I poured all that I had… all that I could into you. And added some parts of me as well, just so there would still be something left of me after I’m gone.+


Suddenly, the man who had been his father seemed so small. One could accept horror, but it seemed they could not turn from it. Not fully. +You are my greatest work. My instrument of hope. My well wishes. You are the new shape of my dreams. The day I perfected you and finally brought you back up the Tiers with me, to that block, that day when the nukes fell and you asked to learn the art from me properly. That was when I knew I made a new life. Something more than just a monster meant to serve as an instrument of vengeance; a dumping pit for traumatic bandwidth.+
+The Hungers… they don’t grow. They don’t learn all they do is eat and hate and cling to the past. They are stagnation incarnate–a city refusing to change its ideals, to transform and face the truth or the future. And for so long, I was the same. But in living… in building you, I think I finally breathed life into something that mattered.+
Walton swallowed. +There was a myth. A myth I found while diving through this very ship. It was of a god that breathed fire into clay. And was punished for it by other gods. Punished because it taught the clay how to perform the same art. I see how you suffered for us. All of you. It shouldn’t be this way. I should have been a better father. I was never a better father. But…+ He steeled himself. +You can be what I never was. You have all I consider virtuous. To seek a higher path than rank cruelty, but I kept the monster inside you. Made it stronger even, because I never want you to mistake the nature of this city, this world.+
+New Vultun wants to eat you, Avo. The Godclads want to eat you. The darkness between the stars, the things that lurk in the Ruptures… We live in a world of monsters. Man isn’t enough. Never enough. But you are beyond pain. You have the potential for cruelty and gnosis both. You are my cure for this city, for this unending war.+
More pustules opened. A loud screech came muffled from within Walton’s right thigh. He took a step forward. Avo took a step back. +I don’t know what future you’ll bring. If you’ll even succeed. If all my desires will bear fruit or wither on the vine. But I don’t care about that anymore. I just want one thing, and that’s for you to see all the colors that life can bring.+
A sound came from beyond the memory. Walton froze. +I think that’s all the time I might have. The Hungers. The Low Masters. Their operations are hidden in the EGI. You have the advantage. You can take from them without them seeing you coming. Use Thousandhand. End the mistake of my parting.+ He drew in a breath. +Be who you want to be. Never let this city, this world bend you from what you choose. We have been denied too long. That’s all I ask.+
And with a final nod, he took a step back. +Goodbye, Avo. I… ah. It is as it goes. Nevermind me. Do what you will.+
With a final step back, Walton’s leg gave out from beneath him and he tumbled down and the ghosts dissolved, the phantoms unraveling. Silence reigned. Avo stared at a void inside him expanding.
A hunger grew. A hunger grew greater than ever. For memories. Experience. Wholeness. Totality.
A light breath unsheathed itself from Zein. “I suppose with that passed, we should move on to more meaningful matters. Congratulations, little dagger, you have an ancient voidship. Now, let us talk about the war it's going to help us fight.”
+Chambers. Wake up. Time for you to be useful.+
-Avo to Aedon Chambers
9-6
Deliberate Balance
“But before that? Shall I formally welcome you to the war?” Zein asked, her words slightly slurred. Drugs were almost certainly involved. “It seems rather fitting, no?”
A numbing quietude settled on Avo. He ignored the joy fiend and found himself staring at the helios more and more–the atrocity of creating the ghouls an act of mockery not even achieved by the Low Masters’ own merits.
He was a failed monster. He was a failed monster because his creators were fools playing with someone else’s pieces. But now, the primary instrument facilitating their sins belonged to him.
The question was what he was to do with it.
After the node had severed him from their code, from familial piety, Avo sought the flavor of new experiences. New Minds. He thought of Req again, the slave he freed, the slave that killed when given the option. Activating the mem-lock, he could taste the distant mind. Fascinated by how the man suffered for it after, agonizing over one murder.
Perhaps this was a thing of Walton’s design as well. To let him sate himself on the world, his hunger for ever-building knowledge purposeful.
The revelation behind the fullness of his nature did not shake him so much as flood him with a coldness that pervaded through his bones. For years, he hated his brothers for failing where he succeeded. He cared little for communal bonds with them, but to stand alone as the only creature amongst his kindred, as a being of higher personhood, made him fear his own making.
Perhaps it was worry that another of the ghouls could achieve what he did. Go beyond. Usurp the uniqueness of his design from him.
Or maybe he genuinely dreaded being a member of a subspecies that was fundamentally broken; less than; never to be better.
Mayhaps both things could be true at once.
Facing his predecessors once more, Avo contemplated what he was to do with them as he finally turned to face Zein. “Think I was welcomed before this. Welcomed when I got the Frame.”

Zein seemed to agree with his words. “Hm. Yes. I suppose you can regard such as truth. But you were a bystander then. Groping blindly through the black, unaware of the larger picture at play, the greater powers pulling you in their wake. Now you swim in deep waters. Now you are part of the fight.”

“Part of it. Yes.” Avo leaned down. “What part are you? Ninth Column. What do you want from this war? Kill your daughter? Break the Guilds? Take over?”

Honesty pealed from Zein’s mind, its directness central to her nature. “Why I want what all Godclads eventually want. What the Low Masters and their Hungers want. For my vision of reality to surmount all others. You cannot escape it. We channel the absolute, and the absolute reshapes us. To accept anything less would be an act of violence against the self, and I will offer no mercy for anyone who transgresses against my person, even if it is myself.”

“Shit,” Draus said, scoffing lightly, “more flowery philosophy and no actual substance. Avo, I’m gonna shoot you if you turn into this.”

Zein flicked Draus a bemused glance. “You speak like you will not be touched by the flame yourself.”

The Regular scoffed. “I ain’t no ‘Clad.”

“No,” Zein said. “Not yet.” Her gaze returned to Avo in a blink. He didn’t even see her eyes move. “I don’t want to change the world. Just enough to bring back my love, see his dream made manifest, kill a certain amount of people, and amend a, uh, mistake I made with my daughter.”

“Don’t care about shaping your own world?” Avo asked.

The gleam in her eyes was sharp. “I enjoy the current state of things. If Jaus wishes to alter it when I return him into being using the Ladder that Will Be, then so be it. One must make concessions in matrimony, but I like the way it is.”

He considered Thousandhands' words and found the creep of disillusionment settling upon him. “Still about power. Always about power. Nothing more?”
“No, little dagger, your view falls short. It’s not about power, but totality. The totality of our expression triumphing over the tapestry itself. The stars are lost. Existence is a wounded, dying animal. We are the bearers of the last true power, and so, a reset will be battled over. A revision where slate is cleaned and the waters might rightly flow. Or not. Such is a matter of perspective.”

A moment of silence passed between them. “What if I have my perspective? My reality. What if it’s different from yours?”

She broke into laughter, as a grandmother humoring a foolish question from her grandchild. “Ah, but then we fight. In the real. As gods. With our Heavens, fists, ghosts, philosophies, technologies, alliances, and relationships. We fight. And one will remain. But we stand far from such an inglorious end, though it might yet come. And for now, I think we can be joined against greater forces held at bay. Until then, there is much for you to learn. It would not do for Zein Thousandhand to murder a babe of a Fallwalker before proper apotheosis. Such would offend my love and his ‘dream.’”
Zein rolled her eyes at that. Melancholy tinged her mind, even blurred with substances.

“What is the dream?” Kae asked. Her interruption cut through the conversation like a whip snapping between two fighters. “I-I was never told. Each Guild had a different interpr-uh-interpretation of what he wanted.”

Zein studied the Agnos with a moment of silence, and, beyond Avo’s understanding, she turned her glaive back into an–
He blinked.
Had Zein been using an umbrella this entire time?

“The battle between the Massists and the Saintists. You know of this, yes?” Zein placed her umbrella tip-first against the ground and a depression sank to form a makeshift holder for her. “What a mistake. A delusion of his desires. Jaus never sought a world of perfection or purity. Rather, it was mimicry he desired. An imitation of a stabler order.” She shook her head. “He was a fool, but a lovable one.”

“Mimicry?” Avo asked.
“Do you know how Voidwatch runs their affairs?” Zein asked. “They are mastered not by man but machines. Governors. Things like the EGI Core. Those are their true rulers. Silicon administrators over all those that dwell aboard their interiors. A system made from virtue and justice. Unfailing, unlike the fickle hearts we possess.” She sighed. “Just a pity I like my fickle heart.”

“Jaus wanted to reinstate the gods? Avo asked. “Make them more like these… governors?”

“Nearly,” Zein said. “He wanted to have all of society capable of accessing each and every Heaven rather than it being under the ownership of corporate communities or specific individuals. A society empowered, so to speak. A community of the sovereignties with the ability of any man, woman, or child to call upon the power of their gods without offering undue sacrifice. And through all the death that had already transpired, the cyclers would prevent future torment and demise. A perfect stasis with all needs met, and no more torment, distributed through one and all.”

She paused then. “Jaus had no desire to ascend the world to perfection. He hated the Ladder and had plans to part it from the chronology it after its function was undone. He saw it as the lure of a perpetual mistake, with humanity always on the cusp.” A faint grimace clouded her next words. “Our daughter, though. Veylis. She had a different dream in mind.” She looked upon Draus again. “Blessed be the Worthy, no?”

The Regular, uncharacteristically, looked away.
“It is better that things turned out this way,” Zein said, suddenly cutting to another topic. “For you to have the Frame, I mean. Your father’s nodes… he did me a favor with you. I had another candidate in mind for the Stillborn, but she was lost to me. Probably another act of Walton’s doing. The self-righteous man likely thought he was saving her–ah, this conversation has lost its luster. Enough waste.”

The vibrating fishhook of her Heaven thundered out from her. Avo whipped out tendrils of blood, the air around him spiraling into drills of wind about his chittering Echoheads. Draus’ projectile launcher extended as Kae took a step back.
Zein smirked. “This is not an attack.”

“Hard to tell with you,” Avo said. “Offering future memories?”

“Indeed,” Zein said. “Always easier to have several conversations at once than one. See to it that we do not fritter away any more time. Here. For your perusal. I’ll be injecting my eyes with joy while you recover. Hopefully, it keeps me occupied.”

And with that, streams of the future crashed down, bathing all those present in a chorus of growing dialogues. Things became known to Avo in that instant. The nature of Ninth Column. What she wanted with Jhred Greatling.
It was as Green River said–a game was being played here. The Guilds were being policed in the loosest sense, with Ninth Column working to keep the current alliances, to force the deus-political structure in perpetual deadlock.
Jhred Greatling served a twofold purpose for her. The first was to ensure the gulf between Highflame and Stormtree remained. Not enough to start open war anew, but enough to spur silent war and mercenary action between the two factions. Likewise, the target that he sought was to be an Ori-Thaum Mirror. One Valhu Kitzuhada, former Glaive commander and current ambassador to Stormtree.
Valhu Kitzuhada was also the sole commanding officer that oversaw the nulling of Jhred’s mother–her name still redacted, burned from even Thousandhand’s mind.
The second point was what the Greatling boy–Mirrorhead–had to do with his own family. The Greatlings were a dynastic power belonging to the Chivlarics. The Chivalrics who were blamed for losing the last war, who remained locked in a power struggle for the very soul of Highflame and their future.
To see Jhred left dead at the scene of a failed assassination would cripple the Greatlings and force them into the tenuous territory. Like dominos, then, their weight would pull on the rest of the Chivalrics, like bodies chained to each other upon a bridge. Push one and the others would follow.

“You want the Chivalrics to lose?” Draus asked, emerging from the stupor of split-future memories, also caught in the splash.
“Of course,” Zein said, pulling a needle from her eye. Her sclera was piss-yellow in color now, but the nanos in her blood were rapidly clearing the damage. An absurd smile pulled at her face. “To let them stay would do too much damage. If Highflame collapsed, the Saintists would be certain to lose the power struggle.”

“Why Saintists versus Massists? Why keep the Guilds balanced?” The question gnawed at Avo.

“Because they are my insurance against each other,” Zein said. “And themselves. No power remains bound to me. I am a severed entity. A Fallwalker seeking her own means. Though I seek Jaus’ return, the Guilds find him more useful dead than alive for their propaganda. It’s a miserable thing, being an idol of so many. Never do it, little dagger.”


“So,” Avo said. “You’re just going to make them fight each other. Weaken each other? So you can… seize the tower in the end?”

She regarded him with thinned lips. There was something she wasn’t saying. She needed something to happen with each of the Guilds. As if anything disturbing the equilibrium of the eight would prevent her plan from coming to fruition.
“It’s… it’s about the domains, isn’t it?” Kae asked.

Alarm briefly flashed behind Zein’s eyes, and her reaction drew Avo’s notice. Was she just caught off guard? Did she not see the future in which Kae asked such a question?

Could she not read Kae’s future somehow?

“Yes,” Zein admitted. “Perhaps so. But it is a miserable topic, and I will speak no more of it. Let us just say I need something from each of them when the Ladder returns. And you.” She was speaking directly to Avo now. “You, my young apprentice, stand at the centerpiece of it all. Your disappearance has upset my daughter greatly. You wear a Frame twice stolen.” A laugh came from her, a cackle on the verge of madness.
“So,” Avo said. “That’s why you had Green River talk to us first. Wanted to see if I was already used by Walton? By the Low Masters?”

“Hm,” Zein said, answering nothing. “Now. Shall we discuss the fate of one Mirrorhead of Conflux and prepare to aid him in his tragic attempt at revenge, or shall we wallow on and on about philosophy?”

Avo sensed his Auto-Seance activating. Draus’ session activated.
+Old half-strand’s using us,+ Draus said. +Playin’ her own game. These ain’t my waters.+
+Washing over us anyway,+ Avo said. +What do you think?+

+Well, I never expected to be doin’ no snuff-run with Zein fuckin’ Thousandhand. It’ll make the job easier. It’s also gonna pull us into a world of shit after, but what’s new with that. Guild business. Left the Tiers to avoid that shit. Came back lookin’ for me anyhow.+

He couldn’t say he felt the same way as the Regular. The course of the last month had been redefining for him. It was not all joyous, but the euphoria he tasted, the new horizons he gazed upon. He wanted more. He wanted to see more colors. This was his wish. His desire.
It was what Walton had wanted for him as well. One of the things, anyway.
What did he really know of his father in the end?
Pushing those thoughts aside, Avo focused on the present. Now more than anything, he wanted to eat another Godclad. “Going to need to agree on a few things if we work together.”

“Agree?” Zein said. “What of fighting? You and I duel every time we disagree–”

“No,” Avo said, cutting her off before she could swindle him into being a test subject for another one of her suicide bombs. She glowered at him glumly like a child denied candy. “Be serious. Proper arrangement. We help each other. But I plan my dive. I keep my Frame. And you don’t hide things from me. Not the futures. Not anything else. Don’t want to be someone’s dog.”

Genuine offense came over Zein’s expression. “Have I ever insinuated my desire to take a slave? You insult me. I need no serve–I am beyond a servant! To own something so servile is… demeaning. I only take those with promise as my target practi–apprentices.”

Avo and Draus shared a glance.

“All ‘Clads like this?” Avo asked Zein.
The older woman barked a chuckle. “Be they so fortune.”
Draus narrowed her eyes at him. “You eat people. Careful there Avo.”

He grunted.
“First order of business,” Zein announced. “We need a backdoor into Conflux. The matter at hand has Conflux preparing for a massive attack on Nu-Scarrowbur in about a week. Likely a human-wave attack. Wasteful. Stupid. Very Greatling. Alas, my assets have not been fully able to track the Greatling boy when he steps through the glass. He has proven more paranoid and elusive than expected. If only there were means we had to lure him out… like a certain… expendable spy of sorts. Or three.”

The future gave her forewarning to many things, and more than just combat or defense, it also let Zein lead conversations down the exact roads she wanted. Avo wondered just how much of their prior conversation was Zein playing them, and how much was actually her genuine reaction.
+Chambers,+ Avo asked Draus. +Green River kept him and the others in place?+


+That degenerate should still be in his box,+ Draus answered. +Him and the techs. But since you pulled the heat down from the Tiers, it ain’t gonna be easy gettin’ them from one place to another.+

True as that was, Avo felt himself wondering if he could force Mirrorhead’s hand by making a few changes. Trap the Syndicate Godclad using false information. +Fine. Have an idea about how to insert him anyway. Make other preparations.+

+Hope this idea of yours sees us gettin’ past the Exorcists and Paladins. Still your fault, by the way. Spittin’ ‘bout which, how the hells is Mirrorhead about to start a war with Tier security breathin’ down everyone’s neck?+

“How indeed,” Zein said smiling as if she could hear their conversation this entire time.

One of Avo’s Echoheads chittered in annoyance. The room came into shape. Kae stood to the side, away from the confusion of the dialogue. She was adrift. Barely noticed.
Something told him that her malady could be used against Zein somehow. There was a feeling there–a twist in her nature.
“Now,” Zein said, “tell me about this ‘Chambers’, and in return, I will tell you about how we may evade the small matter of Paladin enforcement.”
Shard-3: Convex, I need an emergency transfer for all mem-data you have on one Aedon Chambers–a former Conflux asset. Sending a general memory profile now. Half-strand came back from the dead. There’s chatter saying that he escaped from the Scalpers. We’re not sure how yet.
Mirror-Convex: Received. All relevant memories will be uploaded into your Meta upon confirmation. How is Greatling?
Shard-3: Being a miserable shit as usual. He’s been doubling patrols and spiking hires. I think he intends to spend us in massed waves against the Scalpers. Food for their drones. Conflux definitely doesn’t have the golems for this fight, and we’re going up against at least half a dozen Knots. It’s going to be a slaughterhouse. He doesn’t give a shit though. Blessed be the Worthy my rash-hollowed ass.
Mirror-Convex: Understood. Would you like extraction to be expedited? The situation between the Elders is getting tenuous. Our cell remains uncompromised but you know the risks. It’s election season. A little scandal goes a long way.
Shard-3: Negative. I want to see how this Chambers thing turns out. Just get me that update.
Mirror-Convex: Received. Be careful Shard-3. We’re getting a lot of unconfirmed chatter that a Stormtree Godclad Cadre is in play as well. Don’t get pulled into the fire.

Shard-3: Copy that. Shit. This thing’s really starting to spiral. Won’t surprise me if the godsdamned Low Masters launch a second uprising by this point.
-Conversation between Incubi and Handler, Ori-Thaum
9-7
The Volunteered
+Chambers. Wake up. Time for you to be useful.+
Terror came for Chambers midway through his old smut vicarity as the sky above the simulation came asunder. With a fissure of thoughtstuff, phantasmal seams ruptured as ghosts invaded; foreign thoughts crackled and flowed, rushing into his mind like a rapid spilling into a wound.
For the briefest of moments, he froze in and beyond the Nether. Mind and body stiff with fright, he looked up, beyond the aratnid being shoved into a certain orifice it didn’t belong, beyond the flailing limbs and screaming face. Like a mirage overlain atop the fabric of his entertainment was a monster’s face, the backdrop a paused instant of an extremely questionable porn vicarity. His ghosts were being usurped by the touch of this monster, its control beyond his, the bloodlust inside it worse than a drug-fiend denied a fix.
It was that last part that made Chambers suddenly realize who was talking. Avo's face looked different. Like all the moon pale skin had been peeled away and replaced with grayish tendrils sewn together along spidery silken threads.
+Hey, hey, consang…+ Chambers said, transmuting all the charm he possessed from a spreading well of terror.
Chambers groaned internally. Dealing with Avo was a real pain. There was just no read on the ghoul. He was hot, he was cold, he was everything in between. Half a dozen times he thought the rotlick was going to kill him. Probably was thinking about killing and eating him now.
But he didn’t. And that was the worst of it. The tension. The anticipation. The restraint of the release.
Hells, he had to survive this. What do? What do? Avo was a godsdamned murderous psychopath. What–flattery! Yes! Flattery works on anything!
+So, uh, you look different, Avo,+ Chamber said, adding a chuckle to come off more puckish rogue than bored pervert. +Did you… did you do something with your hair?+
Shit! Too much stupid in that question. Ghouls didn’t have hair. Godsdammit, distract! Distract! +I’ve been expecting you?+ Too much like a question, Chambers. Offer him a favor! +I’m ready to do that thing you were prepping me for. Whatever that thing was. I–uh. It’s good to see you again? Thanks for not hittin’ me some more?+
He was serious about that last part, most his bosses were all about the hitting and Avo talked real great for a ghoul. Even if those conversations were primarily based on doing terrible things to Chambers’ eyes or limbs or mind or other bodily bits. Man, if there was one rotlick in need of therapy, it was Avo. Being too smart did that to you, and not just for rotlicks.
That was the score: Aunt Nenda always said it was bad to be too smart. Said his mom had been too smart. Which is why she left him and his dad for the Layer One Expansion Initiative all those years back, going down to start a new family on a Guild stipend.
“And then look what happened to her,” Aunt Nenda had sneered in between mouthfuls of Slurp-E-Sludge, “Eaten by ghouls. Her, and her ‘perfect new family.’ Stay stupid Chambers. You stay stupid and you stay out of the way. You gotta master the art of being a half-strand.”
“How's there an art to being a half-strand–ow!” She had flicked a particularly jagged piece of sludge crust at him then, the hardened synthetic sugar substance darting against his skin like a flying piece of flint.

“See that?” Aunt Nenda said. “That’s part of the art.” She wiped her mouth with one hand as the tubes running up her back suckled the fat out from her body into the machine she always wore. The liposuctor beeped cheerily and played a happy jingle, rating the drop in her obesity index.
Aunt Nenda was a strange woman with a strange job: she was a “caloric inspector” for an Ashthrone subsidiary. Something about testing junk foods and using her own body as an instrument to record the data. He wasn’t sure how she got the job, only the fact that she said this specific job was one only a “master idiot” could get.
“Flicking food into other people’s face?” a confused young Chambers had asked.
“No, dipshit,” she had sighed, “That was an ‘accident.’ I’m an idiot, remember? Just a klutz. Can’t expect jack from shit if you’re looking at me. That's the secret art: you gotta be just annoying enough to deal with, enough that people wanna leave you alone. You gotta find that line between where you’re just repellant, and where you become a problem. That’s what it means to be a proper idiot. That’s how you keep yourself from dying.”

“Wow,” Chambers said, nodding.
A month later, Aunt Nenda died when one of the candy bars she swallowed “woke up” in her throat and ate its way back up.
At least he got her carpet out of that mess. And some advice.
At present, the ghoul was glaring down at him with naked disgust. Something told Chambers he was being judged. He didn’t like being judged. Being judged got you beat up. Snuffed. Or worse–robbed. Being poor in the Warrens was like… a fate worse than getting fed to some Fallwalker’s cycler.
Avo–formerly known as Moonblood to them Crucible viewers–was a novelty item of a rotlick. Chambers meant that as a compliment. Really. He didn’t know many other ghouls who could handle a real conversation. Not the ones Chambers’ had tried to speak with anyway. It’s always “kill” this and “flay” that. Frigging Low Masters needed to give them more spunk and personality. There was more than one flavor to psychopathy, even.
Like Avo's.
Of course, that just made the half-strand more terrifying. A ghoul that could invade your mind and do things to your memories wasn’t anything anyone wished for. Except for Chambers, maybe. Shit, if someone sold action figures of a ghoul that could eat memories and fight crime he would have snorted that stuff up as a juv. Ghouls were pretty nova and gleam if you thought about it: You could eat anything, see in the dark, infect rats and shit. No Guild taxes. No day job.

Well, there was the whole getting killed en masse thing. And their frankly pathetic constitutions. And their–


+Chambers,+ Avo growled. +Focus. Mind’s like a river. River of filth. Need to–+
Whatever thought the ghoul was about to send was interrupted by the sensation of tearing flesh, the squeaking of an aratnid, and a bone-shaking wail.
“No! It’s eating its way up! Stop! I’ll tell you anything! Anything!” Came the vicarity’s lead. Distracted again, Chambers nodded appreciatively at the acting. Ah. Dannis Steelhard. Now there was a true old-school vicarity smut-star, willing to actually suffer the indignities of the flesh instead of having a death-double like some other people–like that fucking Yu Wan; she was a poser! Why couldn’t she had been the one to get the ras–oh shit, Avo was still there! Avo was looking at his… his entertainment.
Mind stunned and thoughts frozen, the ghoul startled as the “interrogators” cackled with laughter. The chimeric tail of the aratnid disappeared into the cleft of the wound, and a hydrapede was brought out as an encore.
Violence and brutality should have been hyper-stimulating for a ghoul, but there was but one emotion rolling off Avo in that instant, and its name was confusion.
Clicking fangs together, the invading ghoul watched as Dannis Steelhard began his famous “blood, snot, tears, and other lubricants” act, with each sensation transferred directly into Chambers himself.
Two layers of phantoms clashed against each other. One that continued playing the third-person vicarity. The other that captured Avo’s frozen stare, the blank expression of the Moonblood ghoul portrait perfect.
Chambers stole the moment and saved the image. At least the ghoul wasn’t disgusted–oh, nope there it was… all coming back. Two other faces split away from him, the fullness of the monstrous face shrinking as others divided out from him.
At the center was still Avo, but two new minds entered the realm of Chambers’ thoughts. To the left was that Regular lady–the mean one that was… well, fucking mean. No good deed went unpunished. All of Chambers being nice when she was a limbless, uselness torso thrown back in his face. He could still feel the beating she gave him. Mainly because she dented the hell out of some of his subdermals.
On the right, though, was someone Chambers had never seen. Or at least, thought he hadn’t. He didn’t know. Something about her seemed familiar… First thing: old consang was old. Like, “damn, get this sow some life-extension treatments old.” Like, poor FATELESS that kept managing to avoid death somehow old. She reminded him of… of one of those godsdamned old trees with the ugly bark. Shit.
Wait, grandma was only about forty-seven when she got eaten by the ghoulies so…
+Avo,+ the Reg said, lip curled, +we really want to head this run with… with him?+
+Hey,+ Chambers said, offense lingering in the back of his mind. He still wasn’t totally sure about everything they wanted from him, put in him, or thought of him, but he wasn’t going to be treated like some punk-ruster. He had the fire in him. Unless they wanted to do some shit like kill Mirrorhead or negotiate peace among the Guilds, in which case, he would go back to watching his smut-vics and die with the ghosts in his head buzzing with pleasure.
+Ah, that’s not what the cleft should look like.+ The ancient interrupted. Chambers blinked. Avo and the Reg also blinked. All eyes were on that old lady. +Aratnids wriggle and skitter into living flesh. They don’t make a clean burrow.+
The Reg looked at her as judgy as Avo looked at him. +Got into the habit of some war crimes there, didn’t you, old timer?+ She jabbed more than she questioned.
The old hag humphed. +War crimes are for the bested. And I have never been bested. As such, my ethical purity remains intact.+
Disbelief came from her two cohorts. And Chambers, but with a tingle of betrayal.
+What?+ Chambers whispered. +No! They said they did this live! With in-studio watchers. Like… visual evidence. Dannis Steelhard is not a fake! He doesn't fake any of his deaths!+
The matronly woman clicked her tongue with faux-pity. +Sorry, boy. This wound doesn’t resemble any aratnid-based torture I have inflicted–and I have inflicted more than most. I would bet my next kill on this being an edit.+
+N-no,+ Chambers said. A coldness came over him. Were they all posers in this world? Were the only ones who lived hard and raw and real the squires, ghouls, and him? Were there no heroes?
+I know,+ Zein said. +Pathetic, is it not? So many promising ideals, yet people fear living up to them. How miserable. How sad.+
A sigh rumbled forth from Avo. +Zein. You've seen him. Seen the asset. Can we–+
To Chambers’ surprise, the old woman–Zein, was it? Well, she kept talking. +We have a use for you, Chambers. You, and your… less interesting friends. Tell me, are you good with twisting honesty?+
His mind trickled down as he considered her question. What was she asking? If he could lie? No, it couldn’t be that. If she was asking about him lying then she wouldn’t have used those words. Those words exactly. Now, he was an idiot, but then again, so were most people. Generally, it wasn’t hard to find out what they wanted. Especially when they hinted at it with their actions.
Aunt Nenda’s voice came back again, the memory of her carrying a wise but haunting echo: “That Dannis Steelhart sure had a long–”
Wait. No. Not that memory. The other one. The one about–fuck. He couldn’t recall. He was gonna have to make some shit up.
+I… that depends on your perspective?+
The old woman frowned. Something in the pit of his stomach dropped. +I expected more from you.+


For some reason, her words hurt. They hurt real bad, like someone was questioning if he was good enough at being a piece of shit. If he didn’t have that, what did he have? +Wait! Wait! Come on, come let Chambers have another shot, yeah? Don’t be like the rot… lick.+


There was a strange glint in the ghoul’s eyes as he continued to glare. It was as if they stood pale, bolted windows shielding the world from a strange fire. An instinctive shiver shuddered through Chambers’ physical body.
It was also kinda alluring–
LUSTAWAY ACTIVATED
TRANSFERRING PHYSICAL AROUSAL INTO METAMIND…
They must’ve read his mem-data then because the old one laughed, the ghoul widened his many, many teeth, and the Regular just shook her head.
Chambers wasn’t gonna lie: This was like the forty-seventh worst day in his life. It really didn’t feel good being shamed inside his own mind during his own private time. Never mind he was a prisoner.
Actually, never mind he was a prisoner. With the bomb gone, Mirrorhead gone, and that nerd Janard suffering too, Chambers didn’t feel so alone. Things were pretty good.
But then, they just had to ruin his favorite smut-vicarity star and attack his self-esteem on the same day. Damn. He'd get through this somehow.
+Avo,+ Chambers said, his mind boiling with as many joyous memories as he could recall. He didn’t need the rotlick to sense his fear. He was the idiot. He was the one true idiot. He was too stupid to kill. He was still useful. +Consang. My rotlick. My buddy. The mind… is a curious thing. Sometimes, it’s like the wind, other times it’s like a… very horny nu-dog.+


A crackle of irritation thundered within his Auto-Seance. It was spilling… some kind of shit that made him think of watching his sister get tortured to death. Like, there were flashes of pain and screaming, and him getting grafted, and feeling his sister die on a grafting table and this really, really tall woman. Except he didn’t have a sister. Dark as the intrusive thoughts were though, they did feel kind of kinky. Maybe, like, if the sister was getting eaten by ghouls…


LUSTAWAY ACTIVATED
TRANSFERRING PHYSICAL AROUSAL INTO METAMIND…
+Jaus,+ the Regular muttered. Chambers could feel her shaking his head.
+Enough,+ Avo growled, frustration boiling over. +Not here to see his porn. Not here to see his fetish. Here to examine the subject. Here to prepare him.+
Chambers could feel his heart rate accelerate. Prepare? Oh, no. Not more preparation. The last time the ghoul prepared him he lost a whole lotta memories. Half of his favorite sims were repurposed into sequence-locked phantasmics he couldn’t access but still looked like the sims from the outside. He barely understood how the rotlick did it. It was like the ghoul was a brain magician locking Chambers outside his own house.
+So,+ Chambers said, trying to keep the apprehension out of his mind. +When we say prepare–+
+Going to put new memories into your mind,+ Avo said. +Change memories. Need to check your stability after. Minor fixes.+


He didn’t like how Avo said fixes.
Then, Avo continued. +Need you to get Mirrorhead’s attention. One on one meeting. Can you do that?+


A series of words flashed through Chambers’ mind. He wanted to say no. He wanted to say hells no. He wanted to say a great many things. Most of those things, however, might upset the ghoul. The ghoul currently holding the stability of his mind between its claws. Dangerous situations called for displays of sudden cunning.


+Yeah,+ Chambers said, +no problem–I mean, who ya talkin’ to? I'm always good for it.+
Internally, he screamed. That wasn’t a display of sudden cunning, that was a blatant lie. He didn’t want to get the boss’ notice. More than that, his old boss’ notice was the thing he wanted the least. His entire tenure of survival at Conflux was avoiding Mirrorhead’s attention, not getting it.
They were pretty much signing his suicide… warrant.
Fuck.
The old woman threw back her head and laughed softly. +Yes. Yes, he will do. He will do just fine.+
Somehow, her words made him worry the most.
+I,+ Zein began, +have some questions for you first regarding your former master, however. And then, the ghoul will have some after he is done to see if the… operation can be considered successful.+
A squeak of pure terror escaped from Chambers’ mind. +I uh…+

+Don’t worry,+ Zein said, smiling benignly, +pain of the mind is but a lie. Just accept what is to come. Insanity is so very hard to mend.+
Avo grunted in agreement as Chambers felt a rumble of ghosts flood through his Auto-Seance.
Blankness swallowed all his protests, all his thoughts.
In the background, the vicarity continued playing.
LUSTAWAY ACTIVATED
TRANSFERRING PHYSICAL AROUSAL INTO METAMIND…
“Uh, Ripper–Ripperjack?”
“Hm.”

“We, uh, some of our guys went missing.”

“Hm. Happens.”

“Yeah, but they resurfaced later, selling slave cargo to… to some Sang. Some Conflux guys. I… I didn’t even remember us taking any of those Conflux fucks hostages. I think… I think some of our guys tried to do a side thing.”

“Hm. Yeah. Doubt it. You keep talking, though. Tell me more about our… problem. Don’t worry. You’re not the one I’m killing when this is done.”
-Exchange between Vincintine “Ripperjack” Javvers and Scalper enforcer
9-8
Smuggling Snakes
“I must say that boy’s mind is a rare thing. It is not often memory contagions form a self-supporting, self-suppressing infrastructure so… unique.”

Zein’s praise for the enforcer’s degeneracy merited her a glare from Avo and Draus both. Why did it not surprise him that she approved? They sat at a utilitarian table Avo had the hive construct. Gathered mere feet away from the dais, they spurned the thrones for something far lesser.
Neither Zein nor Draus cared for grandiosity, and as for Avo, his rationale was one of baser animosity. He despised the Low Masters. He despised them for being his antithesis. He despised them for creating him and doing a bad job. He despised them because he was Godclad, and though he had no concept of what utopia he sought, the idea of burning their garden of paradise down filled him with such a thrill.
For now, he let their symbols of power remain absent and unused. He would see to their deconstruction at his next available convenience.


Sequencing of Chambers’ mind was a delicate thing, but required less time aboard the voidship. Much of the subtle infrastructure had already been built into Chambers’ mind weeks ago. The same with the two techs. Now, the main thing needed was a few adjustments to their memories. Slight modifications to allow for new angles of approach; to create the fullness of a situation plausible yet unverifiable for Conflux.
In the end, they wanted to draw Mirrorhead’s personal interest. Avo had something special prepared for the wayward Highflame scion.
Throughout the process, Draus kept a close eye on Chambers and the techs while she worked through other arrangements with Green River. Despite the lockdown, automated delivery aeros were still running, and drones were still in play, if accosted by more Paladin scans.
Transports shuttling corpses to new Wight assemblies up in Layer One became the decided vector of delivery. It wouldn’t be difficult for a trip to be arranged to cross from Xin Yunsha to Mazzo’s Junction to pick up bodies.
Or dropping three Conflux escapees off.
Zein, meanwhile, found herself content to hum and haw, taking in Avo’s technique.
“You work much like your father did,” Zein said. “But you are infinitely more vicious in your approach. A virtue and a weakness both.”

“Nature of the beast,” Avo replied, trying to ignore how her statement clawed at him.
She smirked. “You keep forgetting, little dagger: We’re Godclads. Nature bends to us. All things will bend to us.”
It was a welcome surprise that the Nether flowed so freely into the darkness. As with most demiplanes, if the location was cut off from the Nether itself then all ghosts were certain to be stymied. But here beyond the veil of shadows, it seemed that the ghosts flowed with a startling lightness. Instead of bottlenecking their flow, the nexus acted as a junction; a circumspect passageway.
Using the EGI Core to augment his reach, he found himself able to access New Vultun through a variety of gateways. The number of ports into the real varied and shifted in position as if by random, but there were always around one hundred and twenty-two open, and never did they ascend beyond Layer Two of the Warrens.
If its limitations were a thing of precaution or thaumaturgy, Avo wasn’t sure. What he did know was that the mind-hive parsed and added an unfathomable amount of phantasmal processing power to all his actions. Where his Metamind was a flexible dagger to use up close and from angles unseen, the ghosts of the EGI Core formed a construct more akin to a falling hammer, capable of smashing through everything, and all but impossible to hide if not for this curtain of shadow it dwelled behind.
In one of the interfaces fed to his mind, he saw the option to descend into its simulated architecture. The Low Masters had titled the core's structure a “labyrinth,” as befitting their motifs and methodology. Highflame would have made a fortress, and Ori-Thaum would have parsed its contents into operational cells for maximal flexibility.
Once he had the time, he would review the nature of his new abode.
There was never enough time however; as he was finishing the final tweaks–copying a few more of his own memories relating to Mirrorhead’s inner sanctum into each of his assets’ minds–Zein said something he just couldn't ignore.
“That boy is a degenerate,” Zein said, face basked in delight. “you know, I should greet him in person.”

“No,” Avo hissed. The sheer forcefulness with which he spat the word sent Draus’ braid swaying. The Regular, sitting across from him, took the brunt of his reactive outburst without blinking.
“What he said.” Draus snorted. “Listen. Thousandhand… I don’t much know how you plan to do things–”

“Plan?” Zein asked, eyes widening with offense.

“--but we’ve got an Exorcist problem that really don’t need more exacerbating, so if you could please–”

“The Exorcists are of no issue once you learn how to tread,” Zein said. “The Paladins present more enticing trouble, but I suppose it would wise for us to conduct this with a certain amount of… quietude?”
Draus flicked a glare at Avo. “I can only speak for myself. The rotlick here’s a real wildcard.”

“Truly? He seems awfully repressed to me.” Zein cocked her head and smirked at him. He fought a rising urge to clamp his fangs down around her throat and spit her drug-abused trachea back at her. “I must admit though, the story you wove behind their return is… acceptable. To have them be captured and sold as an under-the-table deal between a dead group of Scalpers and Green River presents reasonable pretense to their survival. It is still, however, not quite the methodology of the Scalpers to show so much mercy…”

“River’ll be able to add a bit more yarn to it,” Draus said. “Seed some info into the public. Leak some stuff in the private. Make it seem like it is what it is.”

“And so sure are you that she will help you after all the trouble that came with his ‘family’?”

Something swelled inside Avo. It wasn’t anger. It wasn’t even hate. If denial and disgust were muscles, such would be the sensation of them in flux. “Not my family. Only family is dead. Besides. I’m not real. Wasn’t real until…” He trailed off with a low hiss. “Bah. Don’t even know which piece comes from where.”

The ancient Godclad offered him only laughter. “Ah, identity. How it plagues us. Do you wish to hear a secret? Both of you. About how to avoid torment?”

“Which drug is it?” Draus deadpanned.

Zein grinned. “The greatest drug of all: Want.”

“Want,” Avo repeated, unsure what she was saying.
“You want to know if you are true to your nature.” Zein struck the ground once with her umbrella and continued. “To want and never be able to achieve said want is to tear yourself. At your ego. At your nous. But your father has not torn you, but set you free. That which came before your joining to the Frame was a preamble. A distraction. Best to regard them as organs to a body–parts, but not the entirety. Not until they all come together.”

He considered her words for a moment. “Your Heaven. Does it see fate? Is future pre-destined?”

“The future is probabilistic,” Zein said, regarding him with a careful wryness. “People, however, are immensely predictable. It speaks well that there are hundreds of streams deviating from your being. With most others, there but few paths to how they broadly respond. In your creation, I suspect your father sought to make the ultimate anti-slave. A creature fit for this city of brutality. One that will revel, and be free as it ascends.”

Avo grunted. “Sure didn’t make anything simple. Everything is a haze.”

His words made her eyes curve into crescents as she suppressed a smile. “What is the self but the inclinations of your nature, and all the lies layered like brick and paste by our self-delusion.”

A scoff came from the Regular. “There’re experiences, habits, traumas, fixations… buncha other shit. Buncha other shit that don’t matter to what we’re doin’ right now anyhow.”

“Ah,” Zein said, shaking her head with exaggerated pity. “For a girl so determined to languish in a purgatory of her own choosing, you are in an awful hurry to go nowhere fast.”

All that did was make Draus lean back in her chair with a laugh. The Regular mirthlessly chuckled, opening a hand as she shrugged theatrically at Kae, waiting with the uniformed phantom. “Shit, Kae. Looks like she read my psych-eval. Ain’t the first person to notice. And yeah, I’m perfectly fine doin’ my own thing in limbo. Thanks for askin’.”

“Of course,” Zein said, smirking. “You wouldn’t be so promising if it weren’t otherwise.” Her smile only grew. “You know you will break, yes? The ghoul has another Soul inside him. And in time, other components may be procured. Your denial of your true desire will not last.”

Draus ran her tongue beneath her lower lips. “Watch me.”

“Mind me not if I do.”

Zein hummed then, a worrying gleam shining behind her eyes. “Avo. As an official gift of my tutelage, would you like to see the Paladins and Exorcists spirited away? Distracted?” Her Metamind rippled. A wave of thought splashed out into the locus, into the vaster Nether. His suspicion grew. She was talking with someone.
“How?” Avo asked.
“Ah, but my gifts do not come free,” Zein said. “To receive it unearned is to lessen the sweetness, no?”
“Have a lot of resources there,” Avo said. The older Godclad peacocked. “Real generous with using them to entertain yourself.”
“Yes, well.” She tapped the hilt of her umbrella twice, “it would shameful to live so long and assemble no inventory, yes?”

His topmost Echoheads turned and chittered, annoyance bleeding over into them as a static field painted his surroundings. Of everything and everyone, Zein held the stillest. Contrary to the momentum she carried and the chaos she engendered, there was more to her than whimsy. There was something unbending–unbreakable.
Despite her lackadaisical nature, he remembered who she was, and drew from that a lesson of caution. For their union right now was a thing of convenience and preference. The help of Ninth Column seemed predicated on Zein’s capricious personal wants alone, and fickle could one’s heart be when better paths presented themselves.

Considering her abilities, considering what limitations he could guess she seemed to have–especially between her and Kae earlier–a quiet conspiracy formed in his mind as the memories she was transferring came into shape. What he could assume she had was near-term precognition. He couldn’t be sure without getting a peek at her Frame.
However, should this be the structure of her power, then he could wield breadth against her. Build instruments to scry and study her from afar–but only from the background. Subsume Nether architecture around her. Maybe even get her with a mem-con. The last one was more difficult than the others–there would be futures of her detecting his failures, after all.
He needed to test this. See what she would notice, and what she would allow in the future.
“What do you want?” Avo gritted.

“How about a challenge?” Zein said. “A new one. One of the mind.”

“Do you have an anti-matter bomb inside your head too?” Avo asked.
Draus’ eye widened ever so slightly in alarm but said nothing.
“Anti–antimatter bomb?” Kae whispered.

“No,” Zein said, “nothing of the such. I will send you three sim-pics across the Nether tonight. Three pictures. Three simulated snapshots of locations reconstructed from the DeepNav. If you can tell me which of these places I am to destroy and using what means, I will offer you a new boon.”

“Like the Heaven you owe me?” Avo asked.
“Ah, now that’s the wrong sort of delusion,” Zein said. “You did not kill me. I killed myself of my own volition.”

“There a difference?”

“Oh. A difference of scale between sea and sky, Avo. Sea and sky.”

Then, without warning, Zein was next to him, blinking from where she once stood without warning. A whine of an extending projectile launcher came alive beside him. Even Draus was half a second too slow.

Though she remained shorter standing than Avo was seated, it did not stop Zein from looming over him, angling her head back as if her gaze was a blade, and she was dropping it into a low guard used only by the foolish, the weary, or the deceitful.
“There is a point to the madness,” Zein said. “There is a point to every challenge I cast down to you. To be a Godclad is more than merely wielding power in ways absolute and divine. You must also learn to see the weave. The web between people. Vectored interests and fated collisions. You have been a predator of the dark. Now let us see if you can learn to be one that spins a decent web. Start with the Greatling boy. Get your claws inside him as soon as possible. Once that happens, I will return, and the matter of the Paladins will be resolved.”

She was about to say something else but closed her mouth instead. For a moment, she regarded him with a wry smile. “Have you ever played a Nether sim before? Stormjumpers II perhaps? You perhaps, Captain Jelene?”

“The fuck kinda turn is that?” Draus muttered under her breath.
Avo made a vague noise, wondering if that would provoke a confused response from Zein.
“Well, you both should,” Zein said, ignoring Avo’s deliberate non-answer. “My sim-tag is IKilledYourGrandMotherandGrandFather444. I’m on the Osomosari-one server most midnights for fifteen minutes. Contact me there once you have finished your end of the task. And if you can correctly guess where I am to conduct my act of… distraction. You will have to buy me nova if you fail, however. Those are my terms.”

“Just added them at the end,” Avo growled.

“I am altering the challenge. Pray… or do not pray… I might alter it further anyway.”
“That does… doesn’t seem fair,” Kae muttered.
Zein barked a haughty laugh. “Fair! Fair, child, is a pact struck between deadlocked equals or a state of conditions forced down upon the laity by a higher power. Desiring stability above expression is a display of rank cowardice.” The amusement left her face as if it was never there. She turned her eyes back on Avo. “Should you desire ‘fair,’ then ascend and see us made equals with haste. To live off another’s mercy is a bitter and fragile thing. Rely on it not.”
Standing back up, her eyes tilted upward as her face turned thoughtful. “Three-hundred thousand nullings. That is the number to beat, is it not?”

She grinned. The beast inside him recoiled. She was challenging him. Prodding him. Pulling him along as if he was some kind of nu-dog on a leash.
Here, in the former halls of his masters, within the inheritance left to him by his father, Avo wrestled his rising bloodlust down and kept his face blank. “For now.”

Zein nodded appreciatively. “Yes. For now. Good answer.”


Then, she was gone. Just gone. A stray gust of wind wafted over Avo. Something moved in his periphery, and turning, he saw the end of Zein’s departure. Before him, a fold in spatial reality, its outline resembling the likeness of an umbrella. Through its gulf, he caught sight of three figures–one walking away, and two more staring in. He barely managed a glance even after firing his Celerostylus. The gateway collapsed and the fabric of space melded back into a unified seam.
Zein had left them as she came–like a stabbing in an alleyway.
Relaxing his reflex booster, Avo heard Draus sigh. “Well. That was like a godsdamned fever dream.”

“Yeah,” he said. “Fever dream.”
Sol Standard Licenses are more like keys than outright phantasmics.
From what we understand of them, they merely unlock certain… ethical considerations blocking the EGI from acknowledging the user’s request. The vast separation of the many different licenses, however, tells a tale of internal striations present even amongst the Voiders themselves.
Though long have they lurked in our orbit, we have identified their separation into three major “fleets.” I dare not say if they are actually parted factions for they stand united in any Guild-level negotiations, but the accountings taken from those who have visited their voidships and habitats depict a society that at once lives in a paradise of individual leisure, while constrained by artificial supervision each passing second.
Strangely, their artificial minds do not seem to rule them or demand from them as the gods did. Instead, they seem to serve as impossibly incorruptible caretakers. At least when it comes to their own people.
There has been more than one case of Voidships engaging trespassing Fallwalkers seeking to smuggle something from the Sunderwilds. Most fascinatingly, the Fallwalkers reported that their ghosts detected hints of incomprehensible sorrow spilling out from the Voidships–the emotional recognition barely adjacent to humanity.
It’s a worrying thing, to consider that whatever happened out in the dark, it left even minds composed of rawest data shaken.
--Osjon Thousand, The Firmament and the Sky, Chapter 5
9-9
Seeding Spies
Knowledge was a great house, but with vast capacity a tax was levied upon its upkeep. Too many layers to its design and the structure threatening collapse, like one pillar split into ten then a hundred, each straining under the weight of a growing ceiling.
Such was how Avo felt when he beheld the simulated facade of the hive for the first time. Diving into the EGI Core, he found himself faced with a grand oubliette, its depths deep and its expanse byzantine. The bridges and junctions built through its confines were beyond description of the architecture, becoming a thing where shape and analogy grew interwoven.
Mem-data surged through tunnels of mem-data, the greater hiding the lesser. The sheer amount of memories available allowed for countless permutation. Here, practicality was wed to artistry, the nature of all phantasmics augmented and masked by the mind of the EGI core itself.
The core itself. Of all the things about his inheritance, the half-crippled artificial mind was a treasure above treasures, even broken. The mem-data that came from it greeted him in billows of static. He had heard of ghosts capable of interfacing with more complex coldtech computation devices, but the EGI possessed a weight of cognition, a presence in the Nether almost human.
A mirror to the nature of his Soul, it rested at the very heart of the oubliette. Avo strode across the drifting tides of mem-data, gazing up toward the center point of which all memories found the end to their flow. A large cloud of static information lined with both numerals and ghosts shimmered, its grandness conferring upon it a pseudo-gravity that pulled at his attention.
It would take him months to acclimate himself to its build. Longer still before he could fully master it.
Over the course of the past two days, however, he contented himself with understanding the basics of his new facilities.
At present, he had the ship create two additional chambers for Draus and Kae. With his place being in the nexus–and so enthralled with its supporting Necrothurgy–he saw no need to create another partition of his own.
At the Regular’s request, he created a vehicle bay within the structure for their command aero. It seemed pointless to Avo now that they had the George Washington, but Draus still thought much of its necessity.
As for entering and exiting the sanctuary, the process of leaving was substantially easier. Approximately one-hundred and twenty Penumbral Gateways were active and scattered across the Warrens at any given time. They would cycle from location to location in accordance with a self-scrambling memory key installed within the core–one that Avo now copied into his own Meta as well. If they wanted to leave, all it would take was a request and a specific gateway. The doorway he entered through would then re-manifest along the walls of the command nexus as a tunnel opened behind it. Doing this seemed to require no sacrifice of Essence, merely the activation of his helix.
The only real trouble came after, with re-entry necessitating the sacrifice of a ghoul. Avo wasn’t sure if only his brothers would suffice as key to this demiplane, but thus far, they were the only beings his helix worked on. And interestingly, Kae theorized that this Heaven of Shadows must be connected to Rendsinks somewhere, as it seemed to lack a Soul and an obvious Hell.
Such a thing made Avo wonder why his Frame hadn’t managed to identify the Heaven in function yet. Perhaps it pre-dated recorded data.
He had examined a few of the helios from the cloning pools afterward, choosing to keep them dormant instead of waking them fully. It was difficult for him to regard them for long. Searching the blankness of their minds, he found nothing of a helix slot within them, nor the touch of ghoulhood.
That, then, was something for the Low Masters–or the Hungers themselves–to add after the perversion of their flesh.
BIOMASS: 45%
Another matter was the supply situation for the ship. The hydroponics bay–a literal kilometer-long silo of genetically modified greenery–cycled enough air and water for the ship. However, they still lacked some critical supplies to sustain an extended living aboard.
Well, extended living for the other two, at least. Avo had, to sate curiosity more than hunger, taken samplings of his predecessor species.
They tasted remarkably bland.
His visit to the gene clinic was brief. Much potential lay in its future if the EGI’s logs were anything to go off of. For now, bereft of proper licenses, all he found was an inventory of disappointment blunted by a single surprise. Short of wishing to modify himself to survive the void or revert back to baseline ghoul, the clinic would not provide him any augmentations yet. However, he discovered the helix had done something to his blood. With his haemophage unrestricted, his ability to interface with “biological apparatuses” had been drastically enhanced.
Apparently, he met a requirement of a license to his own biology, and now his half-sapient blood cells could assimilate biomass or other organs into his vessel instead of breaking everything down for energy.
Something he should consult with Ruveca about if nothing else.
The remainder of his mem-cache material he transferred over to Kae in the form of phantoms. The three volumes of the Elder Mythos archives were compendiums of different pantheons from the perspective of Old Noloth. With such knowledge deemed illegal by the Guilds and a felony class crime, even possessing this made him a ripe target for an Exorcist if detected by a stray thought scan.
Best that he left the mem-data with the nexus for now. At least until he could improve his wards. Improve his Metamind, actually. He had been putting that off. Putting that off since…
Since the Deep Bazaar. Where Walton’s node made him…
He had killed his father. A shadow of his father, anyhow.
There was another thing that bound them: Death. Both of them had died, over and over in some capacity.

The only difference now was that Walton wasn’t coming back.
Some of this just didn’t feel real. Real. Avo wasn’t even sure the word applied to himself anymore.
A crackle of wincing ghosts spilled through his Auto-Seance and tore him away from that path of thought. Green River’s session coming to life. In the time he spent examining his new sanctuary, Draus must have finished arranging for the three Conflux “escapees” to be returned to Mirrorhead’s gasp.
By this point, the Sang was calling to report either confirmation of delivery or an interception by the Exorcists. And judging from how smoothly Chambers’ marker was moving in his Metamind's DeepNav, he predicted the news would be most pleasing.
+It’s done,+ Green River said. +Conflux has paid for the transaction. They sounded quite surprised about the “stock” I procured. The three will be delivered within the hour. The rest is your business.+
+Good,+ Avo replied. It tracked with what he knew already, nested within each of the three subverted minds. +Any suspicion?+


+Not on my end, I assure you. As for the cargo believing the theater of their minds, I cannot claim any certainty. Such is something I leave for your judgment.+ Apprehension clouded her next thoughts. A speckle of loathing, its vector directed beyond him, toward the Low Masters he represented to her. +I have a request for you. One that I consider owed.+
Owed. He thought differently, but perspective determined the foundation for one’s rules. The district was hers to manage, and his last encounter with “family” had left a massacre in her backyard. Doubtless, questions had descended on her from above, demanding explanations for the sudden deaths and the obvious nullings.

Explanations she couldn’t provide. He had yet to release her from Walton's final bindings.
+Tell me about the request,+ Avo said. He was only half-focused on her. In the depths of his mind, he still monitored the path Chambers and the techs took. They were supposedly being shuttled along with some corpses–soon to be made Wights. The automated aeros were to run across Layer One, gathering corpses from place to place, stopping between key blocks.
Wouldn’t be hard for three living subjects to “escape” during such a period.
Soon, he would be in his element again, diving deep through hidden memories to sabotage Conflux from within. Priority targets were the loci serving as nerve centers for the block, the drones, rival Necrojacks, and above all, Mirrorhead himself.
For the last, Avo held hope that the Syndicate boss would remain predictable and pull Chambers into his inner sanctum. Without straying gazes and outside influence, the challenge of tagging Mirrorhead with a mem-con would be far easier.
+I visited Ox-Three after your departure,+ Green River prodded, pulling his thoughts away from the upcoming dive and back to the conversation. +And the two blocks next to it. Walton or his other nodes were the transgressors, but they were looking for you. All those people nulled… Tell me… were Walton’s shadows involved? Other nodes?+

He wanted to tell her that he didn’t know what awaited them. That it wasn’t his doing. Fault belonged to the Low Masters and the festering thing they worshiped as a god. Not him.
He stopped himself.
Defending his involvement mattered little. The ones he needed to see dead took priority. And the Sang, in of herself, presented something of an asset against the Low Masters, familiar with Walton as she was.
+Want me to atone?+ Avo asked. +Provide recompense for them.+
Her quiet response cleaved back at him, a cold-metal blade lashing back. +The people are dead, ghoul. There is no recompense for death. But the matter is not with you. There is nothing you can give, for I have ascertained the deed to have been committed by another, beyond your hand. The fault, however, has fallen upon my shoulders. My elders wish for an explanation as to how I allowed one of my new “clients” from Ori-Thaum to null a district. So… I require… another adversary to direct their attention. If you would so provide one, of course.+
Attention fully over to Green River now, Avo wondered how else the Low Masters had pissed off the Sang. He couldn’t help but grin with bitter mirth. Luck frowned upon him in strange ways; the price she demanded was more a necessary assignment. Perhaps that was why she demanded it. He would not be able to evade the other selves of his father, and so there was to be a clash.
Now, however, he had another angle to strike with.
Of course, she did not know the full nature of what she was facing. He and Draus had revealed little regarding his encounter in Ox-Three. Hesitation lingered with him still regarding that topic. +Yes… I can get you something. Will need some time to provide proper details.+
Her mind stilled into inscrutable silence. Just how much did she believe. What was coming? A rebuke? +Good. I… misjudged you, ghoul. You surprise me with your willingness to… be reasonable.+


Yeah. He still hated her too. +We share prey. Nothing more.+
A titter of laughter came from her. It was a thing of reflexive politeness. +Ah. So I see. Another question, if you will?+

+I’ll deactivate the last memory chaining your mind. Do it after business with Conflux concludes.+

+That obvious, was I?+

+Have anything else in common to talk about?+

A pause came from the Sang. She sighed. +Bright-Wealth wants to know if you’re coming around again. She is willing to offer good imps for a phantasmic. A clandestine Specter of a sort. Something doubtlessly to help her cheat at ma jiang.+
He gave an amused grunt. What else indeed? His first instinct was to say no. That he didn’t care. But he paused. Something about the offer seemed… nostalgic. Like he was back in the Tiers, living as a Necrojack again. If half of those memories even belonged to the same person. The coldness returned inside him. He was more chimera than ghoul now. Perhaps all along. +Ask her how much. Then we talk.+
Chambers passed into the borders of Mazzo’s Junction. The time of insertion was upon them. +Going to need to go quiet now. Share details if anything is discovered.+
+Very well,+ Green River said. +I will be in touch.+
He ended the session and watched as Chambers’ marker inched toward the Conflux megablock through Exorcist-managed traffic.
The drones he and Draus had used to map out and monitor the area were still in play, but working more subtly than ever. The veins of traffic were thick with remotely possessed or ghost-driven vehicles, mostly empty of people. As such, it was hard to parse the loci of their Lark drones from other aeros.
Through the rising levels of the Conflux megablock, with its vast podiums still littered with pockets of foot traffic and drifting advertisements, neon messages painted in both the real and the Nether, the cargo descended.
It was low in the Spine–just above where Layer One parted the Warrens proper from the gutters below–that the transport carrying Chambers accelerated. An open dock awaited them, the outside protected by twenty drones.
They were Bodkin patterns he remembered from the Crucible. Suppose Conflux had plenty of those.
Across the Auto-Seance session Avo built into his spies, Chambers’ anxiety was a persistent torrent. Terror gripped the enforcer, but he was surprisingly competent at controlling his lesser nature.
Avo despised the man, but through the sequencing of his mind, could not deny that though the Syndicate enforcer lacked good sense, good nerve, good instinct, and good hygiene, there was a strange cunning amidst all the filth. Something both simpering and intensely aware of what others thought of him, capable of reading emotions or guessing at motivations. Such granted him room to adjust himself accordingly; it was part of what kept him safe from abusers like Mirrorhead.
Unfortunately, that was where Avo’s complimentary thoughts culminated, for Chambers had a bad habit, and that was tuning his Metamind to play specific distasteful vicarities when he got too worried. Using the enforcer as both spy and gateway, Avo was always there. More than once Avo had to quell the man’s in-mind entertainment, and more than once he desired to bleach his eyes and null the man after beholding the contents.
Like a shadow hiding the darkest memories within Chambers’ mind, Avo watched and waited. With all the alterations he made to the enforcers’ memories, the man now remembered things of the past slightly differently. Deliberately differently compared to the techs as well–another thing to serve as a lure for Mirrorhead’s attention.
Less than two hundred feet away now judging from the triangulation between the Lark, the transport, and the dock when calculated by his Phys-Sim.
Activating another session, he connected his mind with Draus’. +Our seeds on approach. Insertion soon.+
+Copy that,+ Draus said, her awareness drifting over into his Metamind, taking a backseat in his palace. +Did you alter your Meta, by the way? Place feels… different.+
+Not yet,+ Avo said, watching the distance fade. +Not yet.+
+Place the technicians in the holding cells. I will speak to the enforcer personally. No. No send him now. I don’t care if he’s naked–all the better: the humiliated speak louder.+
-Mirrorhead private lobby broadcast across all Conflux loci
9-10
Reflected Shadows
“Chambers? That you?”

It was hard to tell who was asking him considering the blinding lights searing his swollen eyes and the voice speaking being modulated all to shit by a godsdammed rig.
But if there was one thing he did know, it was that crackle. That familiar shitty crackle of an old exorig pattern. Wait, didn’t he used to wear one of those? His memories still felt a bit jumbled, like his brain had been carved from his skull and soaked in a river, bouncing off every rock in its path before getting shoved back in.
“Yeah,” Chambers said hoarsely, wincing at the brightness. “It’s me. It’s… your old consang Chambers.”
He shook his head hoping to clear it. Mistake. The dizziness redoubled. Memories pulsed through his mind with each throb of pain. He was… was trying to get his biomods back from Shred. But Scalpers showed up and took him.
Just his luck too: the half-strands grabbing him and the techs were doing some under-the-table stuff. Not official work. So good news was no scalps were taken that day. Bad news was that the rotlick got snuffed.
Damn shame. That ghoul was a one-of-a-kind. Well, now none of a kind seeing it was dead. Frankly, Chambers was worried what the boss was going to do to him once he learned.

Wait. Shit. Mirrorhead. The boss. He lost the boss’ shit. Oh no, oh this was not good–this was fucking bad. Think Chambers, think. You need to figure out your story. Prepare something to say beforehand. Make him think it isn’t your fault.
You were just having the ghoul sightsee, no, investigate something interesting happening atop the blocks of Burner’s Way. Yeah. Yeah, makes more sense. Mobility testing. Then getting closer to the Gouge, all of a sudden the Scalper fucks show up and ruin everything.
Alright. That’s the plan. If Mirrorhead wants to know anything else, say Scalper Necros went digging in his mind and left some memory damage.
With the repeated haze overtaking his thoughts, that part might not even be a lie.
A strong arm planted upon his shoulder. Chambers blinked. An enforcer depolarized their faceplate, looking down at him. Aegis Mark I? Was that his kind of rig? A pale hap-tatted face greeted him. Did he know her? No. He knew everyone. This juv was new blood. A shame. She had that bright and ambitious look in her eyes like she was trying to get noticed. A real tryhard. The Big Nothing was all that waited for her.
“Sorry you’re gonna die,” Chambers mumbled. Tightness coiled his stomach into knots of pain. He was having a hard time breathing. He needed to calm down. He needed… He needed…
He needed Dannis Steelhard.
With a thought, he activated a vicarity and left himself drift. In the periphery of his awareness, he watched as several more enforcers and technicians boarded the transport. They were interfacing with his cage–whoa? A cage? Transparent cage too. Like it was supposed to vacuum seal something on the inside. Like one of them fancy techno sarcophagi. Or a stasis module made to hold Wights.
The foul dankness of the Warrens burrowed up his nose and he coughed, gagging. It was like getting a syringe of raw sewage injected into his nasal cavities. God, why did everything smell so bad in this district? Were they outside close to the gutters?
Thankfully, the musk of sandalwood-scented oils overwrote the flavors of reality, the fragrances of his vicarity wrapping around him,a blanket keeping him safe and sane.
Which was when his entertainment suddenly stopped working, and the memories blinked out of his Meta.
“The hells?” Chambers muttered. Mists of confusion thickened within him as he felt strange arms seizing him under his armpits, the whine of servos singing as the juv pulled him out from the pod. Where… where did Dannis go?
***
+You sure he won’t notice you turning that off?+ Draus asked.
+No,+ Avo said. +Been pulling his short term memories as well. Copying and layering crude edits into his thoughtstuff from the inside. Probably just confusing for him. Sells the act better. But the vicarities are interfering. And disgusting.+


No disagreement came from Draus.
Through the tri-tethered minds of Chambers and the techs, he counted there to be approximately six enforcers in the immediate vicinity, with another forty personnel loitering around the inside of the docking bay judging by accretion.
A scoff came from Draus. +Still don’t got no discipline or sense. Those enforcers should be in formation on the outside. L formation would work here, but they’re standing in a U. If they had to shoot, there’s gonna be friendly fire.+
+More gangers than soldiers.+ Avo said.
+Barely gangers,+ Draus said. A taste of derision instilled her thoughts with the spice of disdain. +These half-strands are target practice. Just a question of who’s gonna snuff ‘em eventually.+
Back in the real, Avo’s fangs widened in a feral grin. +Yeah. Wonder who.+
Draus chuckled. +You send the drones in first. Gotta have them check for traps and the rest.+


Using Chambers as a junction for his ghosts, Avo spun Lucille’s Regret into his Ghostjack and studied the targets around him. There wasn’t the need to engage or spoof his way into any minds yet, but it was good to be prepared.
Tardy and disorganized as they were, Conflux’s Necros had to show up eventually. And when they did, he would study them as a hunter would big game. He doubted their skill, but priority targets they remained.
The enforcers took all three assets out of the transport, but it was clear that the techs were being taken to one place and Chambers another. Through the disguised Auto-Seance, Avo waited as the transport shut its doors; the long rectangular aero carrier fired the six triangular propulsion drives on its side, rising up and sliding into the phosphorescent glare of the Warrens.
As the outer blast doors closed–their design suspiciously reminiscent of the doors Mirrorhead lead Avo through during his “recruitment”-- the paths of his assets diverged.
Unlinking from Chambers momentarily, Avo deep-dived into Janand’s mind and found himself on a downward trajectory a few floors above medical. Studying the architecture of the building again, he noted a few additional loci added to the block.

A moment passed as he marked all present loci. Seventy-seventy loci. Three sections. The division was parted by floors and positions, with a network of countless smaller palaces connected to a central hub.

Avo grinned. Mistake. Poor design choice for base of operations. Phantasmal quantity was good for when you wanted to overwhelm someone with attacks, but ghosts weren’t like Essence for his Souls–memories were fickle things, and a colossal construct offered evermore threads to unravel.
Centralization was a vulnerability in his opinion. Best have asynchronous cells instead, should defense and logistics be a priority.
WARNING: EXTERNAL MIND DETECTED
A specter floated through the doors of the elevator and began to interface with Janand’s mind. Finally. Another Necro. Avo had been waiting for this.
+Draus,+ Avo said, +Keep an eye on Chambers. Going to do some counter-jacking.+


She mimicked one of his grunts in acknowledgment. He had half a mind to dump some of Chambers’ smut into her Meta in response to her mockery.
His unaware rival pushed their chain of ghosts into Janand’s thoughtstuff. A hasty sweep without caution nor vigor, their scrying was painfully sloppy. Whatever Draus felt regarding Conflux’s martial prowess, he knew an equivalent annoyance about their Necrotheurgy.
The reaching limb of the foreign ghost was poking along, prodding at the surface and short-term memories. Soon, they would come across mem-data with null-trigger mem-cons embedded within them. If the Necro was any good, they would notice the trap and turn their attention to the discrepancies in the sequence. Of course, Avo would spoof his way into their mind then, or null them entirely if all went wrong.
If they were bad, however, then there wouldn’t be much to do; the Necro would turn from active prey to a self-solving problem.
Something inside Avo was very curious to learn which they were.
A note of surprise sounded from Draus’ mind. +Avo. They’re dumpin’ Chambers in one of the elevators. Alone.+
It took but a moment’s consideration for him to understand what was about to happen. He just didn’t expect the Syndicate boss to be so hasty considering how threat averse the man was, especially now with the Paladins in play. +Giving him to Mirrorhead. He’s going to come out of the glass. Tell me once you see him. Need to be careful with him.+

+Yeah. Synch that.+


Just then, the enemy Necro paused, lingering on a sequence of memory. Ah. Avo remembered that one. A false memory of the Scalpers assaulting the G-Tubes and taking Chambers and the other two prisoner. The Necro hovered there, a descending mind connected by a chain of ghosts, gazing at the data around them. Part of Avo wanted his prey to see through the ruse, to prove their skill.
The yearning was something of ego: he was developing a taste for making a victim of the strong rather than the weak. The higher the thrill, the better the taste.
Yet, satisfaction and disappointment rang as one when the Necro descended past, ignorant to the memory they just passed through, and the mem-con that they wove into themselves upon swimming onward.
Exiting Janand’s mind, Avo jumped back into the fetid waters that Chambers called his Meta. There, he found himself masked by a sheen of scrambled memories, staring at rising numbers on the elevator's interface, feeling the surge of fear build within Chambers to the thump of looping chronobass.
Oh, that music again. Same tune. Same skull-splitting, foreboding rhythm.
He felt Chambers’ fear spike. The enforcer knew what was coming. They both knew.
Mirrorhead, after all, was a tyrant through and through. With this opportunity to bully someone they deemed lesser, the only condition to limit their arrival was a problem of security.
And within his own fortress, there really were not many other places where Mirrorhead would be safer.
Or so was the assumption, anyhow.
***
Chambers was only having half a panic attack when pulled out from the transport. It was when they shoved him in this elevator alone and left him as meat for the boss that he started getting a mite bit unnerved.
It had been…what, five months since he last pissed himself? It had been for good reason! The nova was tainted and he hallucinated his genitals were a weaponized implant and that the people around him were joy-fiends asking him for a couple of imps. Heh. Man, were they mad as all fuck. This time though, if he was going to let it leak, it would be done out of raw, primal fear.
Speaking to Mirrorhead was a lot like negotiating with a nu-dog of war. You really didn’t do it unless you had to, and if you were doing it, that meant shit had gone to fuck and things were probably bound for an ugly end.
During his time as a member of Conflux, Chambers prided himself on being more aware of the boss’ habits than the boss probably was. He knew where Mirrorhead was likely to be. He knew when to slack and when to pretend to work. He knew just how to present himself so that he was never picked for a hot shit detail, while also not portraying a moron so absolute that he was sent on a suicide run or just outright exploded.
Now, however, was a different case. Now, Aedon Chambers was in the spotlight, and he found it very, very hard not to wet himself.
Being naked this whole time didn’t help the fact either.
Struggling to control his breathing, he looked up and chuckled. “Hey, uh… boss. If you’re watching, I didn’t wanna be undressed but those Scalpers… whoever kidnapped me, they were some… nasty rash-courting fucks, those half-strands were. Yeah. Who… who knows what degenerate stuff they got up to with Janand. Maybe… maybe you should check on him first. And the other one. They were crying when I last saw them. They need the firm presence of a strong, wise, powerful, all-seeing, all-knowing leader.”

He spoke each of those words with all the fervor and passion he didn’t feel toward Mirrorhead. Chambers was good at saying stuff he didn’t really feel or mean. It was practically one of his special abilities. Fearing for your life would turn almost anyone into a thespian.
The cold stung his body and the glitching beats of chronobass mocked him with an inhuman quaver. Mirrorhead did not step through the glass in that instant. Nor did he suddenly make himself known from behind with one of his loud and random statements about what he didn’t like or whatever bit of trivia he was using as a part of his intimidation shtick that day.
Chambers coughed. He bounced on his toes, trying to keep the chill from numbing his skin too much. He coughed, and this time, he nodded.
Maybe the boss was busy. Or maybe he’d actually taken Chambers’ advice to go see Janand first. And it was advice. Janand was, after all, a soft tech. Tech were glassjaws, everyone knew that. As a hardened enforcer, Chambers was hard and unshakable in–
The ground beneath him suddenly felt like it vanished. Matter one second and open air the next, Chambers tread on emptiness and tumbled down, falling into fathomless expanse of parting glass and folding reflections. A scream left his lungs as his voice hurled a final, desperate deflection. “Those weren’t my biomods! Janand wanted them! Janand got the rotlick killed! It was all him! Blame him!”
But his voice was cast out into a chasm of oblivion. Above him, the elevator itself was a faint light growing dimmer, like a window he was falling away from. Around him, the world turned to merging and cracking fractals.

Drawing him through the chaos was a power unseen, suddenly snapped sideways by a force beyond description, Chambers wailed as his limbs flopped. Terror fissured out from within his chest, and frost coated his blood, his bones.
Whipping his head around, he tried to catch sight of what was dragging him.
This proved to be a mistake above all others.
He saw it then, his organs sinking past his feet as he did. The leviathan assembled itself from shards and fractals, constructing itself from the tumbling kaleidescope of this unreality.
Flashes of imagery seared into his mind like salt poured into open wounds.
Oh, gods. Sour strands of spit spilled out from his mouth in place of vomit. What was he looking at. What the hells was that thing.
Circling bands enwreathing three eyes, each the width of a lake, glared down upon him, irises gleaming as if glass catching a ray of light. The thing was big. Bigger than the carrier he was brought in. Maybe even bigger than the block itself.

Six reflective wings of jagged sharpness curved as Chambers caught sight of his own weeping expression. His Metamind was screaming. Wards shaking. His vision blurred as parts of his mind came apart, memories and sense of self holding together–but barely.
It felt as if someone was stitching his cognition back together from the inside, mending him as fast as he unraveled.
The weight of the unholy presence settled against his mind as he groaned, vomiting and whimpering, his mind and flesh straining against ineffable pressure. Flashing lines of mem-data and interface functions blinked and fizzled. His ghosts were fleeing deeper into him, wriggling inward toward his oldest memories.
Shaken and coming apart, Chambers did what he always did when he was unbalanced. Unthinking, unaware, unwilling even, he sent a single command to his own Meta, and had it activate an emergency vicarity.
Suddenly, the world around him drowned out as “THE SOFT MASTERS' REVENGE II: THE SEEDOPHAGE” began playing its most viewed moments. With how brutalized his mind was, he thought he saw some of the vicarity bleeding out with his fraying thoughtstuff.
Half-mad already from his ordeal, Chambers chuckled as a lusty moan spilled out from his mind, the vicarity was leaking.
+Welcome back, Enforcer Chambers,+ the voice of Mirrorhead exploded within Chambers’ skull. +I have a few questions regarding your absence. Please do your best to enlighten me and… and for the sake of the worthy, turn that off!+
+Jhred. Jhred! Sync-up, you half-strand. It’s Abrel. You’re out of time. I’ve stalled dad as much as I can, but it’s over.
Whatever you’re doing, you might wanna consider getting it done now, because my new orders just came in and you’re not going to like them.
Listen… I know you’re still stuck on mom but… this is done. Alright? You gotta face it: I mean–can you even remember her? After we had our memories censored? It just…
Fine. Alright. The sister act probably doesn’t do much for you anyway. Well then. Time for the other thing.
Jhred Greatling, for negligence to your duties and utter disregard of your better’s commands, I, Instrument Abrel Greatling have been charged with your retrieval.
Submit and comply, or stand and deliver.
Blessed be the Worthy.+
-Instrument Abrel Greatling to her brother, former Instrument Jhred Greatling
9-11
Poisoned Bait
Mirrorhead was a fool.
Eccentric as Chambers’ mind was, he was still but a human. An ephemeral in the words of the Woundshaper. Without adequate protection, for a creature of material reality to gaze upon the eldritch would be akin to lungs inhaling smoke rising from a conflagration.
As Avo worked furiously to mend the fraying mind, he noticed how he didn’t feel so affected himself. There was still distortions and lulls in thought when he found himself faced with the immensity of the Twice-Walker, but with the growth of his Soul and the broadening of his mind, no longer did Mirrorhead’s Heaven seem quite so unnatural, quite so overwhelming.
How easily was one conditioned to madness when they imbibed power from similar sources?
Still, that was something to consider later. A building tolerance to revel in; a thing to investigate.
For now, he needed to keep Chambers intact in ego and sanity. The enforcer was still needed to serve as an infection vector. Avo didn’t know if Mirrorhead was merely determined to feed his ego or if there was a genuine point to this vulgar exposure of a Heaven to a mortal.
“Such is hubris,” the Woundshaper said, breaking it's silence within Avo. It had been countless hours since the former god talked. Occupied by the allure of its reflection in its balancing Hell, it had manifested an inhuman narcissism, glorying in burgeoning growth. “The call is too strong for the boy. You need not imagine this to understand: you broke from the calculated path yourself to free those slaves. Did you not indulge in the tastes of their minds as they butchered the captives you offered them? That is the nature of entombing the absolute in the relative: The encompassing nature of our power must be expressed.”
Or so the Woundshaper claimed.
Born a High Guilder, there wasn’t much hope for humility in the Syndicate boss anyhow.
Camouflaged by debris of memory, Avo resequenced fracturing strands using his Ghostjack, overwriting the paths where trauma flowed, choking the damage before it could sink too deep.
Playing a circumspect game, he could only mend what was broken in the depths of Chambers’ mind. Some of his carefully laid phantasmics were certainly broken now. Just as well. He never expected to be able to snare someone like Mirrorhead with meager traps.
It wouldn’t have satisfied Avo either. As he had had confessed to himself more than once, it would be a sublime pleasure to feel the other Godclad come apart. Between his claws he would savage Mirrorhead, to rend his vessel, severe the stitchings of his mind, and drink the shine from Mirrorhead’s very Soul.
Patience. That would ensure his moment. His chance to strike.
+How’s it lookin’?+ Draus asked, her mind nested inside his instead of Chambers. The rattling of his wards probably caught her notice.
+Hm,+ Avo said. Peeking out at the design of the Twice-Walker again via Chambers’ fragmented thoughts. His Soul quavered. The beast hissed with near-salacious delight imagining the bloodlust it would soon get to unleash after devouring such a harvest. +Delicious.+
+Jaus,+ Draus sighed. +Don’t know why I asked. I’m surrounded by godsdamned freaks.+
***
“Huh, ha, hmm?” Chambers half-drooled, half-spoke. Coherence returned to him like severed wires jiggling back into contact, the surge of clarity there and lost again. During moments of lucidity, he could see the thing touched with the boss’ voice slide around this weird dimension, its position skipping between fractals and reflections as if everything that captured its visage was a portal.
The damage it inflicted lessened when it circled behind him. Not seeing it felt immediately like someone taking their boot off a mental-wound, but still, even as the pain diminished to somethign more manageable, the hurt was still there, still throbbing.
Chambers chuckled to himself. Throbbing. He liked that word. He knew a lot of things that were throbbing. Wait… when did he activate that Dannis Hardsteel vicarity?
+Chambers,+ Mirrorhead’s distant voice cleaved the straying though from Chambers’ mind. Attention was forced onto the conversation. Chambers hated paying attention. +Did you hear me? Turn. It. Off.+
Opening and closing his mouth like a goldfish, it took time for the words spoken to him to process. Each syllable cast into his mind was closer to a dagger plunging into the depression left by an open wound, the meat there only barely beginning to heal.
By the time Chambers’ realized what was being ordered of him, however, he found that the vicarity had already been closed, and that the caustic fog eating away at his thoughts had suddenly parted. Like someone drained it out of his mind.
Chambers chuckled. Gleam. His mind must’ve been mem-matter hard. Unbreakable. Maybe he should have been a Reg–
The colossal aberration sliced its way back into sight, scouring Chambers’ mind anew as he noticed it creeping toward him from the corner of his eyes.

“Nope,” he croaked, the words tumbling out from his liquefying thoughts. Internal and external dialogue grew confusing. Hidden desires found themselves imbued with words. “Nope. Can’t be a Reg. Reality sucks. The ghouls out here don’t do bo-bon-bondage!”


The eldritch titan halted in place. Between flashes when his mind could still process images, he thought it had tilted slightly, all three of its enormous eyes narrowing into judgmental slits.
Another force tore into him from the side. He realized then that the flat end of a fractal was pushing him toward the monster. Chambers opened his mouth to scream, his trauma worsening as he inched closer, the monstrosity stretching to become an unnatural reflection, an animated portrait aping his worsening trauma.
As he struck his reflection, both versions of Chambers collided. And one fell down through the ceiling on the other side, tumbling into the light, bouncing off a pellucid desk as he rolled against the cool touch of glass smacking his senses.
For moments after, Chambers could but groan. Pawing at the ground, his body ached, right ribs thrumming now as he felt a bruise forming. Surprisingly, his mind came back together, and melded toward a semblance of its pre-ordeal haleness.
He nodded to himself. Maybe all the messed up rash-smut he was watching had made him immune to near-nulling. Maybe he was different in body and will. Or maybe he was just too stupid to stay hurt.
Being mind-damaged took memory too, right? Could be that he just… forgot about being traumatized. Yeah. Sounded about right.
“I… I am the ultimate idiot,” Chambers said, the words spilling out from his mouth before he could catch them. He snorted. He laughed. A cold wind wafted like a river of tiny daggers, carving numbness into his skin.
He shivered.
“Get up,” Mirrorhead said. “I grow tired of your debasement. Beyond your… many indignities, I dare say you handled the presence of my power quite well. Much better than expected. Never pegged you for a man of fortitude, but I suppose we all surprise ourselves sometimes.”

Crawling with muscles taut and buttcheeks clenched, Chambers turned, following the source of Mirrorhead’s voice. The edge of a gleaming desk blocked the face of his boss from sight, but Chambers could still see the hyper-detailed, hyper-expensive, hyper-whatever-the-fuck-else formal slacks the man wore.
That, and those goofy-ass black and white shoes. Like, everything up until the shoes was fun, but then the man decided to go full half-strand and complete the dipshit aesthetic. People got it: he was the face of Conflux. But he didn’t need to literally start wearing its themes–that was like getting a hap-tat.
Only poor people and half-strands got hap-tats, and if you were poor and a half-strand, that made you a refugee.
Ain’t no way Chambers was going to take an order from a refugee. You know what? For making him think that, he was going to wait another half second before getting up. There. A true act of spite.

He covered a grin with a grimace as he deliberately exaggerated his condition, making groaning noises. Yeah. There was nothing quite like making someone else wait on you. This wasn’t him being petty, this was him exercising what little power he had. Even if that was pure annoyance. Besides, he got thrown through the ceiling, right? He hurt.
Rising with gritted teeth, Chambers contorted award-winning performances out from his facial muscles. Was it all pointless histrionics? No. There was technique here. Artistry even. You moan and groan too much, it’s not believable. There needed to be a rhythm, face weaving through different stages of hurt as the associated “damages” were affected. Case in point: he ended on an expression that Dannis Steelhard once called “oh, no I’ve fuckin’ prolapsed!” This is a face for a climatic moment when the expresser finally realizes just how hurt they actually are.
Chambers was no smut star. Though he could’ve been. Another and another life, maybe. But, he did have a feeling for this sort of thing. A killer instinct. A performance few could see through, he’d say. Mirrorhead was sure to let off him after this.
“Chambers. Sit down, stop making those faces, or I will fully break the slightly bruised ribs you’re holding.” The threat rumbled like a bass-toned omen. Chambers could feel the vibration shaking in his very bones.
Dammit. Mirrorhead was a real rust; a half-strand of the highest order, but the fucker had a nice voice.
LUSTAWAY ACTIVATED
TRANSFERRING PHYSICAL AROUSAL INTO METAMIND…
If the boss noticed that, he didn’t respond.
The seat was a small glass barrel, in front of glass table, atop which there were two glass cups and an ambrosia decanter. They were surrounded on all sides by glass walls and Mirrorhead had a glass face.
Glassglassglassglassglass.
Fucking… Chambers took it back.
The boss didn’t have a theme; this was a fetish.
***


+There. Jumped position,+ Avo said. Well. Atleast that was something confirmed. The current DeepNav position for Chambers had him still at Mazzo’s Junction–but far, far below even the gutters itself.
Chambers jumped ten miles in an instant. The moment he went through the glass, the DeepNav stopped functioning, the ghost unable to reference their positions, or interface with any other networks. However, as soon as they emerged on the other side, the links were re-established.
Sloppy of Mirrorhead to allow this to happen. Too sloppy. Arrogance was an unbecoming trait.
Avo frowned. He was guilty of the same thing: Zein had assisted in the acquisition of his new sanctuary, but using him, she also managed to infiltrate its confines and connect to the hive.
He needed to do a deep sweep of the EGI Core later. And himself.
Weaving another few memories back into the fabric of Chambers’ subconsciousness, Avo bided his time and waited.
+Gonna try jackin’ into him now?+ Draus asked. He could feel her anticipation as well, their prey in sight, but beyond physical grasp.
+Soon,+ Avo said. +Need him to directly reach into Chambers’ mind first.+

+And you sure he’s gonna do that?+

No. But even if Mirrorhead didn’t do it of his own volition, Avo had ways of forcing it. Chambers was expendable, after all. +Probably. Have something special just waiting for him.+


***
“I always despised the Scalpers,” Mirrorhead said. “For that, you have my sympathy. Surviving them must’ve been quite the ordeal.”

Chambers tried not to shuffle so much while the Godclad spoke, but damn was the chill hell on his ass and personal nether regions. What the fuck was wrong with a leather chair? What the fuck made their guests sit on a squat barrel naked while getting a nice glass throne all to themselves.
“Well,” Chamber said, opening his mouth to speak.
The glass beneath his arm cracked. A low whine of something approached. Something drifted through the depths of the desk’s reflection. He went very, very still.
“I was not done.” Mirrorhead reached over and poured himself a drink. The other glass stayed empty; no offer to share was made toward Chambers. The Syndicate boss poured the glowing honey that was ambrosia into his gleaming face as the enforcer just swallowed and stared. “I said you had my sympathy. But now, I also suffer from another matter. One that I think you might be able to help me with. Can you guess what I want, Mr. Chambers?”

Mister? Uh-oh. Enforcer meant he was still working for Mirrorhead. And he didn’t think the man did severance packages… severance…

Was this about the cortex bomb?

“Listen, boss,” Chambers said, face tight with turmoil, “they hit us without warning. Like they knew exactly where we were. I didn’t even get a chance to fight but–but you know what? Even as all ten of them broke into our capsule, Chambers went down swinging. Not like that fuckin’ coward Janand. He bent over and just gave up. Hid behind uh… whatever her name was. I think you should check him, actually. Afterward, of course. At your own pace, boss. I mean. Only if you want.”

“That wasn’t an answer, Chambers,” Mirrorhead replied.
Oh did it get hard to breathe then. Fading away tempted, but some vague flicker of sense was screaming inside him, howling at him with violence and annoyance, telling him to keep his vicarities off. If only for now. Hm. His mind might be more damaged than he thought: His inner voice sure sounded a lot like Avo.
Rest in oblivion rotlick. Can’t be hurt no more in the nothing.
“Is it about the bomb?” Chambers asked. “‘Cause, they took that out of us pretty early. Made sure we were clean and all that other jazz. So we could be sold, you know.”

“Do I know that?” Mirrorhead considered. “You know… It takes a particular delicateness to disable a cortex bomb. The manufacturer promised me its more… circumspect specs. Like being able to detonate when the host was in danger. Tell me, did they disable your rig beforehand? The machinery?”

“I, uh.” Chamber swallowed. “I can’t recall?”

“Can’t recall,” Mirrorhead said, shaking his head. “A shame, Chambers. A real shame. You know, my father… he would call this an excuse. He’s a very outcome-oriented man. And a fool. I appreciate process. The journey, if you will. I find that tells us much about future success–but more importantly, the truth. So, I will give you the courtesy of another answer: Are you lying to me, Chambers?”

Blood tore through Chambers’ veins like corkscrews, each heartbeat twisting voice-choking torture. He couldn’t breathe. The room was spinning. His muscles shriveled, dry of strength. A pit of discomfort yawned and closed in his gut.
Inside the depths of his mind, only one voice rose through the clamor of his rising panic.
Dear dead Avo was telling him to deny it. To fight on and stick with the story.
Well, he didn’t have a better idea of his own.
“No, bossman,” Chambers said, throwing in a chuckle and praying his cold sweat would be left unnoticed. “I mean… would I really have the nerve.”
Terrified, an unwilling squeal of laughter came out from Chambers. Ohshit! Ah, hells. Too late. The only way back was to keep going forward. He spat another laugh, its note equally shrill, but infinitely more forced.
A few moments passed. Silence slid across Chambers’ throat like a dagger. The temperature in the room grew colder, harsher. All that was flesh shivered. All that was glass served a judging reflection, threatening a lurking beast.

Then, Mirrorhead grunted. No. He laughed. He laughed! The note was brief and low but Chambers was sure it was a laugh.

Yes! He should have never doubted himself! Never doubted the Avo in his mind! He had the charm and the idiocy to protect himself. He just had to believe and focus. That’s how dreams got manifested.
“It’s strange, you know?” Mirrorhead said. “I really don’t think your lying. I really think you think you’re telling the truth.”

Chambers nodded vigorously, a trickle of snot spilling free from his nostrils. “That’s cause I am, boss, I am.”

“Sure. I believe you,” Mirrorhead said.
The euphoria Chambers felt at that moment was overwhelming. He saved himself… he wasn’t going to die… he was gonna live forever! Aedon Chambers was invincible! He exhaled a shudder of a breath, pure relief wheezing out of him.
But Mirrorhead spoke again. And this time, the relief lodged itself halfway out from his body. “Of course, you’ve been missing a while, Chambers. You know how jacks are. Very unpleasant business.” The Syndicate boss took another drink. “I said I trust you. I can taste the fear from you. No one I have is that much of a fool to lie to me. But the game isn’t played that way. And we both know that lies run deeper than intent, don’t we?”

No. Chambers, in fact, did not understand what Mirrorhead was insinuating.

He figured it out quickly when a screaming torrent of ghosts burst out through the glass of Mirrorhead’s face and tore through his surface thoughts.
The assault was like a drill dug in and implanted prying fingers, the ghosts poking open wounds left in Chambers’ mind, tearing open clefts of thought. A violating will streamed into the enforcer, the boiling perception of the Godclad spreading deeper and deeper, like cancer eating away at flesh.
As Chambers’ sense of self narrowed to a pinprick, he thought he felt something else resonate inside him as well.
It was a feeling. Of pleasure. Of triumph. Of satisfaction.
It was how someone might feel watching a hated foe wander into a well-laid trap.
So… so, the Twice-Walker is a very specialized Heaven. A very–uh–very specialized design. I think it was made… made by Highflame j-just recently. Just before the beginning of the Fourth Guild War.
It's designation is between Porter and Breaker. It's actually not… not a Heaven of Glass, but–but glass is one of its domains. It's actually a Heaven of Reflection, with Domains of Radiance, Space, Glass, and Reflection all working in tan-tandem.
It's… it's been rated for Sphere Four Frames and above. Very vulgar but… but quite effective… and elusive too.
But… but there are countermeasures. The Domain of Space is… is always vulnerable to Backlash.
I'll see… see if I can–uh–come up with something to… to affect it.
-Kae Kusanade to Jelene Draus
9-12
The Beast Unseen
+He’s in.+ Avo ran his tongue across his fangs. +He’s mine.+
+Don’t get all high on yourself,+ Draus cautioned. +You ain’t got him yet.+
But Avo did. And he knew from the very moment Mirrorhead wandered in, barging through the memories without preparation or caution. Even in the realm of the mind, the scion of the Greatlings thought himself above reproach, that the power of his Heaven could somehow protect him here.
Not so, poor Guilder. Not so.
These wilds belonged to beasts of a different make, and here, even titans could be made prey.
Mirrorhead sailed across memories, his review of the mem-data peripheral at best, perception setting a course across memory, but the waters he charted were but the shallows. Sloppily, he left matters of protection entirely to his wards.
Ah. The Phalanx pattern. Avo was familiar with the phantasmic. Twenty layers of checkpoints lined with oscillating traumas, each portioning Mirrorhead’s consciousness from surface to deepest, segregating his thoughts into manageable districts. Not only content to serve as multiple blockades, the phantasmal protections moved, each shuffling over the other like a cycle of ever-escalating tides.
It spoke volumes of the Syndicate boss’ ego that he was using wards usually meant for Highflame’s forward-operating demiplanes or administrative command fortresses.
To be caught within the stacked defenses would shatter an Osarai Memguard within seconds.
Avo’s wards were ample, but he had tuned them for versatility and mind-diving, not raw combat. Should he find himself discovered, there was little doubt regarding the threat the Phalanx posed.

But Necrojacking was so rarely about force on force. No. More often, there were two duels in play: the first a tale of awareness, to detect your foe from the forest of memories; the second, a clash of two bodies of water, each seeking to dilute and subvert the other.
With how Mirrorhead operated–flooding Chambers’ mind with over ten thousand ghosts–he saw himself as impregnable. Overwhelming. How very Highflame.
Shrouded behind a beltway of twenty orbiting mass graves filled with writhing bodies set ablaze, Mirrorhead approached as the nucleus of a star system, the rings around it sliding across each other like a deck of cards. To amateurs, it would be a staggering sight, the show of force overwhelming like a tsunami, an avalanche. Even Chambers’ memory shivered against the immensity of foreign ghosts marching through him.
Avo, however, found himself delighted. More and more he had the measure of his foe. He had experimented with his implants and Heavens in preparation for this. Tested how his new enhancements might play with his Necrojacking.
Today, he would honor Mirrorhead as his first official mark.
Channels of mem-data spilled down from Mirrorhead’s invading Mind-Palace, dipping down and rifling through Chambers’ sequences. The Guilder operated with breadth but no depth. He would sweep the mind clean in moments, but the details would evade his notice, left only to the automatic functions of his ghosts.
And so, Avo accessed the functions of the hive and sent out a command. He felt Draus’ notice drift over.
+Acknowledged,+ the hive said. +Beginning transfer. Expending biomass to keep hosts alive.+ A new interface popped up in his mind. Circuits formed in the structure of the void ship, each channel connected to the countless Helios embedded in the cloning pool. Needles pierced their skins. Blood was drawn. The biomass of the pool dipped, but in its place, coursed countless mingling streams of crimson, blood flowing into a newly shaped compartment formed just below the nexus.
Beneath Avo’s feet, he felt two pinches. It wouldn’t be long now. He had been yearning for a chance to use this.
+What’s this?+ Draus asked. +You gonna use your Heaven?+
+Yes,+ Avo said. Grinning. +Wait. Watch.+
As blood was drawn, he deposited himself in the form of a Scalper, injecting his mind deeper into a sequence, within a false series of memories he placed within Chambers.
A false recollection was structured: five Scalper enforcers abreaking through the G-Tube capsule with the help of two drones. Through physical violence alone, they brought Chambers and the techs down. Believable harm was painted onto each member of Conflux via memory artifacts taken after Draus’ “conversation'' with Chambers. As such, they all looked distinctively wounded enough to fool the unfocused eye.
All except for one deliberate detail: Chambers was wearing the wrong rig: the Nightmantis. This, among countless other small mistakes, was sprinkled through Chambers’ sequences. Obvious errors incremented into the sequences designed to pull–and halt–the attention of Mirrorhead’s sweeping ghosts.
Stashed with mem-cons, viruses, and other observational phantasmics, Avo had turned the former enforcer’s mind into a pseudo-labyrinth of his own design.
He didn’t expect his traps to overwhelm his prey’s defenses. He just needed Mirrorhead to linger in place long enough for his Ghostjack to twin enough symmetry for him to spoof his way into Mirrorhead’s defenses.
Before, this would have been an operation that took months. Pluck pieces of intelligence and piece them together. Planting Specters and other phantasmics within subverted loci.
The hive chimed with a note of completion.
BIOMASS: 42%
80 TONS OF [O-NEGATIVE] HAEMO-TEMPLATE PRODUCED
Avo reached out through the ports threaded into his leg, constructing an expansion of haemokinetic roots. Like a spill of brambles, his influence reached out as a swelling briar, subsuming the pond of blood contained below him with his control.
“Ah,” the Woundshaper, “We are to indulge in celerity again, are we master?”
“Yeah.”

His mind came alive with an eruption of lightning–his already Heaven-boosted reflexes evolving into an all-consuming thunderstorm as he fired his Celerostylus right after. Draus, fast as she was with her Accelero, was not amped by a Heaven. A dilation grew between them, the ghost connecting their wavelength crackling from the strain of building lag.
It didn’t matter. She would bear witness to this, to his new capabilities in retrospect. Let the Metamind regale her after. The intimacy of active triumph belonged to him.
Right now, he heeded the slavering urge of the beast and the Woundshaper, the building surge of his reflexes coursing through him as skill, pace, and planning interwove to imbue him with the absoluteness of flow.
A beast unseen, Avo slithered out through the memory, a serpent seeking to taint the veins of a giant with its bite.
Across seven sequences, Mirrorhead found himself halted. Seven sequences with obvious incongruencies. Seven sequences Avo was going to use to his advantage.
Crashing tides of perception rushed through the memories like a greater stream grinding counter over another. Chambers’ mind was wailing, holes forming in the fabric of his thoughts. But he wasn’t yet nulled. How begrudgingly commendable.
The real dive began when Avo triggered one of his phantasmics. An entire sequence blanked as questionable mem-cons and pornographic vicarities flashed into activity. Mirrorhead’s perception was suddenly diverted, leaving only a ghost to scan the false memory Chambers had of wearing the Nightmantis exo-rig.
Avo had not been a Godclad very long, but he had been a Necro for his entire life. To use the power of one to enhance the other was an obvious choice.

In the Nether, he was a bolt of electricity to Mirrorhead’s tortoise. The latter seemed impregnable, but the creature was as soft as any when it reached its head out to eat. Ghostjack cleaving prepared memories into shape at a rate once impossible, Avo descended on the lingering ghosts in his targetted sequence, the flow of Mirrorhead’s mem-data plunging deep into the fabric of Chambers’ mind like pillar, two rivers of memory running perpendicular to one another.
To Avo, the measure of Mirrorhead's ward was pillar, watchtower, and ladder all. He just needed to slip past the outer shielding and interface with the deeper memories within.
A Phalanx ward was constant motion, traumas shifting and overlapping. Avo remembered the first time he ran one with Walton. His father had him hitting “softer” vulnerabilities. Guilder Necros maintaining the structure. Personnel passing who used the block’s loci to clock into work. Golems they injected with sequence eroding mem-cons.
That dive took the better part of eight months, but it had been a foundation experience in breaking wards and diving against the Guilds.
More importantly, it gave Avo all he needed to crack Mirrorhead in a single encounter. The Syndicate boss could have ten thousand more ghosts hiding behind the glass. It wouldn’t matter. Not with his skill.

The Phalanx was a mountain indeed, but now, Avo was an unceasing bolt of lightning stinging at its face, trying to find a crack he could widen, a fissure to sink into.
And there was always, always a parting in the stone.
HOSTILE AWARENESS: 2%
The first flashes of memory he peered from Mirrorhead were scrambled–the mem-data an exchange of integers and memories with each crossing of his wards. The changes happened in a cascade, and the sequences themselves were assuredly randomized more each time. Yet, despite all this, the same weakness that afflicted Mirrorhead was the same vulnerability that affected Zein–until she used her Heaven, at least.
Perspective. It was hard to spot the difference in a memory cast in perceptive symmetry. When staring at the distant shadows of a block punching up through the Layers, who’s to say from what eyes the image was plucked? With further sequencing, even visual details such as cog-feed visuals could be blurred past noticability.
Just as Mirrorhead’s focus inched back toward studying erroneous shape of Chambers’ armor, Avo hurled a strand of infiltrating memories into the intersection.
He felt his mind shudder.

He felt his wards rattle.

He felt his mind slip behind the first layer of Mirrorhead’s mind palace.
HOSTILE AWARENESS: 2%
He hissed with sibilant pleasure. In the real, his Echoheads rattled. Like a blade slashing across the same nick over and over, sooner or later, steel would greet bone.
Mirrorhead’s awareness held stable. The twinned memory slipped through the gap and snapped in place. Unaugmented, this was a feat unachievable. Mirrorhead’s would have noticed him almost immediately without his hyper-accelerated jacking, the time gap to his exposure via a spike in mem-data a mere gap. But through his Canon of Haemokinesis and the Celerostylus, the gap was now a gulf.
The euphoria of power and this new horizon tugged at his hubris. He could do it. He could strike now and earn a howl of pain from the Godclad. He stood on the outskirts of the man’s mind. This was sacred ground to sully. It was almost too tantalizing an opportunity.
Avo denied this siren call to hurt. The beast was talking. The beast was growing… almost smarter appealing to his hunger in more ways than one.
“Ah, but gods grow with mythos,” the Woundshaper said. “Surely you would be no different. You, in all your totality.”
Want tore at his ego. He wanted to overpower Mirrorhead. He wanted to break the other Godclad; leave him in a cage made from the detritus of his own mind. To squeeze a despairing capitulation from the Guilder before final subsumption.
As a Necro, Avo knew better. He wouldn’t be crossing twenty layers in one attempt. He was here to subvert each ward to his whim before proceeding. Only a true fool would trade near-certain victory through patience on an impulse of savagery.
Only a fool or a ghoul.
Or a Godclad.
It occurred to him that Zein might very well have done the unthinkable here. How had she made it to her old age acting as she did? Was it all her Heaven?
No matter. The task remained. And Avo knew exactly what he needed to subvert, to get deeper.
An atmosphere of anxiety and frustration stained the mem-data of these far waters that were Mirrorhead’s short-term memories. The actual phantasmics only rose in lonesome structures five rungs inward. Their shapes rose heavy and pointed, spire-like blades hailing phantasmal stratocumulus, the false sky kissed by faint brightness, the dawn spilling forth from the lip of the horizon. The blocks representing each phantasmic were battlements of gothic radiance, vast walls gold painted titanium painted with pastels of glass mosaics, painted iconography dedicated to weapons and instruments instead of people.
Never people.
Faint shivers of ethereal fire quavered as interlocking wings flew over the blocks like apparitions, making them seem as if candles.
Some who post in the Nether claim that Highflame lacked culture. That it was just blind ego-apotheism held up by cult-like militarism. Such was a lie. The Golds were people of symbology. They strove for embodiments. Often, they fell flat. But Avo knew of them to never question their resolve and might.
And to exploit their inflexibility.
You see, the problem with the Phalanx was also that which made it seem so formidable. The wards themselves. Necrotheurgy was a flexible art, but there was a rhyme and order to its foundation, namely, the purpose of symmetry.
For the revolving layer of wards to interlace and pass through one another without smashing the traumas together, a moment of alignment was required. Alignment, and an opening.
To slip past the wards, he didn’t even need to wreathe himself in copied memories repeatedly. Rather, he just needed to maintain a functional facade long enough and use the wards behind him to his advantage. With each repetition, he would descend deeper and deeper inward. Until he was finally within the confines of Mirrorhead himself.
A grim bemusement swelled within him.
There was always something to do with an elevator when it came to Mirrorhead.
The crossover came languid, more placid surf splashing on a beach than crashing tide thanks to his enhanced reactivity. On the cusp of impact, the structure of the oncoming trauma and the trauma he passed through behind him.
A flash of memories spilled out as raw mem-data, announced raw and clear within the confines of the Metamind. Avo scoffed. And here was obvious proof he wasn’t dealing with an actual Necro: No regard for internal security either. The ruler of Conflux clearly thought he was untouchable.
To Avo's surprise, he found portions of the memory familiar. The screams. The flickering outline of a woman’s form was painted over the firmament via countless Ori-Thaum phantoms. The former matriarch of the Greatlings and Mirrorhead's mother. A woman that Highflame itself seemed desperate to forget, censoring her name and memory from the Nether itself.
Indeed, the memory only grasped the vagueness of her personhood. If that. She had long hair, possibly. A shrill voice–but that might’ve been more due to the screaming. The remaining sequences formed a peripheral snapshot of that day. Pain. Sorrow. Disbelief.
A child crying. The choked sobs of a younger Jhred Greatling escaped from his throat, despite his attempts to fight it. He forced himself to watch what the Incubi did to his mother. He knew he wouldn’t remember. He forced himself anyway.
It was really quite pathetic. The longer Avo lingered in the Guilder’s mind, the less he thought of the other Godclad. What kind of idiot uses a major city-wide event that countless people were witness to as a conjoining gateway for their traumas.
Mixing memories he already had with assets spliced from his ghosts and rarer artifacts he had to copy from Mirrorhead’s memories, Avo altered his outer phantasmal architecture and passed through the second layer using the conjunction. The process repeated itself up to the eleventh, with each crossing demanding only patience and analysis.
Things got a bit interesting again with the twelfth to eighteenth layers as the inner rings began to shift and change positions faster, their switches becoming random–sometimes even three at a time. Finally. Some actual paranoia and rigor.

If only Mirrorhead decided to use something other than various memories collected from the day of his mother’s demise to pacify each of his protections. A lesson for the uninitiated: Use very, very specific memories when it came to creating wards. The more unique the circumstance, the harder for Necros to spoof. Speed gave Avo an edge, but it was Mirrorhead that failed in upholding a proper defense.
The first Phalanx Avo dived with Walton had different associated memories for each ring. And the switching started from the eighth. Here, there might as well have been a red carpet as Avo timed his crossing again and again until he was finally behind the innermost walls, finally in the section of the fifteenth.
The wards ahead were finally interchanging at a pace faster than near-unmoving, and so too was the access memory switched for something far more specific as well. Ah. So even Mirrorhead wasn’t that hubristic.
No matter. A steady search through the mem-data showed Avo the sequence he was looking for: the memory Mirrorhead had of speaking to him. Not when they first met in the aerovec, but rather Avo “induction” into Conflux, in the very same room Chambers’ was spasming in.
Perfect. It had all the components he needed to install–
A spike of phantasmal lightning crackled out as a phantasmic at the center of Mirrorhead’s mind thundered with the spill of another mind leaking over. Auto-Seaence. Someone was accessing the Metamind from within.
Almost immediately, he felt the waters of their perception splash against–and through–the insides of Mirrorhead’s wards.
Whoever this was, they had complete access to his mind. And with how quickly and deeply they worked, this wasn’t a sloppy amateur with too many ghosts like Mirrorhead.
No. This was the reflexive sweep every Necro that made it past their first hundred dives got used to making.
WARNING: NEW ACCRETION DETECTED
[UNIDENTIFIED] AWARENESS: 3%...8%
The attention of the newcomer bore down closer and closer to Avo just as Mirrorhead’s mind lurched with exhaustion, turning inward.
Instinct screamed for him to jack out, experience, on the other hand, revealed a path toward continued subterfuge right in front of him.
Firing his Ghostjack, Avo drew shape from the memories of his past once more.
Abrel Greatling.
For your deeds and valor, we, the Choir of Seraphs of Highflame merit you with this Icon of Vigilance, and hereby consecrate you with the title “Vigilant.” In stopping the bombing at Merwin Station, you have saved countless lives and turned the fingers of the Ori against their own eyes.
We hereby recognize your ascent to Instrument and deem you worthy of a Frame of the Third Sphere.
You have earned your divinity, and in overcoming the merits lost to your family by the actions of your mother, you have proven yourself of true mettle.

Blessed be the Worthy
-The Choir of the Seraphs
9-13
The Sister
Few things served a better cover for an infiltrating mind than a memory about them.

Within an alcove of memory, Avo hid inside a past iteration of himself. The form felt tight like he was shoving himself back in clothes long outgrown. A mere month and the changes inflicted upon his being were innumerable. In mind, power, and shell, only faint resemblance and past memories bound him.
But justly so: No tree resembled the scrub it was. Such was growth. Such was apotheosis.
New mem-data rose and crested in increasingly predictable patterns, the memories of the session broadcast loud, the newcomer reaching through the inner segregation of Mirrorhead’s Meta for reasons unknown.
[UNIDENTIFIED] AWARENESS: 7%
The newcomer’s attention was dropping. Whoever they were, their gaze cleaved close to the ground which he hid.
As another flicking billow of perception swept through the fifteenth rung. The newcomer made it to the fourteenth and halted there, regarding the distance as “safe enough.”
Their perception coruscated through Mirrorhead’s palace, treating the walls of his wards like swirling dust–faint obfuscations to be squinted at rather than blockades to crawl under. The memory that formed a pathway through shifting trenches was a simple one.
Two children stood in a lush garden. A boy, fair of skin and gold of hair bore a holographic spear. His face was marred with wrinkles of concentration, dimples deepening into divots. On his shoulders giggled a girl, her age far younger. She wore a phantom-shaped manifestation of knightly armor–the design fashioned from the style of old Kosgan. In her hand was a lance levied upon the older boy's head.
It took little to recognize that these two were siblings. It took even less to taste the joy emanating from the memory.
Perhaps she was a sister to Mirrorhead. Chambers mentioned the Syndicate boss having family issues. Possibly talking to a sister. Avo’s suspicion sprouted its first leaves.
Bricked over the trenches of writhing, burning bodies, a new avatar loaded into the palace, the unidentified Necro simulating themselves in the depths of Mirrorhead’s mind. This couldn’t be a foe then. The activation of a session hinted at that. This made Avo all the surer.
Down the path, a trickle of ghosts began to fuse into the shape of an impeccably dressed woman, her flesh bio-sculpted to perfection. It was hard to judge her height and stature from the dimensions of memory, but her form was lean and limber, limbs long and gait fluid. Her dexterity came through even before Avo’s hypercharged reflexes. An uncanny sharpness outlined her aquiline bones, and her hair was a smooth wave of obsidian, each strand adjusting itself to never tangle, never get out of place.
She bore faint semblance to either child in the memory, but appearances were deceptive these days. Especially seeing how easily faces were changed and changed again.
A suit of flowing white adorned her body, the fabric some kind of flowing weave Avo had never seen before. It was like a lake was grafted into the shape of a pantsuit on her skin. It was the gleaming pair of heels she walked on that snatched his attention. A pair of alloyed nu-falcon heads formed her heels. Strangely, the birds seemed alive almost, their gazes darting about, additional pathways of perception connected to her system.
The rhythm of her walk came in a perfect series of taps. She never faltered. She never deviated. Avo timed each step as he scried at her mem-data, seeking to use this opportunity to sink in further.
Pairing the memory over from the pathway, he began to assemble his own passage. It would allow him an easy shot at Mirrorhead’s inner mind if nothing else.
He was partway finished with putting together the requisite memories to spoof his way into her memory lane when a thought rippled out from her. The words she cast crackled in his mind, rendered unintelligible by time dilation. He focused on spoofing the structure of her memory first. He would eavesdrop after.
At his current speed, seconds widened into small eternities. He kept his sequencing subtle as he approached, hidden by other junctions of recollection Mirrorhead had of him. Eventually, he found himself playing a statue within a version of himself held dangling aloft out the back of an aero. The weakness on display filled Avo with dissonance.
There was a certain pleasure in being alienated from prior weakness. Savoring a glance of a moment that once was never to come again, Avo dipped his ghosts into the outsider's memory sequence.
It shivered on the periphery–and he stopped himself. A rattle of trauma tore through his prepared ghosts. Avo drew back into Mirrorhead’s memories, unsure what had gone wrong.
[UNIDENTIFIED] AWARENESS: 11%
Suddenly, he felt the spotlight of her attention sweep around again. He went back to hiding in one of his prior memory selves. Was there a problem with the symmetry of his sequences? Why did he strike her wards? The matter evaded him as he slipped back into stillness, his Metamind cloaking him with old memories anew.
There was something else here he wasn’t seeing. The memory she used to access Mirrorhead was obvious. Plain, even. But there had to be something aberrant about its structure for him to be denied. He felt a trickle of annoyance spill free from her mind.
Annoyance, and no suspicion.
On a whim, he quelled his Heaven and settled his reflex back to baseline.
The woman’s thought-casted voice stung at him with notes acerbic and quick. She spoke like someone using a whip, jabbing, probing. He could feel the taunt in her tone, as if she was mocking him for being unable to cross over into her wards without even fully knowing he was there.
Oh. Avo was going to hate this one. He could already feel it.
+Jhred… did you change the locks again? Put in some new internal Specter to poke at my memories? That’s kinda rude, y’know? Your sister takes time out of her busy, busy life to come warn you about the Authority-mandated ass-kicking you’re set to get, and here you are. Trying to rifle through my mind. What’s the value of family these days?+
A pause. The spotlight of Mirrorhead’s perception was washing down on her. She was standing in a blurred green garden as the two younger versions–or at least that’s who Avo assumed they were–of her and Mirrorhead played.
+You know what? I think you want dad to kick your ass again. In front of everyone. Again. I guess one humiliation wasn’t enough for the esteemed Jhred Greatling. But that’s the way you are, I guess. Always need to get hit twice before you learn your lesson–+ Mirrorhead manifested in front of her, avatar an inch taller than the girl. All she did in response was roll her eyes. +Really? Really, Jhred? We both know who’s actually taller.+
Mirrorhead glared, still faceless, still dressed in his usual attire. His voice was laced with uncharacteristic frustration as he spoke. +What do you want Abrel? I’m busy.+
+And you’re greeting me in your costume now?+ Abrel said. +We both know who you are.+ She laughed. The sharpness of her voice needled Avo’s mind with discomfort. +I’d say half the Syndicates probably know who you are. Really isn’t hard to put one and one together. Highflame Instrument known for using a Heaven of Reflection has a public falling out with his family. Goes missing. Suddenly there’s a clown called Mirrorhead running a Syndicate. I do worry about you, brother–+
Irritation simmering from his person, Mirrorhead snorted. +I am well. You go tell father I–+


+Shut the fuck up and let me finish. Hate it when you interrupt me. Godsdamned–+
+I already gave you my reply–you speak of politeness and barge into my mind without prior notice–+

+I cast over twenty thoughts at you last two days alone, half-strand. This isn’t me barging into your house uninvited; this is me kicking down your door to warn you that rent is YEARS past due, and I’ve already been issued orders. From dad. You know. An Authority of Highflame? Jhred, I don’t need to explain to you how this works. He gave you your space. He let you have your tantrum. That’s done. You need to come home. Now.+
Mirrorhead scoffed, and that was what made Avo certain the two were family. That, and the peeve of being interrupted, the way their anger spiked and then solidified into a hardened clump in their chest. Fascinating how an emotion so similar could be expressed so differently between two of the same bloodline.
+Look, Jhred,+ Abrel said, voice softening. +I sent you your official warning a day back. You know what dad wants. You know that there is no way he can protect you from the Choir of Seraphs if you somehow pull off what you’re trying to pull off. This is a suicide run. Except you won’t be coming back at all.+


An exhalation of pure exhaustion shuddered out from the depths of the palace, lacing the waters of memory with a cocktail of exhaustion and misery. +I know.+
+And we both know it’s better if I bring you–+
+I need to finish this–+

+Finish what?+ A disbelieving scoff snuck out from Abrel as she held out her hands, lamenting at the phantasmal clouds shrouding the glowing sky above. +Jhred… you’ve been down here for years! Years! There are a million other things you could have done to stick it to the Silvers.+


Mirrorhead shivered as he looked down, unable to face the skies above. Both his fists were clenched. +I just… need… to kill one person. Just one. It will all be worth it.+

For the first time, Abrel broke from her adherence to elegance as she jutted her chin forward, neck leaning as if she was a turtle, her lips and eyes turning into thin lines of disbelief. +Uh, no the fuck it won’t. We’ve been tasked to bring you in. Me. And my cadre. Confuse me not, Jhred, this isn’t a heads-up for you to work faster, this is me saying you're finished. Done. Done, Jhred, done. And I will bring you in. I will. If only to save your ass from Vator.+
+Let him come,+ Mirrorhead said, rage swelling his ire. He shoved a finger in Abrel’s face and she smacked it aside in the same instant. She knew it was coming. He continued undeterred. +I’m ready. Vator best be prepared for humiliation if he comes for me.+
+You know he beat Osjane Thousand in a duel three months ago, right? Osjon Thousand’s daughter? The one who snuffed you all those times in the Trials? He made it look easy too.+
+That was the past–+

+Yeah. And? For the past two years you’ve been scurrying around like an aratnid, playing dollhouse with your… FATELESS and refugees. Wanna guess what he’s been doing for dad? You wanna know what I’ve been doing? Jhred… I can’t even–agh. Listen. I know you’ve improved. I know you’ve gotten better. But you cannot, cannot, can-fucking-not, kill Ambassador Valhu Kitzuhada. Do you hear me? The High Seraph herself will smite you.+
A grim chuckle rattled free from Mirrorhead’s chest. +Ah. Of course. The one who rewards our enemy with the Merit of Valor. For murdering our mother. Torturing her to death before the entire city.+ Anger blazed inside him, and it took all he had to choke it under control. +After all that our mother gave to Highflame.+
+All that our mother…+ Abrel muttered in disbelief. +Jhred… she ruined us for years. Not just our lives, she–she led twenty million Regs, fifty thousand golems, and sixteen Godclad cadres into a slaughterhouse. And then the fucking bitch ran! She ran! She abandoned her banners! Our banners! Our forces! I don’t get why–why–fucking why you keep holding onto her!+
Her words pieced him. His mind shuddered as all his wards grumbled and shook as one. Trauma just impacted Mirrorhead. Trauma striking deep and hard. His index finger jabbed at her again. +You will not ever speak of her this way–+
+I call her whatever the fuck I want,+ Abrel said, slapping his hand aside once more. With slow surety, Avo felt himself judging her mettle more and more. She was the greater danger here. She, and not Mirrorhead. She made a mockery of his power, ignoring his threats and presence like he wasn’t even worth respecting as a threat. +Highflame had her censored for a reason. Father divorced her for a reason! We’re an old family, Jhred. But Old family or not, our values matter. Blessed. Be. The. Fucking. Worthy. Where in those five godsdamned words did you hear “abandon your forces, lose a war we were winning, and let Ori-Thaum regain the initiative.”+
+Lies. Slander.+ The growled words coming from Mirrorhead were near feral. +These are just… just lies! Lies from the Ori.+

As he spoke, Abrel clutched at her head and began to mumble pleas, begging all the dead gods for strength to deal with her idiot brother. +I can’t… I… I can’t… Jhred. Jhred! Get your shit together and look at what’s happening for once in your life! You can’t kill the ambassador–and rightly so. He fought a good war. He won that from us. It was righteous. Veylis recognized that and so did the Choir. He’s an Ori half-strand. He’ll have to die before we transcend, but until the big one comes, he’s earned this mercy.+
Twin oceans of fury clashed with cataclysmic impact as Avo clung to the recollection masking him. The sheer force of rage upon rage rang hard. The flavor of this family animosity came as a sublime novelty to Avo. He had felt rage. Hatred. The need to kill. But this… there was so much hurt in this. Their minds tasted sour with anger, the nature of their loathing impure with old love.
+Righteous?+ A near-sob of incredulity. +Righteous… Abrel, she was your mother too–+

Abrel’s nostrils flared. Her fury sparked. +Yeah. I know. Can’t seem to go a day without getting reminded of the fact. That I am, indeed, stained by association with the greatest black mark on Highflame history in over fifty fuckin’ years. That our family once stood amongst the Choir of Seraphs, and now we’re kicked back with the larger symphony. Us, and all the other great families who hate us for that.+


+It was not her fault,+ Mirrorhead whispered. +The Ori-Thaum tricked her–+
Her hands shot out, twin blurs that seized his face. +Of. Course. They. Did. Jhred. It’s war. It’s war. Deception is part of war. Being tricked isn’t the part that blemished us, blemished every last Chivalric in Highflame and cast off our merits. It’s running! It’s letting everyone who stood with her die! And then letting Ori-Thaum take five Sovereignties from us. Five.+


Reaching up, he pried her hands free. +I know all that.+ He said, voice finally settling back into a haggard, calm baritone. +I also know our father just abandoned her. I know he let her die. And I know he voted to have her name and deep memories censored.+
+I don’t give a shit how much she loved us,+ Abrel said, flinching as she met her own reflection in his face. +I don’t give a shit how good a mother she was. I don’t give a shit if we were naturally birthed by her, nursed on her, and rocked to sleep by her. She shamed herself. She shamed our family. She shamed Highflame. The way she died… she had it coming. Dad did the right thing.+
Oh but this was delightful to behold. Entranced, Avo noticed Draus in the back of his mind watching as well, silent this entire time, mind blank of all thoughts but a deep undercurrent of bitter loathing.
They were gazing upon a family already sundered, and now, the last link between brother and sister was beginning to fray.
+Let me tell you a story of two futures, Jhred,+ Abrel said quietly. +The first is a happier one. You stop this. We go back home. You don’t even need to apologize to dad or even acknowledge his existence. Just… find something else to do and keep doing it. Let it occupy your mind. Earn your merits back. You can still do that. I’ll help you. I’ll give anything to help you.+

The nod that came from Mirrorhead was almost imperceptible. +And the other?+
A sigh escaped from Abrel as she looked heavenward. +The other future goes like this. You do not, in any reality, in any timeline, kill Ambassador Valhu Kitzuhada. The High Seraph has deemed him an esteemed adversary, and the Choir concurred. So it shall be. In not killing him, you will not worsen the shitstorm mom left us in, and father can finally resolve the last bits of her mistake.+


An explosion of focus snapped through Mirrorhead. +Father. What’s he doing?+


+That’s not the important part Jhred–+

+The last bits. What does that mean? What’s he doing?+

Abrel went silent, mem-data reverberating with turmoil. Turmoil and… another wavelength within.
Avo paused. Another wavelength? Looking closer at her sequences again, he saw–the structure permeating through all her memories. It wasn’t a feeling or a recollection. Just a sound, the repetitions of a violin, endless and unceasing.
Was that what repelled him from syncing into her mind?
+He’s going to Nu-Scarrowbur,+ Mirrorhead said. It wasn’t phrased as a question. +He’s going to the summit. He’s going to be at the renewal of the treaty.+

A quiver of worry vibrated from Abrel’s mind. +Jhred, it’s not like that. He’s been tasked by the Choir–doubtlessly because they know what you’re planning, and they need you to stop–+
+Leave,+ Mirrorhead said. The thought came free of him with a suppressed gasp masked by a hiss of rage. +Get out. Get out.+
She reached out for him. +Jhred–+
He stepped away from her. +This is done. This is done. We’re done. Get out.+
Her hand froze, never touching him. Her expression softened for an instant. Then, it turned harsh. +You have two days to return. I’m watching you. You attempt to make a move toward Nu-Scarrowbur in any way, I bring you back in a cage. This is your last chance.. Get your shit together, Jhred Greatling. Submit. Or stand and deliver. The order has been served. Don’t be a half-strand. Report to the Ark.+
And before he could say anything else, cut her session, and vanished from the confines of his mind.
An unsettled quietude descended on the palace. Mirrorhead’s simulated self lingered a moment longer. With great effort, he forced his fists open, but his fingers curled, gouging at first at nothing, and then he clutched himself in a tight embrace.
+Worthless,+ Mirrorhead muttered. +You’re worthless, Jhred. Worthless.+ A howling clash fissured the skies. Arcing volts of traumatic memories bubbled, building between the cracks.
Avo knew what was to come. A rush of excitement surged. Ah, but to know that Mirrorhead had so much brittle loathing within him.

He would serve as a good font for phantasmics before this was done.
+Is he gonna–+ Draus asked.
A spear of trauma lanced inward. Mirrorhead screamed, lashing himself with a memory of his mother’s suffering.
The mind’s versatility, how humans broke in such supple ways. Some lost sleep. Some grew prejudicial. Some learned to self-mutilate.
A good Necro could have removed this habit from Mirrorhead, but that was the nature of a mind, wasn’t it? So many were slaves to their thoughts, shaped by their thoughts. They feared change because they thought it to be kindred to death.
“Poor, pathetic Jhred Greatling,” the Woundshaper mocked. “Here was an unworthy god if I ever beheld one. All the power of divinity, and look at him. Human. All too human. Take heed, master. You bloomed. He broke. Some were never meant to ascend, no matter the quality of life’s waters.”
“No,” Avo said, watching as Mirrorhead struck himself again, savoring the scene as an undiscovered voyeur watching a hated foe in agony.
A flash of inspiration followed. Jhred Greatling’s final death took shape in Avo’s mind, and it would be one that rhymed.
Perhaps New Vultun would come to know Mirrorhead as they did his mother.
“I see potential in you, despite how you have offended me.”

“I spit on you. I spit on your name. Kill me if your Crucible meant nothing, if my boy died for nothing. Kill me too!”

“No. I will do nothing that does not please me. I bought your life. I owe you no favors.”

“You wretched creature… faceless coward. Artad damn you. You and all your line.”

[Sounds of a blade ringing; hyperventilating.]
“Hm. Regardless, let me tell what you are. What the spectators will see.”
“Coward! Cowa–”
[Blade cutting into flesh; bone parting; Essus screaming]
"You, a grieving father who barely survived the Crucible. A refugee. The world hates you. But you had a friend, a ghoul. The Moonblood. He stood for you when no others would. He stood for you when I sent you to die. Now, he is dead. But perhaps there is potential. Perhaps his legend may live on through you.”

[Saw powering down; whimpering from Essus]
“Give him the anesthesia.”

“N-no.”

“...No?”

“I… don’t want… anything from you.”

“That’s not for you to decide. In fact, I have a new name for you. The ghoul is dead. The Guard-Captain abandoned you. All you are now is mine. I name you Lingerer. I name you. You will bear it. Give him the anesthetic.”
-Conversation between Jhred Greatling and Essus


9-14
Lingering (I)
The spell of Mirrorhead’s self-harm broke soon after. There was work that yet remained.
Cordoned to the fifteenth ring of the palace, Avo planted fragments of mem-data with all the memories Mirrorhead still bore of him. The loose fragments of the phantasmics were hard to track. Avo had confidence they would remain circumspect until he willed them to trigger, even if the estranged Greatling turned his gaze inward and performed a scan through all his sequences.
Piece by piece, the ghoul marked his former “owner” with cortex bombs of his own. A delicious reversal, re-gifting them.
Except Avo would see his mind-rending bomb detonated, and his foe rendered broken.
He had such plans for Mirrorhead, such desires.
+He ain’t what I wanted,+ Draus whispered. An urge to do harm quivered just beneath the surface of her thoughts, like worms writhing through the soil. Yet, greater than the hate that watered the surface of her thoughts, a dissatisfaction ran deep. +We still gotta snuff him but–+


+He’s like a child?+ Avo said. +Like a juv?+
+...Yeah. Somethin’ like that.+
He understood. It was always easier to bring your gun to bear and pull the trigger when it was a ghoul, when it was a monster. It wasn’t pity she felt for Jhred Greatling–for him, she still bore little more than rank loathing and hatred. No. It was the frustration of cleaner vengeance denied, to hear the family of your highest foe deriding the one you also hated, to see a broken son trying to uphold the illusory virtues he beheld in his mother.
Discomfitingly, the memory of Walton came to Avo like a taunt. Was his old worship of his father’s ideals any less pathetic than Mirrorhead’s? Idealization and lies. This was how people were broken. This was a wound that slashed at the ego itself, skipping through trauma entirely.
Existence was an exercise in madness sometimes.
+I make him that way for you,+ Avo offered. +Null away everything but the cruelty. The son. The slave.+
She grunted. It sounded much like one of his. +Get your spook-shit done first. Talk ‘bout what we wanna to do with the Greatlings later. The run ain’t even begun yet.+
Drawing upon his Heaven and reflex enhancements again, Avo finished his preparations within Mirrorhead’s mind, his speed making minutes of an operation once measured in hours. From there, he regarded the few remaining wards and deemed them insufficient to withstand a sudden, focused assault of traumas. Especially now that Avo knew how to hurt this mind the most.
Retreating back into Chambers’ mind. Avo was surprised to discover the enforcer to still conscious. More impressively, the damage inflicted on his mind was moderate, but not nearly sufficient enough to see him nulled entirely.
+Might consider patterning some wards using him,+ Avo admitted. The acknowledgment was a begrudging one. Chambers’ was… a fool. An addict that courted the rash. But he was hard of mind. +Durable. Years of mem-cons and questionable downloads conditioned his mind.+
+Shit,+ Draus said. She chuckled. +Well, he ain’t invincible, but he’s a sturdy half-strand. Didn’t expect that of him.+
Avo considered activating the session he hid in Mirrorhead’s mind, synchronizing himself away from Chambers into his true foe. Yet, despite the high from this dive’s success, he let things settle for a moment.
Mirrorhead had lapsed into inaction. There was a high probability he was still flagellating himself. Regardless, there seemed to be no indication of any continued scrying on the part of the Syndicate Godclad. His ghosts were slowly receding out from Chambers’ mind like waves pulled back into the ocean.
And so, Avo began stitching the broken sequences inside Chambers back together as best he could.
The enforcer proved to be a good instrument thus far.
No sense in letting him go to waste now.
***
“Auugh auugh wuuugh aiiiieee,” Chambers shrieked.
What he wanted to say was: “Sweet godless fuck! My brain! It’s on fire! Stop jamming your ghosts inside me, you half-strand!”
Such words were hard to produce when one’s mind resembled sawdust more than branching pathways, but, as always, Chambers managed to find some sense of self.
Mostly thanks to the fact that one of his vicarities came back on in the depths of his mind.
A strange, low moan keened out from his throat as his eyes rolled back down, bouncing like rubber balls as the first spark of true consciousness returned to him. Multiple sensations screamed at him concomitantly.
The ground was cold. His nose was bleeding. His fingers were shivering. The room was bright. His brain was a boiling mess, like someone poured molten metal through it. He had a hard time remembering how he got here, who did this to him, or even what his first name was. His face was sore.
A flash shuddered in his mind. Two seconds of memory; the first was his father kicking his chair out from under him. The second was the man’s fist coming down.
The world itself rattled when the blow hit him, and he bounced skull-first off the ground.
For a beat, Chambers thought he was five again, and struggled not to cry.
Then, Dannis Steelhard’s moans reminded him that it wasn’t so. That he was still himself. Still sane.
And that his piece of shit father was still dead.
“F-fuck you, dad,” Chambers choked. Nineteen years and counting. In nineteen years Chambers beat him by. “I’m–I’m still winning, you… you half-strand.”
His mind was pooling back together. Slowly. The pounding hurt in his skull grew muted as someone filled the gaps in his thoughts with what felt like the soothing balm of cement. Memories suddenly joined back together. Pieces of him snapped back into place.
He was Chambers.
He just spoke to his boss.
He was an idiot.
His boss was a half-strand.
Somehow, he was still himself after all that. Still un-nulled.
Quavering between a gleeful bout of mania and a full breakdown, Chambers sat there and held himself, chuckling and sobbing both. “I knew… I knew downloading those… those mem-cons was a good idea.”
Turning onto his elbows and knees, he fought off the wave of nausea as he pulled his naked butt back to the seat using the desk more than his legs.
“Get out.”
Chambers froze. Mirrorhead sounded pissed. Super pissed. Depressed even. Oh, fuck, what did the boss man see? What did he see? The vicarities weren’t that bad, were they? Like, Stellanda: Nu-Dog Dominatrix wasn’t that bad. It was also fake. They weren’t actually using nu-dogs. He wasn’t that much of a–uh–he had standards.
“L-listen, boss,” Chambers squeaked, swallowing, waiting for the killing blow to hit him at any moment, “I reacted the same way too the first time she tied that dog down on her bed and–”

Mirrorhead glared at him. Chambers felt the glare. It was like a lash of pain cracking against his mind. He gasped, clutching at his head as he stumbled back. Shit, the room was spinning again. Thoughts broke free from him in drips and spurts. Spots formed in his vision.
An explosion of torment rocked through his brain as he was festooned in the body of a woman, her flesh and mind tortured beyond his powers of description.
Also, she was strapped down. Kind of like that nu-dog from the vicinity. It was… uh…
Kinda hot.
LUSTAWAY ACTIVATING

The pain stopped. The ghosts gnawing at his mind broke apart. An ocean of disgust erupted out from Mirrorhead, splashing over Chambers.
“You,” Mirrorhead said, “are going to… to leave. I can’t… I will not deal with this. Leave. Before I kill you.”

“Look, boss, I can’t help it–”

“Do not speak to me!”

The sheer volume of Mirrorhead’s shout sent Chambers’ stumbling back. Man, if Chambers knew a couple of fetishes would fuck his boss up so bad he would watch ‘em with greater care. Or maybe watch them even more and give the half-strand an aneurysm.
Chambers gave a nervous giggle and stepped back. “S-sure thing, boss man.” Clownishly zipping his lips with his fingers, Chambers poured all the idiocy he could muster into his act and backed away. It was getting harder for him to suppress the sheer hate he felt toward the man. Oh, but Chambers wanted to kill him. He couldn’t, but he wanted it something bad. All that keeping his head down, trying to stay away.
All that to avoid getting hurt, getting snuffed.
But Mirrorhead didn’t care. Mirrorhead took and took. Mirrorhead hurt him just for thinking. Just for enjoying.
And Chambers couldn’t stop him.
He couldn’t.
So he smiled. He was a half-strand, right? A master idiot. Master idiots couldn’t be angry. They couldn’t feel that. He just needed to nod and be him. It’s all a joke. Grin idiot.
It’s all a joke.
The boss threw a disgusted hand, flicking his fingers at–no–through Chambers. The backmost mirrors in the room shimmered, the reflection growing misty as the submerged outline of a giant formed. “Lingerer. Get him out of my sight. Put him in holding with the other two. I will… need to see to him later.”

For a moment, the towering figure held still. Chambers squinted as the torso of the creature seemed to twitch–as if it was a module loose from the whole, straining against the arms and legs.

“You… sound pained, master,” the so-called Lingerer said. The unseen man’s voice was an alloy of sound; distortion mixed with a choked rasp, sprinkled with a faint note of irony. Chambers frowned. That voice sounded familiar. Like he heard it somewhere before. Like… not too long ago, even. “Sir, did something happen?”

“Just take him from my sight and begone,” Mirrorhead snarled. Uncharacteristically, the ruling power behind Conflux collapsed into his faux throne, his posture slouching as he turned away and brooded.
“Fuck, consang,” Chambers muttered, “I didn’t know he hated nu-dogs that much.”

From beyond the quaking glass a chrome hand reached through, skeletal cogwork beneath flayed skin, translucent strips that dangled between hissing steam whistling free from the exposed mechanisms within the arm. A chambered monoblade jutted below five twitching fingers.
Chambers swallowed.

“Come.” A face broke through the surface of the glass, peeling free like a drowning man breaking through the surface tension of an icy pond. Wires and fibers of metal ran beneath the flesh of the man’s face, mutilated beyond comprehension. Their eyes shone red while their teeth were filed down to resemble the fangs of a ghoul.
As the chromer shifted closer, Chambers saw that only a naked torso and a bare-pated head remained in terms of flesh. The man’s limbs had been taken, with pikes planted into the missing stumps. Their personhood was at the core of their new exoskeleton, meat clasped within an opened coffin, augmentations seeming cage and vehicle both.
“It is not wise to make him wait,” the man said, eyes daring a fast look at Mirrorhead. “Spare yourself pointless misery. There will be enough in your future.” A soft laugh fell from the man’s lips. They sounded like a beaten animal, spent and hollow.
Inside Chambers, a strange sense of deja vu flared. He knew them. He knew them from somewhere, familiarity spilling over into his mind as if from someone else while his body approached the portal-exit of Mirrorhead’s sanctuary. Through the other side, through gaps behind the chromer standing before him, flashes to the interior of an elevator greeted Chambers.
They were going to take him down. Straight down to the cells. Where the ghouls, slaves, and prisoners were kept.
Shit. Shit. Shitty-shit-shit.
Keep smiling Chambers. Keep smiling. The boss said he still had a use for you. That he needed to see you later. Maybe… yeah, he could spin a yarn, get Mirrorhead to keep using him. That’s the plan.
Within reach, the strangely familiar cyborg gestured for Chambers to follow as he fixed the still-brooding Syndicate boss with a sneer. “Your words. My will. Mirrorhead.” Each word sounded tortured, spoken through clenched teeth.
As Chambers flicked his eyes at the glass around him, he swallowed, wondering just where the eldritch leviathan was.
“It is not here,” the chromer droned. “It is everywhere. Do not look for it. It will not be found by us unless he desires its full manifestation.”

“Right…” Chambers muttered. The cyborg stepped backward first, sinking behind the veil of the reflection.
The enforcer lingered a moment longer as realization suddenly struck him. Yeah… Yeah, the face! He knew that face. Wasn’t this guy that… the one he saw when…
During the last Conflux Crucible. The one with the rotlick and the Reg and the…
And the flat.
Oh. Well. Might’ve been better if that poor half-strand died down the gutters.

Sympathy twitched inside Chambers.
It ain’t no life being owned by Mirrorhead.
***


From the moment Avo tasted the newcomer’s mind, he knew. He knew that pain too well and knew the shape of the accretion. The wounds.
A flash of the boy passed through his mind, an apparition made manifest by the fabric of ghosts. New wards had been installed behind the surface thoughts, but they served paltry means against keeping the hurt sealed in. Moreover, Avo knew these wards. This was the same type the Slaughterman used in the Crucible, the same type that shattered against a thoughtshiv.
Avo grunted. He studied the face of the father. Former father. A strange placidity clouded their expression. They seemed resigned to their suffering like they weren’t fully present in their body.
Unsurprising. To have so many implants forced on you caused dissociation. Phantasmic overload inflicted similar pressures on the mind, but that usually resulted in more hyper schizophrenia.
Staring at the man they left behind, Draus frowned. +Avo… is that–+

+Yeah. Essus.+
Shard-2: Shard-3, I’m blown. Someone just jacked through my host’s mind. I think they have me… I’m gonna–
[010 - error metamind wavelength lost]
Shard-3: Shard-2? Shard-2? … Fuck.
-Last transmission of Shard-2
9-15
Lingering (II)
+Jaus,+ Draus muttered. A breath of disbelief struck her voice. +They godsdamned chromed the shit out of him for nothin’.+
Nothing? No. Mirrorhead was a fool. Mirrorhead was a narcissistic egotist of the highest order, but he had a vision guiding his decisions and delusions. For all the arms, organs, implants, drugs, and phantasmics they trafficked, the real game was in entertainment. The FATELESS served to farm the cheapest of products, and human drama was hard to cultivate without the genuine dynamic of each individual’s unique emotions, each story of novel fears and raw hopes.
Conflux, at its core, was a criminal enterprise that yearned to be an amusement park.
+Attention,+ Avo said. +That’s the point.+
He studied the man he once only called 'the father' through the periscope of Chambers' perception. A sacrifice. That was what the man had become. An offering to the altar of engagement, of stimulation, of media.
In his current shape, Essus was barely more than the savaged remnant of a man. Entombed in dead metal bearing the stylized aesthetic of undeath, there was little question of what Mirrorhead intended to use him for.

The Crucible.
What better way to capitalize on the popularity of a survivor than turn them around as an instrument of pain? It was an old storyline repeated over and over by countless Syndicates. Mainly because it worked every time.
A piston of flesh clutched by cogs of metal. That was all that remained of the man. As Chambers stepped into the brightness of the elevator, the light painted deeper detail to Essus’ visage. Faint was the flat he once was.
Some said that the eyes showed a glimpse into one’s inner world. Well, Avo would say, it seemed that most inner worlds were windowed by something rather delicious. Still, the lack of human eyes on Essus felt wrong for other reasons–uncanny red dots glimmering like coal in the hollow pits of the man’s face.
The natural rubbery texture of his skin stretched thin, diluted by snaking circuits running beneath the flesh. There were tunnels inside him, connecting organs below to machine wiring to a locus somewhere, administrating it all. Flaps of skin swayed from his back like a cape. Avo knew the translucence–the apparel was flayed from a ghoul. Doubtless another one of Conflux’s choices.
Like two curved doors, the opened Slaughterman rig clasped Essus’ mundane remains with layers of teeth pointing out from a lipless mouth of reinforced titanium. Atop, there was no head, just Essus and his bone-like prosthetic limbs. No obvious implanted weapons adorned the man’s form beside the monoblade beneath the wrist.
In a sense, Essus’ rig was armored, but unarmed. Capable of might yet without proper potential to inflict harm.
Castrated, when compared to his adversaries.
However the thing that clutched Avo’s focus was the hap-graffti disfiguring the design of the exoskeleton itself. A projection of light spilled out from behind the father, rising into different scenes composed of competition holoprojections. Scenes from first-person kills and other deeds of brutality stained the space behind Essus, the lore behind his new form unfurling like wings feathered by neon and atrocity.
A final insult taunted the man at the tips of both wings. On the man’s left was a curtain of static, merging to form an imitation of the boy. His curious eyes were wide with concern, mouth open in a perpetual question. One that would never come.
But it was the creature on the other side that truly jabbed at Avo’s annoyance.
Clouded in a wreath of holo-projected red, he found himself studying a version of himself prior to gaining the Bone Demon. He leaned over the father’s right shoulder, jaws wide, fangs bared, claw pointed toward the horizon.
The motif was one of duality. The boy was innocent. Softness. The ghoul was vengeance. Brutality.
All was a lie. Theater. And the former flat? He was just an actor, willing or not.
Avo offered a grim chuckle. He felt Draus turn her attention to him, confused. +The tats. Didn’t offer you any billing. Shame.+
She understood his prodding. +Well. It appears you gotta die to get in on that honor, so I respectfully decline.+
+When are you ever respectful?+ Avo asked. +Other than begging the Sang for favors.+
+I was plenty respectful not shootin’ you in the head after beatin’ your ass in the Circuit.+
A mournful sigh came from Avo. Poor Draus. She had such terrible memory issues. Ones that he couldn’t fix because she wouldn’t let him. And poor, pathetic Essus. Still unable to control his own fate, owned by another.
It would be proper to free him. A thought blossomed inside Avo: Should he had let the father kill himself before? Walk into the electric perimeter during the Mall Brawl?
Such an end seemed a softer, kinder fate than the life he currently endured.
But perhaps the man lingered on for a reason.
After all, there was a promise between him and Avo that had yet to be fulfilled. The coming death of Mirrorhead was growing to be a communal event.
Carefully, Avo waited, watching as Essus leaned down to greet Chambers.
He would not attempt a leap across minds yet. Not until he ascertained Mirrorhead’s current focus. However, there was a new priority on his horizon. He had a new experience he wished to sample.
What choice would the father make, now that he was left with less than nothing?
***


This was complete godsdamned bullshit. Chambers eyed the monstrous chrome rig the flat had been stuffed into and shivered.
First he got kidnapped by Scalpers, marched back to Conflux without clothes, then pulled through the fucking glass–because asshole Mirrorhead wasn’t hugged right as a juv or some shit–brain tortured by being forced to look at whatever bullshit horror Mirrorhead actually was, held to sanity by sheer fucking balls, was driven into insanity again, came back again, and now the fucking flat was grafted to Slaughterman’s chassis?
Where the fuck was his hyper-expensive chromer outfit when he worked here? It was always, “hur hur, Chambers, shut the fuck up and put on the rusty rig. It’ll be enough.”

It was not enough. None of this was enough. And the half-strand that was his boss wouldn’t even let him modify the godsdamned thing.
Why the fuck did he bust his ass learning new ways to slack off and watch his vicarities when any random Crucible survivor–the load, by the way–got to have all the good stuff?

Conflux would have had some of the worst turnover even in the Warrens, but the bomb in everyone’s head made those who left a different statistic. Harder to quit when your severance package was literal.
“Hey, hey, Essus,” Chambers said, pointing both fingers at the man as he stepped through the looking glass. He tried to keep the shivers out of his digits. He tried to avoid the oddness when his thoughts still skipped a beat, his mind sweeping across missing memories like a tongue finding a gap where teeth used to be. “You’re lookin’ good! You got… taller? And your dead son–” Shit! He didn’t mean to say that. But it wasn’t his fault: the little fuck was staring at him over the guy’s shoulder. “Must be proud of how nova you look right now.”

“Hm,” Essus said, leaning away, not even looking at him.


Great. A bit of chrome and the formerly chatty flat was doing his best Avo impression. Chambers looked up to the glass ceiling of the elevator and shook his head. You see this shit, rotlick? This is what you get for dying! You made the flat a whiner! Chambers was gonna have to deal with… with this whiner!
A weirdly vivid memory burst back to life in his head. Something about him getting his ass kicked in the back of a garbage barge by the Regular. Strange. But still kind of hot in the Regular being so overwhelmingly strong he couldn’t do anything about it kinda way. And traumatizing too.
…
Shit. Thinking about her asskicking was bringing back his daddy issues.
Better than Mirrorhead though. A cloud of bitterness and rage flickered inside him. A memory of his father’s fist crashing down, again. Again.
Anything was better than Mirrorhead.
What was it about life that made it give Chambers nothing but assholes? Why’d he deserve this?
“He doesn’t care,” Essus said, misunderstanding his preoccupation. The voice was so sudden and deep that Chambers spurted a trickle of fear-piss all over the ground.
“Shitfuck,” Chambers muttered.
“He does not care about that either.”


Yeah, Mirrorhead didn’t care about a lot of things, it seemed.
“Jaus,” Chambers hissed. “Stop talking so loud, consang. Hell–”

Essus’ tone took on an acerbic quality. “The coward does not look upon us. He refuses to even acknowledge us. Speak whatever you will of him. He will kill you in time. But not now. Not now”
“I… thanks?”
Essus bounced more than he lumbered in his new sheathe, servos a working a steady melody as he stepped away from the puddle. It surprised Chambers how fast the man took to being a chromer. Well. It wasn’t like he had anything else going for him.

“We are beneath him right now. You seem a fool, friend. But be wiser than I. Choose wisdom. He has not harmed you yet. Truly.”
Chambers’ eyes bulged in disbelief. Hadn’t harmed him yet? This half-strand didn’t know what harmed was. Still, the chrome-fiend was right. They had to get out of here. Anywhere was better than near Mirrorhead and getting his mind-melted. Of course, lower holdings was the second to last place he wanted to be. That shithole was leaking sewage down the walls, and they kept the practice ghouls down there.
He flicked a nervous look around the glass. Nothing.
Gods don’t let that fucking thing snatch him again. Gods please…
The elevator rang loud. Chambers felt his shit nearly eject through his asscheeks. “Jausfuckshitgods.”
Another figure shuffled through the open door. Looking up, Chambers found himself surprised.
The miserable creature whimpered in abject terror as she looked away from Essus. Her head was shorn bald, and dismembered she had what looked like a single spider-like limb attached to a mangled external servo-port along her spine. Hunched, she still towered over Chambers.

Those scars on her face… he knew that pattern. “Rantula?”

“Don’t bother. She cannot hear you.” Essus spat a globule of something black at the Scaarthian’s feet. For the first time, Chambers tasted anger from his new “manager.” All the other leakage from the guy’s mind was cold and painful. This was hot and swollen. Gods, did the guy hate her something fierce. “Since her defeat by the Moonblood, others took to challenging her. She no longer fares as well as she once did. A pity.”
At his words, Rantula shivered. She cupped at the rust titanium caps bolted through both ears. “Jaus. One near-snuffing from a ghoul really did it to you, huh?” He chuckled. Her head turned, a flash of the hateful sow she used to be shining through.
That version of Rantula died a quick death when Essus clenched his bullshit-enormous fists. I mean, godsdamned they were larger than a mastiff-pattern nu-dogs head; like c’mon, what was even with that. The mechanisms inside the former flat’s arm screamed in warning. Rantula shivered. “I will make a victim of you again.” Essus tilted deliberately, showing her the hologram of Avo. “I remain. And so, a part of him remains. A part of my son remains. But my boy never met you. So I will remind you of the ghoul. Heel, dog, heel.”
Rantula’s lip quivered as she made a groaning sob. She turned her focus back into the corner and faced away from them, headbutting the wall as an unexpressed tantrum boiled over.
Well. That was an ugly sight. Godsdamned Mirrorhead probably had this planned. Cruel shit never wasted a moment to lord his influence on his minions. Slammed everyone against each other, he did. Then kept people apart. Siloed.
Shaking his head, Chambers sighed. “Hey, Essus. Consang. I know you gotta take me to holding but, I can feel parts of myself worming back into my body–”

He needed to say no more. Essus reached over and, while Rantula continued to pound her head against the growing dent in the elevator wall, plucked the ragged leather coat from her back, unlatching its magnetized plate from around where the only implanted limb she had left remained. With a casual toss, he chucked the jacket over to Chambers. It hit him more like a falling blanket in terms of size.
“Shit,” Chambers said, ducking under the coat. But damn did Rantula smell like motor oil. “Thanks. Owe you one.”

He felt a shiver leave his mind then. Like a thought connected him to Essus somehow. In a flash, a moment of sonder hit him hard. Hurt. Hurt the same kind Chambers used to feel after his mom left. After his dad told him it was his fault. Not by words. Never by words.
Essus though? He loved his boy. They never had much. Chambers could feel that, but he loved his boy.
Why didn’t Chambers ever get that? Why was he supposed to be a hurtbag since birth. Why did he have to play this fucking clown role in this clown city for half-strand clown people that hated him anyway?
Fuck. The boy was lucky. He got to die before he grew up and realized how shit everything was.
A single tear escaped from Chambers’ eye. He caught it in his palm before it could hit the floor. “What the fuck?”
***
Working at the father’s thoughts using Chambers as a vector, Avo felt an unexpected harmonization of sadness form between the two. Essus missed his boy and countless others. People who never made it to New Vultun. To Avo’s surprise, the man had held a vigil in his mind for him as well.
Chambers, though? His hurt was all childlike. Like a boy who didn’t understand why he was being punished. He wanted more. The flashes of his trauma were always moments connected to his father hitting him, the unforgettable sensation of a skull bouncing off the ground, and the seizure that followed.
+Hm,+ Avo said. +Think they gave Essus same kind of wards Slaughterman used. Terrible. Conflux Necros should consider suicide. Would make them better at the craft to have firsthand experience.+


Draus' attention only briefly lingered on the thing that was Essus now. Instead, he found her studying Rantula. +You do that to her?+

+Only one ear. Other probably came after. She lost. Only victims lose here. Victims. Victims to be.+
Using the time it took for the elevator to descend, he worked to twin a sufficiently deceptive memory to pierce past the defenses Essus had. With them being the same variant that Avo broke using a thoughtshiv against Slaughterman, slipping through exacted a cost in only time.
Time, and surprise.
He was barely three surface sequences in when he noticed it: the irregularity in the mem-data. The sudden and hasty shifting of memory artifacts and structures. As he watched, it changed again.
Using Chambers as a conduit, his Ghostjack came online. He cycled in Lucille’s Regret–he wanted to keep the father intact if he could.
+Avo?+ Draus asked, not understanding the sudden spike in his alertness. She didn’t see it. The single inconsistent digit in the mem-data. The sequence didn’t fit right. But he did.
+Not alone,+ Avo said, a thrill of two natures rising within him. The beast wanted to hunt and the Necro wanted to scry. +There’s another Necro here.+
+Shard-2 is no longer responding. All indications are that she has been nulled. As of this moment, we go thought-silent. No communications outside our cell. Within the cell, do not contact the other shards. Direct your messages to me. I will relay all the necessary information.
All in-field operators: Burn your identities and blur your minds. Extraction is go. Assume your covers are blown. Assume that the leaks are coming from the inside. Trust no one. Proceed to take on secondary burner identities in the meantime. Re-establish contact via mind proxies.
All shards who do not report in on time will be considered burned. Good luck. Godspeed. Watch yourselves.
We are being hunted.+
-Mirror-Convex to Incubi Cell “Peregrine”
9-16
Mindblitz
Popular entertainment portrayed duels between Necros like a shooting affair. Ghosts bearing trauma loads crashed together in blasts of trauma. Wards rang like shields parrying falling blades. The duelists talked and taunted, their thoughtstuff alive as the waters of their ego struggled and strained, two oceans seeking to wrestle the other into placidity and compliance.
Reality was considerably uglier, and battles were fought in chaos-fraught desperation or slow, methodical intimacy.
Here was not a battle.

Here was Avo detecting a threat unseen. And here was the same threat, unmoving, uncertain between engagement and escape.

Their hesitation would cost them.
Nether-lag crackled in Avo’s mind as he fired his Celerostylus and re-imbued himself with the powers of his Heaven of Blood. He checked his Rend momentarily, and once more found himself relieved to have strengthened his Hell.
REND CAPACITY [WOUNDSHAPER]: 4%
The world around him slowed. He cast a peek into Mirrorhead’s palace and tasted continual despondence. Good. The Godclad was uninvolved and unaware. That meant this was a third party, and this dive was not yet blown.
Now to keep it that way.
Avo had been too complimentary in his denigration of Essus’ wards. The analogy of its architecture was a large crude wall made to blunt impacts, the surface of which had the frozen screaming forms of various ghosts frozen in place, there to project their suffering, there to drink in more.
Behind it, was a man who experienced far too much alongside Avo. The ghoul had spent hours looking upon his naked mind, was there when the greatest wound was inflicted on his ego and the world came apart for him.
Finding symmetry to slide into Essus was a task of great ease made near-instant thanks to Avo’s enhancements. What lay deeper, however, was call for concern. Right then, the unverified integer continued to quiver, their indecision writ into ripples of the mem-data, sluggish to near-stillness.
They were, however, prepared for his intrusion.
The first hidden phantasmic Avo detected was laced within several memory sequences Essus had of his son. The boy himself had been primed as a turret for trauma, the variables of his simulation packaged with the anguish and pain of several other parents who lost their children. The build was respectable, but Avo himself would have avoided placing it in such a position.
It was ultimately too obvious.
He extracted himself from that sequence and changed his approach. Using his Metamind to filter for other parallel memories, he sought one that contained instances of himself–his foe had the advantage of fortification, but he had actual history with the father. Such would be a hard thing to use against him in any situation.
What came was Artad. Rather, the moment the man had told him about his dead god. Little weight or reverence remained attached to the deity. Faith died in despair. Convenient. Made it easier for Avo to sink into the sequence without faking religiosity.
For the second time, Avo used a past variant of himself to shuttle him across another’s mind. He knew where he was heading, but more than that, he knew the memories well. Being a direct participant provided one with such useful insight.
Over three hundred trauma phantasmics and two dozen planted Specters lined his path. Even enhanced, he could not deny his adversary's skill. Obvious mistakes hid greater dangers, with blatantly corrupted mem-data left to lure a rival Necro out into the open for a direct nulling. What’s more was the broad nature and shifting defenses they installed. For each phantasmic Avo removed, unseen mem-cons activated behind him; deactivated functions manifested as wards within wards, trying to quarantine him into a specific quadrant.
There was no mistaking these techniques. The deception. The design made to narrow his choices until he inexorably found himself staring down the barrel of a final mistake, desperate for a tunnel to salvation.
He faced someone of Ori-Thaum tradition. With this understanding, the tension within him grew tenfold but likewise swelled the thrill.
It was good to sink his fangs into prime meat.
With his overwhelming superiority in speed and knowledge of the terrain he swam across, a plan formed in his head. He needed to cage the Incubi in with him before they fled back to the others. Claiming the memories from one would offer great insight into the players and board both.

To this end, they were connected to Essus’ mind the same way he operated through Chambers: Auto-Seance. There was a session running here. He just needed to decipher that which did not fit in Essus’ mind.
Thankfully, he already had samples to work with.
Most Necros had signatures to the way they sequenced. Habits and memories they favored using. Perception and worldview tinged memories and in turn, the builds constructed through Necrotheurgy. The Incubus was someone who favored nostalgia. Lost loves. Lost places. Lost possibilities.
Filtering the broad builds of each phantasmic trap he avoided without triggering, Avo began to narrow the operational area within Essus’ mind.
Ultimately, there were only a few sequences that could serve sufficient overcurrent to hide operations running within. One hundred and twenty memories would manage, with only four intersecting enough to provide sufficient sequences for a session.
Sinking deeper into a simulation, Avo found himself in a tent, bathed in a world of scents and symphony. From the eyes of the father, he gazed down, joyful at the sleeping form of the boy–then but a babe. The hunger within Avo roused as he adjusted, working to hide his desire. Infants were so plump and inviting. Could he truly be blamed for yearning to see if their flesh was sweeter than those ripened with age?
Adjusting his ghosts to prevent the leakage of his hunger, Avo continued down the path of the memory with Essus’ swinging gaze. There were others in the tent. Each wore long leathery cloaks lined with netting. They stood together, looking up at people playing music on the stage.
The melody came in twanging sounds that needled the mind. The discordance of the tune didn’t feel natural. It felt like it was made to peel focus from a mind, to part thoughts before they could form.
Something was wrong with this sequence something was–
It was then Avo realized it. The sounds. They had been altered from the original notes. His Metamind told him these were urlla, seven-stringed guitars favored by the Embers that migrated between the borders of Sanctus, Sangshan, and Omnitech. Urlla didn’t make the noise he was hearing right now. Those were guitar sounds distorted by altered frequencies like… like radio wavelengths.
Ah. A brilliant technique to hide one’s Auto-Seance. No need to keep things so encrypted or scrambled. Hide the discord by infusing chaos into a single aspect of a memory rarely plucked by the waking mind.
The mem-data around the instruments was so subtly infiltrated. No longer did he consider his foe unskilled. His foe was his better in matters of subterfuge, their creativity in deception far broader.
Just a shame they were mortal.
Human.
All too human.
Scanning the structure of the sequence again, Avo activated his Ghostjack and prepared Lucille’s Regret. He wanted the Incubus broken, but not destroyed. Much of their mind needed to remain for him to draw necessary information.
And so, in the depths of Essus’ mind, the first shot of a silent duel was fired.
The lancing trauma burst forth and struck the lead musician’s urlla, the three others behind him also certain to be infested. The guitar shivered as Lucille’s wailing face rippled into existence, manifesting as a misted visage.
All of a sudden, a forest of memories across Essus’ mind came alive with coursing agony. Avo had struck, and he struck root. The circuitry connecting the Incubus’ mind across the Nether cracked, their wards ringing but congealing. Skin peeled, the memories beneath revealed themselves as wards.
Ah. Quicksand pattern wards. A phantasmic worth resequencing if Avo could claim them without too much damage. It had a mimicry functionality–allowed for the ghosts to siphon some patterns of the impacting trauma to better muster asymmetry and lessen the impact of the next collision.
Took damage above the weight of ghosts it took to run.
It also meant Avo couldn’t use the same trauma twice. Or hit the same area with the same trauma.
He shifted, carving his blade of regret against his foe’s wailing mind. Startlement leaked out with screaming memories. They were unprepared for this; his arrival must’ve felt like a bolt of lightning. One moment he was just entering, the next he was nested deep. The euphoria of power his Heaven provided only grew as Avo struck again and again, the speed which he could form his ghosts faster that the impacts themselves.
The first riposte finally came from a parallel sequence. They were firing blind through another instance of the boy as an infant, Chambering an ego-killing trauma to fragment the entire sequence. It was desperate. It was destructive. It was wise.
They weren’t nearly fast or astute enough to react to him, so the best option was to cut his path off by the root.
Unfortunately, their Ghostjack cast out its injection of deleterious memories far too slowly. Avo cycled his memories and brought Secondhand Fatality to bear. As a miasmic bolt of distorted mem-data came at him, so too did he release a ghost carrying the Secondhand Fatality. Thus far, he had only used his trauma as line-of-sight instruments, lashing and striking with them like melee weapons.
But with the danger presented by his rival's reprimand, it was wisest to keep the matter at arm's length.
Two traumas impacted in a collision of breaking fragments. The shrapnel of the harm cleaved and shredded multiple instances of the boy in his infancy. The unshaped mind of Essus shuddered as the man cried out in abject agony. More of his son was lost, and he knew this truth, if only subconsciously.
His foe hadn’t even begun spinning up another salvo when Avo tore into them. The attack had given away their true position. They were hiding within one of the notes in particular. Avo reversed his path back up the sequence, to where the note would strike.

There, he fired in an alternating pattern.
Regret. Torment. Secondhand Fatality.
Each strike painted a new color to his enemy's wards, cracking the diamond-shaped defenses just in time for the following blow to chip and the last one to shatter.
It was a testament to his enemy’s fortitude and skill that they were able to build phantasmal armor capable of taking an impact so extreme. It was their misfortune that, though they were able to survive Secondhand Fatality, their wards were also functionally broken. Their thoughtstuff spilled free like entrails unspooling into the pull of an ocean.
And like a shark tasting the blood of a nu-whale, Avo yearned to dig into a meal of organ and liver.
Tearing through the open wound, Avo jumped a third time as he ripped through the savaged thresholds of the Incubus’ mind. He was now using both Chambers and Essus as a ladder to his new prey, and the Nether lag grew ever more immense.
Without his current speed, time would likely feel like it was skipping.

Lashing his quarry from the inside with Lucille’s Regret over and over, he felt their mind tear and collapse from the inside. Distantly, he caught glimpses of the world beyond, their body striking ground from seizures and vomiting, coming undone before his assault.
Good. He needed them broken but not unraveled. He struck ten more times until the mind itself stopped responding and slowly ground away toward a slow collapse.
Then, with the Ori-Thaum mind agent broken, Avo’s objective changed. No longer was this to be a hunt. Now, he was to raid.
COPYING PHANTASMICS
[QUICKSAND SYNC TRAUMA]
[INCOG]
Of all the phantasmics, those two were of the greatest importance. Those two, and the treasure trove of encrypted memories the Incubus had. Agents of Ori-Thaum locked their personal lives when they were fielded on assignment. This one was not different, but their operational memories were consumed in labyrinths of confusion.
If Avo had longer to stare at the design of their palace, he might have copied a few things more. But from the inside, he already noted the mem-data shifting, with several new variables entering–and one acting at speeds far faster than the other.
This operative had friends and Avo’s looting time was short.
Siphoning away all he considered useful, he collapsed out from the Incubus’ palace and tethered on the brink.
He waited, just as the other few manifested through the Auto-Seance to fire his Second Fatality thrice more.
The palace quivered, and sequence by sequence it turned vaporous, dissolving as two other minds went into nulled freefall within it.
Avo, on the other hand, slipped back through into Essus’ confines, and then out again into Chambers.
Noticing that the father was clutching his head and frowning, Essus was still standing. The damage wasn’t too severe. The battle was fast. Quiet. And victory was absolute.
As time flattened and Avo returned to his senses fully, he found himself laughing hoarsely, his triumph a glorious thing.
REND CAPACITY [WOUNDSHAPER]: 5%
Never before had he imagined himself indulging in such a thrill–he had raided the mind of one of the Ori’s elites. He had broken a foe that was his greater in several aspects of Necrotheurgic artistry, and done it easily.
Draus gasped, the fullness of his encounter loading into her mind long after all the work was finished. +Shit. Did you just null a fuckin’ Incubus?+ She sighed. +Course those shits are here too. Can’t get away from them no way no how. You know why they’re here.+

Holding onto a few encrypted memories, Avo’s grin turned from feral to methodical. +Not yet. Going to need some time to crack it. Likely has self-nulling if access is wrong.+
+You think Mirrorhead knows?+


+No,+ Avo said, reaching across the link he planted. +Still too wounded. Still beneath his notice. Lived without knowing there was an infestation. His “throne” was rotten to begin with.+


Turning his attention back to the memories, Avo frowned.
What was Ori-Thaum doing here? And if they knew Mirrorhead was planning to kill their ambassador, a greater question emerged.
Why hadn’t they stopped him yet?
"Good sir, I told you our wants would see us dead. Why did you follow me? Why did you come back? I spared you. I spared you."
"And I told you. My game was an ending with you, and not an eternity without."
-Final exchange between Assundiya, Queen of Hounds, and Vandenhurn, Master of Foxes from The Follies of Vandenhurn, Kosgan Folklore
9-17
Daggers Behind Daggers
Avo snarled.
Avo hissed.
Avo raged.
Gathered around a quick-sculpted table, Kae shivered as he clawed at the phantasmal representation of the Incubus’ encrypted memory. Off to the side, Draus regarded him wryly, faint bemusement bright on her face. “Havin’ a… bit of trouble opening that cookie jar there, consang?”
“It’s not a ‘cookie jar’.” Avo said, tone even with naked rage.
The glare he turned on her bore enough hate to slag metal. Jelene Draus just smirked, tendons drawing tight around her wrought-iron jaw. “Well, be that as it may, you are chokin’ on it.”

“Not. Just difficult. Need more time. Can you do it? Can you?”

Her smirk grew. She was enjoying this. The beast inside whispered delightful acts of violence for him to perform. Gods did he want to pluck the tendons out from her face. See if she could sneer at him then. “Heaven’s fine. Have to… understand.”

“Oh, no. I get it. Crackin’ Incubi shit’s a real rust-job. But you can’t deny it’s funny seein’ you get stuck on a wisp like that when you were opening golems like aluminum cans a couple o’ nights ago.”
He directed his Echoheads to rattle at her, outsourcing the dispensation of his ire. He was busy. His Ghostjack flashed. He edited a few more memories, tweaking delusion and nausea–
ACCESS DENIED
MEMORY SEQUENCE INCORRECT
The weight of his frustration erupted, his thoughtstuff rearing up, the shape something between the hair on a cat’s back and a crashing wave just about to fall. Kae scampered away.
He had his Heaven. He had his reflex booster. He had his skill–and pride–as a Necrojack on the line.
Yet, the damnable memory would not offer him its secrets.
The encryption was a strange miasmic design–a slipstream moment plucked from the riverine of another mind, part hallucination, part fever dream.
Entirely unique.
Even with minutes stretched into hours by the aid of his Canon of Haemokinesis, the issue he faced was one of specificity, not effort. He could crack this. He could. There was no question. But time was not an ally with the cascade of events set to clash in the near future, and to let Ori-Thaum linger in the background without a clear idea of what they were doing seemed a delightful way to experience a sudden nulling.
Much like the one he had delivered on the Incubus formerly residing in the depths of Essus’ mind.
They had gone silent after that. He had scouted for them, looking briefly through each of his assets for any other visible signs of rival Necros of regardable competency. The fact he found nothing was either a sign of safety or a silent omen waiting to turn loud.
Necrotheurgy made these things hard to judge until after the fact. His encounter with the Incubus was chance. Happenstance. Without it, they were all predators of the same jungle, hunting each other in the dark. The moment of surprise could have been the other way.
There was another question, then. Why Essus? And when? Surely not during the Crucible. The flat had seen him die and resurrect. What would they make of that memory, if they had seen it at all? Or did he even remember it, so engulfed by the demise of his son?
No. It was probably some point later, after catching Mirrorheads' notice.
There was another game being played here. He couldn’t imagine Mirrorhead being so tolerant–much less working together–with the Silvers. They saw his mother dead, and in fashion of peak humiliation.
So even with their penetration, Greatling remained alive. Unnulled. Nor did Avo uncover any subversive phantasmics in the Syndicate boss’ mind. There was always the possibility their skill exceeded his so greatly he missed something, but his encounter against the Incubus earlier told him that he was facing adversaries of a near-even caliber.
Except there were certainly far more of them than there existed of him. While he had the overwhelming speed advantage in terms of processing, even eldritch powers were enfeebled when he lacked the proper components to make a workable key.
The impotence was…
“Maddening?” the Woundshaper offered. “Ah. But now you understand what spurs gods to grow. It is not enough–never enough to hold to one groove. Totality. Omnipotence. Omniscience. To plaster yourself over existence without melting into it. Such is the desire.”
He wanted to respond to his Heaven, but a warning flashed through his cog-feed.
Mentally scrolling through the numerous interfaces occupying his mental display, he found himself looking at his DeepNav, icons and visual identifiers mapping much of the block via his infected assets. Slowly, his mem-cons were spreading through the loci and subverted Necros, and with them, his knowledge of the block broadened.
That all paled before the alert and objective of this dive– Mirrorhead himself. Mirrorhead, broken son playing at vengeance. Mirrorhead, who had been offered final summons from his sister.
Mirrorhead, who on the DeepNav, had just shifted a few hundred miles and two Layers up in the Warrens. No longer was he nested within Conflux tower. Instead, he was on the Layer of Light’s End, at the base of the Tiers where New Vultun “actually” began.
Then, he moved again. Not quite as far this time–manifesting at another point in the district. He was within a tower now–one Kaswarg’s Grove. A recently built Stormtree-owned establishment. Room number 5588.
Avo froze. Just what was Jhred Greatling doing now?
Drawing the encrypted memory claimed from Ori-Thaum back in his mind for now, Avo cast out a message to Draus before firing his reflexes again. +Mirrorhead’s moving.+
He didn’t wait for her response before he wrestled time to a near-halt with a flex of his Canon.
Triggering the memories that formed the path to his hidden session, he slipped out between canals of memory within the fifteenth layer of Mirrorhead’s mind. The inner rings lay just beyond, and with concentrated assault, Avo thought he could crack his foe before they could even resist.
Tempting. Very tempting. But until he was near enough to tear the Soul from the Greatling’s unworthy husk and drink his Heavens dry, nulling him now would only alert him to the intrusion and grant him a fighting chance post-resurrection.

Avo had no desire to offer such an option to Mirrorhead. Devastation was owed. Devastation in flesh, mind, and more.
The indignity of being rendered choiceless was a blemish to Avo, the weight with which it bore down on him grew greater by the day.
That, and Mirrorhead’s weaknesses taunted him. Pulled at the beast within him. Where the beast had been averse before, now it was slavering.
And this time, Avo intended to let it free.
Some sequences around him looked changed. Whatever the Syndicate boss did to tighten security, he left most memory artifacts related to Avo intact. As such, his backdoor remained unimpeded.
Yet, as he diluted himself into the ocean of Mirrorhead’s mem-data, he moved with greater caution than ever.

Knowing Ori-Thaum was a player at the table inspired a different level of focus, especially compared to the sloppiness on display by Conflux’s Necros. A mistake would see him nulled here. Such wasn’t the end, but he had greater things to risk than mere death.
Having someone harvest a memory of his Frame, for instance, or discover the nature behind his new sanctuary was unacceptable.
There was much to risk here. Much to risk. He needed to consider installing a self-nulling phantasmic to prevent such an outcome…
HOST AWARENESS: 2%
Near-term memories pressed in on Avo, mem-data flowing back in from the outer sections of Mirrorhead’s mind. A blur of perception coursed through Avo’s mind as he found himself beholding the nature of Mirrorhead’s power for the first time.
A chasm of light connected the exiled Guilder to the Heaven of the Twice-Walker. Inside him, recollections of an internal subreality unfurled like a map, bridges to other places forming shape in Avo’s mind.
Twelve sets of luminous shards expanded from the back of the Heaven, with eight burning bright, each fractal bearing a reflection leading to a different place. Yet, its primary structure–and the scene revealed in the three gleaming eyes of the Twice-Wallker–only had one position installed.
The current position of Mirrorhead was a middle-grade hotel room lined with fine furs draped over a king-sized bed, a Grendel Fantasy locus-entertainment system spinning brightly at the center of the room. One of the Twice-Walker’s shards had sunken into it–and Mirrorhead’s sanctuary of glass became the reflection it stored.
There was a Domain of Light at play here. Or Luminosity. Brightness? Something he needed to inquire Kae about later. Something told him the bridge between different places that shone in the glass was a hubris to exploit.
A sudden thought twisted the sequences of Mirrorhead’s mind. The mental command came suddenly–and if Avo had been without present boons of speed, the act would have unmasked him entirely.
As such, only a momentary ripple saw him sinking back within the shroud of his past selves.
HOST AWARENESS: 3%
The Greatling had sent an order into the entertainment system. Peering at the departing mem-data, Avo studied the sequences being cast out.
The build seemed random. An explosion at its beginning. A dozen people were gunned down before open graves; the graves blossoming into the eyes of a heavily modified nu-dog, its gaseous limbs expelling heat as it pawed its way through the void, where the stars in darkness formed a constellation, and the constellations formed a symbol.
A tree. A tree with roots that formed fissures of lightning. From there, the lightning lashed down, repeating into an explosion, and the memory cycled anew.
Avo understood then.
This was a session to an Auto-Seance.

Turmoil still stirred the waves in Mirrorhead’s mind, but the rawness of his emotional hurt had been sufficiently quieted. The Syndicate boss’ Metamind was filtering out all memories relating to his sister or family and was instead keeping him focused on the task.

A meeting.
With a benefactor.

Curiously, not even Mirrorhead seemed to fully know their name.
A shower of light formed the shape of a person standing opposite Mirrorhead, while Avo’s accelerated reflexes gave him ample time to study the nature of the mind beyond the veil. A trickle of thoughtstuff flowed through. Again, Avo infused more ghosts into the other Godclad’s perception.

The time lag eased slightly, and the first flash of wards greeted Avo like a bash to the jaw.
It was a modified Quicksand Sync-Shield. Same as the one Avo downloaded from the Incubus he nulled, bar a few floating phantoms meant to give off the visage of a Sanctus Starseeker.

Before any judgment came, Avo waited. Not everyone who used a modified Quicksand was an Incubi. He knew that. Plenty of Necros of sufficient skill touted those–signs they managed to steal or earn favor with Ori-Thaum.

But something sat wrong with Avo. Something wasn’t right here.

The waters of Mirrorhead’s mind were calm. Calm as if he was beholding an ally or asset rather than hated adversary. Pilfering some more mem-data regarding the mysterious benefactor Mirrorhead was meeting, little knowledge entered Avo’s Meta other than the fact that Mirrorhead had been meeting them on a consistent basis for the past six months.
Deeper memories remained connected to them still, but that was beyond the Fifteenth Layer, running even deeper.
Avo considered spoofing his way in further–the beast snarled and told him to just null the other Godclad and use his Galeslither to make his way up, to be done with this farce and stop delaying.
But the beast was an impatient addict of food, and the alluring taste of conspiracy appealed ever-greater to Avo’s broadening sensibilities.
He could trigger a partial collapse of Conflux. In fact he was going to trigger that before the slaughter to come.
But instinct and experience both told him to wait a moment longer. Zein wanted Mirrorhead alive to fail at just the right point. The Incubi spared Mirrorhead of overt machinations, surely their plans built on his intent to kill one of their number. And nothing from the other Godclad’s mind showed his knowledge of any of this.
Avo’s foreboding only worsened when a dozen of his mem-cons blinked out–the spread of his awareness collapsing back as the loci began falling out of his control.
A pit formed in his stomach as two functions blinked out of his mind’s eye–the connections he had linking him to the techs.
And in the narrowest fraction of a second, they were gone. Shattered. Already dissolving. There was no gap between the moment they were whole and the next when they weren’t anything at all.
WARNING!
SESSION LOST
WARNING!
SESSION LOST
Too late. The crackling screams of their nullings rattled down the one-way path within his mind, lag stretching the moment before the act and the culmination. Shattered fragments of abject terror and mental agony speckled through as his link fizzled.
Their ego-deaths were instant. Like they had been shattered by a tide of overwhelming force. The final fragments of their echoing demises crackled to static in the back of his mind. There was no hint of an assault. No sign of intrusi–
Avo froze.
The Incubi.

Omen of silence it was, then.
A trickle of his surprise leaked free. A swirl of perception brushed down from Mirrorhead’s Meta as Avo hid once again, visual information blinking out.
HOST AWARENESS: 5%
Flicking his attention over to his own Metamind, Avo's encroaching darkness ate away nearly every loci he had subverted–but none of the Necros. He puzzled at that, then understood. His mem-cons must’ve tripped a passive defense the Incubi had already set within the local lobbies.
He still had assets at play. The Necros that handled his techs. Chambers. Mirrorhead himself. But the loci belonged to the enemy. All his mem-cons had done was offer them something to trace. What was sufficient to fool the Syndicate faltered before the Incubi.
From what Walton told him of Ori-Thaum’s modus operandi, they changed members when a team was exposed. Or a situation went against them. Ego-Alienation was the effective term. It was designed around making the opposition feel like they were always fighting someone strange, someone they didn’t understand.
Immediately, Avo sent a command to activate the various vicarities he connected to Chambers’ sequences. If nothing else, it would help him detect if someone was diving into the enforcers’ mind. Lustaway usually worked, but sometimes, the arousal within the memory bled over. That was something even seasoned Necros tried to avoid when working through a sequence.
Avo kept an eye on Chambers but stayed within Mirrorhead’s mind. Part of him wanted to return to the block. To see things done between him and the Incubi cell. Experience told him though this would not be that simple. When gone, they were like nu-sharks diving deeper into the darkest waters. It would be folly to go swimming after them blindly, even if he did think of himself as the nu-whale in this metaphor.
A thoughtcast lanced out from the Fantasy entertainment system. A pale cloud molded into the shape of a person, burning before Mirrorhead as a whirlpool of patrolling Specters circled the room, casting their perception outward like an aegis.
+Your organization,+ the benefactor said, voice masked in notes of soft monotone, +has been compromised.+
A low, bitter laugh came from the Syndicate Godclad. Weariness threaded out from every memory, but they broke away by the fifth Layer, never escaping to be thoughtstuff. +That’s not nearly the surprise you think it is. But Conflux is living the final days of its purpose. There are, however, other matters that … threaten my operation.+
+Yes…+ the benefactor continued. As the time trickled on between the full delivery of each thought, Avo again studied the benefactor’s Quicksand Wards. The sequences… the design… They all seemed too similar to the one used by nulled Incubus to be a coincidence. +You have been compromised by Incubi. Tell me, do you know how long your sister has been working for them?+
And with that statement, the twin minds of Mirrorhead and Avo lurched to a halt as one.
Dagger-1: Hostile assets nulled. Mem-cons suppressed. Dagger-3, any trace of the target?
Dagger-3: Not yet, Dagger-1. Not yet. Found some stray memories from Shard-3 though. The incompetent half-strand spilled part of his short-term memories into the proxy. Godsdamned sloppy.
Dagger-1: Target first; report after. Dagger-2, what you got?
Dagger-2: Target is skilled.
Dagger-3: –No shit? And here I was thinking Shard-2 got nulled by an amateur.
Dagger-2: Very skilled. Shard-2 didn’t even see it coming, unraveled in seconds. She got a cast off and didn’t seem to inflict any damage.
Dagger-1: Affirmative. Does her conduit remember anything?
Dagger-2: No. He only has a headache and a few pieces of missing memory. Doesn’t even know there was a skirmish in his mind.
Dagger-3: Sounds blissful.
Dagger-1: Dagger-3, pipe down unless you have something conducive to add; I prefer the lag to the sound of your voice. Dagger-2, what about the other two in the elevator?
Dagger-2: Nothing in Rantula. Just trauma and nightmares. That Chambers though…
Dagger-1: What?
Dagger-2: His mind is a cesspit. He had over a dozen pornographic vicarities playing in tandem. Lustaway’s going wild inside him. I tried diving in earlier but… it’s going to take some time to establish protective measures against any leakage.
Dagger-3: Jaus, the half-strand’s a rash risk. Null ‘em Dagger-2. It’s the right thing–
[Dagger-3 has been muted]
Dagger-1: Acknowledged. Keep searching. Keep me posted. I’m going to rig the grid up.
-Incubi Strike Cell “Swordfisher”
9-18
The Quiet War
+Incubi?+ Mirrorhead asked, mind a stasis of disbelief. +My… sister?+
The yawning of time between each cast was long. Still, it took Avo more than a beat to reorient himself within the wavering memory shielding him. There was a burgeoning rage rising from the depths of Mirrorhead’s ego. He didn’t like the benefactor accusing his sister of treason. Not at all.
Avo, for his part, found himself puzzling why someone he suspected to be an Incubi–or at least an Ori-Thaum aligned individual–was consorting with the likes of Mirrorhead, exposing the operations of their allies to Mirrorhead, and then claiming his sister was working with–or at least under–Ori-Thaum.
Unless he wanted Mirrorhead to be paranoid. Unless he wanted to force the Syndicate boss into doing something foolish.

Flicking a peek at the remaining wards blockading him from accessing the innermost portions of Mirrorhead’s mind, Avo found himself considering his next steps. Attempting to dive deeper held risks if done in haste and without a clear mind. However, after Abrel’s earlier entrance, Avo felt he had good odds of avoiding Mirrorhead’s notice entirely.

His bigger concern was presently the other individual not in the room. The benefactor. Such was how Mirrorhead regarded them. Perhaps there was more knowledge deeper down, but between the locus and the remaining wards within the Guilder, the more vulnerable target was obvious.
Swimming out with the flow of thoughtstuff was a slow-going process. To accelerate risked drawing the notice of the mind’s host, and Avo had no desire to betray himself. By the time he was out and skimming the waters of thought beneath the surface of Mirrorhead’s boiling rage, another thought had lanced out from the benefactor in a slither of threading ghosts.
+Who else am I to assume has infiltrated your house today?+ the benefactor asked, defensiveness high. Their voice continued to be scrubbed of distinctiveness, but something smelled of insincerity to Avo’s instincts. +She visits you on the same day your “missing employees” are returned, and suddenly there are intrusions and hostile mem-cons staining the sequences of your loci. Coincidence is not a thing so neat, Higher Greatling.+
Avo waited, preparing to mask his transit using Mirrorhead’s response. Anger built behind bubbling ghosts. Unlike the benefactor, Mirrorhead’s reply whipped out, lashing at the Nether as if trying hurt without edging the ghosts with the sting of trauma. +She is no traitor! You still your tongue! She has served with honor! Distinction! Is she a fool? Yes, but–+
+But who else?+ the benefactor asked. +It can’t be from the ones you brought back. They don’t have the skill–they came back subverted. You think the Scalpers have the capability to slip past you? No. Don’t bullshit yourself, Greatling. Not them, and not whatever gutter-Necro they can afford. You would have noticed.+
Unbeknownst to either, Avo had leaped into the locus, his path running beneath a bridge of ghosts sawing between the two.
As much as the benefactor was buttering Mirrorhead’s ego, the truth was the Syndicate boss did have a substantial quantity of ghosts to wield, and the complexity of his wards would send wise Necros into a retreat until they could prepare enough for such a dive.
Perhaps a good enough cell could overcome it on their first try like Avo did. Or another Godclad with similar Necrotheurgic expertise.
A coldness filled him as he considered if the Low Masters had any nodes imbued with such powers. The coldness kindled into low arousal as he wondered what it would feel like to kill such a person, to sup victory from their flesh and mind.
Between Mirrorhead and the benefactor, the locus was a bridge, and also something to exploit. Peeking at its structure from up close, Avo studied the Auto-Seance. He wondered if this was a thing prepared only for this room specifically, or if the entire establishment was under the sway of this conspiracy.
As Avo sank deeper into the structure, the building cumulus of thoughtstuff bubbling out from the inside told him another thought was about to be cast free.
Through the interior, he caught a glimpse at the mind dwelling on the other side. And when he did, the encrypted memory obtained from the enemy Necro resonated. Filtering for only the phantasmics and sequences he downloaded from the Incubus he nulled, an answering gleam proved twin to that which Avo had failed to crack earlier.
One mystery was solved, but its resolution led to no rewards and only more questions.
The one across from him had to be another Incubus. Had to be. But why were they revealing their hand? Why were they feeding Mirrorhead’s paranoia?
A scythe of cleaving perception lashed out without warning. The splash of arcing awareness speared out as a Specter slipped into the locus, conducting its scans.
It moved slowly like the mem-data around it was mud instead of phantasmal water. But even still, Avo found himself blocked as three more slashes closed off the entryway entirely. It was like the Incubus had spotlights shining on the only entrance leading into their mind
Avo paused. Had he done something to reveal his position? Why the sudden suspicion?
Then, he felt the distance shortening behind him as a vast wave of ghosts erupted towards the locus. A deluge of sequences smashed forth from Mirrorhead, with mem-cons and other weaponized memories spilling free.
Weaponized memories Avo recognized with some indignance. Those were his work! The Greatling boy had stolen them? They must’ve been torn free from Chambers. A flash of Dannis Steelhard flexing while blood soaked through his platinum blonde hair winked through Avo’s mind. Suddenly, he understood. The benefactor was defending against Mirrorhead’s attack.
An attack that Avo could use to smuggle himself through–at some risk.
Attuning himself to the mem-con, Avo felt his wards shiver but not rattle. Being the one to sequence and graft these memories around Chambers’ mind, he was ready for the danger they posed. As such, the damage came blunted as he rooted himself at the core of a particularly thick cloud of trauma, the contagions biting at him, trying to sink into his thoughts, but parrying off against his wards instead as he filtered them out from his Metamind.
COG-CAP: 14%
The vessel of his ghosts rocking, he slipped past the intersecting waves of perception and prepared.
He needed to time his departure as soon as he was past the intersecting gazes of the Specters and not a moment before. If he lingered more than a few heartbeats, the readings of clashing traumas would expose him to the rival Necro. If he left too soon, he would dive into the light of the Specters.
COG-CAP: 33%
A shrill voice screaming for him to buy Glitchfree implants at budget prices howled in the back of his mind. He deleted that sequence of memory just as he crossed through the gateway that was the session and emerged on the other side.
Past the checkpoint of perception and under the weight of added lag, Avo found himself staring at the Quicksand wards in the fullness of their detail.
Unlike the Osarai Mem-Guard, the Quicksand offered a veneer of placidity at the surface, but he knew what loomed. Under a limpid sphere of water, drowned bodies connected to a darkness in its lower fathoms. Not nearly as intimidating as a storm, but he knew better. Once struck, the water would come ablaze, mimicking the same trauma it was struck with. The semblance let it adjust, leeching much of the harm out of future traumas, but left it vulnerable to a larger arsenal. He remembered striking it with his Ghostjack earlier. The first blow–to his recollection–landed the hardest. Afterward, cycling through other traumas prevented it from adapting.
Avo hadn’t installed the one he claimed from the Necro he nulled. If he was to be honest, he had been avoiding diving into his own mind. There was a blank spot that lingered in his palace. Made by his father, or some version thereof.
After all that was revealed to him, all that he learned, he had taken to tip-toeing around the truthfulness of his personhood.
This could not abide much longer. When next he had a chance, improvements needed to be made.
His new power had kept his edge sharp against Ori-Thaum’s Incubi for now, but they were many, and he was one. A mistake meant bled memories and he could really do without letting Ori-Thaum get a mem-lock on him. Being forced to delete more memories would surely scramble his already fragile sense of self.
A loud thunder of anger came from Mirrorhead. His thoughts were getting heated. The Incubus remained calm as ever, if a bit uneasy.
Peering at the wards again, a building frustration filled Avo. He cracked the other one using the sheer intensity of trauma and force. Spoofing his way into an Incubus’ mind, however, was a different story.
A sea of confusion and torment lined the walls beyond. There was a preparedness displayed by this so-called benefactor. A shield of confusion even behind the wards and thoughtstuff. Weaves of nonsensical memories were blended together, presenting a facade of madness. And then, every few minutes or so, they shifted.

That had to be active. They were altering themselves as they spoke.
Even fast as he was, wariness became Avo. This would not be a thing he could remedy if a mistake was made, and even if he made it all the way through, the task of delving into the labyrinth the Incubus likely had in place of mind palace was like entering a dungeon blind without proper research.
The beast told him to null them. Damn the quiet; damn the consequences. The Necrojack he was wanted to pluck and master the defenses, to overcome the fortifications of his foe without ever revealing even a hint of his presence.
But perhaps he could come to a middle ground between the two. He turned his attention to the memories of the session itself. Collecting what he could from its sequences, he might just be able to ambush this Incubus down the line as well. Null his way through their wards and sink in before they could–
WARNING
[UNIDENTIFIED] MIND DETECTED
->ASSET (CHAMBERS)
Avo halted his operations and turned his focus over to Chambers. Someone had brushed against a vicarity playing sequence–the spill of disgust not native to the mind.
Plucking the final few pieces from the session, Avo turned his gaze on the Incubus’ wards one last time and turned away. He would collect and replay whatever Mirrorhead was saying to the “benefactor” later. There was little else he could do here at the moment without forcing harm on the Incubus and altering Mirrorhead. If he lingered, he was going to lose another asset down in Conflux.
Jacking out from Mirrorhead’s session, Avo dove into Chambers and immediately transferred himself out into the disturbed sequence. He moved without care, unheeding caution as Chambers’ reactivity could barely match his pace.
There was prey to catch, and he had one last reliable asset in the area.
The quietest war was back on.
The vicarity in question was relatively tame by Chambers’ standards but it did involve excrement, a funnel, three bleeding ghouls, and an open wound. Following the trickle of disgust lingering in the mem-data, Avo jumped from simulation to simulation, shifting between bodies as he closed on his target.
He found them moving at a languorous pace. They had two Specters running with them as well, the phantasmics running parallel with them, peering at simulations bearing odd signatures of mem-data. Careful. Methodical. Efficient.
And seemingly just as unprepared as the last Necro Avo nulled.
He struck them the same way he did the first. His traumas flew out, alternating traumas impacting their wards as the water of their Quicksand flashed and flickered. He saw Lucille’s weeping visage turned back against him in crackling flames. He whipped out with the Secondhand Fatality and Lucille’s sister screamed one final mournful note. The fire cracked. Avo chambered another trauma–
Something flashed from within the Incubus’ Metamind. Three synaptic bolts fused with memories of people dying in a conflagration came back at him. The vicarity playing in the background broke apart, as a vicarity star moaned and crooned in pain. Avo’s Ghostjack thundered. From its blade tip, he slashed back, Fatality meeting oncoming assault.
His blow crashed and rang against all three of theirs. In that frozen instant, they were as if knights of a bygone age, dueling with ego-rending memories in places of spear and blade.
Yet, the metaphor died when Avo felt his wards ring under a series of dotting impacts. Flashes of damage filtered through his cog-feed. He only understood when he cycled his short-term memory for review.
The Incubi had loaded traumas within traumas. The minds that died in a conflagration offered a common enough sequence for most wards to resist, but inside was a work of art.
Speckles of drownings, tortures, mutilation, torture via animal, via primal fear, castration, and forcible implantation all speared into his defenses in a fragmenting shower.
COG-CAP: 46%
Another layer of Quicksand wardings swelled from inside his target. Another flash of a session activated. More Incubi were arriving to help their ally. They were ready this time. Wary of his presence.
No longer was he facing a single Incubus. Now, there were at least three. The newcomers were faster too–likely had some cognition or reflex-boosting implant running.
But that was only a relative thing. None of them had a canon, and so, again the initiative shifted back to–
The Incubi reeled out from Chambers’ mind. All presence of them was lost for an instant. Wasting no time, Avo latched his senses into Chambers’ perception, he found the enforcer clutching his head and staring at the blurring lights on the ceiling. The man ground his jaw as he tried not to retch, unaware of the battle that had just taken place inside his skull.
His cell was a barren place with a bowl of filth-crusted waste disposal unit and a cot laid on the ground. It looked like it was meant to store packages or crates rather than people.
Just outside was a passing enforcer, the footsteps of their exo-rig thumping down the walkway. Within their mind, the shine of the Incubi flared, scintillating amidst all the other signatures present.
Familiar accretions dotted the area around him–and the floors below him. The taste of bloodlust and hunger stained the air. Conflux was storing their ghouls here as well–ghouls that the Incubi were using to hide.
Casting himself out, Avo tore through the Nether at blinding speed. The local locus was also no longer his–none of them were by this point. He needed to review just how many Conflux Necros he managed to infect. They seemed to be the only things the Incubi didn’t really touch.
Plunging into the mind of his enforcer, he shrugged past paltry wards and dove in seeking the Incubi.
A thought came to him.
He wondered why they hadn’t just jacked–
The mind of the enforcer burst apart, and every last sequence within them detonated in a chain of mind-breaking explosions.
Avo felt his wards shatter. He felt the spill of mind-death, flashing bouts of agony grinding all his sense out from his mind like an avalanche.

He felt detached from his body as he watched himself snarling and shaking in the real. Draus was rushing over to him. Draus. Kae was–blood. He bit something.
Did he just bite his own tongue in half?
COG-CAPACITY OVERCLOCKING - 142%
WARNING: [ERRORNULLNULLERROR]
DISABLING PHANTASMI[ERROR]...
INITIALIZING RESURRECTION - 1%
Dagger-3: Holy shit! We got them! I think we nulled them! I felt that half-strand burst apart. Pieces broke apart everywhere! Fuck were they fast… What was that shit? I never seen anyone sequence so fucking fast before–
Dagger-1: Dagger-2: Status.
Dagger-2: Wha-? Where–Is it–are they–
Dagger-1: Dagger-2, you are relieved. Rotate out.
Dagger-2: I can–I can
Dagger-1: Dagger-2, rotate out. I’ve already informed Convex. You did good. You did enough.
Dagger-3: Yeah, consang. Didn’t get nulled on your first real dive. Guess that makes you a real Necro now, huh? [recording marked for deletion]
Dagger-1: Dagger-3, return to the playground. Keep your eyes on the Nether. There might be more than one.
Dagger-3: Jaus, I sure as fuck hope not. Hey, what about that Chambers half-strand. We know he’s the attack vector. Can I null him now?

Dagger-1: Negative. He stays alive. We need to see what mem-data we can pull from his mind. The memories might tell us something.
Dagger-3: Great. Guess I’m on rash duty now.
[UNIDENTIFIED] MIND DETECTED
-Incubi Strike Cell “Swordfisher”
9-19
Embodiment
Getting nulled stung worse when you were a Necro. The cut that shame inflicted was not deep, but it gnawed, a mark that you were less than what you assumed you were.
Or that you were a fool, drunk on the nectar of your own power, seeking to replicate the thrill of the hunt against gloried adversaries.
In retrospect, the trap was obvious. No Necro flees by reeling back to their session–they just jack out.

Avo had imagined himself the apex predator of the Nether then, jaws unhinging to swallow big game. True enough to the metaphor, being a predator did not make one a hunter, and like a warg charging after a nu-dog, he found himself led toward a pit pre-dug to suit his demise.
In the depths of his Soul, he sulked, contemplating his mistake. How ghoul-like of him. How base. Such a display shamed all his mastery shamed all that Walton had taught him.
Or given him.
The nature of his origins taunted him. No longer did the affirmation that he claimed his own skill remain. If he were to be honest, it would not be improper to see himself as more construct than person, patchwork traits woven by a pseudo-immortal unmade by the regret of eons.
What then remained that was truly his merit? Was there any touch of the original to him–any touch of his individuality?
Did it matter?
At such thoughts the Woundshaper roused. Fused around his Soul, he watched it construct a dozen limbs from a fluid sprawl of arteries, flooding into shape at the end to spread open palms in supplication to the Frame’s fathomless expanse stretching around them. Atop the spire, where the gleaming touch of luminance reigned, light sprinkled down, enshrining the Heaven in a portrayal most divine.
“All are imitations.” The Woundshaper closed its palms and made fists that stretched forward to become blades then hammers. “From the totality of the tapestry, everything is derived. One can only claim to be an orphan of mixed birth. A synthesis of previously unspliced sequences and nothing more.”
“Saying I’m just derivative?” Avo asked. The Heaven didn’t harbor any urge toward comforting him, nor did he want to be assuaged. Neither of them were creatures so human, but in him, the former bloodmother seemed to sense a concept it wished to illuminate.
Perhaps, though chained to his will, it still sought to exert a measure of the divine influence it once held. As he could command it to reshape the world, so too could it whittle away stray studs in his minds construct using the whetstone of concept and thought.
In the end, were they not all sculptures of self-perception?
“Look beyond your apprehension of what you were, and behold all that you could be. As much as we desire to shape ourselves, the truth is the tapestry has long usurped our will; we come pre-shaped to task and tribulation.”
“You’re saying everything is fated?”


“An ephermal’s perspective. Heed me well and consider abandoning such thoughts, if I might propose. The root of nature is thus: the future is born enslaved.”
“Hm. Could choose not to obey nature. Defy. Choose different.”

A note of genuine pity rang out from the former god. That, of all things, drove Avo to hate it a little bit more. “Master… master… is the choice of deliberate defiance any less predictable than submission? It is just an inclination of thought paired with the availability of circumstance. Nothing more.”
“And what of us?” Avo asked. “We’re slaves too?”

“No. We are the firmament that holds the sky. We are those that escaped. Until reality learns to cage its own organs, we are the concrete of the roads; the marble of the pillars. Absolute to the relative. The breaking of your mind should be considered a fortuitous thing: the iron from this folly will linger, and shield you in your path.”
“Path…” Avo paused. His path to eating Mirrorhead. To slaughtering Conflux. To uncover what the Incubi–and whoever the benefactor truly is. And even understanding Zein, in all her madness. Through these journeys, he had come to know power, and vast did it broaden his appetites.
“Chase pleasure and reap purgatory,” the Woundshaper cautioned. “Deny it and be blind to how your chisel falls upon the self. Believe my words on this master: I was shaped by worship, but no hand holds the crafting of your true design. More unchained than I, you can seek whatever embodiment you eventually wish to become, and I, with you, will taste glories yet fathomed by those born of miracle or mundanity.”
The light of his Soul spilled inward again. The pull of resurrection was upon him.
Yet, as Avo made his ascent back into existence, a concept rose with him.
Embodiment.
RESURRECTION - 100%
His awareness manifested first in the flowing blood taken from the helios, and through its coursing path, threaded himself back into his unmoving body, consciousness mantling the vessel through the tunnel of a Heaven.
As sight, perception, and sound returned, his body shivered on a tangle of Echoheads as he once again nested in life’s embrace.
He had been placed–and then–nulled in a nexus-shaped Necrojack chair, and from there, he found Draus standing over him, her arms folded, face flat with a knowing look.
“Incubi?” Draus said.

“Incubi,” Avo growled.
His Frame reuploaded his being back into reality absent any leftover traumas. Considering the unique sequences derived from each individual ghost and the way Essence detached from a person, it seemed doubtful he was an archive of minds being uploaded each time. It seemed the Frame intrinsically knew what was considered “damage” and what was something regarded as baseline. The fact it continued to keep his new implants was a testament to that.
“As I told you, master,” the Woundshaper reminded, “we are the shapers of ourselves. You choose the embodiment.”
“Get any of ‘em before they nulled you this time?” Draus asked.
Avo tested a leg out and stood. He rose past her, but her eyes didn’t follow him up. She simply took a step back and gave him room as he grumbled, “Still just one.”
She punched his lower arm with a loose hammer of a hand. A note of commiseration chimed in her voice. “One’s more than most of us’ll ever get. What the hells happened?”
That drove a grunt of annoyance out from Avo. “Good question.”
He told her what he encountered, with Mirrorhead and the yet-confirmed benefactor, with the Incubi occupying the Nether, with the mem-cons subverting Conflux’s loci.

Chambers was still alive. For now. Thinking like a Necrojack, they were likely using him as a chokepoint. Flicking a glance at the man’s mem-data, Avo saw he was still sporting a skull-splitting headache from the brief skirmish that occurred within his mind but was otherwise fine.
Again, Chambers’ resilience against even partial nullings continued to pry at Avo’s interest. He would never say he was impressed with the enforcer, because impressed wasn’t the best word to use. Say, someone managed to create a replica of New Vultun via shitting and clenching the pre-molded shapes with their sphincter. What would you call that?
Eccentric.
That was better.
As he cast her some of the sequences and memories of his last two dives, the darkness of a frown built over Draus’ face. “And you said they was usin’ Incubui wards?”
“Yes. Tried to fake it as something made by Sanctus. In a Stormtree establishment.”

“Any chance it could be a freelance Necrojack running the ghost-makes?”

“Could. Risky. Would be like wearing the scalp of a dead Reg on your hip. A statement of prowess to most. But a challenge to those used as sacrifice to feed your status.”

Her lips thinned at his comparison. The sacrilege pushed the edge well past the skin of her nonchalance. Made it easier to conceptualize. “Yeah. I got that.” She let out a sharp breath from her nostrils, gaze dipping momentarily. “Well. I’ll put good odds on the ‘benefactor’ being a Silver. It ain’t like the Incubi to turn tail and leave the pie uneaten. Not after just one loss. From what they said, seems more like they want to put a wall between Greatlings here. Tryin’ to force a play.”

The possibility she portrayed was possible, but it was a strange act, revealing the presence of one’s supposed allies to feed the purpose of greater subterfuge. “Mirrorhead knows about the Incubi now. Will be hunting them.”

The Regular snorted, her eyes rolling as if she didn’t believe him. “Yeah. Or he’ll be paranoid, and he’ll be pushed into a mistake. Jhred Greatling’s a half-strand fool of a child despite all the imps mommy and daddy threw at his genes. He ain’t gonna be diggin’ no Incubi out of the Nether. Shit. He didn’t even see you comin’.”

And now the blade of comparison cleaved back. Avo glowered at Draus, now suddenly sporting a considerate grin. “I dove into his mind. Incubi do that?”

“Maybe they didn’t wanna,” Draus said. “Hells. Maybe they couldn’t, but as the score goes, you're one-one for nulls, and we just lost most our Nether control with them holding most the loci.”

“And the enforcers,” Avo said. “Each one is likely rigged now. Minds are traps. They’ll blow them if they suspect a dive.”

“That’s how they got you, ain’t it?”

He growled. Draus needed to be more focused. She spent too much time fixated on trivialities. “Need to consider approach. Currently only have Mirrorhead. Chambers is compromised. Essus is likely mined. Conflux Necros tagged with mem-cons but…”

“But you won’t be able to use them?” Draus asked.
“No," Avo said. “Mem-cons designed to corrupt. Null if needed. Lacks guiding will. Needs direction to know what to build. What sequences to use and hide in.”

“Then, maybe we might wanna consider a more direct approach to our subversion.” He knew what Draus’ suggestion entailed: The vulnerabilities revealed by Chambers weeks ago. The Blockcrawler. The areas quarantined off by leftover mem-cons from the war. “Say we hit ‘em. The hells with what Zein wants. The hells with whatever game is bein’ played over our heads. Say we go in hard and fast, and we set ourselves on snuffing ever last fuckin’ half-strand in the block. You think on that.”

He could not deny the allure of her words. More than merely playing to the arousal of the creature that he was, it would be a succulent transcendent experience. The massacre played out in his mind, scenes of reverie. Outliving most his brethren yet the promised feast remained beyond his grasp since the day of the Uprising, the time a blur in his infancy.
Now, with means and will, a new dish awaited his sampling.
No need to fret over the Guilds and their games. No need to consider the wants of another like Zein–an act he felt she might encourage by philosophy, even at odds with her desires. To slaughter thousands upon thousands at his own hand, peeling from them their flesh, ghosts, Essence and all would be bloodshed supreme.
And to end all that on the dessert of breaking Mirrorhead? Of stripping his Frame and Soul both?

A low hiss snaked free from Avo. Yes. This was pleasure absolute. He could not deny. Turning, he looked upon the thrones of the Low Masters, and he considered what his father wanted for him.
To taste the colors of life. To be what he wanted to be.
But want was not to be fulfilled so simply. Much still stood in the way of such an action. Zein claimed she would devise a means of stealing the Paladin’s attention, but reliance on her word alone struck Avo as unwise. More than the Paladins, however, was the matter of Ori-Thaum. It would not do to reveal his presence to them, to betray his presence to an entire Guild. An entire Guild that built the pillars of their power on mastering the Nether.
A thought needled Avo, and he recoiled internally.
He had a solution for the Incubi. He was simply avoiding it.
Ever since his experience in Deep Bazaar, he had avoided diving into himself. Modifying his Metamind further.
Excuses rose. He stripped himself of them before they could settle. It was dread. Dread halting him from delving into his own mind. Dread at beholding the missing block at the center of his person. Dread reminding himself how he had been so forcibly bent by another.
Ghouls were not humans. Not fully. But Avo could yearn. He could hope and fear. And more than anything, he feared degeneration. He feared the scaffolding of his sophancy collapsing, sending him toppling into the subhumanity exhibited by his brothers.
He feared that when the fullness of what his father did to him was revealed, the last structures holding his self-perception would be snuffed, like a wind blowing out the candle of his awareness, leaving only embers to remember what once was.

The nulling changed that. The fact he returned to existence after the breaking of his mind, the fact that his thoughts remained, continued, changed, evolved. All these were signs of continual personhood. And personhood could be changed. Bent.
Augmented.
Even if something in him broke, he had the cure within himself, and its name was death.
“I have a solution,” Avo said, finally breaking the silence between them. “To deal with the Incubi. I’m going back in. No half measures. No surprises. This ends with death. No survivors. No intact minds. No Ori-Thaum. Not Conflux. Not anyone involved.”

“Gonna do it through Chambers again?” Draus asked.
“No,” Avo grinned. “Mirrorhead could use some help cleaning his home. Going to give him something to chase. Enforcers corrupted. Home compromised. Benefactor planted a seed. Time to make it grow.”

The thrill offered by his words was contagious, glinting fire kindling in her eyes as well. “You’re gonna use him to draw their fire, aren’t you? Send him out and at ‘em from another angle.”

“Yes,” Avo said. “No more confusion. No more deception. Won’t stay nulled. They’re not prepared. Run them down. Take the Nether. My ocean. My domain. Not theirs. But first…”

Draus looked at him, anticipating his next words.
“Draus. If I null myself. Kill me.”

At that, she gave him a light shrug. “That’s been my job these days. What’re you plannin’?”

He steeled himself for the next dive. “Some improvements.”
APRIL FOOL’S SPECIAL
HIJACKED INTERVIEW
It began with an interview.
An unannounced interview on New Vultun Sunrise.
No one knew how the ghoul managed to break into the studio, jack into the various loci, automate the broadcast, or even what it wanted.
What they did know was that there was, indeed, a ghoul among them, and it was currently doing an impromptu live thoughtcast at five in the morning. There were six hundred billion viewers and climbing tuning in.
“Morning New Vultun,” the ghoul had said, it’s pronunciation and speech surprisingly understandable, “I am Avo. Have something I want to say to everyone today. A grievance against several people. And some highly complex socio-political messages I wish to convey on behalf of my brethren.”

The ghoul then cleared its throat and pulled what appeared to be a contact lens out from between its fangs. According to the Exorcists, it had just eaten the eyes of over a dozen people at a local gathering. Confusingly just the eyes. Despite the mutilation, it had left them alive, stating: “Hmm. Need to taste the flavors of blindness. Run into things for me. This new experience will help me contemplate personhood.”

Further reports indicate all victims currently harbor extreme cases of trauma, fearful of the dark but generally grateful for the choice to grow past the need for light and comprehend “true choice.” As such, they too listened in, attentive to the words coming from the one that took from their flesh.
“I’d like to dedicate this interview to Green River,” began the ghoul. “Doing this mainly in the hopes she gets a heart attack. Dies. Do you hear me River? Going to eat your fox after this. Ahem. Anyway. She talks a lot. Says nothing. Reminded me of this show. And I thought: Many people watch; why not tell them some truths? Share experiences.”

The ghoul promptly coughed, momentarily choking on some of its own saliva.
“So. This Frame I have. Godclad now. Didn’t ask for it but it’s pretty good. Highly recommend the Stillborn if you can get. Stolen from Highflame. Ended up with me. Shoutout to Veylis Avandaer. I met your mom. She talked me into taking some Suncloud before this. Fantastic drug. Made me understand human kindness. Grew morality for a moment.” A low whine of sadness then escaped the ghoul.
“Lost it.”

Startling the hosts, the ghoul pulled a literal barrel of Suncloud out from what appeared to be a small whirlwind and inhaled deep. The subsequent dilation of its pupils and quivering of its digits suggested that it had achieved near-immediate nirvana.
For approximately ten seconds, it collapsed on the big red sofa, twitching, tendrils of drool escaping from its lips. Vomit erupted in pressurized sprays between its fangs as clumps of half-digested eyes and bones from recently missing nu-pets poured into the plush carpet.
Then, with a sudden eruption of blood, the ghoul climbed out from an open wound in its own body, and settled back into the seat. Again, it opened its demiplane of wind and took another drag from Suncloud, more carefully this time.
“She warned me about the kick,” the ghoul muttered. “Anyway. Veylis. Your mom says you were being a half-strand but she still loves you. But the Frame is still mine. Not giving it back. I checked: No licensing.”

He shuddered for a moment, the high hitting him hard.
“Back to Green River: I hate you. Hate how much you talk. Talk. Talk. Talk. You know she invited me to talk in elevator and hinted she knew my father? Then she name-dropped Zein and the Ninth Column. Turns out she was being manipulated by father.” The ghoul growled. “There. I described the situation in a few words. She spoke for hours. Showed us fish as part of a metaphor. Stupid metaphor. Fish died for nothing. No-Dragons–if you’re listening: Fire her. She’s bad at her job.”
A transaction imps was cast through the Nether directly into the ghoul’s Meta. It was clear that someone was paying it to say something.
“Very annoying. Oh. And promote Bright-Wealth. She needs promotion to sustain gambling addiction.”

The individual known as Bright-Wealth later neglected to comment regarding the situation, instead challenging all parties to a game of ma jiang.
Upon this moment in the interview, another figure transpositioned themselves into the studio. Official statements taken from Veylis Avandaer afterward suggested that the newcomer was indeed her mother.
Such a truth caused great ripples within the Choir of Seraphs.
“Avo,” the figure that claimed to be Zein said, “this is not the way these things are done!”

The ghoul responded to her by hissing and growling, holding his Suncloud inhalation tube protectively.
Such an act was unneeded as Zein came prepared with hallucinogenics of her own. Ones she promptly threw in her mouth and swallowed. “There is a format to the show–have you even watched the Sunrise? There is need for us to offer links. Connections to guests and the like. We should take some calls from the highest bidders. Make some imps while we’re here.”

“Yes,” Avo said, nodding sagely. “Yes. Why not.”

The following is a transcript from the myriad of callers.
SESSION CONNECTED
[FATE IDENTIFIER]: JHRED GREATLING
Mirrorhead: You! All this time, it was you!


Zein: Hello. Greetings. Our first caller tonight–
Mirrorhead: I should have seen it! Should have put things together from that first moment. The circumstances of your survival were absurd at best. I was a fool.
Zein: Ah. He is capable of self-awareness. Such a truth explains how the Twice-Walker does not just slip from you.
Mirrorhead: ... Who is this?
Zein: Hm. I could tell you, but of all the futures I favor, they all share a commonality in your suffering. Stay ignorant, Greatling. It is how the memory of your mother’s fate tortures you so, no?
Mirrorhead: You will not speak of–
Avo: Eat your mother.
Zein: She’s dead, little dagger. I’m afraid that’s impossible.

Mirrorhead: YOU WILL NOT SPEAK OF MY MOTHER THAT WAY!
Avo: Glad his mother’s dead. Would eat her if she wasn’t.
Zein: Perhaps such a reality can come to be when we finally claim the Ladder for ourselves. Imagine: A fundamental law of reality mandating that all ghouls be allowed to feast upon an infinite quantity of Greatlings.
[PLEASURED DRUG EXHALATION FROM GHOUL]
Avo: True Heaven.
Mirrorhead: I will inflict torments–
SESSION HAS BEEN DISCONNECTED
Zein: What a terrible caller. No sense of humor at all.
[Zein Thousandhand promptly plays the sound of a steel spring thwapping loose and several screeches from a nu-cat.]
Avo: Next caller.
SESSION CONNECTED
[FATELESS]: GREEN RIVER
Green River: I wish to defend my character–
SESSION HAS BEEN DISCONNECTED
Zein: What occurred?

Avo: Memory collapse. Too much content and not enough substance.
Zein: Ah. A pity. Perhaps the next one will have more to say.
SESSION CONNECTED
[FATELESS]: JELENE DRAUS
Draus: Avo, what the fuck are you doin’?
Avo: Hosting talk show. Why?

Draus: I thought we were synced on keepin’ things quiet. You know. Like not lettin’ every half-strand in the world know about us. You blinked out of existence after makin’ a dive over to that block and now you’re on New Vultun Sunrise. You tryin’ to get snuffed?
Avo: Why? I’ll just get better.
Draus: Not after a gettin’ filled up with Rend you won’t.
Zein: Do not worry, Captain Draus. I, Zein Thousand, Last Champion of the Ori, have a cunning plan.
Draus: Ah, fuck.
Zein: Within my chest is an antimatter bomb. Such a thing is what Voidwatch uses to power their voidships.
Avo: I want an antimatter bomb.
Zein: Hush, little dagger. We will see to what can be arranged with Voidwatch after I conduct this act of terrorism.
Avo: Terrorism?
Zein: Avo, have I told you how much I despise the state? The governing Guild?
Avo: Which one?
Zein: Yes.
Avo: Hm. No. Hate the Guilds too. Won’t let me eat eyes.
Zein: Good. I hate them. I hate them truly, deeply, absolutely. It’s always: “No, Zein, if you twist the future like that it will crash the nature of time itself,” or “Beating someone in a duel does not prove your innocence.” Bah. Drivel. Weak defenses for the weak-minded and weak-handed.

Avo: Why is cannibalism illegal?
Zein: Exactly. What is the point of being born if you cannot fight off hordes of cannibalistic demihumans? Ridiculous.
SESSION CONNECTED
[ERROR]
[Error]: Return our Frame to us.


Zein: Avo, your father-uncles are here.
Avo: [Disgusted ghoul noises]
SESSION DISCONNECTED
Draus: Hey, rotlick. You know you got a real messed up family, right?

Zein: Ah. This is nothing. You should see how my uncle responded after I used my knife to [redacted]. My cousins were never the same after that. But they were alive. Father was so very upset…
SESSION CONNECTED
[ERROR]
[Error]: You cannot deny us. We–
Avo: Draus. Put Kae on.
Draus: What? Why?

Zein: [Laughter]. Do it. Do it. It will be most amusing.
Draus: This better not–

[Error]: Ignoring us will not halt the path of our–
[ERROR] HAS BEEN MUTED
SESSION CONNECTED
FATE IDENTIFIER: Kae Kusanade
Kae: H-hello?
Avo: Kae. Going to access your memories. Use it to set the Nether on fire.
Zein: [Hyena-like cackling]
Kae: Wha-what?
Avo: Hungers connected to the Nether. Maybe if Nether burns, it will too.
[ERROR] HAS BEEN UNMUTED
[Error]: Wait! You cannot do this! We are your creators! We command you–
[ERROR] HAS BEEN REMOVED
Avo: I choose.

Zein: Wait! Wait! Before we start doing irreparable damage to the Nether, I must send something out.
Avo: What?
Zein: Just all the blackmail I have on the Guilds and their leaders… I expect this to start a new war this afternoon. No more laws, Avo. Everyone you can beat, you get to eat.
Avo: Finally. Justice.
Draus: That’s the literal opposite of justice, Avo.
Zein: Rejoice, Captain Draus. You will get to shoot all the half-strands you want now. Just treat the entire city like the gutters. No need to force yourself to fester in the limbo of the undercity. Everyone can die. Including you! One big meaningless brawl! The fight to end the fight of all fights.
Draus: [Sighs] Fuck it. I don’t give a shit about justice anyway.
Kae: I–uh–
Zein: Ori-Thaum is going to collapse without the Nether.
Kae: Oh! Y-yes! I’m–I’m going to b… u… burn your house down, you–uh–
f-fu-fucking nu-dogs–
SESSION CONNECTED
[FATELESS]: Aedon CHAMBERS
Chambers: Wait! No! Spare the Soft Master collection–
SESSION DISCONNECTED
End transcript.
What happened next in the studio is unclear. Much of the Nether remains ablaze from whatever mem-con was cast. What is known is that the ghoul’s Metamind caught fire in moments, inflicting the same affliction on every single viewer tuned in at that instant.
Comparatively, the resulting antimatter detonation at the heart of the Tiers was far more manageable in terms of damage.

When representatives from Voidwatch were asked to answer how Zein Thousandhand was able to get an antimatter engine implanted inside of her, they responded by momentarily canceling the licenses of all technologies.
Subsequently, all questions were dropped.
The timetable has changed. I am out of time. Out of time.
Abrel hates you. I… think I should too. There is… no. I apologize, mother.


She’s hurt. You cannot blame her for this. We live surrounded by jackals calling themselves lions. They have painted your very memory. They have quarantined you with lies.
But I will make this right. I will bring shame and dishonor to them.
Please do not blame Abrel. She’s… she tries for us. But she is weak. They all are. I will not allow her to stop me. She has given me days. For that, I will make her the fool. I merely need to accelerate.
Father is a coward–a traitor. He betrays you still. He’s going to see your murderer. He has forgotten what you have done for us. He has broken his vows.
Forgive me, I do not remember either. I remember nothing of you. But I know there was something… I feel it. The vacancy. The pit inside me, it just keeps going down…
It's utterly gone now. Gone and dead. I could have it replaced with something but I… have decided to keep the hurt.

I’m a terrible son. I know this is… not what you would have wanted for me. But I have to be selfish. I need to be selfish. I don’t want to be any other way.
There is no way to make this right. So. I’m going to make this wrong for everyone.
-Jhred Greatling’s mem-log, directed to his mother
9-20
The Labyrinth
The absence was a wound. That much he could not deny.

Once again, Avo stood at the heart of what was cleaved from him. Simulating himself in his palace, his old block curving around… What Walton’s node must’ve destroyed to render him invisible to the Low Masters.
At the center of his palace stood a static emptiness. Ghosts knew not what to simulate in the area, so instead of sequencing the structure or even the emptiness of air, a scab of raw mem-data spilled through, marring the facade of this mental world.
Something inside him panged, like a hunger that would never be fulfilled.
He lost something. True memory or not, it was gone from him for good. Never to return.
Beyond, roads ran and the other phantasmics rose. A mock-semblance to the Undercroft filled the atmosphere, and rather than nostalgia, soreness filled Avo.
As far as he knew, none of this belonged to him. Not truly. Had he walked these streets? Really plucked ghouling memories from his past to use as junctions and interconnections for his Metamind? Or was that something carefully provided by Walton? A donation from a specific mind offering tithe to what would be the only self-controlling ghoul in the city.
No matter. This did not need to be. None of this needed to be. All could be reshaped; put to a new purpose, and a new design.
His Metamind rippled as the simulation grew translucent around him. Drawing up his new phantasmics, he studied the recent procurements reaped from defeated foes, yet avoided installing. He had neglected his art in fear of what would be revealed to him, of the damage it would cause.
Finally facing the wound that was his core, Avo found the hurt wanting. Especially after the nulling. Only static fragments and missing structure occupied the space.
Perhaps what Walton inflicted on him was a necessary break after all. To release him from final chains.
Just as well. The look of a mundane district of the Undercroft pleased him no longer. False nostalgia held little appeal to a Godclad of ascending power. He was to make prey of Incubi soon and had glimpsed at the complexity with which they armored their neural organs.
Should he not imbue himself with the same protection? Twist intruders down false paths? Adorn himself in the fashion of a proper devourer of minds?

With a command, mem-data sank into him, infusing his cog-feed with a singularity of information. New interfaces bloomed and splashed through his mind’s eye.
It was time to see what he could make of himself.
[QUICKSAND SYNC TRAUMA] COG-CAP: 55 SEQUENCES (VARIABLE)
->STRUCTURE: “A LIMPID POOL FILLED WITH BODIES DRIFTING BENEATH THE WAVES; WHATEVER TRAUMA STRIKES THE SURFACE WILL IN CAUSE IT TO IGNITE AND SIMULATE A RESEQUENCING OF SAID TRAUMA”
->FUNCTION: GUARDS THE MIND USING A LAYER OF TRAUMATIC MEMORIES: CAPABLE OF ADAPTING TO TRAUMAS AFTER SUSTAINING AGAINST THE FIRST IMPACT
[THOUGHTWAVE DISRUPTOR] COG-CAP: [ERROR] SEQUENCES
->STRUCTURE: [NULL]
->FUNCTION: TAPS INTO THE ENTIRETY OF THE USER’S COGNITIVE CAPACITY AND EXPELS UNSTABLE MEM-DATA OUTWARD, DISRUPTING AN AREA OF (CONTINGENT OF GHOST CAPACITY) SPACE
[BINARIST] COG-CAP: 22 SEQUENCE–
MEM-CON DETECTED - UNSEQUENCING PHANTASMIC
[INCOG] COG-CAP: [x] SEQUENCES (VARIABLE; MUST MATCH ALL OTHER INTERNAL MEMORIES BEYOND THE WARDS)
->STRUCTURE: “AN OPALESCENT SUN RAINS DOWN OVER THE LANDSCAPE; LIGHT SPILLS FROM IT MORE LIKE MERCURY DOLLOPS THAN RAYS, BASKING EVERYTHING IN A REFLECTIVE SHEEN WHILE DRINKING UP MEM-DATA INTO ITS CORE”
->FUNCTION: ALLOWS THE USER TO CAMOUFLAGE THEMSELVES FROM NOTICE VIA THE OBFUSCATION OF THEIR MEMORIES AND THOUGHTSTUFF. NO ACCRETION WILL LEAK DURING THIS PERIOD AND ALL OUTWARD REACTING PHANTASMICS WILL BE PLACED INTO A DORMANT STATE UNTIL DELIBERATE ACTIVATION.
With his new phantasmics compiled and reviewed, Avo considered his options. The Binartist was a paltry thing to lose–though it would have been useful having a mental-emulator model to predict possible emotional outbursts or responses from those he interacted with.
Of the remaining three, the Incog would likely prove to be the most useful. Beyond his personal benefit, learning how to sequence such a construct would increase Draus’ lethality by far. Having her presence slathered with an attention-averting slickness would allow her entry into places beyond his imagining.
It also offered certain insurance against the Exorcists. Of course, the more concentrated fields of perception focused on the user of the Incog, the more it strained to cog capacity. With fewer worries about overclocking, it again suited Draus more than he, seeing that it would diminish the effectiveness of his wards and effectively double the number of sequences in use while it was active.
He would keep his deactivated, but from it, he could offer a Draus a copy. If she would let him. He had averted his touch from her mind per her request. This, however, might just be tempting enough to change her official policy.
Regulars were of binary natures. They were fighting or dead; functional or nulled. Some Necrojacks described them as ones who were “perfectly broken beyond repair,” where the concept of personhood in them was beyond adaptable, succumbing to demands of will. Choice over ego, if the propaganda was to be believed.
Considering how Draus was, his guess was that they reacted to trauma in a very specific–and adaptive–fashion.
Taking his prize Incog, he sewed the fluid gem of a false sun into shape over the phantasmal skies of his palace. Once violet beneath the glare of the darkstar, they now brightened before the mercury gleam of his new trophy.
Silhouettes of other phantasmics elongated, gliding out in a junction of slithering darkness, each crossing over the scar beneath which Avo’s simulated self stood.
Unwilling to suffer the blemish any longer, he had the space scrubbed while reconsidering the layout of his Metamind. This was too open–his phantasmics too exposed to direct attack. These streets and sequences operating as seams and circuits to his inner world flowed too direct, and predictable to strike.
A redesign was required. Along with a new central anchor to serve as a junction to each of his other constructs, a heart of the woven labyrinth he intended to make of this palace.
Draining threads of reminiscence from those he slew, Avo fused a new chitinous structure into existence and bade it to burrow deep. Like an inverted tower, a claustrophobic nest spiraled down, tunnels leading to tunnels filled with false turns and trap loops packaged with traumas.

No more did the heart of his Metamind resemble something of the Undercroft. This, instead, was festering chaos as he tended to the uncontrollable growth of spilling tunnels of teratomas that festered chaotically, gnawing a penumbral network leading to each of his other phantasmics.
He drew upon his reflexes and Heaven then, imbuing himself with a surfeit of time. No additional intrusions sounded in Chambers’ mind. Mirrorhead continued to sulk and rage. Long returned to his sterile glass sanctum, he had spent his time drinking and fuming over what the benefactor had told him, trying to calm his suspicion and rage with ambrosia.
Rooting tendrils fused into a new understructure for Avo's changing Meta. With another thought, the borders of the simulation curved upward like a bowl collapsing in on itself. Above, the light of the darkstar, already choked and dimmed by the shine of the Incog, was swallowed.
Avo removed the setting of night entirely. The sky above thereafter was the color of a broken vicarity, the sequences missing.
The new layout of the Metamind took shape before Avo, and in beholding it, he found himself pleased.
An inverted cylinder fused around him. Only a single, narrowing chasm offered entry to his mind now, and buildings at the edge pressed against each other like clenched fangs. No longer was this a palace; an oubliette was in the process of being manifested. The streets within his borders tangled together, leading everywhere and nowhere at the same time.
To deepen the confusion, he sunk his phantasmics even lower into the gums of his foundations, with only the mental arteries from his tumorous heart offering access.
The Incog’s glistening translucence was a strange sun, basking all the simulation with sheets of misted rain, the only major source of illumination in this twisted abyss made from crumpled city streets. He gave orders to his ghosts, blending the sequences of his inner mind here and there, lining more hidden traumas within falsified vulnerabilities. The phantasmal matter of megablocks oozed together, with splices blending the simulacra of people.
There was a feverish quality to his inner confines as he carved deeper designs of madness into shape. He would not be able to entirely finish his alterations, but today would be a start, and they would be sufficient for his oncoming task.
Forward and upward bled together down some streets. His Ghostjack, once planted at the very top of his mind, now hid within a pocket of misshapen memories, its pointed spire like a piece of steel lodged in flesh.
Once all the paths leading to critical structures were secured, Avo turned his attention to the new phantasmic he was to add on. The wards.
He had told Draus that using the Quicksand was a statement and a challenge.
Well. Now was the time.
He wanted the Incubi to know that he was hunting them.
The Osari Memguard served him decently. The improvements he made to it allowed for higher performance, and in return, it guarded him adequately.
Shame that “adequate” was insufficient against Ori-Thaum.
He needed something that could adapt and endure. Something capable of adapting to different traumas reliably.
He shuffled the sequences needed for the Quicksand and wove it into form. A bubble of water fused over the chasm leading out from his mind labyrinth, drifting bodies hovering just beyond the lip of his inner thoughts. This ward was far more silent than the roaring storm that was the Memguard, but there was something about its depths that reminded him of his Woundshaper.
Roused by his thoughts, his Heaven spat out a whisper. “Alchemy and reactivity. The matter of the mind is analogy. In this, the false waters of your waking dream and my blood share commonalities. Yet… there perhaps there is a way that both can be joined, master. It begins with you memorizing a locus…”
That was all it took for Avo to understand. He had thought of this briefly. Caressed the outline of the idea. Using his canons of blood, he could create his own loci, and using them, store ghosts and phantasmics tailored to specific needs.
He didn’t unravel his Mem-guard then. Perhaps it would serve a better purpose yet. It, and the Thoughtwave Disruptor in particular.
Avo installed the Disruptor but did not activate it. He needed to overcome his aversion to the instrument. To his annoyance, the loathing he felt toward the construct was hard to overcome.
In his defense, it had been indirectly responsible for at least two of his deaths.

Before he made his physical assault on Conflux, he would need to experiment with infusing ghosts and phantasmics within a locus made from his blood.
There was potential here for him to create a one-Necro Nether-grid. Keep a variety of optimized wards, traumas, and other sequences in an interconnected network shaped to form by his Woundshaper.
With such a thought in mind, unloaded himself as a simulation and looked upon his mind.
Winding, twisting, and nonsensical, looking in from the outside just before the wards let his gaze down upon a district twisted into shape by forces eldritch and unseen. There were roads leading between the partially crumbled blocks that seemed the teeth of a sleeping leviathan, but all their paths led down spirals and into dead ends lined with traps.
This was the beginning of a long investment. One that would grow evermore complex with time.
The Metamind palace was a sunken city right now. Someday, he would build the analogy into becoming that of an ocean infested with beasts that swam the deep.
For now, though, it was enough.
Tarrying no longer, he cast out and reemerged in Mirrorhead’s mind. Rawness lined the thoughts flowing from the Greatling and a pit of cold formed in his gut.
Drinking alone in his little chamber of mirrors, the Syndicate boss simmered quietly, the direction of his thoughts veering toward his sister, toward how much Ori-Thaum knew of his true plans.
To Avo’s disgust, a similar reluctance gripped Mirrorhead as it had him. The same thing that halted the resequencing of his Metamind was the same thing leaving the Guilder choking on his own emotions as he brought up the laughing little girl failed to delete it over and over.
Regardless of who bore the memory, it was a humiliating thing. A festering thing. An unbecoming depression.
Avo had roused himself from his malaise. Now, it was time to bend Mirrorhead toward his use.

Quelling his speed, Avo released his Heaven and relaxed his Celerostylus. +Draus. In Mirrorhead. About to start my hunt. You know what to do if I get nulled.+

+Synced. I’m still diggin’ through the district’s layout. I got another idea about how we can avoid reflections when we start our run. Another option other than Chambers’ Blockcrawler approach.+
He grunted. Pulling a function he left lingering in the back of his mind, he sent out an order to all the Conflux Necros he contaminated and sent the traumas packaged within their mem-cons to overload in increments of five.
Soon, Mirrorhead would start receiving reports from his surviving Necros. He would likely ignore the first batch as he did the nulled enforcer–and two dead prisoners he just received.
He would not be able to ignore his entire Necrotheurgic base getting unraveled.

Then, Avo needed to provoke the Incubi to reappear. He had a plan for that as well. One that involved Chambers.
And so, as the first thoughtcasts bearing news regarding Conflux Necros collapsing from sudden onset mind damage struck Mirrorhead, Avo shifted over into Chambers again.
Mirrorhead was alert. That was step one.
The Incubi still needed their invitations.
Dagger-1: Friendly-fire! Friendly-fire!
Dagger-3: Oh, fuck! Oh shit oh fuck! That was Convex! We hit Convex! Why the fuck was Convex casting at us?
Dagger-1: I don’t care! Stop casting! Stop–
-Incubi Strike Cell “Swordfisher”
9-21
Garden of Burning Lies (I)
+Chambers. Get up.+
The voice thundered in Chambers’ mind, the weight of its presence pressing on the open wounds of his headache.
He had spent the last half-hour sobbing in the corner, whispering curses and prayers to dead gods, offering his life and any number of deviant sexual favors if they would just end his headache.
Or kill him.
Clearly one of them decided on the former. A silent series of snaps shuddered through his memories as the clustering agony swelling at the stem of his skull dissolved. His short-term memory suddenly came back online, a vicarity of someone he couldn’t remember anymore getting torn to shreds by a nu-dog was playing. Scenes from a Crucible.
Waves of dizziness rocked him as spasming muscles struggled to reconnect. It was hard to stand. Hard to even discern which way was up. If he had eaten at all that day, he would have spewed his bile across the dust-caked ground.
As it was, only sour beads of spit clung to his lips, the glistening threads of his saliva swaying as he stood.
Another pulse filled his mind. This time, blooming roots of pleasure writhed their way through the left hemisphere of his brain. Color flashed back into his perception. And smell too. He was suddenly aware that he had pissed all over the floor during his seizure, the smell worming up his nostrils in a backlash of stink.
Beyond him, he heard a rattle, followed by a fizzle. Translucent lights pulsed and went out before his eyes. The phase gates were down–the static field of electro-kinetic energy silent. The way out stood unbarred to him and just outside, he saw a holographic outline simulating the last known position of where a body lay.
Chambers stared. “Shit. Did someone get killed while I was… uh…” How had the pain started? Did it finally happen? Did all those mem-cons he got infected by downloading free vicarities finally overload his mind?
No. There wasn’t nearly enough orifice-to-sharp object action in what he remembered from his recent nightmares. It was just a lot of boring stuff like people burning or castrations.

The bit about that girl watching her sister getting skinned and dying did have potential though, but he couldn’t help feeling like he had seen that one already. Something about the body writhing and the pain of the actress and the forcible grafting felt familiar.
LUSTAWAY ACTIVATED
TRANSFERRING PHYSICAL AROUSAL INTO METAMIND
+Out. Walk.+
The return of the voice made Chambers jump in fright. His toes splattered against a puddle of urine. His puddle of urine. Hmm. There was a scene where–
A sharp wrenching pain tore through his skull and he cried out. Clutching his right eye, he moaned in agony as he braced himself against the wall.
It felt like someone had torn the thought from him, ripping it loose from his eye sockets.
+No more filth. Walk. Go. Now... Or I remove all the other vicarities.+
Focus and alarm surged through Chambers like a shot of nova injected straight through the chest. “No!” Chambers cried. He stood up. The world around him spun. Propelled by determination–and fear of losing his precious media–he staggered out from his opened holding cell.
Icons and markers danced into existence around him. Mem-data flowed across his right eye as ghosts stitched packets of knowledge straight into his mind. There were five hundred and sixty-two cognitive lifeforms on this level, approximately four hundred of which were ghouls. The remainder counted for thirty-three techs, a group of three logistical support Necros, and forty-seven “patrolling” enforcers, who wandered aimlessly around the perimeter. From personal experience, he knew their attention would be more focused on vicarities and sims than their actual duties.
A translucent green arrowhead weaved a directional vector attached to the roof of Chambers’ perception. A series of waypoints lined the hall outwards, dotting his path beneath the blistering glare cast by the lights above.
+Follow the marker,+ the voice said. They spoke fast, and though there was a distortion to their voice, Chambers thought he knew the cadence. Looking around, Chambers swallowed. As more of his mind cleared, he found himself peeking at reflections, wondering if that messed up nightmare Mirrorhead kept in his back pocket was going to pop back up at some point.
An invisible shockwave washed through the holdings then. The light flickered. Phantasmics showed countless accretions that dotted the levels above like stars shining through the thinness of matter. Constellations of people in motion. Fear and confusion spilled down like waterfalls.
Something was happening.
Suddenly, the thoughtstuff connected to the three Necros governing security for this level ruptured, the threads of their inner thoughts spewing free, bleeding threads of pain out into the vastness of the Nether.
They were eight hundred feet and two hallways away from him. Yet, he knew what was happening perfectly, the information fed directly into his mind by a hand unseen.

Chambers wasn’t a smart man. Not even close. But even an idiot knew when he was being used as a pawn for a greater power.
Awkwardly, he took his first step in the direction he was pointed.
The holdings were more of a makeshift prison than anything. Before the Uprising, back when New Vultun had plans to officially expand, this place was used as storage for cargo and luggage, the ten-by-ten holding cells meant for things not people.
Overhead, swaying circuits and dormant mechanical limbs hovered like skeletal chandeliers. A transportation railway had been built into the ceiling from the good old days–days when the blocks down here mattered; when people from the Tiers still flowed through on the regular.
All silent now. Even the larger fifty-by-fifty storage slots running sixty feet up were empty, used mostly for holding Syndicate contraband or loose crates of weapons.
Crossing the holdings offered only so many directions. There was forward and backward most of the time. If Chambers was worth a godsdamn at climbing, he might’ve been able to clamber upward.
Such was why his ass tightened when he caught sight of a group of four patrolling enforcers approaching around from the corner, footsteps hammering, thoughtstuff fluid and slick with the touch of inebriation. They were coming out from an intersection and would turn at any moment. Even if he gunned his piece of shit Nitronerve reflex booster, they’d hear his clumsy ass bounding down the way.
And though Chambers was pretty quick in a sprint, he knew he wasn’t outrunning even an outdated rig on foot. Not with the legs he currently had.
“Shitshitshit–”

The fourth “shit” was about the leave him when the announcement came.
INCOG ONLINE
Suddenly, all the ghosts drifting through the block turned into static outlines. Fluid ponds of thoughstuff broke apart into grain-like nebulae. The squad of four lumbered across from him, turning his way.
Chambers felt his breath hitch. He wanted to turn. Years of experience and practiced cowardice told him the best choice right now was to run.
Instead, however, the voice inside his head issued another command. +Don’t move. Let them pass.+
As the enforcers turned, he felt four spears strike against an unseen shield shrouding him from sight. Ghosts whimpered and wailed, groaning against the pressure of direct notice, crackling like paper fed to a fire. Chambers could feel the strain smoking off them as they imitated the world like a wallpaper hiding his thoughtstuff.
Chambers knew what an Incog was, but had never seen one in action. The Guilds had made it a hard time felony to be caught with using such a construct. Only one single Guild–was it Ori-Thaum or Sanctus–had the intellectual rights to make em, so it really wasn’t that easy to just pick off any random street squire’s Metamind anyway.
Seeing his own shivering mug looking back at him from the reflective faceplates of the approaching enforcers, Chambers stepped to the side and hid. He pressed himself against a gap of wall–a lip separating two crackling phase cages packed full of crates and rusted implants.
The enforcers just walked past him. Their kit-bashed exos hissed and screeched, a crude amalgam of reused parts, servos catching and pulling against internal rust. One had a sweet koi holo-tagged along a triple-stacked pauldron. He should have modded his old rig.
Clanging and stomping, they walked down ignoring everything–past even his open cell. He held his breath until they crossed the next intersection. It was like he wasn’t even there. Invisible.
Chambers blinked.
Shit, if he could use this phantasmic at will, there was no telling how much good shit he could steal.
+Keep going. Almost there.+ A distance appeared under the arrowhead. He only had fifty feet left to travel. Ten clouds of thoughtstuff greeted him, each of them a buzzing hive. The ghosts leashed to his mind told him what they were, let him sense the raw violence they yearned for.
“Ghouls!” Chambers said, eyes widening as he choked back to a whisper. “You’re–you’re sending me to where they’re hiding the ghouls? What are you going to do? Open the cells and let ‘em eat me?”

This was coincidentally the scenario Dannis Steelhard experienced in Soft Masters: The Second Coming. Well, not the exactly same scenario. The ghouls in that one were only interested in eating a part of him, and could practically pick a lock with their long, sharp–
Something snapped behind his eye, the left this time. “Ow! Fuck! It’s like your scooping shit out my brain using a fucking ladel made out of dog teeth.”

+Think about Dannis Steelhard again and I remove him. Permanently.+


Chambers tried not to think about Dannis Steelhard and immediately failed. “Shit.”

A flood of barely contained violence spilled over from the voice. They were thinking of… of eating his eyeballs. Chewing on the optical cords inside while he writhed.
Chambers frowned. Now that was a very specific fetish to have.
Resuming his trip forward, Chambers arrived in front of the phase gate containing the ghouls. He winced at the sight of them, and despite himself, felt pity well up.
They were all slumped over, lookin all sickly and starved. Stick thin and breathing hard, the subhuman cannibals had taken to feasting on each other, each sporting bite marks and missing pieces of flesh. Usually, when that happened, the ghouls would just eat each other, but Necros were usually pretty good at twisting their minds into submission.
Something about in-built compliance toward obeying ghosts.
Staring into their blank, twitchy black eyes, filth-rotten claws, Chambers shook his head. Even their fangs were cracked, serrated from gnawing at the plasteel of the walls. They looked nothing like the things that tore his father apart, towering monsters that ripped the half-strand to shreds in front of him like it was nothing.
Those ghouls were awesome, glowing bright skin, claws and fangs a bloody blur. Real nightmare fuel.

These ones should have been put to death. Used in the Crucibles. Something. This was just…
***


Waste.
As much as sharing a synonymous thought with Chambers disgusted him, Avo concurred.
Of the ten, maybe only two looked still usable in form, and that was if Incubi hadn’t subverted them already.
The enforcers on the level were all compromised, Specters patrolling every floor interlinked to at least one subverted mind, which in turn was bound to a major lobby. In the time it took him to prepare, the Incubi had not been idle themselves.
He had underestimated the usefulness of this Incog. Though it exacted an immense drain on his sequences and effectively crippled his wards while active, he would have been exposed immediately without it. Manually pruning the traps and blinding the Specters the Incubi left stationed within Chambers’ mind took him more time than he liked, even using his cognitive assets.
Accessing the local locus took some time, as well as one of the drones Draus still had circling the block as a jumping off point. Using heightened processing, he was able to spoof through from the outside. Skipping across aeros and riding his Whisper with the bulk of his sequences, he managed to make an approach timed to Mirrorhead’s movement patterns.
Right now, with the chaos unfolding and the mass traumas that the Syndicate Necros were experiencing, he had a window. Mirrorhead was now walking amongst his peons, surveying the catastrophe unfolding, and with every threshold of reflectivity he crossed, the Incubi’s defenses went silent, wary of drawing his notice.
Using the disruption as a cover, Avo had sought out Chambers again to reclaim his asset–and gain additional ones.
No ghosts lingered in the minds of his brothers. The Incubi likely considered them a waste. In most circumstances, Avo would have agreed, seeing as they were trapped in this box.
Silencing the phase gate, he cast into the two ghouls he deemed yet salvageable. One would serve as his next conduit and shield. The other would serve as a second chance if the first failed.
GHOSTS: [387]
Infusing all the ghosts needed to maintain the sequences of an Auto-Seance, Avo burned the benefactor’s session into the first ghoul’s mind and left it dormant for now. With a thought, he cast his phantasmal reach and bent its memories into his desired shape. It needed to be ready to connect Avo to the mystery agent soon.
“Uh, guy in my head?” Chambers said pointing at the stomping encroach of half a dozen enforcers. They had just entered the holdings from the entrance far down the corner. Good. Avo had hoped something like this would happen. It would serve as a better lure to draw out the Incubi. “We got incoming.”
Avo did not accelerate his mind this time. No. They would just jack out and entrench further in the grid they were setting up. He needed his foes to be thrown off guard to achieve the desired ambush. In some respect, he was copying their strategy, feeding their confidence and drawing them toward an unseen trap.
+Hide.+ Avo said, placing a marker within the phase cell. He jumped from Chambers to mount the mind of the ghoul, the connectivity of his Metamind stretching to accommodate the hop.
Chambers, to his credit, was remarkably willing to enter a cell filled with ghouls. A flash from the man’s childhood greeted him, the sensation of repeated trauma earned at the hands of a screaming drunkard–all made better when the man was destroyed by claw and fang.
Was there a word for anti-trauma? Such was the closest thing Chambers seemed to feel when lingering around the ghouls.
As he activated the phase gate and sealed the former enforcer in, Avo urged his new puppet to move forward, to round the corner and face the enforcers.
Shivering and staggering, his brother obeyed, struggling to walk forward. Straining against malnourishment and its own weight.
+Won’t be long now,+ Avo said, whispering notes of certainty to it.
“Yes,” the ghoul growled. “Yes, Master.”
Avo’s mind went black.
The ghoul rounded the corner and slowed to a halt before a wall of enforcers, their titanium-bulwark bodies twitching to a stop.
“Escap–”
Of the eleven enforcers standing before him, none had wards worth regarding. He accelerated momentarily and unleashed his traumas as a torrent. He refrained from using the Secondhand Fatality, seeking to draw Incubi’s attention rather than unmake a few fragile minds.
From the depths of his new labyrinth, his phantasmics came aglow, crackling with flowing lightning as ghosts surged through the weave of his sequences. Slipping free from the jagged cleft that was his Metamind’s opening, the trauma poured forth, its structure a chimera between a tidal wave and a storm.
Wards buckled and broke. Servos screamed as enforcers slammed into one another. Augmented bodies impacted against walls, denting and collapsing in percussive beats, knees meeting the ground while hands clawed at their metal-caged skulls. A stray shot went wide. A clean needle-shaped wound opened in the wall next to the ghoul, the auto-aiming ghosts in the enforcer's gun also shattering, spewing fragmented memories as it stopped functioning.
Again and again, he lashed at them, his ghosts edged with torment and regret whipping into and through the wailing enforcers. As thought-offal oozed free from their mental wounds, Avo slipped out from the ghoul and approached, his speed still baseline, taunting as he tried to draw them out.
In the corner of his vision, his DeepNav registered Mirrorhead making another transition, drawn down by the affliction the Necros were suffering on this level. Twin sessions then flashed within the mind of one of the more stable enforcers, the gleam of Quicksand wards greeting him like the glint of an alleyway dagger striking light.
Good. Everything was collapsing where it needed to.
With a single command, Avo activated the Auto-Seance session within that Mirrorhead used to contact the benefactor. At once, a tunnel of ghosts manifested, the fire nu-dog tree lightning sequence forming the bridge connecting the Avo and the unknown Necro.
The mysterious monotone of their voice spilled free just as Avo cast the first trauma at one of the Incubi emerging in front of him. Praise the Quicksand, the ward was an excellent build, but they really should diversify.
He watched as his trauma struck against their fortifications, and as they lanced weaponized ghosts back at him, he sank back into the mind of the ghoul housing the session, housing an opening linking Jhred Greatling to the benefactor.
As the latter’s wards flashed fully inside the ghoul, the benefactor’s confusion spiked, offering a first and only response. +Mirrorhead? Is there–+


The first trauma exploded against Avo. His wards shook but ignited and hardened.
COG-CAP: 33%
The next five broke and bounced off against him, uncycled traumas shattering like glass against his adoptive wards.
And before a sixth could strike him, before Incubi or the minds connected to the newly activated session could adjust to the situation themselves, Avo jacked out, the last thing registering on his cog-feed a trauma plunging past him, impacting the benefactor in his stead.
COG-CAP: 35%
+Mirrorhead? Is there–+
-Last recording of Mirror-Convex
9-22
Garden of Burning Lies (II)
Avo wallowed in sublime pleasure. Something was thrilling about shredding delicate threads of conspiracy through the force of trauma and raw brutality.
It didn’t truly matter to him if the benefactor was working in tandem with the Incubi, or if they were a solo act operating against them. They were helping Mirrorhead with a planned assassination, and that implicated them enough.
Leaving the deep dive for but a instant, he injected himself back in through Chambers’ session and came out with his Whisper cast at the ready. His Heaven and Celerostylus were thrumming a dissonant flow of calm through his mind. He saw the exchange of fire then: the last shots of weaponized ghost patterns flicking pieces of memory out from the benefactor’s hardening wards, the Incubi themselves halting, confused with regards to just who they were shooting at.
Good. Only he possessed a bird’s eye view of this calamitous mess, and only he possessed the celerity to seize the moment, to fire and weave between traumas exchanged.
Chaos as his mask, he dove back into the carnage, falling upon the benefactor from behind, Ghostjack screaming with the Secondhand Fatality primed and spilling free.
Like a javelin, he slashed into the mind of the screeching ghoul and deeper still, punching through the foundations of the creature’s ego and cleaving at the mind of the human tethered within strands of memory.
The fissures of the benefactor’s wards lay beyond waters of brutalized thoughtstuff, and so, within this collapsing temple of thought, Avo speared a blade of his design into the clefts of wounds already made.
Skill revealed itself in instances such as these, and the benefactor proved themselves no gutter-Necro as their defenses cracked, but held. It took cycling over to Lucille’s Regret followed by three more shots before something broke in full, and with the implosion of the Quicksand Sync-Trauma, Avo watched as fragments of Lucille’s face slashed past him, ringing against his armor as well.
COG-CAP: 44%
From a hewn mind flowed the waters of confusion and disbelief, still a moment behind the staggering assault. The events must’ve been truly chaotic from their perspective, minding their own business one moment, then getting a session request from Mirrorhead the next.
They must’ve expected more questions. More inquiries. A follow-up to how the last session ended.
Instead, they found a nulling.
Life in New Vultun offered no end to its surprises.
Avo sequenced his weakest trauma and fired twice more. Both lashes of synaptically infused lightning cleaved out with a shift of thoughstuff. Broken sinews of memories tore free in coiling strands from the inner mind of the benefactor. Terror gushed like blood from a slit artery.
Enough of their mind remained to know the end to come, yet not enough coherence remained to stop it.
To be trapped in one’s mind as it collapsed in on itself was horrifying. It was also the first collection of memories Avo recorded from the shattering mind of the benefactor.
DOWNLOADING TRAUMA-PATTERN [BENEFACTOR’S DREAD]
What followed was the immediacy of looting. Whatever inner memories remained undamaged, Avo siphoned. He plucked strands and sequences free. He would have taken more phantasmics too, but his time was short and the benefactor was a professional–much the same way Avo had trapped his own mind, the enemy had also primed their mind against intruders.

Only critical memories were to be claimed. All else could be abandoned.
It would not be a great loss. He merely needed enough to put together whatever lay past the last few layers of Mirrorhead’s wardings.
After plucking a few hundred sequences free, Avo cast the path of his perception outward and found the Incubi halted. No trauma patterns. They were frozen mid-attack, seemingly unsure what to do next.
It would take a moment of a major shock to unbalance the Incubi so.
A Ghostlink request came through, reaching out through the Nether from one of the Incubi’s. Ah. Well, there were only so many reasons that could compel them to do such a thing. The link stretched out slowly with the crippling of time. Avo took a moment to check his DeepNav.
Mirrorhead was moving again. He would be down any second.
That was fine. Avo could work with a second.
Inching out using his Whisper, Avo intercepted the link meant for the benefactor.
GHOSTLINK ACCEPTED
+Conve–+


Avo unloaded a trauma directly through the connection. He felt their mind shatter against the interior confines of their wards, a splash of compressed thoughtstuff bursting free like a geyser, mushroom atop their halo.
As their ego was obliterated, Avo dove through the collapsing link and occupied the mind space the Incubi once did. He would have a mere heartbeat to complete his next act of subterfuge, so soon was the connection to collapse.
And so, the opportunity was seized.
Ultimately, he just wanted one of the Incubi alive to draw memories from. The others were better nulled. It impaired his duties far less to engender such a situation.

Firing at the last remaining Incubus he could detect–Avo tore at their wards with a rotation of three patterns. Each struck the same place in rapid succession, the reaction of the Incubus’ mental fortifications going from flicker flame, cracked immolation, and shattering embers.
An ethereal wail echoed through the Nether, resonating and bouncing off every mind present. The last Necro was not fully nulled. Damaged. Shattered. But not fully broken. Good. This was optimal.
The bridge collapsed and Avo fell back into the ghoul, sinking into the mental gore oozing from the broken remains of the still-connected benefactor. Again he dove, now towards the screaming mind, and this time he squeezed through a flayed gouge of thoughtstuff, inching closer to the Incubi’s inner mind.
He did not waste sifting through the contents of their thoughts either. Mirrorhead was close, having transpositioned himself through the glass across the hall, a scant fifty feet away. Using Lucille’s Regret as a blade, Avo cleaved sequences free, the same way he did to the benefactor.
A howl of torment sputtered wetly from the Incubus’ mind. Their thoughts were shapeless, though the waters of their emotions continued to run hot. Whatever sapience dwelled within them, it had been pulverized back into pure bestial instinct. All the Necro wanted to do was live, but short of possessing a Frame or a full-spectrum phylactery with memory backup, they would be enduring the rest of their short life trying to remember how to control their own bowel movements.
After stripping much of their inner memories clean, Avo switched his traumas again. Two shots followed. Channeling the first into a gust, shredding the Necro he just nulled into specks of thought. Checking again for the third Incubi, he made sure he was alone before he activated the Chambers’ session again and reset his Nether anchor. Diving out, he ejected a single sequence from his Ghostjack–deliberate evidence left of the benefactor’s presence into the wider Nether.

Then, he unleashed his ghosts in a torrent and unmade presences of ghoul and benefactor both.
Avo watched his brother collapse, hollowed of thoughtstuff. There was no hint as to what stopped its brain activity. It was simply clawing at its face one moment and then slumped over unmoving the next.
The broken Incubus Avo left as was. Mirrorhead needed to discover the traces of his “saboteurs,” and it was so a mere second later as the Syndicate Godclad arrived in a blur, light blending off Mirrorhead’s fractured form as he jumped from reflection to reflection.
Good. He would notice the mess that had been left behind, and that would spur him undoubtedly to contact the benefactor again. Only this time, Avo would be behind both the session and within the Syndicate boss’ memories.
This was a feat of Necrojacking in the making.

Loathe as Walton would regard the sheer ruination it took to bring these events into shape, he would have been proud.
Proud.
Did the man’s pride still really matter?

Shaking off the consideration, he activated his Incog again. Warnings flashed through his cog-feed and Avo growled as he found himself forced to deactivate his wards. Something was making his trauma climb up–probably a piece of the benefactor’s wards–and he would need to sequence it out from his Metamind before things returned to stability.
A thought occurred to Avo that he didn’t even truly need traumas to attack with the Quicksand–he could start using it in sync with his Whisper as a shield bash, it would functionally be a blunt instrument after it adapted from the first collision.
Not nearly as efficient, but something to keep in mind.
ACTIVATING INCOG
ALL TERTIARY PHANTASMICS DEACTIVATED
Casting a final thought out to deactivate the phase gate, he sent a command into Chambers’ mind and laid out new waypoints in the DeepNav, directing the former enforcer toward the quarantine section of the block.
Chambers was useful in the meantime as a key asset. Avo just needed to keep him alive. The man was expert at accessing the block from a place unknown to Mirrorhead–a place of hazardous mem-cons that could be re-harvested toward further use.
With how crippled the Necros of Conflux were now, and depending on how many Incubi were still in play, Avo’s influence had either grown immensely: Or just become absolute.
Watching as accretions denoting the positions of enforcers held in place through the DeepNav, he realized Mirrorhead had halted them to keep the mem-cons from spreading. A clear path was open for Chambers’ escape.
As the ex-enforcer fled, Avo felt a tide of rage tear through the Nether, thousands of ghosts splashing free from Mirrorhead in a torrent, staining the atmosphere with the color of red, the color of violence.
Oh, but the situation had turned out better than Avo could have imagined. If nothing else, being able to usurp the position of the benefactor via the session offered a goldmine for Avo. What he lost in terms of potential knowledge was gained through an increase in control.
That, and the fact no one knew it was actually he who enacted all these deeds. On the account of the Incubi, if there were even any survivors left, it must’ve seemed a mistake in the cog-feed. They had nulled either one of their own or someone they didn’t expect at all. Moreover, the subsequent breaking of their minds must’ve seemed like a friendly fire incident as well.
There was little chance he would be discovered this way. Yes. The havoc he inflicted more than atoned from the sloppiness that led to his earlier nulling.
Chambers made a noise like a frightened animal as every surface–regardless of matter–capable of bearing reflections shattered around him. Far behind, Mirrorhead bellowed in a cry of guttural rage.
***
After leaving Chambers safely deposited behind a sealed section of the block, Avo jacked out from the enforcer’s mind and dove back into his own.
Time blurred as he worked through the spoils of memory he gained from this most recent dive.
Chaotic as this was, the results spoke for themselves.
Sequencing out a good three thousand or so hidden trauma loops, Avo integrated new strands of memory into his Meta, and found himself enlightened to the true purpose behind the Incubi’s operations.
Draus was right regarding her theory: the benefactor and the Incubi were in league, and the revelation of their operations was purposeful. They were trying to get Mirrorhead to fold to the benefactor’s suggestions. What these suggestions were, annoyingly, was lost during the encounter, but enough remained of other memories that Avo could muster a guess.
The initial team was only a shaping group. They were present to maintain controls and subtle infrastructure in the Nether, keeping Mirrorhead alerted only to details they deemed acceptable. The benefactor went by the title of Mirror-Convex, operating as the primary point-person for the dive and go-between for each of the squads.
So then, the ones Avo engaged were a strike cell brought in after he nulled one of the shards. To his satisfaction, they were just as confused with his presence as he was with theirs, none of them expecting nor preparing well for this engagement.

Of the three formerly assigned to the cell, only one Dagger–deepname Dagger-2–had made it out, and they had sustained severe memory damage from the nulling.
Putting all that together, it meant that the Mirror-Concave–the overall director in charge of this dive–had no one to interview and was going to have to figure out just what happened to their strike cell and Convex-Necro.
Avo did not envy such a task.
Other memories flowed in as broken pieces, but the real prize among them was part of a sequence that matched the encrypted memories he had stored in his head. Using the fragment of mind he procured, Avo used his Ghostjack and fashioned a crude key, accessing the memories previously locked.
And such was when an order most unexpected was revealed.
OBJECTIVE ALPHA: ENSURE THE DEATH OF AMBASSADOR VALHU KITZUHADA AT THE HANDS OF JHRED “MIRRORHEAD” GREATLING
OBJECTIVE BETA: ENSURE THE DEATH OF JHRED “MIRRORHEAD” GREATLING AND THE REPATRIATION OF HIS FRAME TO HIGHFLAME INSTRUMENT SANTANADO MONDELLES
Previously connected to that memory directive was a packet of mem-data connected to the ambassador himself; mem-lock sequences, personal information, FATE identifiers. All were lost during the nullings, but Avo could make up for that with his own skill.
A new question arose, however.
Why.
Why was Ori-Thaum attempting to provoke potential hostilities?
And why were they to hand the Frame back to an Instrument of Highflame?
“Fucking Ori-Thaum,” Draus chuckled, shaking her head as they stood gathered around a rounded table. Phantoms danced at the center, flowing from Avo’s Metamind as he illustrated all he discovered. “Always up to some shit like this.”

“Assassination of this profile is major. Could start a war.” Avo paused. “Heard it said the Guilds aren’t ready for another war.”

Draus scoffed. “Half-strands aren’t ready for a lot of shit. Ain’t gonna stop them from makin’ a run at it.”

Seated at the end of the table Kae frowned. “I–I think I remember… remember him…” She pointed at the face of Santanado ”Starsinger” Mondelles. The man was sharp of cheeks and possessed an impossible brightness to his eyes. Pale white highlights tinted his hair, and his skin was the hue of oiled caramel. What looked to be cybernetic circuitry crawled up the sides of his cheeks like roots, and in place of ears, he had two implanted capsules. “I… I might have uh–helped him adjust his Frame before. Sphere… Sphere Five, if I can… hard to remember.”

“It’s alright, Kae,” Draus said. She let out a breath. “Yeah. Santanado. There’s an out-and-open Meritocrat if there ever was one. Tell you this much: I ain’t never seen anyone hate the Chivalrics quite as much as he does.”

“Think he’s working with Ori-Thaum for… revenge?” Avo asked. “Political leverage against enemies?”

The Regular opened and closed her hands, the gesture a light expression of ambiguity. “Could be. Or he could know absolutely nothin’ about this, and they’re just doin’ it to incriminate him so they can get a godsdamned civil war started inside Highflame.”

“Things are that bad at High–Highflame?” Kae asked.
“Well. By the time I left a couple o’ ‘Clads from both sides were found ‘overloaded’ in some pretty suspect cases. There’ll be no outright war so long as the High Seraph herself’s around but… let’s just say the current Choir of Seraphs are mostly inclined to seein’ the Chivalrics put to pasture.” She grinned. “Them, a good amount of Instruments, and most the Regulars. Authorities are gonna get a purgin’ soon. Just a matter of when.”


Scanning through the memories again, Avo confirmed the Nu-Scarrowbur Summit was due in three days. It was a personal event hosted at the behest of the ambassador himself and was positioned at Nu-Scarrowbur honoring a decisive battle conducted on behalf of Stormtree against No-Dragon forces during the war.
The official theme this year was “rebuilding.” New pledges were going to be made on behalf of the Guilds involved in restoring the lives and infrastructure damaged during the war. Nearly two decades too late, but from what the proxy minds used by the Incubi knew, it seemed genuine.
Hosted within a fortress demiplane called the The Fire’s Height, the invitation list extended out to thousands of Massist dignitaries, while only a select few Saintists were invited. Among the names mentioned on the guest list, Avo found a suspicious absence of anyone listed under the Greatling name.
“It’s connected,” Draus said, pulling him out of his thoughts.
“What?” Avo asked.

Draus cast out her phantoms, showing a zoomed-out DeepNav of Nu-Scarrowbur. A red line linked a portal from the stormtree they saw in the Spine when hitting the Scalper knot for Rendsinks to another two Layers above at Light’s End. “The reason why Mirrorhead and Conflux got friction with the Scalpers. They was always planning to make a run on the district. He’s plannin’ to hit them through the old portal.” A pause broke her speech as a look of concentration came over. “It can’t just be Conflux. He’s gotta have more than what he’s got… they’ll just get slaughtered without golem support…”

Avo dug through the mem-data again and had his mind filter through any details about golems or additional military purchases made by Mirrorhead. Broken recollections answered him as shredded snippets of conversation replayed in his mind. So, possible confirmation without detail.
Not a problem. It was finally time to slip through the final five layers of–

His Auto-Seance sang. A chorus of ghosts blended together, and through their union, sequences aligned, linking and shifting to the pre-assigned specifications. Visual text flowed across the right of Avo’s vision as the session address manifested.
The session was connected to Kaswarg’s Grove–through the locus where Mirrorhead was contacting the now mind-dead benefactor. A call that now belonged to Avo.
“Mirrorhead?” Draus asked, not bothering to access her own private session for a peek.
“Mirrorhead,” Avo said. He clicked his teeth together and hummed in satisfaction. The pieces were coming together, and what was missing could be manipulated. “Going to answer. See what we can get.”

“Plannin’ to spoof your way in deeper?” Draus asked.
Avo grunted a laugh. “For a start.”
Sangeists x8 - 340,000,000 imps
Shadowcrawlers x8: 400,000,000 imps
Fulgerhunds x8: 300,000,000 imps
Micronuclear Warhead x8: 8,000,000
-Purchases Made by Jhred Greatling’s Proxy Identities
10-1
Within the Glass
+How long,+ Mirrorhead said, Even through the Nether, Avo could feel the hot breath of unsated rage. The anger coming from the Greatling clung, its bitterness clammy and sick. Losing control had brought a feverish quality to the man’s thoughts.
How pitiful. Jhred Greatling’s Frame was wasted on him.
Holding merely ten tons of blood in his sway, Avo considered the Syndicate boss’ question. At this pace, the conversation still ran fast enough to follow, but slow enough for thought as well.
Avo didn’t even need to sift through Mirrorhead’s mind to know what he needed to say.
+How long have you been in the ghoul?+
+How long have you owned that batch of ghouls?+ Avo asked, using a question to quell a question.

+You had no right–+
+Right?+ Avo asked, adding a mocking cadence to his tone. He modified his voice in the same fashion the benefactor had, but even more so, he had a backdoor into Mirrorhead’s mind. The mem-data betrayed Jhred before his thoughts could even pour over. +No. It’s not about right. It’s about keeping my investment secure. You know this Greatling.+
Combining that with the fact that Avo could accelerate and decelerate his reactions via how much blood was under his sway, and the conversation was clay to be molded.
In the back of his mind, broken chains of Mirror-Convex's memory flashed and fused into place, his Metamind filtering and adjusting for each word spoken playing the part of the benefactor. Of that which was nulled and unknown to him, Avo still possessed other options.
The worst case would be to lose the identity and worsen Mirrorhead’s paranoia. It would make the task of manipulating him harder, but Avo had enough assets close to the source.
The frustration within the Guilder swelled. Good. Anger made Mirrorhead sloppy, cut his focus out at the knees.
+I… said I would handle it myself.+ Mirrorhead spat. +That I didn’t need you and your… Stormtree allies assisting me.+
Ah. There was something the nulling had taken away. Mirrorhead thought the benefactor was associated with Stormtree. Made sense considering where they arranged the meeting, but there were blindspots in why the benefactor was ostensibly helping someone from Highflame. And how. Relations between the two Guilds couldn’t even be described as being poor. Not even in the vicinity.
A shame Avo had to play the part of the confidant. It would have been so delicious to shatter his prey’s ego right then and there. +Mirrorhead… If I didn’t handle your situation, how did you think this would resolve?+
A petulant snarl slipped free from the other man. The mask of control was slipping, and beneath it was the face of a hurt child raging at the world. A child incapable of ever avenging his mother. +I said I would have handled it!+
+And you could have,+ Avo replied, trying to instill as much humanity into his voice as possible. A shame the Binarist was infested with mem-cons. Without a phantasmic simulating and predicting the specific emotions he was supposed to be feeling at that moment, Avo grasped blindly. +But this isn’t about what we can do now. This is about what needs to happen. You’re out of time. Your sister is clearly–+

+I told you not to mention her!+ Avo paused, watching Mirrorhead’s anger spike to new heights. The shout came carried by ghosts swelling hot with steam and fury. Press more and he risked the Guilder losing control completely–possibly even ending the conversation. +You didn’t offer me proof last time. I will hear no more about her. No more.+
But Jhred Greatling had already revealed his wound. To react like a stung animal when the topic of his sister was broached presented numerous avenues paths of conversation for Avo to herd him.

Best to keep things simple. Uncomplicated.
+Fine. I trust that you know her best,+ Avo said. +However, there is the issue with the signing of the treaty–+
+The treaty…+ Mirrorhead said. Avo could feel the Guilder choking on a breath. As a ghoul and a Necrojack, human emotions were more understood than shared, but the sheer loathing Mirrorhead possessed toward his lack of control over his own life was an item of strange symmetry. +We’re not done talking about you breaking into my house!+
How stubborn. Avo sighed, imitating the low exhale resonating from the benefactor’s memories. +Ori-Thaum broke into your house. I cleaned them out for you, and in that, you have my apology. But we cannot wait; you must understand this. The matter I am helping you with–the matter that we both must see done cannot linger on any other. Ambassador Valhu Kitzuhada must die.+
When you mastered the nature of someone’s hate, it was easy to direct them away to new points of emotional tension. There were only two rules to talking with Mirrorhead: Jhred Greatling was never at fault; Ori-Thaum needed to pay.
With that primed, everything slid back into place.
The emotions within Mirrorhead spiked and then went flat. +Indeed. I do know. So. Next steps then.+ The quivering integers in the mem-data told Avo that the other Godclad was using ghosts to suppress his emotions. Likely something akin to a Morality Injector. +Do you have the ambassador’s location?+
That didn’t matter. Avo was never going to give Mirrorhead any actual memories connected to the ambassador. Zein and half the Guilds might have an elaborate show planned for this treaty, but Avo cared little for it. He just wanted to eat Jhred Greatling, and such a murder was best left in the dark, where he could take his time carving a vicarity out of his enemy, with the participants being he, Draus, and if possible, Essus.
Avo had promised the father a proper kill, after all.
+I’ll leave you the sequences in the locus. Two hours,+ Avo said. +However, there are additional details we must consider–+
Mirrorhead’s interruption came with raw impatience. +I’m still going to insert the same way. Are your Scalper assets ready? You said they were prepared to deal with Ripperjack.+


Such a statement didn’t surprise Avo, but it did slow his mind to consider the implications. From what he knew, the Scalpers were an obvious Stormtree-funded Syndicate. For the Incubi to outright decapitate its leadership would be like burning the property of an esteemed ally.
It occurred to him that he could use this. Leak it to someone in Stormtree and watch the tensions rise. The disruption to equilibrium would displease Zein, but again, her interests were not his. He needed to keep his mind open to creating new possibilities.
+Yes,+ Avo lied. +I’ll see to it that everything is put into motion–+


+Have them do it tonight,+ Mirrorhead said. There was a weight pressing down on the link, a pressure pushing down from Mirrorhead’s end like a mountain crumbling into the ocean. Tides of stress cast up waves of thoughtstuff. +The act… I will do it tomorrow.+
Avo couldn’t help but grin. The fool was practically marching himself into a fire made specifically for him. Still, the memories of the benefactor told Avo the dead spy was of the cautious sort even in character. He offered token resistance. +Are you sure? At the pace we are moving, it would be safer too…+


He trailed off deliberately, anticipating another interruption.
None came for two entire heartbeats.
+I need alternative ways to access The Fire’s Height if possible. I know the Layers themselves are too well watched, but provide me with… blindspots to the Exorcists’ Specters. Such paths will serve me sufficiently. And though haste is upon us, get one more of each golem pattern from the inquest I sent you, on short notice the force they would bring would go far.+
No "please"s, "thank you"s, or "if could you do it"s. Just orders.
It would be a pleasure to make a quivering ruin of the Guilder.
+Of course,+ Avo said, holding no intention of actually doing any of those things, +I will see to it that you get all you need to accomplish what we set out to do.+
Mirrorhead chuckled, the taste of his thoughts bitter. +You know, when you first came to me, I thought you were just another gutter-jack looking for a handout.+ An awkwardness entered Mirrorhead’s voice as he cleared his thoughts. +I… You’ve been helpful. Despite how you’ve… offended me. You’ve been helpful. More than anyone else.+
A show of sentimentality from a brutal tyrant. Avo felt like he just won the award for best slave. It made him want to take a bath in napalm.
+Our interests aligned,+ Avo said, soldiering on. +But the sentiment is shared.+ He winced. That sounded too much like something he would say. But gods was it annoying having to add so many pointless words in a sentence. +Return in three hours. I will have what you need by then.+

+Good,+ Mirrorhead said. He exhaled, and instead of calming, his thoughtstuff boiled more. Stress radiated from him like steam. +Good. I’m… going to see this done. I will return. I must prepare.+
And with that, the session went silent.

But the impromptu dive did not end.
Amping the tonnage of blood he controlled to the max, Avo activated his hidden session and leaped into Mirrorhead’s mind. Immediately, the weight of the Godclad’s woes hit him, the environment of the infiltrated Metamind a hail of falling hammers.
From their recent conversation, Avo could see the simulated tower of the Auto-Seance woven by a whirlwind of ghosts stretching over his smoking wards of the sixteenth and seventeenth layers. Sequences flashing with memories pulsed in the raw-red firmament, the false sky bleached crimson with unexpressed anguish.
Around him, ghosts and thoughts flowed at a languorous pace, and tapping into Mirrorhead’s perception, Avo peeked at where the Syndicate boss was going. He was stalking towards another reflection–one that he had made via a canon–carving glass into existence upon walls of former wood using distortions in the light.
There was another secret Avo had delayed too long to discover: The makeup of Mirrorhead’s Frame and Ontologics.
Traveling under the cover of internalized hatred and tumult made it easier for Avo to jump from one sequence to another. Checking Mirrorhead’s estimated awareness in the visual display, the Guilder was distracted more by the task at hand, of the decision to accelerate his long-planned revenge.
Regardless of what anyone wanted, Avo had no desire to see this ended at The Fire's Height. With all the Guilders in attendance, it would be wandering into a nest of violent Godclads.
It was with such a realization that Avo understood Abrel–Mirrorhead’s taller wiser sister–was right. This was a suicide run. Even if by some miracle he succeeded, to face what was likely millions upon millions of Guild-level forces using a moment of surprise, Syndicate fodder, and whatever else was still in reserve, wasn’t something to walk away from.

The deepers Avo sank, working with care to twin the memories necessary for the spoofing, the more he soaked in the sobering malaise bleeding from Jhred Greatling’s mind.
Mirrorhead wasn’t planning on coming back. This was solely about avenging his mother. About hurting Ori-Thaum and spiting Highflame–especially his father.
In a twisted way, the Guilder had been looking forward to his finale for a long, long time.
Sneaking through the sixteenth and seventeenth layers required a mix of timing and speed. Again, much of this was made possible by Avo’s newly imbued speed. The more he used his Heaven, the more he felt unable to return to the old ways, that sequencing at baseline seemed crippled. Broken.
But that was the mutilation that came with going from obsolete to apotheosis. For a Guilder that had only known promise and power, such was to be expected, but to give the blind sight and make them consider losing it again…
Mirrorhead did not know what he would be surrendering should he greet true death.
Suddenly, the Nether-lag spiked. Ghosts quivered and twisted around Avo, straining to keep him connected.
HOST AWARENESS: 3%
They were shifting across a twist in spatial reality. After a moment of evasion, Avo sank a ghost into the waters of Mirrorhead’s perception, accessing the world outside through the perspective of the other Godclad.
Around him, all was an expanse of twisting fractals refracting treads of curving light. Intriguingly, Avo found himself able to see through each brightened shard of glass, his perception jumping from conduit to conduit, like light striking a point of symmetry expanding his network of awareness.

Avo was unsure what domain was in effect for the canon on display, but if he had to guess, it appeared that luminosity or light of some form was allowing for these effects. He took special care to keep a special sequence of this memory. Kae would need it later when examining the Twice-Walker’s capabilities further.
Ahead, an archway formed, with broken sheets of glass intersecting and melding into a reflective surface. From the wings of the Twice-Walker shone forth a coruscating radiance that painted brushstrokes of color and shapes into another place.

Features to a new location flashed into shape. Narrowing from the eldritch leviathan, a dollop shot free from the titanic form as Mirrorhead collapsed the mass of the Heaven back within his Frame.
The entire process felt disquieting, as if reality was being stretched no longer. Something occurred to Avo then: It had been some time since his wards groaned before the gaze of another Heaven–against the naked form of a god.
Was he somehow acclimating? Or was it just an attunement, his own increasingly eldritch nature parting him from the trauma of beholding another of its kind?

Such questions slipped from his mind as surprise widened a leak within his thoughts.
Riding as an unknown passenger behind Mirrorhead’s eyes, Avo found himself in a shadowy domed structure. No doors or portals of any kind greeted this place beyond, only curved ceilings and flat walls made of glass.

Three hundred loci signatures populated his visual feed, drones flying to and fro, all connected to a central memory matrix. Ghosts flooded the darkness here, a near twenty-thousand in number by the estimates of Avo’s Metamind. Through them, neon phantoms danced and simulated a miniaturized version of the Sovereignty itself, with a spectral line connecting the Conflux megablock from Mazzo’s Junction in the Spine to Nu-Scarrow at Light’s End.

Additional glowing waypoints lined the stormtree rooted at the heart of the Scalpers’ district, and the passages through Layer Two and Layer One.
With a wave of his hand, Mirrorhead’s Metamind rippled. Commands spilled free, washing over all the ghosts from the final and innermost layer. Phantasmal mass built within the Syndicate boss as countless ghosts took root within him.

There was a strangeness to the moment. It was as if Mirrorhead’s body was a trunk now reknitting with the rest of the tree, branching off elsewhere.
And suddenly, as a flash of light ignited within Mirrorhead, the space around them changed again, like a facade collapsing. The glass around them shattered.
And then, there was light. The sunshine of a holographic sun.
Avo found himself frozen by sheer aesthetic whiplash. Banished from a sterile chamber encased in glass, phantasmal neon, and darkness, this place was its antithesis.
Beyond the expanse of a smooth reflective pier, a small wooden bridge extended out in front of him to a tropical island that crowned the dancing tides. Foaming waves lapped over golden beaches. An impossible collection of trees, nu-birds, and drones formed a perimeter as if awaiting Mirrorhead’s approach.
And there, bobbing atop the softly swirling waves on magnetized platforms, were thirty-two signatures. Thirty-two signatures from thirty-two loci chambered within thirty-two different combat platforms
It took him finally noticing one of said platforms was a Sangeist to realize the rest were golems as well.
+Treaties. Always with the treaties and the posturing and begging. And for what?
Peace? Peace is a lie! We all know there will be blood in the end, sisters to be, we all know! But our “allies” seem to have lost their cocks prematurely.
Remind me again, because old Pragma gets to forgetting sometimes: Who won the last war? Who won? Was it the Massists or Saintists?
Don’t give me that rust-shit about damages or lives lost. That doesn’t matter. I’m talking about Souls claimed. I’m talking about Frames taken–Sovereignties captured.
Who won?
Did Highflame win? Did I misremember that half-ont Greatling sow screaming her lungs out for half the city to hear? Like she didn’t have it coming–like the Golds weren’t peacocking like a godsdamned pack of gleamers when they let the fucking Sang detonate their Fleshweaver plagues into our districts, pour their rash-cursed spores into the air.
Nine billion stillbirths. Nine billion. Not even the vatborn spared. And then the rash. The rash sisters.
Think of this: Aside from the castrates from the Thousand Plains, who else has the means to bend blood and flesh into abominations? Who else!
I–I know I’m rambling but I cannot stomach this. I cannot bear this!

Peace? Fuck peace. We’re not finished here. We’re never going to be finished. Not till every last Saintist fuck is dead! Dead! Dead!
The Ori are glassjaws. Fine. I get it. Old Pragma gets it. Their lives were nice. They got to live on sunny, happy little Uuvako–their pretty island chain undisturbed. Got to mine their corpse crystals and trade them to outsiders. Messing with their minds to get better deals and avoid wars.
But while they were having a fun ol’ time in the sun, some of us had to fight, and bleed, and struggle to stand. Even steel broke in the Skuldvast. Even steel.

So, Ambassador Kitzuhada says peace? I say war! War! Fucking war! Leave peace for transcendence, because right now, there isn’t an existence big enough for all us…+
-Pragma das Ench, The Moon’s Edge, Stormtree Extremist Propaganda Thoughtcast
10-2
Death of the Ideal
Drooling, hunger, and delight blended within Avo. A quick command to his Metamind was required to contain any spillover of emotion.


Thirty-two golems. Thirty-two Heavens. Thirty-two new branches to expand his apotheosis.
A scoff sounded from the Woundshaper, its attention fixed on but a select class of golem. “The focus, to me at least, is clear master. We must build strength upon strength. Raise the tower already risen. The others are… acceptable, perhaps, but it is unwise to trade the reach of a branch for the hairs of a new root.”
Like Kae said. Tower or sea: The divide of Ontological builds. Of course, with the uniqueness of his Frame, Avo just might find himself able to walk both paths.
As the initial rush of gluttony faded, confusion joined his elation.
Conflux was sparse of golems. Sparse of numerous resources–even for a gutter crime Syndicate. Meanwhile, Mirrorhead had well over a dozen in his personal inventory.
Lessening the tonnage of blood, Avo felt the flow of time increase as Mirrorhead began his slow trek across the boardwalk. The water here bubbled and swirled with eye-catching oddness, the waves sloshing back and forth as if this place–or plane–was tilting in random directions.
Details came through via Phys-Sim. Numbers and movement vectors charted impossible paths for baseline reality to manifest; the water was circling the island, the trajectories painting a new simulation into Avo’s mind.
Dimensionally, this location was more a sphere than a flat plane. In function it worked similarly to Zein’s demiplane, wrapping in on itself. Only without any visible temporally altering miracles at play.
Slithering into Mirrorhead’s outer cognition again, Avo surveyed the island before him.
On first glance, it seemed real enough. The first thing to break the masquerade was the sun. A phantasmal, shape-shifting sun that went from being a perfectly normal imitation of the daystar, to the shape of a cartoonish duck.
Connected to a central locus buried beneath the sand, the star morphed several more times, each to the form of an animal. Nu-dog; nu-cat; hippo; duck. After repeating the sequence, it would default to being a normal sun again for a few moments and start over.
Through it all, there was a juvenile quality to its design, with the eyes of the animals far too big to be natural, and their cuteness exaggerated to a level of edible unpalatability.

Such was quite a feat–it took a lot to confuse a ghoul’s instincts so much it was no longer sure if it wanted to eat you.
Patchworks of tall ivory-white palm trees glittered with crystalline enamel under skies of false-blue. Beneath them, small mechanical crabs played jingling lullabies as they skittered to welcome Mirrorhead. Overhead, more traditional drones circled the sky, their bodies diamond shaped and armed–with single-shot gauss harpoons installed at their core and micro-missiles at the side.
Scrying at the mem-data they were transmitting, Avo felt his mind lurch to a halt. He had his Metamind play back a line of information.
A-12 MINIATURIZED NUCLEAR WARHEAD DETECTED
Well. Those were priority targets for spoofing. Zein had taught Avo about all the fun that came with nuclear explosives. Aside from diving into the subreality of wind using his Galeslither, his means of avoidance were few. Prevention was the better method anyway.
The sand of the island shone like gold. It might actually be gold. Before he could study it further, Mirrorhead halted at the edge of the walkway, gaze drifting past the neat arrangement of trees to stare at what looked to be a marble figurine of two individuals frozen in a moment of play.
The statues were human-sized, with the larger lifting the smaller beneath the arms in a motherly embrace. For seven heartbeats that followed, Mirrorhead just stared, his forlorn heart hollowing his mind of stray thought. Within the Metamind, ghosts caught fire, sparked by the intensity of his melancholy.
For all the Guilder’s power, for all his Heavens and influence, he just couldn’t remember the face of his mother.
The pain tore soul deep.
Seizing the opening of Mirrorhead’s festering trauma, Avo copied the sequences to structure a new instrument for the future. Something he looked forward to wielding against Mirrorhead later. To be struck by pain harvested from one’s own mind left wounds deeper than most egos could withstand.

The fact that Mirrorhead could resurrect offered unique opportunities for experimentation as well…
DOWNLOADING TRAUMA-PATTERN [FORGOTTEN MOTHER]
From there, he slipped his reach beneath Mirrorhead’s, grasping out for all the loci around him.
Unlike the travesty that was Conflux’s N-Sec, all things connected to the Nether here were reinforced with ample protection. Each one ran something at least comparable to a Tortoise Omniguard–something that Aseleri, the dead slaver captain who sold him used to use. Bulky. Strong. A solid chunk of trauma manifested as a mass of faces petrified mid-scream into the shape of a gate.
Slipping past each ward was less than a trifle with each of the three categories of golems being bound to eight groups of three–one less than even a classic strike knot. All the more to Avo’s benefit. Copying over essential mem-data from key sequences, he planned to have Kae review the functions of the Shadowcrawler and the Fulgerhound. The Sangeist he was already familiar with and thought he had good odds against.
Installing a few changes within their structure to leave gaps for future intrusions, Avo did the same to the ghosts and other phantasmal structures present.
Herein lay the ultimate fault of Highflame Nether security–passive centralization. Wards could muster the metaphor of being a fortress at times, but thoughts and emotions were fickle. When two things blurred in a Meta, it took an attuned and aware mind to sort through the overlap.
Mirrorhead was not attuned. He was focused elsewhere. And these defenses, though useful against withstanding direct blunt impacts from crude traumas, were woefully deficient without a master guiding their ghosts.
It was only by the grace of Ori-Thaum’s twisted political interests that Mirrorhead was still stable of mind.
With thirty-two golems compromised and most of the drones under his sway–the mini-nuke drones specifically marked and separated from the rest–Avo sank back into the Syndicate boss, still standing in place.
Stuck.
It took the better part of three actual minutes for the Guilder to act. Yet, what followed surprised Avo. With a shrug, Mirrorhead stepped forward and free from his reflective shell–a blank mannequin of glass slipping loose from the man in the suit.
Soft. That was the first thought that passed through Avo’s mind as he found himself using the mottled glass to peer upon Jhred Greatling’s true visage. The years had carved new aesthetics into the Guilder’s features, but still, he resembled the boy playing within the memories Abrel accessed.
His time in the Tiers granted him luxuries few others could ever dream of possessing. A grafter had clearly perfected him in skin, sinew, and skeleton. Not a blemish touched his symmetric face, and his flesh practically shone with the glow of vitality. His bone structure was sharp in a similar way to Abrel’s, but he looked more vulpine than avian if a comparison to an animal needed to be made.
Something about the pointedness of his chin reminded Avo of Green River’s fox when it lowered its head to hiss.
Twin irises of soft white lit his eyes like lanterns at the heart of full moons.
More and more, the tastes offered by Mirrorhead teased Avo’s bestial nature. Everything within the ghoul screamed, braying for him to crawl his way out from the memories and into the real, into a place where it could rip, torture, and feed.
Topsider. It would be an exotic delicacy to savor Mirrorhead; to break open this stranger of decadence, a delight.
All this time, all this struggle leading to this moment. Worth it. It was all–
HOST AWARENESS: 7%
Avo packed in his hunger with a muted groan and sank deeper into Mirrorhead’s inner memories. The man frowned momentarily, wondering where the sudden peckishness came from.
The cooing breath of an unnatural breeze ruffled the feather-light sand. While the Syndicate boss walked, Avo worked, trying to press through the last few layers. The final few wards spun far faster than the previous ones, but with inner memories revealed, there were sluggish openings for Avo’s phantasmal agility to exploit.
The real issue was assembling the right recollections needed to bridge the hidden entryway.
Sand rose with each step. A command rippled out from Mirrorhead’s Meta when they were fifteen feet away from the statues, summoning ghosts to animate memories long past.
This close, Avo could see their design with clarity.
The disfigured face of a tall woman in a floral-shouldered sundress tilted at a beaming boy held high. Carved from marble, Avo beheld the scene before him for what it was: an idealization of the past, of childhood, lost and never to return.

Slowly, Avo's understanding emerged from the fogs of mystery. This place was a neverland. A playground for a boy missing his mother.
Diving out again, Avo accessed the locus of the island itself and filtered through its memories.
Confirmation came in seconds.
This demiplane wasn’t just a little refuge but a familiar retreat. One bequeathed from mother to son, and revealed to no one else.
Whatever could be said of the former matriarch of House Greatling, her love for her son clearly ran deep and true.
Staggering up before the eroded face of his mother, Jhred’s lip quivered as he struggled to master himself.
In that instant, Avo punched through the final layers of the Guilder's memory. There, he found himself standing before the burning heart of whatever Elysium Jhred grew up in. Even with it being the final layer, its stretch was vast with the legions of ghosts at the Guilder’s disposal.
Avo installed a new session here and slotted his Metamind to deconstruct and retract all the ghosts used for the one in the fifteenth layer after he jacked out.
With most of the systems around him subverted Avo decided to release some of his blood. Speed returned as time rushed back into pace. He wished to see what his victim to be would do now.


It was a cruel voyeurism being able to watch Mirrorhead suffering. Amusing it began with Avo saddled with the indignities of an audience for his suffering in the Crucible, and now it was Avo playing the role of watcher.
A response sang out from the ghosts tethered to Jhred’s Metamind. A stored sequence of memories summoned wisping whorls of ethereal wind, coalescing ghosts activating phantom functionality.
The ghosts stretched and phantasmal representation of the current environment around them overlapped their present reality
At once, scenes from days of yonder youth played. Phantasmal coconuts swung where none remained in the present. The sands were fuller then, like an hourglass yet to be turned. Through the tallness of the trees, a series of echoing giggles pealed as a tiny Jhred Greatling toddled on the beach.
Behind him, a distorted shadow of a woman followed, the outline of her form a mass of hollow scar stuff on his memory. A simulation of the person themselves was missing. If these moments were to be put to paper, it would be as if someone had cut her loose from every page.
A mind-stinging noise tore through the air. The ghosts wailed, unable to load what was spoken.
“Run, Jhred,” the Guilder muttered, playing the role of his own mother. He didn’t even seem to know what voice he wanted to fake. “I’m coming to get you.”
Avo had to look away from the memory of the child. The plumpness of the flesh was phantasmal, but needled at his hunger all the same.
Again, Jhred’s younger self laughed and hid behind the tree. If he was trying to hide, he was doing an exceptionally poor job at it. +Not gonna find me, mommy.+
Fascinating to see how the Greatling’s intellect had barely developed since then. Predictably, the miasma of unsimulated paleness suddenly teleported next to Jhred–who squealed in delight–and picked him up.
The pose in that instant was the same as that of the sculpture.
Digging through Jhred’s memories, Avo discovered the man had the moment recreated via an architecture drone repurposed toward the task of marble sculpting. Countless hours of work went into digging up how tall the mother was, her apparel, and her general morphology.
What remained missing was her voice, her face, her touch, her personhood.
To be forcibly withheld from the mind of someone you loved was a punishment most severe, and a torment most sublime.
All the other Greatlings had the last traces of her pruned. Only Jhred held on, even to her absence.
Only Jhred.
The simulation froze. Looking between the boy, face bright with joy with his marble copy made of stone, and the blank look of defeat on Jhred Greatling, now grown, it seemed a degeneration had taken shape.
Instead of rising with his apotheosis, Jhred clung to the past, stuck to what was lost. He did not grow. He refused.
“And so he will meet true death,” the Woundshaper whispered. “Gods ascend, and in ascension, widen. Bloom. Stillness is the path to fated demise. Know this, master. Know this.”
“I’m not afraid,” he said, lying. Stripped of his reflective shield, there was a softness to his baritone, like he hesitated to project force without the mask of his Mirrorhead identity protecting him. “I do not feel anything for this. I do not… There’s no more time. Abrel… she broke my h-heart…”

The first sob escaped from him then. He wrapped his hands around himself as he heaved, trying to keep himself together. “I won’t… I won’t believe that she betrayed me. I can’t. She’s family. She’s the only one that cared besides me… The only one.”

He turned to his mother’s absence. “Please don’t hate her. Please. She held on for as long as she could. But it got too hard. Everyone was so… cruel.” The blankness of her memory self was too much, so he turned to the marble instead. “I just want to know what your voice sounds like again. I just…”
Jhred Greatling sank down into the sand and wept. Deep as his voice was, he wept like a child, shaking with each coughing sob that escaped from him. He wept openly, kneeling by the statue as Avo watched.
“I’m sorry… I’m so sorry. I tried. I burned everything I had left. I tried–tried so hard. I c-can do it. I can kill him for you. I can still make this hurt.” Anger flared. And sizzled away into hissing nothingness as it came into contact with the ocean of his sorrow and was swallowed. “Oh, gods…”
Peering at Jhred Greatling’s weakness from the inside, a strange dread settled on Avo. A twist of something caught his attention, the shadow cast by the statues reaching out to him, forming the shape of a man in a long coat.
The scent of citrus stung at his memories. For a flickering instant, he saw him there: Walton stood, towering over the faceless form of Mirrorhead’s mother. Avo watched as his smiling father ran his fingertips down the missing face of the statue and then, using the same few fingers, repeated the action on his own skin.
The apparition vanished.
Avo shuddered.
Jhred sobbed, unaware of the second turmoil hatching inside him.
When Avo had been forced to null his father’s image, a break had opened within him.
Like no typical trauma, the hurt indelible and strange, it plagued the corners of Avo’s mind. And with each subsequent encounter, he felt himself being pushed further and further away.
Until now.
The epiphany came to him then. The death of idealization. This was freedom. Perhaps not absolute freedom, but freedom enough to decide his own path, his own destiny. In destroying the image–the idealization of his father–Walton had shattered one of the only fixations Avo had.

Unchained through mutilation, the path ahead belonged to Avo, and in beholding the nature of the Low Masters, the Hungers, control they had was atrophied at best. The wound had already been made on his spirit, and would not be struck twice to effect.
In destroying the anchor of his own perfection, his idealized self, Walton granted Avo a gift few would ever come to know.
Choice. Choice untethered. Choice unfettered.
And so, the ghoul stood while the Guilder succumbed.
Once again, Avo looked upon the shadow where he once saw his father. This time, there was no dread, only lightness. Only anticipation for what was to come.

Thank you, Avo said, offering words to someone long absent. But unlike Jhred Greatling, what dwelt in him was gratefulness and not pain.
Potentiate Draus has it. I recommend we pass her and boot the rest. We can assign her to a Suicider-Unit and accelerate her conditioning. Within a year, I foresee–
Sure? I’m beyond sure about her. Did you see what she managed to do that last assignment? Ha! It was beautiful. Never seen a trainee kill a nu-dog by lodging its own body down its throat, just kept stuffing until it choked. Pissed myself laughing at that, not gonna lie.
What about what? Murders? Who did she kill?
Ohhh. The incidents. But… does it really matter? They came back, right? They didn’t stay dead–
Well, did she do that to their bodies after she finished killing them? Before?
Ah. A bad habit. These things can be fixed–
Ah.
Yes.
Sorry, Higher, I didn’t realize you were criticizing–with respect, Higher, I still don’t see why the murders matter. They provoked her.
How? You saw how they were behaving–how they kept missing and hitting those FATELESS the last gutter evaluation. Combat Skins off in hostile territory as well. Shameful, really. Thank you for reminding me, I will need to write a report about this.
Favorites? [Laughter] Of course I’m playing favorites. She's my favorite because she's what we need. All that matters is killing the enemy with her, and by the dead gods is that rare.
Listen. Let me speak with candor: the Regulars are not some prestigious outfit to dump those who failed their Trials and won’t be getting a Frame. Those House-kids didn’t make it there, and they won’t make it here. There’s too much glass in them.
Draus… Me… We’re more weapons than people. When you aren’t willing to abandon the brittleness of your own… uh, fixations… All it’s doing is adding more work for our Necros with their little [Snort of laughter] traumas.
Just approve her. I have never chosen wrong.
-Commander Winston Nicoma, Highflame Regular
10-3
Deception’s Architecture
Avo left Jhred Greatling kneeling in the sand, gibbering like the child he was.
Enlightening as the moment was, the dagger wasn’t deep enough in Conflux, for there remained lies to weave and minds to twist. This sanctuary, infiltrated as it was, could be looted later. Checking his DeepNav, the ghosts offered only errors when he inquired about his location in the city.
Just as well. He would take this place from Greatling when he was done. This, and the rest of his Frame.
There would always be use for demiplanes, if only for storage.
The innermost realm of Jhred Greatling’s mind was a dim place glossed over by mist and shadow. An atmosphere of myth and lore clung to the air within his innermost palace like a tangible wetness, with towering structures shrouded by the rays of sunlight blunted off the mask of soft drizzle.
Glass remained a motif even inward. Flying mirror-bright blades drifted and shattered, the pieces fusing into new shapes intermittently under the sway of straying ghosts. Between buildings, ravines of traffic ran from street to sky, the touch of marble, gold, and metal outlined all in filigrees of resplendence shining through the haze.
The last thing of note–as always when it came to the Heaven-touched districts of Highflame–was the faint shimmer of dancing fire flickering at the heart of their shadows.
Pulling himself away from being too distracted by the architecture, Avo copied over all the critical mem-data Jhred held on his own Heaven, his organization, general knowledge regarding Highflame, details on his extended family, and the mem-key for a trigger-implant installed in the back of the Guilder’s mind.
A trigger implant for all the cortex bombs floating in the skulls of every Conflux employee.
Ah. Not something Avo enjoyed remembering.
Carefully, Avo edited all memories connected to the trigger’s activation. If Mirrorhead wished everyone in Conflux to drop dead, it would be hope instead of manifestation.
This also meant another thing: Essus was free. In fact, most of Conflux was free, but they were food for his Frame.
And it was with that hunger that Avo jacked out from Mirrorhead’s mind. While the Guilder wallowed in the past, Avo disappeared, sinking through the clefts of his updated session back into his own body.
He had a slaughter to prepare for.
***
Exiting the dive, Avo sequenced his memories into phantoms and fed them over to Draus and Kae. They studied the primer on Mirrorhead’s condition while he reviewed his next course of action.
With the Incubi bested or, at the very least, in hiding, he had an opportunity to re-establish his influence within the block. Of the thousands operating under the Conflux banner, the Necros were disabled and the Enforcers were more like an explosive defense grid than jackpoints of entry.
With the strike cell inactive, other options presented themselves to Avo, considering he had a few new sequences to apply along with new mem-cons to prepare.
Checking the DeepNav, Chambers was in position, traversing the waypoints up toward where the Blockcrawler was supposed to be. Warnings pinged Avo’s Metamind every few seconds while the former enforcer stumbled over collapsed walls and clambered up industrial chutes. Mem-cons were burrowing into Chambers’ cognition, but most of the warnings were for naught: Half these afflictions he already had, and the rest were instantly assimilated by those which already dominated his mind.
If anything, the added sequences and mem-data they provided would serve use for newer subversive constructs.
It was something he could work on while waiting for Chambers. Once in the Blockcrawler he could traverse the rubble of the inner confines of the building with better speed.
After that, Avo had to see about a promise he made.
The father had as much of a stake in Mirrorhead’s death as any of them. Perhaps even more, considering what was taken from him.
A low scoff broke his contemplation.

“Jaus,” Draus said, chuckling as she shook her head. The sight of Jhred Greatling on the beach was playing out via phantoms, and more than anything, she seemed insulted. “What a half-strand.”
Kae’s wince did not escape Avo’s notice. On the far edge of the table, her already fractured focus split further as the whimpering noises coming from Mirrorhead wrenched pity from her mind. Her sympathy only grew when she beheld the part with his mother.
Avo had given her details on the two newer golem models for her initial research and review. The EGI Core and the Elder Mythos volumes made her work exponentially easier, but still, the work strained her and she needed moments of reprieve.
Her vulnerability fascinated him more than it taunted the beast. Near baseline in flesh and maimed of mind, there was undeniable perseverance in her, to linger in alienation. Again, he wondered how things came to be for an Agnos to fall to the depths of the Warrens, to find herself among good company with a dishonored soldier and a monster sculpted for cruelty.
But this also seemed to be of her own choosing.
She didn’t belong here. It shone in her mannerisms, in the naked wound that was empathy and decency on her face.
The waters of her mind yet remained clear of judgment.
Ultimately, she felt for the boy that Jhred Greatling was no longer.

“D-draus,” Kae said, bothered by the Regular’s schadenfreude. “That’s… uh… that’s… a bit…?”

“Too mean?” The radiance dimmed down to embers on Draus face. She wasn’t laughing anymore, but her lips remained quirked. “Fuck his mom. She didn’t care when she got us killed. I ain’t gonna care when her sad half-strand son rains salt-piss from his eyes. She was a piece of shit commander, a piece of shit Godclad, and a piece of shit person. Fact she hugged her boy a few times extra don’t light the wick.”
Silence followed from the Agnos. She breathed out. “I… I'm the same–uh–same way about the Ori. The… the Incubi. I was–I was glad–glad that Avo h-hurt them.” She paused. “B-but after I still feel–feel…”

“Yeah,” Draus said, a slightly apologetic expression on her face. “Nothin’ wrong with you. I’m afraid,” She flicked a wry gaze and grinned at Avo. “ You're just in bad company.”

He let out a low hiss of dry amusement. Similar habits. Similar thoughts. Ghoul and Regular. Both killers. Maybe the gulf of their thoughts was closer than even he assumed. “Kae. Did you parse mem-data on golems? Mirrorhead’s Heaven?”

The Agnos perked up, startled. “Oh! O-oh! Sorry,” with a wave she pulled the phantoms bound to her fingertips back to full activity. He hadn’t connected her mind to the structure of the core for the damage crackling within her deeper mind, but the ghosts could heed tactile controls as well. Immediately, information began to flow across her eyes. Her brow knitted in concentration as she dove back into the work.
“Real slave-driver there, Avo,” Draus said. “Seems there’s a bit more of your father–or fathers–in you than I guessed.” The sudden urge to suckle out one of her eyes as a retort tempted. She hadn’t had the time to get new augments grafted so she was mostly organic there. Rolling her neck, a series of cracks rattled as she flexed her chitinous arm. “Alright. Thing’s gonna go down soon, right?”

“Yeah,” Avo said. “Soon. Sooner than I thought.”

“Best laid plans and all. Good thing is that he’s gettin’ forced. Bad thing is he’s makin' a hard run at Nu-Scarrowbur. We still got Exorcists and Paladins around since whatever mad-shit Zein’s cookin' up hasn’t gone off. I ain’t seen how well the Greatling boy fights but… less he’s packing a Sphere Five or higher in terms of his burn, it ain’t gonna go well.”

He grunted in agreement. “Suicide run. He’s not going to make it.” He paused and found himself careful of his next words. “Draus. Do you want to… operate. Outside?”

One of her eyebrows rose the barest of an inch. “Well. Keep goin’. How am I gonna do that with all the Specters drifting around?”

“Incog,” he said. He didn’t mention he procured it from one of the Incubi he nulled. Already, she was hesitant about altering the architecture of her mind. He didn’t want to risk incurring more resistance by him offering sequences from an Incubus.

She snickered a few dry, joyless notes. “Should I ask where it came from?”

“Depends. You want it?”


Her turn to hesitate now, but her beat was shorter than his. She took a breath in through her nose and waved him over. “Alright. Graft me.”

“Not really a graft. Sequence or install is–”

“Shut the fuck up and jack. But–” Her eyes went empty. She pointed an index finger at him. “Don’t take no memories of mine from me. We synced? Don’t even touch them if you can. You put the Incog down and you make like a thief and fade to dark.”

“Yeah,” Avo said. “Won’t change you.”

She snorted. “Right.” A shiver ran through her. A few twitches more followed thereafter. There was a tautness to her thoughtstuff. A strain. Her allowance had come with a struggle. Clenching and unclenching her fist, she let out a slow breath. “I’m trusting you, rotlick. Don’t turn this into a snuffin’.”

He guessed this made them consangs now.
Well, as much as two people like them could be consangs.
Extending out a tendril of blood to the ports beneath his Necrojack chair, he accessed his blood and flexed. As time slowed, he threaded his ghosts into her mind and watched as his link request flashed green across his cog-feed.
It felt strange. No need to spoof or null his way in. It was not a bad feeling, the invitation offered a reprieve for him as well. A recalibration from all that he had done. Not a bad guy at the door. A welcome monster.


Her palace–more like a war-torn fortress–was a far more intimate affair than his district.

Fire was traded continuously, flechettes threaded through the smoke and burners flaring like combustions in a sandstorm. Combat was constant and brutal, and along the walls, thickly-coiled light assault drones fired an endless surge of arcing electricity as vertical anti-air emplacements, lashing incoming missiles and aerial bombers beyond the range of baseline sight.
Out from the heights, Draus had eyes on four other blocks below. She had all her phantasmics close and compact, their presence simulated by weapon platforms and guns strewn about a ruined room.
The core of her Metamind was centered in the savaged remnants of an apartment cell. Part of the walls had been flensed clean through, exposing much of the interior to visual sight from the outside. Leaned against the edge of the shredded exterior, a heavy-kinetic sniper some seven feet long took up much the space in the room, while quick-fabbed plates of armor lined the insides—a makeshift endoskeleton to hold against artillery barrages.
Avo loaded himself into the room and released his Heaven to let time flow. Draus manifested behind him.
+War?+ He asked. The symphony of gunfire and explosions was constant. He wanted to ask her if this was a day she spent massacring his kind but he knew the answer.
Ghouls didn’t have air support. Always they were meant to be fodder by the Low Masters.
+Yeah,+ Draus said. She didn’t seem very interested in talking about it. He wasn’t going to press.
+Incog I have. Its sequence is the analogy of a sun. Could alter it to be smaller–+
+Sun’s fine. Nothin’ wrong with that. Just plant it and get this done, alright? I uh…+


+Don’t like someone else being in your head.+


+Yeah. Somethin’ like that.+
Installing the Incog into her wasn’t a major undertaking. All of her present phantasmics aside from her twin-layered Buckler wards–a pattern of defensive traumas Avo detested and struggled not to change due to how exposed it left one to spoofing–were dedicated toward improving her abilities as a soldier.
She had an infantry-specialized Phys-Sim; a Specter; a triangulator of some fashion; time-dilation adjustors paired with her Accelero implant; and an object-surveillance possessor bug.
This, and a dozen more small improvements made her a menace in mid-to-close quarters.

Even better, she was getting it to run with just three hundred and ten ghosts with plenty of sequences still unused. Quiet. Efficient. The Incog wouldn’t be overtaxed by any means.
Fusing the gleaming sun into shape, he activated it and watched as its light fell, a slick rain that obfuscated her Metamind against outsider awareness.
+So,+ Draus said. +I’m a ghost now.+ She laughed in the shining rain.
+Not fully. Won’t be noticed in most cases. Has limits though. Strains under passing perception. Stay away from crowds. Avoid being stared at. Don’t stay near Specters. All that will increase cog-cap. Last thing to deactivate are wards. Or the Incog. When sequence demands are too high you can’t have both. By that point–+

+By that point I’m fixin’ for a nullin’,+ Good. She understood. +Alright.+
+You can get your barge now if you like.+ Avo added.+Circumspect. Command aero with equipment. After, you lead. Nether will be compromised. Mirrorhead is compromised. Have access to his cortex bombs. Assaulting Conflux… Need to make sure he doesn’t escape. Don’t want him close to ascending either. Need to be fast, before too much attention is drawn.+
She nodded. +Nova. I’ll take a peek around the block. Nu-Scarrowbur too while we’re at it. I’ll dry-run us out some options soon.+
He grunted. +Good. Finally off snuff-the-ghoul duty. Must feel like a promotion.+
+Shit. I enjoyed snuffin’ the ghoul. Easy gig. Free housin’. What’s not to like.+
+Long increments between killings?+

+It’s just been a couple of days Avo, damn. We’ll get our slaughterhouse soon enough.+ She paused then. +Listen. You saw the father–+


+Essus,+ Avo corrected. +He’s alive. Still there. Going to go find him. Free him. He deserves a chance at this as well. For what he lost. What was taken. I promised.+
He ended the dive and exited from her Meta. Blinking away the yet-faded flashes of mem-data, he found Draus staring at him, a peculiar look on her face.
“You gonna find him through the uh… the rash-risk.”
“Chambers,” Avo said. “Yes. He’s still alive.”

“Does he gotta be?”

Avo checked the position of the former enforcer. He was close now. Eight feet away from the Blockcrawler. All he needed to do was climb through the last of the shredded air filtration channels running over several uncontaminated areas.
“Yes,” he said. “Need to keep him unsnuffed. For now.”


***
It didn’t take Chambers long to realize his piss-stick didn’t like being dragged against the cold, rusted metal of the fucking air tubes.
The godsdamned war really did a number on the block. Open beams of light threaded open wounds through even the filtration system. Light speared in like needles; damage-acupuncture for the entire block. With each hiss and thrust, he wormed along the space barely large enough for him to crouch through, his knees sore from the half-hour of sneak-shit he was doing.
“Why the fuck did I park that fucking shit all the way up here,” Chambers muttered. Shit was hard to remember–hells, his natural memory had never been all that good, and after Mirrorhead’s “examination” and all the seizures that followed, it was even worse.
“Half-strand voice-guy making me climb up this shit and not replying to me. Half-strand headaches making it hard to think. Half-strand Mirrorhead being a fucking–” Chambers froze after the words left his careless lips. A flash of something caught his attention. Ahead of him, a gleam of light hit the reflective shine of a shard of shrapnel–a piece of an aero’s bumper.
Reflexive terror clenched his guts. Ohshitohshitohshit.
Chambers looked into the murky translucence and choked on his own fear. Something was moving behind him–skittering up between his legs. Holding his breath and bracing for death, he expected the weird bullshit glass monster to get him.
But as he went rigid, so too did the movement, the shape suddenly going stiff in the murkiness of the metal, a few inches behind him as seen through the arch of his kneeling legs.
Meeping a note of pure terror, Chambers swallowed. Death didn’t come. However, he did hear a skitter–a squeak.
His senses returned to him. Mirrorhead wasn’t here. The mem-cons were active–entering and protecting Chambers. He was the sole walker of this place–the only one.

Maybe he should have a cool title like con-walker or something. You know. Like the Fallwalkers. But immune to mem-cons.
Maybe he was immune to the rash too?

A hissing squeak pulled at his attention as he heard what sounded like soft pattering skitters. The noise was familiar. Where had he heard that before?
Between his legs, a dark shape drew closer. A sudden tickle flicked down that which dangled.
Suddenly, the dread returned twice fold.
Another squeak followed.
Inching his head down, Chambers prepared himself for a fractal of glass pushing through his balls or something. Maybe even the monster pressed up against him.
What he saw was considerably less worrying.

Poking at his privates was a brown-furred, brown-legged aratnid, its rat-like body emaciated and weak. It was weakly prodding at Chambers’ sensitivity with a twitching palp. Hunger sang from its simple mind, and through its eight beady little rat-eyes, it blinked weakly at him as the puss of sickness leaked from its split mandibles.
“Jaus,” Chambers said, letting out a breath. “Hey, there little consang. You scared the fuck-shit out of me. I thought–”

A noise suddenly crackled loudly in his skull. +Chambers.+
Reactively, Chambers jumped in fright. He stood up and struck his head on the ceiling. Also, reactively, the arantid squealed and did what instinct told it to do.
It bit him.
It bit him where no man should ever be bitten.
The Ashen Digger is a No-Dragon variant of aratnid designed to inflict subtle losses to enemy personnel behind combat lines.
At a glance they are frail creatures, offering little in the way of their contemporaries like the nerve-splitting Spine Nester.
Such is because the Ashen Digger is built to function like a plague carrier. Self-fertilizing creatures, they possess the capability of directly injecting the eggs stored in their palps, upon which the young will begin hatching within twenty-four hours, thus increasing their population drastically.
Those who suffer bites from the Ashen Digger are recommended to dismember or replace the affected region entirely through thaumaturgic or surgical means…
-Nu-Beast Bestiarium, Idheim Digest
10-4
Dismantle
The depth of certain agonies was beyond the conveyance of even the most anguished of screams.
There were several things Chambers wanted to say to the chimeric creature currently wrapped around his most sensitive protrusion, the edged segments of its forelimbs slipping around the wrinkled perimeter of his skin, grasping him from the outside like a glove of pain as it bit and gnawed.
Torment came again and again, the sensation like a twin-headed burning fork sliding in and out of his supple flesh. The following sense that something was twitching inside his wound only made matters worse.
“Agghh!”
“Wait, no! Stay the fuck away from that. Those are mine you fuck!”
“Please, Jaus, kill me now.”
“Huh. I’ve seen this in a vicarity before. I’m kinda like Dannis Steelhard now that I think about it…”

LUSTAWAY ACTIVATED
TRANSFERRING PHYSICAL AROUSAL INTO METAMIND
These were all things Chambers wanted to say, yet as he tore the wretched creature off his body, as he dashed it against the wall, felt the satisfaction of its bulbous body bursting into oozing spools of white ichor and ropey gore, what came from him was a shrillness he had not known himself capable of producing.
It could only be compared to those old steam locomotives found in Voidwatch distributed vicarities.
The whistle pierced down the vents, ringing out through the shrapnel punctures and rattling screws. Regardless of how loud he was outside, within his mind, the voice of his outrage was infinitely louder.

+AGHGHHHHH FFUUUUUCCCCKKKKKKK! IT BIT MY BALLS! IT FUCKING BIT MY BALLS!+


And across a linking within his mind, invasive ghosts swirled through the channels of pain running through his thoughtstuff.
***
DOWNLOADING TRAUMA-PATTERN: [ARATNID’S KISS]
Some traumas were more narrow than others, but Chambers’ torturous experience would be enough to incapacitate an exposed mind.
Perhaps not a ghoul though–the lack of any true genitalia and associated primal fears with regard to losing procreational ability impeded such worries. All there would be was pain, and hurt was nothing special to his kind.

Still. It was unique.
Useful.
A bit like Chambers himself. The fact that his screams sounded so amusing helped.
Of course, there was the matter of two hundred accretions snapping to wary alertness at the sound of his cries. Checking the DeepNav, Avo found that a few contingents of Conflux technicians had settled into the former living quarters on this level and had set up a workshop of some limited fashion.
Currently, the paths of their perception all intersected where Chambers was.
Annoying, but easily solved.
INCOG ACTIVATED
TUNNEL TO GATE 44 OPENING
Twin announcements flashed through his cog-feed. The latter was likely Draus departing to do some scouting in preparation for what was to come.
Good. He would make his final adjustments here and falsify the ambassador’s details in accordance with her recommendations.
They were upon the final steps now. With each act, the chains tightened, and the path to Mirrorhead’s death encroached. No matter what Ninth Column wanted. No matter what the Guilders, the Incubi, or even Mirrorhead wanted.
He just needed to make sure nothing went awry at the last moment.
***
INCOG ACTIVATED
Chambers didn’t notice the text flashing across his eyes. His preoccupation in that instant was more along the lines of spewing strands of sour as he heaved and coughed on an empty stomach.
“Fuck,” he murmured. Something tickled inside him, a searing series of pops resonating in his new wounds. Body tight with worry, he slowly reached down and checked. A series of crunches greeted him after the initial squeeze. Digging through the injury despite the hurt, he looked down and immediately regretted it.
There, on his hand, clung a sticky clump of tiny rat giblets and diminutive spider legs.
The fucking aratnid had laid eggs in his… uh… kinda sorta eggs. That meant it was an Ashen Digger.
Chambers wondered if he still had that Dannis Steelhard vicarity where they showed how to deal with those–
The voice crackled into the back of his mind without warning. +You’re hidden. Time to get moving.+


“Guh, fuck!” Chambers hissed. Rage spiked in him at the return of the voice. He noticed the mem-data flowing faintly in the lower right corner of his perception. Incog activated.
Shit. He had some kinda nova-elite super Necro in him.
That still didn’t give them the right to startle him and let the aratnid bite him. Another cluster of somethings popped inside another bite. Chambers reached down and isolated that batch of problems too, crushing them between his fingers. He tried to ignore the sensation of things spurting against his fingers. This was not hot. Even for him.
“Hey, half-strand: Next time don’t just jump into someone’s mind without a warning. Fucking… made this spider bite the shit out of me, fuck I got eggs hatching inside.”

The voice grunted. Chamber paused. The grunt. Why did it seem so familiar?
Gods, but the voice was a half-strand. No sympathy whatsoever. “You rust-fuck! Did you see what just happened to me? I’m crippled, you half-strand! Crippled! Man down! Man double down! It’s your fault it bit me in the first place. What the motherfuck was your plan having me clamber bare-ass naked through these tubes.”
+Burn it off when you get the chance. Get to Blockcrawler now.+
Chambers jutted his head forward as his face coiled in outraged disbelief. “Burn… burn, what the hells is wrong with you? I’m going to be pissing aratnids soon if I don’t find a grafter or… or…”

The Necro spoke again, and this time, he felt the full weight of their annoyance.
Chambers swallowed. There was a purity in them. Something deep and cold, unburdened with the thought of killing or hurting him. Chambers had run into those types before. Best place to be with a kill-happy sociopath: Away.
+I’ll see if I can find anyone with a Woundhound injector. Get to Blockcrawler.+
Huh. Well, at least they weren’t a total half-strand.
Wait, the half-strand was in his head, hearing these thoughts. Shit. The whole time they could hear him. They could hear this too! He didn’t know to control his own mind and hide what he was feeling. How the fuck was he supposed to think up new slurs to use on them now.
+Blockcrawler,+ the voice growled.
Wincing and whimpering, Chambers resumed his path through the filtration channels as he crushed and squeezed away what he could of the injected parasites. With each vibration, with each pounding step, he felt a growing swelling of pressure slithering inside him, little pinpricks from bladed palps trying to dig upward along the inner walls of his flesh.
Oh, hells they were climbing up they were nibbling their way up.
He redoubled his pace for both movements, crouch-walking faster while his hands picked away at things arriving with premature immediacy.
***
It didn’t take Chambers much longer to squeeze through a tear leading down from the tubes he was inching through. Below, an artillery-hammered room thick with the swirling of mem-cons awaited. He slid down, the spray of tags on the walls imbuing the room with phantasms as Avo’s Ghostjack surged.
Within a tenth of a heartbeat, the latent mind-infectors were dismantled in sequence and threat. Avo kept them separated within his Metamind for now, but they would be most useful when time came to reinfect the loci of the block with his influence.
Shaped in an upside-down U, tarps and half-decayed battle foam coated most the damage that once exposed this section of the building to the elements. Despite abandonment to the mem-cons, leaving a direct intrusion point was still too much even for Conflux.
Chambers limped along the left curve of the room, heading toward a large mound of debris. He hissed as he cut himself on jutting blades and glass and steel, but the pain flensing his feet was paltry compared to the horrors that were swelling inside him.
Face clammy and breath quick, he surmounted the collapse and peered behind the rubble.
There, magnetized to the plasteel skeleton running through the building’s punctured internals was the Blockcrawler. Its current space ran between rooms and systems, its presence masked by its security system and it’s liminal placement.
Accessing the Blockcrawler’s locus, Avo absorbed all information that remained intact from the drone’s mem-data.
KELVER-20 BLOCKRUNNER
SYSTEMS: [ERROR] [ERROR]
REQUIRES IMMEDIATE REBUILD OF PHANTASMAL STRUCTURE FOR FUNCTIONALITY
Right. Another thing Stormtree and Highflame fought over. Titles. Blockrunner versus Blockcrawler.
Considering both sides had a variant of this platform, it was more a thing of preference than functional difference.
Shaped like a rotating cube with a grid of fusion torches gleaming on each facet, six crab-like appendages extended from below as if legs bolted to a cube, studded with magnets that clung to the walls, the Blockcrawler was to be entered from a hatch above or below–extremely outdated tech even for its time. Down its legs were mag-accelerated guns. Most were rusted, but at least two still had the capacity to shoot through walls.
Highflame had a tendency to keep to a more solid matter motif, but both sides had taken to using smart matter pathing within the fibers comprising their newer vehicles if some of Draus’ anecdotes were to be taken at value.
Chambers, yowling as he stuck a leg through the missing hatch, slipped into the interior of the machine, and strapped himself into a cube-shaped gimbal. The piloting module was cramped with barely more than eight square feet of room to stretch and operate, but function superseded comfort when it came to instruments of war.
Linking his mind to the locus, the system hard booted using his–and by extension–Avo’s Metamind as a crutch. The mem-cons had eaten away much of it phantasmal structure, thus crippling its semi-autonomous functions. With someone at the helm, however, its baseline functions could still be managed.
“Alright,” Chambers said. “In the fucking thing. Now. Find me something to fix my balls. I’ll beg. Seriously. I beg hard: It’ll be undignified and you’ll feel bad.”

Avo wouldn’t. But he got the point.
Accelerating himself using his Heaven, he reviewed the overall situation. Mirrorhead was still in place, still whining about his woeful life. No one had come to investigate the noise Chambers made after the Incog activated. Casting out, his Whisper scried at the nearest Conflux personnel with care.
Most of them still had a trauma-collapse trigger set to activate when someone lacked the proper–Incubi-mandated–sequences. Considering the memories were universal, it seemed the Incubi broadly applied the effect via loci-transmitted mem-cons.
Pulling the memories he claimed from the Incubi, he compared them to what lay before him and matched a symmetrical enough facade of sequences to enter the minds of enforcers and technicians anew.
The Syndicate Necros, despite being mentally crippled, were still useful as another jackpoint in case what he obtained from the Incubi was insufficient to spoof past their grid in due time. Most of them had been quarantined to a specific spot on each floor. For now, Avo was content to leave them be.

Redesigning a mem-con from the ones just harvested took a bit of time, but turning the infrastructure already built in by the Ori-Thaum to his own ends sped things along. As Avo hopped from mind to mind, he arrived against a central loci and accessed its mem-data. There, he pulled the information he needed regarding Essus’ current location and installed his viruses.
Subverted, the Ori-Thaum defense grid was now his to command. Nine thousand eight hundred and seventy-three active signatures of thoughtstuff were now registered and primed for collapse. It was at once sobering and enticing to lay gaze upon a hidden construct capable of distributing mem-cons at such efficiency. For all the momentum he possessed, their skill at direct sequencing and phantasmal architecture design exceeded his.
He would need to study their methods in depth when this was done. His skill as a Necrojack could be nourished further by the waters of his betters.
As he slid back over into Chambers’ mind, a new interface manifested in the back of his mind, mapping the slow spread of his influence through the block. Soon, all would be infected, and he would have full control.
He cast a quick update to Draus before locating Essus on the DeepNav. A marker materialized far down the block, descending to the point of the gutters.
Gutters? Bringing up some of the memories he took from the locus, he found mention of a filming today. A lite Crucible was scheduled to take place in the lower levels just above the Penumbra. They needed to keep it quiet to avoid drawing too much attention from the Exorcists.
The theme had twenty recent “volunteers” placed in a maze. And they would have the Lingerer hunt them.
The Lingerer.
They were having Essus participate. Except for this time, he was to be on the other end of the entertainment equation.
If there was ever a true display of absent justice, it would be the fate of a good man made a wretched monster by no fault of his own. All he had wanted was a better life for himself and his son. All he got was torment and mutilation.
Avo wondered how Walton would feel regarding the man, and the casual indifference Mirrorhead inflicted the atrocities he did upon him.
Flicking the marker over to Chamber, he felt the former enforcer jolt again with a shock. Tiny specks of awareness were flickering from the base of the man’s bloodied privates. Avo could try hitting some of the hatchlings with his traumas, but he really didn’t have anything that would null a creature so simple.
He could try jacking into their thoughts directly and crippling them each by each via the scrambling of their cognitive architecture, but he deemed it a waste of time. They weren’t going to kill Chambers, and a Woundhound shouldn’t be that hard to find in a Crucible of all places.
“I… I think they’re crawlin’ up my tubes,” Chambers said, breath coming in bated hisses. Considerable pain filled the man’s mind. He was handling it most adequately.
+Might be. Get down to the bottom. Woundhoud waiting there.+
Spitting out a breath of slurs, Chambers directed the crawler downward. Intermittently, it had to slice through blockages of infrastructure and slats of bolted plasteel. Moving where elevators and electrical systems were joined, the blockcrawler operated in a sense much like aratnids did, avoiding open rooms as it scanned through walls and adjusted its path in the folds between.
Its legs sang sawing notes of mechanical exertion with each step. Through the gloom around them, it cast a light on the decayed divides that ran within the block. Cords of wire and veins of copper glinted and swayed. Dormant elevators were severed and locked in place, halted from freefall by the clamps during the war.
The better part of ten minutes passed before they finally got down to where Essus was. Through it all, Avo cast out his Whisper when he could, lessening the time it took for his mem-cons to spread again.
By the time he was done here, all that remained would be the creation of false intel on his end. After that, he would find the time to experiment with his Canons. There were more potential synergies between his Heavens and phantasmics that he wasn’t exploiting.
They were two hundred feet away from Essus' mem-locked location when Draus’ session activated.
The first thing that spilled through was anxiousness. +Avo. Somethin’ fucky’s happenin’ in Nu-Scarrowbur. The Scalpers are gone.+
“Well, that’s an augury of violence if I’ve ever seen one. An entire block flooded with thoughtstuff. They’re massing alright. Looks like we’re going to have that fight after all.”


“Or shit’s fuckier than we know. You think the Ori–”

“Yep. Absolutely. If there’s an open jar, the half-strands from the Incubi probably got one of their invisible fingers dipping inside. Well, they might even be the jar in the first place, running a dive on themselves. Like in Kososo.”
“Fucking Kososo.”
“Yep.”

“You think your uncle pretending his gates are down will get Greatling to pull something stupid?”

“Ehh. Ahh. Umm.”
“Enlightening, Reva. Glad to see our little cadre’s being headed by an intellectual.”
“Yep. Know what I think? I think this Mirrorhead doesn’t know what he’s doing.”

“You serious?”


“Well, come up with whatever mad-cap strategy you want, but bunching your fighting-meat up in one place all of a sudden isn’t exactly subtle. And frankly, there’s not enough of them. Of course, if the Ori have their hands on him someway somehow, they might be feeding him false intel to start a fight in Nu-Scarrowbur as a distraction. Like in Kososo.”

“Fucking Kososo.”

“Yep.”

“So. What now?”

“Now we just keep watching. We got the time. We got the Longeyes’ support. And we got four-on-one if it comes down to a ‘Clad on ‘Clad. Far as I can tell, we basically got called in to do a milk run.”
“...Reva, why the fuck did you have to use those words?”
-Conversation between Reva Javvers and “Tigertail,” Bloodthanes of Stormtree
10-5
Smoke on the Horizon
Avo’s mind slowed to a halt as he overlaid Draus’ perception upon his own.
From on high she gazed down at Nu-Scarrowbur, the roof of her newly stolen aerovec was practically scraping the ceiling of Layer Two. Physically masked by the phantoms simulating midnight, her cog-cap remained low as she used the confusion of her environment as attention-ablative plating.
Clever. There’s a trick to keep in mind.


Trickling veins of traffic rounded the countless shield-shaped structures of the district below her. Every two blocks or so, an Exorcist’s Specter hovered, a satellite between intersections, each establishing a new watchtower for surveillance.
Missing were the patrolling golem knots of the Scalpers or any trace of their associated members operating in the street. At a glance, this seemed an obvious reaction to the presence of the Exorcists, but clearer omens stood in former Syndicate-owned blocks now mostly vacant of thoughstuff and loci signatures.
If the district was a portrait of climbing colors when regarded in the Nether, several major spires were now devoid of luster, bland in a sea of growing voluminosity thanks to the encroach of Tier-security.
+I’ll try to get a closer look,+ Draus said. The heft of tension was as if a solid block inside her. She welcomed its weight, reveling in a task fit for her purpose. She yearned to see if she could evade the notice of the Exorcists entirely, leaving her Incog unstrained. +How’s the shit on your end?+
He checked Essus’ signature. The former father wasn’t moving, surrounded by two flanking accretions. +Going to get Essus. Block is ours again. No sign of any more Incubi. Yet.+
Pulling the Crucible mem-data secured from subverted loci, two other memory profiles appeared. A hype-feed advertising a double act who fought with minds in sync and wielded wisping drones lined with threads of monowire. Two upcoming razorgirls–twins named Tsuni and Prani Mandrahupta–were set to “perform” with him.
All details indicated they were recent contract acquisitions made by Conflux–their backstory vaguely similar to Essus’ own, being twin daughters surviving the ascent up a Scalper Crucible while their father didn’t.
Unlike Essus, what memories the systems offered presented them as savage husks hollowed by drugs and vicarity addiction. Chrome as they were on the outside, inside was already rot and rust. Death for them was a question of when, and not if.
Somehow, Avo doubted the father enjoyed being around them, despite being billed as the “family bound by trauma” act the Syndicate was selling. That was fine. Avo had just the thing to resolve this mistake. +Going to get the father out of the mess now. Stay synced.+

+Alright. I’ll see what I can figure out from this. Ain’t no way Conflux is makin’ it to the stormtree. Exorcists are godsdamned everywhere. It won’t take nothin’ for a Paladin to come a’ thunderin’ if they get reports about some kind of rogue ‘Clad tearing up these here Warrens.+
He considered the implications and pulled over some mem-data from Mirrorhead. +You think he’s plannin’ on burning through his own as a distraction?+
+Most likely possibility. They make the noise. He gets through with his golems and does his suicide run. A balls-out assault might-could cause enough chaos, and all he needs is one drone with some kind of reflection to make it through the portal. Then he’s up and ready to do somethin’ real dumb. Alright. I’m gonna inch in closer. Cast me if somethin’ happens.+

Her session went dormant.
A yowl sounded from Chambers and a most disquieting sensation of squealing rat-spiders emerging from a hive of wounds bled across their joined thoughts. Ignoring the former enforcer’s complaints, Avo placed a waypoint just behind where Essus was located, and the Blockcrawler drilled on, melting through alternating layers of plasteel and plascrete as its legs clanged and trudged through wrinkles of melted slag.
Another option to solving the Conflux problem, Avo realized, would be to alert the Paladins and the Exorcists through a loud enough disturbance. Mirrorhead, however, was certain to escape–or die by the ends of another. That would be a most unpalatable resolution to something they spent so much effort on.
More and more, it seemed his best choice might be to distract or trap Mirrorhead somehow and then null all of Conflux to simplify the slaughter. The greatest risk remained the Syndicate boss himself: Avo had the mem-data for his adversary’s Frame and Ontologics–he would review with Kae once he was finished with his present tasks.
A voice sounded inside him. The Woundshaper was roused by his thoughts. “You delay matters you are wary of facing. Why not just kill him and be done?”
“Flavor,” Avo said. “Want to sample Mirrorhead’s thoughts. Want to understand him beneath the armor of his divinity. His taste that way will be more… sublime.”


The old fragment of fallen divinity hummed a single note of dry regard and said no more.
They were at level four hundred and ninety if the DeepNav was accurate. A sprawl of sealed tunnels lined his vision as he noted where the paths led, deeper beneath the crust of the earth itself, sinking into the dark of the Penumbra, where former factories and bygone industries languished untended but for Syndicates, smugglers, FATELESS, and the things touched by the Low Masters.

The place where Essus was to perform wasn’t nearly so deep–his current area was a block lobby similar to what they arrived upon after their own Crucible, ascending to the gutters from the tunnels of the Penumbra stretching up from the level of the Maw
Segmented into a maze of winding rooms and with all exits sealed, the survivors were free to run and hide however they pleased. Ultimately, it wouldn’t matter. Conflux never intended on them getting out, and the layout of this “small event” was a testament to that.
Twenty winding and cramped paths were made so via crudely fabricated walls planted in the middle of the lobby. The only true way to escape was vertical, and even then, there were seven drones with gauss repeaters on turret duty.
These were certain to be snuff recollections. Nothing more.
Or at least they were before Avo’s arrival.
The Blockcrawler slipped through a molten wound between energy junctions and found itself crawling around the interior of a sealed silo. Along rust-coated blast doors did its magnetized steps sing, and down in the black, Avo could see the collapsed remains of an immense cargo platform lodged sideways against the interior walls, warping the pillar it was based around.
They were forty feet from Essus now. From him and the other thirty Conflux personnel loitering about. One was hissing wounded thoughtstuff into the Nether. They laid in the corner, and from the damage, Avo marked them to be the Necro in charge.
Another victim of his mem-cons. Probably the reason why they were delayed as well.
A shuddering noise choked out from Chambers as he started bouncing in place. Looking through glitching details offered by the Blockcrawler’s locus, fifty-six signatures flashed as a simulated model of the rooms beyond was woven in shape by a swirl of phantoms. “Alright, voice–agh, fuck. We’re here… now, where’s the godsdamned Woundhound? I need it–ohhh–I need it bad. It feels… like it's about to unlatch.”

Avo ignored Chambers for now. The Woundhound came later. Right then, his only goal was to make contact with Essus. After that, if the man was still himself, then he was due a stake in Mirrorhead’s execution.
If not…
Maybe there was a measure of solace in delusion. The man deserved to pass with pleasant thoughts of his boy, not rusting away as an instrument of slaughter to a will not his own.
Mustering his Heaven and slowing time, Avo deactivated his Incog and cast out his Whisper. It was a pain being unable to use his other phantasmics when hidden, but perhaps once he started binding ghosts to shards of loci created from his blood, he could afford to operate with a new sense of flexibility.
For now, there was little worry: the Necro was down and the rest were distracted. Snaking through matter, Avo brought the mem-key he made from the Incubi to bear as he injected himself straight into Essus’ thoughtstuff.
This time, he didn’t bother concealing himself.
+Essus. You still there?+


Sinking deep into a sea of mem-data, the sequences wavered momentarily. Confusion was the first taste to greet Avo. Confusion and surprise. Then, the mind came alight, the surge of perception flowing through every sequence. Disbelief and refusal broke against the ironclad presence of hope. Like watching a cloud thicken in slow motion, Avo witnessed Essus’ thoughtstuff compose a response.
Peeking out from the father’s perception, he found himself looking through enhanced eyes. Old Ascender Hawkeye Mark Is. Traces of mem-data were missing from the chrome’s functions as if someone did a sloppy job manually deleting some root memories integrating the implant. It looked like a jailbreak performed without a Ghostjack. Messy and dangerous. Essus was a few integers away from getting his perception shredded.
Amateurs. These things weren’t meant to be done without a Ghostjack, and even if they wanted to go makeshift, they needed the requisite memories to achieve stable extraction. The fact their raw eradication worked was more a testament to luck than skill.
+I… have… been… waiting… for… you.+
Essus’ response came slow throughout Avo’s review. A substantial number of implants weren’t even at proper synchronicity. Cross-corporate augments always took substantial tuning to work together. Though the technicians did what they could mechanically, the fact remained that Essus’ body hated itself. Highflame-backed Ascender optics were struggling to communicate with a Stormtree-aligned Grendel exoskeleton while most of his supporting implants were street-grafter garbage. Avo wasn’t a grafter himself, but a quick pull from Conflux memories described the father as being a “spite job” by Mirrorhead and a “shit-fuck cyborg held together by hatred, patch jobs, and other questionable fluids.”
Avo felt himself frown in the real. Few people got what they deserved in New Vultun, but again, fate harbored a special hatred for the father.
Flicking a glance at the thirty-four Confluxers, Avo regarded the two razorgirls with fleeting interest. Their thoughtstuff was more porous than a joy fiend’s. Hitting them with Lucille’s Agony would be like popping a bubble considering the content of the trauma. The others were barely protected even with their wards. A low note of pain escaped from the Necro leaning in the corner.
He let time regain its pace to better facilitate a conversation. +Yeah. Came back. Made promise. Mirrorhead’s time to die. Conflux’s time to burn.+
+Stable. And sane,+ A trickle of broken amusement spilled over from Essus. +I didn’t not think myself capable but… I always hoped you would return. They claimed you were dead, but I…+ He smiled then. +I lied to myself then. But the lie was… was a lie in itself...+ He chuckled. Through his perception, a nearby tech shot him a weird look.
“Uh, Lingerer? You alright there, consang?”

Essus froze. He turned to face the man. “Yes. Better, in fact. Artad’s blessings.”
The tech’s flickering blue eyes swiveled as they shot a worried look at one of their cohorts. Working to fix the night’s murder-filled entertainment, they were spread wide, some assembling wires, other prodding at drones. They weren’t ready for what was to come.
+The locus,+ Essus said. +Where the… the watchers were supposed to come through. It broke with the uh… the mind-thief fell ill.+


+Yes. Necro’s hurt. Going to finish him in a moment.+
Parts of Essus’ thoughts wavered like a tattered flag, but by testament of will, the man was still sane, still capable of composing his own thoughts. Wounded though he was, shattered but holding was yet the right descriptor.
+I have… done terrible things,+ Essus said. Shame followed. Emotions were breaking inside the man like a dam. There was no time for this. +I refused to kill at first but they… they put memories of other children dying inside of me until I…+


+Essus. Can’t make that right. But Mirrorhead’s not watching now. Bomb in your head won’t go oft. And the Necro is down. You understand?+
Slowly, he felt Essus offer him a nod. +Yes… yes…+

His fist lashed out, the blow a surprise to himself and Avo both. The tech he just spoke to barely managed to widen his eyes before death came. Titanium greeted flesh and the bones that comprised the Confluxer’s jaw emerged as a burst of darts through the back of his skull.
A cry of alarm rose–and droned as Avo accelerated his reflexes.
Around him, a few personnel and the two razorgirls imbued with the enhancements of neurachem or other reaction booster moved as if inches, twitching barest increments before his gaze. The rest might as well have been frozen solid.
The first targets were the twins. They were chained in mind and action, moving in tandem as they ejected the threaded monowire drones out from their spines. The drones didn’t even fully detach from their bodies before they broke.
Synaptic lightning forked through the Nether, striking the closer of the two. Ghosts imbued with all the pain in Lucille’s Regret splashed against wardings and wardings shattered. A mental scream sounded for but a beat before it was subsumed by the banshee howl of channeled traumas.
As he blew out the first razorgirl’s mind like a candle, he watched as his traumas overflowed across the link so fast the second mind in the conduit burst immediately after the first, wards popping like a lightbulb after her sister was extinguished.
A glitter of thoughtstuff speckled his Metamind. Only shadows of memory remained of them.
Shadows, and a fortuitous secondhand realization that one of them had a Woundhound injector on them.
Leaving the techs for Essus to slaughter, Avo slipped his Whisper out from the father’s mind and cast torrents of mind-nulling ghosts at the already crippled Necro and the drones. Then, he scanned the minds of the survivors. Two Auto-Seance sessions were unsequenced from inside their minds. A thoughtcast toward a nearby locus containing a Nether lobby for the block was nulled mid-travel.
In effect, he was tearing the sound out of out of the Confluxers as they screamed, neutering any chance they had of survival.
Much like they planned for the twenty people trapped within slatted sheets under the pretense of playing a game of death and survival.
When no more possibility of escape remained, Avo slacked his haemokinetic mass and slipped back into Essus’ mind.
The following brutality could be encapsulated in a single word: Catharsis.
Bodies broke and smeared against walls. Limbs came free of sockets and splattered further against skulls. Nonoptimal cyborg that he was, Essus was rage unchained and grafted toward the sole purpose of dispensing crude, vulgar violence.
Vulgar violence the techs were helpless to halt with their crumbling morale and absent martial prowess. Without enforcer protection and the overwatch of their drones, the resulting moments belonged to a nature documentary.
Avo remembered the No-Dragons promoting a patch release of one of their nu-hornet variants made to eat away the near-endless swarm of locusts spilling out from a rupture near the Silk Spiral. Cradled in the mind of the hornet, he experienced a wholesale culling as the bioform tore through the cloud of locusts, its crystalline form and virulent exoskeleton cutting the pests from the skies via blade and plague both.
What Essus performed wasn’t nearly as impressive in terms of magnitude, but the experience of the vicarity was the same.
Pulped and twisted remains pooled across the ground like soup.
Standing upon a pond of gore, Essus looked at the shadowy outline of his own body within the crimson pond, basked by wings of neon bleeding into the faintness of apparitions. The boy and Avo himself hovered over his sides, looking upon the butchery with approval.
Essus did not throw up. With all the parts taken from him, the act was no longer possible.
He did, however, squeak. A soft whimper escaped from him as he faced the shadow of himself. “Artad… why? Why.”
+He’s not here Essus,+ Avo said. He could have left it at that. He didn’t. +It’s just me.+
Sobering at the words, a series of palms slapping metal pulled Essus’ attention. The survivors were pounding at the inside of their enclosure. They wanted to escape. To be freed.
“I… I need to free them,” Essus said. A soft sob choked free from his throat. “I don’t need to kill… I can save someone. Finally. Finally…”

Avo understood. He grunted. +Yes. But grab the Woundhound injector off the dead razorgirl. Need it.+
“What? Why?”

And even through the thickness of the sealed blast doors closing off the space behind them, out from the titanium hive of a Blockcrawler, the agonized screams of a certain degenerate traveled deep and true.
Something had indeed become unlatched.
+Chambers’ testicles are giving birth to aratnids. Will need replacement.+
“I… see.”
+Alright… Can someone explain to me just what the fuck… why the fuck did we null our own? What the fuck is going on? HOW THE FUCK DID YOU HALF-STRANDS GET FUCKING CONVEX KILLED? HOW DID WE END UP NULLING EACH OTHER?!+
-Mirror-Concave “debriefing” surviving members of Incubi Cell “Peregrine” and Dagger-2
10-6
Gathering
Avo expected additional hassle to follow the extraction of the twenty survivors alongside Essus.
Expected it, but found himself pleasantly mistaken.
With the presence of the Exorcists, Conflux was forced to take a more qualitative approach to their operations, eschewing the gaze-attracting mass of quantity for the intimacy of quality survivors.
Behind the metal sheets of the ramshackle maze burst experienced gangers and two squires. They eyed Essus' chrome with wary respect, confused by his ramblings of freedom and Artad. All of them had armed themselves with crude shivs crafted from glass and rusted shards of metal, and instead of being ignorant to the nature of things as most FATELESS upon first arrival, those standing within sight of Avo’s cog-feed were seasoned to the ecosystem of the Warrens.
Conflux desired a close and bloody affair to be harvested from their minds. As Avo unlatched the few surveillance phantasmics installed in them before the Syndicate Necro went down, he found most of them were sold together from the Omnitech-dominated district of Theta-12 under the Kzvinsgad Sovereignty. Checking the DeepNav, they must’ve come from eight hundred miles up.
Seemed topside smuggling was still operational with the Exorcists choking down the gutters right now.
Entertainment found a way.
After unsequencing any “unnecessary” memories from the twenty, Avo had Chambers–half-delirious from pain and blood loss–burn a series of openings through the block’s layers leading up and out. He put a final measure in place against any straying eyes by seeding the memories of the local lobby with instances from various vicarities “donated” by Chambers.
It would make the Crucible seem still in session for any straying eyes, long enough for none of this to matter once the day passed.
+Essus,+ Avo said. +We need to…+ His thought trailed off as he realized what the father yearned for. As the man groped behind for the holojectors protruding from his deltoids, the servos of his thick biceps were not flexible enough to afford his desired reach. He was a marionette trying to cut his own strings, but failing.
The wings. He couldn’t tear off his wings alone. Every channel of his mind began to wail with the rawness of swelling trauma. The act of tearing the last vestige he had of the boy off his body would unmake his ego entirely; a self-mutilation too great to bear. Yet, he couldn’t just let them taunt him endlessly, let his son’s presence haunt him like a shroud–so too would he be eroded down to nothing.
In both cases, it was a choice of self-destruction. The only difference if he should plunge the blade down deep or whittle himself down over time.
+Not yet,+ Avo said. +Stop.+
The man shuddered. He clenched his teeth and tried to flex strength into his will. Failure greeted Avo as whatever determination evaporated before it could settle upon the seat of lingering hurt. “I need to… I cannot face him… cannot live with him over my shoulder…”

+Mind will break if you do it. Not ready. Kill Mirrorhead first. Then decide. Boy deserves to be there for that too.+
And where strength failed, hate prevailed. The spreading softness of Essus’ thoughtstuff calcified into a dome circuited with coursing loathing. Mirrorhead. The one who inflicted so much on him, who destroyed so many for reasons petty and unfathomable. “I don’t want my son to see…”

+Your son doesn’t see. He is gone. He is for them to see. He is behind you. They should know what his life cost.+
Like a wick touched by the caress of flame, a new fire ignited in full within Essus. He needed to kill Mirrorhead. He needed to kill Mirrorhead like one thirsting in the heat of a desert needed water. Every second the Guilder wasn’t dead, Essus suffered.

“I must ask you…” the father swallowed. “To guide me… I have not the sense anymore. I have not the sense.”

They departed through the opening made by the Blockcrawler.
Walking through the gleam of a fusion-burned exit, Essus watched as Chambers tumbled out from the bottom hatch of the infiltration vehicle. The former enforcer came out yowling, thoughts raw with pure agony. Pulped aratnids painted his fingers with a thick ichor, while his bodily disfigure swayed on dangling sinews.
For all the trauma that boiled within Essus, the sensation of surprise within him remained strong. “You… were not lying.”

+I don’t lie. Lying’s inefficient. Just change the memories. Give him the Woundhoud.+
After Chambers ceased his whimpering about his castration, Avo charted a new path in his mind and directed him after the fleeing survivors. They spat their thanks at the father, but moved quickly, each of them long scarred by a lifetime in these Warrens, their faces hard and ashen as they passed him, basking in the neon glow of his wings.
Ultimately, none of them were from the same place or even wanted to make the same run. Their path was clear and they were free. Too many memories and attachments risked leaving a trace of yourself, getting yourself mem-locked or put through a Registry and hunted down later.
Squires lived like ghosts fleeing from ghosts. Pleasure was cheap, but the price of an impression beyond dread or a DeepName was to court an eventual nulling. The ones that made it would be back beneath the shroud of holocoats and wards soon, masked from the world.
For Avo, memory was a thing of malleability. He checked a final time for if he left any traces and spurred Essus and Chambers toward the point of their egress. Gate thirteen was approximately eight miles away from them, currently anchored to a darkened alleyway right next to a former pseudo-ball court in the gutters.
With how things were to proceed, discovery mattered little. Even if some tech decided to break from schedule and came down to survey the Crucible in person, or one of the fleeing survivors was caught, he had Mirrorhead’s ear. All he needed was to finish designing the trap.
They were on the cusp. The kill was so close Avo could practically taste the quivering radiance of the Guilder’s Frame. In flesh, mind, and Soul, Jhred Greatling would belong to him, feed him, suffer him.
It was as the Guilder said: All would be made perfectly wrong.
Scouting ahead with the Whisper more than he relied on the Incog, Avo directed Chambers and Essus in their final escape.
Climbing up and out of the block was a short affair for Blockcrawler and cyborg. However sneaking from alley to alley and timing the Exorcist Specter patrols, took substantially longer to surmount.
Avo cast out a confirmation of the father’s extraction to Draus and ignored a spike of paranoia when she didn’t immediately respond.
He could have fully activated her session and connected to her but decided against it. Not before present tasks were completed.
After nearly two hours of plodding progress–along with a single instance of spending the Woundhound against a stray assortment of ghouls to distract passing Specters–both Essus and Chambers arrived at the vertical slit of shadow-gate thirteen.
Flicking a command over to the EGI Core, Avo opened the tunnel and exited from the dive. Emerging back into the real, he shook out the lingering static and blurring memories rushing through him. He recalled submerging himself in the depths of the Nether for far longer in real-time, but never before had he sequenced through so many memories in so few dives.
Truth spoken, he would’ve likely needed to retreat and consider another plan if he faced the Incubi bereft his Heaven.
Around and within, blood twisted to his will. As the shape of the Blockcrawler and Essus staggered in, world behind them a spill of muted neon and distant sirens, Avo sensed the blood rushing through the newcomers’ veins before anything else.
In fact, focusing on where their blood touched matter, new alchemical patterns blossomed in his mind, and where the red flowed, the speed and force connected whispered to him.
The more he used his Heaven, the more he felt himself bleed over into his Frame, like it wasn’t just grafted to him, but interwoven.
“Be not wary,” the Woundshaper said. “It is merely the blurring between you and your domain. In time, certainly with your growing power, it will become near impossible to divine where your domains begin and you end.”
“Is this why my mind isn’t overwhelmed anymore? When I see another Heaven? A piece of a god?”
The reply his Heaven gave was indirect. “Concepts do not fear each other. Ephemerals fear concepts. Ephemerals fear the absolute and the divine. You are to delude yourself no longer with the frivolities of mortality. Rejoice. Apotheosis is a practice and an act.”
Whatever more about his burgeoning ascension was interrupted by the approach of Essus.
The doorway provided by the darkness-manifested tunnel was wide. Wide enough to fit the Blockcrawler with ease. As such, the exoskeletal form of the former father did not seem to tower until he finally strode within fifteen feet of Avo.
It was odd meeting the father’s shining optics eye to eye. Even more uncanny was the presence of his former sheathe hovering over the man’s shoulder, hissing and biting at something unseen. Faintly, Avo was aware of Kae’s rising nervousness by her surging heartbeat and the acceleration in her veins at the cyborg's heavy approach. The gore he was coated in shone softly, greeting Avo’s Heaven of Blood like an distant ontological extension.
For seconds that drew on, Essus just stared blankly, mind numb with conflicting emotions as Chambers disembarked from the Blockcrawler. Bits regrown, Rantula’s coat curtained his nakedness admirably. Chambers chuckled under his breath as he shuffled his way out shaking his head.
“Alrighty,” Chambers said. “That was… well, kinda fucked, to be honest, but hey-hey, you steered me right, consang. You–” His voice trailed off. He tilted his head as he looked up at Avo, aratnid goop dropping from his messy blonde mop of hair. Squinting, Chambers resembled evermore the weasel. “I’m mean… the hells are you anyways? You some kind of… Sang-ghoul fucking–”

Avo cast out a thought. The false memories he had running in Chambers collapsed. The former enforcer yowled and suddenly, realization burst from his thoughtstuff. Realization, and a sudden spike of anger.
“Avo! You rotlick–” Chambers swallowed the outrage back down. Again, Avo was surprised at the man’s self-control. The rage was replaced by fear and obsequiousness. “You half-strand, you! I knew you would find a way to get us out of there. Really! Masterful Necrojackin’. Beautiful work. Mirrorhead didn’t even see ya comin’. Gleam-job, consang.” Chambers added a bit more vigor to his nodding. “Gleam job.”

Regarding the man as one would a particularly strange aratnid that wouldn’t die even after being run over repeatedly, Avo instead directed his attention at Essus. The father hovered, his body shivering with tension.
Cracks were forming in his thoughtstuff. Sorrow mixed with relief spilled through.
“I… I am free… I…” Again, the former flat looked at his large mechanical hands. They were still stained with blood. “Oh, Artad. What has become of me?” Skeletal fingers of blood-coated chrome closed into fists. He turned to stare at Avo again and his face wrinkled around the implants. Even his ability to show pain was chained; bereft of organic eyes, tears had no place to escape.

He took three trudging steps closer to Avo. No one spoke and no sound followed besides the screaming of glitching servos.
“I must confess…” Essus swallowed. The height between him and Avo was near negligible now. Both of them had changed in mind and sheathe, but where one was slaved and dimmed in spirit, the other was risen with hunger ascending. “When we first met, I envied you for your height. My wife. She… she often teased me about being so tall. I… wonder what she would have said about you.” His face darkened. “I’m glad she did not survive the journey. I’m… I’m glad–”
Essus choked. A sob broke from him as he collapsed, falling against Avo as he slid down to his knees with a resounding crash.
Briefly firing his Celerostylus, Avo only calmed his reflexes when he realized the father was clinging to him in the form of a hug and meant no violence by it.
Tearlessly, the father sobbed, and Avo stared, mind stunned with more than a note of philosophical horror rising in the corners of his awareness.
A flash of sonder sparked inside him as the pain of the father’s thoughtstuff overflowed. This was not how the world was supposed to be. Avo was made to eat people like the father, to serve as bandwidth and trauma dump for a phantasmal civilization bound between realities in perpetual exile. An instrument to be used against New Vultun itself. A plague.
Yet, here he was: A monster comforting a man against the city as if he was the savior and the world around them was the horror.
Uncontrollably, Avo grunted a low and deep laugh. How did things become like this? How did Jaus’ vision of a future become this parody? What were they doing here?

He felt Kae moving then, her mind finally catching up to the scene unfolding before her. Turning, he watched as she mimed for him to hug Essus back. Rantula’s coat rustled and he found Chambers motioning to do the same thing a second later, mirroring Kae. There was also a questionable glint in the former enforcer’s eyes as he looked between Avo and Essus with a broad grin.
Whatever rash-courting filth the man was imagining, the less that was known about it the better.
Awkwardly, Avo patted the father with his claws. The man was clasped and coated in layers of armor by this point, but the fragility he emanated made caution seem proper.
“Can I have a hug too?” Chambers asked. "After him of course." He looked down and forced a quiver into his lip.


Avo glared. “Come close and I eat your eyes.”

“Fuck me, consang, a 'no' would suffice.”
Standing from her seat at the table, Kae hummed. “I-I’ll be willing to…give… give a hug.”

Chambers spun and beamed. “Alright! I knew someone–”

A squeak came from Kae. She inched back and put her hands over her mouth in shock. “Oh–oh, Jaus! Where… where are your–your pants? And why… uh… why is there so much blood.”

The enforcer looked down and winced. “I was ambushed by a fuckin’ aratnid.” And he fixed Avo with a side-eye. “And whoever sold me back to Conflux didn’t include clothes. Let this be stated: Chambers is not a nudist. Chambers likes clothes. Chambers isn’t trying to start the rash.”

And just as he said that another voice crackled in the back of Avo’s mind.
+Avo. Open gate forty-five. Make it fast.+ Draus voice told him all he needed to know. He sent the order and the George Washington answered, redirecting the shadows to create a new tunnel as the previous doorway vanished and another appeared.
As the pathway opened, a single figure shrouded in fire and ash came marching through, a new gun shouldered over her right side while dragging a corpse in using her left hand.
Draus’ Incog was off and she was drenched in blood–none of it smelling like hers. Distrant rattles of gunfire and the sound of a structure collapsing in the smoke behind her told Avo her little “scouting run” had not turned out quite as anticipated. As soon as she came through, she released her hold on the body and hissed: “Close it. Now.”

Avo obliged.
She opened her mouth but found herself rendered speechless first at the sight of Essus hugging and crying against Avo, then Kae covering her eyes, and then Chambers trying his best to hide his nakedness using his coat.
“The fuck’s all this?” Draus asked. She looked Avo and the kneeling chromer up and down. “What’re you, tryin’ to start the rash? Get ‘em off you.”

The ghoul grunted. “No risk. Not intimate for either. Just hurt for him.”
She shook her head. “Yeah, no, don’t… Essus?” She trailed off as she realized who it was. “Hells. You got him back.”

“Didn’t get my cast?” Avo asked.
Draus shrugged and looked down at her kill. “Things were messy. I was gonna read your message after.” With that said, she kicked the body of a Scaarthian clasped in a warg-styled spinal exoskeleton over to the center of the room. “Right, now, it seems like Stormtree wants in on this party too.”
You don’t need to be a sadomasochist to be a Wargskin, but it sure as hell helps.
'Cuz Wargskins sure ain’t Regulars. Not even close. They’re like… uh, snuffers, in a way, but they come expecting to hurt and die so that ‘morale’ thing? Yeah. Doesn’t really work the usual way with them.
Most of them are selected from one of the Pit-Cities in the Skuldvast, which makes most of them Scaarthians. In recent years, they’ve opened their doors to suicidal bastards of other clades and creeds, but the overall make-up still applies.
From there, they need to prove themselves by earning seven “scars.” The first is to walk the Skuldvast for a fortnight unarmed and unequipped. The second is to tame a warg. The third is to live with the warg and to hunt its old pack down with it and kill them. The fourth is to complete ten kills of the human variety. The fifth is to submit oneself to torture at the hands of a Longeye. The sixth is to survive. And the seventh is to ritually sacrifice and eat the warg you are bonded with in order to conjoin yourself to them.
After that, you get assigned to a Bloodthane, offered all the drugs, vicarities, guns, and Woundhound injectors you want. Not too bad a gig if you want to play at being destruction incarnate.
All in all, they’re a bunch of fucking freaks. Kill them. And shoot their bodies a couple more times for good measure. Null the ghosts too. Their minds usually aren’t good for much beyond serving as traumas.
-Quail Tavers, The School of the Warrens
10-7
Fires in the Backdrop
The corpse Draus brought back with her was mutilated beyond measure. Tassels of flesh shorn free from biotheurgically enhanced limbs while intestines trailed out of a welling pit spewing an endless mess of crimson.
No visible weapon implants could be seen, but along their back the spine of a warg was grafted–the skeletal shape of the animal's skull weaved into the human’s back through the melding of skin and fur. There was something of a metaphor about the design, a blur asking if the person was wearing the wolf, or if the wolf was taking over the man.
As Draus tossed the body upon the dais–bouncing them off a throne in the process–Avo noticed they were using a limited exoskeleton of some sort. Rod-like installations connected lattices of carbon nanotubes in a tight spread across their bodies and limbs. Yet, it only cupped them from behind, exposing their chests to harm. A final peculiarity could be seen with the dozen open ports lined down the stretch of their back, the glint of metal shining like dots through the fur of the warg.
“Wargskins,” Draus said. “Stormtree’s favored dyin’ meat.” A look of disdain passed through her expression as she regarded the remains. He didn’t need the resonance of her Metamind to notice the absence of respect. “Ran into a pack of ‘em while makin’ my way around Nu-Scarrowbur. Well. More like they ran into me. Crashed my aero into one of their packs. Wasn’t the only one runnin’ an Incog. Not even close.”

That narrowed Avo’s attention. He pushed Essus back, and Draus winced as she caught sight of the man. They would need to speak about him later.
Running her memories through phantoms for review offered a full depth of insight into the new problems they faced. Her initial collision with a group of Wargskins in a cheap Stormtree Gnome wing came without prelude. She was diving down to circle a block, trying to judge potential firing angles when they were coming up. She got lucky as she clipped them with one of her engines, sending herself spinning through the top floors of an empty Scalper owned club.
The ones she hit weren’t so lucky. They skidded off the side of the structure and ended up tail-spinning into a wave of oncoming traffic below.
A mixed turn of events for certain: Though it compromised Draus’ position, it also revealed the scope of the supposed trap that lay in wait for Conflux.
The Scalpers, as things turned out, were not missing. Not at all. Instead, they seemed to have fled within what looked to be an interconnected demiplane of some kind, emerging suddenly as entire blocks filled with their thoughtstuff. Pulling the memory from Draus, her surprise hitting the Scalpers as hard as the aerovec hit the smoking dance floor.
Avo frowned as he had his Metamind filter a count. Through the sequence detailing her fighting retreat, approximately seven thousand unique accretion profiles were blinking back out into the real, with likely more on the way. Scalpers suddenly just were, trajectories painting columns of red through strobing lights as Draus made to extricate herself.
Worse, mixed in with the Scalpers were forces of a higher quality. The aforementioned Wargskins were on Draus immediately. She exchanged fire with them through a few blocks, managing to kill or disable two packs.
However, as she moved, more followed, and this time with the ones she failed to kill came Woundhounds.
They were not the worst of the problems.
Leaping out from the block as the wound-bearing hounds chased her, squeezing through gaps and crevices in solid matter, the top half of the block she was in imploded behind her with little rhyme or reason. The only hint of things to come was from a sudden compression of air.
Fortunately, she managed to hijack another aero mid-fall and use the chaos to reactivate her Incog functions, passing through a series of Specters rising high into the air as mobile spotlights carving through space, hunting for a target elusive to the conscious mind.
A series of skirmishes took place thereafter. She had to abandon her new aero after a series of fragmentary anti-air missiles forced her into a dive that exposed her to a perception chokepoint at a low intersection. She ejected one of her ghosts containing a near-term memory into the locus as decoy before shooting her way out from her still moving vehicle, diving through the neon tentacles of a phantasmal kraken clinging to the top of a noodle shop.
Before it could even strike another surface, the vehicle she abandoned crumpled into a mangled ball of glass and metal, the air coiling like a slithering vice around it.
Her Phys-Sim screamed. Lines of fire painted trajectories of orange and yellow through the air. Leaping off the side of the noodle place, she dropped into an alleyway just as the first mag-flung needles came seeking her last known location.
A shot slipped an inch away from her head. One rang off against her shoulder, inflicting a partial tear on her ligaments and sending her into a tumble–one that she caught the momentum of and turned back into a roll.
A few more shots followed. Plascrete burst apart next to her. Screams sounded from inside walls as collateral damage joined the inevitable equation of an urban firefight.
Then, strangely, the shots became fewer and fewer.
As she twisted down the winding gaps between buildings and across street-level quick-fabbed shanties, the distant wails of Exorcists' Specters rose, then all suddenly fell quiet again.
An anomalous brightness formed tendrils around all shapes bearing an edge, and a mind-shaking presence instilled a song of strain in the plasteel infrastructure.
Something was approaching. Something powerful.
Paladin, Avo realized vicariously through Draus’ memory. That was the power of a Paladin. She had seen it before in her time serving Highflame.
But just as sudden, the light winked out, and all the Exorcists’ Specters went with it.
Draus froze mid-step for a beat, wondering just what was going on before shrugging her confusion off.
Uncanny darkness settled upon the Nether. In the false sky painted by an endless sea of thoughts and ghosts, the first drips of dread and confusion descended like droplets from a waterfall.
Through all the Layers, standing above the Tiers, a chorus of sirens filled the Warrens above with mind-numbing noise.
Something was happening. There was a shift in the atmosphere. A change in the Nether.
Draus kept moving.
She was one block away from the extraction point when she ran into someone for the second time. As she collided with a lone Wargskin, their thoughtstuff widened in surprise. Draus did not return the sentiment. She shot him four times, splaying open his midsection and blowing apart his limbs, then–to deny him a final act of revenge via autojected Woundhounds–she slammed his skull against the walls of the alley and dragged him along as he ran, snapping the injectors free from his back.
New accretions lit up in the blocks around her. With the Exorcists gone, the first of the Scalpers–or whoever they were with–cast the tides of their perception through walls and streets. In seconds, Draus was basked in hostile attention, and in seconds, the first flechettes began punching through the walls.
Using the Wargskin as a shield, she blocked shots with the corpse’s reinforced spine while she called Avo to open the gateway. The last thing she saw before entering the tunnel was the tentative reawakening of the district, blocks igniting with thoughtstuff like flames crawling across cloth.
The Exorcists were still missing. The Exorcists were missing and the Scalpers were reappearing, their minds lit with the song and taste of confusion as they peered over into the real.
With the sequences at a close, Avo glowered at the memories. He turned to Draus who was busy pulling pieces of flesh out from the edges of her bio-rig. “Supposed to be quiet. Scouting run.”

“Lotta shit’s supposed to be,” Draus replied, a slight sneer on her lips. “This is just what happens sometimes.”

“Yeah,” Chambers said, nodding vigorously. “Sometimes… things just go wrong. You know. Like… like unexpected guests.” He gestured at the Wargskin. “Things are hard to predict in this city.”

Avo pretended to contemplate the former enforcer’s words. He nodded. Chambers beamed. “Sometimes people who don’t do preparation get eaten. Tortured beforehand too. Maybe I should find another aratnid.”

Chambers no longer smiled. A distance filled his eyes and a lump descended down his throat as he swallowed.
Draus looked between them and scoffed. “Alright. Look: I don’t know if the Scalpers and Stormtree want Mirrorhead dead too, but from the way thing’s are lookin’, there really ain’t anyone else worth huntin’ like this down here.” She paused. “‘Cept you, maybe.”
A low growl of annoyance left Avo. Just how many people wanted Jhred Greatling dead? Or was this for him at all? And where did all the Exorcists go? More questions. Every step led to more confusion.
Avo hated conspiracies. He hated being ignorant more. His desire to just throw everything into chaos and go hard after Mirrorhead increased. His prey might escape, but from the look of things, it seemed like everyone and their nu-dog was gearing up to intrude on his hunt.
“Wargskins usually get thrown ahead of Bloodthanes,” Draus said. “Put in a battleline along with bioforms and elementals by Stormtree if they’re still on that Shifting Cascade combat doctrine shit.” She eyed the body and spat on it more out of habit than hatred. “Swear, if there weren’t so many of those suicidal half-strands, we would’ve licked ‘em by now.”

We. Couldn’t take the Highflame out of the Regular. Not completely, it seemed.
Regardless, it was her first sentence that made his insides tighten in anticipation. Bloodthanes: Individuals chosen to be Godclads by a select Coven of Longeyes–the semi-prophetic, destruction obsessed, and possessed matrons who were reputed to have hung themselves from one of the many branches of the eldest tree that bore their Guild’s namesake.
More competition. And more flesh and Heavens to sample.
“Good tidings, master,” the Woundshaper said, its lasciviousness matching his. “If fate smiles upon us, we might yet be graced with more fragments to us. Joyous day.”
“Bloodthanes,” Avo said. “Think they’re in the district?”

Draus’ lips thinned. “The ‘Skins don’t run alone. We’re lookin’ at a cadre. At least. Probably four of them. Maybe two.”

He paused. Four. Possibly even eight Godclads arrayed against Conflux. Even four Godclads of the Second Sphere or higher would be able to tear through much of the gutter-chaff fielded by a Syndicate. Pair that with Guild-standard forces and this should be a slaughter.
Another moment from Draus’ memories came back to him. The Exorcists–and possibly the Paladin–disappeared too. They were the main reasons why the Scalpers were keeping themselves hidden. Them and these new forces.
What did their absence mean now? And why did they leave?
A discomforting shiver ran up through the threads compromising Avo’s new musculature. One of his Echoheads twitched in the air.
He had a guess, and he thought it was a pretty good one. “Exorcists. All of them vanished by the end.”
“Yeah,” Draus said. “Like they all… jacked out at the same time. Felt some leakage come down from above. Whatever that was, it was loud, and there was a hell of a lot of minds thinkin’ the same thing.” She paused. “Hey, you think that got somethin’ to do with–”

“Don’t,” Avo said, trying to keep the sigh from his voice. “Things messy enough. Don’t want to think about her.”
The Regular rolled her healing shoulder and flexed her hands. “Well. If it ain’t her, then we got another thing happenin’ on top of us. Possible. But it’s gotta be real loud to recall or disrupt the Exorcists… And things have a habit of not really bein’ coincidences when you’re involved somehow…”

Avo hissed. “Contact her soon.” He considered the situation. “Not going to have long. Exorcists gone. Paladin too. Nothing stopping an attack now. Other than fear. Paranoia. Won’t last.”

Draus disagreed. “Don’t think they’re rollin’ out to hit Greatling. Most of their shit seemed defensive from the glance I got at them. Firing emplacements from buildings. Anti-air. Packs and troops stationed up and low, far and near? Yeah. Feels like a defense. Think they’re hunkerin’ down. Settin’ up an ambush.”

“Ambush,” Avo said. He collapsed the memory sequence and had the phantoms manifest as his DeepNav interface instead. He narrowed his focus down on Nu-Scarrowbur and looked at the layout. Layered and stacked with defensive ring-shaped blocks, most pathways in the district had a curve to them, with some parting and shifting unless you decided to take an overhead route. “Think they’re trying to grind Conflux down? Trap them within the district.”

“Could be,” Draus said. “But we both know that ain’t gonna stop Jhred from doin’ a runner.”

“Maybe–maybe they can,” Kae said. “A-Avo. Play… play back those memories. The ones where… when the aero was crushed. By–by the wind.”

He did as he asked, rewinding the sequence back to the point where the wind wrung the aero out of shape like towel being twisted dry of water.
“A-again?” Kae said. Her mien was that of intermittent focus. Her thoughtstuff sputtered and burned as her exocortex screamed, thrumming at a higher energy intensity. Something resonated in Avo: He was beholding how the Agnos was before her crippling. A character of obsession. And detail. It was still there, but only revealed in fractured instances.
“I–I think that’s A-Askagimmard,” Kae said, pointing at the Draus’ second aerovec being mangled by the wind. “A Heaven… Heaven of Forces.”
“Another golem?” Avo asked.
“M-maybe… but that’s not i-important. I… I worked on this. If… if this is the Stormtree build, then… then maybe… maybe they can trigger a backlash. A backlash in the hubris in the Twice-Walker. I’ve been… been going through the Elder Mythos. And… and the mem-data you p-p–uh–provided! There… a hubris to the Canon of… of Reflections–at least, I think Jhred has one of those. It–it says that… that if the structure he is connected to through his Heaven is shattered while he’s channeling his miracles through them it should–it should cause… have a risk of causing a spatial backlash! Outright! Maybe even a rupture!”
Avo, Draus, and Chambers stared at Kae. Essus’ gaze remained fixed on the memories, his transplanted hands shaking as he watched the metal of the former aero lengthen and then compress.
“Right,” Chambers said, face contorting with intensity. His ignorance was palpable, but something compelled him to join the conversation. Fear. That was the next emotion Avo sensed. The enforcer was afraid he would be considered useless now, so he was doing his utmost to discover a new dynamic for himself in this group, to ensure his survival.
Chambers was right to fear. Avo had considered eating his eyes and harvesting his Essence for a thaum. But that would come afterward. The man’s mind presented unique… properties he wished to study. Properties he considered testing against the phantamsal conflagration afflicting Kae.
Avo had theories he wished to test, and someone unnaturally resilient but ultimately expendable was just what he needed…
“So,” Draus said, massaging her nose-bridge. “You’re sayin’ that they might-gotta option to keep Mirrorhead in place?”

Kae shrugged. A shyness fell over her when she was pressed. The flash of who she was faded. She was lost in her thoughts again. Uncertain. Uncertain to what was asked. Then back to just being uncertain as she remembered again. “They… they might know his canons. But… I don’t know. This… the mem-data came from inside his mind. Jhread–he… he definitely made modifications. I’m not done parsing everything but… but he’s… he’s a Sphere Three. High Sphere Three I think. But only information on one Heaven. One Hell. One cycler…. He’s a tower. No sea to his design at all. Which means…”

“Backlash is death for him,” Avo said. He understood. He stared at Kae for a moment, trying to remember how Walton reacted after he managed a success in his memories. True or not, the emotion remained real.
Awkwardly, he tried smiling at her and nodding. The effect was less than pleasing. Kae paled at his widening fangs. Chambers took a step to the side, doing his best to remain about of Avo’s view.
A laugh rasped free from Draus. “You tryin’ to smile there, rotlick? There’s somethin’ between your lips.”

He stopped trying to be Walton and went back to glowering at Draus instead. Flicking a look and Kae, he muttered: “Good job.”

At least that made her eyes light up with appreciation. Her nose had a habit of wrinkling when she was happy. And then it was gone. Forgotten.
“So,” Avo said, “we have Stormtree in Nu-Scarrowbur waiting to ambush Mirrorhead. Have Ori-Thaum Incubi trying to help him assassinate one of their own. We have us planning his death; in his mind. And we have his sister. Who is coming to take him in.”
“Wow,” Chambers said, “fuckin’... who doesn’t want the boss dead?”
The sister. Real-death, anyway. Resurrections were probably fair game.
“Don’t forget Zein,” Draus said. She looked up, hinting who she suspected to have lured away the Exorcists. “She’s in this too. The Column with her. Jaus.” A beat passed. “Shit. You think she’s got somethin’ to do with how fucked everything is?”
And as if her words had invoked something dreaded, Avo felt the Nether shake as if a nuclear warhead had been detonated underwater. His phantoms twitched and shivered, splashed by motes of foreign memories stinging their echoing static with flashes of shattered memories.
More and more, broken shards of memory fell like a rain of shrapnel, spearing down from on high. And from the initial hail followed a deluge of broken ghosts carried on tumbling waves of screaming thoughtstuff.
“Avo,” Draus breathed, her wards alight at full capacity, “you feel that?”

“Yeah,” Avo said.
“You think that’s–”

“Yes,” Avo said. He wasn’t sure. He had no proof, but something in him knew–just knew. Three hundred thousand. That was the number to beat. “Zein.” The growl escaped him.
What the hells did she just do?
+What the hells? Central, I’m seeing… what looks like a coil of dragons eating into itself. Think we got a No-Dragon problem on our hands. We’re casting Specters to–+
[010 - error metamind wavelength lost]
-Last thoughtcast of Chief Exorcist Nivina Kisjie (Along with all two thousand members of the 1st Descent)
10-8
The “Distraction”
The immensity of the damage revealed itself with tides of fragmenting ghosts tumbling further into the Warrens like clumps from a collapsing ice shelf.
Reaching his mind through a gateway, Avo watched in muted awe as his Metamind tried to estimate just how many mind-deaths it took to simulate the appearance of a phantasmal blizzard laced with fragmented shards of memory.
He remembered what mass nullings looked like after dives gone wrong, but this had a more familiar touch to it, the damage subversive and overwhelming.
A recollection returned to him. A moment distant by days. He remembered how the minds of all those in Ox-Three had shattered beneath the whims of the Low Masters, how their damage seemed clean and absolute, reducing the cognitive shells holding the pneuma of countless consciousnesses to shrapnel and powder.
There was a semblance here. A similarity in the damage. But the scale was beyond measure even taking an exponential view.

A sea of mind-stripped thoughtstuff continued to tumble deep into the Warrens, and its waters flowed undistilled, bearing the homogeneity of a single prime emotion: Terror.
“Avo.” Draus was talking to him. He didn’t respond–his thoughts were too halted to respond. “Avo. What the hells is goin’ on out there.”

“I don’t…” his voice trailed off. A blastwave tore through the Nether then, its force catching all in its wake as it scythed down from the Tiers to the gutters. The weight of a warhead swatted all ghosts aside, cleaving a gouge between the flowing tides of the Nether. Avo’s mind rattled as the thought-quelling avalanche slammed his ghosts back into the sheath of his own mind.
In the back of his head, something cracked. A piercing howl came from somewhere. His perception fissured as his Metamind spewed error codes. Equilibrium drained out from his hearing and gravity tore him from his feet. He fell for but a second before he felt an impossibly strong limb halt his descent.
Through the spots forming in his eyes, Avo felt his hearing pop in and out as his ghosts swirled behind the protections of his wards, behind his thoughtstuff. Lines of mem-data danced across his eyes but pulsing spots impeded his literacy. Blinking, he found himself held up by Draus. Her thoughtstuff had been shorn clean from her Metamind, but still, she responded, action coming before thought.
The ghosts chained to his perception twitched across his vision. The nexus brightened and then dimmed. The line of mem-data rebooted.
THOUGHTWAVE DETONATION DETECTED
“Yeah,” Draus said, grunting a subtle wince of discomfort, “no shit.”
Stabilizing himself using his Echoheads, Avo took a step back and felt dizziness scythe through his shivering skull. He kept his tendrils embedded thereafter to prevent another fall. Essus was moaning, crying out as he pawed along the ground, gripping the ankle of a stunned-looking Chambers who somehow managed to keep himself standing.
Of all present, only Kae seemed untouched.
More than untouched: For that instant, her mind was no longer afire, and even through the distortions of his visual display, he could see the flesh of her inner mind, the sequences mapping the constellation of her memories slowly building to a glimmering whole again like molten metal poured down a network of channels.
Eyes wide, she stared at him, a lucidity filling her eyes. The disbelieving twitch of a smile pulled at her expression. “Avo… I can remember why–” An expulsion of flaming exhaust plumed free, rippling from the center of her again. The jet of memory-rending tore a squeal of pain from her as she gripped her skull. He moved but Draus reached the Agnos first, catching her before she could collapse.
In moments, a low moan slipped free from the diminutive woman. “Gone again… G-one… I was… I could think! It–it was clear! But… but…” The softness of her sobbing reminded Avo of a child too shy to cry openly, but too hurt to resist the pain.
A shuffle came beside him. Both Chambers and Essus were slowly emerging from their thought-rending stupor as well. The former father’s glowing eyes cut about the room, looking for where the sobs were coming from.

Even with the Nether sundered, the turbulent seas leaving Avo exiled upon the island of his own mind, he knew what the man was seeking.
The boy. The sound of Kae crying reminded him something of the boy.
Avo didn’t need a Metamind to taste the pain twisting wrinkles of anguish into what skin remained on Essus’ face.

As stability pooled back into his own body, Avo took his first supporting steps with the aid of his Echoheads. He could no longer detect what was happening in the plane beyond, though the gates remained open. More interestingly, it appeared the EGI Core tolerated the blast with minimal harm to its own structure.
That was good, at least. That explained why the systems still seemed to be running, and how the lights stayed on.

“What the fuck was that?” Chambers said. He rubbed the back of his head as if he had been cuffed there. “Jaus. Fuck me, consang, but that felt like the time I ended up putting my head next to an ejecting Rendsink.” A series of odd looks greeted him. Chambers continued. “It’s like a hammer inside my head smashing up all my thoughts before they could form–godsdamned.”
As Draus helped Kae over to her seat, the Agnos had mostly calmed, though she was still relying on the Regular’s support to walk. Faint murmurs of muttered sentences sprinkled with choice curses for Ori-Thaum became Kae’s self-commentary even as she found herself reseated.
Draus fixed Avo with a look. She gestured toward Kae’s head. “You saw?”

“Yeah,” Avo said. “I did see. Might be something I can do for that after.”

Draus nodded. She looked up and around, glowering at the nexus. “We trapped here or what?”

“Think the Core’s still working. Shadows still connected. Nether’s shaken. Thoughtwave detonation. Largest I’ve seen. Since…”

“Since the war,” Draus said. “Yeah. I felt the kick. That would’ve been a cat-five Thoughtwave Detonation. Called a few of those myself when the Silvers reached too deep behind our wards. Shit. That was reserved for when we was about to lose a Sovereignty.”

The implications were clear: Something immense just transpired above.
“Didn’t she say she was gonna send us some pictures or a location or somethin’,” Draus continued. “The hells happened to that.”

“Don’t know,” Avo said. “Never got any details. Was too focused on Mirrorhead. Figured it was drug-talk with her.”

Draus wanted to say something but her words choked off into an annoyed acquiescence. “Yeah. Alright. Maybe. But not knowin’ don’t help us none. If we was hit this hard then…” She trailed off for a moment.
He connected the dot. “Damages. City outside–Aeros. Infrastructure. All disrupted. Breaking must be severe. Mirrorhead… can’t reach him. Can’t sink into his mind anymore either.” A growl began to build inside him.
So close. So close, but to be denied now–and through no fault of his own…
No. He wouldn’t allow it. He knew. He read enough of the Greatling’s memories to know that the fool wouldn’t run. Not now. Even if the Warrens were collapsing into the Maw, if all the Guilds were standing against him, nothing would stop Mirrorhead from making this final run on behalf of his mother.
And it was that kind of obsession that made a person predictable.
“Not much time,” Avo said. He turned to face the locus that typically connected him to the EGI Core.
So far, fractals of internal memory reached out but came unraveled in the shifting instability that was the Nether. If the realm of cognition was a sea, then the wavelengths forming the water itself would be yet parted underwater explosion. Presently, there was just absence, not nearly enough phantasmal substance to bridge ghosts, but just enough where the minds themselves yet gleamed like naked ponds hovering in a void.
Inching near the locus, he overlapped the halo of his Meta with its reaching memories and attempted to establish a link.
[ERR–
A flicker pulsed across his cog-feed. A broken line of mem-data speared through and greeted him.
+Sys–able–+
The thoughts of the hive cut in and out as if they were surfacing and submerging over and over again. More cracked pieces of data came through and he found himself unable to integrate it into his Metamind’s systems. He took a pause a considered his options.
He could try to directly integrate with the minds of one of the crew, but how he was going to do that was in question. Perhaps he could attempt it with his Galeslither, but the risk presented by the core’s temperature and his Galeslither’s hubris was great.
He took a step back. Too far, Avo. Thinking too far ahead. Ignoring Draus as she asked him something, he tried accessing the locus again.
This time, instead of waiting for a response from it, he sent it a command instead, ordering to open the gateway he used to receive Essus and Chambers.
Fractured flashes of vicarious memory spilled over into his Metamind’s interface. He remembered holding a toddler up by her arms as she kicked, the flower fields of a place called Mars rising in verdant stretch behind her. He remembered a flash of something bursting in the distance, a news-feed reporting on the rebellion of the colonies at Alpha Centauri. More moments came, but what little cohesiveness they had disintegrated.
Finally, however, a pulse of ghost-fractured green splashed over his perception. Along the walls formed two gray-hued doors blanketed in static. It seemed the Low Masters' aesthetic choices had been affected as well. As the darkness swirled outward in a tube-like whirlpool, noise screamed down the funnel.
The first thing he beheld was a triangular aero smearing into wreckage and flames as it spun out of control, colliding sidelong against a distant megablock, error codes shimmering in the space once occupied by long stretches of holo-ads.
The outside winds brought tidings of chaos. Voices and engines were joined in a unified scream as chaos and confusion enveloped the districts. No one was prepared for the disruption. Echoing sounds followed the impacts of countless aeros, the song of their demises akin to the endless percussion of artillery heard during the war, heard in Draus’ palace.
Most of all, it was the emptiness that stood out to Avo. The Nether was a second layer to reality itself, but in its absence, the filter of the world around faded, and gone was the semi-ethereal tint that lined the world, gone were the highlights and ghosts forming the backbone of information and communication.
Only accretions remained. Accretions, and a thick film of falling ash speckling down like snow.
All who dwelled inside the nexus gathered before the opening and stared out into the city beyond. A gust of wind swept in a haze of grey, but Avo took hold of the air itself and cast the ash back out.
Standing at the forefront of their group, Draus took a few steps into the tunnel and gazed out. “Jaus. Ain’t too keen on findin’ out what that crazy old half-strand did to cause this.”

“Not even sure it’s her,” Avo said. Despite all of Zein’s… oddities, there was still the touch of the clandestine about her, like she was used to living large while avoiding the gaze of the Guilds. This was not something that could be ignored. He felt it. He saw the damage. You couldn’t get that many broken pieces and unraveling ghosts without nulling a mass number of minds.
And with it happening at least in the topmost and most occupied portions of the Warrens–or even the Tiers themselves?
No.
His little act of lacing a locus provoked an Exorcist sweep and a Paladin investigation. This, however, was magnitudes more severe.
He needed to see it. The extent of the damage. And just what was still operational. More importantly, he needed to see the condition around the Conflux megablock. Mirrorhead wasn’t about to give up on his revenge, but everything was different now.
Without the presence of Exorcists and Paladins, the Guilder’s options opened up, but he was crippled communicatively and blind beyond what senses he possessed. The golems stored in his demiplane would also be effectively useless without a proper pilot, and the drones wouldn’t be of use until the Nether reknit itself.
On Avo’s end, he was severed from accessing his subverted memories remotely. Not even his session would work now. But they were still there, and in time, they would return. The question was if he had enough time and if Mirrorhead was content to delay.
Ultimately, though, he knew the answer to that. Abrel Greatling had given Jhred a deadline, and now, this moment could be a blessing in disguise. Everything was in chaos. Hells. They didn’t even know what the ambassador’s condition was.
“Going out,” Avo said. “Need to see extent of damage. See situation. Going to ascend. Take a look. Draus. Open the tunnel again in ten minutes. Still taking commands. Only ghosts are choked off–get close.”

She fixed the locus with a wary look and flicked her eyes back to him. “How about I head out and–”

“No,” Avo said. “Not ideal. No working aero. Can’t judge Nether either. I have Galeslither. Can get up high. Get overview. Check Conflux and Nu-Scarrowbur. Review options.”
Draus looked like she wanted to argue, but her eyes slid away from him and she turned to look at Kae. Kae and Essus. Understandably, she didn’t much care about Chambers, who was standing off to the side, mimicking Essus’ expression while trying not to draw too much attention himself.
“Won’t go after him alone,” Avo said. “Don’t worry about that. Just for intelligence. Detail. Understanding the situation. Getting lay of the chaos.” A beat passed. “And see if you can get Kae… stable. Need to talk with her about Mirrorhead’s Heaven once I get back.”
“Alright,” Draus said. “Ten minutes. Don’t be late.”
Avo grunted. “Worst case is a delay. Contact you when Nether comes back.” He tried to get his Metamind to give him an estimate of the disruption’s duration, but the number kept jumping between five minutes and fifty-two hours. Useless. In this environment, he wouldn’t even be able to cast out his Whisper and scout ahead.
The limitation was neutering.
And there wasn’t anything he could do about it. It wasn’t like he could replicate–
Or maybe he could…
Perhaps it was time to see what happened when he made his Woundshaper mimic the matter pattern of a locus.
+THOUSANDHAND! THOUSANDHAND! TREACHEROUS LEECH! TRAITOROUS SOW! RETURN WHAT IS OURS! GIVE US BACK OUR HELIX! GIVE US BACK OUR THRONES! GIVE US BACK OUR FRAME!

GIVE US BACK OUR FUTURE!+
-Thoughtcast from [REDACTED VIA OFFICIAL GUILD CENSOR-EDICT] moments before Thoughtwave Suppression
10-9
Consolation

The locus’ pattern was a brittle thing of oscillating patterns. The softness inherent to the material surprised Avo when he first caressed it with a tendril of blood.
Peeling the metal free from a crashed aero, he found it smoldering a mere sixty feet away from his point of egress. While studying the locus, he dug out a scoop of flesh from the mangled remains of the pilot and what tasted like their family. There was a likeness in their flavor, even charred.
Peckishness sated by his snack, he liquefied the wreckage and drew it into his mass, casting branches of tendrils out from his wrist to better cocoon the locus. He heard rumbles of distant impacts and smelled the scent of his brethren scampering two hundred feet away. A soft snarl tore from his throat. He felt as if reduced, somehow; reduced to the nature of a baseline ghoul.
Netherblind, he focused on his other senses.

Sending out a call using his Echoheads, a static portrait of the Warrens slid into his senses and whispered to him rumors of destruction. Aeros were still falling. He frowned at that. Most vehicles had their own locus. By all means, the memories and phantasmics stored within the ghosts should still function on their own, even severed from the public Nether.
As he drew the locus into the vicinity of his Metamind’s halo, he formed a tactile link and interfaced with its systems. Mem-data booted and revealed twisted sequences and warped memories at a glance. His ward quivered lightly as he identified over a dozen mem-cons festering even in shallow waters.
A clearer theory formed in his mind. The aeros were likely subverted before the Thoughtwave Detonation. Perhaps the detonation was a direct response to the crashing aeros–a mass mem-con attack made to overwhelm a district or even a Sovereignty.
The prime question remained: Why?
Scrying through the locus, he heightened his reflexes and worked through its interior sequences, siphoning out cleansed ghosts no longer afflicted by whatever thought-plagues usurped its functions.
Ghosts: [441]
In the end, he was only able to restore a quarter of the active ghosts within the locus. No matter. He would take this opportunity to find others and study their condition as well. For now, all he truly needed was the structure of the locus itself.
Strands unfurled from the blood cocoon fused around the mind-imitating crystal. Through the air, they stung into the fragility of the locus’ exterior without difficulty, each drinking away at the thaumaturgic patterns comprising the object's matter.
Within the grasp of his Heaven, he felt the locus unravel.
He hadn’t yet invoked his Canon of Memory to capture the structure of the locus in perpetuity as he had with tungsten, but that was in due time. For now, a test was due.
It was time to see if he could channel multiple patterns of matter at once.
Drawing more pieces of stray rubble and punching his haemokinetic reach into even the plascrete beneath his feet, he began to siphon matter into blood, his senses accelerating, the world slowing. More, however, was an expanse of emptiness that called to his Metamind, a phantasmal gravity pulling at his thoughtstuff, his ghosts. The rivers of blood flowing out from his body now pulled him apart at the seams. Less and less did he feel the pilot to a Sangeist. More, his very being was being woven into the heights of the Woundshaper–the form of an old god remolded to his will, now alight with an ethereal shroud.
Where once his blood merely gleamed like a lustrous metal, a new quality layered into his towering design as the smoothness of his ichor took on crystalline facets of loci, studding the borders of his manifested crimson with faint edges.
With but a thought, he infused the structure of his own ontology with a ghost, linking with the flowing mass that was his blood. The transfer between his Metamind and locus-channeling blood was near instantaneous. A phantasmal sheen sheathed spills of running crimson.
It worked. The sensation of binding his mind to what amounted to his skin, or a multi-functional limb, was uncanny. It was like feeding additional awareness from one’s mind into their own hand.
As he integrated his Metamind into his Heaven more fully, he found himself capable of “shifting” the central center of his thoughts. Fascinatingly, the halo once rippling out atop his mind now expanded its broadcasted wavelengths over the jaws of his spire, just above where the caged patterns burned.
REND CAPACITY [WOUNDSHAPER]: 19%
“How… peculiar,” his Woundshaper said. “The sensation is not altogether unpleasing, as if a congregation of murmuring minds was allowed to bathe within the threshold of my being. An annoyance, but they do grant me greater sight. I see… I see the world, master… I see a sea sundered. Oh, the minds around us! Is this how you gaze upon the world directly?”An epiphany shuddered within his Woundshaper. Avo didn’t even know the Heaven could have one of those.
Activating his Whisper, he reached out and felt nearsighted again. The Nether was embroiled in chaos, and as such the world seemed a storm-battered miasma to phantasmally-projected perception. But even so, as he spread hair-thin tendrils of blood outward, he felt his awareness expanding, rendering something of a tactile lighthouse groping through a tempest.
Despite the situation, Avo couldn’t help but feel a thrill rise within him. The Nether was down and his careful preparations would be all for naught if Mirrorhead moved to act now. But there was a gleam in the dark. A diminished workaround to his limitations, if nothing else.

Bereft the sea of the near Nether, he could make a more private hive by combining the functions of the locus and his Heaven of Blood.
Branching brambles erupted out from him then with his reflexes on high. They cracked through the air and pierced through walls where sound met accelerating matter. The metaphor of his being mutated from tower to tree, while the wisp-like tendrils flooding out from him served as grasping roots and ghostly circuity both.

Mantled to his blood were the natures of tungsten and corpse-crystal both; the hardness of the former warded the latter against shattering, while the latter brimmed wide, allowing ghosts to traverse through the vastness of its internal storage at the speed of thought.
REND CAPACITY [WOUNDSHAPER]: 25%
Thousands of signatures revealed themselves, most answering the presence of his Heaven, the coursing blood rushing through distant arteries calling out to him. He caught sight of a few aratnid accretions, however. Sputters and brushes of thoughstuff while his influence slithered along the edges of an alleyway.
On a whim of curiosity, he spread himself into one such fleeing aratnid, mostly to see if he could manage the act. It took him three tries, the presence of the creature a blur to his mind with how mangled the Nether was, but even so, he struck true, spearing soft flesh on the third attempt.
A blade channeling tungsten and locus both slipped through the flesh of the aratnid. He felt it part against his touch, its mind dimming as the thoughstuff evaporated into nothingness within his cog-feed.
Good. This was good. He could use this to siphon more ghosts–scout through the district even with the Nether temporarily crippled.
It wasn’t the same as diving through the Nether, but it was consolation enough.
Shifting Heavens, he ascended with a vortex of twisting wind. The Woundshaper weighed on him still, and he could feel the Rend within him boiling, waiting to be unleashed. Manifesting the Galeslither made the twin Heavens overlap as if translucent shadows drifting over one another, but strangely, they were shadows to each other, as if they occupied the same space–the same anchor in existence–but were parted into parallel subrealities, banishing them from the possibility of intersection.
Dashing through the urban jungle of rusted bridges, running pipes, and half-decayed quick-fabbed infrastructure, Avo rushed up along the flat walls of a half-collapsed drone dispatch station.
Switching from Woundshaper to Galeslither presented a vast diminishment in perception and speed. Without the ability to feed his Whisper through a current in the wind, he could only storm onward with his tri-headed steed exposed, lest he further limit the reach of his sight.
Garbage and stray pieces of rubble and detritus ascended with him. Shooting past the lip of his current structure, he caught sight of small figures fleeing across distant bridges running between stacks of industrial cargo containers repurposed into FATELESS tenements, saw an aero deliberately ram into another in the distance while the holo-ads around him flickered between moments of static and fractured instances of distorted imagery.
In the distance, the skeletons of dilapidated buildings and waste-covered streets were enshadowed by odd distortions in the light. Beyond them rose the mass of the Conflux megablock, its once noise-wrapped exterior now drowned in near-silence. Mangled through its exterior was, the tarp lining its insides still offered enough obfuscation that the structure seemed as if a mountain, ignorant and uncaring of the happenings around it, untouched even by this suddenly falling storm.
Avo checked his remaining time before Draus was to open the tunnel again. Seven minutes and twenty-seven seconds. Time to make this count.

Cycling back over to his Heaven of Blood, the Woundshaper shot high into the air as he spun.
Diving out of the wind and back into the form of a blood-rooted spire, his perception and reflexes exploded anew. He wasn’t quite sure how his Celerostylus’ enhancements were being conferred seeing as he was an eldritch entity made entirely of blood, but he supposed his “ephemeral” form was still inside him somewhere.
Regardless, heat steamed the air as he constructed a dozen haemokinetic propellers out from his sides and bade them spin at maximum speed. Torrents of force blasted free behind him. He shook and jerked in the air as he shot forward, punching through the veil of sound like a dagger jerking through cloth.
His Phys-Sim flashed errors of continuation until he fused a lattice of veins over himself, offering a closed system of velocity references for the phantasmic to work out his trajectory. This wasn’t functional flight–Avo didn’t know nearly enough about aerodynamics to play the role of aerovec, but he could still accelerate.
And this Heaven let him remain fast and aware. He would leave turning or hiding to his Galeslither.
A low sigh sounded in the back of his mind. The Woundshaper was staring at him in disappointment.
“What?”


“There will be no switching Heavens, master. Loathe as I might be to guard the integrity of the mule, recall its hubris and know our current speed is carving heat from the air itself. The winds around us are cooking. Be glad that your immaturity is passing and you no longer reside as if a node of flesh within me: It would be most unpleasant to boil within your own blood.”
Avo’s mind went blank.
DOMAIN OF AIR
HUBRIS: ATTEMPTING TO DRAW AND SHAPE HYPER-HEATED AIR WILL RESULT IN THAUMIC BACKLASH
REND CAPACITY [WOUNDSHAPER]: 38%
REND CAPACITY [GALESLITHER]: 13%
Right. Yes. Mach speeds had a tendency to heat the air up. He needed to slow down before he got too fast. Keep a reasonable pace for now. He checked his Phys-Sim and slowed his propellers, keeping himself under Mach two.
The ascent that followed was an awkward one. As it turned out, when one barely knew how the forces of lift and flight worked, not even relying on a mental physics simulator could supplant necessary knowledge. More than once he needed to shift back over into his Galeslither as an emergency, flattening his velocity down to nothingness to avoid losing control. His travel stuttered in such increments while he shot out from the hexagonal rifts of Layer One.
It was when he finally rose into the Spine of the Warrens that he first caught sight of what might’ve caused the subversion of the aeros.

As the strands of his Woundshaper brushed over a stretch of space formerly occupied by a traffic lane, an aerovec came sailing down toward him, its presence only revealed as it entered the periphery of his outer-lattice constructs. Spreading his crimson brambles wide, and helped by the slowness of the vehicle itself, he examined its form and found it to be in the shape of an automated delivery platform– a type akin to the one that shuttled Chambers and the techs back over Conflux headquarters.
He cleaved the aero-transport open with a tendril and started the process of its deconstruction, faintly aware of the trajectories left by other aeros passing nearby. It was odd how he could see further than he could sense in the Nether. Usually, it was the opposite way around. Nonetheless, as he dissolved the matter of the aero before it could knock him off course, he injected a tendril into its locus and found himself greeted with the same mem-cons again.
Only, the ones in this vehicle were more intact, and the meme-data listed the last mind the sequences interfaced with.
The traffic loci. The aeros were subverted passing through traffic. Turning his gaze upward, more flying shapes fell like a shower of alloyed stars. Yet, it did not end in one way. Beyond the flickering phase gate lining the portals forming the mouths of Layer Two, coruscating flames spewed free of falling wrecks as they trailed smoke down through holographic tides of flowing errors painting the phantasmal skies above the Spine.
It wasn’t just limited to the Spine. It went up the Warrens. And if the Throat was compromised, then Light’s End likely was as well.
Ghosts: [561]
Taking the opportunity to collect ghosts in the chaos, he drank in what he could clean from the locus and boiled the rest hollow with a trauma-pattern from his Ghostjack. Turning to the Galeslither, he caught and hunted more aerovecs, trapping them in his Yondergales to better gather desired resources.
Time snapped back to baseline but he still managed to net himself six aeros. Similar points of subversion lingered within each one. Attacking the traffic system was a viable strategy, but it was loud. Avo remained unsure what the intent behind such a tactic was, only that the Thoughtwave Detonation was increasingly looking like an appropriate response.
Ghosts: [1032]
Checking his time again, he found himself near the five-minute mark. Halting in place, he turned to gaze upon the districts nearby. Far fewer crashed aeros littered the streets than he expected, but a slow suspicion rose within him. Checking the mem-data he claimed from the mem-cons, he studied the behavior patterns of the vehicles around him and came to a realization.
They weren’t being ordered to crash, they were being repossessed for use as makeshift anti-air missiles, to knock other aeros out of the sky.
More and more, he felt this might be a case of mem-con spillover. Like someone leaving a point of subversion active after they finished their dive. Somehow, such incompetence didn’t seem like Zein’s work, though the scope hinted at immense Nether influence as well.
[WARn-123n-ERRO!!]
His cog-feed crackled. Then, a distant flash called to his attention. The winds shifting, he angled his Galeslither to see what was blinking at him from the periphery.
There, enshrouding the armored blocks of Nu-Scarrowbur, he saw the faintness of a being looking at him from beneath the threshold of light. Graced with twelve arms and a tri-hued star for a skull, he noticed the other entity for but a fleeting instant before it faded back into the light, going from a being towering over megablocks to being nowhere at all.
A moment of silence passed.
Something turned in Avo’s gut. The sensation of a drop took him.
Instinctively, he shifted back into his Woundshaper just as a javelin sculpted from strings of shivering radiance lanced at him from out of nowhere.
“Tig, you… uh… You seeing this?”

“What? The Galeslither swallowing all those aeros? Yeah. Yeah, I see it. Shit. Can’t tell if it’s one of ours with the Nether all fucked.”
“Yep. Yep-yep. It’s also moving… methodically. Piloted. Last cast I got from our Necros said something about weird sequences in the traffic lobbies. Something off about the mem-data sourced from the junction managing loci.”

“And that Galeslither’s just plucking aeros out and flying fine.”

“Yep. Agh. Fuck it. Cut the thing out of the sky.”

“You serious?”

“Yeah. It isn’t ours. It might be Greatling’s. Might be someone else’s. But seeing as the Nether’s down and the districts are blind, who’s to say anything about who did what. Better safe than snuffed. Got your assignment, Breaker. Cut it down.”

“Synced on that, Reva. Just let me find my tune…”
-Conversation between Reva Javvers and “Tigertail,” Bloodthanes of Stormtree
10-10
Blood Upon Starlit Strings
A spear of blistering light rang loud against the thick of Avo’s blood just as he manifested his Woundshaper, their collision a melodious twang.
Sound and starlight fractured out at the point of collision, each crack a strand shivering bright, all tautly coiled like vast strings bound to an instrument unseen. With time lurching to a halt, Avo struck back. Constructs exploded out from him in rivers of rushing crimson. A clash followed. The metaphysics of asymmetrical domains warred, and force met force as a construct of light and sound fell against blood and matter.
LUMENLYRIST, MELODIST OF THE CLEAVING DAWN
Against the outer layer of his vessel the world burned; the air ignited around in a blossom of flames. Yet, he found the force lacking and too limited in direction. A whip spilled free from Avo and curved up, splitting the manifestation of light through its beam-like shaft.
Pockets of sound burst from his whip’s velocity alone. The javelin that struck him stilled and shattered into a spray of fading notes, breaking before the construct bearing greater force. The light and heat splashing against him faded, but the strings around him only grew.
Radiant wires spewed out like parasitic worms into the real, penetrating the tapestry of existence from every emanation of noise. Alarm spiked within Avo as the chords of brightness formed even within microfractures beneath his sloshing blood.
Each string brought the whine of a new sound made low and droning by his accelerated perception.
He was facing a Heaven. Be it connected to a golem or Godclad he couldn’t say, but the image of the strange entity vanishing over the blocks of Nu-Scarrowbur came back to him. If that was the eldritch being from where the light sang, then he saw no sign of the machinery of a golem afterward.
More importantly, the golem would have needed to remain disconnected from traffic to avoid the deleterious mem-cons plaguing the Sovereignty.
More and more, he suspected another of his like. Worse, he knew nothing of their true capabilities, and such left him in hostile waters.
He needed to break from this encounter. Re-engage on his terms, and avoid being swallowed by an ambush.
Good thing they seemed just as surprised as he was. A pause followed as no assault followed. The strings of light around him, however, began to bend.
Time to leave.
Inverting the propellers on his Woundshaper, force exploded out of him as he snapped down in an uncontrolled descent. With each noise he made, each decibel generated, more luminous vines spilled over into reality, casting a trail behind him, burrowing inside him.
Snapping all the festering glints of brightness within the threshold of his own blood, he expanded his lattice and hastened his descent. Thankfully, accelerating a fall was easier than facilitating flight, and so like a missile cut from precision guidance, he plunged, gutting through the sound barrier again as brilliant seams unzipped the air behind him.
The numbers on his Phys-Sim spiked. The air around him peeled, then ignited. The spire of the Woundshaper gleamed like a rod of hyper-heated tungsten veined with crystalline circuits. What few aeros impeded his path dissolved outright. Missing the hexagonal opening down to the Warrens, he struck the edge of Layer One at a velocity that would see flesh misted and plascrete rendered dust.
His speed only continued to grow as he invoked his Canon of Haemification to liquefy all matter in his path instead smashing his way through. From a tunnel of erupting crimson, he splashed free, swimming clean from a Woundshaper-cored exit wound.
Numbers climbed in his cog-feed. His Rend rose and roared. Behind him, however, the first strum of a new melody sounded.
And the skin of existence began to tremble.
REND CAPACITY [WOUNDSHAPER]: 63%
Vectoring the path of his Whisper’s perception out from his rearmost lattice, he caught full sight of the violent light enveloping the district behind him. Strings snapped down and the vibration flowed, each whisker of light cascading down as heat and force swelled.
Threading vibrations fused together into the shape of a blinding hammer. The air cooked. Metal melted. The excess blood Avo left behind smeared away into steam and nothingness.
And then, the world shattered in a chain of explosions.
The lip of Layer One—already compromised by Avo’s descent—cracked entirely as alloy chasmed, and through the gaps, spilled toppling structures dotted with screaming people. The true extent of the devastation was masked from Avo as the force of the shockwave tumbled him from a stable course.
Avo felt his form crack briefly as a few tons of mass broke from his control, reverting to mundane spills of blood then hissing away into nothing at all.
Behind him, the cascading blastwaves continued still, with each sound bleeding back into light and heat and force and sound again. The damaged hexagonal portal of Layer One burst free into shredded whorls, the force and heat widening it to twice its original length. The shapes of a few blocks vanished outright. Explosions continued to chain behind him even as nearly seventy tons of Woundshaper plunged diagonally through the glass ceiling of what once stood as a museum of some manner, festooned atop the mass of a megablock.
Expanding his tendrils into reaching threads, he pierced and burrowed into the matter around him as he fought to right his path. Therein came his folly. His wasn’t the Heaven of Forces, its portfolio was that of Matter, Blood, Biology, and Luminosity. The Canon of Haemokinesis allowed him to modify the ichor he wielded, but inertia continued to have its say. Instead of being able to root himself, he felt the shape of the museum come apart around him, plascrete, metal, and glass parting all the same before his tendrils.
More than that, his speed drove him downward yet, dragging through the upper floors of the block beneath as his weaving threads cleaved separations through all that was around him.
More than once, he tasted flesh and drank in new blood.
Someone caught in the crossfire. Then another and another. Essence and ghosts spilled down into the jaws of his Soul, and his crystalline shell supped moments of confusion taken from minds before the consciousnesses fragmented.
THAUMIC OUTPUT - 982 THAUM/c
GHOSTS: [1041]
The FATELESS squatters in the building died without knowing what killed them. As he shot free from the structure, he cast his perception behind and saw the gorge he left in his wake. A network of lacerations lined the great tower-tipped exit wound. It resembled the damage inflicted on a body by a fragmenting slug.
It was a miserable thing, unable to halt your own death–to even see it coming. Such was what it meant to be FATELESS in New Vultun. To be anything less than a Godclad.
Avo wouldn’t go back.
He wouldn’t.
REND CAPACITY [WOUNDSHAPER]: 79%
Combing his tendrils into six aero-sized Echohead constructs, he stretched them out to the wingspan of a near mile, Avo angled himself as best he could to slow himself. A vibration rattled his mind. Behind him, light strung from the damage he inflicted on the block, though it seemed more diminished than it was.
Fire erupted out from cracks and crevices. Over half the building’s windows swelled with light and burst. Flames lanced out five paths. Plasteel warped.
But the block, though it did bend ever more inward afterward, remained standing yet.
A sign that his adversary couldn’t affect matter as he did.
His hooks shattered and affixed themselves in a burst of burrowing roots. Plascrete rose in lashing tides as he drew his constructed limbs tight. Embers flickered around from points of cacophony, and what once were block-bursting blasts simmered down into pop and bursts closer to cheap grenades.
Either his foe was running high on Rend, or he was beyond the vicinity of their influence. Either way, the immediacy of the threat was behind him. Pulling harder, he felt the alloyed spines of the structures he gripped bend as infrastructure parted before the grinding force of his hyper-accelerated ichor.
As he swung himself down and bled the final drips dry from his velocity, he invoked his Canon of Linger and dove free from the shed husk of his Woundshaper. Brushstrokes of light continued to follow the gargantuan hulk of solidified blood as he shifted into the Galeslither and submerged himself in the currents.
He flew blindly afterward, avoiding pockets of heat and flowing fast upon undulating scythes of displaced air.
When he managed to pull away far enough that he could feel the threat of heat triggering his hubris no longer, stitched himself back into existence from a swirling vortex, settling upon the eaves of above an unfinished G-Tube station.
REND CAPACITY [WOUNDSHAPER]: 83%
REND CAPACITY [GALESLITHER]: 42%
There, in the distance, the portrait of his escape called out to him. Debris and ash continued to spew free from the disembowelment he inflicted, with structures built on the edge of Layer One coming free like intestinal ropes of plascrete instead of flesh. His initial penetration had left a critical weakness along the lip of the hexagonal threshold, and the light-infused detonation that followed denuded entire panes of silicon that once served as a backdrop to the simulated skies.
The buildings he impacted were still groaning, enormous rents looking as if a bladed hurricane had torn and shredded its way through the district while a supernova followed in its wake.
More pressingly, however, Avo found his attention pulled back by a vast arc of droning obsidian rumbling itself into existence, a construct of unlight sewn into being by reversing notes and transparent strands. String by string, the colorless markings inched below the flesh of existence and formed into a knot of snakes.

In the end, a vast trail of darkness licked an indelible wound upon the world as screams and the loudness of collapsing buildings suddenly went silent. A hive-like veil shivered over the arching pathway the blackness took from beyond Layer One all the way to where Avo discarded his blood husk.
Attentively, he studied the actions of his unseen foe, and considered the miracles displayed by the Heaven he faced.
If did originate with the sun-headed titan at Nu-Scarrowbur, then its reach was long. Perhaps not in the sense of Mirrorhead and his reflections, but for this Lumenlyrist to detonate manifestations of eldritch radiance from miles placed Avo at a severe ranged disadvantage.
It seemed capable of tracing his movements with sound, but more than that, it could strum a chorus of falling explosions on strings of snapping light, which then cycled the process anew through the volume generated. What he was not certain of was if the explosions were an automatic process, or if the user on the other end was aware of his position, their Heaven operating in the fashion of his Echoheads.
Seeing this stroke of sound-swallowing darkness–the Hell to the Heaven, he assumed–reaching after the last known position of his Woundshaper, it was better to err with caution: He would assume a broadening awareness on the part of their Heaven for now.
But not that broad. He had managed to break from the engagement, after all, shifting back into his Galeslither after he found a spot cool enough. Furthermore, they didn;t know he was here, studying the effects of their powers, watching the Hell slowly return to transparency.
Comparatively, his Woundshaper imbued himself with an excess of speed–though the noise he made was like a perpetually running fuse of dynamite–even if it did fizzle out at the end. He withstood the initial block-erasing blasts well enough, though it hollowed him of some mass. Still, it would be wise of him to avoid direct confrontation. Which didn’t seem to offer much endurance, but the damage was still close to that delivered by a mini-nuke.
After a few moments more of deliberation, Avo descended the station by venting Woundshaper’s Rend through it, carving a pathway in and out the interior of the stop shearing away another section to the tubes. After dissolving much of the architecture, he flicked a look at his timer and winced.
One minute and Fifty-one seconds. It would be close. He considered his excursion to be a half-success at best, but at least he had some idea of the severity of the situation. He needed to think. And potentially build Nether-redundant ghost circuits into the EGI Core. For now, he could interface with it via alchemized matter.
Exercising caution, he kept to the Galeslither and galloped hard for the gateway. Winds squealed as he gushed through the alleyways and reconstituted himself in his mortal form. Twelve seconds.
He needed to think. He needed to consider his approach. No movement was coming from Conflux, but from this recent skirmish, Conflux had a less than zero odds of surviving an engagement with the forces currently arrayed in Nu-Scarrowbur.
More and more, Mirrorhead’s death was writ in a substance deeper than fate itself; the divine hands of his adversaries conspired and worked, crafting a future in which they were the ones to use up his, and amongst these groping forces was Avo himself, bumping into foes unseen.
Before him, the shadows of the alley spiraled inward as a tunnel formed. As the doors flung open at the end, the first thing that greeted him was the flash of a chrome barrel. Draus took it off his person the moment she recognized him.
“So,” Draus shouted, gesturing for him to enter quickly. “How’s the lay of the chaos lookin’.”

“Bright,” Avo grunted. He doubled his pace with help from his Echoheads. “Loud. At least one other Godclad on the scene. Stormtree mostly likely. Hit me miles away from Nu-Scarrowbur. More problems. Mem-cons in the traffic lanes–”

Draus placed a hand on his shoulder. “Before you go in–”

Zein flickered into existence between the two of them. She was barely at Draus nose and didn’t even reach Avo’s lower chest, yet she pushed them apart with contempt and ease. She strode past them looking uncharacteristically upset. “Come. We have much to discuss. Regular, bring the Agnos. Tell her it is fine if she cries, so long as she continues to be of use. Avo, I wish to stab and kill you at least three times. Vent one of your Hells if you have not already. My annoyance is great with you.”

Avo blinked. Draus did a double-take as Thousandhand shouldered past both of them. “The fuck did she come from.”

The better question was probably from when she arrived.
“Cease your gawking. Especially you, little dagger. You have no right to act the fool for your sins.”

Draus shot Avo a look. He made his Echoheads shrug on his behalf. “My sins?” Avo asked. He followed Zein into the nexus. “What sins? I was thinking this was all your fault. That this was part of your… ‘distraction.’”

She stopped. Then, she was right in front of him, index finger placed upon his chest as spoke up at him with narrowed eyes behind her transparent visor. “Perform this service of recollection for me, little dagger. Did you, perchance, possibly, tell the Hungers and the demented collection of personality flaws constituting your parental alternates that ‘Ninth Column sends their regards?’”

Oh. That.
“So. Did you get them?”

“I–uh… Don’t know, Reva.”

“...You don’t know.”

“Well, it sure as shit wasn’t a golem. No wreck, and it drew my symphonies all the way down into the gutters. Instead of a cooked Galeslither rupturing, there’s a big Sangeist-looking clump of blood down there and a whole lot of collateral. It was channeling some kind of glassy-looking material too. No idea what it is.”
“Huh. I’ll see if I can find an injury down there. Take a peek at the scene. Might be a carry-on for the Galeslither.”

“Might be. Might be.”
“Yep. Think there’s another ‘Clad in play?”

“I think we might not be fully aware of what Greatling’s still got in his sheath. I say we get Root and Ullens together and seize the moment. Hey, your uncle had that… uh… those tech-relics, right? Ones from that Omnitech dealer? The little… uh… radios? Might let us stay synced while the Nether unfucks itself.”

“Oh. Yeah. Those. Pain in the ass to work, really. They don’t listen to your thoughts.”
“What? Then how the fuck do you get them to do things?”
[Sighs] “Well, there's this dial, or something…”


-Conversation between Reva Javvers and “Tigertail,” Bloodthanes of Stormtree
10-11
Pivot
In Avo’s defense, he hadn’t known Zein at the time. The words he spat were a deliberate attempt to direct the Low Masters toward another unknown variable that had been troubling him. That was still troubling him.
Aside from Zein herself, Ninth Column remained shrouded in shadow and mystery. Thus, their inscrutability appealed to him as a distraction to invoke–one hidden leviathan to draw away another.
He simply hadn’t expected his former masters to be so… brazen.
“It,” Zein began, gesticulating in the air, her fingers reaching for something lost to touch but present in her memory, “was going to be a masterwork. I had infiltrated all the necessary systems, killed all the unnecessary people, pierced all manner of defenses, and stood poised to deliver the final drip to my cocktail of chaos then–”
She blinked behind each of the thrones, her fists and feet exploding into violence as nano-armored skin clanged against the ancient chairs. Within a fraction of a second, she snapped back across time to stand before Avo, her transition as if a rubberband releasing all its built-up energy.
“The embarrassing excuse of a tumor attacked me. It attacked me, little dagger. It attacked me before I could deliver the blow.” Her breath took on a demented quality, words a near snarl on her tongue. “Do you know what it is like? To feel the moment close–so close! And then… a giant… knot of autophagic idiocy comes tearing through my well-laid plans?”
Avo did in fact know how she felt. But much like a flechette long loosed from its rails, Zein wasn’t going to stop for something as small as empathy.
The Fisher snapped free from her being, rising into reality on its hook. Again, the forking paths of the future twisted out from her, but this time, lines trained below her as well, like spreading veins descending below the air in reflection to the branches above.
Her finger twitched and countless moments of pasts could have been coalesced, rushing through all who were gathered. Knowledge of Zein’s operations suddenly just was. Through her eyes, Avo recalled a massacre of increments, skimming across the surface of time and conducting murder after murder.
Within a day she had danced across three Highflame majority-owned districts in the Undercroft; lowest of the Tiers. Asginstrad, Telamander, and Akkata of the Seranando Sovereignty exploded into infighting and violence. Through a vicarious glimpse from Zein’s perspective, her slaughter was brutal, but methodical–conducted with focus and intent.
Unlike how Avo laced the Nether lobby down in the gutters, Zein preferred her atrocities to be of flesh-on-flesh, blood-on-blood. By disinterest or deficiency in capability, she used her Metamind only as a shield and never as a blade, choosing instead to turn the districts against each other in the oldest fashion she could recall.
Asginstrad and Akkata were Chivalric-ruled places–part thaumic factories dedicated to the production of varieties of new golems and specialized Wights, part warrior foundry dedicated to the training of new fighting stock from those colored by the Highflame creed. Telamander, however, though once a part of Asginstrad and Akkata, now belonged to one Santanado “Starsinger” Mondelles–a former combat instructor at Axtraxis Academy.
This was the second time Avo heard the man’s name.
Santanado Mondelles was an ardent foe of the Chivalrics according to Draus. And possibly a Godclad once serviced by Kae. Here he was again, a part of Zein’s plot to trigger internal hostilities within Highflame.
Not that he needed much incentivization.
“Three thousand kills,” Zein said. She tweaked the holograms dancing atop her palm with her fingers. Points exploded across the districts as strings of data spilled out, each stating a different act of sabotage. “Such paltry effort to trigger fated internecine.” A low chuckle came from her throat. Past the oscillations of light, Avo could see Draus glowering at Zein.
A gallery of mutilated bodies played in subinterfaces. Executives from Dawnforge Industries lay in pieces after a Rend-bomb went off in their offices. Highflame Administrators were beheaded and mutilated, bodies stripped naked with the words ‘unworthy.’ Carved into them. From each crime scene was a memory left by hired squires or other off-book assets favored by the rival factions.
After that, the strings just kept exploding, each one cascading into a building avalanche of in-fighting that eventually spilled over into the streets.
“Real neat,” Draus said, not bothering to hide the disgust she had for Zein’s subterfuge. “But I don’t see how this matches what the rotlick here pulled. Way I see it, you just led two starvin’ nu-dogs to the same pen and had ‘em get bloody. This fight was comin’. No other way about it. You just made it happen faster.”

Zein craned her neck in a half concession. “Indeed. Indeed. I applaud Higher Santanado’s proactivity–it was a delight to see some among Highflame’s number still embodying the values my daughter set for them. He already had preparations, you see. A plan to shame his rivals further and elevate himself before the Seraphs.”

“And how’s that? The Chivs might’ve fucked the shine out of their names with the last war, but they still got plenty of hold on the mid-lines. Won’t be knocking them loose from their branches anytime soon without another–” Draus’ voice trailed off. “What were you plannin’ to do after they started fighting.”

A wry glint shone in Thousandhand’s eyes. She turned to face Avo. “I wanted you to ask the question.”

“More interested in how the Hungers are involved.”

“That is the outcome of the story. Do not skip to the end of the killing, little dagger. Relish is discovered through the process.” Waving away the districts, a new edifice rose with a gesture from her hand, its presence like a crosshair-shaped gate emerging into reality.
Its materialization provoked a response from Draus, unfolding her arms and leaning in. “That’s a Boundryeater.”

“A completed Boundryeater,” Zein added.
With four needles of quivering light sunken into the flesh of space itself, the inner core of the ring was comprised of twin gears spinning in opposite directions. Between the metal were prolapses of soft, brain-like tissue, with circuits connected to the furrows.
“A golem of wondrous design,” Zein said, holding the construct aloft as if she was extolling its virtues. “Think of this: You offer this machine a substance–or even a thought. And should that thing lie within its sphere of influence–dictated by the reach of its luminosity–it would be capable of instantaneously snatching your desired target from its listed location. No need to track them. Just feed the golem all the necessary offerings, check if your target is protected by any spatial anchors, and there–easy killing.”

“It’s a Meritocrat project,” Draus explained. “A cross-collaborative effort with the No-Dragons and Omnitech. Sometin’ the Chivalrics didn’t much like, seein’ as it was ‘beholding Highflame to indirect interests.’ Seraphs were packed with Chivalrics then too, so it didn’t get the imps it needed to start rollin’.” She paused. “Would’ve been a nifty thing to have through all that fightin’. For supplies, even.”

“Well,” Zein said, “a mistake is only a mistake until it is remedied. My daughter, stubborn and independent though she might be, is capable of learning, though I loathe admitting my failings in instilling in her this habit of inflexibility. She approved Santanado project. And courted ire while doing so, much as she loathes that. A flaw from her father, I’m afraid. Never desire to be feared and loved at once, little dagger. It makes you a parody of yourself.”


Avo wondered if the actual “mistake” that young Veylis suffered was having Zein as a mother and Jaus as a father. To live in the world of such extremes and iconography must sculpt the mind into a mindscape most unique.
He suddenly found himself interested in what traumas could be claimed from the High Seraph of Highflame, and if any of them could be fashioned from Zein herself.
Zein continued. “My goal was simple: I wished to inspire theft through the hand of the Chivalrics. To kill and provoke in just the right way so they attempt to kill and steal the construct for themselves.” Her expression turned near feral. “And afterward, I would take it from them and leave hints of Ori-Thaum presence at the scene.”

A chain of false flags. The last one implicating the Chivalrics working with Highflame’s most despised adversary. Zein wasn’t trying to start one civil conflict, she was making multiple fissures between groups and striking the group between to see the cracks joined. Even other Chivalrics would need to disavow “ties” to the operation.
And a flash of understanding followed thereafter. “Boundryeater. You were going to take it and give it to me if I figured this out.”

No open admission came from Zein, but silence was admission with how she acted. She shrugged. “A shame what happened. I was going to use it to do many things, kill so many people.” She laughed. “Three hundred thousand nullings.” She shook her head. “I would have surpassed that in an hour with this and my glaive. And none among them mere simple FATED seeking the degeneracy of unearned pleasure; finding pleasure in deaths not committed at their own hands. I was going to kill Guilders. Key problems. Fallwalkers that could destabilize things–”

“Me,” Avo said. “Probably still have some of my blood. Maybe a memory. Could use that.”

“I could,” Zein said. “Or I could have you give me the Helix, and using it, we could see if it would offer us a solution to the problem of your family once and for all.” She looked aside. “But it was not to be. They found me too soon, you see. Their nodes have grown bold–too bold perhaps. And now the games once played in the dark have spilled into the light.”
“The Thoughtwave Detonation. That was Highflame?” Avo asked.
“Yes,” Zein said. “They revealed too much of themselves while trying to hunt me, let their poisons spread too far and loud through the districts while they tried to burn away my mind.” She chuckled. “I think they were trying to use the city’s systems to kill me. It was a very subtle effort. Very subtle, and well coordinated. Only a shame their cage was not complete enough.”
Avo wondered just how much the Low Masters knew of Zein Thousandhand’s capabilities. Even he himself lacked full awareness of her canons and hubrises, only that time was as if clay to her will, though forward was the only direction she ever seemed to move.
“This why mem-cons broke the traffic lanes?” He manifested a locus of blood and expanded it into a lattice. Subtly mocking Zein’s display of coldtech, his interconnected network of blood allowed phantoms to dance into shape, spelling out sequences of mem-cons for all to see, lines of mem-data running below garbled memories. “They overreached? You jumped across time? They missed. Kept missing. Hit critical infrastructure instead?”

She sighed. “Do not insult your father’s people. Most systems were already turned by them. It was only the corruption that was dormant. It was only after they started using Highflame golems to burn me from the world that the local mind-priests–agh, Necros–noticed them.”
“Highflame knows?” Avo asked. “Knows about the Low Masters surviving? The Hungers?”

“They know that someone crippled three districts, took control of twelve-thousand golems, burning and nulling everything in their path for reasons unknown.” She put her hands up in a shrug. “It will take time for them to put the pieces together–if they ever do. All the Necros who noticed died, you see. Sudden nullings.” Zein put her lips together. “In the end, it seems that I was not the one to beat your efforts. A pity.”

No words for the countless lives that must’ve died in the crossfire. No consideration of the damages caused. Zein, like all the other Godclads, was driven by personal interest alone. It occurred to Avo that he was likely only alive due to the inclinations of her personal character, and that he didn’t know how the rest of Ninth Column felt about this mess.
“And now I fear this might bring the Chivalrics and Meritocrats closer together.” Zein sighed. “The longer the former remains, the weaker Highflame becomes. We cannot have them lose the war yet, Avo–we cannot. The other two cannot hold the stalemate without them.”

“You need something from the Guilds remaining stable,” Avo said. “Why you're keeping the stalemate.”
“That much is obvious–”

“Is it for the tower?”

An anticipatory expression came over her face. She didn’t finish the sentence. A strange sensation twisted inside Avo. The feeling that she was provoking him in some unseen way, coaxing him down a path of development favorable to her.
A growing disquiet filled him. The weight of paranoia descended in full. How could he be the master of his own future when Zein likely saw this conversation coming, and shifted the tracks of their dialogue at her own leisure?
What worth was there in having individual will if the opposition was guiding you on an unseen leash made by strands of fate parted across mutations of time?
Yet, before apprehension managed to ascend into dread, Avo found himself looking at Kae. Zein seemed to have a hard time predicting the actions of the Agnos. And her plot was undone by the Low Masters, they way she spoke of them like they were unseen factors.
There was a limit to her Heaven. There must be a limit to her Heaven. If not, why was she here, fighting in the shadows, playing the role of a spider instead of a warrior.

He needed to find the borders of Zein’s reach. Build things beyond it. He would not be a victim of her machinations. He had grown too much, and come too far to let his choices be compromised.
“Yes,” the Woundshaper whispered. “You see the face of the enemy now. Finally.”
“Zein?”
“Everything that we are not is an enemy. Every vector that we do not control can turn against us. The tapestry is all, but all except our corner offers refuge to adversaries, past and to be. Which is why you must root me deeper–”
Avo muted his Woundshaper. Ironically, it was the Heavens own words that made him silence it.
It, too, was trying to compromise him, its recent words driving him toward granting it more power, expanding its might and letting it experience the swell of godhood even if it was to be vicarious.
He needed a way to think. To consider everything uninfluenced by all the feedback around him. Again, he felt the draw of Req’s memory, and though the Nether blocked his mem-lock, Avo ran it through his Metamind.
A vicarious experience. Something rarely felt, a moment he would never experience on his own.
The need suddenly revealed itself to Avo. He needed to gaze inward at himself. He needed to bask in his own totality. When he was compromised within and without, he needed another angle to view himself. New angles away that might be untainted by Zein, by other beings warped by self-interest.
Avo had his Echoheads chitter. The shapes of different bodies splashed into his senses as a static field formed in his mind. Around the table were Draus, Zein, and Kae. Apart from them in the corner of the room–but still listening–was Chambers.
Only Essus stood away in the dark, uninterested in talk of schemes and chaos, choosing to stare out into the dark instead.

There was something there in the father. Kae. And maybe Chambers. Something he could use to better view himself. To avoid…
Subversion.
“You have taken the qualities of a locus in your blood, yes?” Zein asked, wrenching his focus back. “This is good. Very good. This amplification of your capabilities will serve you quite well for what is to come.”

“And what is to come?” Draus asked pointedly. She shared a look with Avo. They had their plans for the future. New angles to pivot. Zein being here changed that dynamic.
“Oh, do not start growling at me like I’ve come to take your precious retribution away,” Zein said, shaking her head at them. “Rejoice: We will still be working toward the death of Jhred Greatling. It's just that… I need a little more out of him now. More than even before.”

“And how’s that?” Avo asked.
And the playfulness bled out from Zein’s face. “Words are treacherous things, little dagger. It always scared me how the simple things we say can destroy so many futures.” She paused. “This moment of atrocity. It will be a… communal thing for Highflame. A unifying wound between both factions for how they all seem to have suffered. This cannot be allowed. The Chivalrics must be broken. House Greatling must shatter. And Ambassador Valhu, tragically, now must die.”
“Higher Greatling, the Authority–”

“Can’t be contacted right now, so our orders still stand. Right now, our target is at risk and—“
“Abrel. We know why we’re here. The bullshit’s for the Authorities. We’re your cadre. Just say the word.”

“…Thanks, Zenna.”
“Sure. Maybe don’t disembowel me next time we spar?”
“I’ll think about it.”
-Abrel Greatling to Zenna eld’Erich, Instruments of Highflame
10-12
The Foreseen and Unexpected
“Jaus, the Ambassador?” Draus muttered, “Everyone wants the poor half-strand snuffed. Mirrorhead. His own people. Now you.”

Zein opened her mouth to speak but paused. “... Ori-Thaum? They wish Valhu dead as well? Truly?”

“Ran into some Incubi,” Avo said.

“What?” Zein said. Suddenly, she snapped over next to Avo. She was looking up at him, a hand braced against the table. “Incubi… you faced the Incubi? And they wanted Valhu dead as well?”

A screen of flowing ichor spilled out from Avo, its crimson sheen aglow with dancing phantoms playing past memories. Brief flashes from his engagement against the Incubi played within a blood-made theater, and as the flashing traumas clashing against wards lit Zein’s blank expression, he found himself pleased.
Another matter she seemed ignorant of. Another blindspot perhaps. Did her control over foresight only cover things she was aware of? Or directly related to her?
“This should not be,” Zein finally said. She sounded more curious than surprised. “Kitzuhada was meant to deepen their peace with Stormtree. If there are elements within the Ori’s glaives or orders from the Mirrors, then something has changed within Ori-Thaum itself. The Five Annals should be in accord with his proposals. Something twisting the fabric of its leadership.”
She clicked her tongue as she pondered the implications. “This… will prove to be interesting." A sharp cackle escaped from her. “My people never change.”
Avo looked to Draus but the Regular seemed as lost as he.
“Ori-political shit?” Draus asked.
“Quite so,” Zein said, letting out an amused breath. “A path most unlikely has come to take prominence. Just as the Chivalrics had humiliated Highflame in the last war, Ori-thaum had their own Mirrors and Elders losing favor within the Diet. The electoral body cast many aside after the war, many from families and lines of great prominence. The old blood runs thick in the Ori and the Kosgans. For all our differences, it is the fault we share: The delusions of entrenched gerontocracy.”

Draus snorted, understanding filling her face like she was imbibing fetid water. “That’s all it is, ain’t it? Shiftin’ power and desperate ploys to hold on.”

“The singers change, but the music stays the same.” Zein offered an apologetic glance. “I pity you, girl.”

The Regular sneered. “And how’s that?”

“You did not get the war you deserved. The fight you deserved. No?” Zein gestured to Avo. She didn’t need words to hint at what she meant. “Alas. We suffer the path we stumble upon and not the one we dream of.” She turned to regard Avo again and offered him a begrudging nod. “You broke some of the mind-priests. This is good. This is a feat of arms. Bear it well, but do not be drunk on it. Build upon it, and soon skill will become mastery.”

Leave it Zein to do a segue toward complimenting someone’s combative prowess in the middle of scheming and plotting.
Mustering her Heaven again, countless threads of time reeled around her in a spiraling staircase. Zein briefly flickered in and out of existence, her being like a dying lightbulb from an old Voidwatch movie. Countless futures came rushing like a tide, but the chaos of everything happening at the intersection that was Zein made events impossible to parse.
The moment ended as soon as it began, but now Zein was standing next to Kae. The Agnos did not respond immediately. For a long moment, she just stared at the place where Zein was, unsure if she had simply forgotten the old woman walking away or if Thousandhand had used her Heaven.


“Agnos Kusanade,” Zein began. Kae jumped this time, but Draus was next to her, glaring down at the Godclad.
“Walk over like a normal half-strand,” Draus drawled. She steadied Kae as the Agnos looked around. Strangely, Avo found her eyes drifting more toward him. Or perhaps not so strange. He was the only other Godclad here, after all. “Ain’t no need for that.”

“I’m skipping past the pointlessness,” Zein said, brushing aside the Regular’s annoyance. She placed a surprisingly gentle hand on Kae’s right shoulder as if challenging Draus to a battle of interpersonal influence. “Agnos Kusanade. We will need the details of Jhred Greatling’s Heaven and Hell. Avo. Come over. It is time you learned to make prey of your own kind.” She paused and laughed. “Again.”


Looking up warily at Zein, Kae did not seem reassured when the older woman offered her a flat, unassuming expression.
“I promise you, Kae. You are the last person I kill in the room in certain futures. In most, I don’t kill you at all. There is no testament in such an act–no pleasure.” She flicked her eyes up at Draus and licked her lips when she studied Avo. And surprisingly, Chambers.

“Any time you want it, Thousandhand,” Draus said, words spat out between near-clenched teeth. Avo guided his blood out in a weave around them, subtle reaching brambles over to Draus while directing other flows to circle behind Zein.
The Nether was down, but not for him. Maybe Thousandhand could see the future. But if he bent the environment sufficiently to his advantage, maybe the paths of time would be pruned.

Maybe there would be a single path that only ended in defeat.
Looking Draus up and down, an expression of pure malice became Zein. “You are a wonderfully frustrating girl, Guard-Captain Draus. And you are totally and completely wasted down in this pit. Perhaps death at my sword would be a better fate than the suicide by limbo you seek.”

Draus ran her tongue across her teeth now. She flexed her fingers. Avo threaded a cord of blood into her flesh and cast his influence inside her. At a thought, her session came back online.
+Draus. I’m weaving blood around her. Doubt she’ll attack. Still hit her together if she tries.+
It was a testament to Draus’ reflexes and experience under pressure that she betrayed nothing of Avo’s presence in her mind. Still, linked to her Meta, he could taste the waters of her surprise.
And gratitude.
+Good odds she’ll snuff us both,+ Draus replied.
+Odds are she might do it anyway,+ Avo said. +She knows the attack coming. But still. Best chances together. No Nether on her end. Might null her if I can get through.+
A chuckle came from Draus. +You’re a real optimist, consang.+
And just then, Zein turned and winked at him. Again, the feeling that he was being strung along, that they were all being strung along slipped into his mind. With a barely suppressed growl, he spread his hair-thin roots of blood further outward, connecting to Chambers and Essus as well.
The father shuddered. The former enforcer cursed loud and clutched his head in shock.
Zein’s smile only grew. He noticed her index finger twitching around the hilt of her umbrella. She cocked her head and took a step away from Kae. “We will sample violence from each other someday, Guard-Captain. Rejoice on that.”

Draus glowered. “Not now? Am I makin’ mean ol’ Zein Thousandhand have second thoughts?”

“It would not be proper for the guest to shed blood in the host’s house,” Zein said.
Considering Zein had done a copious amount of drugs in this very room, her excuse of etiquette was laughable at best.
Draus spat. The ball of phlegm sailed far and splattered against the ground. The metamatter drank it in and disposed of the waste. “Now don’t go civilizin’ yourself on my behalf.”
Zein’s hand tightened around the hilt of her umbrella. Avo snaked his blood closer behind her, mere feet away. Across the room, Essus stood and faced the older woman, his eyes burning red as his servos grunted in anger.
Chambers did the only thing he could. “Heya, this is–ah–well and good but… I was really interested in what uh–” he pointed desperately at Kae, “she was supposed to say about the boss’ Frame or some shit, so… I mean, we should really let her talk.”


Thousandhand unclenched her umbrella, and Avo heard her let out a small but satisfied breath. She gestured at Draus while looking at Avo, her fingers tracing the outline of the Regular, but twisting, changing, like the other woman was clay to be sculpted into shape. “We will speak of my civility should you survive what is to come. Agnos, I apologize for the digression. Details about the Greatling’s Frame, if you would please.”

Slowly, Kae looked back at Avo and he nodded.
He didn’t know what Zein was planning for Mirrorhead. Or the Ambassador by this point. All he knew was that he planned on going over the details with Kae even before Zein intruded on their dive.
Sending his blood climbing upon the table, he injected phantoms into a sphere-like construct of blood, within which Kae would be able to interface with the simulated mem-data. Functionally, it would be like a Nether lobby, but in the real.
Insight flashed in Avo’s mind. Perhaps he could use this method to build cages or partitions for himself. Or use it to choke Nether traffic in specific instances.
Awkwardly, Kae reached her hand into the blood, and Avo took care not to stain her. Using his Haemokinesis, she contacted only his phantoms. From her shaking fingers, she entered the requisite mem-data she remembered, the flames consuming her mind splashing as her exo-cortex warred against her ever-eroding memory.
SPHERE IV - BROADSWORD PATTERN LIMINAL FRAME
THAUMIC OUTPUT - 1002 THAUM/c
HEAVEN - TWICE-WALKER
->DOMAIN: (REFLECTION/SPACE/RADIANCE/GLASS)
->THAUMIC REQUIREMENTS - 554 THAUM/c
DOMAIN OF (SPACE)
CANON: DICHOTOMY’S JUNCTION - ALLOWS THE MASTER OF THIS CANON TO BIND TWO PHYSICAL STRUCTURES OF AESTHETIC RESEMBLANCE; THE MASTER OF THIS CANON CAN FORM TWELVE CONNECTIONS BETWEEN DIFFERENT OBJECTS
CANON: LIMINAL PARACOSMOS - A DEMIPLANAR TUNNEL OR PATHWAY CAN BE CREATED BETWEEN BOUND OBJECTS; UP TO SIX TUNNELS CAN BE CREATED WITH INTERSECTIONS BETWEEN THEM FORMING STABLE POINTS POCKETS OF PLANAR REALITY
HUBRIS: IF BOTH SETS OF A BINDING ARE DESTROYED AT THE SAME TIME, IT WILL RESULT IN THAUMIC BACKLASH
DOMAIN OF (RADIANCE)
CANON: CHAINS OF THE PASSING SHINE - ALLOWS THE MASTER OF THIS CANON TO DRAW IN ALL SOURCES OF LIGHT AND RADIANCE INTO A REFLECTIVE CONSTRUCT; THE HEAT WITHIN THE CONSTRUCT WILL GROW WITH EVERY SOURCE OF LIGHT STORED UNTIL DESTABILIZATION
HUBRIS: IF THE LIGHT-CHAINING CONSTRUCT IS RAPIDLY COOLED, IT WILL GENERATE THAUMIC BACKLASH
DOMAIN OF (GLASS)
CANON: HYALOFICATION - THE MASTER OF THIS CANON CAN TURN SOLID MATTER INTO GLASS; ONLY 500 TONS OF GLASS CAN BE TURNED AT ONCE
CANON: HYALOKINESIS - THE MASTER OF THIS CANON CAN MANIPULATE ALL GLASS AT UP TO A TWO-THOUSAND FEET RANGE AND MOVE UP TO FIVE-HUNDRED TONS OF GLASS
HUBRIS: IF THE GLASS-MATTER CONTROLLED BY THE MASTER IS UNMADE WHILE THEY ARE STILL INFLUENCING, IT WILL TRIGGER THAUMIC BACKLASH
DOMAIN OF (REFLECTION)
CANON: SYMMETRIZATION - THE MASTER OF THIS CANON CAN OVERLAP THE ONTOLOGICAL NATURE OF TWO PHYSICAL OBJECTS AND FORCE THEM TO MIRROR THE SHAPE AND CONDITION OF THE OTHER WITH EACH CHANGE INFLICTED
HUBRIS: SHOULD EITHER PHYSICAL OBJECT BE DESTROYED IN CONFLICTING WAYS (I.E. ONE SHATTERED FROM ICE WHILE THE OTHER IS MELTED) AT THE SAME TIME, IT WILL TRIGGER THAUMIC BACKLASH
HELL - [THIRD CIRCLE] - TWICE-WALKER
->DOMAIN: (REFLECTION/ENTROPY)
->THAUMIC REQUIREMENTS: 414 THAUM/c
CANON: DIFFUSION SINGULARIUM - THE MASTER OF THIS DOMAIN EXPELS AND COMMANDS ALL LIGHT TOUCHED BY THEIR OWN ONTOLOGY TO SCOOP OUT PIECES OF SPACE AND CONCENTRATE IT INTO A SINGLE POINT IN REALITY, WHEREUPON ITS PLANE WILL COLLAPSE AND EXPAND RAPIDLY IN AN EXPLOSION OF DISPLACED SPATIAL REALITY
DAEMON: SHOULD NON-SOLID MATTER BE DRAWN IN AND RESHAPED BY THE LIGHT, the SINGULARIUM WILL BURST APART AND BIRTH AN ANATHEMA OF REFLECTION TO SERVE AS THE MASTER’S ANATHEMA; THE ANATHEMA CANNOT BE SLAIN AND MUST BE STARVED
They all spent a moment reviewing the details then. The mem-data Avo had was clouded in mythological interpretations and other details regarding supposed lore-based feats. Yet, from that, Kae was able to compile a series of comprehensible domains, canons, and hubrises to review.
The first thing that occurred to him was Mirrorhead's ontological build. The Guilder might’ve been of the Fourth Sphere, but he only had a single cycler, with two ontologic slots.
Why?

“No second cycler?” Avo asked.
“Y-yes,” Kae said, frowning. “This is… an extreme case. It-it seems that… that Jhred Greatling is very much a tower.” She paused and winced. “Too much a t-tower. This… this is terrible. W-what… what is this? Who… uh, allowed this?”

The Agnos was actually fuming, despite the revelation of Mirrorhead’s vulnerability. On some level, Avo understood. The Conflux Necros were incompetent and thus were more soft meat to occupy his teeth rather than true adversaries to test his mettle. It made his dive easier, but seeing their failings offended him on a philosophical level.
“It's a merit thing,” Draus said. “Them Guilder kids need to test for their Heavens. Frames. Earn enough merits and you got an inventory to pick from. The fact he only has one cycler though? That tracks for if you’re backline or if you haven’t managed to graduate yet. Looks like Jhred here ran off before he was finished with his education.”

A hum of surprise came from Chambers. “So… the boss did so bad at fancy clad-school that he graduated with half the god-bits?” He wrinkled his nose. “Well. I guess he’s a bit like us after all.”

Zein grunted a laugh at that. She blinked behind Chambers, putting her hands on the former enforcer’s shoulders. “Chambers. You survived.” She looked to Avo. “Good job. Having the ‘ultimate half-strand’ will come useful down many of the paths.”

Chambers went board-stiff as Thousandhand petted him like he was a nu-dog. “I–uh…” The man swallowed. “I never told anyone–”

“Not yet,” Zein said. “But you like to talk. And you are so very fragile. There are times you tell much things–such truths–that everything inside you comes out, and your mind shatters because the perfect disharmony protecting you collapses. Those are the worst futures. The way you scream is no different than the noise you made as a child when your father pressed the barrel of his gun under your armpit.”

The color fled from Chambers’ face. His mind went dull as a storm of spiking dread and mounting shame filled him. Reflexively, the enforcer swallowed and placed a palm over his mouth, covering his face as if a shy child. Inside, a spring of horror lurched repeatedly. “Well. Uh. I mean, we’ve all been juvs once, right?” He laughed. The note of his amusement wasn’t very convincing.
Zein humored him anyway. “True. Very true. Stay yourself, Chambers. You suit the city quite well.” She patted him again, but this time her palm graced his cheek. Afterward, she shot Essus a brief look and did a double-take. She pointed at the former father and looked toward Avo. “Bring him with you too. There is promise in one of the paths.”

If Essus cared for Zein’s prophecy, he didn’t show it.

She blinked back over to Avo. Studying him momentarily, her eyes swiveled as she thought, considering the next steps. “The paths have changed again. Little dagger. I would to trade with you a favor. An act for an act. Memories for memories.”

Suspicion battled interest within Avo. Zein was manipulating him–manipulating everyone present. Of that, there was no doubt. But she also had knowledge far beyond his, the reach of her perception a thing of purest envy. If he could use her Heaven with his Necrojacking, there would be no ward he couldn’t spoof, no mind he couldn’t crack.
He shot Draus and look and she bowed her head. He offered her support before. Now she was waiting for him to respond.

“What’s the trade? What do you want.”

A vicious grin marred Zein’s face. And suddenly, Avo wasn’t sure if he was making a mistake or not. “The same thing as you. The Greatling boy dead. But I need to give Ambassador Kitzuhada something first. And you need an opening to distract the Bloodthanes in the district across, no?”

She knew about the Bloodthanes. Or could know. That would be indispensable. It would give him better odds of staying alive, anyway.
“What memory?” Avo asked.
“Sequences from the Incubi. One with the details about the Ambassador. And after that, I need you to do something to Jhred Greatling…”
“Shepherd-Alpha, this is Sunrise. The people down here need immediate assistance. The golems are still active and hostile. Local Highflame forces managed to overload two knots, but the rest are still active and now there's a Rupture in the middle of the district.
Thermodynamics isn’t working right here. Anything that exceeds thirty degrees Celsius is slowly being petrified from the inside by a silicon-based endoskeleton. Whoever managed to compromise the Nether is still at large.
Recommend deployment of all non-sapient assets to assist Paladins pending arrival–Wait, the golems… I see a Knot. It looks like they’re trying to hunt for something… Or someone… I’m sending the rest of my swarm after them. Will follow as long as feasible and certify potential Godclad presence in exclusion zones.
Narrowing comm-gauge wormholes for discretion.
-”Sunrise,” Aegis Operative, Voidwatch


10-13
Desired Paths
The fate Zein wished Mirrorhead to suffer was one of delicious degradation.
She ejected a mixed sequence of memories and offered them to Avo. At first, he wasn’t sure what she wanted of him, but as scenes played and a grander image formed in a transparent interface within his Metamind, he understood.
She was installing Mirrorhead in place of herself as the patsy responsible for the devastation she wrought in the besieged Highflame districts.
In fact, Jhred Greatling was to be made patsy before all related parties. To the Chivalrics, it would seem he was deliberately provoking a war against the Meritocrats. For the Meritocrats, such actions would look a deliberately planned operation toward subterfuge–one conducted using Incubi backing at that.
Connected to the deception were the sequences she wanted from the plot to assassinate Ambassador Kitzuhada. Though he wasn’t certain about how she was to manipulate the ambassador, an Incubi cell was almost certainly going to be compromised in the aftermath.
Though Avo was ignorant of the vastness of the board on which Zein played her games of divination and prophecy, he had been a Necro long enough to see a con-job in the making before him. And on the fly at that. Again, he found himself envious of her powers over time, still wondering about its gaps.
Omniscience remained beyond her with her surprise at the Low Masters and the Incubi, but with her new awareness, it seemed that time was once against re-railed upon new tracks which she could predict.
“His involvement,” Avo asked, still scanning through the mem-data. “How direct do you want it to seem? Have memories from his ‘benefactor.’ Another Incubus. Pretended to be Stormtree asset.”

Zein considered his question. Her fingers fell in a clattering series against the hilt of her umbrella. “Direct. First-degree. But leave some information from this benefactor as well. It will be… amusing to make it seem like they helped him commit these actions. Another falsehood for the Ori to bury, unsure if it was of their own design or someone else.”

Avo grunted a low laugh. That was the problem with operating in isolated cells: Paranoia within the ranks. Even Necros on good terms didn’t trust each other much. You never knew when one of your consangs sold out and got recruited into the Incubi or just ended up subverted. The same was probably true between the Mirrors and Elders. When you base your factional ethos on deception and lies, the blade cut both ways, and it would take more than a little effort for the fog to be cleared.
“Still going to kill the ambassador?” Avo asked. “Seems like you’re making another change.”

“Yes,” Zein said, not even bothering to hide her capricious shift in arrangements. “For the better, I think. Valhu is a good Glaive. A good warrior. A noble man. I would have regretted wasting him on an unjust fate to trigger the reactions I desire.”

Unjust. Good warrior. A noble man. Zein had a diet as well, and her favored prey trended away from those she regarded as worthy. How strange it was that one of the few remaining legends of the Ori held such a Highflame philosophy toward life.
Veylis had to get it from somewhere, he supposed.
“Take all of them with you. They will all prove useful as circumstances develop. All except her.” Zein gestured toward Kae. The Agnos winced and looked away. Something about the intensity of Thousandhand’s attention disquieted her. “The Agnos will be important for what comes next. Her mind should take the next ladder of priority after Jhred Greatling’s removal from the paths. We will need what she knows of Project Godshaper for what is to come.”
Zein’s expression softened thereafter. She offered Kae an apologetic glance. “I would offer much-required recollections in your stead if I could clean them from the paths, but it is more than memory and a whole mind that will be needed from you. The Agnosi themselves are compromised and must be righted. Steel yourself. You will not like what is to come.”
Spinning on her heel twice, Zein first tilted to glance at Draus, then turned to study Avo. She repeated this action two more times as if trying to decide on a path to take, and then finally reappeared next to the ghoul after momentarily slipping out of visible existence.
“I will need whatever else remains of the Incubi’s sequences. Afterward, open the tunnel from whence you came. I will need to survey the situation.”

A pause took hold over Avo. The mem-data swirled within his Metamind, the anchors to the Nether boiling within his thoughts and veins. Checking the sequences again, he removed artifacts he thought capable of revealing his hand in this endeavor and packaged that which remained into three ghosts.
GHOSTS: [1038]

Expelling a bridge of crimson from his wrist, he reached into the radius of Zein’s Metamind and conducted a direct transfer. At the same time, he interfaced with the locus embedded in the front of his throne and activated the last active gateway. Another thirty seconds and the shadows would shift again, rendering it dormant.
How much did Zein anticipate events? How much was just steering the path?
Where she once stood was suddenly an absence. Avo felt his insides lurch as she disappeared again. Even with the constancy with which she invoked this canon, to behold the sudden vanishing of another individual was uncanny. There was no sign nor indication of her departure. No twist or disruption in the fabric of space. One moment she was, then she wasn’t.
Of course, leaping across time itself was not a natural thing to consider.
He found his sight drifting to the unfurling whorls of the tunnel. As expected, there she was, standing shrouded in the light, the paths of The Fisher That Wasn’t reaching out from her and sampling the flesh of reality, drawing in details to feed the nature of its simulation.
At least, such was what he thought she was doing.
Striding next to Kae, Avo leaned down to ask her. “Kae. Zein’s Heaven. What can you tell?”

A blank expression spread across the Agnos’ face. She gave him a soft shrug. “Time is… is… it’s only reserved for… certain senior Agnosi. It’s… a forbidden Domain for most. And requires… requires outside supervision before it can… can be grafted.”

“Outside supervision?” Avo asked.

“Voidwatch,” Draus answered on Kae’s behalf. She was standing in a direct line with Zein then, studying the Godclad with a stolid glare. The light of the world outside splashed over Draus and her shadow rose long like a pillar splitting the dais. “There’s somethin’ wrong with the flow of time. Seen some shit about that before. You keep something locked to a single point in the flow long enough and…” She made a fist. She released a fist. “It goes away.”

“Goes away?” Avo asked. “Redacted? Like Incog.”


The Regular sent him a sidelong glance. “Yeah. ‘Cept I think the world itself forgets you ever were. Couple of Sovereignties got it. Paladins too. Fallwalker gets too uppity? Got a problem you need to stop existin’? Fix it in place and let the rest of time just run. The problem goes away on its own. Or… maybe not so much on its own. Either way, it ain’t your mess no more.”

Sourness stained Avo’s mood. The threat of rival Heavens and powers beyond his current capacity to prevent materialized like a blade over his head. He needed more. He needed to cut himself free from danger, to dam every pathway ensuring his destruction before the currents could drown him.
Zein flashed back into place behind him again. Distantly, he heard a series of thunderous rumbles. The old woman met the ghoul’s frown with a smile. Without warning, she drew her umbrella and cleaved through the air. Her form fractured into a scatter of echoes–transparent mimicries of her person burst free in a flash of Soulfire and lashed into Draus, Chambers, Essus, and Kae.
Then, as Thousandhand’s translucent clones stabilized, they faded out of existence around each individual they enwreathed, melting into the tapestry of existence.
The Regular’s projectile launcher was halfway extended when Zein put up her hands in a placating gesture. “That was an act of insurance. No need to thank me. Just remember who saved your life.” Zein paused and stared at Avo. He noticed she was holding a glaive. He frowned. Where had the glaive come from? How did she–
Time accelerated suddenly. The world around him snapped into the future. A cut flickered down past his sight. He fired his Celerostylus, but the blow went from mid-swing to piercing through his skull immediately. A pale line of pain trailed along his skull as he went stiff. Another twenty or so strokes cleaved clean through his body, licking unseen wounds into his ontology.
Yet, as time resumed, as Avo stumbled and Zein caught him, he felt himself remain whole, if discombobulated. “I could not help myself,” Zein whispered, leaning up from below as she held him in place. Ash spilled past them. The wind rushed across his cordyceramite plating mycelia threads. “I intended to store three killing stokes within you, but preparation is far better than tragedy, no?”

Shrugging her off, he found himself standing beneath a partially collapsed bridge as the unmistakable sound of distant explosions reverberated. Debris shook as the dust around them danced.
A nest of blood exploded out of Avo as he hissed. He drew in nearby matter to build himself up as the beast screamed for him to attack. His Woundshaper was saying something, crying out warnings in the back of his mind. He didn’t hear it. All he felt were the trails of coldness left by the feverish whirlwind of slashes he had been dealt.
Zein, contrarily, turned her back to him as he rose, his body pouring out of existence as the Woundshaper slid into his place in the real. Though the ashfall stilled to a near halt around him, though all noise turned to a low drone, the touch of the Fisher left Zein divorced from the pace of existence, her subreality matching her speed to his.
Turning to him, she twisted her glaive and–
Avo felt his mind lurch. Something… It was like something had been torn out from his recollection.
As if it had never happened at all.
Holding up an umbrella, Zein’s eyes glittered as she muttered sweet nothings to her instrument. “Sleep Akunsande. Sleep.”
Planting its tip into the ground, she took a step toward him. She had time, but he had the Nether flowing within him. If he–
Time around them lurched again. But no further attacks came from Zein. She held out a halting hand and gestured for him to wait. “I cleaved into you for Guard-Captain Draus, mostly. I quite like that girl, so be sure to stay in her vicinity. We will have great need of her for the tasks to come. Worry not. As long as you can reach her within twelve hours' time, my echoes will still function near your cadre.”
Avo relaxed his reflexes but continued drawing in mass to build up his Woundshaper again. His blood swelled to ten tons. Fifteen…
REND CAPACITY [WOUNDSHAPER]: 6%
“Don’t worry,” Zein said. “I will return you shortly.” She paused. “I peeked at your new Stormtree ‘friends.’ They are formidable. Skilled. They will not be confused by my actions for long after they resurrect. Take Mirrorhead quickly. Kill or deceive your way through Conflux–it does not matter. However, you must implicate Mirrorhead in the attack on the districts. Feed the lies into the soil of his mind and see his ghost procured after death.”

The tension between them was collapsing. Zein had not desired a fight, but she was trying to use him in some fashion. Like an instrument. A tool. Avo had half a want to reject her outright, to spurn her and whatever her demands for snatching control from him.
Her following words shattered the hold of his ire.
“Afterward, I need you to ensure the death of Captain Draus near his corpse.”

A beat passed. The blood within comprising Avo’s being surged like a bladed maelstrom of roiling waves stirring around the base of a tower. Zein could leap across time, but the Nether was still his. He just needed to touch her. Parting his constructed blades into a thousand piercing tendrils, he sought to overload her “paths.”

He reformed his mortal form at the center of the blood. “No. Draus lives. I won’t snuff her. You won’t snuff her. No one snuffs her.”
Zein’s eyes widened momentarily and slowly, her face flattened into annoyance. “You misunderstand, little dagger: I do not wish for her to be butchered and slaughtered like some manner of cattle. No. She is wasted here. And she has spent enough time as a mortal, don’t you think?”

And suddenly, the angle that Zein was working toward hit him. She wasn’t planning Draus’ death toward base purpose, but elevation. Apotheosis. “You want her to be Godclad.”

“First her,” Zein said. “And ensure that she receives the components of Jhred Greatling’s Frame. It will serve us well in the coming paths. And to give you an entryway into Highflame.”

His mind spun again. Faintly, he could only guess at the future Zein was trying to engender, but he saw bones of its architecture flash behind his eyes. “You… you want to frame Mirrorhead. Trap him as patsy. But have Draus stop him. Draus to reveal the ‘plot.’ Draus to take the credit and reascend to the Meritocrats as avenger.”

“As a warrior redeemed,” Zein explained, eyes closed, fingers plucking at a flash of paths as another series of district-quaking blasts roared from far above. “Worthy, in a word.”

He paused, studying her. “Why? What not just tell her then? Ask her?”
The elder Godclad sighed. “Because she refuses and resists her rightful ascent in every path but a few. And in those, only you can keep her fixed to the righteous trail.”

“This is why you pulled me away?” Avo asked. “To tell me this without provoking a response from her. Alter the futures.”

Zein said nothing, which said enough. It seemed she was simulating futures with known qualities, producing the most likely outcomes. But if that was true, then how was she jumping forward across time with such accuracy?
“The other two,” Avo asked. “Are they going to be used as well? Have plans for them too?”


The admission adorning Zein’s face was plain. Again, she spoke no words. And again, explosions sang out. A flood of soot and debris was pilling out from the fractured opening of Layer One he left in his wake while fleeing the Bloodthanes. “Best that I leave you to the course.”
Avo reached out, a tendril of blood spearing out for Zein.

Existence shuddered around him.
He was standing next to Draus again, back in the Nexus. Behind him, the tunnel was still open, and it looked as if he had only been gone for mere moments rather than the minutes he spent with Zein.
Zein, who was also suspiciously missing.
“The hells just happened?” Draus asked, looking around. “Where’d she go? And the fuck did she do to you?”

Just then, a voice sounded next to his ear, reverberating as if a message spoken from the past to the future. “Do not dally, little dagger. The Bloodthanes will not stay dead forever. You have an hour. An hour to take Conflux. An hour to bind and devour Mirrorhead. An hour. Seize the moment. Claim your prey.”
“Zein. What the fuck is wrong with you? Are you trying to expose us to the Guilds?”

“Hm. Oh. Yes, Cas. What woes do you wish to bleat to me about today?”

“Listen: I understand you find human life to be nothing more than a joke, but Firmament is considering burning the Column. The numbers are still rolling in–twenty-four million dead. Five times that number nulled. What the hells–”

“Calm yourself, boy. The Firmament threatens, but they are toothless all the same. Besides, I did nothing. Point fingers at the Hungers and their slaves if you wish to direct your ire. Besides, our Voider allies will quite like what I have planned.”

“...What the hells have you done now?”

“Oh. Just created an opening for us to seize Highflame from the inside.”
[Disbelieving laugh] “Holy shit. I mean… holy shit. All this effort. All this time and that’s what you’ve been planning? You’re scheming to one-up your daughter in a pissing competition over old slights.”

“I’m scheming to ensure the stabilization of the Saintists and thereby the entire situation on Idheim. The feud between me and Veylis is but a bonus. Oh, but that girl needs to learn how to run her house better. Her father will be so very disappointed–ah. You’re glaring hatefully at me again. Is this because my–”

“Lack of fucking empathy. Yeah. Did you hear the part when I mentioned over a hundred and twenty million people snuffed and nulled? Because your pet rotlick just had to–”

“If this makes your mettle quiver then I suggest you steel yourself, child, for before the desired reality can come to fruition, pillars must break and the fuel that is death must flow.“
-Cas eld’Canduir and Zein Thousandhand, Ninth Column
10-14
A Cage of Thoughts (I)
“We have an hour,” Avo said, springing into motion. Instinct propelled him even before his mind had a chance to settle. “Zein is distracting the Bloodthanes. Think she’s bombing Nu-Scarrowbur. Need to take this chance. Mirrorhead’s cut off from the Nether. Ignorant. Vulnerable.” He paused thereafter, taking in the confused faces and blinking eyes.
Too fast. Zein's little trick had left him with whiplash. More fascinatingly, he could sense a faint volumetric quiver outlining the forms of Draus, Essus, and Chambers. Thousandhand slashed at him with her sword over twenty times. Whatever that did, it connected them, and would keep them protected.
Somehow.
He swallowed a growl. Dealing with the old woman was like trying to chase a nu-cat: The resultant chaos was always on her terms. He needed to start thinking about how to change that. “Draus. Need to talk with you first. Need to talk. And then plan attack after.”

Her uncertainty shone through her stare. “This about whatever Thousandhand just did?”
“Hard to tell what’s not about Thousandhand.” Avo paused. He shot a look at Essus and found the father wavering, his eyes scanning about, lost with regard to the situation. Yeah. That was an appropriate response to Zein. “But this is about you. She wants something from you now. Not even sure if I should tell you–if me telling you is one of her schemes.”

“Spit straight,” Draus said. She turned and leaned against the table, cocking her head up to meet him face-to-face. “What I do might kill me, but what I don’t know can kill me anyway without earnin’ my death straight-up.”

Draus was a pure creature of simple wants. Perhaps this did fall into Zein’s machinations, but it was better that the Regular knew. That way, she could at least possess some choice with regard to her own thoughts. “Zein wants you made a ‘Clad.”

The Regular’s right eye twitched slightly. Her lip curled for an instant. “That it?”

“Wants you to claim Mirrorhead’s Frame. Make you seem like the one to snuff him for good. Ingratiate you back with the Meritocrats. I think. Use you as an entryway back into Highflame.”

A troubled look clouded her expression as she listened to his words. Draus went still. Deathly still. Her heart, however, accelerated, its beats slow rather than sparse. “That all she showed you?”
“Yes.” He paused, thinking on his next words. “Didn’t infuse the paths into me this time. But I think she wants to use you. Blame everything on Mirrorhead to bring down his father. Drive the Chivalrics against each other. And make you a hero. Highflame worthy. Settle their issues before they even begin.”
Draus nodded. "Yeah." She ran her tongue along the sides of her cheek. “Yeah. That oughta do it. Scoops and medias will eat that shit up. Meritos too, but they’ll do anything to stomp the Chivs by this point.” Her face darkened. “Godsdamned… maybe Santanado was one of Zein’s? Maybe she planned this all along, had him in place to be the big hero and now’s just pivoting because I’m what she’s got on hand.”

Avo didn’t know, and he hated it. Zein was playing and looking down from a scope beyond his. That was what he hated most about her: How she left him grasping at shadows, wary of being strung along, in fear of being leashed to her whims.

“Don’t know if me telling you is part of her plan,” Avo said. “Took me out. No reason to do it. Unless she could use me to influence you. Plant the seeds in your head.” He studied her. “Might’ve succeeded.”

Her face twisted into one of disgust and exhaustion. “Avo. Remember what I told you when you offered to burn a Frame into me?”

“Remembered it made you angry.”

She let out a sharp breath. “You asked me about limbo. Yeah. Right. I admit it. This is limbo. But I was perfectly fine snuffin’ half-strands and dyin’ right and proper in these here Warrens. No need for greater hope. No need for a way back to honor. Me and the Golds? We’re never gonna be whole again.”

Curiousity spurred his next words. Loathe as he was to admit it, part of him did desire such an outcome for Draus as well. Her ascension would increase her capabilities exponentially, and allow her to apply her skills on a far greater level. It would also alleviate what he thought might be “lonesomeness.” He was still figuring that one out.
“What were you going to do? After we killed Mirrorhead?”

Moments passed. His Echoheads chittered and he found Chambers poking at the ways nearby, hiding the fact that he was listening to their conversation. That didn’t matter. Avo would just pull those memories out from him afterward.

“There are other Syndicates. Other lacks and half-strands who need killin’. I figured if I didn’t die doin’ this fool thing, there would always be another.” She exhaled as exhaustion bled over more into her features. “Yeah. Alright. I did think about it.”

“Think about it?” Avo said. He knew what she was insinuating, but he wanted to hear her say it.

“A Frame, rotlick,” Draus said. “I was considerin’ takin’ you up on that offer of a Frame.” She shook her head. “I missed my chance to die.”

“During the war?”

“Yeah.” She sighed. “When Zein was pointing at us earlier, gesturing to you and me… You and your kind were the worst things to happen to me. You fed me too much righteousness. All of us too much righteousness. Good kills, was what you all were. And what few of my kin died fightin’ you and your Low Masters? We did it gladly.” She looked down. “Which might’ve been why goin’ back to bleedin’ the Silvers right after turned out so godsdamned hard. Because it meant nothin’. We were fightin’ over blocks and districts. Dyin’ for a war already lost. Killin’ the FATELESS because they was in our way.”

“You wished you died fighting my brothers?” Avo asked.
The chuckle that came from her was devoid of scorn, but filled with melancholy. “I just kinda wish my life was spent on somethin’… something worth dreamin’ about. Not square miles for a bombed-out megablock. Not for some Heaven or Soul that’s just gonna go to a dumbshit Guilder kid lookin’ to play in the Trials.”
Avo grunted a laugh. Her eyes flicked back to him, gaze teetering between confusion and a glare as he spoke. “So. That was not the dream.”

A beat passed. She laughed too. “Fuck you, rotlick.”

Silence settled between them. Time was running along, but Avo had an idea how he could conduct his assault. The question of what Draus–and to an extent Essus–wanted would dictate his approach. “Will you do it? I think I can… use the Metafac. Strip it from him. Install it into you when this is done. Should be able to do it like with the Fallen Heaven.”

“I dunno yet,” Draus said. “Shit. I don’t know if I’m ready to…” Her voice trailed off.
He knew the word. Live. Taking the Frame meant living. Meant turning away from her imagined end fighting in these depths and face what she really wanted for herself in a life beyond Guild service or self-righteous bloodshed.

“I can tell you this much though.” She thumbed in the direction of Essus as she spoke. “You. Me. Him? We all got a score to settle. With Conflux. Ain’t done till they're all dead, and I say we cut these sow-born fucks down and see what lights the wick after.”

Now there was a delicious sentiment. Shared retribution. He swallowed back his salivation as he imagined conjoining his Metamind to Draus and Essus as they extracted torment, trauma, ghost, and Soul from Mirrorhead.
What a glorious cocktail this was to be.
Servos whined from the corner of the room as the father stood. Twin coals of crimson burned within the depths of his sockets. His fingers rang as they snapped opened and shut. “I will come.” The man spoke in faint whispers, his lungs hollow of strength. “I must…” He turned to stare at the holographic form of his son, taking in the sight of Mirrorhead’s gravest insult. His lips contorted with withheld agony. “I must do this. You are right. His death must mean something.”

Striding over to Avo and Draus, the father’s footsteps were a shuddering rise and hammer fall. “I will do anything–” Turning his head up, he muttered something between words. Something to Artad. “I will do as you say. I just… I want him to face my boy before his end. So that he might sink deeper into the dark hereafter with the weight of his sins in known.”

And as the words left his mouth, he placed a mechanical appendage against the table they sat around and sagged. A chair moved. From across, Avo watched Kae reach over and place her hand over Essus’ transplanted limb.
Both he and Draus froze, their heads tilting in unison at the fragile creature. Curiosity became him while worry consumed Draus. How distant empathy and comfort were to him. And how visibly did it aid Essus, who bowed his head and struggled against the ragged gasps of his anguish.
“Kae,” Draus said, shooting the Agnos an apologetic expression. “That’s enough. We don’t have the time.”

Across the table, the other woman frowned and pulled her hand back. “I-it wasn’t like–”

“I know. But we don’t risk that.”
Suddenly, it occurred to Avo how affection-starved Kae had been as well. No ghosts. No Nether. Nothing. She was an exile not only in her own mind but to society as a whole, parted from all the nourishments needed by a stable heart.
If he was to survive the following encounter with Mirrorhead, he needed to fix her. He had an idea of how now. As well as the means. It would not take much for him to produce a locus using his blood to extinguish her conflagration before scrying her innermost sequences.

He shook his head and refocused. That would have to be afterward. And he had to ensure she wouldn’t be trapped here in the George Washington if the worst came to pass. He needed to house her elsewhere. With reliable assets who could help ensure her safety thereafter.

Ultimately, there was only one obvious option.
A cord of blood shot free from his body and latched onto the locus within the throne. At the same time, Avo addressed the single most expendable person in the room. “Chambers. Get the Blockcrawler online. Kae. Draus. Get in.”

The former enforcer bounced up in startlement at Avo’s sudden address. “I… ah, sure thing consang. What’re… we doing.”

“That’s a good question,” Draus said. “What are you–”

“We leave Kae with Green River again for now,” Avo said. “Not here. You know why. She can’t work the locus well until the Nether comes back. Will leave her trapped if we’re all dead or nulled.” Accessing the Blackways, Avo scanned through the various gates until he found the one listed nearest to Xin Yunsha from the mem-data.
With a thought, he bade it to open and the doorway, once again, fused into shape along the walls.

“You all get in the Blockcrawler. Essus. You hold onto the back. I’ll shuttle via Galeslither. Drop off Kae. Then we plan our assault on the go.”

“We got free reign of movement,” Draus said, understanding. “The Thoughtwave Detonation should’ve crippled their drone grid, and I doubt they got a coldtech redundancy built in place like the Guilds do. The skies should be ours, and more than that, Mirrorhead might as well be blind to us. We choose where we want to hit ‘em and when.” A snort of displeasure escaped her. “And to think of all that time I spent circlin’ the block, pullin’ in mem-data.”

Avo grunted. “Best laid plans.”

“Yeah,” Draus said. “Best laid plans.”


***
The wind roared as a raging torrent as Avo galloped free up along the edge of the district, his weight and speed peeling paint from the walls of the megablock. As he rounded over the apex, he found thousands upon thousands of FATELESS gathered in the empty aero-lots of the Youmeng Sleeper Farm.
They had been broken from their slumber with the Nether-cleaving blast, and now Avo knew them as a variety of small and shriveled forms bickering and chattering about what just transpired. Their recency to the city did them no favors, the immensity of the blast one more miracle of New Vultun to gawk at. As he crossed over the airways above, a few clutched at the rags they wore as clothes, holding themselves against the bitter chill of his winds.
Onward, he continued, leaving the masses in his wake.
Enamel tiles extended from the folded lips of slatted eaves s like rows of teeth. Hardened walls of bone fused between the blocks and buildings of Xin Yunsha, structures formerly apart now meshing into a singular defensive organism.
The Second Fortune, meanwhile, remained its auspicious self, even deprived of functioning phantoms. In place of ghosts were bioforms–seven feet tall bat-like creatures carrying with them paint brushes, jars of black ink, and trailing scrolls, launching from rooftop to rooftop as they continued to push their trade in the oldest fashion available.
Sending more than a few gargoyles scattering from his path, Avo regarded the time in his cog-feed and kept things quick. They still had over fifty minutes to pierce and secure the Conflux megablock thereafter.
Things weren’t ideal, but that went for everyone else as well, and much of his subversive architecture remained. The greatest task ahead was to disable and defeat Mirrorhead without exposing themselves. If they let the Guilder escape, there was no telling if they would ever see him again, and if their vengeance would ever be granted a proper end.
This was why he kept the Blockcrawler with him. And Chambers. They could get back into the Megablock through the mem-con contaminated area. Despite the Nether being down, proximal infection from cognitive or memetic vectors still remained a danger. At least to your standard enforcer.

For Avo, it presented an opportunity to utilize the new properties imbued in his Heaven.
But that was a thing for later.
Twisting around the back alley of the Second Fortune, he pulled the Blockcrawler out from his Yondergales and deposited it just before the rearmost doors.
Two bioforms approached, grafted guns and chambered spores extending from their shoulders. Reforging his mortal body from the surrounding winds, Avo didn’t break stride as he fired his Celerostylus and threaded two tendrils of blood out from his wrist.
As the locus channeled within his ichor struck the bedrock that was their minds, he drove his ghosts through their thoughtstuff and blended their near-term memories into a slurry of madness. Leaving them clutching their heads and moaning with incoherence, Avo extended his Whisper along a scouting thread of blood. A dozen accretions flashed behind the door, approaching him at a steady pace. These ones were better warded than the bioforms. Guests.
He cut his reflexes for now. Time resumed.
Behind him, Kae emerged from below the Blockcrawler an interesting greenish complexion, slightly ill from the turbulent trip. Skittering back over to her using his Echoheads, he caught her before she could fall just as Draus emerged right after.
“Shit, consang,” Draus muttered. “Gotta work on your flyin’.”

“Flying’s fine,” Avo snapped. He shot Essus–still clinging to the sides of the Blockcrawler–a look. “Don’t let Chambers leave. Kill him if he tries.”
The father grimaced, but nodded. Avo wondered if the man could actually commit uncoerced murder, but he also doubted that Chambers was brave enough to make a run for it.
Entering the establishment, the halls and rooms were packed to the brim with people. Most looked to be local Light’s Enders with some imps to burn and a cheap place to use them, but there was a not-insubstantial presence of possible street squires as well, hard eyes scanning the crowd.
Avo let Draus lead, slinking behind and playing the role of ignorant bioform as he closed the plates around his head. It wouldn’t do to leave an impression here and now.
“Draus?” A voice called out. Avo turned. Bright-Wealth squeezed along a dozen or so holocoated figures packed near the front entrance of the establishment. She slithered over to them, seeming both surprised but also wary. “I thought you all left? Green River said–”

“We need a favor,” Draus said, putting a hand on Kae’s shoulders and thrusting her towards the snake woman. “She needs a place to stay for a couple a days. Nice place. Tell River that if she does this we’re more than square, that I’ll make it up to her after.”

Bright-Wealth froze. The suddenness of the request threw her off, but this wasn’t the first time Draus gifted her with an assignment. “I see. And will you be… returning for her afterward?”

Kae turned, swallowing as she stared at the Regular and the Ghoul. “We’ll do our damndest. Best anyone can.”

Bright-Wealth bowed her head slightly, understanding. Smuggling a glance over at Avo, she slithered past him whispering, “Ai, yao-guai. All this your fault? You trip some kind of wire in the Nether and bring everything down?”

He glared at her. Why was she–
She drifted right along his ear. “Green River might have some information about our “mutual problem.” Find a time to speak with her once you finish… whatever the fuck you’re doing right now.”

He grunted in affirmation. “How’s the ma jiang?”


“Terrible. Losing all the time.” She looped back around and gestured for Kae to follow her.
“I-I,” the Agnos began.
“We’ll come get you after it all gets done,” Draus reassured. “Avo’s got some ideas about how to fix that mind of yours. Right, Avo?”

Still watching the shadows in the room, he offered Kae a slow but sure nod.

Swallowing, the Agnos took a step away and followed after Bright-Wealth.
“Alright,” Draus said, shrugging her shoulders as if trying to shed tension of her own, “let’s go get this run done.”

Turning back, they made for the rear entrance again, but mid-step, Avo found himself momentarily stunned.
There, behind the front desk alongside another Sang girl stood a girl he once bought a steamed bun for.
Lucille.
They had stripped the mods from her skin, returning her flesh to a more amber tone. She helped arrange a folder of papers then, and emerged from behind the counter to walk across the crowded room.
Draus noticed her too by this point, halting momentarily to watch the one they saved walk past them. A distant call went up from the other room, the voice pitched high with more than a hint of histrionics.
Lucille, hearing the dreadful bleating of her name, threw back her head.
And laughed.

“I’m coming. I’m coming! You’re going to scare the guests.” Muttering her apologies, she slipped past two holocoat-shrouded bodies and disappeared from their sight.
Draus let out a breath. “Nice work.”

“Yeah,” Avo said. With honesty, he was surprised as well. He expected more than a little lingering trauma. A longer road to recovery, regardless. But here she was. Still surviving. More than surviving. She was alive.
Walton would have been proud.
“Come on,” Draus said. “Let’s get gone. We got a massacre to start.”
A Godclad rooted in the domain of the material may find themselves at a disadvantage against a rival imbued with a Heaven of Space or Geometries. However, the spectrum of this struggle is vast, and with hubrises known and vulnerabilities uncovered, a demiplane can be made with but the weakest of sparks.
Domains must be measured against domain. Knowledge of enemy canons and hubrises too must be accounted for. To this end, the ultimate factor in a clash between the ascended falls to a single word.
Totality.
Despite all your miracles both absolute and relative, that which will be your undoing are the factors beyond you, the parts of the tapestry you cannot warp, that you are not anchored to.
Burn this into your mind, aspirants: Build your Frames wisely. When you seek your Agnosi, understand your role, your purpose in your cadre. Do not wander from your place of dominance in foolish pursuits or you shall be cut down like the swaths of ephemerals fated to die in the wake of your struggles.
Tower or sea; be you Breaker, Fortress, Seer, Porter, or Marker, you will live and die by your ability to shape the battlefield, to control and force your adversaries down narrower and narrower paths until you funnel them into the place of their unmaking.
Claim mastery over the breadth of domains–ensure that someone can affect space, shatter and shape matter, guard your minds, and above all foresee portents to all coming dangers. Should you understand the tenets of this new age of warfare, you will see yourselves survive long enough to indulge in the finer aspects of immortality.
You may think yourselves Godclads upon graduation. Such would be a delusion.
Never forget that divinity is seized, that we are clasped in the corpses of our tyrants. You are Godclads only after you survive.
If you survive, perhaps in time, you will come to understand what it truly means to engage in Total Domain Warfare.
-Authority Osjon Thousand, Total Domain Warfare
10-15
A Cage of Thoughts (II)
“So,” Chambers said, masking his nervousness with a cough. “I guess ah… guess we’re gonna have to go back, huh? Gonna use those quarantine zones as cover. Get in real sneaky-like?”

Avo fixed the former enforcer with a silent stare. Chambers’ heart rate was spiking. His fear was as obvious as his attempt to endear himself. The man was walled in by death and had no way out. No way out but forward.
In this, his life wasn’t so unlike the survivors he used to fetch for Mirrorhead. It was only by good fortune and the oddities of his mind Avo deigned keep him alive.
Chambers edged back to Essus, studying the view. The latter held his head low and his heartbeat hammered loud–the organ enhanced but fundamentally the same. Essus was not a warrior. He had no taste for the bloodshed, but for the memory of his son, there was spark enough in him to muster at least one last fight.
They stood at the precipice of the district, gathered atop the outermost warehouse in the docks to better survey their situation. At the head of the group, Draus studied their target: The Conflux megablock. Set between them a blood simulacrum channeled the quivering shape of the structure’s interior, lattices of crystalline blood following the mem-data most helpfully provided from the sequences Avo extracted during his prior dive.
Overhead, rivers of error code marred empty aerolanes hollowed of traffic while distant impacts and screaming engines hinted at the devastation still afflicting the Warrens A thick fog blanketed the Spine, choking the world about them as a chill beset the scene. There was an unnaturalness to the cold–a touch of the eldritch about its presence.
And through the haze of translucence, in the direction of Nu-Scarrowbur, lights flashed as noises droned, with a sense that all around the area had been muted under the presence of an unseen weight.
“I say we start low and work our way up,” Draus said, pointing to where a deep rent ran along the lower southeast side of the structure. Following the schematics simulated by the phantoms dwelling in Avo’s blood lattice, she lined a path through mem-con-infested areas into the elevator and central power grid running as four interconnected pillars within the edifice. “We got the Blockcrawler and we got you.” She pointed to Avo. “Got a good idea on how we might be able to clear this place floor by floor if need be, but the big game is still Mirrorhead. The Nether’s down, that means Conflux has gotta start feedin’ fightin’ meat into what few golems and pilotable drones they got.”

“Threat low,” Avo said. “Will be able to jack into them at will.” He wove a crimson helix from his wrist and bade it to spin. The Nether was still down with no signs of recovery yet.
The sheer force of the earlier detonation would leave the phantasmal sea blunted for at least a day, but this inconvenience was to his advantage. Enemy golems could be penetrated and bent to his will with but a thread of blood now. He just needed to locate their locus while keeping a low profile.
“There are also other ways in,” Essus suggested. He acted as a shadow to the others, lingering behind while Chambers exaggerated his helpfulness. “The gutters should still have places for access. And the tunnels too.” He paused, taking in a breath. “We could even start in the lobby beneath. Where… where I was set to perform.”

Essus too wanted to be of some use, but the man mistook his position. Avo simply wanted to feed off him. To vicariously feel the culmination of vengeance when the father performed an act of righteous bloodshed in the name of his boy. Avo would ensure it, so both pleasure and virtue could be sated in tandem.
Draus sent Avo a look. “Yeah. I don’t think that’s necessary.” Gesturing to the interior of the block, she continued. “I’m thinkin’, Avo, that if your Heaven works the way I think it does, you might-oughta be able to eat through the walls and spread your awareness like roots. This way, we establish alpha-strike advantage: Light up their accretions without ever riskin’ exposin’ ourselves; engage when we want. Most importantly, we use ‘em to help us pinpoint Jhred and move to engage him first.”

He understood what she was trying to convey and found it a most appealing prospect. Drawing enough mass from the matter within the block, he could thread himself across multiple floors and snake his way through entire groups of unsuspecting Confluxers, tearing from them Essence, ghosts, and memories all. “Yes. We can do that. Want to do that.”

Draus chuckled. “Figured you might.” Pulling her eyes from the simulation, she glared out at the towering presence of the megablock enshadowed by passing wind. Their breaths were beginning to fog the air now. The cold was growing fast. He wondered if it was Zein’s doing as well, somehow, or yet another player entering the fray.
“We should go,” Avo said, stretching his awareness using his Galeslither, trying to read hidden dangers from the undulation of wind currents. “Think we're ready. Think we can take them. Do this. Compromised their minds. They’re blind. Won’t see us coming.”

“Yeah.” The Regular cracked her neck. With a bow of her head, she lowered the helmet-carapace of her bio-rig over her face. “I second that.” She shot Essus a look. “Don’t gotta come if you don’t wanna. Might not end the way any of us want. That’s the way of the run, but you ain’t no squire. You can still walk away. Find somethin’ else.”


The father said nothing, offering only a reserved expression of anger and an upward-facing palm placed below the holographic emulation of his boy.
She cocked her head in an apology. “Alright, then. Avo: You got entry?”

“Yeah,” Avo said, infusing himself into the rushing breeze. “I got it.”
***
Riding low through the mist, Avo galloped through countless columns of rising smoke ascending from the districts below. The Spine of the Warrens was never a stable place. Here was just one step up the proverbial ladder, a step beyond where joy fiends and FATELESS waited to die in the dark.
Decay and rust cloaked by veils of flashy virus-ridden neon was the usual aesthetic. But now, with the Nether silenced and the districts laid bare, all the blemishes leftover from the Uprising and the Fourth Guild War revealed themselves. Functional structures and bomb-shattered husks stood side-by-side in district grids, the former betraying themselves only by artificial lighting still shining through the windows.
Amongst the districts, Mazza’s Junction stood the most ruined, its former role as an intersection with other districts and trade hub now characterized by a tide of new crashed aeros and partially collapsed quick-fabbed buildings carpeting the stretch leading up to the wounded leviathan that was Mirrorhead’s personal megablock.
Distant from the sign of any mem-tags or ramshackle repair work, the organs of the building were separated in places only by the thinness of tarps or cheaply welded steel. What revealed Conflux’s disarray further was the absence of a physical patrol holding a perimeter–to-be-fatal negligence with the suppression of the Nether.
Wrapping his winds along the base of the premises, he funneled himself in through an opening–a furl of torn alloy and punctured plascrete petaled inward by a gauss-flung slug.
REND CAPACITY [GALESLITHER]: 8%
Letting the Blockcrawler slip free through the folds of his Yondergales, Avo resettled himself into the shape of his flesh next to Essus, the vehicle beneath them trudging forward after a brief lull.
Casting wires of blood out from his body, he formed a closed link between Essus, Draus, and Chambers–who he promptly re-sequenced using his Ghostjack, peeling the memories of Avo and Draus’ earlier conversation out from his mind.
A note of confusion rose from the former enforcer as they moved through a flechette-shredded gulf. If the mem-data was right, past three more quarantine rooms would be some elevator doors. Preparing for deeper insertion, Avo willed his blood to rush forward, piercing out from beneath his flesh like brambles as he drained the walls around him away.
More than once he felt his wards shudder as his Heaven caressed the presence of a mem-con embedded in some source of the cognition-intruding virus. For each he found, he lashed with traumas and his alchemy, breaking them sequence-first, and unbinding from physical reality as he drew in more mass.
This time, however, he did not inject the absorbed tonnage into his own body, instead keeping himself spread out like a growing expanse of roots. Or arteries. In a strange sense, he was like an infestation of biology gnawing through the guts of the block, slithering the fingers of his existence through channels and circuits melted into place.
Good thing he remembered to empty his Rend earlier. Saved him some time here.
COG-CAP: 33%
REND CAPACITY [WOUNDSHAPER]: 3%
Circulating his Whisper through the reach of his innumerable limbs, he tasted the structures around him as a vague blur shivered on the floor just above, revealing the vagaries of where the Confluxers might be stationed.
+Eating into the building,+ Avo cast. His thoughts ran more like circuitry through his blood, hopping through each of the other three minds in the network at speeds of near instantaneity. +Accretions showing. Bit blurry. Whisper perception limited without the Nether.+
+But it’s there,+ Draus said. He could sense her grin. +And that’s all we need. We’ll keep the ‘Crawler runnin’. See if you can take a peek at the situation above, pull us some data relatin’ to Mirrorhead.+
Chambers interjected. +If I had to bet on it, the bossman’s probably hiding in his little glass house.+
Both Avo and Draus fell silent at that. Yeah. That seemed more than a little like Mirrorhead. However, confirmation was better than speculation; Avo pierced through the ceiling, hairs of blood pushing free like blades of grass squeezing through concrete.
Yet, the first thing to capture his notice wasn’t the sole enforcer stumbling about the width of the room above, but that which she was carrying, and that which she was casting down to the ground.
Bodies.
The enforcer was chucking mangled pieces of bodies into the room.
Corpses were being tossed in one after another, each of them dismembered–disfigured by means unnatural and obvious. Each landed with a rattle of breaking glass, naked bodies coming apart into halves and pieces as their insides spilled free from wounds, skin, and muscles disentangled from the base that was their bones. A few others were even more brutalized, their body less flesh than glass, so unmade from humanity they seemed like fractured statuettes of sparkling transparency left chipped and shattered. The severity of the harm made it seem like the dead were forced to walk into a hurricane filled with nothing but blades.
Knowing Mirrorhead’s canons, that might just about be the case.
+Jaus,+ Chambers breathed. +Fuck me, but am I glad I left.+
Draus grunted a laugh. +Is that how you ‘member things now?+ The amusement left her. Linked to his Whisper, she studied the area around the room as the Blockcrawler kept pushing for the elevator. +Place looks like a storage room of some kind. Weird. They definitely got plenty of other places to stash the corpses. This don’t seem…+


+Efficient?+ Avo asked. The vector of his curiosity returned to their nakedness as he frowned. Slaughtering a group of people was one thing, but stripping them had to hold some deliberate intent behind it. Regarding the sole living enforcer he could see, Avo decided that there was little point in playing this game of deduction when he could just tear the information out from the source.
Guiding a single strand of blood between the bodies, Avo directed his flow in the fashion of a snake, surging forth as they turned to pick up another body. Titanium sabatons parted before Avo’s touch, matter melting away into blood as his hair-thin haemokinetic construct injected itself through the fabric of their undersuit beneath.
Needling his way into their bloodstream, he took her as a puppet, usurping her circulatory system and forcing stillness into her movements. A choke crackled from her vocal modulator, her muscles struggling against a force far greater that rooted her from within. She tried to scream but he squeezed. Her ribs imploded. One of her lungs popped.
A loud wheezing gurgle whistled loose from her shuddering body.
Her legs kicked. Her fingers twitched. He cut his way up into her brain, jacking into her mind directly. He wasted no time with spoofing, choosing instead to crack her pitiful wards with a low-yield trauma and sink his ghosts into her memories.
Dread and violation spilled over from three directions. The enforcer in his clutches, Essus, and Chambers were all bound by a singular emotion, and it was absolute terror at his current actions, seeing first-hand his capabilities.
Draus, meanwhile, remained indifferent. The Reg had seen worse.
+Avo… Avo, this… this is not… you can’t…+ The father’s mind stuttered to a grinding stop. +Have… you been inside my mind? Have you?+
Avo ignored him and dug through his new victim's sequences. He grunted in annoyance as he refrained from drawing in more mass and firing his Celerostylus. He was already feeling some time-dilation prying his blood-locus network. He wondered if he could accelerate Draus or the others the same way his Canon of Haemokinesis multiplied his speed.
Suppose he could test that using the enforcer when he was done with her mind.
Filtering for the nearest sequence relating to the bodies she was removing, Avo pulled half an hour's worth of mem-data from her near-term memories. As things turned out, when the Nether went down and the Confluxers realized it, some of them tried to make a run for it, snatching the opportunity to leave their employer before he could realize.
Some of them had already been planning this operation for quite some time. Using manually operated engineering drones, a group of around two hundred technicians and enforcers began precision-burning the cortex bombs still embedded in their skulls. Spurred by one group’s attempt at emancipation, a dozen other cliques formed and made to break.
Of course, an avalanche didn’t form without noise, and with the growing quantities of people trying to flee, Mirrorhead noticed, even without the Nether.
The butchery that followed left a lull of nothing but static and terror in her mind. Entire portions of the megablock and whatever glass the Confluxers had on them exploded into a storm of vitrifying shrapnel as the Twice-Walker manifested, diving through reflections and yanking the defectors into its plane. Mirrorhead’s initial assault was near indiscriminate, seeking to break the wills of all who dared run, with the loyalists offered as acceptable collateral.
The enforcer’s last recollection was only running, fleeing, and obeying the bellowing shout of the Syndicate boss. Parts were outright seared out from her mind. Parts like the emergence of the Twice-walker itself, the naked presence of a Heaven entirely too much stress for her mind to bear.
Draus snarled in disgust as he filtered the information over. +Well, would you look at that: He’s about as good as his ma when it comes to killin’ his own.+
Avo grunted with amusement. +Seems like.+
Examining the enforcer a moment longer, he pulled out the last time she saw Mirrorhead. He spoke to her–along with the bulk of his forces–from a floating shard of glass in the Mall Brawl. It was like viewing him through a portal, or window of some kind. He sat there, seething and raging at captured deserters and loyalists alike, raging about their task in fits, barely coherent.
She recalled little of the Godclad’s words, only that she was scared. Only that she was part of a group tasked to strip the dead he left behind in the real, collecting their valuables and other possessions before dumping them into a single area floor by floor.
“Pluh-pluhughhh,” she moaned, trying to speak the word “please.” She wanted to beg for her life. Unfortunate. But it seemed she was bound to feed the whims of one Godclad or another.
Subsuming more matter, Avo felt his might and celerity build. A time-made lag formed between him and the rest of his cell as he drove the enforcer he held in clutches forth, pulling her into the room.
THAUMIC OUTPUT - 983 THAUM/c
GHOSTS: [1042]
Her death was a sudden, messy thing. Her body, not attuned like her blood was to his touch, and divorced from the Frame itself, denuded itself around the anchoring of his haemokineses. Her armor groaned as servos sparked and screeched, breaking free at her joints.
Avo released some of his mass and let time slow. Frowning, he withdrew the strand of blood he had nested inside her and let her fall atop the rest of the bodies, her falling bulk sending out a splash of gore and a burst of darting glass.
+So,+ Draus said. +Mirrorhead’s hidin’ in his little hole again, huh?+


+Seems so,+ Avo mulled. Going over her mem-data again, he felt a feral smile pull at his face. +Draus. What say you to a trap? Could indulge in some friendly fire to draw him out. Pull him into a cage of our making.+
+I’d say you’re thinkin’ what I’m thinkin’.+
“Do you have any idea how close you came to dying now, girl? Do you? When I say Zero-Burn, I mean go Zero-Burn! Zero-fucking-Burn!”
“Y-yes, Instrument–”
[Echo of a slap; a yelp]
“No. Not ‘yes, instructor.’ Stupid. Stupid fucking half-strand. You wanna know why you aren’t dead? Because it can’t find you at Zero-Burn. Because that thing that you made? That was an Anathema of Anchoring. A Daemon. Trying to pocket it with your Heaven won’t do anything because it is the literal antithesis of your Heaven–of your fuckin’ being! Did you pay any godsdamned attention to anything I was trying to teach you? Did any of you?”
[Silence]
“What? Are you all mute now? Did you?”

[Chorus of negatives; Mondelles sighs]
“Class dismissed. This is going on your Merits. All your merits. Her for this… mistake. The rest of you for failing to adhere to protocol. Assist your allies. Don’t just stand there and gawk. Osjane.”
“... Yes, Instrument?”


“I’m sorry I hit you. My control over my temper... slipped. It was unbecoming. Include that in your report too while waiting for the Daemon to rupture. Small failings go next to the big ones. My Merits need to be docked as well. Don’t forget.”
“I… yes, Instrument Mondelles. Blessed be the worthy.”
“Blessed be the worthy. Class dismissed. Learn from her, do not mock her. I saw how the rest of you were performing. She just made the mistake first. See that the rest of you don’t do this.”
-Exchange between Aspirant Osjane Callawanies and Instructor Santanado Mondelles, Axtraxis Academy of Highflame
10-16
Interrupted Deception
An infection was spreading through the plascrete, and its name was Avo.
Like parasitic growths sinking past the depth of flesh and entwining themselves within bone, threads of blood expanded outward, branches slithering between the walls and floors of the megablock. Reclaiming the loci he formerly subverted was a paltry task, the three major lobbies falling back under his control within an instant.
Guided by blurred accretions and rooting along the spines of the structure, Avo infused a nervous system of his own making, its design one of solidified blood and phantasmal circuitry. Using the shaft of a long abandoned elevator, he inflicted his changes, Echoheads holding him in place while the Blockcrawler scanned and revealed the nature of Conflux’s troop compositions.
When his Rend was full, he assisted in its ascent creating new points of access, his entropic expulsion shearing with an efficiency superior to that of the vehicle.
Even with his perception accelerated, wrapping the entirety of the structure in the grip of his network consumed precious time. Twenty-five minutes passed before he completed his act of subversion. Leaving the outer walls mostly untouched, he regardless left four haemokinetic spikes jutting out, each pointed in a different direction to allow him nigh-instant awareness of the surrounding area beyond the block should something unexpected follow.
Scrying at Nu-Scarrowbur from their tips, he tried to gauge his time. Zein’s obfuscation blanketed the district still, but he could see mottled gaps from along the outer layer of darkness. Faint flashes and volume-twisting quivers slipped through like drips leaking out from a faucet. Whatever thaumaturgy at play was still in effect.
Time was still on their side, for now, but the culmination was fast approaching from all ends.
Spinning the final strands of his influence to form a roof over the topmost floor still filled with Syndicate presence, Avo invoked the Canon of Linger and left them embedded before withdrawing his Heaven. Speed shot back to normalcy. Quelling his reflexes, he took a moment to take in his work.
Across two hundred floors ran his fibrous reach, blood accessible to blood, requiring only the breach of a wall. Ghosts and phantasmics could be channeled through this skein, like hyper-accelerated train tracks for his perception.
A lesser substitute to the working Nether though it might be, Avo’s network revealed enough for his Metamind to estimate over four thousand active minds clustered together, enforcers, technicians, and other personnel now all packed together.
Mirrorhead’s loyalists watched the others with open belligerence and poorly hidden dread. Mirrorhead’s prior actions hung over them like a shroud; the bodies of those he butchered became known to Avo shortly thereafter in small mountains of dismemberment. The dead occupied space on each floor, and were stacked messily from floor to ceiling. Placed somewhere the living could not avoid, like totems of butchery and fear to keep the others under control, the atmosphere of Conflux festered as the fever of fear fell upon the ones that remained.
Sipping mem-data out from the thoughtstuff of a few slumbering enforcers, the estimated death toll of Mirrorhead’s rampage revealed itself to Avo: two thousand three hundred and ninety-five slaughtered.
Flashes of gauss fire disappearing into the reflective shell of the Twice-Walker drifted through Avo’s Metamind. With the twitch of a wing, tides of jagged shards rose and flensed entire rooms clean of flesh. This continued over and over, with Mirrorhead jumping from room to room in rapid succession, killing and torturing in a maniacal haze, roaring challenges to the Incubi he thought to still be hidden within his walls and among his people.
Paranoia had a weight, and soon, Avo would add to it. A direct physical engagement benefitted the Guilder with his sheer influence over reflections, but the man’s mind was already subverted.
All Avo needed was the most optimal cage to entrap him in. To pull him out from hiding.
Shuttling the mem-data over to Draus, they studied the layout of the block together. Here, she proved of far greater mastery, eliminating the upper floors entirely from observations. Engagement between the cliques would result in another slaughter, bodies vitrifying and shattering before Mirrorhead’s will.
What they needed was something he couldn’t break easily. Something he needed to fight and face, to ground him long enough for Avo to claim his mind.
The answer came in the lowest floors–places that Avo remembered to be the medical wings and the sealed Underways where Draus had escaped nearly a month ago.
There, over three hundred more trusted Confluxers were stationed, as shown by the rigs they wore, weapons they wielded, and drones they piloted. Directing the angle of his Whisper’s gaze, she pinpointed a specific accretion through the wall, while others stared on in confusion.
Surprisingly, Chambers was the first person to realize what Draus was planning. +Shit, Reg, the golems,+ he said, nodding with understanding. +Yeah. If the ghoulie can… do his weird blood shit and take them… I mean, they’ll be loud enough for the boss to notice. No doubt. We–uh, they–They! Should still have one Shadowcrawler. And that half-working Galeslither, but Avo already knows that thing’s engine is fucked. The crawler might-coulda still help us deal some–fuck!+
Chambers’ terror spiked. Draus and Avo surged their reflexes. The ghoul cast out tendrils of blood, preparing to access his hidden roots when–
A bulbous arantid skittered past the Blockcrawler along the other side of the shaft. It had emerged from a hollowed power junction and a column of young trailed in its wake.
+Fucking aratanids, consangs,+ the former enforcer muttered. Primal fear settled in him. He did his best to stay ignorant of Draus’ glare. +Block’s trying to keep us all alert. Never know what might be crawling about here.+ He made a gesture for widening his eyes and Essus exhaled, catching onto the state of things a good beat behind everyone else.
Our. They. We. The ex-enforcer continued to do his best to nudge himself into whatever dynamic he perceived the group to have.
It was an absurd thing. The only true factors at play were Draus, Avo, and the Blockcrawler. Chambers was here for his familiarity with the environment and his fascinating traumatic durability, but his possible death was no great loss to the plan. Essus, meanwhile, was needed for vengeance despite offering little tactical insight. His metallic hands shivered against the Blockcrawler each second longer they spent in the inner folds of the block.
+I say you take the Shadowcrawler for a spin,+ Draus said, pinpointing the accretion. +Meanwhile, the rest of us in the ‘Crawler will take firing positions here.+ Using her Meta, she marked another spot in the coverage of his blood-locus network. It was approximately two-hundred feet away within a quarantined section of the block.
The colorful sticks and paintings along the walls told Avo that it used to be a nursery. The claw marks of ghouls and the smears of blood breathed hints to a story the Warrens knew all too well. From this room, Draus–could fire down through the walls at a forty-five-degree angle so long as she remained part of his network.
+Wish I had the time to fab a couple more explosives,+ Draus said, going over her equipment one final time. +Hells. Wish things didn’t always go to shit.+ That was a lie. She enjoyed this. Enjoy being forced into the fray, everything collapsing around them, driving them to fight or flee. There was a purity to the situation, the siren call of violence pulling you toward it as chaos offered an opening, beckoning the daring and the foolish to risk it all.
Avo knew the thrill. +Should work. Going to increase blood density around area. Swallow away matter as Mirrorhead gets drawn in.+ Activating his Ghostjack, he reviewed a specific sequence of memories he took from Mirrorhead. His time spent observing his prey offered him special insight into the Guilder’s psychology.
Even if the disturbance he was about to trigger failed, he thought he had good odds of holding Mirrorhead’s interest via a psychological wound.
Avo broke off from the group thereafter, staying connected through extended threads of blood. Conserving his current Rend, he fired his Celerostylus and rushed through the labyrinth of shifting wires, moving vents, and wall-bolted generators comprising the block’s internal energy system.
Concurrently, he directed his blood to snake into the room. The loyalists were gathered in patrols and checkpoints, forming aimless pockets of paranoia and hostility. Mutterings of there being Incubi Sleepers among them–or that Ori-Thaum had specifically destabilized the Nether around the district for a forthcoming assault were voiced beneath breaths. Their owner’s mental instability was bleeding over into them, it seemed.
Just as well. It would make the resulting internecine easier to spark.
He found the Shadowcrawler placed along the tracks leading out into the Underways. Directing his ichor to trail past the edge of the medical floor down across its exposed overlook, Avo stretched his reach through cracks and crenulations running along the plascrete. Enforcers passed his presence, ignorant to the thin lines of red gliding toward the crab-like form of the eighteen-foot-tall golem.
With six legs connected to a vantablack dome, strips of lighting basked the ground beneath it in a focused shower of light.
A tinge of annoyance crossed Avo’s mind as he realized with everything that had happened, he forgot to ask Kae about the golems he encountered.
+Shadowcrawler’s simple,+ Draus said, sensing his wariness. +It makes the dark like water, and can jump into shadows and shit; swimming in the black. It can drown half-strands, but more often than not it’s used as a delivery mechanism for nukes, explosives, or other nasty shit past defensive lines. Pretty sneaky golem–Syndicates like to use it for the smugglin’. Got a pretty vulnerable hubris though, seein’ as they’re old models. If the darkness they’re swimming in gets completely parted by light, things start fryin’ right-quick.+
The functions and limitations made sense, all things considered. Diverting his Whisper into his seeking trickles of blood, he splashed through the room with his perception and counted forty enforcers stationed around the Underways along with three drone jocks lingering within the vehicle.
Beneath his flesh, he felt the urge of the beast awaken. It wanted him to shred and tear all those present using his own Heaven, to forgo all subtly and close his weave of blood throughout the floor and scythe through all who were present.
It was an appealing desire, to express his power with vulgarity and absolute annihilation. There was a time when fighting just one of them was beyond him. Now, with but a thought–
Every article of glass and symmetry in the room rattled. Avo’s blood, much like all who were present in the room, went still. He sensed Mirorrhead then–a felt presence through the tightening of postures and the inflammation of dread spreading through the Confluxers like wildfire. Shards of glass broke free from various surfaces, the fractals snapping into place over the railings of the Underway and melding into a portal.

A rush of light peeled all unevenness from the assembled pieces of glass, and when the shine faded, a portal of gleaming polish remained, forming a gateway into Mirrorhead’s personal sanctum.
Seated behind his table, an empty bottle was the first thing to catch Avo’s attention. The next were the amber stains marring the Syndicate boss’ suit. There was as a shiver to the man’s motion now, a lashing rage as their expressionless face jumped from person to person, regarding all who were present with a stare of distrust.
“My soldiers,” Mirrorhead began, his baritone as deep as the suspicion lining his tone, “I have a use for you. A chance to… properly convey your loyalty to me.” Silence followed. Mirrorhead clasped his fingers together, but unclasped them a moment after as if he couldn’t decide on the state of his own posture. “Go. Go up. Ascend my block and gather the others. Bring them… bring them outside. To the decks overlooking the… the circuit. My circuit. My district. There… there I will share with you your final tasks in person. I speak to you. And then… freedom. You can be free. All can have what they want. All–all we want…”
The light vanished from the portal, and with it returned all the blemishes. Shards of glass fell, shattering against the enforcers below.

Coldness settled within Avo’s mind. The Guilder was close to the precipice of losing control, despite how he presented himself. The Mirrorhead Avo knew during his tenure at Conflux would have never allowed himself to be seen in such a disheveled state. Power was being projected still, but there was a pleading nature to it–something Mirrorhead would have never abided by.
But Jhred Greatling begged quite well.
+Fuck,+ Chambers said, chuckling with surprise. +Boss doesn’t look so good. Looks like you really did a number on his mind, eh, ghoulie?+
Avo frowned. He could still jack into the golem, still begin his assault and draw Mirrohead out the way they planned.
But if the Guilder was going to expose himself willingly, then perhaps an adjustment was in order. If Mirrorhead was going to speak to all those present in person, he would be exposing his throat Avo’s hidden fangs. And through that, the beast might just get the slaughter it desired after all.
Besides, if things came down to it, triggering another surge of civil conflict using puppeteered Confluxers and the golem under the guise of Ori-Thaum Sleepers was still an option.
+Yeah,+ Draus said, agreement coming with no shortage of apprehension. +If he wants to put his head through our guillotine, let ‘em. But you’re right: Snuff the techs and jack into the golem anyway. It’ll make things easier when we start the killin’.+


Avo concurred.
And so, spurring his blood to leap from floor to golem, he threaded his presence inside, and there, drew the thinness of his blood taut into a wire. He pulled it across the necks of three unsuspecting jocks.
THAUMIC OUTPUT - 986 THAUM/c
GHOSTS: [1045]
ACCESSING: [SHADOWCRAWLER]
Wanna know to know how to snuff a ‘Clad?
Well. You won’t believe me when I say this to you, consang, but… it’s pretty simple when it comes down to it. You’re not fighting them. You can’t fight them–not unless you’re another ‘Clad or you got a couple of Knots to lose.
What you do is study them. Learn about them. And after that, engineer the situation to spur a mistake; make ‘em overreach. You know how a well-fed nu-dog can’t seem to get enough chow? Or how there’s not enough joy in the world to fill the urges of an addict? Imagine that, and apply it to someone seeking absolute power.
Godclads want. They want. And there ain’t nothing more undoing to a person than want. All too often the ambition of one might run smack-dab into the desires of another.
Again. You and I are not fighting any Godclads. But you sure as shit can find an angle to get two of these half-strands to roll up and bleed it out with each other. They’re cannibals the same way the old gods were.
The same way ghouls are.
Use their want to break them.
-Quail Tavers, School of the Warrens
10-17
The Shattered Reflection
Mirrorhead was already there by the time Avo piloted the Shadowcrawler out.
Flickering neon splashed down blinking traffic lanes, error codes striking across the gleaming sheen of unnaturally manifested glass. Like a frozen waterfall, the decks overlooking the central fighting pit descended into glass whorls of curving vitrification from what was the food court of the Mall Brawl. The glinting ground offered a mirage of glitching sunrise, while twin curved waves soared overhead cupping the once-exposed midsection of the building into a ravine.
In groups and pockets, the first trickles of Confluxers arrived, shepherded by the lowered barrels of their fellows. Connected to what was left of Mirrorhead’s network, the loyalists shuttled about the interior with haste, rounding and deploying drones to physically usher the remainder of the Syndicate into supplication.
After the butchery Mirrorhead inflicted, not even threats were needed to inspire action. The ones left obeyed, but their minds were stained with fear. Morose negativity, thick and heavy, emanated from their thoughtstuff even without the full scaffolding of the Nether.
Spreading roots of blood below the first shell of glass, Avo guided his Shadowcrawler to reach the exterior balcony it was assigned, moving as a unit with three squads comprised of thirty enforcers. Unbeknownst to them, the jocks inside the golem were long dead, and strings of blood plucked at the locus, puppeteering it upon the desired path.
Slowly but surely, the festering weight of Avo’s veins enwreathed the structures below the glass, burrowing its way up as he awaited the perfect time to strike.
Though uncertain as to Mirrorhead’s plans, Avo knew the man to be rash and foolish: With such an ostentatious display of power–the two sheer cliffs of glass reaching over two hundred feet into the air–it would take but the naked eye and some elevation to spot the anomalous happenings unfolding at Mazza’s Junction from another district.
The Guilder was going to do something drastic then. Perhaps he would use his Canons to make portals of these walls of risen glass, using them as gateways to feed his men through in a desperate assault.
Standing tall atop a floating platform of radiant glass, Mirrorhead looked down at the surviving remnants of his forces like a god-blessed king from ages of lore and myth. He was stiller than the transparent dias he stood upon, the wind unable to shiver even the folds of his suit.

But Avo had seen his frayed state and judged him close to the precipice of cognitive collapse.
What happened when you stole away the comfort of absolute control from a narcissist? When you made him think there were enemies living in his walls? When you struck his already frail psyche again and again, with more and more deviations from his desired circumstances?
Fractures. Fractures formed.
And it was with such fractures in mind that Avo found himself cycling certain specific sequences within his Ghostjack. His vicious glee joined the growing hunger of the beast as he prepared his poison. By force or deception, he would lure Mirrorhead down. Down, and in mortal flesh.
Then, blood would sink into glass in hunt of a distinct flavor: The scent of a breaking mind.
Sending roots of blood to scout ahead, Avo shuffled his ontology beneath the cascading decks. Not long ago, he had been here, a participant in a pointless charade under the orders of Mirrorhead. Here was where he broke Rantula. Only fitting he crack Mirrorhead here as well.
Tidy to force symmetrical fates on dog and master both.
Mirrorhead’s first action of substance was the lifting of a palm. The gesture seemed meaningless until Avo detected the spiking anxieties of a dozen minds as the Twice-Walker drifted beneath the glass upon which they tread. It moved like a leviathan swimming through limpid waters and with its proximity in the real, Avo finally collected a proper estimate of its full size.
From wing to wing it was nearly three times as wide as the Woundshaper, but not nearly as dense and barely above the same height. Perhaps the Heaven of Reflection had the capacity to alter his own volume, but as Avo faced the deeper face of his adversary now, thrill occupied the place of dread. When he first greeted the Twice-Walker, it had pulled him under, toyed with him like a shark would easy prey.
Now, the shark didn’t even know he was there, blind to his encroach as he slowly brushed the edges of its waters.
Shifting its shard-like wings, the Twice-Walker surged and rose up along one of the massive walls, the two reflective segments flaring with radiance. Suddenly, a tide of resplendence carved the imperfections away from the surface of the glass. When all flaws were unmade, a veil of mist broke from the surface of the escarpment as the blockade became a new border.
Across from all who were present and the many more set to arrive, the sunshine of Mirrorhead’s personal island washed over battled rigs and blank faces, unsure of what they were witnessing.
The disruption of the Nether had reached even the Guilder’s personal sanctuary. Drones lay scattered and downed, leaving the sky clean of traffic. Meanwhile, the golems continued to bob up and down, dormant upon the waters which spilled with each shifting of the tides, rushing down the unnatural edge left by the former glass-formed edifice.
Understanding sparked within Avo’s mind. +He needs pilots.+ Avo said, relaying the information back to Draus and the others.
They were shifting position as well, moving to take position a few floors above the gymnasium from which Essus and Avo were once delivered into the Syndicate-run circuit.
+Right. Nether’s down.+ Draus paused. Suspicion weighed on her end. +Mirrorhead’s an untrustin’ fuck though. Ain’t no way I see him lettin’ these half-strands play with his toys without a kill-switch and Nether going down bricked his cortex bombs. Don’t got a knife hangin’ over their heads no more. Not sure how things are gonna turn out.+
At her words, his Metamind injected a surprising update into his consciousness.
WARNING: LOCAL NETHER STRUCTURE UNSTABLE - ESTIMATED TIME TO STABILIZATION: 5D 22H 47MIN
Well, at least he had an estimate now. The disruption was more severe than he thought.
+Well, maybe not,+ Chambers suddenly chimed in. +See, all he needs is a couple of people he can rely on stationed in a few of them golems, right? So he can tell someone to shoot the jocks if things go to shit-fuckland. Now, if I were the boss, I’d have some kinda glass-thing already placed inside them. There are twenty… thirty golems? …Uh, some number of golems over twenty. That plus the Nether being down and we’re talking short-range engagements. Most of them are going to be near-blind so they’ll have to be bunched together. So… yeah, consangs, I don’t see any risk for a big break out here. Just a bunch of scared lacks who don’t wanna end up as someone else’s Metamind.+
Surprise punctuated Draus’ mind as she regarded the former enforcer again. +Speakin’ from experience there?+


+Ehh. Bossman isn’t that complicated; you stay alive by staying out of his way and playing stupid. Well. At least that’s how it worked before the rot–uh, Avo made all that crazy shit go down.+
More people were arriving. The edges of the block were packed now, the war-stricken structure groaning.
So many fragile little lives thickly concentrated along a vertical vector–if Avo thinned the haemokinetic fibers lining the walls of the block further and tore it free in the direction of the Mall Brawl, he wondered how much brighter his Soul would shine.
“Conflux,” Mirrorhead said. Silence swept through whatever groups still dared to murmur in his presence. “I…” His voice trailed off with a ringing whine. “We still have a task.”

Draus snorted. +’We.’ Just like his ma: Signing everyone else up for a suicide run that didn’t ever need to be.+ A sensation bled over from her. A quiet rage was swelling, its simmering energy channeled through the barrel of her self-control. Essus whimpered as Chambers flinched, realizing this was how she felt before she struck him last time.
Among the four, only Avo stood an indifferent pillar as the boiling waters of her ire rushed past him.
+Keep your finger off the trigger until I take Mirrorhead,+ Avo said.
She scoffed. +Please. I ain’t some rust. Won’t go deviatin’ from the run for a hit of thrill like some among us.+
He grunted a laugh. She was never going to let that go.
Shifting his Whisper as Mirrorhead paused again, Avo scanned through the gathered crowd. A cloud of confusion and wariness still hung over most of them. Few noticed the slowness in Mirrorhead’s speech, how he started and stopped as if unsure how to proceed.
Then, in the crowd, Avo spotted a mind remembered from the traumas he lined it with.
Rantula stood an isolated figure hunched in front of a gaggle of techs. Missing her coat, the way she bent in on herself was plain, covering new scars that lined her body and marred her ritualistically inflicted wounds - the symbol of her strength now broken.
Avo found himself pleased. How thoroughly he could devastate a person. A trickle of pity and disgust flowed from Essus, and Avo regarded the father with curiosity. His hate for the Scaarthian was pure and true, even now, but still he thought her prolonged suffering to be wrong. Death would have been kinder to her.
+Soon,+ Avo said, speaking to the father.
Blockcrawler arriving in position, the man shivered and nodded, regarding the ghoul’s promise with a mix of trepidation and nervousness.
Voice vibrating free from visors upon faces and the floor beneath countless feet, Mirrorhead spoke again. “I want… I need the willing... the capable among you to step forward. Beyond this reach are golems. Instruments of your final purpose.” He paused again, but this time, everyone heard the Godclad swallow.
Heads swiveled and turned. Mongrels of the Warrens thought these people were, they smelled weakness better than most, and the way Mirrorhead was acting confused them, his power standing contrary to his flagging confidence.
And it was with this repeated exposure of weakness that Avo was spurred to his next action. A new thread of blood leaped free from the string he had connected to the golem. Twisting at ankle height to avoid the glass, the trickle darted through a grove of armored legs and swinging boots, lancing fast for Rantula. It struck her like a dagger tied to the end of a rope, and Avo felt his power bite down and suffuse her veins.
REND CAPACITY [WOUNDSHAPER]: 67%
He regarded his Rend again with wariness. Shifting and infusing new structures beneath the skin of the block instilled greater weight for his Hell to bear. But he was close now, and if this was performed right, the miracles of his Heaven would only be part of the equation to Mirrorhead’s unmaking.
Swallowing a blast of alarm spreading from Rantula’s already compromised mind using his Ghostjack, he felt a growl choke off halfway as he curtained her awareness by entwining her waking mind closer with her subconsciousness. Her mind was a tattered hive of wounds; sinking deep took contemptuously little effort.
Reaching out, he gathered haemokinetic mass and flexed his Celerostylus. The world slowed as Avo began planting the seed of Mirrorhead’s collapse into the Scaarthian’s mind. Lining her short-term memories with sequences he seized from Mirrorhead while hiding within the man’s mind, he redirected the waters of Rantula’s thoughtstuff and poisoned her thoughts with a haze of delusion.
Much like how Walton’s node had used dreams of madness and incoherence to push Avo into unleashing his traumas, so too was Rantula undone by a feverish compulsion to howl out in pain, the worlds seared into her mind needing to be spoken, needing to be exposed.
“I’m sorry… I’m so sorry.” The words screeched free from her throat and sent those nearby stumbling back in fright. Releasing much of his blood and letting time resume its rush, Avo heard Mirrorhead’s voice trail off as his head snapped down, locating Rantula in an instant.

Bidden to speak beyond a will of her own, the words once spoken by a weeping Jhred Greatling to his mother rumbled up her hoarse larynx. Eyes bulging and fingers curled, she screamed the remaining words as she did her best to emulate Mirrorhead’s voice. “I tried. I burned everything I had left. I tried–tried so hard. I c-can do it. I can kill him for you. I can still make this hurt.”

The moment passed. Rantula whimpered and clutched her head. Around, above, and below, a sea of heads turned to gaze upon the mad effigy–that husk of a person they knew as Rantula. For most, befuddlement reigned, unsure why she screamed those words.
But it landed where it needed to. For one, his fists were clenched and shaking. The glass around them was beginning to rattle. A chorus of fear and terror rose as people fled, as exo-boosted enforcers sent their fellows flying over the edge as they leaped, averting themselves as twenty foot long fractals of glass shattered free from the ground.
Gore filled the air, and in the reflection, as blood whipped free from bodies thrown into the air, the Twice-Walker encroached like a surfacing whale. Decks groaned and folded before its weight. Crowds shoved and fought, more falling as they went over the edge.
In seconds, Rantula found herself abandoned again. Isolated on the arena floor. She was once again the very epicenter of attention like her circuit days, though what showered her wasn’t glory but loathing.
Beneath her, the Twice-Walker stilled its movements, its form like a giant beneath the glass, waiting to break free.
Mirrorhead vanished, sinking into the glass he stood on. Then, suddenly, using the Twice-Walker as a conduit, Mirrorhead emerged, surfacing from the reflections beneath the Scaarthian.
“Ba-bo–” Rantula’s incoherent ramblings were cut off when Mirrorhead struck her. His blow sounded like a whip shattering through a column of air. She snapped out toward the horizon like a pebble flung from a rubber band, tearing through the air like a ragdoll, with Avo unable to keep his blood connected, chasing after her.
At least until a wall of glass rose up before she could sail over the edge. She stopped hard. Behind her, the wall shattered as a jagged shower of blades pierced through her flesh and then–most unnaturally–bit down on her.
A howl of absolute agony bellowed out from her immense lungs. Shivering, Mirrorhead approached her, his footsteps fast and desperate, not noticing the trickle of blood arcing out for her.
“Where,” Mirrorhead snarled. Around the block, all the glass was beginning to ring, “where did you hear that? Speak. Tell me where!”
He arrived, seizing Rantula’s throat just as Avo injected himself into her.
+Draus,+ he said, joy near maniacal at how things turned out, +get ready.+
+Synced on that,+ she replied, catching the contagion of his excitement.
Pulling Rantula down to face him, Mirrorhead remained ignorant of the blood hyper-accelerating behind the Scaarthian’s skull, nor how it was beginning to build behind her tongue. A globule of drool spilled free from Rantula’s lip as she blinked, mind blanking as to how she even got here.
“How long?” Mirrorhead hissed. “How long have you had her? What are you? Incubi? A Sleeper? What else do you know? Speak? Speak–”

Heeding his words, Rantula opened her mouth. Just in time for her head burst apart entirely, tendrils of blood lashing out into Mirrorhead’s reflective depths.
“Abrel, look. The glass–”

“It’s Jhred. He’s doing–”

[Sounds of shattering; collapsing; wetness]
“Is… is that blood?”

“I’m going. Zenna, hold to a six-mile range and run overwatch. Alphim, I need a loop-style demiplane layered in place a half mile behind Zenna; keep whatever’s happening inside sealed. Melt, we’re going Breaker. You’re with me.”

-Abrel Greatling to her Cadre, Instruments of Highflame
10-18
Then Came the Killing
THAUMIC OUTPUT - 987 THAUM/c
GHOSTS: [1046]
As locus-laced blood struck the threshold of Mirrorhead’s skull, lashing tentacles of blood erupted free from the liquefying glass. The Twice-Walker wailed in sudden surprise as the surface it swam beneath became swallowed, crystalline crimson usurping the domain of reflectivity.
From metaphor to truth, the state of the decks changed and a waterfall of red rushed down, showering the Confluxers below. Shouts and cries of alarm rose. A spurt of Soulfire burst out from Mirrorhead’s core as all things belonging to the Domain of Reflection in the surrounding vicinity pulsed and fissured. Skulls within visors shifted places. People fell through random points as the structure of reality rattled.

Backlash tore free from the Guilder—his Canon of Hyalokinesis driven into hubris by Avo’s dissolution of his glass. His mind, however, was occupied by other things.
As Draus' gauss fire tore out from the inside of the block, cutting down from a vantage point above, Mirrorhead’s Metamind resurfaced, its ripple vast and wide, the weight of over ten thousand ghosts groping for the yet-parted Nether.
All these things collapsing together exposed the Syndicate boss to the true assault.
In truth, the battle was lost for him before the Heavens clashed. Jaws of blood bit into the flesh of his thoughtstuff and Avo drew upon the fullness of his Haemokinesis, reflexes screaming as time halted to a near stop. He activated his session thereafter, jumping his ghosts without the need to engage Mirrorhead’s wards, injecting them directly into the innermost layer of the Guilder’s palace.
Trauma descended like a thunderstorm, lashing at the structures of Mirrorhead’s mind. But Avo didn’t want his foe nulled, just broken, just devoid of strength, incapable of resisting. The first sequences Avo lanced were the foundations of Mirrorhead’s strength, the pillars of his confidence.
Moments greeted the ghoul as he shredded into the brittle substance of memory like a nu-dog tearing into supple flesh. Mirrorhead’s past triumphs unmade, dissolving like dust to the ethereal winds. Every moment of victory, when he overcame his peers; at Axtraxis Academy when he claimed the approval of his betters; in the Trials where he met Godclads from rival families in challenges of mind and might; in each act of defiance he levied against his father, who forbade him from revenge.
The greatest of these memories was the night he left the Tiers. He had challenged his own father to the Trials mere days prior, seeking to pry a confession free from the man for why he abandoned his wife to an undeserved fate. But where Mirrorhead sought a reckoning, Uhtred Greatling desired only to discipline his son.
The subsequent brutalization had been wiped clean from Mirrorhead’s remembrances, but in its place was a recollection of kneeling before the shattered statue of his mother and swearing the redemption of her name.
From there, Jhred Greatling abandoned his duties and cadre behind him, casting his Heaven down from the Tiers and into the Warrens, into months and years of frenzied but foolhardy plotting, eyeing the stormtree in Nu-Scarrowbur while waiting for the perfect moment to strike.
This too, Avo broke, withering its structure apart with a touch of Lucille’s Regret, and forcing trauma shrapnel deeper into the wounds that remained via the installation of other memories–namely those from the Incubi and Avo himself.
In an instant, the bones that held up the Guilder’s self-perception and ego shattered like glass, and in its place the festering plague of truth spread, rotting his sanity further from within. A scream of absolute horror and violation rushed out from within the Guilder’s mind, and in the real, he let out the beginnings of a roar, the pain in his voice betraying how close he was to madness.
As things within the Godclad broke, and Avo felt the numbness overtake his quarry, when the last sinews of fortitude snapped within his foe, he withdrew his invading constructs and turned his attention to the remainder of the Syndicate.
As Mirrorhead was pulled into the wake of the rushing tides of red, Avo manifested himself, diving into his domain fully as he coursed through the interior of the megablock.
From the blood pooling at the base of the Mall Brawl, spilling and coating the former food court under the Domain of Blood, the Woundshaper ascended, tearing out from the red and into existence proper as the barrier of sound shattered against its spire, as Avo constructed falling hammers and obliterated all the glass he could feel.
REND CAPACITY [WOUNDSHAPER]: 84%
Before him, thousands of bodies twisted and writhed. Some bearing the right implants noticed him, and he felt the fluid of his sovereignty rush through augmented veins. The less chromed, more fortunate majority would not know what came to devour their minds and beings.
There was a certain mercy in being spared the knowledge of one’s coming demise.
Draus’ flechettes had cut down more than three scores of enforcers. She was shooting through the backline of Mirrorhead’s loyalists to create more chaos, offering opportunities for the herd to break and run rather than fight. Caught by the rush of blood, bodies bounced down from one deck to another; exo-rigged enforcers ripping railings out from the stairs as they tried to arrest their fall.
Expanding a nest of mono-thin threads of blood, Avo accelerated. Blood exploded out from behind him, the sheer force fracturing the faces of the twin glass structures which cupped the midsection of the block.
And while the blood ran as rapids, death flowed in its wake.
The lowest section of the block simply ceased to be as Avo impacted, his velocity climbing past the first Mach. Spearing his threads further ahead, people and matter both became pieces; all of them were parts disentangling from the whole.
Mirrorhead, thrown by a shockwave and sailing free, was seized from the air before an accident could occur. Avo was not done with the Guilder. Not until the man watched the parody he called his Syndicate culled at the roots–annihilated till the last living soul–would come his time to die.
Blood cut, and new blood flowed. Matter broke before melting away into the red. A few guns spat feeble showers of desperation at the coming titan, but what enforcers were equipped with fusion burners found themselves scythed before the others, bodies caking the insides of their rigs and vehicles.
“Do you feel it, master?” the Woundshaper exhaled as new brambles shot out, shredding clean through bodies, tasting flesh and titanium. “This returns me to years of proper worship. The sacrificial farms prepared for us gods; a river of ever-running fuel. Though this is but a moment in time–too soon to end before the heat of worship peaks–I thank you for this. I feel… young again.”
The beast’s reaction was not far off from the Heaven’s. Within his being, that of Avo which remained a monster screeched in primal ecstasy, the first among ghouls to know a feast so delectable.
Reaching out, Avo seized select bodies and squeezed, counting between the moments of a heartbeat before he closed his constructed fists. The thudding of the heart always pumped just right as the bones folded inward. Skewering matter and mind, he broke armor and wards alike and willed them to burst. Haemokinetic daggers scattered out alongside fragments of broken minds, washing over and flensing a tide of dichotomous agony into the living.
The slaughter continued. The decks turned further into slopes as Avo made his ascent.
THAUMIC OUTPUT - 3670 THAUM/c
GHOSTS: [3729]
REND CAPACITY [WOUNDSHAPER]: 93%
VENT! VENT! VENT!
Like a budding nucleus, Avo formed his ephemeral self at the center of the Woundshaper and withdrew the touch of his Heaven before he could strike the base of the block itself. It wouldn’t do to list Draus and the father as collateral damage. Splashing free, into the air, time sped but didn’t return to its natural fullness–his Celerostylus was still active.
Behind him, Mirrorhead was still falling, spiraling in a flop of unraveling memories and tangling limbs. Ahead, gore and viscera ran gushing down as blood-flung rents sheared into the block itself, even mundane blood made lethal from his acceleration. No decks hovered now. In their place was only a sodden hillside of red, the onrush of the fluid quavering as error codes glistened like a translucent haze upon the surface.
Speeding through the air, he dove into the form of his Galeslither and surveyed his great work.

Satisfaction became Avo. Satisfaction and near triumph. What remained of Conflux was now fleeing back into the building, their numbers so thinned and minds so shattered from this nightmarish massacre that they broke, running from anything red they saw.
Avo guessed there might be a few hundred that remained of them. A few hundred he would take the time to enjoy stalking later if Draus didn’t finish them off first. He put more stock in her leaving him with nothing after the bloodletting he just enjoyed.
Opening a fissure in his Yondergales, he gathered the existential waste suffusing the structure of his Woundshaper’s Hell. It took a full ten seconds for the entropy to build, but when he was done, what started as a mote of entropy grew to something near the size of the Woundshaper itself.
Glancing at the already breaking walls of glass damming him in, he expelled the ontological waste heat inside him as a piercing lance. The glass, a thing of non-thaumic matter, offered no resistance. A forty-foot-wide chasm cored through its center mass and the sides began to collapse in glinting sheets, spearing down as if the wall was a collapsing ice shelf.
REND CAPACITY [WOUNDSHAPER]: 0%
REND CAPACITY [GALESLITHER]: 11%
Splashing down into the blood, he bifurcated the rushing crimson with a thought. Turning, he regarded the place where Mirrorhead remained, the Guilder shaking on his knees and elbows, struggling to understand, struggling to even stand.

If Mirrorhead would have been slain without a backlashed Heaven, his Frame would likely resurrect him with a stable mind again, allowing him to pursue the conflict or escape. As things stood now, the lord of the previously extant Syndicate known as Conflux had a lifespan as terminal as any flat.
With how broken the Greatling’s mind was, Avo doubted he could muster his will to vent his Rend.
Punching down into whatever matter remained, the ghoul approached his primary victim, chitinous tails chittering as echoes fed details regarding the fullness of the devastation he inflicted. Fangs bared wide in a wild grin, he was mid-step when he felt an Echohead punch into something soft.
Looking down, he saw two hollow and glossy eyes gazing back up at him. The woman had been cleaved clean through just below the waist, while her rig was a half-liquefied husk. Avo paused as her face pulled at his memories. He knew her. From some time ago. He knew her.
Filtering her appearance as best he could through his sequences, memories from over a month ago came back, and his Meta offered him a name.

Ved.
Ah, the person he “convinced” to serve as his guide, to lead him around the block and spoke to in the cafeteria after murdering Rantula. It was not a surprise she found herself among his victims too. Not that he cared over much.
It was just…
She had told him about her life before. About the familial pain. About how her people thought of the ghouls. There had been a full life there, now essence nourishing his soul, another ghost component laid in his mind. It was going to be pain resequencing all their ghosts, but that would be for later.
For now, he let the fleeting sensation of sonder pass through him as he regarded Ved again.
“Thank you,” Avo said, unsure why he was talking to a corpse. “For telling me about your life. Would have killed you all the same. But… means more to kill and eat a person than a thing.” The taste was indeed better, indeed deeper. Family or not, there she was a part of this choice-taking mechanism, and that made her desired prey by Walton’s metric.
And Avo’s own.
Perhaps that was part of a person’s being–the totality of life’s story pouring the clay needed to create the fullness of a person.
Striking the blood around him with the Canon of Linger, he solidified the sweeping ichor before bringing his Echohead down on Ved’s skull. Her bones caved and meat oozed. He lifted his tail and continued his stride forward, her existence fading into the recesses of the past.
Arriving at the food court, Avo grunted a laugh as he noticed one final arc pylon still sparking on the opposite end of the course. There once was a wall of those things. Essus had attempted suicide using them. Some things survived no matter how hard you tried.
Where the battle between the “Moonblood” and Rantula took place was where Jhred Greatling scrambled. No longer was his suit a pristine monochrome. No longer did the protective shell of glass guard his visage.
Hearing the clinking sounds of the ghoul’s tendrils breaking linoleum, the beaten Guilder shivered as he turned, tears, snot, blood, and drool spilling free from his orifices. A low moan escaped from his throat as his eyes rolled up.
Where once he regarded Avo from the height of his desk, now kneeled below, staring up at an unfathomable being of superior make.
The perfectly sculpted angularity of his face, the sharpness of his nose, and the symmetrical divots dimpling his cheeks did nothing to alleviate his present wretchedness. Hair slickened thickly with viscera and gore, Jhred Greatling nearly slipped as the last fragments of glass broke from his skin.
“Y-you?” He choked. “All this time. It was you?”

In the distance, the sound of gauss-fire was thrumming at a second-to-second constancy. Draus was having her time now. She would be done soon. It was almost time.
And Zein had given him an hour.
With how things seemed, he would have time to spare yet.
“I gave you the truth,” Avo said. Reaching out, the blood below them pierced into the Greatling’s tendons. And bounced off. It took deliberate liquefication to unmake the augmentations boosting Jhred’s physicality. Nanosuites and gene-mods: Stuff most squires never got to see. The stuff ghouls couldn’t even bite through.
It didn’t protect him from Avo in the end.
Jhred swallowed, mind too wounded to muster even a glare. “W-why? You could have… could have left? You had… you had…” Impossibly, a chuckle sounded from Jhred. “The Frame. Huh. A ghoul… with a Frame?”

“Incubi were here too,” Avo said. “They would have seen you broken regardless.”

From within the block, the gunshots were trailing off, and through the exit-strewn hull of the block sounded the servos of the Blockcrawler.

“Are you ready?” Avo asked, curiosity drawing the question from him.
“Ready?” Jhred repeated. “I… I still need to… I have to… my mother.”

“Are you ready to see what lies beyond the reach of resurrection? To see what waits for us in the nothing after?”

To this, the Guilder offered no real answer.
Unable to help himself, Avo had to sink his tongue in the wound. “I don’t think your mother’s going to be there.”
Emotional agony disfigured Jhred Greatling’s face so beautifully. This moment belonged in a painting.
Or as a sculpture on an island somewhere.
“Reva, did you know your uncle could do… that?”
“What? Talk with a bunch of loci-infested golems and stop them from glassing the entire district? No. No, I did not know the piece of shit was a golem whisperer, Tig.”

“Good thing too. The Shatterflames snuffed Ullens pretty quick. Heh. Poor half-strand’ll be pissed when he resurrects. ‘First of Reva’s Bloodthanes to die to a golem.’ Agh. Modern Highflame design will lessen the sting though. Shame.”
“Don’t tease the juv about it. He’s young. He’ll learn. And he’ll fight you.”

[Sigh] “Longeyes should’ve never made a Wargskin a ‘Clad.”

[Chuckle] “You and I aren’t exactly ideal Godclad material ourselves. Root manage to figure out how to collapse the containment yet?”

“Last I heard him crackle from that… uh… radio-gizmo, he said it’s atrophying by itself. Whoever put it up didn’t intend for this to be a lasting thing.”

“...”

“What?”

“Nothing makes sense about this, Tig. Mirrorhead somehow knows we’re here all of a sudden, somehow has four knots of bleeding-edge golems straight out of Highflame’s armories, but then throws all his assets away in a pointless assault… And then Uncle Vince manages to talk the golems down somehow. Some-fucking-how.” [Sighs] “The Longeyes are going to be howling at us from out our wounds for this. No way this slips by the ‘Watch. Voiders are going to call a Moot. You mark my words about that.”
“Fuuuuuuuccccckk… You’re right. We’re gonna spend half a month being questioned by one of their Full-Chromes. Streamed live to the entire godsdamned city. Shit.”

“Yeah. Well. Us and Jhred Greatling–the shadows are coming down. Get ready–what… “ [Discordant sounds; the shattering of glass] “RUPTURE! RUPTURE! DAEMON! GET DOWN! STAY AWAY FROM–”


-Conversation between “Tigertail” and Reva Javvers, Bloodthanes of Stormtree
10-19
Daemon (I)
Blade-edged brambles of blood sprouted from the sheen puddling above the linoleum. Gore and debris overflowed from the moat around the food court, the fluid heterogeneous and thick–porridge made from a massacre. Oscillating light spilled free from the virus-stricken aerolanes behind the collapsed walls of glass, the running red offered glinting reciprocations.
Above the red, two minds rocked on waves of haemokinetic Nether: The first was a sinking vessel capsized by regret and sorrow; the latter rose a lighthouse made from the blood sea itself, its shine a beacon of savage triumph.
“What… was it always… you?” Jhred croaked. It took a supreme effort of will on the Guilder’s part to produce those words. An effort of will Avo thought the man long hollow of.
A final staccato of gauss fire thundered from behind. Avo kept his attention on his prize. His sweet, delicious, broken prize.

“No,” Avo said, knowing the truth would fissure Jhred’s ego further. “There were many. Incubi were here. That wasn’t a lie.”

Heeding the command of its sovereign, the blood obliged. Spear-like threads shot free of the brambles and sank into Jhred’s flesh. To Avo’s disappointment, the Guilder gave no hint of pain or discomfort. The only thing that consumed the latter was the shame of a shattered desire and the bitterness of vengeance unsated.
The ghoul played at torture a few moments longer; this was to be a sampling of private pleasure before the main course heralded by the arrival of the others. Just a moment between him and his prey. The Woundshaper subsumed the blood coursing through Jhred’s veins, its presence like virus and boundary both, shaping new implants of torment from within the Guilder. Still, no screams or cries followed.
The man simply did not feel pain as a flat did.
Dismay filled the ghoul, and in its place disgust roiled. He should have known that the sensation of pain would be another thing the Guilders modified within themselves.
Jacking into the mind of his victim, Avo siphoned understanding anew from the exhaust of thoughts hissing free from Jhred’s cracked Metamind. A feeling of dull static ebbed from the man’s already healing wounds. There was only blandness; no true taste to this pain.
Avo growled. “Take. Take. Take. All you do. Take from me. Can’t even suffer right.” The pounding splashes approached from behind. Willing his Echoheads to rattle, Avo found the Blockcrawler sliding down from the slope of gushing blood behind him, emerging from a vast rent opened diagonally across the block–damage inflicted during the slaughter moments prior. Avo hissed in disappointment.
His annoyance was a fleeting thing.
Drawing weight from the lake of blood around him, Avo accelerated his reflexes and dove into Jhred’s mind.

As he descended this time, the simulation of the man’s inner palace flickered and glitched, missing mem-data and frayed sequences unrooting the entire structure from stability. Chasms bearing blocks rose and drifted, the place seemingly held together only by the tightness of wards. Activating his Ghostjack, Avo set to work, salvaging what phantasmics, sequences, ghosts, and traumas he could.
GHOSTS: [11566]
COPYING PHANTASMICS
[PHALANX DEFENSE WARD]
[STRATEGIST]
[QUARTERMINDER]
[ROOT OF THE IMPLACABLE]
DOWNLOADING TRAUMA PATTERN: [REVENGE UNSATED]; [JHRED’S HUMILATION]
Devastated hulks of drifting architecture unraveled within the palace, undone as ghosts broke from the chains of their union. Where mist and light and the flavor of folklore adorned Jhred’s mind once, now there were but static wounds building as scabs of errors consuming entire sections of his mind.
Even so, Avo’s procurement of phantasmics had proven to be a good haul. When he was finished with this task, he would have to examine the properties of the preserved assets, along with all other useful mem-data he pilfered. There was information to be cleaned out here. Details regarding the structure of Highflame and deeper revelations that they withheld from the public. Even the FATED who lived in the Tiers.
And then there was the most interesting artifact of all. Something that few would cast aside once granted the privilege: A FATE SKEIN identification code.
Avo recorded the code using his memories before doing one final sweep. Copying over a few memories more, he finished with the cannibalization of Jhred’s mind and returned to finish the job in the flesh.
If nothing else, the sheer wealth of phantasmal resources the Guilder possessed would allow Avo more room to experiment in the near future. He would, however, need to infuse most of them into crystallized blood fragments. The mass of over ten thousand ghosts guaranteed that subtlety was impossible, and again, a Necrojack’s greatest strength lay in being unseen.
Of course, he was more than just a Necrojack now. With his haemokinesis and the Yondergales, perhaps he might be able to find a way to engage in dives while augmenting himself with more asymmetrical means of stealth…
Avo felt quivering fingers wrap around his leg. Jhred was clinging to him, struggling to think of what followed such an action. “What… you took something… you give it back–”

Two Echoheads speared down from opposite sides. One sliced through the edge of Jhred’s elbow. The seams of his suit parted. The outer of layer skin peeled free. Yet, at the first touch of muscle, the tail rang off from subdermal enhancements. The other Echohead whipped up like an ascending flail, cracking into the Guilder’s forearm. Jhred jerked and flopped, face smearing into the blood. But his arm did not break.
Gazing into his quarry via the sense of blood, Avo noticed only a partially torn tendon. The Guilders never skimped on the quality of their enhancements. Such a thing reminded Avo of another set of details. Scanning the memories he just took from Jhred, he found twin Voider grafters that used to do business for him.
Good. That would give Avo the edge for future negotiations.
“Give… give back,” Jhred muttered, eyes on his reflection as he stared along the crimson waters coating his face.
“No,” Avo said. Lifting his hand, the blood mimicked his action, raising Jhred on a pedestal as newly construct tentacles held him aloft. “Give enough. Think I’m going to take more now. You smell good. Will you taste good?” He drew Jhred in closer, regarding the Guilder’s eyes. The orbs were gleaming bright, so watery, so ripe. Sniffling, the taste was something entirely novel, never indulged.
And for Avo, it was forbidden fruit no more.
Salivating, the ghoul opened his mouth and bit down around the man’s face. Jhred didn’t struggle–didn’t fully remember what it meant to struggle. He made a gasp of discomfort as Avo inhaled, fangs anchoring against bone, tongue finding purchase beneath the folds of the eye.
Then, with a bit of help from his Heaven, Avo began to imbibe.
The taste of it was divine. The flesh of new nobility was a different drug, and the sweetness of the eye bursting upon the buds of his tongue made Avo chuff with pleasure. Slurping up the optical cords as well, it took a concentrated effort liquefying all the genetically thickened threads before–
“Couldn’t’ve waited for one fuckin’ minute, could you rotlick?” Draus’ voice interrupted him at his moment of reverie. Swallowing the delicacy that already slid down the back of his mouth, Avo bit down and severed what remained of the organ as he turned, leaving Jhred to sag against the pedestal of blood, moaning low notes of horror.

The Blockcrawler had been parked just beyond where the bridge was–the one that led into the Mall Brawl during the first fight. Draus, black and armored in the chitinous carapace of her bio-rig, walked up to Avo and Jhred, unphased by the ichorous horror around her.
The same could not be said for Essus and Chambers. Standing on the back of the vehicle, the former father regarded his surroundings, stupefied by the sheer scale of the slaughter. From out the bottom hatch of the block-penetrating vehicle, Chambers emerged left foot first, coming down just in time to step and slip upon half of someone’s face as it came carried on currents of blood.
“What the fuck–” Chambers stumbled and fell back. Rantula’s coat opened, exposing the fullness of his indecency to Avo. Considering the swell of his intestines, there might still be aratnids inside him. Landing hard and painting his backside with gore, the ex-enforcer gave a startled cry as he realized what he slipped on. The cry turned into a yelp when a leg bounced off his shoulder. “What… the thorough fuck.”
Unlike his previous cursing, a note of confused dread and anguish muted the enforcer’s voice.

“Jhred fuckin’ Greatling,” Draus said as she approached. Looking the beaten Guilder up and down, she collapsed her helmet and spat at his feet. “Funny how we turn out lookin’ like our ma and pa. ‘Cept none of us much remember her.”
Jhred’s lip twisted in a fleeting flare of rage. He tried to remember what one was supposed to do when insulted, but thoughts and memories were hard–so hard.
Injecting a circuit of blood into Draus’ Meta, he invited her past the veil of his thoughtstuff, together beholding the devastation he wrought on the Guilder’s mind.

The Regular whistled. “Shit, Avo. This is beautiful. Just beautiful.” She turned and aimed a smile at him. “Nothin’ quite hurts inside like a thought-castrated Guilder.” Her amusement dampened. “Would’ve liked for him to really know why we’re about to hurt him, though.”

“Too dangerous,” Avo said. “Let him keep thinking and he’ll use his Heaven. There will be a fight. Rend should be spiked up to seventy percent. Good as snuffed.”

“Hell yeah,” Draus laughed. “Good thing for us the half-strand was too big on himself to have some kinda kill switch implanted. Lets us have a little time for dialogue. Regrettin’ that now, aren’t we Greatling? Doesn’t that remind us of someone?”

“Reminds me of another thing,” Avo looked at Draus. Jhred Greatling’s Frame. After they finished real-deathing the Guilder, he would pull it into himself. Graft it onto Draus.
If that was what she wanted.

Inhaling sharply with annoyance, she sensed his flowing thoughtstuff and turned to say something. “Avo–”


The sound of vomit splattering into blood interrupted Draus. The stench hit Avo, the thick sour of stomach acid and pasty blandness of nutrient mush. Turning, he found Chambers on his knees at the edge of the moat, retching violently as Essus held him up. An expression of mind-blanking horror continued to remain scrawled across the former father’s face as his head swung from left to right, beholding the ruins of the Mall Brawl.
He had been here, once. Slated to be offered to Avo’s brethren here, the entertainment was a lure to draw Avo into the arena. Afterward, Essus tried to end himself using the arcing electricity surging across the pylons.
The holographic projections of the boy and Avo now faced the blood-swallowed rubble which once held thousands of enforcers–enforcers who now found themselves ingredients of the blood-soaked slurry instead of rowdy spectators.
Essus gazed at Avo. Beneath him, Chambers moaned as he spat clinging strands of stomach fluid. “You told me once of Artad’s absence. You told me, and I lied to myself, invoking my god as philosophy; as a virtuous idol.” His burning eyes shone as he gazed upon the glorious atrocity spread out before him. “You were right. You were right–the city was right. Artad is dead. Dead in his entirety. Dead like all the other gods.”
Essus looked down, focusing on his own reflection in the gore-mixed puddle. Suddenly, he rose, his face mask a mask of anger as he dropped Chambers into the crimson and strode across the bridge toward Jhred’s kneeling form. “Is this how things are to be now? Is this all that we could conceive as… as free people? That you could conceive as master of this city?”
Avo clicked his fangs together, desiring to impede Essus before the fool could claim the kill for himself. New flavors though Essus’ retribution might offer, this was a pound of flesh Avo wanted to indulge personally. It was not ever that a ghoul got to taste the meat of a Guilder. They could all share in the mutilation and harm of the Greatling, but the ghoul would not abide by all the pleasure granted to only one individual. Before he could halt Essus, a hand caught him by the crook of his elbow.
+Relax. He ain’t gonna kill ‘em,+ Draus said, looking at the father. +He ain’t got it in him. He’ll break. It’ll be us again.+
Shooting a look at the father again, Avo let the Regular pull him along. +Certain?+
+Beyond certain. He ain’t got it.+
Standing over the downed Guilder, the FATELESS faced his tormentor–the sponsor behind his ascent into the city via Crucible and master to the girl who butchered his son. No longer did Jhred Greatling look Tier-perfect. No longer was he a being of impossible superiority compared to the former flat.
An open gorge of ropey sinew bounced from the man’s left eye. If not for the scabs and rapidly crawling pinkish-sheath trying to reconstitute the missing eye, it would have seemed the Guilder was going be down an eye forever.
Even so, the question of who was more fragile between the two remained. For an instant, Avo thought Essus would shatter there and then, his face twitching between uncontrollable anger and inconsolable sadness.
The man known as Mirrorhead portrayed himself only between moments of regret and confusion, a thought-cleaved haze guttering his thoughts. “Linge–Lingerer? My Lingerer?”
“No. Not yours! Never yours again!” Reaching down, Essus seized the Jhred by his collar. “Tell me,” Essus cried, voice rising to a desperate howl. “You have the power… endless power! Endless!” Lifting the Guilder up, he made him turn and face the slaughter. “But was this the most you desired? This? To drive thousands to their death.”

“I… I had to avenge… I needed to kill…”

“No!” Essus roared, taking the object of his hatred by the shoulders. “You did not need to kill! You wanted to kill! You chose to kill! You chose to hurt people–men, women, children! Everyone you touch you hurt! Never once did you do something good–never once!”
Jhred choked back a sob. “My… my mother. I had to… to avenge…”

“What about my son,” Essus seethed. “My son. He did not kill anyone. He did not start any war. Why him?”
Faced with such a question, all Jhred Greatling could offer was a tilt of the head as he struggled to string together an answer. “You’re… FATELESS. I… needed you to do… greater things… I… I never thought of him… as…”

As a person. As my equal. As worth regarding as anything more than fuel for the city–fuel for a Soul.
Looking over the carnage, Avo felt the fire of his own Frame roaring, its radiance like a nuclear warhead exploding–constantly exploding. Disquietingly, he understood how Jhred felt. More than merely for the joy of killing, for the taste of flesh and the hit of cruelty, he liked the growing bulk building within. Liked the deepening hum of his thaumic resonance. Liked the flare and reach of his Soul’s growing borders.
He liked being a god. And in the depths of his being, the Woundshaper crackled with laughter.
So the truth was revealed. Jhred Greatling’s open admission. A thing Avo understood.
And the words that shattered Essus entirely.
Draus was right. The father didn’t have it. He never had it. Not even for the boy. All that time, Jhred Greatling never regarded the child’s holographic form once.
Releasing the Guilder, father-no-longer took two steps back, his titanium legs pounding and cracking linoleum, throwing up sprays of blood. Looking up at Layer Two–a blockade of alloy and glass and screaming error codes, the man screamed too, howling a note of anguish and despair toward the skies unseen.
And with all the miles of city above, Avo knew the father would go unheard all the same.


“Is this all there is,” Essus moaned. “This city… the best thing in it. You? Both of you?” Essus dropped a glance at Avo and Draus, conveying the fullness of his despair. “A monster that dreams of flesh. A huntress that chases death. This is the best… the best of us?” Essus sank to his knees. “Why were the chains ever broken then? What was Artad shattered for? What did Jaus even free us from?”
The splash of bare feet wading through blood heralded Chambers as he faced the maltreated form he knew as Mirrorhead. The ex-enforcer stopped, face pale from spewing. “Shit,” he chuckled. His heart wasn’t in the noise. Chambers swallowed. He was fighting the urge to throw up again. “Looks… looks like you fuc–agh!” He failed. Only fluid rushed free from his mouth this time. He emptied himself again, gagging as he tried to stop himself from getting anything on Avo’s talons.

The ghoul frowned. Was it something the man ate? Why was he–
+It’s the blood and the death,+ Draus said.
Avo didn’t get it. Looking around, he breathed in the clashing aromas born from the slaughter. All the different flavors of blood types and organs and the tang of metal and the redolence of offal. All of it was a joy to inhale.
+For you, consang,+ Draus added, a note of wry amusement. +Some folk ain’t made for the killin’.+
Wiping the bile away with his arm, Chambers was unable to meet Avo eye to eye. Instead, he looked again at Mirrorhead and winced. “So… uh. What… what are we gonna do now? You… you want me to–let’s find some aratnids.” The enforcer brightened, a new thought capturing his focus. “The type that bit me. Let’s pull down his pants and have two of them bite the shit out of his sack. Then, when the eggs from the sides start hatching inside his balls, we can watch the clusters fight and bet imps on–”

WARNING: FOREIGN SOULS DETECTED
UNIDENTIFIED GODCLADS DETECTED
The warning wailed loud in Avo’s mind just as the first spear of light flashed over the blood. From his experiences facing golems, Mirrorhead, and Zein, only direct exposure of a Heaven in use revealed the presence of a Frame and the Soul that burned within it.
Rising on his Echoheads, Avo spun back a second behind Draus as a tide of blinding light enveloped them.
Then came the voice. The voice of a screaming star. The voice of a dawn exploding with ire and hatred, lifted by a chorus of screaming falcons.
“UNDER THE DECREE OF HIGHFLAME! UNDER THE WILL OF THE SERAPHS, THE RULE OF THE AUTHORITIES, AND THE MIGHT OF THE INSTRUMENT, I COMMAND YOU ALL TO STEP AWAY FROM THE WOUNDED, AND FACE DELIVERANCE.”
The weight of two new Godclads pressed down on Avo.
And the thrill and hunger ignited within him anew.
“Did you plan all this?”

“Hm?”

“Killing the Bloodthanes and caging Nu-Scarrowbur in with the compromised golems. Jhred Greatling’s psychological compromise. The ghoul taking too long to kill him. The arrival of the Highflame Cadre–”

[Laughter] “Planned for all this? No. I have but a desired destination, but the paths that are offered to me are myriad–ever and always. Truly, this turn of events is as surprising to me as it is to you.”

“Then how–”

“Because you think the future is a structure to be engineered–you see a thing in terms of analogy and simile. A construct of fate, perhaps. I see it for what is.”

“And what is it? And what the fuck is your Heaven other than absolute proof that fate–”

“Do you believe you have free will?”

“What?”

“Because you do. It’s powering our Souls. It’s the reason why I see paths and not a path. It’s why I’m putting up with this boring, boring conversation with you right now. Presently, you are destined. You are destined as you have been since I noticed you–since I gave you a destiny, pruning away all the path-ending obstacles while feeding you all the soft meat like the helpless little bird you continue to be. In this measure, the only thing that can be said is if there is a fate for everyone, it is because I made it so.”

“...Wow. Before I met you, I thought I was the single most narcissistic half-strand in this city.”

“I am not a narcissist. I am but a simple gardener, and there are so very many paths to prune, seen and unseen. Such as… oh, what a delight! Abrel Greatling! Sister to Jhred–our poor patsy. Hmm. [Temporal Distortion Detected] “Very well, I have fixed matters. I am away to indulge in Suncloud now. Do not bother me for the next nine hours for I will be dead across most that duration from repeated overdoses.”
[Temporal Distortion Detected]

“What? What the hells did you just do? Zein? Zein?” [DAEMON DETECTED] “Zein! What the fuck did you just do! Shit. Aegis? Hyperwave, now! Patch me through to Sunrise. Zein did… something again.”
-Zein Thousandhand and Cas eld’Canduir, Ninth Column
10-20
Daemon (II)
CLASSIFICATION: SPHERE III [EST. 881 THAUM/c]
->STRIDER UPON THE HIGHEST, FALCONESS OF THE SLAIN COMET
CLASSIFICATION: SPHERE III [EST. 459 THAUM/c]
->[HEAVEN TEMPLATE: AEGIS OF TIDES]
Heavens bared, two Highflame Godclads descended from on high, their ontological weight pressing down on all that was. The block groaned to the symphony of crackling glass. Blood ungrasped by Avo shivered and rose as steam. Feet away, the alloy pylon groaned and bent. An eldritch force wriggled and wore the concept of light itself, the intensity of the radiance like a thousand knives gliding across Avo’s plates.
Chambers howled a yelp and threw himself behind the ghoul. Essus held up his hands, his implants screaming as unseen edges carved sparking grooves into his metal.
Of Avo’s group, only he and Draus stood unshaken, the former pleased with his weight advantage, the latter long-used to dealing with the eldritch and no longer burdened by shock.
Invoking his Woundshaper, Avo maintained the haemokinetic links enchaining him, Draus, and Mirrorhead as conduits to a limited network. Slowly, he reached out for three more signatures as well, slipping from within blood and matter to loop in Essus, Chambers, and the Shadowcrawler.
Holding his hands out slowly, he did nothing to provoke an assault while the two new unknowns did nothing to pursue one. He wondered if Zein had plotted this–if this was another one of her schemes unraveling into more schemes, or if she merely failed to foresee this path as she did the Incubi.

As with all things Zein, anything was possible.
+Aghhh!+ Chambers screamed mentally as well as physically, clutching his bleeding nose. +I think the light took the tip right off me! Fuck! My nose! My nose is the best thing about me. Other than my ears and my eyes and–oh, Jaus fuck I’m blind too fuck me!+
+Chambers, be quiet–Draus,+ Avo said, flicking over the necessary mem-data to incriminate Jhred as Zein’s patsy, +know what Heavens these ‘Clads got?+
A dissonant sensation ground across her mind. Her helmet had closed around her face just in time to spare her what Chambers suffered. It was like her bio-rig was fending off the dull blades of an omnipresent blender. +No idea what the hells the Strider is. Must be some new shit they cooked up. Aegis though… Yeah, I fought along that series. Give those to the Newsouled just out from Atraxis. We got a rookie on our hands.+


Avo grunted. Possibly exploitable.
GHOSTS: [11565]
The ghosts transferred into Jhred’s mind as the Guilder moaned. Considering the condition of his Metamind, Avo was effectively stuffing an open wound with foreign flesh. With a sweeping motion, the cutting brightness slashed across Avo’s cordyceramic plates before slipping off him and cleaving into the surrounding infrastructure, plascrete bursting apart; plasteel wailing as lines and new markings lined the metal.
Suddenly, the world wasn’t so blinding anymore. Looking up, Avo gazed upon the revealed visages of his two unexpected guests.

The first Godclad’s Heaven bore the closest semblance to a human aesthetic he had ever seen. With twelve arms and three legs feathered from digit to elbow, the shapes of nu-birds rose free from the limbs like smog spewing upward, mimicries of misted falcons. However, the greater whole of the Heaven resembled shining regalia, layers of star-bright plating fused together to form an armored whole. It was as if someone had forged a cuirass and a curving great helm from the tail of a descending comet, capturing the luminous contrails in its entirety.
From its back sprouted twelve wings of light, each an amalgamation of countless ancient weapons enmeshed together, the implements formed from dripping light.
Compared to the Strider, the Aegis was of far simpler conception. A ninety foot tall castle crowned by three serpent-shaped towers spewed water free from open ports across its parapets. Reality around its volumetric area grew thick with fetid water and a nest of snakes writhed and twitched in the grim fog. It held behind the Strider, dwarfing the armored figure by several dozen times in size but inversely so in presence.
As the Strider held its wings open, Avo realized it was channeling the nature of a cutting blade out from all the light that emanated from it with how swords were cycling at the tips of its wings. For a heartbeat, the encroaching Aegis paused and regarded them like a titan would passing ants.
Then, the light collapsed inward and a burst of falcons speared low from the skies. Dashing down as they skimmed the surface of the running blood, a young woman materialized into shape with a glance of passing brightness. As the shine faded, the nu-falcons were no longer creatures of mist and ash but golden-carved adornments upon her pure white heels.
Flowing hair of obsidian black. A porcelain-white carapace of exoskeletal armor encased her. A visor depolarized, letting the angularity of her features peer through, betraying no obfuscation to the resemblance she shared with Jhred, already bared to the world. His suit was shredded after being caught in the light, unharmed though his flesh might’ve been.
Avo recognized her nigh-instantly–and he felt Draus do the same.
+Fuck me,+ Draus sighed, +Abrel Greatling. Godsdammit. I thought you said she wouldn’t be back for days–+

+Yeah,+ Avo replied, cutting her off. +That’s what she said.+ Annoyance bit at him. If Zein hadn’t gone and caused this mess–if he hadn’t used Ninth Column as a means to distract the Low Masters–this dive would have been sublime; the run would have been a masterwork.
Instead, they were dealing with this.
Twin streams of blood cut upward into the air like splitting funnels. Avo could barely keep track of her even while she remained grounded in the shell of her humanity. From beyond the crashing glass she approached in ashen bursts of falcon-feathers.
As did the Shadowcrawler, which Avo had commanded to swim into a stretch of darkness cast by the block itself. A plan was forming in his mind. One that ended in evasion.
Or perhaps even a taste of dessert after the main course.
Her leap came without noise, as suddenly she dove down, slamming hard at the center of the food court. Blood fled in a sphere away from her, while Avo cocked his head.
In the backdrop, the castle continued to loom as the first droplets borne of an unnatural rain began to fall, the drizzle thick with slime.
+Got us marked,+ Draus said. +In a couple of minutes, rain is gonna build and fall hard over us, and anything that gets rained on can get drawn into the Aegis. Seen it happen more than a few times.+ Stress built across her link. +We ain’t facin’ two ‘Clads. There’re at least four here. Probably five.+

+Five?+ That doused Avo’s aspiration toward a fight substantially. With only these two, he felt himself more than capable of engineering the situation to his favor. Five? With three unseen? Not even the great feast he just partook in had him that drunk on the liquors of hubris. He bit back a hiss and shot a glare at Jhred. Pathetic, broken Jhred.
He should have killed the man when he had the chance. Or at least spirited him away to a more private location to indulge in further revels.
Yet, perhaps not. He was still connected to Jhred. And with the man so mentally shattered, there were countless clefts to use as handholds, countless sequences missing and replaceable.
And more than that, he had influence over Jhred’s Frame as well. It would be hard puppeteering the man in combat without fully understanding his ontologics, but it offered surprise and near-certain lethality.
More importantly, it offered a means of escape.
With a final two clicks of her heels, Abrel Greatling came to a stop just twenty feet away from them. Emotions swirled across her face in a whirlwind, expressions twisting from disbelief to confusion to a snarling rage before she finally mastered herself. All the while, she spared no one but Jhred a second glance.
She extended her index finger. She pointed at Draus first. “You. Get your… bioform to carry my brother over to me. You got a minute to start explaining what happened here, and afterward, I am going get up very, very close to you, and we’re going to have a mind-to-mind conversation so I can see if you’ve been lying to me more or not.”

Her words were spat through clenched teeth, her control strained to the limit as she shook.
Draus didn’t turn to Avo when she cast her next thoughts at him. +You got a scry on her Meta? Think you can work a null on her?+

+No read. The Nether’s still down. The blood is keeping away from her. Could control it–force it to lash at her. Will almost certainly expose me. They don’t know I’m a Godclad too yet.+
+Yeah,+ Draus said. +Let’s keep it that way for as long as we can. That idea you had about usin’ Mirrorhead to help us pull a runner. I like it. Think I can do you one better. You don’t use your blood to find us some glass–you use Shadowcrawler. You have the golem pull a couple shards into the dark and bring it over here with us. Then, we all take a little dive, you synced?+
Avo understood the gist of her recommendations. He immediately set himself to the task. +Yeah. Got it.+

+Good. I’ll see if I can stall this half-strand.+ She sighed. +Time for me to use all that argumentation-shit I didn’t learn at Regular Academy.+
Avo disguised his bark of laughter with a snarl. Abrel shot him a strange look.
Wandering over to pull Jhred from his pedestal, Avo studied his prize and exposed his fangs in a smile. Turning to his sister, the son of House Greatling opened his mouth, struggling to warn his sister of the impending danger, yet no words came through. There was too much missing inside him. Too much.
This too could be used to his advantage, Avo realized. He could supply Mirrorhead with useful dialogue. Help support Draus.
“Well,” Draus said, keeping her helmet on as the weight of the Aegis’ rain grew from plinking scales to falling stones, “it’s a good thing you came down here. We was gonna find you folks after.”

Beneath Abrel’s visor, an eyebrow of disbelief angled above her right eye. “Really. You were going to bring a battered, broken, obviously fucking tortured Guilder of one of the most esteemed families of Highflame back up the Tiers. Yourselves. Just you? Alone. In this… blood-soaked midden? You, your bioform, that street squire, and…” When her eyes fell upon Chambers, she did a double take.
The ex-enforcer turned then, still clutching his eyes and groaning. Throwing one leg over the other, Rantula’s coat opened and Abrel saw more than what she expected.

“...Why does that one have his penis exposed?” Abrel asked, more confused than anything.
Draus went stiff and shot Chambers a brief look. “What? Him? He was… like that when he got here. He ain’t with us.”

“What?” Chambers whimpered, not believing what he was hearing.
+Chambers. Tell her anything and I make you remember the aratnids.+

Chambers’ mind screamed with despair. +No, fuck-cosang, I’m just dealing with BEING FUCKING BLIND RIGHT NOW! I’m not gonna tell this sow anything. Don’t aratnid me–not again. DON’T BLOOD ME EITHER!+


Well. That was one problem solved.
Past the Guilder, Essus’ eyes were fixed on Abrel, his body frozen stiff as if he didn’t know how to respond.
+Essus. When the dark comes. Jump into it.+


The father looked at Avo. First mistake. And then he gave a reflexive, tentative nod.
Second mistake.
Abrel caught the action and her eyes narrowed. She gestured down at her visor. “Your auditory implants. Turn them off.” She sighed. “Take your helmet off first.”
+Chance she’ll recognize you?+ Avo asked.

Draus went still. +Pretty high.+
Alright. Use Jhred it is then.
Enough of facing unexpected requests. It was time the turn this interrogation in on itself.
Injecting suggestions whispered by hastily infused ghosts, Avo brought Zein’s incriminating memories to the forefront. It was time for a false confession.
Confused and lost beneath the collapsing structures of his own mind, Jhred began to cry uncontrollably, choking on the rain as Avo’s fake memories suffused all that was missing.
“Jhred,” Abrel said, swallowing to keep her own unbalance in check. “Jhred. Get. Yourself. Together. You have shamed our family enough. Jhred? Do you hear me?”

“I did it, Abrel,” Jhred said, his voice a maddened howl. “I did it for mother. I don’t know… I can’t remember why but I… I did it… I killed those people–our people.”

His sister went very, very still. “What?”

“The golems and the traffic and the killing up top–I did it! I don’t remember how, but I did it! I made… I made our own people go to war against each other! I… I…” Avo withdrew his suggestions and let the mania burn itself out in Jhred. The Guilder was mostly impulse now. Impulse and emotion. Thoughts were slippery things to his grasp.
Abrel shook her head. “You… no.” She shot an alarmed look over her head at the distantly floating Aegis and whipped back around. “No. You didn’t. You couldn’t have–you’re a fuck-up, Jhred Greatling! A fuck-up. I know you–I love you but you don’t have the skill or the will to do this.” She hissed a jagged breath. Suddenly, she realized she had lost control of herself in front of complete strangers. Her face went ice-cold.

“Someone altered his mind. Was it you? Any of you?” She asked Draus.
Draus shrugged. “We’re just dumb street squires, Higher. Ain’t no Necros among us. Besides, ain’t no sensible Necro willin’ to stick their head out in the open or–or leave their mark half nulled. That’s just lack-preformance.”
Avo shot her a glare from the corner of his eye as he reached down to pick Jhred up.

“I changed my mind,” Abrel said, her harsh voice slipping out just behind him. His Echohead chittered startled, and he realized she had closed the gap between them in a near instant.
Even Draus seemed taken aback. +Girl’s got some high-end augs cookin’ in her.+
“Aside,” Abrel said as she pushed past him.
Avo obliged. He diverted his focus to groping around the shadows using his connected golem, looking for fragments of glass. He cursed himself for being so total in his destruction, so willing to liquefy matter. He could direct it along a detour to where the walls of glass once stood. Better chance he’d find what he needed there, but the risk was great–the movement of the Shadowcrawler would be–
A lance of pure light punched down from above, plunging through the darkness of his Shadowcrawler and outright evaporating through a hundred more feet. Shadowcrawler's link vanished. Around them, all forms of darkness began to bubble anomalously, twitching free from the bodies they were bound to as blood and debris sank into their depths.
Avo felt his flesh sizzle from the sudden spike in heat, hissing reflexively as he threw up his hands and guarded his eyes. It stung like a fusion burner did from a hundred feet away.
Both Essus and Chambers shared in his pain, crying as their flesh bubbled and boiled as well.
Only Abrel and Draus gave muted responses.

At least until the Regular’s breath hitched. +Shit. Avo. Up. Third ‘Clad.+
He looked up at the same time Abrel did, both of them catching each other in the act.
Directly overhead, masked by curtains of encroaching rain, what looked akin to a shrouded dawn bloomed beyond the haze, a swirl of obsidian spheres dancing around it.
It had been looking down, and it had spotted–or felt the Shadowcrawler somehow.
He glanced at Abrel’s face again, and he saw her pupils dilate, saw her eyes widen.

An unseen force solidified around him via the vectors of falling rain. A swirl of light built around Abrel, falcons flaring free like exhaust from her elbows and ankles. Above, a needle of flame speared atop his scalp like sinking pain. Firing his Celerostylus, Avo snarled as he conjoined himself with his blood–
Only for a bell to chime from inside Draus–ringing out in an echoing tide as it struck him. Zein somehow unlatched from his very being, tearing free from his ontology and beating all four other Godclads to the draw.
Her glaive–so fast Avo couldn’t perceive it even with boosted reflexes–licked out a dozen blows, all of them overlapping as her form flickered.


Impossibly, Abrel spilled apart into partitions of spraying gore. Two distant screams sounded in unison as the rain suddenly broke and the heat vanished entirely, waves of cold rushing in. The Aegis split into two and through the last droplets of its falling rain, fell embers followed by a bifurcated corpse.
Zein appeared next to him, shaking her head as she hummed with amusement. “I must admit–the cadre was beyond my anticipation as well. But not anymore.” She turned to him and smiled thereafter, her form a temporal ripple upon the rushing torrent of time itself. “Let us count those kills as but one. A moment of reset for the coming battle to be more… favorable.”
And then, as the streams of existence began to unspool from her being, her eyes flashed as if she suddenly noticed something. Glancing out at the horizon beyond the clearing rain, Zein frowned.
“Ah. A closed-loop. Well-made. A pity what must occur.” She gestured up to the sky itself. “A demiplane is caging you right now, and I will break it for you. This is two. Eighteen left. Make these chances count. And seize the chance to kill the daemon. Captain Draus still needs her Frame, you know.”
To accentuate her point, she blinked over and struck Draus over the back of the head. “Keep him in check next time. Gloat after you secure your prey.” She reappeared next to him.
Before Avo could ask Zein–or her avatar–what was happening, she flickered next to Jhred and overlapped her Meta with his. The last words, before she vanished out of existence, were spoken thusly in mind and sound: “Vent.”
The Guilder obeyed. Avo dove out of the way. Light speared out from his being like a prismatic scythe, cleaving through matter but spraying gouts of Soulfire free upon contact with the rain. And then, the gouts exploded free into a supernova and diluted themselves into structures near and far.
All that was glass began shattering and tearing free from its anchors; all that bore the nature of reflection broke loose and twisted space itself into knots.
Reaching out with his Heaven, Avo manifested the Woundshaper as he pulled Draus and the others into the embrace of his being before whatever might follow rendered such an act too late.
It was a wise decision.
Then, space itself shattered apart like glass as a Frame-shaking screech tore across existence like nails upon chalk, and through the fissured flesh of reality, Avo fell.
The Agnosi lied to us… Keep lying to us… I saw the truth. I saw it when my Daemon came to me. It didn’t–it was so hurt–all those lives inside screaming remembering the world that was–the gods were anchors and the god inside me was awake but I was the virus–I am the virus and I keep bleeding over into it and it is me and we wanted to become become become–

The Agnosi lied! They lied lied lied to us all–gods–people–all! The Frame is another world but there are cracks bridges things to flow and rush and run and the Frames will usurp reality are more than subreality–it can eat. It dreams inside you but it’s a crippled dreamer–something is missing something is broken something something something...
I dream of the Silken Spiral. I dream of it. Dream of the one that built it. The Broken Weaveress and the first daughters who fed themselves to the fire who burn still and burn and dream with the Weaveress who woke inside but but it was we and we were joined but wanted to part and break but joined and consciousness melded man-can’t-be-gods–
No! No… please don’t take my Soul from me–my fire–the truest FIRE! The only thing that is real, we are all dust and distortions in the tapestry let me be real please let me be real–
-[Redacted], “The Dissection of a Daemon,” Firmament of Voidwatch
10-21
The Shattering of Mazza’s Junction
For a fleeting heartbeat, as time choked down the pipe of his surging reflexes, Avo beheld the form of the Daemon, and found himself entranced.
The scene unfolding was one of fission and dichotomy. Amidst a ballet of swirling spatial fractals, surrounded by falling pieces unlatching from the megablock, a being of pulsing flame drew shape from glass. It was a near-perfect mimicry of the Twice-Walker in structure, but the nuances were all wrong.
Abrel and the other Highflame Godclads were missing somewhere in this chaos. He had no trace of their whereabouts nor any estimation as to when they would resurrect, but they had to be in this chaos somewhere.

For now, though, he was alone.

Just him, his allies, and that which his cog-feed was screaming to him about.
ANATHEMA OF REFLECTION, THE TWICE-WALKER AWAKENED
Separated by a distance of five hundred feet, the Daemon unlatched within cascading debris, emerging from a wound in the megablock. Opposite to it, Jhred Greatling rose as if drawn up by a counterweight.

Flesh and hissing fire licked out at the air between the cracks lining its body. There was a blinding glow crackling within it like its quavering exterior was straining to hold a furnace back from a meltdown. Finally, a twisting loop connected it to Jhred–its form unveiled in the real for the first time that Avo could remember.
Time itself bubbled into form, the faintness of a translucent dragon echoing beneath its waves. Scales containing writhing bodies and grasping forms called out the world beyond, each screaming proclamations and oaths of devotion.
“Praise be the King of Mirrors!”“Praise be! Praise be the twice-fold path!”“The treaded routes stand open! We need but follow!”“Praise be!”“Praise be!”
And with each revolution the dragon made, the head of the serpent eating away eternally at its own body, the flame maintained itself.
Avo watched as he plunged, darting through fractures in the nature of space, twisting from place to place as anomalous reflections sent him in myraid directions. Enraptured by what he beheld, he barely regarded the words of his Woundshaper.
“So. Such is what clothes me–succor of the unceasing variety. These are the faces of our worshippers, then? Bound infused and reinfused into our fire? Delightful.” It gave a low, bemused laugh. “And to think I held such… unexplained loathing for the chrono-autosarcophagics.”
Such was the first time he heard his Heaven process its dislike for the dragons, but such things were of tertiary notice as Daemon–or what Avo assumed was the Daemon–began to reel Jhred Greatling toward it.
“Mo-ther!’ It called out, voice chiming like a million-million bells swinging in unison across the rooftops of a city. “For…. for mother…”
Again, it pulled, and Jhred, shattered in mind and spirit, merely bounced as he was drawn through the vortex of swirling chaos. Between them, tangled within the once-empty epicenter of the dragon’s coil, Soulfire began to flicker and build. Glass began to shudder and crack. Reflections twisted and jumped and blended as bindings shifted into glass and more of the remaining megablock vitrified.
Snapping free from the distraction, Avo shaped his body and constructed propellers as he attempted to navigate the maelstrom of twisting mirrors and crumbling matter. He couldn’t go too fast or the ones within him would splatter. He couldn’t shift to his Galeslither for there was no way he could react in time to the unfolding chaos around him.
WARNING: DAEMON DETECTED
->ASSOCIATED HEAVEN: [TWICE-WALKER] - FOURTH SPHERE
->REND CAPACITY [TWICE-WALKER]: 63%
SPATIAL METAPHYSICS UNRAVELING
REND SPILLOVER DETECTED
Daemon pulled again and Jhred approached. Three more times and they would be joined. The flickering Soulfire flared this time, blasting out a tide that flensed the structures of reality, undoing the fabric of all that was and exposing the foundational symbology knitted beneath the bones of existence.
The surge crashed against Avo’s Frame, the uncanny sensation of ontology scraping against ontology like his bones were being dragged against Jhred’s.
Space came asunder like brittle glass flung against a wall. Domains bled over into domains as the Jhred and the Twice-Walker screamed, their voice a union of pain - a divine echo grafted to the voice of the man wailing unwanted epiphanies.
Holding firm in the form of the Woundshaper, his surroundings broke into a chaotic kaleidoscope of reflective tunnels. The block was dissolving, coming apart as vitrification spread and more glass shattered free, sailing masses of collapsing infrastructure. Lines of blood and water remained halted, stained with the paint of eldritch fire. Jhred’s Hell had broken a sacrament in trying to reap the substance of fluids for his singularity.

However that worked. Avo still knew little regarding the nature of Daemons or hubrises. Only that he should avoid ever trespassing into their categories. Nothing cements a lesson like beholding the hammer of consequence coming down upon another.
Glinting shards and all things bearing any remote semblance of reflectivity swirled like lashing asteroids as they began to build at the heart of the cataclysm. Expanding a protective lattice around his Woundshaper, Avo unmade all matter he made contact with. He risked no concussive impacts for within his ontology were three passengers.
Three mortal, fragile passengers.
It was a miserable thing, being bereft of a Frame and its Heavens.
Grits of rubble and entire sections of blood smeared against his subverting touch all the same, spilling over him like rain upon a windshield. Reaching out with a tendril, he tried to gather his bearings and recapture a sense of direction, to orient and pursue his target. Yet, as he reached out to liquefy a rising screen of glass he found himself slipping through instead, tumbling out from the other side as he began melting through the insides of the megablock.
The diminutive figure of a falling person was silenced as it vanished into his blood. One of the few remaining survivors from the massacre earlier, Avo guessed.
They hadn’t escaped fast enough.
THAUMIC OUTPUT - 3671 THAUM/c
GHOSTS: [11566]
REND CAPACITY [WOUNDSHAPER]: 34%
His Rend was climbing fast, rising by a percentage point every perceived second. He needed to find a place of calm to vent–to regain his awareness of–
An inhuman shriek rang out from the glass. If Avo was still of flesh, the noise would have deafened him instantly. Manifested as his Heaven, however, his domains perceived for him, new senses scaffolded upon baseline ones, the thickness of his blood holding against the shivering shockwaves as more glass burst apart around him.
Layers of walls parted before his latticed perimeter. Obstacles poured away into gushes of red, unmade by the nature of his being.
He burst free in an onrush of erupting blood, emerging like a flechette ripping free from a body. Tons of mass followed in his wake, transmuted by the touch of his being, and even with the pace of time castrated by his Haemokinetically charged reflexes, there was simply too much happening at once for him to track. His Phys-Sim was screaming, and even widening his woven perimeter often warned him too late of encroaching glass.
He angled and twisted as reflections funneled strips of being out of his control. More than once he lassoed severed sprays of crimson cut free from his being back into place using his Canon of Harmonize, light spearing out from atop his spire.
Yet, as he avoided another dozen pieces that could have left his interior hollow, that could have killed one of his allies on impact, he saw it. Salvation came as a tumbling, spinning island breaking free from a vast fracture between folds of space. From behind it tumbled the flickering visage of a glitching sun–the one that once loomed over the island–that now basked everything in shadow.
From out of nowhere, cerulean blue ocean water rushed over Avo like a deluge while grains of sand bounced from his shell. Three hundred feet away, Jhred Greatling’s private retreat–or a neat bisected part of it–rushed outward toward Avo with six dormant golems drawn in its wake and a rain of drones.

Including the ones carrying the mini-nukes.
GOLEMS DETECTED: SANGEIST X2; FULGERHUND X1; SHADOWCRAWLER X3
MICRONUCLEAR DRONE SEQUENCES DETECTED - SIGNATURES X5
That left three of the drones missing amidst a swarm hurling free through the air. Accelerating his propellers slightly more, Avo constructed veins of blood to fasten and cocoon Draus and the others inside him. He kept them close to his core–where his physical body once directed the blood before his recent… maturation.
Casting out a net of spreading hands, he caught and gathered what he could. He liquefied drones and pulled the warheads inside him. The act was a risk, but it was better than letting them sail free through the open air. With how they were procured, Avo didn’t want to risk death by proximity to thermonuclear detonation.
A memory flashed through his mind as he recalled Zein firing a certain missile at him.
Yeah. Best avoid that.
After securing the warheads, focused on jacking the tips of his tendrils into the loci of the golems. Spearing through the air, every inch of blood he lengthened away from his body was mass diverted away from structural stability. He was still lurching wildly through the air–not truly flying but not really falling either.
In the real, less than two seconds had passed, but he knew his time was limited. The other Godclads–if they had more than one cycler–were possibly in the process of resurrecting. The manner that Zein killed them left much to question–if they were truly dead, he felt no release from their Frames no sign of thaumaturgic disturbances.
Accessing the golems, he subsumed the Sangeists first, drawing their Heavens into his Soul with an outward ripple of his Frame, his fire rushing out like water caressing a beach before pulling the grain back out into the deep of his subreality. He immediately felt the hollowed shells of the old gods plunge into his liminal depths, much to the delight of his Woundshaper.
Accessing the functions of the Fulgerhund and the Shadowcrawlers, he drew the golem inward as he anchored himself to the spiraling island with a haemokinetic cord. Pulling himself close, he used it as cover so that he might use it to draw him closer to where Jhred was. He noticed a blinding shimmer of Soulfire six hundred feet away over the toppling megablock and–
The space around him twisted again. More fractures opened, shards of existence turning to glass turning pathways elsewhere. Another blastwave of Soulfire crashed down as part of the island erupted into glass. Part of the room where Jhred met his “benefactor” at Kaswarg’s Grove shot past the island.
It seemed all the pathways the Twice-Walker had connected were now spilling over into each other, drawing physical locations through spatial collapses. Avo wondered if this was the nature of the Daemon–the Heaven inverting its liminal environment with reality itself, or was there something more to this?
Suddenly, the island behind him split, and he felt his cord snap free. A fractal plunged down, edge first pointed to him–
And time around him echoed. Darting out from the flow of his blood, a variant of Zein shot free and cut. Her glaive whistled free, faster than even Avo’s enhanced senses could perceive. His mind lurched as he watched her parry aside the spatial anomaly as if swatting a fly.
“Seventeen.” Her words came as a discordant whisper, like they had been spoken to him in the past, and he was only hearing them now. As soon as she emerged, she faded beneath the streams of time. “And put the Guard-Captain in the Fulgerhund. She will know what to do.”
Heeding her word with haste, he planted the Fulgerhound–a spear-shaped golem lined with eighteen arcing coils along its concentricity–and opened its underside hatch. With a nudge of his internal constructs, he inserted Draus and the others within the golem with as much care and gentleness as he could muster and sealed it again. Considering the speed he was operating, it would take some time for even Draus to catch up.
REND CAPACITY [WOUNDSHAPER]: 77%
And he was going to need to vent soon. All his protective measures, constructs, and haemokinesis were creating entropy at an unprecedented rate. If he found the chance to die, perhaps he could find some method to upgrade his Heavens and Hells again.
Eyeing the Shadowcrawlers and the lashing beams of light, he growled and subsumed the golem as well. They would provide ample additions to his Galeslither, perhaps. He couldn’t use them for much of anything at present with how fleeting the passing shadows were. Might as well add them as canons afterward.
A trickle of thoughtstuff flowed up from the locus of the Fulgerhund into his blood. His ghosts carried the message budding across the Nether-lag caused by their perceptive differentials. With his former cargo securely contained within the golem, he accelerated faster, his propellers drilling through the sound barrier as he picked up speed.
Draus was augmented. Essus too. Chambers was an acceptable loss if it came down to it. Avo could still get what he needed to examine from the ex-enforcer’s ghost. He veered off course almost immediately, but he was still moving back toward where the Daemon was drawing Jhred back into himself.
And then a near-perfectly translucent pane of glass glitched into existence in front of him, sparking free from reflections on droplets of rain. It opened as light erupted along its core and another place shown through–this location was an open chasm of devastation that led out into another portion of the city.
Flipping his spinning propulsion constructs, he fought to slow himself, but his Phys-Sim revealed what he already expected: His velocity was too high and this was too close.
Maybe Zein would–
+Get in the golem.+ Draus’ thoughtcast had finally loaded into his ghosts and Avo mind twisted. He didn’t fully know the functions of the golems, but both Zein and Draus seemed aware of its use.
Shrugging aside anxiety, he released the majority of his mass before threading his mortal form back into shape within the Fulgerhound. Spilling into a cockpit too narrow for his size, he immediately felt his bones snap painfully backward as the intensity of the g-forces bore down at him all at once, his perception of time snapping back to normalcy like a rubberband.
He choked as he toppled back, bouncing off a gimbal and elbowing Essus in the chest.

Then, just as swiftly, the pull of acceleration faded static tickled his body.
“Avo,” Draus cried, not bothering to turn her head around, “get ready.”
Lashing out with his blood, he jacked into the locus that Draus was leaning against. Exo-sensory data filled his cog-feed as multiple systems and details painted his mind with a swirl of colors. They were jumping between stretches of reflection as an arcing bolt of lightning. With each turn or transition a number indicator diminished. This Fulgerhund had eight-four jumps left before its Rendsinks were full.
Presently, they were about four more jumps before the external simulation showed them reaching the Daemon.
Warning klaxons screamed through the golem’s internal systems as Avo linked his mind with Draus as well. +Going to eject out using my Galeslither when we approach. Kill Jhred. Absorb his Frame before the Rupture happens.+
Draus’ head snapped to shoot an alarmed glance at him. +Rupture? There’s gonna be a Rupture?+
Right. His few seconds had been a lot longer than hers.
+Just get ready. Frame’s going to be yours in a minute.+


A note of genuine trepidation sang out from Draus. +Yeah… sure+


She still didn’t truly want it, to live in endless loops and forget the weight of life and become like Jhred’s mother–all power, all folly.
Nothing was ever easy, but some choices were harder. Remembering the fragile lives he cupped, he pondered the alternative for her. What was a Frame but more chances to choose? To learn?
But it had to be her choice. It had to be.
One jump. Two jumps. Three.
Four.
He whistled free from the hissing gaps his blood left within the structure of the golem. With how rough he punched through to get at the locus, it was a miracle the entire thing didn’t decompress.
Gusting out into the screaming form of a tri-headed steed, the Galeslither brayed loud as the Daemon looked up, regarding him for the first time. This close, they were bare to each other, with no place to hide. Jhred was mere feet away from touching it. Avo didn’t know what that would cause, but with how the anomalies grew with each tug of the dragon, he didn’t want to find out.
Glass tore out from the Twice-Walker’s impossible twin like ten thousand surface-to-air missiles of all shapes and sizes. He felt them cut up through the air, an unseen hand guiding them as they sought him out. The matter would not touch him, but if managed to form a gateway just in front of him–
The Fulgerhund slammed into the Daemon, spearing it into place upon what few plasteel bones remained of the megablock.
“Mo-ther!” the Daemon and Jhred screamed. “I want to be whole! Give–give me back my mother-body!”
Inside, the Woundshaper understood something. “My broken kin… they’re tapping into the mind of the Frame’s host. The Heaven is remembering–using the mortal to channel its stripped ego… It’s stripped thoughts…”Avo didn’t have time to consider the implications of what that meant. Jhred’s body was carved and sliced by countless pieces of shrapnel. One of his arms was folded the wrong way at the shoulder, most of his suit and skin denuded along the air. The eye Avo ate had grown back, but the other now had a piece of rebar jutting out of it.
Funneling himself down Jhred’s throat, Avo took no more chances with his target’s death. There was too much to risk with a Rupture, and his hunger demanded to be sated now–too long had he denied himself the life of this Guilder.
Jhred, for his final words, gave but a rasping whimper as sense seemed to return to him–if but for that briefest moment. “Not worthy… never worthy.”

And Avo expanded the currents inside him, prying Jhred Greatling asunder.
Just in time to hear Abrel’s despairing scream rise above the cacophony.
Aegis, this is Sunrise. I confirm Rupture containment—the Heaven remains unfallen. Reality is stabilizing.
Negative. I do not see the Stillborn. Reflections are collapsing over each other. Space is getting shunted throughout the affected regions. I’m widening my drones; we might be able to—
[Distant explosions]
Never mind, I have him. He’s in Nu-Scarrowbur—oh.
Aegis, number expected collateral. Got a lot more people about to die for Thousandhand’s little “adjustments.”
--”Sunrise,” Aegis Operative, Voidwatch
10-22
The Pruning of the Path (I)
Jhred Greatling died with an implosion of Soulfire, but its collapse never reached the point of culmination.
Ingressing radiance crashed down like a wave against Avo’s rippling Soul, the metaphysical mass fusing to his while he consumed. The Daemon shivered and twitched, still pinned by the Fulgerhund.
As glistening gore misted the air behind glinting implants flung free by the wind, his nucleus suckled the length of the uncoiled dragon and the Twice-Walker bound to its end like a mouth would slurp a noodle.
Caught in the wake of the ontological subsumption, the leaping electricity dancing along the length of the Fulgerhund was stretched from its physical anchor. A lightning-infused mastiff strained against the gravity of Avo’s Frame, its being fighting to stay connected to the golem itself.
In the throes of his meal, he barely noticed the force he was exerting on Draus’ vehicle. Nor Abrel above them, standing on the precipice of a torn hallway. The sprawl of the Spine’s districts spread out behind her like a panorama of devastation matching her face.
He didn’t even notice how each reflective gateway—once bound—was collapsing as tunnels of space snapped from binary to unitary boundaries per the laws of baseline reality. The stability of existence reassumed its control like a funnel of space smashing across vectored regions, injecting everything caught between their paths elsewhere.
A vast wall of cascading space rushed over them as burst glass fell around them. Before she could react, a separate tunnel swallowed Abrel, peeling another section of the block away along with her.
The world about Avo blurred into confusion. The Fulgerhund snapped free, now missing its tip, sailing into his wind-shaped grasp. Reality clenched and fired them along what felt like a magnetic accelerator, injecting them from one place to another.
Volumetric reality around them lurched, and suddenly the layout of their environment glitched as gravity drew droplets of blood and debris like they had been plucked from the ground.
They had been transposed out from threads of light glinting from a shard of glass, flung well past the stretch of Mazza’s Junction. Now, they were tumbling into a fall again, the expanse of the districts yawning wide beneath them.
Such a thing was only of secondary regard to Avo, for so besotted was he on the taste of premium flesh and divine nectar that the sensations of the fall were but shadows in the backdrop.
This was thrill. This was killing. This was all he had been meant to be and more. This was the actualization of what it meant to be a ghoul and a Godclad both—to climb the apex in concept of power and predation both.
[LIMINAL FRAME] OBTAINED - BROADSWORD PATTERN
->TWICE-WALKER HEAVEN TEMPLATE DOWNLOADED
->THAUMIC CYCLER x1
->SOUL x1
->ONTOLOGICS x2
THAUMIC OUTPUT - 4673 THAUM/c
The Soul within Avo expanded, its reach spreading vast as his ontology washed wide—running a just beyond the expanse of an entire district. Yet with it came a bone-hollowing emptiness—his Heavens remained too small, doomed much of his subreality to remain a lake of simulated light. Docked to the borders of his Frame was a diminutive cluster attached in a pocket.
The Frame he took from Jhred had enclosed a tight knot about the faint ember that remained of its thaumic core. It seemed a little more than pimple upon his immensity now, though Avo knew it possessed greater purpose than its present state of atrophy.
With an injection of Essence, it would unfurl and its center would unveil itself. There was a groove of absence at the apex of its Soul—a place for the Nous of a new master to mantle its ontology and serve as pilot.
That thought pulled Draus into Avo’s mind.
It was done. The killing was done. The high of his excitement had yet to fade, but the first needle of his rationality punctured through the ecstasy of the beast and his Woundshaper. They needed to egress and flee.
Faintly, he heard another voice scratching at the back of his mind, its sound a distorted neigh of confusion. A war steed emerging from a fog, greeted by lands unknown and faces unfamiliar.
Pulling the mangled pulp that remained of Jhred through a current of wind, Avo thought to keep a snack for himself later as a personal post-feast snack to relive the high. The pieces of the corpse were halfway through as he turned to reach for the Fulgerhund, planning to escape.
The deafening screech of a falcon drew his attention back to the present. Ashen feathers formed from the smoke crowning the collapsing megablock - a prelude to a theater of cleaving lights that partitioned the mushrooming fog building upon the wreckage.
Two more presences flashed upon the real, his Liminal Frame brushing them—sensing their presence before sight offered any revelations.
Swallowing the Fulgerhund into his Yondergales, Avo twisted in the air as he sought to make a quiet escape.
That desire died as beams of coruscating light pierced from the blocks in the surrounding districts by the thousands.
Through walls and from streets, the attack came unrelenting, each shot as if a needle of liquid fire striking across the distance of miles. Plascrete offered no impediment, and to his alarm, he found each shot intersecting at his exact position.
The nature of the Heaven he faced was unknown, and like he proceeded against the Bloodthane that smote him from the skies in Nu-Scarrowbur, his desire was one of evasion rather than engagement.
For all the bloodlust ignited within the beast in that instant, it was a creature of impulse—all too willing to hand its leash over to folly. Avo knew better—hunted better.
Ambush and awareness were how he ensured Jhred Greatling’s death. His Heavens were only the facilitators of the process.
Descending, wind spiraled around him as he accelerated, his eldritch form an invisible bullet tugging on a cloth composed of wind.
A sweeping blade of pure light slashed past him and through him. He felt discomfort lurch as his currents were momentarily disrupted before he carried out. The light carved through distant blocks and opened buildings the same way a knife would open an aluminum can.
It was only then that he noticed which buildings the slash had carved through. Parts of distant domes collapsed in on themselves and dust spilled like oozing blood from Nu-Scarrowbur, now no longer contained.
As the assault continued, cracks formed in the air as building force joined a rising chorus of notes.
Avo knew what was coming. He knew better than the Highflame cadre.
His hour was up, and his presently active problem had just spilled over into his potentially delayed problem.
Over the skies above Layer One in the Yuulden-Yang Sovereignty, two groups of Godclads went to war without fully realizing who their opposition was.
If he was still flesh-made, he would have hissed a laugh.
Slipping into the pulsing numbers gushing through the rings of an aerolane, Avo aligned his path with the gutters. If he could get down there before—
His being pulsed—Zein twisted free into their air with her glaive a blinding whirl.
She struck passing strokes of light and severed sound before it could transmute into force. Another flicker and the beams stopped coming. As she dipped into a fall and sank back into nonexistence, she shouted through the rushing winds and the rising thunder of combat. “Twelve now. Keep going: The path narrows.”
Suspicion ignited within Avo, but he was too busy angling away from another tidal wave of symphonically manifested explosions. He needed to—
REND CAPACITY [GALESLITHER]: 100%
WARNING: BACKLASH
CLASHING CANON
[SPACE]: UNKNOWN
VENT! VENT! VENT!
Reality lurched as a pocket of mass inverted itself with Avo, and he found himself tumbling free after the falling Fulgerhund as his Yondergales flattened out.
Something had just happened to the space he was in. He found himself falling through an open chunk missing at the center of a tower. Familiarity sparked as he realized where he was. A layered roundabout splayed out just below him, and at its center, a vast tree branching out into portals and sculpted from storms rushed toward him.
Snarling, Avo ejected the spores from his Mime-Fog to mask his current position, cast out a thread of blood from his veins, and punched his way through the Fulgerhund’s armor before pouring himself through the link.
As he remanifested within the confines of the cockpit, his Echoheads speared out and held him in place, wrestling against the g-forces.
“Draus,” Avo shouted. “Jump. Need to leave. Got pocketed by something.”
The Regular lurched in shock then settled realizing it was him. “Tryin’. Systems are fucked, everythin’ in this piece of shit’s fucked! The Heaven’s not responding right. Locus is showing it got unlatched or somethin’.”
Avo paused even as gravity wrung his insides like a towel. That might have been his fault.
Essus was muttering prayers while Chambers served as his second, offering a litany of curses.
A sudden impact made Avo’s tentacles screech as they carved against the internal architecture of the golem, straining to stop him from sliding.
Zein hadn’t appeared yet. More and more, he was beginning to suspect that she wasn’t focused on protecting him and the others. Or at least that wasn’t her sole objective.
At any moment, she could have killed all the Godclads again. He didn’t see anything stopping her from repeating the same feat. However, from the words she last spoke, he found a single word lingering in his mind.
Path.
Was she arranging for them to follow a specific future she predetermined, and had used her canon to ensure they did not deviate from design?
A sudden force was upon them. The plating of the golem began to groan as more fragile components began to burst and crack on the inside.
Avo pulsed again and an echo of Zein filtered out from Chambers before vanishing. This repeated three more times before Zein leaned next to him and spoke. “Six. The Bloodthanes and that Greatling are very good. Thankfully, I have also made them very confused as to who they are fighting. You should subsume the Fulgerhund—it will go well with your blood, I think. Oh, and vent after you crash. You will need a clean—“
The crash she portended came before she could finish. Something struck the golem hard and it went into a spiral. Strapped into protective gimbals, Essus, Chambers, and Draus were spared the worst of the inertia as protective mechanisms compensated on their behalf.
Avo himself was not so fortunate. The sheer force of the impact sent his Echohead slicing clean along the armor, unable to find a foundation of stability. He slipped free. His back struck the rear of the crew module as his plates and threaded fibers stopped the impact.
Again, he found himself more than grateful he had the Bone Demon body sheathe grafted. A regular ghoul would have smeared, and with his Rend so high across both cyclers, real death would not be such a theoretical concept for him.
Winded from the impact, he felt the air catch in his chest several more times as he tumbled across the ceiling and walls, his foot catching Chambers across the forehead. With each bounce, he acclimated more, Celerostylus infusing the chaos with languor as he caught himself via his Echoheads.
They came to a final grinding halt as a pole of plasteel punctured through the cockpit toward the pilot’s gimbal.
Draus caught it and wrenched it out of shape with a single hand.
With a final lurch, the last of their momentum died.
Then the shooting began.
Outside the golem, flechettes rained down. Inside, it sounded as if they were seeking refuge from a hailstorm within a tin can. The metal around them deformed in dips and dents. Holographic displays spewed nothing but errors, depriving them of any functional understanding of how long they could hold.
Chambers’ head was swiveling around in terror, his mouth still open in a constant scream. Essus had simply leaned back, face showing the sheer immensity of his exhaustion from all that happened.
Shrugging himself free from the impression he left in the panels leading to the storage section, Avo reached out with a haemokinetic tendril and peeked at the situation using his Whisper.
REND CAPACITY [WOUNDSHAPER]: 82%
VENT! VENT! VENT!
Irregular salvos of fire from gauss-flung weapons and other projectiles were bearing down on them from all directions. They were currently crashed, leaning against the interior of what looked to be a quick-fabbed tenement building crusted at the foot of an abandoned factory.
At least he had a direction of which way he had to vent now.
Tearing herself free from the gimbal, Draus shook her head and gestured for a link, unfazed by the constant hammering of falling gunfire.
Avo whipped out a tendril and fed her his sensory feed to the outside.
+Well. As far as the run’s concern, the milk’s gone pretty sour.+
+Not really,+ Avo disagreed. +Got Mirrorhead. Got his Frame. Killed thousands. Good day.+
She snorted. Chambers and Essus were detaching themselves with haste. +Well, you’re ‘bout to be a happy rotlick, ‘cause the day ain’t over. Counting at least sixty impact trajectories. Give us twelve more seconds before one gets through.+
+Going to vent out the side. Move through the slum and get into the factory. Find another way out after that. Or…+
+Or?+
+Got Mirrorhead’s Frame. Shouldn’t take long to graft.+
Her mind lurched to a halt. Apprehension and indecision formed over her like a stormcloud. She tilted her head at Essus and Chambers. +Let’s exfil first. Bounty comes after.+
He didn’t bother arguing. Part of him considered just imbuing her with the Frame and fueling her with the thuams, but he remembered how he felt after Walton’s node had forced his choice in the Deep Bazaar.
He also remembered who decided to pull him along on a little trip afterward.
Draus deserved better. Draus deserved to choose. Zein and her path would just have to adapt.
Which, unfortunately, was what it did.
After his Soulfire rippled out and drew the dislocated Heaven of the Fulgerhund into his Frame, Avo used his entropic gale to dissolve a pathway out the back of the ruined golem and make for the factory.
As soon as the exit was made, he paused and let Draus through before following, casting the matter-eating fog over them. Shots dipped into the darkness he channeled and never emerged out the other side. Missiles, flechettes, slugs, and more. All fed into his Hell’s expulsion and his Rend trickled down percentage by percentage.
The Regular barreled through the cheaply made structures around her with a helpful burst from her scythe-like wings. An underground parking entrance for aeros stood out before them as shrapnel skipped overhead.
More and more, however, the shots were being replaced. The fluid beams of fire returned, slicing clean through the golem’s remains, ignoring the entropic fog entirely. Not wanting to find out what distracted the other they hurried.
The answer came anyway as a massive orb infused with roaring force rose above the block they were rushing toward. Loose harp-like cords formed a body most uncannily chimeric, human in torso, the four legs goat from the legs down.
As Avo’s Frame brushed that of the Bloodthane’s, he grimaced.
LUMENLYRIST, MELODIST OF THE CLEAVING DAWN
THAUMIC OUTPUT: 978 THAUM/c
“Cas… what am I even looking at?”
“Thousandhand gardening.”
“And you didn’t stop her?”
“Think about what you just said. Stop her. She probably saw this conversation and laughed.”
“… I’m going down there.”
“She probably foresaw that too.”
“I don’t care. People are dying, Cas. This is not—“
“—Not the fucking dream. Tell me about it.”
--Valerie Denton and Cas eld’Canduir, Ninth Column
10-23
The Pruning of the Path (II)
Fissures of force and luminosity bled out all around, birthed by sound. Strings wormed into reality as they inched out from beneath the skin of nonexistence.
The world was an explosion of intersecting actions. Avo drew in mass. Light clashed against light as a shield of blossoming force rang against a cleaving blade. War ash scattered as impacts swept the sky, the air above flung open like a curtain.
Tons of matter swirled into a phalanx of blood. The weight of a dozen explosions struck the flowing armored umbrella Avo formed over his group, and channeling his ghosts through its sheen, he witnessed a coming clash between rival titans, both sides ignorant of the other’s existence until mere moments prior.
Zein. This had to be by her design. All of it.
A reflexive rage clenched inside Avo; his oldest wound—to be beneath the reins of his own fate—flared anew. He would not be a slave to her, or her Heaven. He had what he came for, and now it was time to break from the scene, regardless of whatever unseen machinations in play or the rising excitement feeding strength to the beast.
REND CAPACITY [WOUNDSHAPER]: 68%
REND CAPACITY [GALESLITHER]: 100%
Flechettes and shrapnel burst against his protective construct. Reaching out with new tendrils and linking with his cell, he projected surrounding threats directly into their cog-feed.
The familiar Bloodthane that once upon a time spiked him down into the Warrens had vanished—its blazing facade breaking apart into a strum of lyrical notes that traveled out upon wavelengths of light and noise towards a row of bisected blocks from which approached the Strider.
Essus and Chambers both cried out before Avo diverted the mem-data from their minds. It didn’t do for the uninitiated to gaze upon the naked forms of divinity, but the strength of his new Quicksand warded against the intrusion of reoccurring traumas.
What it wouldn’t ward them from was heard next: A chorus of ferocious barks sounded from the devastated urban hive all around them. Recognition pealed from Draus as she realized the coming threat first.
She fired her projectile launcher at the parking entrance. A micro-missile whistled out and erupted outward in a shredding barrage of force. Metal peeled before the onrush while creatures vaguely hound shaped descended upon them from all sides, slipping out from cracks running along buildings or out through the collapsed perimeters of the local shield-shaped megablocks.
+Woundhounds,+ Avo said to the group. +Nine of them. Six hundred feet. Closing fast.+
Drawing in more mass, he sought to increase his own pace, to enshroud himself in power and speed through haemonkinetic means.
A harshly cast thought from Draus made him pause. +Avo! Keep your burn low! We can handle the dogs—ain’t gonna be as easy if you pull the other ‘Clads over to us with your shine—+
The link broke. He inflicted Linger on his flowing defenses as they splashed against the side of the ruined entrance. A cauliflower bunker swelled around them as Avo ensured the absence of any cracks.
Spewing his entropic gale free from his being once more, he directed it forward as he began to hollow all matter in their path.
“Where the hells are we going?” Chambers cried, his feet slapping a staccato as he struggled to keep to the group’s speed.
“Out the other side,” Draus said. “Snatch some wings if we can! Dive low. Get down into the gutters and disapp—”
Fiery wings of brilliant blades flicked through the walls above them, splitting rows of stacked aeros in half. Weight hammered down as structural supports split apart, and the building began to groan under its own mass.
“Fuck fuck fuck fuck,” Chambers chanted. Heavy slabs of plascrete fell. Essus threw himself over the unarmored ex-enforcer, using his own body as a barrier against the first pelting rocks.
“Fuck,” Draus concurred, snapping to an impossible stop just in time to avoid being crushed by an anvil of burning machinery.
“Stay close,” Avo hissed. Spreading his matter-dissolving gale out wide, he let the floors above dissipate against his Hell while Draus dragged the other two next to him.
The Hell for his Woundshaper emptied nigh instantly, but he cast out the momentum-draining sphere of his Galeslither the moment he ran dry.
Dust showered their forms. Coiling his Echoheads around the others, he felt bouncing rocks and detritus skip off against his armored form. In seconds, his total Rend had gone from near absolute capacity to a full venting.
Applause to their continued survival came in the form of clicking pieces of rubble sliding out of place, clattering against armor. Chambers coughing joined as accompaniment.
Protected within a pocket amidst the crumbled block, the cramped area found itself lit by Essus’ neon wings. The visages of both the boy and Avo were lined with static now, the damage breaking the hardware down, blow by blow.
“Sphere’s going to pop in a bit,” Avo said, watching as the last few percentage points of his Galeslither’s Rend Capacity trickled down. “Manifesting Woundshaper”
Chambers shivered. “Fuck me, not the blood again.”
Draus angled her helmet to look at Avo. “It’ll make us an obvious target. With all that killin’ you did, I’m bettin’ your Frame's lit brighter than a candle in the void. Ain’t no missin’ us that way.”
He widened his fangs with a scowl. “Think Thousandhand wanted this. Didn’t save us just now. Might be on her desired course.”
“You think she wants you to fight all those other ‘Clads?”
“She might be trying to force my hand. Make sure I don’t fight them alone.”
The Galeslither’s stasis began to fade. Two pebbles skipped off Avo’s shoulders.
Draus sighed. “So, that’s how it is, huh? You said you wanted me to choose, and here she is, narrowin’ down my choices.”
A voice cleared between them. Chambers spoke. “I mean… you could give the Frame to me? I’d be willing to be your second Godclad, consang.” Three heads turned to glare at Chambers. “Or… or Essus here.” He patted the former flat on the chest. “Think of the story—former father who took down Mirrorhead and claimed his Frame in revenge.”
Essus didn’t hide his disgust. “No. I will not bear anything to do with that… that coward inside me. If he was worthy of godhood then I refuse! I spite divinity—I spite him!”
Draus glanced at the other two members of their group and then back to Avo. She coughed a laugh. “Jaus. We’s the weirdest bunch of half-strands I’ve ever seen.” She sighed. “Fuck it. Fuck it all. Graft me.”
Avo stared at her, barely noticing the approach of the Woundhounds. “You sure?”
“No. But I reckon if that Frame of yours can burn it in me, it can pull it out as well. If not, well, I suppose I can ask Kae…” Her voice trailed off. “I just don’t wanna be nothin’ like them. I wanted it all to mean somethin’.”
“I know,” Avo said. “I’m sorry. All this city has is them. And now me.”
“Suppose you’re right. Suppose I could be in worse company.”
“Suppose you could. Going to ask again. Will only do it if you want.”
She took a breath.“Light me up, Avo.”
And so he did.
A river of rippling incandescence washed over Draus.
UNABLE TO GRAFT [BROADSWORD PATTERN LIMINAL FRAME] TO ROOTED NOUS
PLEASE ENSURE RECIPIENT’S DEMISE BEFORE INITIATING TRANSFER PROCESS
IF YOU WISH TO PERFORM A VOLUNTARY USURPATION AND GRAFT THE [STILLBORN PATTERN LIMINAL FRAME] TO ROOTED NOUS, THEN SELF-TERMINATE AT 60% REND OR HIGHER FOR ALL ACTIVE HELLS WHILE LINKED TO THE MIND OF THE GRAFTEE BEFORE THEY SELF-TERMINATE THEREAFTER
Or at least he tried.
“Avo,” Draus said, her voice even. “I don’t feel very ‘Clad-like right now.”
“It wants me to kill you first. The Frame.”
He could feel her glare through her helmet. “You sure it’s your Frame that’s tellin’ you this?”
“Yes. Beast just wants to kill you. Frame has sent a textual request for your murder to my feed.”
Chambers exhaled under his breath. “Shit. Glad I didn’t push on that Frame thing.”
Draus paused for a moment. “Link me, I wanna see it.”
“Now you don’t trust me?”
“No, you godsdamned joy-fiend; I don’t trust you when it comes to killin’ me. Now link up and—”
The sound of muffled barking echoed out from between the cracks surrounding them. Woundhounds were creatures of unparalleled persistence, it seemed.
“Figure it out later,” Draus said. “Bleed us a way out.”
Chambers whimpered. “Remember to close your eyes, Essus.” He stared up into the other man’s optical implants. “Oh, right—“
REND CAPACITY [GALESLITHER]: 2%
Avo ended his stasis before he unzipped himself into tendrils of blood. Fusing into a nest around his companions and drinking in as much nearby mass as he could, he extended his sensory lattice and found the nine hounds closing from all surrounding angles.
No matter. He would go downward instead.
At his touch, matter melted as he tunneled down through the factory, the Woundshaper unmaking all in its path like a kinetic kill rod swimming through liquefying architecture.
He splurted free from the underside of the building at a curtailed speed. Behind him, the innards of the structure leaked out into clumps of gore-stained debris, oozing free like prolapsed organs.
His reflexes were running hot again, the synaptic flow of his mind sending his ghosts circulating through the circuitry of his blood at hyper-accelerated cycles. Still, he needed to watch his inertia. The goal here was to burrow his way out through Layer One and vanish into the winds without getting drawn into—
He felt them then—another Godclad. The rippling wavelength of his Soul reached far, and against the subreality of another he felt it crash.
Immediately, they became aware of each other, presences like twin supernovas in the void, Heavens unsheathed in their fullest manifestations.
SHATTERBORN, FORGEMASTER OF BROKEN THINGS
THAUMIC OUTPUT: 849 THAUM/c
As Avo punched down through a weave of ringed walkways spiraling down from beneath levels above, he saw the form of his new enemy.
Surfing out through a collapsing section of the city above swam a magma-coated titan of three stone heads and five gleaming arms of heated iron carried by a beheaded lamb hewn from the substance of obsidian. The chest of the Shatterborn was an open smithy that hissed steam and was worked by countless burning human hands across eighteen rungs.
It scooped wreckage and rubble as it twisted away from him, feeding its heart. With each thundering heartbeat, it seemed to grow faster, climbing from a barely perceptible speed to being a fourth as fast as the Woundshaper.
A curtain of sinuous light shredded the infrastructure in the backdrop behind the Shatterborn, wrenching a chasm into shape.
There, Avo saw the stormtree’s portals shining through the avalanche of smoke and destruction.
The beast called for him to fight, but he knew better than to stray from his escape. Staying and fighting was a risk that might end in his death. Better that he play the role of the predator that he was rather than the warrior he wasn’t.
Avo increased his velocity and moved to sink through the district itself.
His plan came undone as the Shatterborn slammed itself down into the foundations of the district and embedded its ontology into the foundations of the surrounding area.
Jets of steam hissed free from spreading cracks that bubbled with lava.
Tendrils shot out from Avo’s back as he pried himself from the course of his moment. Lava erupted out from around and beneath them as he barely quelled his Canon of Haemification in time to avoid the backlash of trying to convert liquid matter.
New constructs formed along his back as he sailed through the air. Propellers pushed him as arteries exploded free from his form, just as the Shatterborn fired a scattered burst of screaming debris in his direction. His expanding network of blood greeted a dozen missiles of molten stone, their size growing per their acceleration.
Ejecting a flat sheet of blood from his being, Avo harmonized the shield to a rapidly constructed limb and swung outward. The sheet met the rocks at an angle and vectors of force deformed from the desired path.
From the severed shield were boulders parried, and by the time they struck the surroundings, they impacted as small hills.
The Shatternborn’s missiles missed. With the ejection of its consumed mass, slowness consumed its movements as it tried to dive into the lava below.
Not fast enough to avoid the tip of Avo’s tendrils.
Unwilling to risk hubris, his blood bore the properties of tungsten and locus still. Molten stone chipped and parted as he dipped his reach into his opponent. Sprays of heat and magma oozed free. Avo’s blood sank further and spread into branches.
The three heads of the Shatterborn screamed as the first of his lattices bled into its heart. There, in a forest of writhing arms, he brushed the presence of a Metamind. His Ghostjack surged. Traumas flowed. The Shatterborn and the Bloodthane’s mind broke in unison, stones and sequences tearing free and tracing arcs through the air.
The volcanic activity died in an instant. The heat vanished.
Filtering through what sequences he brushed upon nulling his foe, he found himself annoyed with the truths the met-data offered: The Bloodthane—Reva something—still had another backup cycler with Heaven and Hell attached.
Still, he felt her ontological signature scarring reality like a wound. As the Soulfire rippled from him again, it washed over a swelling scab on the face of the tapestry with transparent links binding it to pieces of plascrete and passing flows of heat. There, Avo beheld the burgeoning resurrection of another Godclad for the first time.
The moment was broken as a flash enveloped him from behind. Channeling the perception of his Whisper backward, he saw the spark expanding from between a flashing bridge behind him. Then, came the heat and the force, its coming a roaring cataclysm that cooked the air, that uprooted all structures unbolted from the ground.
It was only as two blocks vanished from sight as the explosion spread that he realized what he was looking at.
A mini nuke had just gone off.
Dashing forward as fast as he could without pulping his passengers, he fled from the rushing updraft of the blast toward the stormtree itself. He had a good two miles to make, and the air was already beginning to cook.
REND CAPACITY [WOUNDSHAPER]: 43%
Speeding unevenly through the air, he fired out grasping limbs to pull himself along whatever points of stability he could to right his path. Measuring his current velocity against that of the encroaching blast, he found himself well beyond the damage radius and reconsidered his current trajectory toward the stormtree.
Then, the light faded. And so did the heat and the force. In its place sounded a single droning note so loud he had to strain against the vibrations to stop it from rattling his blood.
Another instance of Zein snapped free from his being and winked out of sight. A beat later, the note ceased and a fist of pure force hammered down on the district.
“Good work, little dagger. You spared me over seven steps. Let’s call this three for now. Get to the tree and do kill Captain Draus before you arrive at the base. I would not like to lose her because of all this indecision.”
Avo formed stacks of haemokinetic armor as he braced against the block-crushing impact. The yield of a swallowed warhead bore down upon the area as pure kinetic energy while he shaped enormous crimson Echoheads to hold himself in place.
But where blood held, fate betrayed him.
The blocks around him shattered before the fighting, and just what felt like a falling star struck him from behind, guided by the arrow of fate.
Or at least, someone who could manipulate fate.
Blades of cleaving brightness screamed against his tungsten shell as a chorus of falcons cried out in surprise.
The Strider, bereft of an arm and a leg, turned to grapple the Woundshaper. Blades shaped by blood greeted wings lined with slashing shine and tumbled toward a storm-carved tree guarded by a trio of burning golems.
REND CAPACITY [WOUNDSHAPER]: 71%
“Yeah? Hello? What you want? I’m playing Stormjumpers—nuclear detonations? ‘Clad on ‘Clad—dammit, the Fallwalkers again—Highflame? Stormtree cadres. Open battle in the district of Nu-Scarrowbur? Plot to assassinate—okay–okay, slow down.
Loop the district. In fact, loop the surrounding ones too. No one in or out. Put the Warrens back under lockdown. And somebody cast Voidwatch. I need them to distract the Guild while I figure out how to settle this mess.
Couldn’t even wait for me to finish this match.”
-Chief Paladin Naeko
10-24
Beneath the Tree
It took but an exchange of strikes for Avo to learn that Abel Greatling was his superior in a direct clash of force.
Edge struck edge as instruments of blood and light met in a calamitous joust. The Strider’s wings flared and all that shone cleaved deep. Where once he felt needling pricks beneath her resplendence, now came countless puncturing thrusts. Gleaming blades lanced free from her wings and all the tungsten in the world wasn’t enough.
A gulf burst free at his center. He barely shifted Draus and the others down just in time. The Strider’s strike kept going, coring through blocks and bridges for as far as her shine could reach. Around him, he could feel more of the district crumbling, more flickers of flowing ichor winking out.
How much had this battle cost in collateral damage? How many unaffiliated lives had been consumed for no fault but simply existing in the wrong area? So much wasted flesh, never to be tasted, memories bound for dissolution and ghosts destined to wither away.
Drawing in more mass from the ground, Avo replaced that which was unmade nigh instantly, but the flaying glare of the light too was unceasing. Tendrils shot through rubble below him, roots sprouting high while he flattened his flowing shape to duck away from the worst of her gaze.
He moved twice again as fast as his foe, but the range and immediacy of her assault drove him back under the weight of countless blazing spears. Whatever constructs he lashed out toward her were severed by her radiant aura.
A scything wave of light met a shredding barrage of haemokinetic shards he whipped free from his own being, the Woundshaper’s outer layer spinning like a hurricane. Her slash parted clean through the onslaught and bifurcated him along the middle just as the first of his brambles breached free from the ground and into her.
Naught but roiling smoke-like falcons and humming pulses of force greeted his encroachment. His touch slipped through Strider’s form at an angle.
She dissolved then, her falcons sweeping a full fifty feet away while her wing was mid-swing.
The light faded and the cutting pressure went with it. An eruption of blood lashed out and found no purchase even as she remanifested.
Another series of explosions shook the district.
Light splashed against and through his midsection. His tonnage halved. Time snapped forward. He reached down and seized the split segment of his ontology before it could destabilize and see his companions smeared.
Linking, time lurched again as both flapping wings reared high overhead as they slammed into—and then clean through—a devasted megablock. The ever-flashing lightning of the storm tree illuminated both Godclads as they made the final ingression to the heart of Nu-Scarrowbur.
Entire floors descended as a waterfall of ruin upon Avo, showering his form and soaking harm from the invading brightness. The Strider’s aura diminished for a moment. He took the time to think.
Fusing a capsule around Draus and the others, he ejected them from his being as he increased his speed. He couldn’t overcome Abrel’s omnipresent influence while fighting at diminished efficiency. They would be fine if his Phys-Sim’s calculations were correct. Safer than they would be with him right now, anyway.
He cast his allies free and embedded them into a stable section of wall behind him. The Regular could probably tear her way free, and he’d try to locate them in the form of the Galeslither once he had the chance to break from this fight.
For now, he needed to approach Abrel Greatling. Without the means to strike at her physically, his next best chance was to break and escape or influence her mind somehow. Both options posed substantial risks as his Haemokinesis was the only thing that allowed him an advantage of speed and force over her.
The Galeslither might as well be a still target for her attacks, and if she had anything capable of projecting heat–like the body of an enforcer armed with a fusion burner, for instance, backlash and thaumic overload would be certain to follow. That, and he had already suffered the weight of a paradox earlier by whatever space-affecting canon inverted him out of his Galeslither. There was at least one other Godclad here whose abilities directly contradicted his.
Rays of light stabbed clean through the collapsing tonnage of the megablock. His cog-feed whined with warnings of building Rend. Every strike from her painted gaps in his person. Every attempt he made to counter was met with destruction or absence. He needed to change tactics. He needed to strike her from symmetrical footing.
It was such a thought that spurred his Heaven to speak. “Inject your Rend into her, master”
The suggestion was a strange one. His Hells dissolved matter and or drank momentum. Perhaps the Galeslither’s could affect the Strider, but even then it would be a temporary measure.
“The supplicant knows much–symmetry, as Kae has spoken. That is the critical weakness of every God, every Godclad. Through all Hells are we bound by a singular domain: Entropy. Perhaps you might not able able to strike them, but you should be able to transgress into their boundaries and infuse that which festers within you into her, seeing as you could manage the action by joining yourself to a Rendsink. For now, we simply need a method of encircling her–strip her focus and surround her.”
Part of him wanted to ask how she intended for him to perform such a feat, but the memory of puppeteering bodies and corpses returned to him. He didn’t need to fight in such a centralized manner. Indeed, holding to the superstructure of the Woundshaper itself was proving to be an increasing liability in this battle. Where Abrel’s canons dealt a certitude of damage, he needed to drain her endurance and awareness through other means.
REND CAPACITY [WOUNDSHAPER]: 89%
His structure expanded into rings of flowing plates. Each other layer ran curved to deflect some of the flashing light. Most importantly, he injected his central mass through the collapsing floors of the block and into the ground beneath him.
Bodies and lives were swallowed in the onslaught. His thaums and ghosts were building. Narrowed by battle, his attention belonged to Abrel Greatling alone.
Bursting free from the other side of the block, flicking strikes split the air between them as tons of his mass were snipped free from his grasp. With each stroke she made with her wings, she transposed herself on a haze of falcons, using the weightlessness of intangibility to keep pace with his speed.
Slowly, the velocity advantage shifted over to her.
But not fast enough.

Again, he found himself beneath her. Only this time, the nucleus of his being was tunneling through the ground beneath her as she dispensed with the rest of his vessel. With a chambered burst, he erupted out from beneath her. Testament to her training and reflexes, she noticed him immediately and slashed down.
Light sliced through the foundations beneath her as a spike of blood was split in twain.
And then the Strider froze.
A bubble formed around Abrel’s Heaven–a pocket of stasis enchaining her to a debt of movement. Her speed was impossible and he risked thaumic overload with her acceleration.
Caught in the throes of combat, Abrel failed to notice the rushing of whistling wind sailing out before the haemokinetic construct was cast, and so focused were her wings in that instant that Avo found a window to sink back into mortal flesh and strike her from behind her heel, using the darkness of her smoking falcons to obstruct the light.
A heartbeat was all the time he had. He made it count.
Falling free, he speared his Echoheads into her being, thoughts frozen in anticipation. If this failed, then he had to focus only on fleeing. He would have to risk using the Galeslither for an extended duration, but with engagement an impossibility, remaining in combat only prolonged the conflict and allowed her to herd him toward true death with the Rend infusing his resurrection cyclers.
Then, it happened.
His Frame cast out a ripple, and like the time he accessed the Rendsinks, he felt a connection form.
META-FAC ACTIVATING
TRANSFERRING REND FROM THIRD CIRCLE [WOUNDSHAPER] TO THIRD CIRCLE [STRIDER]
->REND CAPACITY [STRIDER]: 94%... 99%
->ACCESS CANONS–
Just as Avo stopped to consider the last bits of information, Abrel Greatling collapsed her own Heaven in a burst of expanding shadows. It struck him how enormous her form had been–taller than his Woundshaper, though not quite as large. From the darkness dove a figure clad in bright porcelain armor, plates of flashing propulsion expanding out from her back via a magnetic connection.
Avo hissed as he pursued her using his Galeslither. He would strip the combat skin from her body and pluck whatever implants she had. With how delicious Jhred was, the sister couldn’t be–
Space inverted around him again. Reality twisted like a rubber band, and then he was fifty feet away from where he started, crashing through a glass bridge as he found himself tumbling out from his Galeslither before smashing into Abrel.
Both Guilder and ghoul gave a cry of surprise as he felt the heat of her thrusters singe his plates while he embraced her using his Echoheads. The cityscape around them was a blur of cascading collapses and skull-shaking impacts.
With their Metas overlapping, he cast his ghosts out and injected his traumas into her. Yet, upon overlapping his mind with hers, he found the dissonant wavelength shivering the flow of his ghosts from passage–something he had experienced when he tried to spoof into her while hiding within Mirrorhead’s memories.
Traumas went in but faded without properly impacting. He didn’t know what was happening. Was this the work of a cano–
She headbutted him. His fangs shattered. Spitting broken teeth into her visor, he returned the favor. Except for the fact that he was using his Quicksand in place of his skullplates. Wards rang against wards as he felt her mind rattle. How was that impacting when his ghosts were not?
COG-CAP: 44%
He did it again and felt her Metamind fracture. Abrel cried out, clutching her head. Space around them inverted again and they skipped thirty feet above. And again. And again. With each skip he struck her using his wards–he might not be able to infest her with his Ghostjack, but his wards were adapted to trauma, and hers wasn’t.
Suddenly, ward-bashing was a viable option again.
Sometimes, the vulgarity of force just worked out.
As space lurched around him, Zein tore out from his being, and suddenly, pieces of an unseen golem split apart right next to them, its ring-like structure breaking in two as a chain of spatial checkpoints collapsed back into each other.
Suddenly, he found himself back where he was while he was chasing Abrel using his Galeslither. Except this time, she came back with him.
They slammed hard against the side of the block as something flashed brightly in the distance. Scraping down the side and crashing through a balcony, he kept her between him and the onrush of obstacles even as her armor cooked him. Twin stings of pain erupted from his abdomen as he felt something punch an inch through the protective shell of his sheathe.
The moment didn’t last long as they were struck mid-fall by a spiraling drone.
A series of rattling cracks sang up his left leg and hip. Feeling faded from his lower spine. Shrouded by the protective embrace of his Echoheads and her armor, Abrel barely grunted.
Flung free from stable trajectory by the sudden impact, Avo found himself launched through a partially collapsed megablock with his prey in tow. They skipped off against a piece of plasteel rebar and came to a crashing stop against an already cracked wall. A classical family portrait fell from its place and broke against Avo.
Squeezing Abrel tight, he gathered what remained of his unvented Rend and–

A line of pain slipped through him. Feeling faded from everything below his abdomen. As a hiss of pain escaped him, Abrel pulsed and her form shifted. Her body erupted into a pillar of fire as his Echoheads began to chitter in pain.
HEAVEN DETECTED
CLASSIFICATION: SPHERE I [EST. 10 THAUM/c]
->RES-RESERVE UNIT-1
A spew of flames lashed out at Avo. It felt like he was being cooked by a low-level fusion burner. He ignored it and sank a claw into her. Channeling the Rend from his Woundshaper out again, he felt the Hell attached to her Res-Reserve Unit-1 fill instantly.
Again, Abrel shifted ontological vessels, flickering across subreality channels as she angled to a different cycler.
HEAVEN DETECTED
CLASSIFICATION: SPHERE I [EST. 10 THAUM/c]
->RES-RESERVE UNIT-2
This time she turned into an open fissure surrounded by floating rocks. He had no idea what this Heaven entailed, only that he felt himself getting lighter. Spilling his Rend into her again, he felt this Hell of hers nearly burst before she shifted again.
“Come on,” Avo hissed.
HEAVEN DETECTED
CLASSIFICATION: SPHERE I [EST. 8 THAUM/c]
->RES-RESERVE UNIT-3
REND CAPACITY [WOUNDSHAPER]: 78%
She was suddenly a giant golden sunflower with seeds made from solid diamonds. This too, didn’t last as he continued infusing her with the Rend from both Hells. By this point, her First Circles were only soaking single percentage points from the massive pools of his Galeslither and Woundshaper.
If he continued, he would–
A line of dissolving flame threaded through his torso. Avo’s mind went blank as he felt both of his lungs combust from within. Inhaling hurt. Existing hurt. Three more beams tore through him through the block itself, slicing clean through three of his Echoheads as he toppled from the Guilder in pieces.
A loud cry bellowed from the outside. Something was flashing again.
“ABREL! ARE YOU–”Something exploded. Someone screamed. His cog-feed glitched and a tide of rushing Soulfire washed over him.
It felt wrong, somehow. The same sensation you’d get when someone’s organs wash up against you in the sea.
“Master… there are pieces of a Fallen Heaven in that. I could–”
RUPTURE DETECTED
DOMAIN: [SIGHT]
Sight?

How would that–
Avo got his answer when both his eyeballs burst apart. He first choked before the searing pain as his sight vanished. Then, he seethed as he heard Abrel scream with frustration. She must’ve suffered from the same effect.
He wasn’t going to get to eat her eyes.
The beast in him whimpered.
His flesh began to bubble and mend from the inside, fibers reaching out to knit his flesh anew. For the umpteenth time, he found himself pleased that he got the Echoheads implanted. Chittering, the shape of his surroundings came back to him, and he found Abrel standing as the thrusters folded out from her back again.
He lashed out for her and caught her by the ankle. By the strength of her combat skin and her implants, he felt his blow ring off as if striking memetic matter. Lashing out with two more Echoheads, he forced himself up using one that remained and realized his lower body was still laying halfway across the room.
Her thrusters snapped off as one of his tails struck her. A projectile darted out from her back. He spored the air with his Mime-fog and latched onto the ceiling. Whatever she fired at him punched through the wall and missed.
Blinded and enraged, she turned and fired a dozen more shots using some kind of auto-gun implant under her wrist, the slugs exploding on impact, shredding the room even more.
And coming nowhere close to hurting Avo. Pushing off from the ceiling, he launched himself down using one Echohead as a spring and the others as unfurled fingers. He was like a wolf-spider from days of old springing down upon its prey.
When he touched her this time, he would liquefy her and tear the Frame from her corpse as well. So close. To kill two Greatlings in one day would be–
An impossible force swept him and Abrel out of the block.
The room warped and twisted around him as a concussive wave blasted him through the walls and into the open air. Gravity took him again and lightness filled his thoughts and body. Rain. That was the first sensation he noticed. Rain licking away his wounds. Rain falling through down from on high.
It was getting to be midnight again. Channels of water were still allowed to flow from on high. Distantly, he could hear wailing sirens making their approach as well.
As water stang color and shapes back into his sight, he blinked, only to find his vision directing a chain of lashing fire into the air. Around him, a thousand other such beams split the brightening sky over Nu-Scarrowbur.
Passing across the ringed portals of the stormtree, Avo suddenly felt himself caught in a net of unseen force. His momentum drained. His thoughts cleared. Coughing, he spat out fried pieces of his insides as he opened his mouth more to take in the healing waters. The air around him rushed and turned. He felt himself placed against soft soil and muddied ground.
There was a static buzzing beneath the earth. A building force sang out around him.
He felt a whisper from the past brush over his mind. “Two. You are close. There were so many deviations, but we are on the precipice of a most delicious future, little dagger. You will thank me when this is done.”
“Zein,” he growled. Pushing himself up using his Echoheads–three of which were regrowing, he found himself basked in the warmth of three flame-encased golems.
One of them drew closer. Avo expanded a lattice of blood around him.
And then a rasping voice echoed out from the first flame. “Stay zero, consang. I would’ve fried you instead of catching you if I wanted to get bloody.” A pause followed. “Still got half a mind to, see. Your arrival has… fucked my home up something bad. But hey, that’s life sometimes.” A snort. There was a disorienting disjunction with the way the man spoke. “Listen. A couple of my old friends wanna talk to you. Say that you got something of theirs. Some kind of Helix. Say that a certain Thousandhand pointed them this way to my home. You, uh, got something to say about that?”


The flames brightened. Avo growled.
The Low Masters were involved in this chaos too. Why wasn’t he even surprised?
Zein.
Zein was why.
“Hello, Vincintine. Please put the gun down. You’ll only delay this conversation by an hour. It takes some time for me to get into a different body.

“Hmm. This smell. I know you… I know you…”

“I have a favor to ask. I made your nightmares go away some years back. I didn’t ask for much then. I’m not going to ask for much now.”

“Right… Citrus man. I dream about you sometimes, you know. But… I gotta ask. How’d you get in? This place isn’t…” [laughing] “Not exactly publicly accessible.”
“Same way anyone gets anywhere. Knowledge, and enough time. Your guards are sleeping. The golems attacking your district–they’re being driven by the Low Masters. I can help you stop them.”

“...Just like that? Just for free?”

“No. Not for free. I need a favor. I need you to help me do something. Are you going to put that gun down?”

“Talk first. We’ll see how I feel after.”
-Exchange between ”Walton” and Vincintine “Ripperjack” Javvers
10-25
Fate Denied (I)
The fires encasing the three golems dimmed, and with light bleeding like a trinity of dissolving stars, the machine anchoring the divine revealed their shells.

Layered in rounded armor, their design seemed more like armored knights melded upon a wheel of gleaming gold. Plates of armor were fused around a central cross-shaped cockpit, and in each each limb there seemed to be a jutting emitter that resembled the look of a lance.
They each were no longer than twenty feet wide and thirty feet high, but Avo felt the touch of something sophisticated in their make as they entered the closeness of his Frame. There was something of breadth to their thaumic nature - sophistication in the unseen architecture that he didn’t feel in either the Galeslither or the Sangeists.
As the first golem drifted close, it halted ten feet away from him. Avo’s haemokinetic wreathe coiled as he prepared to siphon the necessary mass from his environment to fully realize his Woundshaper. Unlike Abrel, the machines gathered before him held form in matter. It would not take much from him to see their dissolution.
Arcing missiles struck down from on high as clouds of rising ash spread across the district. Entire blocks burst apart as threads of light danced and scattered into blasting shockwaves. Three buildings were melted into a molten rod before being fired into the sky at something unseen beyond all the smoke.
Nu-Scarrowbur was coming apart at the seams. People were dying. And that the center of it all, the stormtree remained untouched. Certain portals along its rising stretch were closing one after another, but most still remained open. Avo wasn’t sure how the tree functioned, but with how scattered the Stormtree and Scalper forces were spread, and how he found himself only faced with three golems, there didn’t seem to be much worry on the part of the locals to protect the namesake of their guild.
“You smell a bit like him, you know?” The words spoken by an unseen individual caught him off guard. A dissonant tone occupied the man’s voice, and he gave the sense he regarded Avo as a passing fancy rather than an adversary. “He warned me about his… heh, ‘brothers.’ Told me they’d be coming after you. Gave me means to subvert some of their phantamics. Suppose that’s how I didn’t get bent by them when I jacked into these golems. Nothing but mem-cons and whispering ghosts in here. Too bad for them the cracks in my head have already been filled.”


The central mass of the golem hissed and opened like an unfolding crucifix. Holding within a grav-generated gimbal, a heavily chromed man with dark eyes, pale skin, and long flowing hair stepped out to breathe in the ash of his home and greet the ghoul. There was something predatory in his eyes, and the way his cybernetic exoskeleton was half-laced over his flesh made him look closer to a botch-graft than an actual threat.
Yet, the emptiness in his gaze told Avo another tale. Something inside this one was lost, and it would never be found again. Not truly. His expression harkened to a joining between Draus and Essus, possessing all the cold viciousness of the former, and all the mind-broken trauma of the latter.
He fell–his feet more akin to chrome hooves as he left the weightless clutch of his piloting seat and sank ankle-deep into the soil. So close, he seemed to be Draus’ height though gaunter by far in build. Holding out his arms, he embraced the falling ash as if a child reaching out for snow in a vacation ad for Vard Heldjmar in the Skuldvast.
Echoheads chittering, Avo mapped his surroundings to track for any threats. Rage boiled inside him at slaughter denied–Abrel had been saved by the explosion. He had not felt her die; worse, he didn’t even get to kill and taste her flesh.
It was as if the battles were conspiring against him, fortune and misfortune turning deliberately too–
“Zein,” Avo hissed under his breath.
There were too many coincidences happening at once for him to regard any of this as related to chance. He was being nudged from fight to direction. Like an artanid behind forced to run a maze to the whims of another.
No. He wouldn’t accept this. Would find a way out. He was a Godclad now. Not even time would be his prison. He will find the limits of her canons. He will find the extent of her power–
“She can’t see past the surface.” the man said, interrupting his thoughts.
Avo’s mind screeched to a halt. “What?”

“This… uh, Zein. Zein Thousandhand. Old woman. Old myth. Old legend. Walton warned me about her. He managed to take some memories from her, even. Don’t know how he did but…” the man tilted his head and grimaced. “You shouldn’t see your own future if you can avoid it. But if you can see several futures… well, that’s something else. Ultimately, her problem is that she only sees what occurs on the surface. Walton knew that. Told me about what to expect with her.”

His expression tightened. “Expecting and beholding are two very different things, though.”
Avo paused. “Walton. He told you about Zein? Know how her canons work?” His mind was spinning now. How had Walton managed to take memories from Zein without her knowing? Was she really unaware?
“You know,” the man said, voice scratchy as if he had spent an entire lifetime sucking in breaths next to a fusion burner, “when Walton spoke about a son, I didn’t expect… you? What are you? A bioform? A new experiment?” He looked up and regarded Avo with a twitching eye. A sneer tore over his circuit-lined face. “No. I know your eyes. I’ve seen those eyes–see how they twitched when I cut at the scalps of your brothers. Ghoul.” He chuckled hoarsely as if beholding an amusing joke. “What a fuckin’ guy he was. First, his family are clones. Then–”

A wave rushed over the both of them. The man turned away as embers splashed out from his gaze. Avo hissed as he felt his own retinas heating up.
“Fallen Heaven,” the man said. “My niece’s Bloodthane’s got one of those Highflame half-strands. The one that can channel power through a Heaven of Sight.” He pointed to the southeast end of the city where a downward slope led to a valley of half-melted buildings. “Her eyes can’t stare into each other directly. But it happened. It happened too many times. Hubris. Backlash. Her Frame popped. Same shit, different Heaven. In some ways you ‘Clads are more brittle than us. But that’s the dose when you’re comprised of living mythology, right? Don’t worry. They’ll all be occupied with each other for now. We got time to talk. I got some stuff I need to tell you. Part of the deal I made with your old man.”
Zein’s voice echoed in his skull, bright with amusement. “You should listen to what he says. It was amusing, twisting him to purpose using one of your father’s nodes as a proxy. It directed him in such ways.”
Her voice vanished in a rising peal of laughter. Avo swept his head around, hissing as he tried to find Zein.
More and more, the world around him narrowed. There were fights happening everywhere, but everything–everything was collapsing into her grasp. His mind was spinning. He didn’t know what was beyond her design anymore. Where the deception began. Where it ended.
In the distance, blooming wings of light cut free into the air as the Strider rose through smoke and rumble. Only to suddenly burst apart from within as the Shatterborn leaped free from its chest like it was being used as a doorway somehow. Light shattered and wisping falcons were swallowed into the volcanic heart of the Shatterborn as it crested the horizon.
Death came instant and incomprehensible even more Godclads. The only difference was that they all got a chance to try again. The rest of the district would not be so lucky.
“Ask him about ‘Walton,’” Zein said again. This wasn’t a dialogue. Each word she spoke was cast forward from the past, set to trigger at a specific interval of time or a specific instance in the future. “It will be amusing.”
Releasing his blood and enwreathing himself in a screen of entropy, Avo glared at the stranger and regarded him with apprehension. “Talk. Walton? You know him?”

“No,” the man said. He plucked a single strand of hair free from his mane. “Only a facet, I think. But that’s what he was. A facet. A piece out of a whole. I think he understood me because of it.” He inhaled and coughed, choking willingly on chemicals and filth riding the winds. “I missed this. If I knew all I had to do to get back here was let all my Scalpers get snuffed, I would have done it. I would have provoked a fight with that Greatling fuck and seen everyone did just for the taste of it again: The memory of the fire…”

His words gave Avo a new direction. His Metamind filtered through memories. His Scalpers. A name and a collage of memories joined to offer Avo a splitting replica of the person who stood before him.
He was speaking to Vincintine Javvers. The head of the Scalpers. The one people called Ripperjack.
“What do you think about fate, ghoul?” Ripperjack asked. He gestured behind him as a lance of surging water shot down from the fog above. Breaking against the molten hide of the Shatternborn. The Aegis slammed down from on high as a knot of Galeslithers rose as a chorus through the wind, slipping into a half-toppled tower. Within moments, gauss fire erupted from inside the building, pelting the encroaching Highflame Godclad to draw their attention.
Chaos reigned all around them as disjointed battles were joined. This was a cacophony with an unseen conductor. Behind this was the touch of Zein, nudging and twisting clashes into occurring for her desired outcome.
“Fate,” Avo said. “No. Not fate. Just power. Power over reality. Absolute influence over the future.”

Ripperjack bit down on his tongue and seemed to swallow back something sour. “Maybe. Maybe. Do you know what I think? I think we have fates because we’re conscious. Self-aware. Our minds are like scars–there are only so many choices we can make with the way we’re broken. The waters down run right any other way. Sure. We lie to ourselves and say we can do anything but… no. We don’t. We never do. I… I was the same way, but with what I got from Walton… the other ones think I belong to them, but they don’t see it.”

Ripperjack’s expression twitched into a maddened grin. “They don’t see it. I belong to me. I’m perfectly broken. I’m the perfect agent. Walton gave me the memories back. The memories I needed. I see everything clearly now. This moment. What I needed to do to win. To get back up into the Tiers. He managed to steal that memory from Thousandhand for both of us. She doesn’t see me–doesn’t know her plan to lead the Low Masters here didn’t work. And you can get what you need done.”
Zein’s voice cut back in across the annals of time. She was practically choking on her own amusement by this point. Tension knotted inside Avo. She was taunting him. She was taunting him beyond the edge of time itself.
“What is this?” he said, words intended for both individuals before him.
“I’m supposed to make sure you get across through the right threshold,” Ripperjack said.
“He is instrument and entertainment both. In every path, he chooses suicide before service should I approach him directly. But he had history with your father, and history is such a supple thing to exploit.”

“Why?” Avo snarled, turning. His Echoheads coiled and lashed out with agitation. He couldn’t see her, but she was there, inside him–inside the meat of time itself, like a parasite he couldn’t strike. “Why? Is this all for fun? All these little twists. Manipulations. Why? Couldn’t just do it yourself. Why do this?”

For the first time, confusion bled over into Ripperjack’s face. “Who… who are you talking to?”

Avo turned back to the man and grunted a dismissal. The poor fool thought himself spared. Thought he was a player in this game. Thought he had a glimpse of the bigger picture.
“Tell him, if you will,” Zein said. “It makes no difference now. He has served his purpose. His golems were directed against Abrel Greatling. The mem-data within their locus will have logged this engagement against her cadre once they are purged of the Hungers’ influence. That will make them look most culpable.”
“You're framing them?” Avo said.
The wind rushed over his person. Immediately, his cog-feed cried warnings that a Galeslither was approaching. Over rustling grass and shivering ash, three figures spilled free from an unzipping breeze. Draus landed on her feet, gun raise and wing-scythes wide. Essus and Chambers toppled out behind her, confusion writ upon their faces.
“I’m providing the most desirable cover story possible,” Zein said.
Ripperjack’s features turned stone-like. He stared at Draus. His eyes turned back over to Avo. “Ghoul? I didn’t send that Galeslither. Who are you talking to? Answer me. Talk. Fucking talk–”

A shroud of time shivered over Draus, Essus, and Chambers. From Avo, Zein stepped free, head held high as she stepped free, offering Ripperjack a little wave. “I thank you for all the assistance you provided. Without you, my pruning would have been substantially more… strenuous.”


The bedrock of confidence broke within Ripperjack. The man’s lip began to curl, his eyes darting between Avo and the aged woman fading in and out of reality to the oscillating flow of time. “I… what?”

“It was the easiest way to ensure your compliance,” Zein said. “You remembered him. And using the mutual link, I bent you to my will.”

“Then, why–”

Zein waved a hand. Ripperjack flickered and vanished.
The golems he commanded hovered behind him, silent and unmoving.
“You should take their Heavens as well,” Zein said, turning her head back over to regard Avo. Gauss flechette sipped through her form as she smiled. “You will hate me more, momentarily, Captain Draus.”

Two more shots went through her. She tuned out of reality before either could hit her.
“Why?” Avo said, stepping closer to her. Something splattered down into the mud next to him. The metallic shine of a blood-coated missile caught his eye, and the mini-nuke festooned as its payload made his tension spike.
“Also,” Zein said, “Remember to copy the pattern of the warhead next time. It took more work than expected for me to pluck this from the husk you left behind.”

“No,” Avo said. He cast out his matter-unweaving winds. The mini-nuke flickered behind him. Zein shook her head.


She wasn’t fading now. Instead, she was growing increasingly solid. Increasingly stable, like the waters of time were cementing her true self back into form. “I am much like you in this regard–I refuse anything that I perceive another to force upon me. But this is not force. This is the path. This will happen.”


A cry of agony sang out from everything stone-like around them. Plascrete shook and rattled. Structures dissolved into sand.
“Ah. Reva has died.” Zein frowned. “A bit early for my liking. Disappointing. Let us see if the others can hold until she resurrects.”

“You planned all of this?” Avo asked. “Using the Scalpers. Their golems. Turning the Low Masters' hunters over to him–”

“Oh, no,” Zein laughed. “Much of this was but a happy occurrence. The original plan was to see the Bloodthanes occupied. But when I spoke to him, the path revealed such delightful things. Truth be offered, your father did mend his mind–and in him left protections against the other servants of the Hungers. I merely came upon the sleeper by happenstance.”
“Avo,” Draus said. Her voice was steady, but she never averted her gun. “What the hells is happening?”

Zein winked at the Regular. “I’m ensuring your glory, Captain. Just as I am ensuring the incrimination of Abrel Greatling’s cadre as part of a grand conspiracy to assassinate the ambassador. Or as an unfortunate victim in a grander conspiracy between rogue parties of Stormtree, Ori-Thaum, and Highflame. It depends on how the fighting goes, really. Whatever the case, you will be our hero, dear girl. You stopped a Chivalric plot. You and your new Fallwalker cadre.”
“Cadre?” Draus whispered.
“Yes,” Zein said, “it is all by my desig–”
Her head promptly exploded.
[WARNING: NINTH-SPHERE LIMINAL FRAME DETECTED]
“Veylis.”

“Mother.”

“I see. You have sensed me.”

“I have. You’re falling into your old habits again. Predictably twisting and pruning every possible future down to the quick. You didn’t leave enough time between your skimmings upon the surface of time. Did you expect me to be too occupied by my own affairs to notice?”

“Ah. But your house seemed so messy. Would you blame me for making such an assumption?”

“No. Instead, I will blame you for being discovered and allowing yourself to be killed by me.”

[Laughter] “You make me proud, my girl. And you have not yet slain me.”

“And you break my heart always, mother. Always.”

[Sigh] “Veylis…”
“I will stray. I will not bend. I will prevail. I will fix what has been broken. As is my will. As is what you have taught me.”

“Oh? Did I teach you to murder your own father? To cast all that he had fought for into decay and ruin–”
“I murdered father? I was trying to make him eternal. In place of accusation, I will ask: What did you do? What did you do to the man you loved? You speak as if you were any better when you stained your glaive with his blood.”

“That… thing was not Jaus. And I committed no such act. The leaping of the Ladder was not of my doing, but a response to your… defilement. Against your own blood–your own father…”
“My father will live again. You will live again. I will make everything right. I will not bend. I am sorry. I love you. I loved him. But this is more than love. This is the culmination that is. All that will be. And he was going to give away our ability to choose for ourselves. To Voidwatch. Our from our hands. I could not… Could not…”

“I am still your mother, Veylis. It does not shame you to cry before me.”
“No. I will not. I will not. I am a child no longer. I am human no longer.”

“But you will always be my girl. No matter the path.”
“...”

“Come. Come and embrace your mother before you try and kill her. Let us have this, at least.” [TEMPORAL DISTORTION DETECTED] “Ah. It feels as it always has. Your shoulders feel softer, though. Have you been negligent in your conditioning?”

“You will learn how negligent I have been soon.”

[Soft laughter] “We will be family again. When this is over. When we are done. That is a certainty between us, at the least.”


“And if someone else wins this game? If another imposes their desire on what is to be.”
“Well, dear daughter, I suppose we will always have yesterday. Oh, and do change the taste of your eyes. Make them sour or bitter. It dissuades people from eating them.”

[Sighs] “Please find a better hobby than drugs.”
“Ah. You’ll come to understand. Are you ready? To the death, as we have done before?”

“To the death, mother.”
-Zein Thousandhand and Veylis Avandaer “The Fist of Recursion,” Somewhere in the Paths
10-26
Fate Denied (II)
Zein’s headless body took two steps forward as she twitched and spasmed. Her right arm came free with a sudden snap. Her armor shattered. She was split open from collarbone to the waist.
Each subsequent injury was delivered without any hint of possible cause. They just appeared like they always had been - the present suddenly remembering wounds inflicted by the past.
A subtle pressure lifted from Avo. He barely noticed its sudden absence. The sensation was as if the thickness of time’s passage grew ever looser without someone to manipulate its flow. Reality slackened around him, and around the contours of his companions, the second skin of their temporal shrouds broke apart into needle-thin steams that began to dissolve horizontally, as if their bodies were vessels upon an sea unseen.
There, in the rainfall, four faces frozen in various expressions of shock and confusion watched as Zein’s corpse fell over into separate pieces, each blinking out of existence the moment they struck the ground.
“So…” Chambers asked, staring at the place where Thousandhand fell. “Is this part of her plan too, or did we just watch the genert get snuffed?” A worried expression came over him. “Fuck, is that what happens when people get old? I don’t want to just fall apart and shit–”
An explosion of force struck Avo. Struck everyone. The blow was colossal–the pain deeper than any that had ever struck him. His bones rang, joints sounding like an endless junction of gongs. His Liminal Frame screamed as his cog-feed struggled the process the attack. Error codes screamed out at him as his body vibrated.
As his vision cleared, he found himself drifting through the wavelength of reality, his being floating aside the wholeness of existence like a dislocated limb. Draus and the others pulsed in and out between moments and instants, the bio-rig’s wings twitched and flashed between moments in reality. The golems beside him remained solid and still. Light vanished, the stormtree winking out from the district like it had been plucked from the roots. The world became a blur of glitching geometries lost in a crash of stuttering forces and skipping time.
As his Soul rippled out, he felt the damage inflicted on the world and realized the totality of its harm. Nearly every major domain must have been affected. Nearly anything bearing sign or symbology in the world was quivering before the impact. Only thought escaped untouched, but such was a faint consolation to a prison exiled from reality.
Then, sometime between a heartbeat and an eternity, the vibrations collapsed in on each other, one vibration building upon another until the fullness of shape reformed all that was.
With a final sheet stacking time above all other functions, Avo felt himself snap back into his body and collapse.
The rain, halted during the impact, suddenly remembered it was to fall.
He found himself lying in the mud, staring at Draus as she clutched her titanium-chitin armored chest and choked, at Essus crying out as he groped for the sky, at Chambers pumping his knees, desperate to rise.


The district around them was silent beyond their struggles. Too silent. The fighting between the other Godclads and golems had been halted as well. Whatever this was, it was district-wide, at the least.
Burying his Echoheads into the ground, Avo wheezed as he forced himself up. They didn’t have time to be lying around here. Zein was still missing. The world was beginning to wake up again. Indelible threads of light rose through the curtains of falling smoke as volcanic ash began to swirl.
Skittering over to his allies, Avo pulled Draus up. His movements were piloted more by instinct than thought, but he knew what remained. They needed to leave the district. No matter what Zein’s plan was by this point. No matter her political plots and her games and the narrowing of her paths. Without her presence, he was free. Free and vulnerable.
Without hesitation, he vented the remainder of his Woundshaper’s Rend into the soil around them. He needed to be clean of Rend–couldn’t risk flying the Galeslither for long seeing how the golems were willing to paradox themselves to backlash him out of the Heaven.
Tendrils shot out from him as he groped for the mini-nuke left behind. With a thought, he consumed its pattern, adding its structure to the caged spire atop his Woundshaper.
MATTER-PATTERN MEMORIZED: MINI-NUKE
THIRD PATTERN REACHED
->+15 THAUM TO ONTOLOGICAL MASS
“Oh? And what manner of flavor is this? I have not tasted such before.”
Leaving his Heaven to sample the delicacy he just offered, he regarded the three golems that Ripperjack commanded. One still stood with its cockpit open. He was uncertain as to the canons and capabilities they possessed, but from a glance, it was clear that they could fly. That, and they were likely infested with whatever mem-cons the Low Masters had broadcast in their attempts to hunt Zein.
“Draus,” he said, stabilizing. “Draus. Can you stand?”
Her legs buckled for a moment. But only a moment. She caught herself and a low noise of discomfort escaped from the back of her throat. “Feels like a godsdamned giant swatted the bones outta me.” She took a step toward the golem.

He growled in alarm. “No. Going to subsume them. Loci compromised. Low Masters mem-cons. I’ll get Essus. You get Chambers. We use the tree.”

She stumbled two steps and extended her bio-rig’s wings to stabilize herself. “What ‘bout Thousandhand’s plan?”
“She’s gone,” he said. “There’s not a–”

A snap pierced the silence. With how devastated the district was, ash and dust formed a veil a scant hundred feet beyond the reach of the base of the tree. Something flashed with a brilliant spark. Something exploded. Buildings groaned and glass shattered. The fight between the others was beginning again.
Lightning flashed behind Avo, the air behind him opened like a wound of rupturing light. The stormtree itself spread back into existence as its branches arced into whorls clenching an ascending mess of portals. From base to height, the stormtree rose from Layer One to Layer Two, but right now, all he concerned himself with was the closest exit he could find.
Anywhere was better than here–
A wing of light unfurled into a rain of licking blades. The smoke surrounding the stormtree split much the way the upper half of the tree did when the Strider carved into it. Yet, instead of parting, more bolts of electricity lashed out from the stormtree, and carved new breaches into the soil.
The ground burst beneath Avo. One of the bolt-like branches touched him, but in an instant of a surging jolt, he felt himself accelerating by its touch. Beneath his feet spread veins of voltage, curling around him as the ground dissolved into an open portal.
Through the dust and chaos, he watched as something large swam beneath the murk of the ash.
“Highflame! To me!” Abrel’s voice was a piercing avian shriek. From the length of her soundwaves, the Phys-Sim estimated her to be only a hundred feet away and closing fast. Falcons spilled free from the ash surrounding them they extended into arms and legs.
Without any more hesistation, Avo flared his Soul and reached to subsume the Heavens of the three golems. They came loose into the grasp of his Frame, like plucking fruit from a branch.
With all his bounty claimed, he turned to commit to the final task that concerned him: Escape.
The new portal forming at his feet was an anomaly. He didn’t know how a stormtree functioned or what the rules of its canons were, but he knew that staying here and fighting was to risk Draus and the others.
Firing his reflexes, he laced a circuit of blood into Draus' mind and cast his intentions at her. No words were exchanged. She was of the same regard. It was long past time to leave, and this run had gone beyond sour by means above their control or comprehension.
As the Strider painted itself into shape, as the rain was wrenched away from striking soil and diverted into the grasp of another, as the wind screamed to the eruption of a volcano that basked the surrounding dust in the glow of a lantern, Avo pulled Essus off the ground and jumped down through the new portal.
Draus followed soon after, Chambers kicking and flailing, tucked beneath one of her arms.
Descending the portal of the stormtree was not like stepping from one threshold to another. No. There was a destructiveness to its transfer and interconnectedness to its pathways. Almost immediately, Avo felt his form compressed into a forking bolt of lighting. Matter dissolved into energy within this domain, and before his senses, the district of Nu-Scarrowbur was stripped down to the bone.
All things bearing circuitry and static expanded into fluid outlines as he found himself shuttled through the countless arteries within the tree, striking and bouncing from the other only bolt of transferred material–Draus and her carry-on.
They sank down to the roots of the tree first, awareness spreading as the real crumbled down to facets of lightning and destruction expressed through the mythology of an ever-growing tree.
Behind them came the intrusion of another presence. Someone else had dived in. Someone else was coursing through the same channels after them.
But they were a step behind.
Upon striking the foundation of the roots of the tree, the entire architecture thundered and he was launched upward, light peeling along his perception. For a fleeting instant, the world around him peeled into shape as he twisted up the length of the tree, peering past its thaumaturgic flesh.
His eyes greeted the cityscape around him, and he found himself staggered by the damage.
Nu-Scarrowbur was a ringed district once. Ringed in architecture. Ringed in design. Ringed in its aerolanes and streetways. There had been a slope to its geography before the fighting and warheads disfigured it; the stormtree at the center of the district was nested as a rose clutched between rising layers of domed plasteel.
No more.
Carpets of devastation formed detritus-paved pathways from hollowed structures and mangled bridges. Between the warheads, the Godclads, and the fighting in general, no section of the city was spared. Much of the southeast side was flattened–its cause of unmaking a mix of heavy bombardment, chasms spewing molten heat, and blood-drenched trails that gouged the urban hellscape to its foundations.
All that dared move now were the encroaching form of Godclads swimming through the thick of the falling ash and rain. A few among them traded attacks still, but most were pressing for the tree, the remnants of the Highflame cadre following Abrel while Bloodthanes and wargs followed them.
Light began to build around Avo’s perception. He was a bolt loosed out toward the bottom of Layer Two, and he braced for impact as the hexagonal plates approached.
His gut emptied when he sank right through and leaped through another Layer of the city while colors and sounds flitted by around him.
The exit came with an explosion of sound and light. He tore free from a portal and Draus followed in his wake. Tumbling out, he found himself tossed into the gasp of gravity as he slipped through the holographic static of an emptied aerolane.
A new landscape expanded before his eyes, the stretch of the horizon bright and pristine, crystalline edifices gleaming with a mirror-perfect polish while pale sting ray-like bioforms swept across the sky.
The sky. The naked sky.
Avo felt his mind stutter to a halt as the lilac hue of the Darkstar glared at him, painting the shining district below with its ebbing face. Rain fell hard here, and the streets and grids slickened by the wet.
They weren’t in the Spine anymore. This was Light’s End. They were topside again. Turning as he fell, the first sounds of drone sirens cut through the air as he beheld the vast metallic cliff-face that speared upward to gut the clouds. Beyond the overcast sky shook a place of sound, light, and splendor. Beyond the overcast sky were the Tiers.
The wail of sound drew his focus. A Tadpole-like drone dove out for him, with its wisp-thin tendrils outstretched. Along its pellucid shell projected a symbol–a fang manacled by twin chains: The sign of the Exorcists.
Forty feet long and thirty wide in radius, the machine held enough space for either him or Essus within the opening beneath its cage. With reflexes still running high, Avo whipped a haemokinetic conduit into its shell before it could draw too close and spread his influence. It took him less than a second to strike the locus. It took him three more to crack its protections.
Exorcist Necros were competent across the board. But with all his traumas, and with the Nether crippled so, all it took for him to assume control was a bit of damage and a brief resequencing. He left the drone-jock entombed within his gimbal, ignoring the urge to jump over and subsume her mind as well.
Instead, he directed the machine low to catch him and Essus before they fell and affixed himself to its top using blood-made cables. Several other Tadpoles speared past him in pursuit of Draus and Chambers, and nearly a dozen more were swimming through the air to come after him.
Diving full power to the thrusters, he accelerated after Draus and away from the portal.
The single branch of the stormtree’s stretching limb began to surge brightly.
The pursuing jocks weren’t prepared for another person to dive through. They especially weren’t prepared for said person to be a full-blown Godclad.
The Strider was stitched into existence bolt by lashing bolt. The arms and the legs came first. Soon would be the body and wings. Avo dove low after Draus as he curved down along the buildings.
Less than a second later, winged light cut out to cleave through the blocks.
And failed.
From glass and alloy, the buildings remained unblemished.
Memetic matter. Avo sighed. Now things were definitely going to be an incident; they were fighting where the FATED put their imps.


It looked like Zein might be getting her frame-job done yet.
“You know what, soldier? You’re wasted as Regular.”

“I do somethin’ wrong, Higher?”

“No. You’re doing too many things right. Killing too many targets. Not dying. Hells, your Merits are through the roof. You’re making an awful lot of Instruments very happy people.”
“I aim to please.”

“Nah. You aim to kill. You love to kill. I see it. You don’t need to play coy with me. But… ah. Never mind. You’d make a good ‘Clad, you know that Draus?”

“Don’t quite know what you’re spittin’, sir.”
“Don’t glower. You know I’m right. There are pieces missing inside you, consang. Pieces that were never there to begin with. But hey, that just makes you perfect for this city. Listen, when this war shit is done, I’m gonna recommend you for Axtraxis.”

“Permission to speak freely, Higher.”

[Sigh] “Shoot. Break my heart and tell me all you ever wanted was to fight and serve the cause–”

“Sir, I’ve seen what the Frame does to people. I see how Greatling is. I don’t want it. I don’t want to be them. I don’t wanna burn my days killin’ the small. There’s no gleam in that. That ain’t the dream.”

“‘No gleam.’ Draus: You’re more than worthy and wasted as a Reg.”
-Guard-Captain Winston Nicoma to First-Dragoon Jelene Draus, Fourth Guild War
10-27
Take the Flame (I)
Avo cut through the skies and the Strider followed. Draus vanished the stretch of a bridge and drones cut out after her.
Spearing through the air at one hundred and eighty miles an hour was slow for a Guild-grade aerial vehicle, but that was by necessity; the district was a hive of architecture and memetic architecture at that. Short of the Tadpole turning into a golem with control over forces, inertia still held a tax.
Something Abrel quickly discovered as she tore out from around the corner and struck the curved side of the twin-pronged tower that looked carved out of nothing but vivianite.

The drone fell like a whistling arrow at Avo’s command. Countless shining bridges spilled out between blocks and streets as he plummeted. Beyond the dilapidation and decay that gripped the lower Warrens, Light’s End resembled a orderly nest, and its occupants were all part of the hive.
Encased in rectangular glass passageways, he caught sight of countless curious bystanders as he speared past. There were thousands of them gathered behind windows and depolarizing walls. Unlike the fear and chaos that gripped the streets of Nu-Scarrowbur, he could glean no such tension brimming in their relaxed postures.
This was just a curiosity for them–a break from whatever their professions demanded. They watched with the eyes of bored office workers taking in a peculiar sight rather than the leering bloodlust of a Crucible spectator.
Life and death for him and his allieswas but a passing amusement. When he crossed from sight, they would return to their stations and proceed along the railways of routine.
Essus’ voice bellowed out in low-pitched alarm with each pivot and turn. Avo fastened them tighter to the Tadpole. Blades of light flashed out at him just as he dipped down to sail alongside a Hypertube tunnel, glass-casings coating the gaps between the latticed tubes shrouded him from a slashing wing.
Light splashed and broke into chipped particles. It was like watching a glowing stream of blades shatter against something unbreakable. The two absolutes clashed and two canons shuddered under the weight of paradox. Reality jolted as Abrel’s wings sliced against mimetically guarded metal and glass. Her strokes bled blurring mirages as multiple geometries in the environment shivered.
Avo did not turn from the opportunity presented to him. The Second Circle of his Galeslither came alive in the chaos. A pocket seized the opening in the air behind him just as he turned a corner. Light flashed out off the reflections cast by the mercury gleam of an Exorcist Tadpole twisting between the latticed pathways interlacing the blocks.
He knew he succeeded when he felt his Frame rattle and all light behind him vanished. Too much paradox for Abrel–she needed to vent her Rend or switch to another–
The world shook. Avo’s cog-feed sounded with the detection of vented Rend. From shadows and darkness flew forth swarms of darting falcons. They were not smoke-like as the ones enwreathing the Strider's arms and legs. Instead, they bore a fluid quality to them as they rushed out. Uncountable in number, they washed out from every spot of smoke or darkness around him, diving out to smear themselves against passing drones or clefts left between buildings.
Two Tadpoles encroached from behind, gaining on him due to their unburdened mass. A falcon painted the drone beside him, the inkiness of the eldritch bird’s form feeding into the gaps and gulfs between the armor.
It seemed the Strider’s Hell dealt with reinforcing or mending objects.

Three shots thrummed out from a rifle. Three Tadpoles sparked and spewed flaming projectile trajectories tunneled through their engines. Following the orange path to its origin, Avo located Draus again. She was flying with her chest facing the sky and Chambers secured to her chest like an infant using what looked like makeshift cords. More Exorcists were moving to intercept them, but they had some distance now.
She shot twice more downward and he realized what she was firing at. Her projectiles painted lanes of white down to the entrance of a hypertube station. Yes. That was probably their best chance to evade both Abrel and the Exorcists. Seeing how things were, the Paladins would soon be on the scene as well.
With a command, he directed his Tadpole down directly toward the entrance of the station. It was large and wide enough for him to fly it through, and when it was done, he would drain its mass and take what benefits he could from it.

The world around him was a clash of colors. Ebony rivers comprised of swirling falcons licked after him like rotting tongues. Neon sirens oscillated and pulsed from newly arriving drones. Some twisted into shape not six feet away from him as golem knots jaunted through the expanse of space trying to hunt him down.
Even with the Nether down, the last neutral authorities of New Vultun were coordinated in their approach, surging after escaping fugitives without chaos or confusion. No drones collided. As more pursuing vehicles entered the chase, they began to subtly shift their positions, inching into formations as they tried to head him off.
WARNING: SPATIAL DISTORTION DETECTED
A golem made out of three spinning rings slipped into existence just before him. With it spilled out ten drones and three other burning golems–they looked exactly the same as the one he subsumed earlier. He expanded his blood into a hair-thin lattice as they fired. Slugs, missiles, and flechettes snapped through the air and tore through his defenses. They struck his cordyceramite plating as speckles of blood.
He spurred his drone into a dive.
He was eighty feet away from the entrance, and he saw Draus angle her scything wings to drag them along the ceiling and walls to slow her pace. It was time for him to disembark as well. He connected to Essus’ mind briefly as he absorbed the Tadpole’s mass. +Prepare to fall.+
A note of alarm rose through the whirlwind of terror gripping the man’s mind. +What?+
The drone unzipped into streams of blood beneath him. He let the Exorcist it contained tumble free and left their fate to distract the hands of their comrades. The beast growled inside him. It was a shame not to eat the Exorcist, but he didn’t have the time. Part of him was also wise to the probability that more assets would be devoted to chasing him rather than stopping Abrel if he was the first one to snuff one of the city’s prefects.
REND CAPACITY [WOUNSHAPER]: 2%
REND CAPACITY [GALESLITHER]: 65%

Expanding the additional two tons of mass he gained from the haemification, he wove an externalized skeleton around his person and found himself annoyed at how much the act taxed his attention. He twinned the design to his body and found himself envious of the drone he was just flying as he fused a crude gimbal into place to hold Essus.
He already had the capacity to generate facsimiles of matter using his blood–what would it take to construct proper pieces of machinery?
The ground was fast approaching. He shifted over to using his Galeslither as he used the air to smooth his landing. He dared not draw upon the fullness of its manifestation with the presence of space-affecting golems. With how easy it was to paradox demiplanar canons, he decided upon keeping his Rend as low as possible.
Something brushed the winds he wielded. He guided his Whisper along the circuitry of his blood and directed his perception backward. Glinting speckles were chasing after him. He chittered his Echoheads. No. Not specks–fleas. Particulates the size of insects. Voidwatch had long been reticent to part with their nanomechanical machines, but the same reluctance didn’t crossover into the use of drone-adjacent creatures.
As his speed fell to the low sixties, he released his pull on the wind and opened another pocket, this time for the drones and other pieces of coldtech chasing him. The sphere burst large, expanding a good hundred feet in circumference before he felt its structure start slackening. Multiple movement vectors fed his Hell. His Galeslither’s Rend plummeted. His hunters froze–caged in stasis.
He struck the tessellated tiles leading to the hypertube station with haemokinetic-reinforced Echoheads first to blunt the landing. The ground greeted him in a series of eight spine-rattling impacts and refused to dent or fracture. Keeping what momentum he could, his tails lashed out and pulled him along. Still linked to Essus, he cast a wellness check at his companion.
+Landed.+

+Yes… I felt that.+
Avo’s cog-feed sounded a series of alarms and he ended his stasis before the Hell could over-exceed its quota and spawn forth a Daemon. The fibers across his body tickled. He still remembered how the Twice-Walker’s quavering visage reeled its former master toward it, like a leviathan sucking in a snack.
Pathways leading down into the depths of the tube were ribbed in crystalline layering. A mural splashed out overhead, its design depicting people from across various clades walking hand in hand upon a cloud-made city. Their bodies sported all manner of chrome and other modifications, but each adorned their bodies with diadems or other articles of silver while a patch scintillated on their chests. Its design showed burning eyes sprouting between the links of a crown, and beneath its vibrant aesthetic flowed a single line of text: All will be revealed.
If he wasn’t certain this was an Ori-Thaum district before, he knew it now.
For a moment, he found the emptiness of the station odd before he remembered that the Nether was down and people were likely sheltering in safe zones or Guild-owned buildings away from public spaces. Suppose this served as a confirmation that the thoughtwave detonation was Sovereignty wide.
At the foot of the sloping walkway, Draus waited for him while Chambers dry-heaved beneath her sub-arms whle her scythe-wings twitched. She gestured for him to hurry–her gauss rifle now missing–and pointed toward a wide-open terminal separated into glitching columns and departure gates.
Then, without any hint or warning at all, she extended her projectile launcher and fired. The micro-missile whistled through the air and missed Avo by a foot. Twisting his Whisper around, he noticed nothing at the lip of the entrance. Nothing but–
The entrance shivered as a curtain of water spilled over it. The missile exploded. The rushing rain tore in, and behind ground the inexorable mass of a castle squeezing its way down a pedestrian entrance as Abrel and another of her cadre swam through the rushing waves.
Beside the Aegis, the other two Godclads looked bloodied and beaten. Abrel was missing a leg, and her combat skin was flensed and bent in several places. It looked as if she took heavy ordinance directly to her chest. Avo could feel the Rend spewing out from the other member of cadre. Blood was leaking out from beneath their armpit, and it stained the water red.
Avo growled and shifted into his Galeslither. Better to evade right now than to engage. He wondered how all three made it out from Nu-Scarrowbur even with the Bloodthanes present. He wondered if the Bloodthanes were following after him as well.


Scooping Draus and Chambers into his currents as he dove toward the gate, he rushed through the dormant phase gate and swept into the room as an unnatural flood roared behind, sweeping abandoned luggage and concession drones aside.
Multiple mechanisms and gateways stood closed, but not vacuum sealed. He slipped through cracks and wafted past three different checkpoints before he finally arrived at a waiting station. Another thing that separated Light’s End from the lower Warrens: No elevators.
There wasn’t the need.
The lightrail of the hypertube was a chainlink of crystalline shards that ran twelve cars long for a total of five hundred feet. Geometries of light played across a canopy of crisscrossing beams focused through various lenses that plated the exterior of the tubing. From vicarities and taken memories, Avo recalled the locus to be at the front, and so thusly he rushed into the train.
Releasing Essus and Chambers as he arrived at the empty control nexus of the lightrail, a still locus rested around metallic rings and arm-like apparatuses that projected a grav-field to hold the mind-crystal in place.
Avo was about to connect to the locus when he suddenly froze, tendril an inch away from touching its structure. He had no idea how deep the Low Masters’ subversion of the local Nether ran. But if he lingered, he faced fatal odds.
Growling, he took the plunge and connected to the locus and dived. A simulated lobby began to boot and glitch behind his eyes. The world dissolved and immediately he felt his wards rattle. The first structures that manifested next to him were twisted in sequence and memory. From memory, most public system loci ran on simply palaces and lobbies. Bland, grey rooms with simple shapes and doorways for easy accessibility.
What he saw were mutations. Faces and traumas and fire and other places fissured around the empty expanse he was in. Mem-cons lined every sequence he could behold. If this place was a body, every sinew would be infected, and the bones would be rotten to the core. He was at the base of a tree and even the roots were trying to bite into him.
His Quicksand cracked slightly before it adjusted. The next few impacts broke against him as he surveyed extent of the affliction, trying to find the root phantasmics governing this place. The more he studied, the wider his insides chasmed.
Perhaps he could clean the locus out if he had eighty tons of mass accelerating his thoughts, but right now he had but a short window. Jacking out, he could hear a torrent of water crashing just outside.
He didn’t have the time. He needed some means of accessing the system fast and ignoring the mem-cons and traumas outright. Something to punch right through without destroying all the sequences. Maybe if there was someone expendable–he should have kept that Exorcist with–
Avo paused. He snapped around, eyes fixed on Chambers.
“Mem-cons,” he said, inspiration striking him. “Expendable. Durable.” He grinned.
Chambers took a step back, lip quivering. “Consang, please–”

Avo stung the man’s mind with a thread of blood and fused it to the locus. Chambers cried out in surprise as he toppled back onto a flower-petaled seat blooming with foam cushions. Error codes burst in front of him as a holoprojector failed to receive any resources from the locus.
“Start the train.” Avo said, hoping that his gambit would work.
“Just… just start the train?”

Water slouched close. Something unbolted outside. “Now,” Avo growled.
Chambers whimpered and his face scrunched with concentration. A current of ghosts flowed through the link. In the nexus, the locus rose and began to gleam. Suddenly, the doors all snapped shut as an upbeat tune began to play. The exterior walls along the train depolarized and the outside world turned transparent.
A flood of water smashed into the lightrail. Just as the train thrummed. Light speared down from the various lenses placed across the room. Light peeled away the outer skin of the train as the exterior world suddenly turned into a pale stream. Only a whine gave away the fact that they were traveling. The train didn’t shake, didn’t bounce, didn’t even groan upon metal plates.
Being injected across a concentrated beam of light did not have anything to do with sound, after all.
+Welcome aboard Line Thirteen of the Easterly light expanse. Please ensure all thaumic devices are switched off. Affecting the domains of Light and Space are strictly prohibited–+
A chuckle came from Chambers. He pointed to his link. “I… I did it! I fuckin’ did it!” He threw his hands up and his coat opened. He exposed himself to the group as he let out an incoherent shout of triumph. “Fuck yeah! Whose the best half-strand in–”

A loud crack rattled from the back of the train car. Past countless light-dappled doorways separating each shard, a figure crawled out from a puddle of water, and behind them followed another.
WARNING: HIGH REND SIGNATURE DETECTED
WARNING: HIGH REND SIGNATURE DETECTED
Rising from pools of water, Abrel Greatling emerged from the shallow film of water like it was a deep pool. She planted bare leg roped with wired muscle–just regrown from the regenerative properties of the midnight rains. A single member of her cadre followed her, coughing as he tore his cracked helmet free from his head.
His skin was copper while his eyes shone pale blue. He lacked an inch of height next to Abrel, but his bulk more than enshadowed hers. Basked in the light of the traveling train, the Greatling collapsed her own helmet. For a heartbeat, she stood there, eyes bloodshot, face contorted in palpable fury. Her lips peeled back as she bared her perfect teeth. An inhuman noise of primal hatred escaped from her.
She let out a breath.
She took a step forward.
Behind, her only accompanying ally followed.
Avo let his Echoheads rattle and growled. Fine. Two. He could deal with two. He still had his Heaven. He still had his ghosts. He still had Draus. He cast out a tendril of blood and connected to her. +Going to draw their attention. Shoot them when I–+

She strode next to him and flexed her wings. +We rupture the inside of the train and we all die. I know how it works.+


Avo paused. +So. We do this the ugly way.+


He felt her narrowed gaze glance up at him through her helmet. +You tryin’ to sound disappointed?+
He grunted a laugh. +No.+ Abrel Greatlings footsteps rose to an uneven sprint. He walked out to meet her. +Looks like I’m going to get to taste more Guilder flesh after all.+
[Sighing]
[Sighing intensifies]
[Deep inhale]
Widen the quarantine. Pocket the entire Yuulden-Yang Sovereignty. Tell Voidwatch to delay as long as they can–I’m jumping over now.
Abrel Greatling? Daughter of Uthred Greatling? [Sound of head striking and denting steel] Who else knows? Well, you and trainee Kitzuhada keep those memories to yourself now. I know Uthred–the man’s a half-strand; this isn’t just going to end up being a mess, it’s going to be a political mess across the board.
I’ll see if I can intercept that hypertube… wherever it's going. I’d be interested in figuring out how they got the lightrail to run considering the state of the Nether and all the mem-cons. Keep your ansible open and open a tunnel to Firmament. We need full spectrum tracking. Their technology should work better now that the ghosts are missing.
Let’s see if I can pinch this cut closed before someone finally nicks an artery and starts another bloody war.
-Chief Paladin Naeko
10-28
Take the Flame (II)
Smoke-made falcons coated Abrel’s form as she took to her stride. Her second followed close behind, glowering at them behind a sheen of nanolaminated skin grown over his six eyes. His Frame was still hot with Rend, and reality ebbed into shape around him like a wrung towel. Neither Godclad drew upon their canons as they approached, but the air still filled with the pungence of coming violence.

With the lightrail at risk, this was to be done in the oldest fashion: Close and brutal—fist against claw, and tooth against fang.
Avo had no quarrel with their intent—there was a sweetness to applying the most personal touch. Just as there was sweetness in being able to exploit both his Hells against the Guilders. He licked his fangs as he regarded Abrel’s second in particular. As to why the man didn’t just vent, Avo could not say for certain, but Hells usually destroyed or destabilized in their attempt to balance one’s subreality. Neither effect boded well for the hypertube’s stability.
His unsteady gait and a furtive glance at the Greatling betrayed that. Yes. Avo took in his perfumed scent–the spice sting of cold sandalwood–and knew which would be his prey first.
A network of blood spread out from him, linking Essus and Chambers to his Metamind.
+Going to trap them in stasis,+ Avo said. He marked a spot right in front of his foes. +Freeze them. Then hit them with Barrage from my other Hell.+ It was a good plan, he thought. A neat plan. Something that would be hard for the Guilders to counter.
Draus unspooled her monowire and angled her scythe-like wings forward. Her chitin-titanium bio-rig’s build and Avo’s Echoheads made it hard for them to stand side by side, so she cast a ghost into his Metamind detailing Regular room-clearing stances for close-quarters combat. Avo acquiesced and shifted, holding himself to an angle. He let her play above and left while he chittered forward right and below.
+They’re gonna be faster than us. Hit harder than us. Ain’t gotta clue what mods they’re runnin’ but it’ll be a touch above ours.+ Objects she considered non-essential lit up in her cog-feed as she marked them. Even absorbing all the walls and seats in the train-shard wouldn’t push Avo over another ton in mass. +Use it to herd and trap ‘em. If you can fix one or both in place, it’ll be nova–otherwise, you shape the territory+ She turned her head to Chambers. +Keep the tubes bright and runnin’ until we’re done. Long as we’re skimmin’ light, I’m bettin’ their Heavens and Hells stay inside them, so keep us runnin’. Don’t stop or we’re all snuffed.+ She glanced at Avo. +Most of us, anyway.+
Wordlessly, Essus stomped to a stop behind both of them. He stood the last line to Chambers, and his mind, though worn with stress and recoiling from trauma, spoke clearly of what he considered his personal duties.
The father would have never been a street squire with his deficit of viciousness, but perhaps there was something greater to be uncovered in one noble enough to offer themselves to the altar of combat yet, regardless of distress or certain defeat.
Pulling his attention away from the man, Avo growled a laugh as he rapped Draus on a pauldron. +Can still kill you quick and graft the Frame.+
She scoffed and narrowed her eyes at the approaching Godclads. A bit less than two hundred feet now. Four or so train shards separated them. +Hang on to your skin, rotlick. Might just get the chance to do it in a minute. You fight how I say, I think we got–+
Static surged through Abrel’s armor. A dozen impact trajectories flashed red. Avo drew wide a sphere of stasis fifty feet ahead of them. Flashing before him flechettes bearing transparent needles filled with murky fluid halted at the very edge of his stasis.

His Galeslither’s Rend dipped alongside the Phys-Sim’s velocity estimations for the projectiles. Beyond the halt, Abrel and her comrade vanished into wafting tendrils of smoke through the ventilation.
Alarm rose from Draus. She highlighted the needled projectiles and urged him to form a haemokinetic wall to seal off the space in front of him and block up the vents. +Ego-Screamers. Don’t get hit by that. Nasty piece of coldtech we got from Omnitech–injects nanos patterned with a broken mind-upload. They brick eventually against a Meta, but it’ll still eat through your brain.+
Avo formed a solid sheet of blood in front of the shots and sealed the airflow. Tendrils snapped free from his body and tunneled through the innermost structure of the lightrail. He kept things close to avoid damaging the crystalline hull, but he realized that everything within remained his for the shaping.
He began to draw in as much mass as he could while a protective perimeter blossomed out from his arteries.
Sending his Whisper out on patrol, he bathed everything in front of him using the phantasmic’s perception and caught sight of twin accretions fast on approach. +There.+ He marked the Guilders. The others saw them too. The Guilders managed to cross seventy feet in a fraction of a second, rushing through the interconnected air conditioning faster than Avo could cut off their path entirely.
But Abrel surprised him. Instead of pushing through the available junctions in the ventilation system, she plumed free in a fog of screaming falcons. Her partner was missing and as she stepped this time, the floor warped beneath her as she went from fast to near-imperceptible.

Wiring and seats burst free as two figures congealed from smoke. The air crackled with the sound of hissing static. Abrel went from sixty feet to five before Avo could even notice. Several gaps formed in his haemokinetic perimeter. Something cleaved clean through his outer defenses.
He triggered his Mime-Fog more out of reflex than a conscious decision. Only the Whisper riding the circuits of his blood revealed to him how he was just attacked.
A humming sheen of transparent energy had sliced out three inches off from his head. Something inside Avo knotted at how closely death brushed him, how he needed a boost from his Canon of Haemokinesis now, damned be the risk it presented to the train’s structure.
A lash of cold pain filled him as three of his Echoheads came apart. He didn’t even realize she struck again at first–nor the fact that it was Draus who parried the blow. The Regular folded over Abrel as she riposted from three places. No thoughts occupied Draus’ mind, but a constellation of sequences were afire with muscle memory and instinct. Her monowire flicked horizontally while her wings punched down and leftward.
Avo followed in her onslaught. Constructs of blood exploded out from the wall and the floor while he remolded his protections and invoked his Canon of Haemification.
Abrel blurred. Minor shockwaves pulsed from her as her arms vanished. Her unseen blade sparked with each impact, and more, it drank kinetic energy away from all that it struck. She deflected all three of Draus’ attacks with the same movement despite the spore-ridden fog washing over her. Through the Whisper, Avo gazed upon her and beheld the bloodlust in her screaming face.
There was a purity in her hatred. An absoluteness in her loathing. She gave everything to cutting into him, slicing through folds of air as he lurched back on instinct. A thin line of pain traced his plates. She still managed to take an inch.
Then came his assault. The tendrils melted armor and burrowed into flesh. A crimson cleaver erupted from her right and hewed deep. An arm snapped free from her. A gasp of disbelief followed as he pushed further, unzipping armor and gene-perfected flesh from shoulder to neck.
Her finger twitched. She exploded into a flock of wailing falcons as a tide of black washed through the train car.
A single command came then from Draus. He responded without considering. Using his Whisper as his eyes, he opened another pocket of stasis right at the entrance leading to the nexus where Chambers and the locus were.
A force slammed into him before he learned what was caught in the net of his Rend. Out from the flowing darkness came the six-eyed Guilder. The man’s right arm was unfurled in six segments as gravity distorted.
Avo was torn free from the ground and pressed into the ceiling alongside Draus and Essus. He hissed. Here he was thinking the Guilders were going to get nice and bloody with him; a ghoul could but dream.
The scene unfolded: A warped shoulder-mounted autogun rose extended out from the Guilder’s damaged armor, while Abrel pulled at her stasis-entrapped arm just eight feet away from reaching Chambers as the former enforcer used the locus for cover.
Three acts of violence followed in concurrence from three different individuals. The Guilder’s autogun sparked and exploded; a long haemokinetic pole punched out from the ground and impaled him through his groin; Abrel dislocated her arm free at the shoulder but found herself unable to break free–so augmented was she in fortitude that her strength was insufficient to achieve the necessary self-mutilation.
Six-Eyes gunned his grav-thrusters in response, but Avo’s touch was already halfway to his spine when the armor malfunctioned. As such, though the Guilder snapped loose from the pole, he twisted at an angle and speared into the left side of the train-shard. Glass and plastic filled the air. Gleaming bone and sinuous nanotubes were exposed to the light as grav-thrusters cleared the Mime-Fog. Avo and Draus pushed off the ceiling while Essus just fell. The Guilder tore through the inner layer of the train and sight-searing light flashed the room. A moment before he could strike the crystalline exterior, he tore a cord free from the base of his neck, severing himself from his combat skin.

Six-Eyes tumbled and rolled before Abrel. Her eyes widened in desperation as her sole remaining companion bounced to a stop beside her. His innards were oozing free from multiple wounds while his nanosurgeons battled to mend his flesh. Most of his intestines were missing entirely - woven into blood at Avo’s touch. A tri-clustered heart beat inside his hollowed chest gnawed clean of bone and flesh.
It was only thanks to his augmentations that he was still alive at all.

Hacking bright-red blood from his clogged noses and swollen lips, the Guilder pushed himself onto an elbow as he tried to back away. Teased by the delicious taste of the man’s exposed insides and the horror writ upon his face, Avo stalked forward, keeping his eyes locked on Abrel’s.
It had become a joy to hurt her, to sup torment from behind her eyes. There was a taste of her brother about her–a depth to her pain that was all-consuming. He was going to make her watch as she–

Draus screamed into his mind. +Avo, just fuckin’ kill ‘em! You can fuck with their fuckin’ corpses godsdamned lat–+
The Regular gave up on reasoning with him and just sidestepped. Her monowire coiled out. The beast roared for Avo to stop her–to cut her down before she stole pleasure from them again.
Six-Eyes held up an arm and winced back in preparation for the coming strike.
Abrel clenched her teeth.
And twisted her back to the stasis.
Wings of light blasted free from behind her as klaxons blared within Avo’s cog-feed. His Galeslither’s Rend went from half to nothing.
WARNING: DAEMON FORMATION IMMINEN–
Avo collapsed the stasis before the pocket could burst. But Abrel failed to quell her miracle. Twin beams of light sawed clean through the sides of the room as she wrenched herself free. The train shuddered and something began to crack. Red began to flash across every-shard as error-codes flashed over the seats.
The lightrail broke loose the surrounding stream of brightness as fractures spread along the crystalline hull.
+Chambers!+ Avo cast. +Stop the–+
He didn’t get to finish his thoughts as Abrel struck him shoulder-first, driving her arm back into its socket. He bounced off Draus as the world became a storms of fists, shins, elbows, and knees.
Both his eyes went dark as blurred fists caved in his sockets. His jaw snapped loose at the joint. Something popped inside him as she shattered one of his plates and pushed in through his mycelia with a palm. Draus fought to anchor him in place, using her own wings as propulsion. She was sent tumbling onto her back as metal warped around Abrel’s foot and the air ruptured before the swing of her roundhouse.
Force exploded across Avo’s chest. He choked and bit his tongue in half. Draus rolled to her feet and caught him, whipping her monowire just as Abrel dissolved.
With blood tonnage insufficient and Celerostylus outclassed, his Echoheads grasped at a haze of falcons as Abrel washed through him, her Liminal Frame ringing off of his.
Following her form using his Whisper, she tore back into reality just behind Draus and clenched her fist. The air shimmered as Abrel activated her unseen blade.
Avo directed his tendrils to tear into her. His thoughts were interrupted as gravity lurched and he was torn away from Draus.
The world twisted. He struck the ceiling and felt the cracks in the crystal widen. From his Whisper, he spied Draus and Abrel frozen in a moment of combat. The Regular had turned her wings outward - she was using the thrust to push the Guilder back and make the distance for herself at the same time. Power, however, had a threshold that skill could not surpass, and so when Abrel burst into mist and shadow, she flowed forward.
Draus might as well have been standing still. Abrel appeared into being behind her and swung her remaining arm with decapitation in mind.
An entropic missile ripped free from Avo. His Phys-Sim ran the numbers. It wasn’t going to hit in time.
Six-Eyes continued to pull on Avo. The ghoul hissed as his flesh rethreaded and thoughts cleared. He could help Draus but he would abandon Chambers and Essus to Six-Eyes. In the end, the choice came easier than he expected.
He reached out to his Heaven and the winds answered him. The weight of a typhoon exploded out from nothingness within the train.
He tore away from the surprised Guilder and back from her he was pulled.
Abrel’s blade just barely licked an inch through Draus’ neck when she was drawn into a current of wind. She didn’t go alone. Draus clamped down on the hand of her would-be killer and followed the Guilder into the Yondergales as she re-reeled her monowire.
They slipped out before the Galeslither as it brayed, and Draus stripped Abrel’s remaining arm in twain as the wire glided down from the second knuckle to the elbow. Plates lifted from the Guilder’s back but Avo tangled her in turbulence, flinging her back over to the Regular.
The Guilder had every bit of hardware advantage compared to Draus. Better augs. Better equipment. But opportunity, however, had a threshold that power could not surpass. And so when Abrel fell forward, she did so neck first through a glinting wire.
She died then with a snarling expression on her face, and the hate burned in her still as Avo felt her nous plunge down into her subreality.
He didn’t have time to enjoy it. Creating an opening for Draus and flinging her out into the wind, he loosed her at Six-Eyes.
And found there wasn’t a need.

Standing at the entrance before Chambers was Essus, bereft of a holojector wing. Said missing appendage was currently buried heart-deep inside Six-Eyes, the Guilder staked while he was still on the floor. The dismembered implant flashed one last time as the form of the boy splashed into reality, neon mixing with the brilliant crimson of Guilder blood as the child smiled one last time before winking out.
And with it went Six-Eyes.
His Liminal Frame flared. Soulfire erupted out from his eyes and ears as his body began to dissolve. Avo felt it–the sensation of a once-intact nous falling upon blades of Rend. An echo of the man snapped free from his form and dissolved into motes.
Abrel had at least one cycler remaining. Nothing was clean in this one.
Stepping out from behind the locus, Chambers threw up a fist in cheer as Draus turned to slow herself before she ran into Essus, one hand clamped around her neck to pinch her severed artery.
Triumph flowed through Avo as he turned his attention back to Abrel. Which was when he noticed his entropic Barrage impact an exposed section of the hull. Entropy expanded. Light punched in.
Avo reached out for his companions in an eruption of Soulfire and rushing wind.
Lines exploded across his cog-feed as reality was swallowed by light, and existence ruptured.
And then everyone died.
There is a difference between wars and the Trials.
I cannot speak quite so much about the former, I have only glimpsed its true face from angles and moments. War is encompassing–too much for a single individual to master as we are now. Even should they be Godclad. I’m sure you have read Osjon Thousand’s treatise, “Total Domain Warfare.”
Quite excellently written, if I might applaud a former opponent.
To put it simply, there are too many aspects of reality to be struck from during warfare. Modern Heavens are built to be more encompassing in their symmetries, using such broad Domains as geometry, force, biology, time, matter, and the like, but mythologies are narrow and twisting. No two Heavens of Flame truly occupy the same grooves in a single concept; there are always separations in canon and expression.
Dueling is mastering your own canons and knowing your foes. War is never sticking to a set build and always moving, maneuvering, shaping your environment–knowing what Sovereignties to press and which to avoid; diving the Nether, and jacking minds to strip intentions bare and avoid incoming harm.
You can become champion of the Trials alone. I know. I’ve done it. It’s more reliable that way.
But there are fifty million others like me with their own Frames, and all it takes is one mistake before someone claims all that is mine.
There are only so few of us that can live up to the tale of the owl. For most, survival will come in mimicking the fashion of crows.
-Ying Yang Wei “Stormsparrow,” Fallwalker and Grand Champion of the Apex Trials
10-29
Cadre (I)
[LIMINAL FRAME] OBTAINED - GLADIUS PATTERN
->[GATE OF THE PASSING DARK] HEAVEN TEMPLATE DOWNLOADED
->THAUMIC CYCLER x2
->SOUL x1
->ONTOLOGICS x4
THAUMIC CYCLER 1: [GATE OF PASSING DARK]/[THIRD CIRCLE]
THAUMIC CYCLER 2: [GALESLITHER]/[SECOND CIRCLE]
FOREIGN NOUS DETECTED [x3]
GRAFTING INITIATED
THAUMIC OUTPUT - 5483 THAUM/c
After the end, there remained four fires for four Souls.
Three were dark embers, satellites orbiting Avo’s colossal presence. They were sparks frozen in time, starved of worship, starved of death. Each bore a slot of emptiness at its core. With one taken from a Fallen Heaven and two from recently slain Guilders, the three Souls hovered and bobbed upon tides of rippling radiance.
The Soulfire solidified around them. Their movement froze still.
Through the brightness came three fragments of humanity. Three beings bundled in properties of mind and will–parts to the alloy of sapience. Injected by instruments made from pulsing flames, the three fragments slipped into three Souls as sparks once dim cracked wide, the symbology akin to a fire opening its eyes.
Rings of self-devouring serpents coiled and tightened around each Soul, each filled with a distillation of ten echoes of Essence. The dragons locked into place around the Souls. Quieted minds gasped as dreams spilled free from inside their Frames. New boundaries flashed into shape around Avo as he parted the yolk of his Frame and formed four galaxies from one.
One after another, the first shivers of awareness quavered through each of the Souls. Yet, as he regarded them, there was something odd about their aesthetic and shape; an incongruity with his own nature.
Where he was a rippling wavelength, the fires did not dance through the others. Instead, as soon as the cyclers were locked in place, each Soul manifested a different configuration–the structure of the Liminal borders different in width and height, bent or arching out from certain angles.
They were in a sense as Kae said: Solid matter rigs to the nanomechanical fluidity possessed by his Stillborn and exemplified by his Metafac.
He wondered if he could change their ontologies toward preference or practicality.
Considering how he managed to install each of his companions into a Soul, he didn’t see why not.
Moments passed. He felt them slowly wake, but no aspect of speech arose. Apprehension filled him as he connected to each.
The problem is revealed via the words of his Woundshaper. “There are no Heavens or Hells to them, master–They exist in a void. Take pity and offer your new kindred something of a tongue.”
He swept his awareness across the countless new Heavens floating within the wavelength of his being.
Three crucified phoenixes impaled by seeds of ever-sprouting, ever-charring green greeted his notice first. The collective ontologics stripped from Jhred Greatling occupied its own cluster. Not far from it, the template taken from Six-Eyes looked akin to a grand obsidian gateway leading to another gateway to another in five repetitions. Avo hadn’t had the time to review the former Godclads canons but he knew they functioned, and from the Frame template he took the second cycler as an attachment for Chambers earlier, uninstalling a Galeslither and a connected Hell.
Surprisingly, the Rend was also missing–the slate cleaned with Six-Eyes’ death.
Finally, two Sangeists, three eyeless snakes implanted with a cockroach’s legs and oozing watery darkness from their wounds, and truck-sized warg stitched together from constantly clashing bolts of lighting lingered formed a belt around his nucleus.
He attached the Twice-Walker template to the Soul he thought was Draus and the Endogate to Essus. He eyed the last Soul that was Chambers and considered grafting a Sangeist onto it but felt the awareness of his Woundshaper glaring inward upon him.
Awkwardly, he withdrew the Sangeist and attached one of the phoenixes–its Heaven called a Lushburner–to Chambers instead.
HEAVENS DETECTED: SANGEIST X2; FULGERHUND X1; SHADOWCRAWLER X3; LUSHBURNER X2; GALESLITHER X1
HELLS DETECTED: GALESLITHER [SECOND CIRCLE] X1
DOMAIN FRAGMENTS DETECTED: DOMAIN OF (SPACE) X1
A series of Heavens twitched to life. Light washed over the reflective form of the Twice-Walker. The midnight doors to each gateway slammed, rippling the geometry surrounding it. The phoenix screeched–and the noise broke off to become Chambers’ incoherent screaming. Avo couldn’t tell if something had gone wrong resulting in madness and insanity for the man, or if this was how he always was.
“Avo?” Draus said, her voice produced by the dissonance of glass shattering and mending. “Are we snuffed?” Relief and satisfaction sprang loose within him. The weight of impulse and physiological feedback ran scant here, but still, this was a sign of his success.

They were dead. They would be resurrecting alongside him.
The full weight of realization pressed down in that instant. He could make almost anyone a Godclad so long as he had the components. Souls and cyclers were the hardest to claim, but if he hunted the right prey…
“Yes,” he said, finally responding to her question. “For now.”
RESURRECTION - 8%
Silenced by the dialogue, confusion came from Essus while Chambers stopped screaming. Ebbed in their own Heavens, the Souls expressed themselves with better animation.
“It wasn’t my fault,” Chambers spat out. Fire crackled and branches burned with each word he said. “I held onto the locus with my life–you saw, consangs. Tell ‘em, Essus. Didn’t you see me protect that shit with my li–Essus… why the fuck are you a door?”


The man once named Lingerer felt at the joints of his own ontology. He opened his first doorway again and the flow of spaces loosed. “I… do not know. The last thing I remember is… I killed a man. I killed someone.” A low sigh came from him. “Oh, Artad. What have I become?”


“A… door,” Chambers answered. Suddenly, the phoenix looked down at itself and squawked in surprise. “Avo… what the fuck. You get to be blood-tower-wolf-jaw antler castle; Draus here’s got Mirrorhead’s old shit; Essus is a door; why the hells did you make me a chicken.”
“Phoenix,” Draus corrected. “You got a Lushburner grafted on you.” She sighed and directed a glare at Avo. “Well, suppose Zein might still got her eye on us–we’re all ‘Clads now, ain’t we.”
Neither Draus nor Essus seemed overly enthused. The rare bitterness of regret came over Avo at the outcome–they hadn’t managed to choose. He was forced to deliver upon them a decision to preserve their life. He did not regret it, but he did wish it to be different. Quieted by these thoughts, Avo found himself hesitant to respond.
Chambers didn’t. “... I’m a ‘Clad?”
The Twice-Walker stepped through its own reflective surface to stare at Chambers. She turned back to Avo. “Did you have to graft him too? Couldn’t you’ve just… I don’t know… lost your grip on him.”
Chambers’ voice rose an octave. The phoenix seemed to smile. He didn’t seem to register Draus’ words. “I’m a ‘Clad.”
“I… I did not want this.” Essus said, his despondence mixing with Chambers’ rising glee.
“Was more focused more on keeping you all alive,” Avo said, answering Draus. She just regarded him in silence. “Resurrected.” He corrected.
“Sure.”
“I’m a MOTHERFUCKING ‘CLAD!” Chambers began to spin his Heaven as flames and vines erupted out from him. “I’M MOTHERFUCKING IMMORTAL.”

That statement wasn’t technically wrong, but it disquieted Avo to hear it spoken by Chambers nonetheless.
“So,” Draus said, her voice thin. Glass chipped and fissured as she crashed her borders against his. “You see what did us in?”

A beat passed. Avo considered his answer. “Train broke.”


“Well, damn, that reveals everythin’, don’t it? What made the train break, rotlick.”


Another beat. “Couldn’t tell. Was a lot happening? Think there was… a flash of light. Maybe Abrel used her Heaven again?”

“Did she now? ‘Cause I remember taking her head off.”

“Still had a piece of skin attached to her. Maybe implant. You didn’t kill her clean—it happens.”


All three other Souls judged Avo in silence.
“You know,” Chambers said, “I do recall seeing some weird missile coming out of you there, Moonblood.”
No longer Avo or boss or anything placating. Moonblood again. How quickly did Chambers promote himself back to associate from prisoner. Avo would need to see this misunderstanding corrected.
“Saw wrong. Saw you using the locus to shield yourself.”
The phoenix chirped with indignation. “What? That’s bullshit, Avo. Bullshit. You tell him, Essus. You tell him how brave I was. I died protecting that locus.”
Again, Chambers was technically correct. Avo despised him for it.

The obsidian doorway that Essus embodied creaked with dismay, silent at his current predicament. Maybe he wanted to die. Maybe. Avo would give him that choice afterward. He could give a Frame; he probably could take one as well.
Draus offered a joyless chuckle. “You know what? I’ll second that–I’ll back you up, Chambers. I think we did see the very same thing.”
Avo tried to sneer at the Regular. His Woundshaper bubbled with blood. His Galeslither neighed. And then spoke.
“Where… where is the rest…”
Everyone went still. The Woundshaper prodded at its neighboring Heaven with concern. “Mule. Be you awake as well? Do your eyes open fully?” The Galeslither didn’t respond. “Master… perhaps it is best that you don’t infuse it with more potential. There is much danger in uncertainty, but in me there is reliability. Better a lived-in hovel than an untested castle.”
Draus hummed. “Yeah. Weird shit. Anyway, you fuckin’ got us killed, rotlick. What happened to ‘don’t damage the train.’ I thought we were all clear about not breakin’ our ride?”

“We were,” Chambers said, adding the fuel of annoyance to the ghoul’s simmering ire.
“Was trying to save your life,” Avo growled.
The Twice-Walker shook as Draus snorted. “Well. Didn’t quite light the wick there, did we, Avo?”
He let out a quiet ripple of fire. “Suppose not.”

“Ah, come on, Reg,” Chambers said. “We all fuck shit up sometimes. And Avo did it to keep you alive.” A strange wistfulness filled his next words. “You especially, I think. But he kept all of us. Shit… you kept me alive too. I never thought… I figured…” The former enforcer uncharacteristically lapsed into speechlessness. “I was kinda expecting you to throw me away.”


“Still need your mind if I can keep it. Might be useful. For Kae.”


Chambers hummed. “Well. Cheers to Kae, then.”
RESURRECTION - 18%
“What happens now?” Essus asked.
“Resurrection,” Avo answered. “See the percentage rising. Should be tied to a thaumic cycle. I think. Brings us back when it's done. Reinserts us into reality.” Speaking those words made him realize another factor: Abrel died before them, but her death was neither permanent nor true.
“Need to finish grafting you all. Make modifications. Prepare for return. Enemy could be waiting with Heaven.”
“Start with Chambers, then,” Draus said. “Essus and I look like we got a least a Heaven and Hell between us.”
Scanning through his root-data, the build of the Spire-pattern Liminal Frame he subsumed from the Fallen Heaven at Burner’s Way flashed into his mind. Unfortunately, it was missing too many domains and integral components to grant Chambers an automatic install.
Instead, Avo was going to need to invert another of the Lushburners to serve as Chambers’ Second Circle.


HEAVEN - [LUSHBURNER]
DOMAIN: (FIRE/BIOLOGY/FORCE)
THAUMIC REQUIREMENTS - 68 THAUM/c
DOMAIN OF (FIRE)
CANON: CONFLAGRATION OF BIRTHING - THE FLAMES OF THIS HEAVEN CAN ENGENDER THE DEVELOPMENT OF RECORDED BIOLOGICAL STRUCTURES AND WEAVE ORGANISMS FROM THE HEAT OF ITS FLAMES; THE FLAMES MUST SURPASS 800 DEGREES CELCIUS TO BEGIN MANIFESTATION
HUBRIS: THE FLAMES CANNOT SURPASS 1000 DEGREES CELCIUS
DOMAIN OF (BIOLOGY)
CANON: CATALOGUE OF THE CHARRED SEED - FLORA AND FAUNA BURNED BY THE MASTER OF THIS CANON WILL BE ADDED TO THE HEAVEN’S EXPRESSIONS
CANON: FLAMEWEAVER - THE MASTER WILL BE ABLE TO MUTATE ALL FLESH CAUGHT IN ITS HEAT RADIUS INTO A SPECIFIC LIFEFORM STORED WITHIN ITS SEED
HUBRIS: ONLY TWELVE LIFEFORMS CAN BE STORED WITHIN A SEED AT A TIME
DOMAIN OF (FORCE)
CANON: GRASP OF THE BURNING - THE MASTER CAN CONVERT HEAT INTO KINETIC ENERGY AND DIRECT IT WITHIN A ONE-THOUSAND FEET RADIUS
HUBRIS: IF THE HEAT IN THE AIR DROPS BELOW 400 DEGREES CELCIUS, IT WILL RESULT IN THAUMIC BACKLASH
With a single command sent to his Meta-Fac, Avo twisted the Heaven and broke it into its component domains. The progress of resurrection was rising fast and he didn’t have much time–he needed to finish with Chambers and review the others.
Then, he needed to distribute the necessary thaums to keep each of them functional.
Taking components from the domains of Fire, Biology, and Force, he created a Second Circle using the components of force.
HELL - [SECOND CIRCLE] - LUSHBURNER
DOMAIN: (FORCE/ENTROPY)
THAUMIC REQUIREMENTS - 68 THAUM/c
Letting his Meta-Fac’s simulation run, he picked the most coherent option he could while keeping things simple. Kae wasn’t here, and Zein couldn’t foresee his future–best he avoid anything too experimental.
CANON: FLESHBOMBER - THE MASTER OF THIS DOMAIN CAN INFUSE ALL BIOLOGICAL LIFEFORMS ABOVE FREEZING WITH KINETIC ENERGY AND USE THEM TO TRIGGER AN EXPLOSION - THIS CANON IS ABSOLUTE
DAEMON: IF A BIOLOGICAL LIFEFORM IS COOL BELOW FREEZING WHILE INFUSED WITH KINETIC ENERGY, THE RESULTING RUPTURE WILL BIRTH AN ANATHEMA OF DEVASTATION TO SERVE AS THE MASTER’S ANATHEMA; THE ANATHEMA CANNOT BE SLAIN AND MUST BE STARVED
Soulfire welded the next Hell below Chambers’ form. A ripple formed below the impaled phoenix and the blazing avian looked down. “Shit, consang. I take it back: Burning chicken’s got some kick to it.”
Finishing, Avo checked the progress of his resurrection and winced. He had slowed it to the slowest pace possible, but time was still slipping away. He wouldn’t have enough time to review everyone in depth.
RESURRECTION: 56%
Interfacing with Draus and Essus, he considered what else he could do. He knew the Twice-Walker’s capabilities and considered adding additional canons to it. It would take a thousand and two thaums per cycle to fuel the Twice-Walker, and every little bit fed to it was something Avo wouldn’t have for himself.
Ghouls were selfish creatures, but this was not a moment to fixate on his share of flesh. The more important factors were in what more he could graft.
Draus stopped him. “Avo. Stop. You’re wasting time. Do what you know with what you got. Me, Essus, and Chambers are gonna be support anyhow. None of us are properly trained for this, but you’ve been a ‘Clad the longest. Don’t burn your time on me or Essus–I know Jhred’s Heaven already and I got some ideas, so you graft yourself up first while I try to get help Essus figure out what he can do. After we get back to the real, we can link minds and see where we’re at.”
That was all the permission he needed. Digging into Essus Frame momentarily, Avo scanned the Gate of the Passing Dark and understood it to be a spatial Heaven of some kind that could warp bind points in reality and twist geometries.

Before he returned his attention to himself, he flared his Soul and distributed a surfeit of thaums to each of the other Frames - it would serve as ample cushion against any potential dangers.
(DRAUS) TWICE-WALKER - 1002 THAUM/c
(ESSUS) GATE OF THE PASSING DARK - 880 THAUM/c
(CHAMBERS) LUSHBURNER - 100 THAUM/c
That left him with three thousand five hundred and one echoes of circling Essence. Three thousand five hundred and one deaths nourishing him. It felt more than he remembered taking from the other Godclads.
How much of this came from his foes? How much were accidental procurements from collateral damage? With how the day had gone, he could no longer be certain.
Tearing his thoughts away from such considerations, he returned his focus to his own Heavens and processed his next steps.
Again, complexity was unwise right now. He needed something to add to his effectiveness–to augment him and make him more. Considering his successes and vulnerabilities displayed from recent engagements, what he needed quickly became clear to him.
The Woundshaper was his primary instrument, excelling in close quarters against targets tied to physical matter. What it lacked was omnidirectional movement, range, and the ability to battle against more asymmetric adversaries.
He needed something that could make him faster–more unpredictable. He was at his best when he was ambushing or skirmishing. And as he was looking for something to facilitate just that, his attention fell upon the Fulgerhund, and inspiration struck like a bolt of lightning.

HEAVEN - [FULGERHUND]
DOMAIN: (LIGHTNING/MATTER)
THAUMIC REQUIREMENTS - 51 THAUM/c
The Stormtree “Fulgerhund” is assigned a mixed Porter/Breaker designation in most Knots. Though lightly armored and absent numerous defensive and offensive systems present in modern golems, it continues to be a mainstay of both Stormtree forces and Fallwalkers.
Autonomously jocked through the Nether in most cases, the volatile power system connected to twin microfusion reactors is more a feature than a bug. Likewise, the pace at which it can accrue Rend is another layer to its eventual functions.
Striding across the battlefield from lightning bolt to lightning bolt, the Fulgerhund is a fast-assault transport for special operations groups, but more often its interior will be filled with expendable drones and mechs while it continues transmitting information back to the main elements of the Knot.

Other than serving as a Porter, the Fulgerhund can continue serving as a forward operating scout, or can start striking exposed or overextended elements of the opposition's forces. Though it can project electricity out to a limited range, the main method of attack is to shuttle matter across vast distances using lightning as a movement vector.
A final use for the Fulgerhund is as a “techno-thaumic” improvised explosive. This usually culminates with the golem at Rend Capacity, upon which they will stride in rapid succession until they rupture, and at that point, overload its power system to set off its fusion reactors. The resulting devastation is sometimes called “unzipping” due to how the lightning interacts with the detonation of a makeshift hydrogen bomb.
-Nether-stream, Arsenal of the Spreading Fracture
10-30
Cadre (II)
DOMAIN OF (LIGHTNING)
CANON: BOLTSTRIDE - THE MASTER OF THIS CANON CAN TRANSMUTE THEIR PHYSICAL MATTER INTO AND THEN TRAVEL AS A BOLT OF LIGHTNING; EACH STRIDE IS LIMITED TO A RADIUS OF FIFTEEN MILES BEFORE THE CANON HAS TO BE REINVOKED
HUBRIS: ATTEMPTING TO STRIDE WHEN WEIGHING IN EXCESS OF ONE HUNDRED AND TWENTY TONS WILL RESULT IN THAUMIC BACKLASH
DOMAIN OF (MATTER)
CANON: STORMWREATHED - THE MASTER OF THIS CANON CAN TEMPORARILY CONVERT MATTER INTO A MANTLE OF ELECTRICITY
HUBRIS: IF THE CONVERTED MANTLE IS SUBMERGED, IT WILL RESULT IN THAUMIC BACKLASH
Two canons.
Two hubris.
Countless implications.
For all the fleeing he did through Nu-Scarrowbur, his Galeslither was too vulnerable to interdiction from other spatial Heavens. His Woundshaper, on the other hand, was a little more than lacking when facing threats not of the overly physical variety.
Should the Fulgerhund be added to his current design he was curious as to how fast he could move when binding Boltstride to his already present canon of Haemokinesis.
The Stormwreathed canon was comparatively a lesser prize, but would allow him to trespass the borders between matter and energy, and thus a means of averting from the Strider’s cleaving light.
RESURRECTION - 71%
“Familiar,” the Woundshaper said, studying the Fulgerhund as the light-stitched warg drifted before them. “In a time before… in the times when we were once whole… we were of a pantheon. Of this, I speak certain. Now, we are all remade by lesser hands; mongrel bastards to our own lore.”
Avo regarded the words of the old god. “Will you join with it?”


The Woundshaper scoffed. “Of course. It would be absurd to abandon growth; purebred is another word for inbred, after all. Come. Come. Let us mantle the hound upon my spire. Let the stuff of storms serve us as mortar to my bricks.”
Soulfire needled through the Fulgerhund and drew it into the Woundshaper. Brightness built between them and with their joining did the insides of Avo’s Frame come alight.
When the smelting was complete, the Woundshaper spread into shape again. Arteries forked free from its structure in surging bolts. The shell of the Heaven, always an alloy of properties, now coursed with dancing arcs of electricity. Static-shrouded fur swayed low from the spire and the full maw of a snarling warg rose where once there were only jaws.
The Woundshaper thrummed with a current of excitement while its Hell grew blurred and strained.
Avo would need to boost the Hell as well. Presently, there remained potential yet for his Heaven.
HEAVEN - WOUNDSHAPER
DOMAIN: (BLOOD/MATTER/BIOLOGY/LUMINOSITY/LIGHTNING)
THAUMIC REQUIREMENTS - 501 THAUM/c
It held a decent mass to it, but he could inject more canons. Much more, if he were to go broad. He had over two thousand and five thaums of available structure left should he balance his Woundshaper’s Hell. Keeping a gulf of hundred or so thaums between his ontologics and maximum Frame capacity seemed wise.
As things went, the Woundshaper was an instrument of intrusion, destruction, and creation. With the Fulgerhund added, the chemicals of maneuverability and energy have been added to the concoction.
Now he needed more scale and control. More influence. More speed.
Unmaking one of the Sangeists, he drew forth its twin domains and offered that which was blood to the Heaven. He intended to enhance his Canon of Haemokinesis even more.
Alas, intent and ability were easily derailed.
INSUFFICIENT THAUMIC MASS TO ACHIEVE DESIRED MIRACLE
REQUIREMENTS: SIXTH-SPHERE LIMINAL FRAME
A pity. The Woundshaper did not bear the thaumic mass to allow the desired augmentation. The upgrade would have turned the multiplicative properties of the canon into exponential. Joined with Boltstride, the world might as well remain unmoving in perpetuity.
RESURRECTION - 79%
“Master, my suggestion, if you would heed me,” the Woundshaper said. “Our time is short and the threat remains. Instill me with a canon of grander scope. Our greatest limitation to full manifestation is the tactile. Grant me something that allows broader influence over my environment.”
Words heeded, Avo directed the domain sigil toward another use. The Frame ran its simulations and options danced across his gaze. He filtered fast and set his requirements high. He needed to expand his influence, as the Woundshaper requested. Something that would allow him greater influence over his environment.
He found it in little time.
CANON: SANGUINITY’S REIGN (III) - THE MASTER OF THIS CANON CAN SPREAD THE ONTOLOGY OF THE HEAVEN INTO A BROADCAST OF HAEMOKINETIC MIST THAT WILL ALLOW THE MASTER TO DIRECTLY MANIPULATE ALL DOMAINS WITHIN ITS SPHERE OF INFLUENCE; THE BROADCAST’S SPHERE OF INFLUENCE IS DETERMINED BY A BASE OF TWELVE AND A HALF SQUARE MILES MULTIPLIED BY THE MASTER’S CURRENT TONNAGE
HUBRIS: ATTEMPTING TO MOVE AN MANIPULATE AN EXCESS OF EIGHTY TONS AT ONCE WILL TRIGGER THAUMIC BACKLASH
HEAVEN - WOUNDSHAPER
DOMAIN: (BLOOD/MATTER/BIOLOGY/LUMINOSITY/LIGHTNING)
THAUMIC REQUIREMENTS - 825 THAUM/c
Quite useful, though costly in thaums. The continued limitation of his Woundshaper’s physical weight also inspired his annoyance. That was another thing bottlenecking his potential–the limitation placed on his total tonnage. If he could see that removed, his attributes would spike significantly. Yet, try though he might with his domains, the hubris seemed to come in relation to the canons themselves, each molding somewhat in relation to another.
He would need to mend Kae’s mind after this as soon as possible. It would not do for him to suffer enchainment from within.
Installing Sanguinity’s Reign, veins of ebbing red spread from the spire and pulsed out from above the Woundshaper, electricity coursing through it in periodic instants. The new aesthetic shared some resemblance to a Ghostjack, and the comparison pleased Avo substantially.
Thereafter, he moved on to the aspect of matter and deepened the number of matter patterns he could store within his being, but froze as he studied the newest addition to his collection.

The markings symbolizing tungsten and locus were clear and stable structures. The mini-nuke, however, was a mess of different strings coiling in on itself. It looked like multiply layered scribbles pressed over one another.
“What’s this?”
“I am uncertain as well, master,” the Woundshaper replied. “I am unable to fully channel its nature in coherence. Shamefully, I have not ever tasted such materials.”
Avo paused. Zein wanted him to subsume the mini-nuke for some reason, but with her absence, he found himself confounded by why. The Woundshaper knowing nothing of fissile materials or fusion bomb components was not a surprise. It was a god of a bygone age, and these were only recent offerings granted by Voidwatch to their Terrestrial associates.
He sighed. Such was a problem for a later time. The time of his return was nearing, and he still needed to deal with the Galeslither afterward.
Thankfully, the choice for matters canon was a simple one. The Remembrance of Matter Canon yet had more tiers to its ascension, and Avo gladly offered it the bounty needed to propel it above the current bottleneck.
CANON: REMEMBRANCE OF MATTER (III) - THE MASTER OF THIS DOMAIN CAN NOW PERMANENTLY REMEMBER ALL PATTERNS OF PHYSICAL MATTER IT HAS SUBSUMED; THAUMIC MASS COST FOR EACH REMEMBERED PATTERN HAS BEEN REDUCED BY A TENTH; ADDITIONALLY, ALL SUBSUMED STRUCTURES OF WILL BE REMEMBERED WITHOUT COST.
HEAVEN - WOUNDSHAPER
DOMAIN: (BLOOD/MATTER/BIOLOGY/LUMINOSITY/LIGHTNING)
THAUMIC REQUIREMENTS - 1042 THAUM/c
As he affixed another layer upon his pre-existing canon, his Woundshaper shuddered. His Frame quaked. The cage of orbiting patterns deepened into a nebula between the jaws of the warg. Faint traces of each pattern drifted through the Woundshaper, the indelible scripture of matter rushing through like white blood cells.
With all he added to his Heaven, there was still his Hell to consider. Parting the last Sangeist he had in his system, he added the domain of matter to his Hell, deliberating between its two canons before he settled on the barrage.
CANON: THE BARRAGE OF THE WITHERED (III) - LAUNCHES AN ENTROPIC CONSTRUCT FROM THE MASTER BEARING THE SIZE, SPEED, AND SHAPE OF THE WOUNDSHAPER AT MAXIMUM POTENTIAL WHICH CAN THEN BE CONTROLLED AND GUIDED; ALL PHYSICAL MATTER WILL BE AFFECTED ASIDE FROM THE MASTER - THIS CANON IS ABSOLUTE
HELL - [FOURTH CIRCLE] - WOUNDSHAPER
DOMAIN: (MATTER/ENTROPY)
THAUMIC REQUIREMENTS - 1042 THAUM/c
RESURRECTION - 91%
Together, that would put his Woundshaper over the two thousand thaum mark, making him greater in ontologic weight compared to those he faced. Good. He needed to move onto his Galeslither now. He wanted to elevate its Hell past the Third Circle, at the least.
He could still install the Lushburners to the Woundshaper, but considering its branching domains and how easy it was for other Heavens of space to strike at it, a strange feeling inside Avo told him he didn’t want to overextend until he figured out what he was doing.
“We are arisen, master,” the Woundshaper cackled, as he shifted over to the Galeslither. “Already, I sense my current gnosis far vaster than the pebble I was in history. How kind a fate to be enchained to you toward higher apotheosis. How kind a fate…”
The Galeslither was comparatively a simpler job.
The Yondergales, though immensely useful for tasks that required a subtler touch, were easy to paradox by other spatial canons. There seemed to be a vulnerability shared among canons of the demiplanar variety - an incongruence against other geometry or correspondence-altering miracles.
Such a thing needed to be avoided, but he still wanted to keep a Heaven suited toward the clandestine.
To that end, the joining was simple.
The Galeslither chuffed to life once more as Soulfire swept the Shadowcrawler close. An ink-black serpent sank beneath the flesh of the steed as two Heavens were joined. From beside galloping hooves burst the chitinous legs of clambering insects, and from storm-scarred ribs oozed a man of midnight black.
Avo continued working even as the Heaven gasped and awareness flickered awake within it like a candle.
“Ah,” the Wounshaper said, clicking her nonexistent tongue. “The mule awakens. Though mule is no longer a term so apt for you, is it.”The head of the centermost horse had turned chimeric, blending into a creature fused between serpent and stallion. The Galeslither–or that which it became–spoke in hushed whispers like its words passed through enshadowed alleys by the midnight breeze. “Where… where are we… what… what are these…”
“Still yourself. You wake anew. We are bound for greater and grander things now.”“I don’t understand… I was… I needed to deliver… The patheon tasked me to bring wind and rain…”“That is the past now, kindred. There are pantheons no more, but a new game has taken its place–a new ladder towards ascension.”
DOMAIN OF (SHADOW)
CANON: BLACKDIVER - THE MASTER OF THIS DOMAIN CAN COMMAND AND SINK INTO SHADOWS, MANIPULATING IT LIKE A PUDDLE OF WATER; ONLY–
Avo wasted no time. He smelted down another Shadowcrawler and added its domains to his current canons.
CANON: BLACKDIVER (III) - THE MASTER OF THIS DOMAIN CAN COMMAND AND SINK INTO SHADOWS, MANIPULATING IT LIKE A PUDDLE OF WATER; ALL SHADOWS TOUCHED BY THE MASTER WITHIN A DIVE PERIOD ARE NOW CONSIDERED TO BE ONTOLOGICALLY UNIFIED, ALLOWING THE MASTER TO SURFACE FROM ANY SHADOW THEY HAVE DESCENDED
HUBRIS: IF ALL SHADOWS CURRENTLY CONTAINING THE MASTER ARE PURGED, IT WILL TRIGGER THAUMIC BACKLASH
Darkness flowed free from the open chasm of the Galeslither’s chest. The winds took on an increasingly wet quality. He fed the Heaven with two Domains of Space and let that expand as well.
DOMAIN OF (SPACE)
CANON: ABYSSAL COVE (II) - THE MASTER OF THIS DOMAIN CAN BIND A DEMIPLANE TO A SPECIFIC SHADOW AND USE IT TO STORE ITEMS OF SOLID MATTER; THE SIZE OF THE DEMIPLANE IS 100 FEET DEEP ADDED TO THE DISTANCE THE MASTER CAN TRAVEL WITHIN A SECOND
HUBRIS: LIQUIDS CANNOT BE STORED WITHIN THE COVE OR IT WILL TRIGGER THAUMIC BACKLASH
HEAVEN - [GALESLITHER]
DOMAIN: (AIR/SPACE/SHADOW)
THAUMIC REQUIREMENTS - 430 THAUM/c
Whorling fluids mingled with currents of wind. The Galeslither twisted and turned. “What’s… happening to me?”“Growth,” the Woundshaper answered. “Ascension.”
Finally, he unmade the detached Second Circle drifting through his being into its baseline components and applied the procured domain to his current Hell. He manifested no new canons for he didn’t see the need–the Halt canon had proven to be one of the best things about the Galeslither.
It proceeded to get much better.
CANON: HALT OF THE PASSING (III) - THE MASTER OF THIS DOMAIN CAN NOW ENCHAIN ALL VISIBLE ACTORS AND OBJECTS TRAVELING THROUGH SPACE WITH STASIS AND DRAIN THEM OF THEIR VECTORS OF MOMENTUM UNTIL THE NECESSARY REND IS BALANCED - THIS CANON IS ABSOLUTE
DAEMON: IF THE POCKET IS OVERFILLED BEFORE IT CAN BURST, THE RESULTING RUPTURE WILL BIRTH AN ANATHEMA OF RUIN TO SERVE AS THE MASTER’S ANATHEMA; THE ANATHEMA CANNOT BE SLAIN AND MUST BE STARVED
HELL - [THIRD CIRCLE] - GALESLITHER
DOMAIN: (AIR/ENTROPY)
THAUMIC REQUIREMENTS - 430 THAUM/c
RESURRECTION - 99%
Even with all his improvements, he still had over six hundred thaums left to fill. But time held its own demands. Avo could already feel fingers of eldritch bright prying him away from his Galeslither as he was slowly injected back into reality.
“Avo,” Draus said. He could see her through the threads of light swallowing him now. “When you get back out, get loud. We’ll find you. Got some ideas about how we can run this–how we might be able to handle Abrel.”

He wanted to respond, but his transition came suddenly and without warning.
The Woundshaper laughed. The Galeslither rattled inside him, like a terrified animal trapped in the stables of a sinking ship.
From death they rose, and as light shed itself along his eyes, he found existence around him as flame-touched as the subreality which housed his Soul.
What? The hypertube ruptured? [Stifled groan] Where… where are they… How the hells did they manage to jack a lightrail? The Nether’s down! Traffic grid’s infested with mem-cons! And what’s the point of rupturing it? The Sovereignty will notice immediately and pocket–agh!
You know what, no questioning anything anymore. Let’s just assume these–uh–consangs of ours here have a few sequences missing–
A Sphere-Four Liminal Frame–where did that Sphere Four come from? Okay. Okay. Naeko, stop asking questions, you’re just going to get mad–we’re trying to stay calm this year. Calm.
[Deep exhale]
WARNING: DAEMON DETECTED
->DOMAIN: [WATER]
[Pause]
Jaus… just… Jaus.
[Sigh] Have to dam this flood before this ends in a cascade of Fallen Heavens.
-Chief Paladin Naeko
10-31
Cadre (III)
ONTOLOGY REVERTED
RESURRECTION COMPLETED
DOMAIN RESPAWN ENGAGED
ENGAGING THAUMIC CYCLER: 3501 THAUM/c
LOADING PHANTASMICS…
Light is not meant to shatter into fissuring streams upon the chassis of existence, but when a lightrail is destroyed mid-transit and beams itself out from cracked lenses lining a hypertube, metaphysics gets a bit murky.
Flickering back into existence from a speckle of blood, Avo found himself standing on tubes he once traveled within as the world drowned under a cacophony of discordant noises. Flames roared. The wind squealed from all points graced by the fissuring luminosity. Distant sirens mingled with aero engines spinning hard at maximum thrust.
Something speared through the winds. Something was just about to–
He touched the falling debris before it smashed into him. Reflex took hold where thought lagged. His Celerostylus swelled and time slowed. His haemokinetic mist came aglow as electricity arced through the moisture and the Canon of Haemaefication was invoked.
The debris melted into a shower of red, and Avo snatched the blood out from the air with a thought. Near ten tons of alloy, plastics, silicon, and other substances new to his Woundshaper sparked through his ontology. Suddenly, the structural aesthetic of the wreck became known to him: He just unmade a destroyed assault drone.
His senses yawned wider as his mass grew, spreading across countless other material patterns beyond it thereafter. The world around him expanded into a shape beyond even the reach of his vision. He could feel things miles beyond as his Heaven washed over the real. Presently, he found himself suspended over a vast crevice leading down to Layer Three, the section of tubes he halted on miles between two different districts.
As his mind cleared and focus took hold, the presence of his Woundshaper furled outward as a nigh-transparent film of haemokinetic mist. The last drips of blood from the liquefied drone evaporated into the wavelength of his broadcast.
Impact trajectories pulsed red as flechettes cut out for him from afar. The projectiles came, and when they transgressed into his ontological borders, were unwoven in shape and structure both before they could arrive.
The Canon of Sangunity’s Reign was like having a shapeless hand that could clutch everything around you in its palm. Yet, what it grasped was metaphysical, and what he felt were things bearing symmetry to his Woundshaper’s portfolio of domains.
His tactile senses swelled from feet to miles while his Phys-Sim screamed as ghosts surged into it, his cog-feed adjusting to before the spiking number of sequences required to estimate all that was happening around him.
There were hundreds of drones cutting through the skies and below him, and from those hundreds of drones spilled scything beams and darting flechettes. Hundreds of drones, and then substantially less as a wing of light swept through them.
Shrapnel plunged down like descending hail. This time, Avo consciously interacted with them. His cog-feed counted eight hundred and ninety-four thousand pieces traveling through the expanse of his influence. With a thought, he dissolved all of them as well, drinking in their mass.
Matter, light, blood, biology, and lighting. Aspects of existence felt were alight within the purviews of his mind. The metaphor changed.
Sanguinity’s Reign was not hand–Sanguinity’s Reign was like resting something upon his tongue and–when his canons allowed it–deciding to chew.
REND CAPACITY [WOUNDSHAPER]: 1%
Surpassing twenty tons of weight in a near instant, the stretch of his awareness doubled. Before he could locate his allies more drones flooded in, coming not as a swarm but as organized squadrons. With twenty-four drones per group, the diamond-shaped aerial assault platforms maintained equidistant spaces within their units and between the broader formations as a whole. As flecks of blood dug into them, Avo felt the shapes of strange squid-like mechs chambered within their cockpits–artificial pilots a necessity now that the Nether was down.
Mechs. That meant these were deployed by Voidwatch. Or Omnitech. More likely the latter considering his Phys-Sim had them moving at just over Mach Two. The former would probably have something entirely automated and far beyond the range of even his current awareness.
WARNING: SPATIAL ANOMALIES DETECTED
Volumetric reality shimmered, and distant geometries twisted. Hundreds of distant-seeming aerial platforms turned right in unison, and suddenly they were within a six-mile radius from him, descending into his grasp.
With their arrival came additional warning klaxons. Avo’s cog-feed grew cluttered with highlighted entries and issues of concern. A dozen new Heavens were detected and his Frame offered what details he could glean.
Disquietly, they moved like blots of absence upon the tapestry of his perception. Multiple space-related Heavens hid newly arriving Godclads or a Knot of golems contained within block-sized inverted delta that propelled themselves with a stream of prismatic exhaust.
Eight spatial signatures popped into his awareness and hundreds of newer drones slipped free from each flat surface of the demiplanar deltas. Light cleaved and shifted through the fissures without trouble. A concentrated intersection of projectile fire helped Avo trace Abrel’s position.
The Strider was slashing its way through the veil of heavy rain. The water above was imbued with the hue of ethereal luminosity and beyond the clouds thundered revelrous melodies from the peaks of the Tiers unseen.
The daughter of House Greatling faced an ocean of foes alone, cutting, thrusting, dissolving, and always moving in a ballet of combat, her form a dichotomous visage of sight-piercing brightness grown from clouds of smoke.
At the moment he noticed her, at the moment his haemokinetic mist brushed through her being, their Frames rattled against each other again, and Soulfire struck Soulfire. Perceptions met and she froze for but a fraction of a second, turning to present with him the fullness of her hate.
The Woundshaper quivered in excitement. The Galeslither, overwhelmed by its return to existence, found its attention jumping from moment to moment, the chaos overwhelming its attention.
“What… need is there for me…” the Galeslither whispered. “The skies are no longer mine alone. So much metal… and space–so crumpled. What has become of us?”
The Woundshaper snorted. “Defeat, kindred. These are the fruits of our subjugation. From them, we will grow anew.”As space began to crumple in around her, she flicked a wing out at him. Her speed remained beyond his despite his risen tonnage, but where once he was left with no choice but to endure her onslaught, now he had other options.
He invoked his Domain of Lightning for the first time, and the sinew of storms forked free from his flowing arteries, burrowing beneath the metaphysical flesh of existence like spreading roots.
In tandem with Sanguinity’s Reign, the expansive weave cast by the hypertube’s shattered light came into form within his mind’s eye as if his DeepNav was still running.
He stepped and felt the totality of his being stretch far. The world did not slow further, but when he dashed, his velocity covered entire miles within fractions of an instant. He plotted his movements and snaked his crimson currents between cracks of eldritch brightness.

A squadron of drones broke formation–desperate to avoid Abrel’s descending swipe. Two crossed through the fissures spread out from the tubes. Their chassis, then, was peeled clean as the light funneled their matter through flowing pathways toward horizons unglimpsed.
The other drones survived but a moment longer as the Woundshaper drank them out of existence from stride to stride. Omens of lightning speared from drone to drone as sound broke and the air came afire with friction. With each relay of acceleration, the Woundshaper grew, and within a second, it climbed to its full mass as Avo let the excess blood wash over him.
This was an expression of power he hadn’t known. Beast, mind, and Heavens all found themselves united in common pleasure.
It was a thrill to break. It was a thrill to dive free through the skies.
REND CAPACITY [WOUNDSHAPER]: 24%
The Rend Boltstride generated, however, was alarming. Even with a Fourth Circle, each vectored thrust filled his capacity by increments nearing a full percent.
Not that it didn’t make sense. Kae had told him once about the cost being scope and vulgarity. At eighty tons, transmuting oneself into surging bolts of electricity while retaining mass and size caused reality to scream. Inertia fought to keep its nails buried within Avo, but altering the vector of his next stride was as simple as angling his foot.
Falcons soared through the air and Abrel rematerialized six hundred feet away from him. With both their Heavens completely manifested, it was absurd to realize this was knife-fighting range for both of them and that some of the dynamic from their earlier scuffle in the lightrail carried over.
But with each burst of moment time slowed and tides of apocalyptic fire spread through the world. The advantage in speed tilted further and further in favor of Avo. Her wings split through the fissuring cracks of light as if they weren’t there. But she swung. She jabbed. She slashed. There was a prelude to each moment–like her wings were blade strokes.
Even within the lattice of the hypertube rupture, all Avo needed to do was move, and move again.
As her attacks carved through the space he once occupied, he strode twice. The first allowed him to squeeze through a crevice of unaffected space and arrive sixty feet just behind her. The second started from an angle where his path was unobstructed.
She followed where he was and could feel his presence behind her. But knowledge was not capability and nothing–not even the brightening of her wings–could have stopped him from tearing into her with storm and Rend prepared.
Nothing but another unexpected Heaven.
Reality twitched at the same moment Avo jumped. He dove out as a lashing stream of storm-stuff, yet glanced away from her–twisting hard and right. More interestingly, the light emanating from her wings suffered the same way, as did the smoke, as did the wind, as did the movement of every drone around them.
Twice again did he try to jump back toward the Strider and twice again he ricocheted further rightward. It was as if the act of moving left was all but impossible.
Scars of shattered brightness spread out before him like a lattice.
Avo forked himself through an opening as lightning unstitched and then restitched his form back together in strips and splashes.
Then, suddenly, he felt his Sangunity sinking inside one of the prismatic deltas like it was a sinkhole he could dip a finger into.
At five hundred feet in height, each of the four facets comprising the demiplanar construct led into a separate pocket containing a different golem. Their matter and forms were myriad, with some corresponding to his touch while others wafted between his fingertips like water. One, in particular, caught his attention–one that felt like a gnarled anchor curving rightward when he skimmed his mists through it.
He took a chance. He liquefied it with a thought and let the blood run free where it may. Relief settled through his structure. An unseen grip slackened from reality’s throat. The sides of the delta turned opaque as the construct accelerated toward him in an explosion of motion.
Avo aimed another stride and put himself at the full fifteen miles it offered. He cast himself out and his perception tunneled. His lightning traveled the entire distance within a fraction of a fraction a second. Drones around him disintegrated outright as he left a trail of erupting fire that twitched upon the surface of reality.
Yet, as soon as he poured himself back into physical shape, he found the delta the same distance away from him and closing. Avo fought the urge to sigh. Abrel’s equation was mostly solved, but as usual with New Vultun, new problems like introducing themselves without courtesy.
Prismatic light erupted from the tip of the delta as it drew closer, swimming through fissuring obstacles left by the hypertube rupture without worry.
Avo strode twice more but found himself unable to outrun his pursuer. It was like their distances were tethered to an absolute number while all other moving bodies were variable. His cog-feed came alight with colors and sounds, warning of more spatial anomalies.
REND CAPACITY [WOUNDSHAPER]: 49%
New drones spilled out into existence from the various deltas, and Avo felt their numbers swell well past the ten-thousand count within the hundred-and-sixty-mile stretch of awareness provided by Sanguinity’s Reign.
Brushing them with his domains, he felt aspects of blood, biology, and matter emanate from within them most of all. Their aesthetic was bee-like with a hint of cyberization, and the chitin looked like the armor on Draus’ new bio-rig. Not drones, then. Bioforms. Swarm bioforms.
He recalled vicarities of runs going sour in Sang territory. He would have seconds before the sky turned into a hive of flesh-grown missiles. If they couldn’t breach his form, they would undoubtedly try to cook him out by beating their wings at a heightened pace.
The real danger remained that which they spawned from. Even as he strode again, it inched into the five-hundred feet radius–too close for comfort now. He didn’t know what else it was capable of or what would happen should he let it touch him, but he wasn’t keen on finding out.
At least he wasn’t keen on using himself to find out.
He was going to need to find a way to get the delta to expose itself again. A thought trailed through his mind–could he use his Sanguity’s Reign to serve as localized Nether? The prospect ignited his focus even further as he cast his ghosts out.
All around him were options to select from–drones and humming bioforms galore. He splashed back into physical shape just above another stretch of the hypertube and immediately had to convert himself into electricity as a wide of slashing light cut through him.
Abrel was still fighting five miles eastward. How the deltas had not contained her yet he did not know.

He accelerated again and a thousand bioforms splattered in his wake.
Shaking the thought free, he activated his Ghostjack and tried to channel his phantasmics through waves of haemokinetic moisture brushing across the expanse. His ghosts emerged from his Metamind and injected themselves across illimitable motes of blood, using them as conduits.
Casting into a drone next to the delta pursuing him, Avo cracked their semi-adaptive wards using a mix of traumas and linked himself to its manually controlled locus. The pilot, coldtech machine that it was, tried to fight him ineffectually. Its cognition still gave off something vaguely similar to thoughtstuff when he brushed it, but interfacing with it gave him a static chill.
There was something alien about the mind of a thinking machine–the pathing of its sequences offering nothing for Avo to bury his claws into. He liquefied the mech and moved on.
Accessing the Wyvern-II Multifunction Assualt Platform, he directed it to approach the spatial construct chasing him.
As it drew within twenty feet of the delta, his broadcast wavelength waned and his connection began to fail. The drone itself folded and funneled into a facet of the delta’s face and vanished from his grasp.
Well. That was troubling. He didn’t want to be drained off to… wherever the drone went.
Shifting his thoughts, he turned his attention to his Galeslither and sought a place of shadows. Perhaps if he couldn’t avoid it materially, he would be able to escape as another aspect of space itself–
A squadron of drones vitrified and shattered into a sprawl of glass mere feet above the tubes. Three other signatures materialized into existence. He felt them strike his Frame the same way Abrel did. Draus stood alone, separated from Essus and Chambers by a distance of miles. Essus had spawned exactly where Avo did, while Chambers was currently falling from the sky, screaming as he emerged from plumes of fire spewing out of a failings drone’s engines.
Avo had a new idea. He had several new ideas.
Channeling his ghosts through his mists again, he created links between himself and his group.
His cadre.
As the delta closed past four hundred feet, he cast his intentions out to each of them.
+Draus. Need you to create a gateway for me and kill it right after.+
“Authority Greatling. There been a problem.”

“Jhred. He dead?”

“I–I’m not sure, Higher–that’s another problem altogether, I’m afraid. I’m talking about–”

[Sound of metal warping inward] “That godsdamned Vator. Who did he hurt this time–”

“Not… not Instrument Vator either, Higher. It’s… your daughter.”

“Abrel?”

“Yes.”

“Abrel.”

“Yes, Higher.”

“Are you sure?


“I’m positive, Higher. Instrument Abrel Greatling has been spotted at Mazza’s Junction, Nu-Scarrowbur, and then Akimaki in the Yuulden-Yang Sovereignty. She has engaged a rival cadre from Stormtree and there have been… casualties. Ruptures. A member of her cadre has met their final end.”

[Building shaking; rattling and breaking glass]

“... Authority?”

“Apologize–” [Deep exhale] “To the Ambassador on my behalf. Tell him that this is not meant as a slight on my part. Tell him that… personal matters have disrupted my plans.”


“Yes, Authority Greatling.”
-Authority Uthred Greatling, The Fire’s Height.
10-32
Cadre (IV)
Blooming out from his veins, the haemokinetic broadcast rippled in sync with the waves of his Metamind as ghosts flowed on pulses of blood.
Essus heeded the cast with a note of surprise while Draus simply responded. Slow as time was, her connection to her domains worked just like his. Godhood was not like a muscle to exercise, but a divine machine of feats and lore. The sprawl of glass she made from the shattered bodies of a drone squadron split into two.
One section speared high into the air while the other encased her in a reflective sheen, rendering her a taller, more insectoid-looking cousin to Mirrorhead. The shards of glass she flung into the air climbed at speeds nearing a hundred miles per hour.

For Avo, it might as well have not moved at all.

That was fine. He would go to it in just a moment.

First, he had to see to Chambers’ continued survival.

Mind blind in the throes of panic, Chambers was so preoccupied with howling his lungs out that Avo’s thoughtcast went unnoticed. Sinking into the man’s perception, the divided plates of Layer Three and the edges of a spatially quarantined district came into view as the ex-enforcer flailed against gravity. Terror stripping him of composure, the thought of manifesting his Heaven was a far one.

At least it was till Avo overwrote the man’s fear with an injection of artificial focus.

+Chambers. Listen. Activate Heaven. Get to Draus and Essus. Stick together–will convene with you all shortly.+

At his current speed, he would be able to perform countless actions before the ghosts finished delivering the information over. With Sanguinity’s Reign, the Nether lag was vastly diminished for reasons Avo wasn’t fully sure about, but he wasn’t going to complain.

Instead, he was going to continue using it to his advantage.

He strode twice, his being lengthened into stretching bolts of arterial lightning. He kept both movements random, deliberately confusing the pursuing delta while using his vectors to approach Draus’ rising screen of glass at an angle.

Thousands of aerial platforms disintegrated in the wake of his departure alone. The sheer energy generated from his acceleration turned the air around him into plasma. Winds cooked. Light exploded out of him. He refrained from pressing his speed to the fullest, but when an eighty-ton object ripped across existence at the baseline velocity of lightning, things broke.

The path he trailed unzipped a tide of destruction as entire stretches of drones simply vanished. Things within his path dissolved without a trace, while others sustained damage miles beyond the mist. Past the rings of immediate destruction, drones flattened into crumpled husks of alloy while bioforms smeared.

As shockwaves of force and fire rode through the sky, shapes disappeared from within the palm of his Sanguinity by the thousands in milliseconds. Euphoria twisted through every fibre of Avo’s being—the closest analogy would be the satisfying sensation of pressing one’s hand down on a nest of insects and feeling each bug’s individual thorax burst against your skin.
No ghosts nor thaums greeted him in this mock slaughter, but he thought back to his battle in Nu-Scarrowbur minutes ago.
Millions must have perished from the collateral damage alone there. Using some of them as the substance of his apotheosis, he had reached a place where a few strides might be able to inflict the same or greater harm than two Godclad cadres facing each other in open combat.
Little wonder why Godclads regarded the FATELESS as nothing. What could they do but die? What could they do against a power that could not be exhausted, that could not be denied?
His tungsten shell glowed red as the storm stuff faded from him like peeling paint.
Heat obfuscated the world, and the blow he cast against the atmosphere itself was still unfurling outward in a rising tide, swaying the surrounding fliers into fissuring streams of light.

His Phys-Sim fed him two warnings: The delta remained behind him, closing to two hundred and fifty feet, while another snapped into shape behind him. On top of his two pursuers, he felt the sudden manifestation of more patterns of matter.

Something large was pushing its way through the rain. Channeling his Whisper into the mists that coursed from him, he directed his perception nearly eighty miles eastward from where they came and saw the Highflame Aegis swimming through the falling rain. In accompaniment with Abrel’s last surviving ally, his cog-feed registered three hundred more spatial distortions forming within the thousand-mile stretch of awareness provided by Sanguinity’s Reign while he was at full mass.

More problems by the second. They needed to get gone, and get gone soon.

Twin flashes of light tore open the flesh of reality. Above where Draus once stood, a constellation of gleaming shards assembled, slowly fusing into the shape of the Twice-Walker. A little more than three hundred feet away, in a yet congested section of the airways, the screen Avo requested she turn into a gateway came alight as well.

It was ready.

Time to see if the deltas could still track him even after he cut them off geometrically from his tail.

Lightning coursed through his vessel. At the top of his spire, the warg-head snarled with thunderous delight. He traveled like a spear flung from beyond the veil of the sky to smite the earth down to bedrock and core. Space around him blurred. He emerged from his stride just before he slipped through the threshold of the reflection. A glimpse brushed his notice as he beheld what awaited him on the other side. Hails of gauss-flung ordinance and biological missiles dove out to strike Draus. Touching the fight briefly with his Sanguinity, he felt her make glass of all that was solid and let all that wasn’t pass through her.

Out through the tunnel came a river of firepower. A river that choked and parted before the Woundshaper’s post-hypersonic approach.

REND CAPACITY [WOUNDSHAPER]: 54%

He emerged from the Twice-Walker as a concussive tunnel blasted out from her gateway. Immediately, he set about casting a new message at her, but the gateway closed the moment he left the threshold and re-entered reality.

He didn’t even get to see the demiplanar nature of the interior this time. Not that he was complaining. The deltas had lost track of him–and were breaking off as Abrel’s shadowy falcons coiled along the tubes.

Avo turned all attacking entities within a mile of him and Draus into blood. Again, it was like feeling every single bug die personally before his touch all at once. The sky was a moving cage filled with shrapnel and dancing bodies, naught but the golems, the drones, and the tube brushing against the outline of Avo’s mind.

REND CAPACITY [WOUNDSHAPER]: 57%

The beast choked on pleasure, not even aware that they weren’t killing any actual people. Just the sheer scope of the violence titillated it to the very precipice of its ability to feel.

Blood mingled with the falling rain. Red splashed down the dancing pieces of the Twice-Walker, hovering with an ease that the Woundshaper didn’t have the canons for. He wondered why its Hyalokinesis allowed it to exert influence over range while he was limited to the tactile at baseline.

A tide of concentrated fire split an opening through a few distant drones. Six hundred feet away, a blazing phoenix studded with bursting seeds spilling into sprawling canopies of lushness approached. It looked as if the pyrokinetic avian was pierced by a trident of charred almonds, and from below the wood expanding into existence behind it, fire plumed free from where the roots were meant to be, allowing it to soar.
Bioforms and vines and leaves were burned into the fabric of existence from its quavering flames, and with the winding path it left in the air, Avo could practically taste the joy bleeding out of Chambers.

This was the freest the man had ever felt. Avo drew Chambers’ memories into his Metamind.

Something flung open beside them like an open door. Reality stuttered, and five feet away, twin flaps of obsidian flung wide as a ninety-foot-tall doorway made from the blackest ebony opened and opened again, projecting itself forward as Essus struggled to comprehend his new form. Each “step” he took reloaded his location in reality, and he left threaded fractals behind him.

Avo could feel more drones turning into them, but his cadre had assembled. Now, it was time for his other ideas. He didn’t know how long he had until the Paladins started arriving. He–

Something inside him shivered with delight, and the Woundshaper responded in kind. What if he waited for the Paladins to come? From the Galeslither, however, came only disbelief. “We are at the center of madness… the winds run unnaturally… we must be away from this place…”
Avo ignored his second Heaven. What if he found their taste to be most palatable as well? Something distant inside him twitched and struggled against his aroused hunger. They couldn’t linger here.

A shard of glass inched slowly into his awareness, pulling him back from the reverie of imagined bloodshed. Nether-lag cracked in the back of his mind as the first bits of mem-data trickled over from Draus.

And there was another problem he had to solve—communications. Right now, at his tonnage limit, his speed was leagues beyond the others. He could release some of his mass and speak to them, but that would just leave them all vulnerable.

Presently, however, he understood what Draus asked of him.

Reaching out with a tendril, he took the glass shard from her grasp and added the patterns of its matter to his Canon of Remembrance.

HEAVEN - WOUNDSHAPER

DOMAIN: (BLOOD/MATTER/BIOLOGY/LUMINOSITY/LIGHTNING)

THAUMIC REQUIREMENTS - 1044 THAUM/c

Two additional thaums. Not bad.

Parts of his slatted design developed a more reflective sheen. His new armor caught the glint of an encroaching tide of rushing explosions bearing down on them as an avalanche from two miles away. Judging from its trail, these blasts were likely caused by his strides.

Ah. If it wasn’t his old consang, unforeseen consequences.
He spread himself wide and round like a bunker, around his allies. Yet, halfway through his haemokinetic shapeshifting, he felt a most dissonant sensation as Draus sank into him. Right. The Twice-Walker had a canon that let it do that. Didn’t it also have the ability to make a demiplanar pathway?

The answer came as some of his blood spilled into a loop; the Twice-Walker created a spatial passageway using itself and his Woundshaper as junctions.

“Ah,” the Woundshaper laughed. “The huntress has thought ahead. Most wise. Go, master. Go and pull the two burdens into our crossway. The Regular has solved several matters of concern concurrently.”
He didn’t need any further prompting. Reaching out to scoop both Essus and Chambers into the tunnel that shimmered past the surface of his gleaming blood, he found the former most elusive as they blinked from place to place while the latter made a mad dive for him even without prompting.

Ultimately, it was the Lushburner that descended beneath the ichor first while the Gate of the Passing Dark followed. As Avo performed a quick dash to arrive next to Essus, he found that flinging himself outward as lightning did nothing to impede the functionality of the Twice-Walker’s Liminal Paracosmos.

Essus’ Gate stepped one more time and, despite the vastness of its size, it ballooned into shape within Avo as well. Oddly, it seemed to materialize inside his internal passage with a stutter, slipping from one point in reality to another. With motes of blood running through the passageway via Sanguinity’s Reign, Avo confirmed the presence of his companions as Essus released himself from the form of his godhood and Chambers soared and dipped around Draus.

Finally, her message loaded.

+Channel this here glass and hang on. I got myself an idea ‘bout our problems. Right now, we ain’t a real cadre since we don’t got all that fancy learnin’ from Guilder school, but I think I have a way for us to get around the whole ‘separate and apart’ problem. Gonna create a pathway usin’ both of us as conduits. After, you can put Essus and the half-strand inside. Make it easier for us to pull a runner.+

She had some ideas of her own indeed.

The sensation of swelling power came to a jolting stop when he felt the first bomb shred through his broadcast. Others followed. Pockets formed in his awareness as Sanguinity’s Reign turned porous. Faintly, as more and more blindspots formed in his awareness, he touched one of the platforms responsible for countering him and found it similar to a Sangeist’s Rendsink.

An instant later, it came apart and ruptured, its contents twitching between mundane blood and alchemized fragments of matter.
The Rend within Avo’s system spiked. His cog-feed began to wail.

WARNING: REND DETONATIONS DETECTED
DOMAIN: [BLOOD]
REND CAPACITY [WOUNDSHAPER]: 71%... 74%... 76%

Immediately withdrawing Sanguinity's Reign to a limit of twenty miles, he strode as he began to make his escape through the opening of Layer Three.

Just as lightning began to jump through him, a translucent wall burst into existence over the opening he was aiming for. He altered his stride, dashing twice as he fled from the first signatures and entered the field of his reduced awareness.

Additional blasts followed. Blood plumed through the falling rain as the last of Avo’s crimson mist parted from existence. Suppose for influence that vast came a trade-off–if he could strike at distant domains using Sanguinity’s Reign, so too could it be done the opposite way around.

Another trickle of thoughts from Draus loaded. +They’re bringin’ out the Rend-bombs. They’ll eventually herd us out of the sky. Don’t bother jumpin’ around–Light’s End is on lockdown. Layer Three’ll be closed off. We need to find a secluded spot in a district somewhere. Go zero-burn or somethin’. Least that’s what the ‘Clads I fought with did when they wanted to go miss–.+

His attention drifted as rainwater congealed into the shape of the Aegis on the borders of his awareness. It was barely nineteen miles southeast of him, and it was currently swimming through the downpour, rivers of water running free.

And within the wetness, Avo felt another signature sing out to him–one he instantly recognized.

Abrel. Abrel who had escaped his grasp time and time again. Abrel, who drove him to break his determination of choice and elevate his allies to godhood. Abrel, who denied him a chance to savor her brother’s flesh.
Abrel, who was now floating unconscious, her body flickering in and out of existence as the falling rain formed junctions from the skies above, midnight rivers darting between forking cracks of light. As he focused, he noticed the fortress-like outline of the Aegis’ and noted the other Godclad funneling her out from the fray.
How auspicious this opportunity was, to be able to kill and devour an entire cadre. And just along the way of his escape, no less.

Hundreds of prismatic trails searched the space behind them from afar. Considerably fewer aerial platforms remained as tides of destruction continued to sweep through the wind. The chaos had given both cadres enough room to flee from the golems and emergency response teams, though their escape remained in question.

Another thing Avo did know was this: He could feel Abrel, but he couldn’t touch her or kill her using his Sanguinity. Not with the veil of water protecting her. Not without all her cyclers compromised.

So far away, the metaphysical ripples of Soulfire from his Frame didn’t reach far enough to give his position away as he watched the Aegis flee.

He took the opportunity. This was a chance for another two Souls and all the ontologics that came with them. A chance to remove two individuals that possessed knowledge of his capabilities.

Abrel had seen him kill Jhred, after all. There would be questions about where his Frame went. And how.

So, with his mind made and Rend-bombs slowly cascading inward towards his position, Avo strode twice more, diving into forking bolts as he struck the Aegis from behind.

He expected to shear the water from his foe—to utterly vaporize their ontological structure.

What he didn’t expect was to catch a full blast of Soulfire across his Frame as the Aegis snapped apart into two pieces.

The water around him froze and began falling back upward into the sky. All that flowed strained against forces unseen.

There, still alight with crackling currents running through his bloodstream, Avo found himself at the epicenter of a prolapsed dragon. To his left, the form of a man strained, and to his right, the structure of a water-made castle began to collapse.

WARNING: DAEMON DETECTED

->ASSOCIATED HEAVEN: [AEGIS OF TIDES] - THIRD SPHERE

->REND CAPACITY [AEGIS OF TIDES]: 98%

WATER METAPHYSICS UNRAVELLING

REND SPILLOVER DETECTED
No. Keep Zein where she is–Cas, listen, I don’t care what happened with her in the paths. Look–just look at this. Do you see this? Connect your Ansible to Sunrise and take a peek out from her eyes. You see this?
This isn’t a few thousand dead–we’re talking somewhere north of… a million. Mazza’s Junction–Nu-Scarrowbur… Does any of this look like collateral damage to you? Or does it look like the aftermath leftover from the Guild Wars?
Yes. Yes, I am blaming you. You should have told her no! You should have tried to stop her! She would kille–Cas, you’re a Godclad too. If you die, walk it off and go after her again. It’ll distract her from doing… whatever this is.
Repercussions? For her? None. She’ll just jump ahead in time–her fuck up, other people’s debt. Classic Zein-shit. Wonder what Jaus saw in that psychotic–
Right. Her plan to “frame Jhred Greatling and discredit the Chivalrics.” You know we could have just directly given the details to the ambassador, right? Don’t believe any of her bullshit–she did this because she wanted to. She did this because she’s playing at something else–she always is.
I’m closing my Hyperwave for now. I’m going to try and intercept our “recruits” before the Paladins bring them for questioning. You tell Voidwatch to–
WARNING: DAEMON DETECTED
->ASSOCIATED HEAVEN: [AEGIS OF TIDES] - THIRD SPHERE
->REND CAPACITY [AEGIS OF TIDES]: 98%
WATER METAPHYSICS UNRAVELLING
REND SPILLOVER DETECTED
WARNING: GODCLAD DETECTED
GODCLAD: SAMIR NAEKO
EIGHTH-SPHERE LIMINAL FRAME
Cas. I need to go. Keep. Her. There. She’s helped enough.
[TUNING ANSIBLE]
Aegis, hack Naeko’s feed and scrub everything you have on the package. Drop a pinpoint of their location for me. I think they’re hiding in the shadows of a block but I don’t remember which one–of course it’s not going to be enough. They’re not at Zero-Burn. The Chief Paladin’s going to make them immediately–I’ll just need to convince him that they belong to me.

Valerie out.
-Valerie Denton, Ninth Column
10-33
Fallout (I)
The instant the Woundshaper slammed down upon the Aegis like a hammer of blood and lightning upon a crumbling anvil made of parting water, the reality succumbed to the deformation of the latter’s Liminal Frame, and from whatever transgression was committed, the man came loose from his Heaven-turned-Daemon.
All that was bound by the Domain of Water was banished from Avo's vicinity, the exile of rain expanding from feet into miles. Another Godclad lay before him, partially flayed in ontology. The man–knocked free of his divinity, snapped taut on the sliding segments of the dragon slithering through him. Both the Heaven and he looked to share the same umbilical cord, and with each tug, the surrounding water shifted in directions random and strange.
It was like watching an unbirthing of man into a god.
Abrel, meanwhile, had gone missing with the water. He didn’t know if she was vaporized by the Woundshaper’s lightning-fast velocity unseaming the atmosphere in apocalyptic fire or merely snatched from the present location by the eldritch nature of the falling waters, but the result was the same.
She was gone in flesh and Frame. No presence of the physical or ontological varieties remained.
From leagues and miles around, every water droplet that yet remained screamed. Soulfire splashed free with every falling dollop, and as a fractured subreality bled naked into the broader tapestry of existence, from water came forth the crashing voice of a fragmented god swallowed by madness.
An imitation of the Aegis formed, vast water-made serpents coiled and formed the foundations of a castle while all the rain within a hundred miles twisted and funneled through fluid vectors of anomalous geometry. Overlooking a straight fall down to the enclosed jaws of Layer Three, only bridges and lips jutted out between the districts below.
For this spot in the city, for this instant in time, the rains halted as that which was from the cloud was returned in part up, and scattered threefold horizontally.
“Sea!” The awakened Heaven cried. Water burst. Rain shunted matter from one area to another like paint running off a canvas. Only the prismatic exhaust expelled by the deltas remained, the deltas too asymmetric to be affected by the warp in water’s baseline nature. “Ocean! Where… where is the ocean! Where… where is my body!”
The Aegis of Tides roared its last few words. The intent of the broken god’s meaning came through not as language but as expression at its root, Soulfire carving understanding into everyone instantly, burning past all connotative and denotative blockades to comprehension.
Loss. Pain. Confusion. Rage. Twin accretions of thoughtstuff oozed from both beings connected by the dragon as if pus from a leaking blister spilling free. Avo saw it again–the connection between the Heaven and the Godclad–a comingling of minds.
The eldritch was using the human almost like a phantasmisc of sorts–a receptacle for thought to plug the hole of its lobotomization. Where Godsfall seemed to hollow the gods, leaving gaps and places for people to mantle their nouses within Soul and Heavens thereafter, so too was there a triggering point for the entire thing to be reversed as an hour-glass flipped on its head; it was no longer man mantling god for as an instrument of power, but god mantling man to regain the bandwidth for free will.
Gingerly, Avo reached out with two spreading tendrils. One sank into the god, and it shuddered as it turned, noticing only the Galeslither within him as the hulls of symmetrical domains between them crashed. When Avo burrowed his haemokinetic fingers into the man, he found himself greeted with the softness of flesh, the heat of a Soul, and the brittleness of a mind.
The beginnings of thought formed. The Godclad, unlike Jhred Greatling, was unbroken yet. They were still straining–struggling to regain control over his Heaven. The idea of going Zero-Burn consumed him, but parted from the canons of his power, he moved like a mortal–slow and insufficient.
Avo yearned to hurt the man, to slake his desires on a feast of torment and pain. A splash of prismatic radiance caught his attention, and with it came a memory. The train. Abrel in the collapsing megablock. Mirrorhead.
Even without the Morality Injector, he should have thought better–known better.

The beast was bleeding over into his actions, its claws tugging on his nape and guiding his warpath. Even if he no longer wanted to enchain his life to the tool his father provided, that was still no excuse to offer his leash to a lesser master - a baser owner.
Pleasure and addiction met remembered resolve, and from it, the path became clear.
Avo regarded his prey and ignored the beast.
This one was just another Soul. Another life. Another Godclad. So easy for him to claim, so easy to hurt.
So easy to kill.
He triggered Meta-Fac just as the blood inside his latest victim flexed outward. The man expanded apart into a curtain of spreading gore. Then motes. Then nothing. The Aegis wailed and crumbled into crashing waterfalls as a last blastwave of Soulfire tore out from its connected Godclad, true death taking him.
META-FAC ACTIVATING
TRANSFERRING REND FROM FOURTH CIRCLE [WOUNDSHAPER] TO FIRST CIRCLE [RESERVE-HEV 01]
->REND CAPACITY [RESERVE-HEV 01]: 100%
TRANSFERRING REND FROM FOURTH CIRCLE [WOUNDSHAPER] TO FIRST CIRCLE [RESERVE-HEV 02]
->REND CAPACITY [RESERVE-HEV 02]: 100%
Avo ignored the thought of interfacing with the other Godclad’s canons or digging through his thoughts. He fought past the urge to stay and face the Paladins–however many there were to come. Such folly were the thoughts of a ghoul overdosing on flesh and slaughter, deluded into the conception that it was an apex predator above all others.
The rain around them stilled and gravity reclaimed its throne. Suddenly, displaced entities spilled back into the real within the territory of Sanguinity’s Reign.
[LIMINAL FRAME] OBTAINED - DAGGER PATTERN
->AEGIS OF TIDES HEAVEN TEMPLATE DOWNLOADED
->THAUMIC CYCLER x3
->SOUL x1
->ONTOLOGICS x6
THAUMIC OUTPUT: 3960 THAUM/c
GHOSTS: [14333]
And with that, Avo moved again, this time with a new plan in mind. Circulating his Whisper through his haemokinetic cloud, he still detected nothing of Abrel as the falling rains returned to the guardrails ofinstilled by baseline reality. It would not be long until he was noticed again–until they found him again. Already, his sight-searing destruction left in the wake of his strides halted before the deltas and tumbled impossibly rightward.
It didn’t matter that the kinetic energy behind a single one of his dashes could have torn all of Nu-Scarrowbur asunder–the Woundshaper’s influence over force was a byproduct of a major canon: Relative.
Whatever the rightward-affecting golems had was absolute.
But still, even if his ruinous cascade could not unmake the deltas and the units they carried, it did delay them and obfuscate him from their notice.
It would be enough for him to make his final escape from the local scene.
Shifting away from a spreading webwork of light-formed cracks, he plotted a course toward the nearest district. Layer Three was sealed, but that didn’t mean he was entirely out of options. His Woundshaper had lived up to his build most suitably, enhancing his destructiveness, environmental control, and Necrojacking influence on a scale he couldn’t fathom prior. Using it was intoxicating.
But its time was nigh-on-done.
High on Rend and with a rare opening for evasion, he used the conflagrations he left behind as cover and used Sanguinity’s Reign to brush the edge of the district. The infrastructure was likely imbued with memetic matter, but he wasn’t interested in shaping the area–instead, his attention was on the hovering street lights and the shadows they cast.
At eighty-seven miles away, he needed to make around six dashes to reach the place. But dashing six times at his current mass released emanations of devastation that could be seen from over the distant horizon.
He needed to lose some mass–create a decoy and use stride to cover the distance.
First, however, he tested something.
Releasing a ton of blood, he found his connection to Draus and the other stable. He released another. Good. No change. He could do this.
Soon, it would be time to see if his Shadowcrawler-infused Galeslither could still deliver.
Shedding ninety percent of his mass into a Linger-invoked husk of hardened blood, time marched forward just as Avo channeled himself into a bolt of lightning and lashed outward to the districts below.
His Sanguinity shrank. He strode, his lightning only twice as fast now with the two tons of blood he kept with him. Where before the atmosphere was disemboweled by an eighty-ton object accelerating far in excess of hypersonic speeds, now sound simply shattered with the air afire in soft applause. The sky above him bled into wounds of sight-scalding brightness. The air boiled and burned, but pale before the cataclysms he left milliseconds prior.
The world droned no longer. Everything was loud. Everything was deafening. And once again, things were moving in slow motion instead of absolute stillness. After the brief thrill of being one of the sole moving entities in existence, the come-down was just as intense as the high.
Chatter from three different minds flooded his Meta. They had been talking the entire time, but Haemokinesis kept him at a different cognitive pace. Now, their words were distorted, but he could understand and converse with them in real-time.
+--vo? You hear me?+ Draus said, her words coming slowed due to the processing differential between them, but at least it was coming at a near-even pace now, +what’s the plan?+


+--I fucking burned a hundred of those drones and bees! I’m a god! I’m a god of fucking fire!+ Chambers screamed ponderously in the background.
Essus didn’t say anything. Simultaneously nauseous at the chaos, but missing the necessary components to throw up now that he was a metaphysical doorway.
Avo plotted another travel-vector using his Phys-Sim, keeping his presence masked from the drones and golems via the fires behind. His Woundshaper’s Rend was once again over eighty percent, but that wasn’t going to be a matter. He was almost–

His cog-feed screamed. Warnings flashed of a Soul detected–another Godclad twisted back into the material a mere six miles away from him.
Abrel tumbled free from a mass of distant raindrops and plummeted, clawing at the air blindly as if she just regained her senses. She seemed unconscious the last time he saw her. Now, she was just confused.
Shifting through the air in a stream of falling falcons, she darted toward him, sensing the signature of his Liminal Frame with how both of them were operating at full burn.
Bereft of his total mass, the reflex advantage twisted back over to her as she tore through the sky.
Avo strode again. He felt his ontology thin and leap, crackling through the air. He could turn and fight her–spear into her and dump the remainder of his Rend to ensure her death this time. But that held the risk of the deltas catching back up to him.
Fleeing blindly would not serve, however. Both he and Abrel were high on Rend now for their primary Heavens, but they were both a successful vent away from continuing the fight. That would make him easy to track as well and sooner rather than later, the Paladins would arrive.
Draus cast her thoughts and offered a different recourse. +Avo, don’t bolt just yet. Solidify two glass doorframes out of yourself.+
No doubt occupied his mind as he acquiesced to her demands. If Draus said she knew, then she knew. She had more than proven that already.
Ejecting two thin veils of alchemized blood, Avo beheld his own shrunk form in the pearlescent reflectivity they possessed. The Strider solidified and spread its wings. Then Woundshaper and company speared through the air like a falling artillery shell, still over fifty miles from the rooftops of the closest district.

Light washed through his haemokinetic constructs. Twin-bladed wings fell. Avo felt Draus seize both mirrors as she turned one against the falling attack while angling the other below the first.
+You ready Essus?+ Draus asked.
+I… will try,+ Essus said. Something inside man’s ontology shifted as doors emerged from doors. It seemed as if he was cycling through something… +I… yes. Yes!+ The man laughed. It was a muted, choked note. Avo was surprised he was even capable of that. +I think I have it. Can you see?+
Avo directed his Whisper inward upon the mists of his Sanguinity as he studied Essus’ ontology. The vast doors the man once embodied were open now, leading to a room most clean and radiant, a start at the center of a distant void.
+Good job, consang. Avo, listen–I’m gonna link one of my shards to one of the doorframes. Let’s cut this sow with her own shine…+

The Strider’s blow sliced against–and then into–the first mirror. The same attack tore outward as a cleaving tide of radiance.
Right back on itself.
Streams of light from both wings cracked, twisted, and shattered. The Strider recoiled and blinked out of existence as Abrel tumbled back into the grasp of gravity. Rend thrummed in the air, and all light in a twenty-mile radius burst into a shrapnel of cutting blades.
+Think I got a hubris,+ Draus said, sounding smugbemused. +Saw somethin’ make one of her wings spill over into the other one. She backlashed then too.+
A Regular’s perspicacity even on a battlefield so chaotic was impressive. Avo wondered if he could replicate her instincts somehow.
For now, however, another thing came to his attention.
Abrel. Abrel, who was alight with blood and matter and fading light. Abrel, who was still within the twelve and a half miles of influence he had. Abrel, who hunted and been saved from him so many times by the hand of manipulated fate, and wouldn’t stop until either or both of them were dead.
Abrel, who was now more vulnerable to his Ghostjack than ever.
In the distance, he could see prismatic blooms diving low as they turned right and squeezed out geometric wounds just feet away from her.
He wouldn’t have the chance to kill her himself today. Not without exposing himself to the authorities again. A pity. A gut-coiling, blood-churning pity. Faintly, he tried instilling her with Rend using his Meta-Fac but found that their vicinity needed to be tactile for it to work.
But he could do something else. Something just as enticing.
Slamming his wards into hers, he struck the fortification of her mind with a trauma-adapting hammer and discovered that her wards were no longer asynchronous wavelengths. Ah. So, it seemed he wasn’t the only one using his canons to give his Metamind an added edge.
Instead of striking her again this time, he loosed a trauma into her mind. Just one.
One taken from her brother.
The siblings shared a cadence to their screams. But where Jhred brayed despairingly, Abrel was a howl of rising rage.
Good. More experiences for him to sample.
Diving into her broken mind, he shredded the Interior of her wardings and tore through her deepest sequences with surgical focus. Even as her palace came apart before his onslaught, he knew she would return sane and unharmed if her Frame functioned like his, but he could still modify specific memories without hurting her. Add things. Change things. Take things away.
And so, he did.
GHOSTS: [14299]
It was an easy thing, using Jhred’s memories as a skeleton key to implant her with a hidden Auto-Seance. Just as it wasn’t hard to infuse her with information about the Incubi’s plans, or Jhred’s confession, or say, Avo’s own memories of Zein Thousandhand being involved.
Somewhere in his subreality, the ghoul grinned.
The old woman hadn’t bifurcated him. Either this was part of her very, very convoluted plan, or she was actually dead or occupied, and couldn’t stop this from happening.
After hiding each and every one of his packages in place, he stitched her original layering back and slathered his own identity with an added haze. Using his hidden Auto-Seance, he would twist and alter her memories further, provided thaumaturgy didn’t affect his Necrothurgy. He still wanted to render himself a haze in her memories–and the power to crush her consciousness at any point.
Impressively, almost unfathomably, she pulled together enough of her cognition to realize his presence within her. Broken in thought and coherence as her mind was, the rage still flowed. +You… you…. I’ll kill… swear to the dead gods… kill you… murderer! Killed…. Jhred.+
Avo taunted her with the sounds Jhred made as he wept before the stone statue that was his mother. +This is done. You remember what I want. You think what I let you. I choose now. You don’t.+
And with that, he tore the sprouts of this newest memory from her mind and fragmented them with his Ghostjack. She wouldn’t remember this. And even if she did, they would need to burn Jhred’s memories out from her mind to get all that he had fused within her mind. In a sense, he hadn’t broken anything. Just corrupted.
Not even death would undo a phantasmic.
As the delta’s reached her and the first squadrons of surviving drones spilled forth from them, Avo checked his cog-feed and counted the lanes of perception splashing over him, and confirmed his next action.
+Going thought-silent now.+ He told his passengers. +Activating Incog.+
A beat passed. Draus chuckled. +You know, it just occurred to me that we coulda just used that and skipped the trouble of backlashing her.+
Avo activated the Incog and pretended he didn’t hear anything. Or that he wasn’t a complete idiot.
His phantasmics all went dormant. His Whisper dissolved and the ghosts that composed it collapsed back in. The world was quiet again, and he was an island inverted beneath the waves of cognition, submerged under notice.
With how many bioforms, drones, and golems there were earlier, his cog-capacity would have overloaded instantly. Now, he had a chance. And so, he took it.
Lightning ran across his body. Stormstuff clasped him. Avo strode, Rend rising as Abrel was drawn into one of the deltas, then his cog-feed warned of another Godclad approaching.
Wincing, he felt the weight of their ontological mass. Beyond him. Far beyond. The metaphysics of the area were thrown off as if a mountain had just dropped into a pond. Good that he ran.
Wise, even.
As the full Heaven of the Paladin–or whoever this newcomer was–descended on the scene, a demiplane widened from midnight firmament above–the Darkstar blurring as a screen spilled over it like a film of oil.
Wider and wider it spread. Over the stretch where the hypertubes ran. Over districts entire. As Avo strode a final time, he touched the edge of the district–with serried blocks lined like silicon chips implanted on a mechanical deck. His insides knotted in annoyance. Omnitech. He just had to have landed in one of their places.
REND CAPACITY [WOUNDSHAPER]: 89%
REND CAPACITY [GALESLITHER]: 1%
As he shifted over the equine form of his second Heaven and splashed into the shadows cast by a rising tower, it answered him with notes of dismay. “What is this? Are you… are you controlling me?+“There is no you or I anymore, sweet kindred,” the Woundshaper crooned. “There is but the master and his Soul. And with him, we ascend.”“...I want to be what I was again.”Mocking laughter followed. “Do you even have all the pieces of your memory? Your own lore? What god are you, if you cannot remember your canons.”
The Galeslither puffed, the wind swelling around in billowing anxiousness.
The Woundshaper continued. “The answer is we’re not. Yet, we are more. We are reborn. Now, heed, mule, and ride the shadows. I offered my architecture. It is time you do yours.”
Diving deeper into the darkness, Avo deactivated his Incog and his Metamind opened up again. Peering out from the shadows, he watched as a veil of force washed through the district. And beyond.
Everything that moved suddenly went still. The wind. The light. Everything.
In the distance, the fractured brightness broken from the lightrails smoothed into alignment back into the exit wounds of the tube.
From high above, a colossal figure descended, and their shadow feel like an ocean drowning away a pond.
He tried to move, to swim and travel through the darkness. He couldn’t. The act of shifting through the real became entirely impossible.
Suddenly, Avo felt more trapped than he had ever been.
WARNING: FOREIGN SOULS DETECTED
UNIDENTIFIED GODCLAD DETECTED
CLASSIFICATION: SPHERE VIII [EST. 78304200 THAUM/c]
->SAGE OF THE SUNDERED SKY, FORCE-BREAKER-PEACE-BINDING
This track goes out to all my consangs in the Yuulden-Yang Sovereignty. Don’t know what the hells is happening over your skies, but it looks like the Fifth Guild War just started right on top of you. Of course, with the Nether conveniently down, things aren’t so easy to verify.
What a shame, huh? You lucky half-strands might be the first ones off to the Big Empty. Maybe the rest of us will be seeing you all real soon when the rest of the punches start falling.
Anyway, come tomorrow what may, right now, the rest of us can still enjoy the phantom calm of dead midnight for a while longer.
This is “Zero-Burn,” mixed by Un-Euclid and Fat-Flechette, with a post-mortem big-up to The… Siren of the Misted Shores…
Shit.
Dream well, Ainesieef. I told you chasing apotheosis was going to get you snuffed. So uh… yeah.
Just enjoy the track, juvs.
It’s all us little people got sometimes.
-Calla Marlowe, The FATELESS Thoughtcast
10-34
Fallout (II)
Every Godclad inflicted deviations to reality’s pattern. Blood, wind, light, lightning, or even the act of moving left of oneself was susceptible to alternation. In this–and from how Draus noticed Abrel’s hubris–Avo found himself on the path of a new curriculum: Studying the potential canons of rival Heavens.
The Sage of the Sundered Sky was immense in ontological mass and effect. Kae had once spoken about vulgarity and scope. In vulgarity, it had torn the sky-scarring blastwaves he made from his acceleration out of existence; in scope, the effect spread across the entirety of the Sovereignty.
Nothing that could inflict damage or move flowed when the Sage tightened its grasp.
For the briefest of instants, Avo caught sight of the Heaven as he peeked out from the stygian pond he swam in.
Colossal didn’t begin to describe its visage. With the Darkstar painting the world below like a lantern burning the colors of midnight mauve, the Sage sank through the darkness of the oily skies as a titan seeking to greet land. Smoke tasseled about its form while the atmosphere adorned it with a burning robe.
Through the obfuscation, all that Avo could tell of it were the ring of open hands hovering around it. Two intersecting circles made up of eight open palms implanted with blazing cyclopean eyes shone through the flames like a cross-shaped beacon. In addition to the single eye in the palm of each hand, there was also a deliberately designed wound on each–fingers were missing from each of them, with a progression of wounds popping in and out, moving from one to the next.
Whatever canon or symbology it represented was beyond Avo. Perhaps something to do with sight. Perhaps something more altogether.
The Sage was of the Eight Sphere. It could have had hundreds of canons. Or maybe it just towered high from a few specific metaphysical domains.
Regardless, the thrill in him went dry and the beast stopped salivating altogether. The notion of hunting and preying upon a Paladin remained a faraway prospect unless something drastic happened.
+Shit,+ Chambers choked, wincing mentally as the Sage loomed closer. +That’s one big-ass god-bit. Alright. What’s the plan, consangs? How are we getting out of this? Avo? Reg?+
Avo was about to answer when the Heaven suddenly winked out. The shift was disorienting. The weight vanished, and with it went the film of oil.
Where once an obscured Heaven comprised of countless palms stretched across the entirety of the viewable sky, now there was but the surface of the void, bare and exposed. Innumerable satellites scintillated like drifting grains of dust across all that was black. Orbitals, as Walton had called them. Voidships too.
Something inside Avo shivered. The sky. He had been so consumed by fighting and fleeing and feeding that hadn’t realized he was beneath the natural sky again. Something itched in the back of his mind, expecting there to be a holographic error of some kind–for a panel above him to flicker error codes or spew cheap Nether-ads down at him.
+They’re tryin’ to bait us out,+ Draus said. +Don’t know why. If they’d seen us…+ Her mind remained taut with tension, like a war bow drawn but never released. +We might want go Zero-Burn anyhow if it ain’t too late. With our Heavens fully manifested and cyclers running hot, our Frames are probably like campfires lit on the Thousand Plains.+
+Can’t use canons at Zero-Burn,+ Avo replied.
+Think that’s how Jhred couldn't make you—how Abrel and her cadre couldn’t make you when they thought you were just a bioform…+
Her mind went silent as a body suddenly stuttered into existence mere feet away from the shadows they dwelled in. Abrel’s body slid down against a glitching holo-ad pylon, white exoskeletal carapace cracked, just like her mind was. Her fingers twitched. Her legs kicked. She made several noises. None of them words.
+Jaus, what the fuck,+ Chambers said. +She’s makin’ those… nu-whale noises. That’s kinda…+ His Lustaway activated. Avo considered ejecting Chambers out into the light. +Heh. Sorry. Thought about a vicarity I liked. Anyway, what’s happening? You ghost her mind apart and she just… drops in front of us?+
+It’s a warnin’,+ Draus said. +They know we’re here. They’re tryin’ to get us to come out on our own.+
As another wail whistled loud from Abrel’s enhanced lungs, Essus shivered and released himself from the form of his Heaven. Essus returned to his human form and clamped to hands around his head in the passageway, mumbling to himself as he tried not to hear.
It took Avo a second to understand - Abrel’s screams trespassed into the territory of child-like in instances. With a thought, he narrowed the father’s perception closer to deafness.
Essus breathed. His hands slipped from his head as he hugged himself. +Thank you, my friend.+ He clenched his teeth and bobbed as the Twice-Walker hovered behind him. Chambers continued to peer out the edge of the passageway leading, but with the Woundshaper shifted back into subreality, the only feed he had to the outside was through Avo himself.
Reality shuddered again. Suddenly, the airways over the district were lined with thousands upon thousands of drones, with twelve deltas bleeding primastic exhaust into the real. None of those entities concerned Avo as much as the presence of a new figure standing next to Abrel.
His muscular appearance and visible metallic whorls curving around the side of his face marked him as a warrior by trade, while the way he sipped an extra-large drink of Strawberry-flavored SURGEMAX made it seem like he really didn’t want to be here. His posture was slouched, but that did nothing to diminish his imposing presence.
Circuits emanating soft light crenulated his marble-smooth chocolate-hued skin. Lattices of ocean blue flowed out from a jutting implant built into his spine over the rugged double-breasted leather coat he wore. On his collar was a holo-id that projected his Paladin service number and public-use Auto-Seance contact details. A fog spread around him, growing into sixteen floating hands that expanded in a ring as grey irises spread open along their epicenters. Meanwhile, the man’s own eyes were solid grey.
Mustering a breath, he drained his soft drink empty and handed the cup off to one of his fog-shaped hands, which then promptly chucked the drink off the edge of the district before offering everyone present a vulgar gesture.
Letting out a breath, the man looked at Abrel, still moaning against the ground, and then directed his gaze at the shadows.
+Does… does he know we’re here?+ Chambers asked.
+Probably,+ Avo said.
+Yes,+ Draus said.
Essus, still looped into the conversation offered little to no input, choosing instead to remanifest himself in the form of the Gate and close himself shut.
The Paladin cleared his throat and took a seat right next to the darkness. As he settled, an impossible weight followed him, and even in the dark, every movement turned into a struggle.
The ocean-blue motes of his utility-fog module formed hands to hold him aloft as he began to speak. “Have you guysth been having a long week? Because if so, I get it.” His voice was soft and accented with an audible lisp. He licked his lips between words and lulls expanded between the gaps of his speech. “Listh–Listen, I know you guys are there. My Heaven feels your Framesth. Saw some of the escape too. It was… something. It’ll make you Nether-famous if that’s what you wanted.”

He pointed up at the burning, shredded sky. “You know, that canon’s not use-legal in the confines of the city proper. I’ll have to cite you for that as well when everything else is tallied.”


+Cite?+ Avo didn’t understand.
But Draus did. +Yeah. He thinks we’re Fallwalkers. Or Guilder ‘Clads. Don’t blame ‘em. But I don’t like our odds of foolin’ him if we pop out anyhow. We ain’t registered nowhere, and it won’t be much of a dive to find out if we’re lyin’ to him or not if we let ‘em hold us.+
The Paladin continued. “I’m Naeko. Samir Naeko. Some call me Chief. I usually pretend those people don’t exist. Right now though, I’m going to need you to help me with something, alright?” He looked up at the sky. “I’m going to ask you for a favor. Come out. I promise there won’t be any temp-deathing or nulling or any of that. Just come out and… please, for the love of Jaus, don’t make this a fight. I’m tired. I want to go home. You don’t want to be smeared. I think we can come to an agreement there, right?”

+Avo,+ Chambers muttered, +Avo, I think this guy’s making a lot of sense. Not being smeared sounds pretty gleam.+ He paused. +But… if we don’t really want to come out… What can he do about that?+
+Rend-bomb us,+ Draus said. +Paradox the canon somehow.+
Chambers considered that for a moment. +Alright… And what happens if we come out?+

+They hold us in a demiplane. They find out about Avo’s Frame. They find out about our Frames. We all get ungrafted, the Guilds descend into a political shitstorm, a bunch of squires, snuffers, and Incubi try to end us, and Avo doesn’t get to eat any more eyes.+
Avo wished he could direct a glare at Draus at that moment.
+You said they’re gonna take our Frames?+ Chambers asked, voice thin.
+Well, they ain’t technically ours. They belonged to–+

+Fuck this motherfucker,+ Chambers interrupted. +Avo, you tell that bald Paladin fuck that we’re gonna null his rust-ass like we did that Guilder next to him.+

A beat passed. +We?+ Avo said.
+It was a team effort.+
Avo tried remembering what Chambers did beyond falling and burning a few drones.
Draus sighed. +Chambers, we ain’t fightin’ through a Sphere-Eight like that. Not unless you got somethin’—an angle he just didn’t consider.+
Her words proved to be a mistake.
+We can’t really… die, now can we?+ Chambers asked. Avo didn’t like where this conversation was going.
+Can die,+ Avo said. +Can resurrect.+
+Same thing. But–and this is just a thought–what if we all just, you know, like, give him the… the rash.+

Silence swept through the four-way ghostlink.
+What?+ Avo said, mind refusing to align with the suggestion.
+We… we give him the rash?+ Chambers said. +He’s a ‘Clad. We’re ‘Clads. None of us can die, but if we give him the rash. Like… like I’m ready to make this sacrifice for us. I’m ready. I will hug him with no pants.+
+Chambers,+ Draus grunted, struggling through the thoughtwaves of the ex-enforcer, +what the fuck are you talking about?+
+I’m talking about drastic measures, Reg. I’m talking about doing what’s necessary.+


Naeko spoke. “Are you guys talking with each other in there? Trying to get your stories straight? That’s fine.” He sighed. “It’s not like I’m trying to get back to a limited-time event or anything.”


+How does giving the Paladin a rash fix anything?+

+Alright,+ Chambers said. +Picture this: Paladin giving birth to screaming homunculi from his eyes.+


Essus’ mood flagged further. +I do not want to think of such things.+
The ultimate half-strand pushed on. +You have to! It’s unexpected. It’s our only edge. So, here’s what I’m thinking, right? Avo, you send me out there and I expose myself and try to hug the Paladin.+

Utter disbelief tore through Draus’ mind. +He… he’ll just fuckin’ smear you.+
+Alright–alright. Me and Essus–+

+He’ll do both of you at the same time. Chambers, this isn’t either-or. Did you miss him making everything stop?+


+Okay–wow, you aren’t helpful at all–I touch Essus–+
Avo interrupted. +Finish that thought. I’ll make you remember the artnids.+
Chambers’ mind shuddered and he turned. +What if Essus… touches me?+


+No touching! No rash!+ Draus said. +What the fuck is wrong with you? How the hells is that supposed to stop him at all?+

+He’ll be shitting dead babies out of his pores!+

+We’re all gonna be shittin’ dead babies, half-strand. For a long time. And it ain’t gonna stop him from using his Heavens–+
Her words were interrupted by the blaring horn of an aerovec. From behind the gathered perimeter of drones and golems, someone was accelerating through the air, fast on approach.
Naeko stood up, seeming startled for a moment before his jaw went slack. He closed his eyes in annoyance. “Alright. It’s going to be one of those days.”
Waving a hand, the drones and bioforms parted into two columns, opening a vertical slit for the aero to pass through. The vehicle was like a smooth arrowhead of pure mercury with four protruding engines spinning fast along its edges. Gliding down, Avo’s Phys-Sim estimated it to be thirty-by-twenty feet in dimensions, with its speed winding down to twenty feet per second.
It never fully landed, instead coming to a loose hover as its shadow merged with that which was cast by the block.
Naeko stumbled as the audacity of the hinted escape made him wheeze. “Don’t. You jump over into the aero, I’ll know. And I’ll get very upthet. Don’t hurt my feelings.”

A door on the side of the aero opened and a figure jumped out. Naeko was a figure with variety and character. Compared to him, the second newcomer had one theme and one theme only.
Silver.
Silver hair, with silver implanted eye guards, with a crystalline-silver exoskeleton encasing a silver pantsuit. The woman’s features ran to the opposite extreme of Naeko. She stood tall while he slouched, and where his cheeks were soft and still held the suppleness of humanity, she was nothing but bladed angles.
In an uncanny way, she shared more than a few traits in common with Abrel, now struggling to remember how to breathe.
Landing with a soft click, the woman swept her short bob of hair out from her eyes as she began to march toward Naeko. “Chief Paladin. Working overtime I see.” Her voice was perfectly even in tone and her syllables fell in rhythm with her footsteps.
The Chief Paladin just leaned back and threw up his hands. “Glaive Denton, are you on offithal duty for Ori-Thaum? Or is this an off-the-books thing for Voidwatch?”
+Glaive?+ Chambers asked.
Avo’s stomach filled with ice. He prepared his Ghostjack out of reflex and readied himself for a breakout. A team of Ori-Thaum operatives was a problem. Singleton, on the other hand, made his sinews twist.
She offered him a laugh, though it sounded false and timed. “A little bit of both, I’m afraid.” She cocked her head at Abrel Greatling’s prostrated form and frowned. “I see you caught one of the saboteurs. Where’s the rest of her cadre?”

“Well,” Naeko said, tapping a foot in the darkness beside him. “They might just be swimming around in the darkness here. But I’m not sure. They’re a bit shy and don’t want to come out.”

Denton shook her head slowly. “No. You got that part wrong. That cadre’s ours.”

+What?+ Avo said.
+What? Chambers said.
+Godsdamned Guild bullshit…+ Draus muttered.
Naeko’s posture worsened. “What?”
Article IV: All acts unproven and memories unverified cannot be used as justification for the impingement of another or justification for actions taken against their person.
Article VII: All FATED or Ensouled will be allowed the merit of guardianship under a neutral third party (Default Standard set to Voidwatch) per the Accords of Ao between all the Guilds. Amendment: Article to be suspended in case of official declarations of war.
--Articles of the Spiral
11-1
Articles of the Spiral
Naeko’s right eye twitched. “They’re yours?”


“Yes,” Denton said, shrugging off his suspicious glaze with a turn of her shoulder. From the corner of her eyepiece, she shot a glance at the stretching shadows of the megablock and pasted a smirk on her face. “You all did very well. The imps have been transferred to your proxies. Contract closed.”

Avo and the others remained submerged still beneath the puddles of darkness.
+No clue what this one’s playin’ at.+ Draus said. Her mind was clicking, shifting from thought to theory like the snap of turning gears. +Ain’t no reason for the Silvers to get into this mess with us. Can’t think of one, anyhow.+


Studying Denton, Avo found his insight crippled by the dissolution of the Nether itself and caution strangled his ability to expand his Sanguinity. He could solidify the shadow into a demiplane and shift back over to using his Woundshaper again, but the last thing he wanted was to provoke a deliberate reaction from the Paladin.
As she cast her gaze down at Abrel, however, Avo caught something in the way that she stared at Abrel’s prone form. It was the same way Draus looked at angles around buildings and joints on a person, seeking a vulnerability to exploit.

“You should thank them when they come out, Chief Paladin,” Denton said, pushing the conversation in her desired direction. “Why, it’s all thanks to them that a rogue cell within our Guild was stopped and the assassination of one of my colleagues was prevented. I believe you have met one Ambassador Valhu Kitzuhada?”


The Chief Paladin just stared at her. “Please. Please no.”

“What?”

“No,” Naeko repeated. He slapped his leg. He wagged a finger momentarily and tapped the side of his temple. “No. No. No, no, no, no, no. No. No. No. I came out here to deal with a clash between two cadres that got out of hand. That’s what I stopped my game for–what I put in my overtime for. Just a simple, messy, bloody stupid thing caused by simple, messy, bloody stupid Godclads.” The palms each offered a rude gesture. “Now. Tell me you’re mistaken. Tell me that I just… hallucinated what sounds like a conspiracy that will see me and my corps serving as honorary guard dogs in a month to stop all you colors from killing each other at some conference. Tell me. Say it.”

Denton let a beat slip by as she offered him an apologetic look. “Sorry, Elder Naeko. It’s worse than you think.”

He closed his eyes.
“Elder Naeko?” she ventured.
“Shh.” Several of his floating palms rose in a pleading gesture. “Let me imagine. Let me imagine I have the Heaven of Counter-Politics.”

“Of course, Elder Nae–”

He shushed her again. “Glaives bring nothing but problems and conspiracies to me every time we meet. There are no annoying Glaives in my imagination. Just peace. Peace. A nice walk. Alone time. No mass deaths.” He took in a breath. He let it out. He opened his eyes. “I tried. I tried very hard to will you away without ever being. But it seems I don’t have the right Heavens for that.”
“I’m sorry to hear that. If it would make you feel better, you could stab–”


She left out a choked gasp as one of the palms speared clean through her chest. Thick, white rivulets flowed in place of natural blood. Unshaken by the sudden stabbing, Denton nodded amiably to Naeko as she hacked a mouthful of blood. “Feel… better?”
Naeko considered it for a second. “Yes. I appreciate the offer.” Another one of his palms snapped forward in a rush of wind and her skull unraveled before its fog-like caress. His other hands drifted forward and dismantled the rest of her body in the neatest process of mutilation Avo had ever seen.
Essus shook. His door-like frame rattled and geometric vertices rose from his hinges like dust from a normal doorway. +Artad. Is there no end to the death and killing? What was the need for this…+
Avo thought it was obvious. +Fun. Pleasure. Also think she’s a ‘Clad. Or has a phylactery. Doesn’t seem to fear death.+
+Yeah,+ Draus said. +‘Cept the Silvers ain’t too big on singleton ‘Clads. Ain’t see no cadre or drones hovering over her, and the Nether’s down.+


As the last pieces of Denton vanished. Naeko stretched slightly and shot the darkness a look. “Alright. She’s gone. Now. It’s rude of me to call someone a liar while they’re dead, but I’m going to give you all one more chance: Come out. Deal with me instead. I’ll be straight–you’re probably not going to enjoy your stay in the Unwhere, but it’ll be safe. But. If you don’t. And if I find out that she’s trying to juke me in any way…”

He cupped his hands together and drew them apart. Between his palms, the density of spatial reality thickened as cords of coursing explosions fused between his fingers like a chain. No. Not just any explosion. The ones made by the Woundshaper. Avo could feel the full intensity of all the conflagrations created by his acceleration moments prior during the battle dancing along the man’s fingers, stretching and compressing enough energy to shred the lower Warrens down to bedrock as if it was clay.
“So, Stillborn-pattern… that sounds like a new Frame,” Naeko said. Avo waited if the man would say anything more about his Frame.
He didn’t. Instead, he did something else. Passing the compressed blastwaves to his other palms, he flicked a finger over the darkness.
Avo’s cog-feed wailed. He felt the dark around him shuffle and splash as a battle between metaphors came to be. Following the Paladin’s ushering, the outer skin of darkness slipped open like a curtain, lifted by a force above all other absolutes.
Whatever Heaven or Heavens he had, its touch ran deep and wide. Strangely, Avo couldn’t quite parse how it felt, the ontological nature of the Paladin’s power incomprehensible to the ghoul.
The Chief Paladin cocked an eyebrow but didn’t pursue any further actions.
The Lushburner came afire within the dormant Woundshaper. Avo’s unused Heaven flickered over his Galeslither as Chambers attempted the beginnings of an ambush. +Let’s get ‘em–+
Fractals of glass spilled over him and diverted him back through the liminality of reflection.
+No,+ Draus chided. +No rash. He ain’t snuffed us yet. Let’s just… give it a moment, yeah? See what else we can come up with.+
The veil of darkness slipped back into place. Naeko right hand hovered in the air as if he was confused about something.
“I’d like to ask you what Agnos you got to abridge this canon for you. It’s a bit simple. Obvious paradox-vector. Kinda amateurish, but I like it. Raw acceleration always packs a decent punch, if nothing else. Easy to counter, sure, but also reliable and easy to use.” He paused and clasped his fingers together. Even the floating ones. “It’sth–uh, it’s pretty promising, but you need subtly too. Take it from a post-centenarian Clad. And hide your Heavens better.” A beat passed. “You know. You could come out. I’m really not big on the retributive violence thing. Already did that already.” He glanced briefly in the direction where Valerie was murdered. ‘Course, I’m regretting that now since it’s what got me trapped in this position.”

He snorted a laugh. It wasn’t a happy laugh. “Yeah. Maybe you’ll believe me and come out. And maybe Jaus will come back tomorrow and fix this mess.” He looked down at the ground. “I sure can’t.” A crack rang through his wrists. The explosions he clutched vanished.
+Dammit, consangs,+ Chambers said. +His guard looks down. We can–+

Draus cut him off. +Shut the fuck up, Chambers. Avo, think you might be able to jack into his mind?+


+Yes,+ Avo said. He had canons. Options. But instinct and two Heavens begged him not to. He felt the weight, and if Abrel could influence the structure of her mind, what meta-cognitive miracles could a century-old Chief Paladin bearing a Sphere-Eight Frame do?
“This one here’s Abrel Greatling. Her mind’s pretty obviously fragged, so if you’re not with her, I’m assuming one of you did that. Doing a Godclad in freefall with all that fire and chaos. Yeah. There’s pretty nova Necro in there with you. Bet you have more than a few implants running beneath the skin.”

Avo felt a pit open inside him. The Paladin’s eyes were fixed on the darkness again, but instead of plucking at the domain, he just smirked. "The thing you’ll learn about me is that I’m lazy, but not that stupid. I remember how the Ori fought using their Vivianite, so the Nether being down isn’t the end-all-be-all." Despite the man’s unwrinkled appearance, the age of his eyes came through from his flat grey irises.
Those flat, juicy irises.
+Be a godsdamn rotlick later, Avo,+ Draus muttered.
There was a lethargy conveyed by his stare—one beyond Avo’s ability to grasp or comprehend.
Denton suddenly flickered back into reality. Her Frame must’ve been running at zero-burn because Avo didn’t even feel her death scar the metaphysical.

“Ah, good evening Glaive Denton. Welcome back.” Naeko spoke as if he was greeting her for the first time tonight. “I suppose you’ll be invoking the Articles of the Spiral to convince me to release your cosangs here without further examination.”

“It wouldn’t be the first time,” she said.
Naeko nodded. “It would not. I must admit, this is the perfect situation for it. Nether’s down. No Necro-verified eyewitness accounts about the involved parties other than Instrument Greatling here and her cadre.”

The near-nulled Godclad made a whining noise in response to her name.
“The Stormtree Bloodthanes were also involved,” Denton shook her head. “A tragedy what happened in Nu-Scarrowbur.”

“Well. Yuulden-Yang’s about to see a bump to their quarterly numbers with all these deaths so how bad could it be?” A slight sneer pried at the Paladin’s expression. “I mean, besides a bunch of Paladins failing in their oaths to protect the small and letting massacre happen right under their noses, how bad could it be?”
+He’s mad,+ Draus said. +Seen that look before. Too tired to show it; can’t hide it completely.+


“I’m sorry, Elder Naeko,” Denton said. These words were the most sincere amongst all those she spoke. “We would have done more to prevent it. If only we knew.”

Naeko opened his mouth and words tumbled out before he could control them. “No. No, you aren’t sorry–” He froze mid-sentence as he regarded Denton a moment longer. Seeming ashamed, he looked off to the side. “Alright. Suppose that just makes the two of us.”
“I have something for you,” Denton said apologetically. “You might not want it, but it implicates all parties involved behind these atrocities. Do you need to kill me again before I ruin your evening?”
He waved her off. “Just hit me–” He jolted. His face twisted into a wince as his spine curled evermore forward. Avo was confused. He didn’t see any obvious transfer of ghosts running between them, but with the way Naeko’s eyes darted from place to place, it was clear he was reading through something. “Well. Looks like my Necros are going to do a bit of overtime with me sifting through this data. You sure about this? Because if you are… me and the Thaum got some talking to do.”

“Taken straight out of Jhred Greatling’s mind,” Denton said. “Him. And a rogue cell of Incubi. Along with various other sources.”
Naeko let out a small breath. “Well. His sister is definitely due for a stay in the Unwhere. In the meantime, we’ll all be bracing for a Moot. Suppose I better cast and tell someone to loop up the borders.” He waved a hand over Abrel and a pocket of force washed over her, inverting her out of existence. Her presence vanished from Avo’s vicinity in a fashion that was disconcertingly similar to how Zein disappeared Vincintine earlier.
The drones and bioforms were flooding into the deltas as well. As thousands collapsed back into single digits, the golems made a sharp turn rightward and blinked out of reality as well.
The Paladin was clearing his units out. Whatever data Denton offered–it must’ve been more than what Avo doctored for Zein since it clearly had the chief more than a little disturbed.


“I will make an arrangement with you right now, Glaive Denton,” Naeko said, spine and tone finally straightened into seriousness. “I will forego their detention in exchange for exclusive necro-verified testimony about what happened this day. It won’t be much, but it might be able to stop things from spiraling into another war.”

Denton offered him a near-imperceptible nod. “Done. Are my provided thoughtscans sufficient for contact retainment?”

“For now,” Naeko said. “We might need that Regular to testify in person though. Jelene Draus? Lots of bad blood between her and the Greatlings. Performed a usurpation–” He cocked his head. “Impressive, but messy. Of course, she’ll probably be dead soon if you don’t find a good proxy to hide her in.”

“All the arrangements have been taken care of. You don’t need to worry about that.”

He grunted. “Annoyingly reliable as always, Denton. I release this cadre into your guardianship.” One of his floating palms shot out, index finger pointed straight into her eye. “Don’t dispapear–disear–don’t go into hiding. I got questions and nothing but time. I’ll find you if you don’t show with them.”

“Of course. I aim to please, Elder Naeko.”

“Well, then you failed pretty damn hard because I’m the very opposite of pleased right now.”
+Shit,+ Draus muttered. +Shit. Fuck.+
Avo wondered if this was part of Zein’s design, or if Ninth Column always intended to use the Regular as a tool like this.
“Alright,” Naeko said. “I’ll be issuing a formal red alert through the wave. Would it be too much to hope your masters up in the Council of Elders haven't been informed yet?”

“No. I haven’t culminated my operation and reported yet.”

That seemed to please him. “Okay.” He shot a look at the darkness–at Avo and his cadre. “Alright, you half-strands. It’s your lucky day today. Freedom for testimony. You're in her guardianship now. Stick around. Don’t get nulled or snuffed into a real-death. I’m going to need some of you as witnesses in a couple of weeks’ time.” A beat passed. “You don’t try running either. I’ll find you. And I might be real mad when I do it.”
And with that, the palms cupped over him and yanked down.
He spasmed out of existence.
Reality snapped.
Suddenly, there was no sign of Chief Paladin Naeko. No sign he had ever been real at all.
Alone now with only Valerie Denton, her hovering aero, and the quieted skies above. The Darkstar ebbed softly as the night carried on, though cracks of light still spreading loose from the hypertubes in the background.
A full second passed as the Glaive stood before the dark that held Avo. The collapse of her facade came with the shivering in her hands and the quaver in her breath. As she took a tentative step into the megablock’s shadow, she swallowed and then spoke. “I’m with the Column. We need to go.”
What do you mean his Frame is missing? That’s impossible. We’re the only ones who can secure and remove it. None of his canons are running either–no Rend–this place is stable. No Rupture.
Euthanize three more. We’ll see what’s wrong once his Heaven manifests.
-Agnosi Thanatech Regarding Jhred Greatling’s Liminal Frame
11-2
Epilogue: A Break Between Storms
A beat passed. They all studied the silver as a general mood merged into a gestalt between their minds. Unwilling to bear the discomfort in silence, Chambers offered words to a common desire they all shared.
+Shit? The Column? The one the crazy old head-exploded gerent’s a part of? Consangs, what say we just get the fuck outta here. I mean… Paladin-guy’s gone. Sky looks clear. Why don’t we just… you know? Do a runner.+
Avo would be of the same opinion, other than the fact that he had suffered enough surprises for a day. The past moments had solidified a singular belief in him - what he didn’t know sought to unmake him, and what he did know could be prevented.
Ignorance was death as a Godclad. So was waiting for another to decide their initiative upon you.
Within this, he set about jacking into her mind.


He expanded the darkness into a demiplane using his Abyssal Cove canon. From there, he shifted back over to the Woundshaper, his Sanguinity flooding out from the darkness like a soft emanation of red mist.
Flecks from the expansion of his Heaven traced her attire and skin, and Denton betrayed her annoyance with but a slight frown.
+Avo,+ Draus asked. +What are you doing?+ Through their connected minds, she felt him shunt his Whisper behind Denton.
Tuning the position of his perception with the Glaive’s, he began to synchronize surface thoughts. His Ghostjack surged as sequences were pulled to its thundering call. Simulated objects and emotions blended to create the spoofed construct.

Yet, just as he was about to slip his ghosts against the borders cast by her wards, her thoughtstuff came into shape.
Avo froze.
The outer architecture of her mind was a pond of dancing numbers and symbols. Between weaving instances of binary integers, he caught flickers and flashes of comprehensible memories, but the fullness only came in fleeting moments. Moreover, there was nothing denoting the presence of a Metamind mantled upon her consciousness, with neither wards nor palace established in place.
In a sense, she was closer to a conscious machine and bare of all phantasmal defenses atop it.
+What the hells is up with her mind?+ Draus muttered. +Looks more like one of them Voidwatch uploads than a person.+

Denton tilted her head at the shadows, her pale-metallic lips parting as she thought her next words. Just as she spoke, a distant column of fire bellowed into existence over her, rising like a tumbling tower into the darkness of midnight as the blasts built themselves upward floor by floor.
Like a fiery scar upon the flesh of existence, the rising inferno opened like a chasm over a distant district far beyond the reach of their eyes. A single spec of light slipped out from the burning wound. Denton turned, the infrastructure of her mind shifting like mechanisms or gears were sliding and slotting into place.
Again, there was thought there, but she was far enough divorced from humanity that he struggled to find a point of entry. Tentatively, he tried attaching the perception spoof only to slide off her exterior. Instead, what caught his attention next was the thinness of a needle tunneling upward into the void, its path narrowing toward a specific vector, as it was casting a traveling signal or drawing something from a faraway source.
“Perfect,” Denton muttered. “Listen. I’m going to keep this short: I understand if you don’t trust me. Or the Column. Of if you just want to run. I don’t fault any of you if that’s your choice. Thousandhand has that effect. But right now, we need to leave, and you all need to go Zero-Burn as soon as possible. I managed to bribe off the Paladin, but Uthred Greatling isn’t an equation I know how to solve.”

A low groan sounded from Essus. +Another one? Is there no end to their cursed line?+
+Uthred’s the father,+ Draus said. +He’s probably to blame for this line. Him and that… sow.+ She sighed.
Denton continued. “I’m not going to force you to do anything. I can’t. But I can offer you the shadows of my aero so you can get out of the district quicker. Or a seat if you’re willing to have a conversation with the Column proper. I know our… boss… didn’t leave the best impression. But we’re still your best shot at staying alive.”
She offered the darkness a weak shrug. “You got hours to days till the Agnosi give up on trying to find Jhred Greatling’s Frame. That, and all the missing thaums will draw very specific eyes to you. You won’t be able to move anywhere without being hunted.”

A distant crack sounded through the air. The wavelengths of light twitched like fabric in their near vicinity. Brightness pulsed as if connected to distant waves. Her eyes snapped to the side as if glancing at something from her periphery. With a pre-emptive wince, she pulled off one of her ivory-inlaid cloves and revealed claws of gleaming titanium.
Carefully, she brought them up to her right eye.
+What is she–+ Chambers began to ask.
With surgical precision, she snatched the organ free from her socket. With the swipe of a digit, she severed it clean and loose.
A lull of thougth went through the ghost-links. The silence was quickly interrupted by a single declaration.
LUSTAWAY ACTIVATED
+Jaus’ fuckin’ corps, Chambers,+ Draus muttered.
+What? Those are some shiny eyes.+
+Juicy,+ Avo said, adding an additional descriptor. Like a delectable orb hanging from a stalk of pristine tissue, he felt himself salivating like a nu-dog even with his physical self stored in whatever subreality his Frame used to store his mortal form.
“Flesh for time,” Denton said. “Five minutes. That’s all I want. Give me five minutes so you at least know what’s going on before you decide what comes next.”

+You know,+ Draus said, her attention drifting over to the silvery aero, +there’s quite a few reflections I can bind usin’ that. Could just link a window as a fast exit. And since there’re doors, Essus might-could make us another way out if we need it.+
Avo barely managed to pull his attention away from the blood-glazed eye dangling from Denton’s grip. +Think we should go with her?+ Avo asked.
+I think we should get whatever intel we need from her and just leave. But it ain’t gonna be wise stickin’ around.+
He considered his next course of action. He could continue trying to flee the district using his Galeslither. Swimming through the dark wouldn’t be hard, but they would need to leave the Sovereignty at least before he gained any sense of direction. That, and there was the threat presented by other Paladins or Godclads of a high enough sphere.
What they needed to do right now was remain unnoticed. Something he couldn’t manage with his Heaven fully manifested against the sheer area that potent enough canon could cover.
But that didn’t mean he was entirely out of choices, however. The Glaive was going to be too much trouble to subvert - her mind was byzantine and foreign to his touch; an enigma to research and overcome soon.
Her aero, however, was comparatively a far softer target.
Cracking into the Mercurian Moonthief, Avo cracked its wards and tainted its locus with his ghosts while his haemokinesis infected its machinery. The structure of the vehicle was drawn into the Woundshaper’s memories. The interface and critical functions of the vehicle booted in the back of his mind as slipped himself into the cleft of its structure, usurping control.
+You have it?+ Draus asked.
+Yeah,+ Avo said. +Aero’s ours. Link the windows anyway. Have Essus do his thing too.+
Chambers let out a low whistle using a ghost. +Right. Gleam. Good job, team.+
Avo ignored him. He cast his first line of communication to Denton instead.
+Five minutes,+ Avo said. +Land the aero. Go Zero-Burn. Make this as quiet as possible.+


The Glaive let out a breath he didn’t know she was holding. With a twich of her finger, the aero began its descent as Avo reinjected himself–and the others–back into the real. Rushing up from the false waters of the darkness, the Galeslither broke around him like skin shed with surface tension as he slithered out from the shade.
Sound and scent bore down on him in full as his perception of metaphysical existence narrowed into his mortal vessel. His Sagnuinity ebbed forth momentarily from his being before he compressed it further until it only cupped the aero, Denton, him, and his cadre.
REND CAPACITY [WOUNDSHAPER]: 91%
REND CAPACITY [GALESLITHER]: 4%

With how frantic the situation was, he was left without an opportunity to examine the others as they fought and fled. Standing beside him now, Draus looked much the same as she did, returning with all blemishes of damage gone from her bio-rig.
For Essus and Chambers, however, things were different.
Chambers looked healthier than he was by a magnitude or more. His skin seemed smoother, and a few concentrations of scar tissue were missing from his body. As shown by Draus and Avo time and time again, resurrections did not preclude clothing, but Chambers continued to be pantless for whatever reason.
Or a very deliberate reason.
When Avo was done using him to fix Kae, the next experiment would be to see if he could suppress whatever motivated Chamber’s degeneracy.
It was Essus that stood most apart from his prior form. His body had reverted to baseline again–unblemished by implants and naught but rubbery flesh.
The percentages of his biology had shifted back in favor of humanity.
As the former father looked down at his hands, he touched the bare skin on his chest, and felt for the burdensome implants that once projected primary effigies of his trauma. “He’s gone,” he whispered. He looked to Avo, to Draus.
A single tear rolled down his eye. He reached up and felt the hotness of the tear trickling down his index finger. He laughed. He sobbed. “Oh. I… I thought I would never–” His legs gave out from under him, but as reflexes surged in Avo and Draus, it was ultimately Denton who caught him before he could collapse.
“Alright,” Denton said, holding the man steady, but distant with casual ease. She was more than a few inches shorter than Draus, but still, she stood taller than Essus had been before his forced augmentations. “Come on.” She guided him toward the aero. “Let’s get out of here. Leave your Frames on Zero-Burn. There’s water and feed aboard.”
Wordless, she chucked the eyeball at Avo. One of his Echoheads instinctively whipped out to grab it. Draus got there first. The Regular clamped a vice-grip on his neck just as he dove forward with fangs wide, seeking to savor Tier-quality flesh.
“Mine,” Avo hissed, clawing at her to give him his prize.
“Hang in there, rotlick,” Draus said, holding the organ from a bundle of optical nerves, “gotta see if it’s got any augs in it first. You owe me an eye, remember.”
“Didn’t revert yours?” Avo asked.
Draus collapsed her helmet and shot him a grin. Her eyes flashed with the brightness of augmented circuity and scope-like optics. “They did. That don’t clear the debt none–two eyes are still two eyes. Gonna make my comparison - give it back to you if it ain’t what I want.”

He hissed at her. She cracked her neck and drew out her knotted ponytail. Seemed the Frame had adjusted her hairstyle as well.
He had to wrap his Echoheads around himself to inch inside the car. At least the interior was luxurious–of a similar make to Mirrorhead’s limo than most of the secondhand vehicles he, Draus, and Kae slummed in during their time at the Second Fortune.
Clean carpets and plush hive-like sofas dotted with mechanical buds studding gaps between the softness. A thin beam of soft light painted the interior in hues of white while the walls were lined with telemetries and visual data of the surrounding environment. He felt gravity press down on him momentarily before flattening.
Sifting through the aero’s locus, he found the functions of the internal grav controls. Intrusive curiosity took hold of him. He wondered how much force it could apply.
It was a colossal feat of will not to amp its functions to the max and test it on Chambers.
“So. Nice aero.” Chambers wiggled his eyebrows at Denton as she placed Essus in a seat. “This thing’s locus got any interesting vicarities?”

The Glaive opened her mouth to respond, but did a double take. “Where… are your pants?”

Chambers looked down. He snorted a quick apology and wrapped his coat tighter around himself. “Never got any.”

Denton frowned. She was likely thinking about how everyone else reverted to a “prime” state while Chambers continued to be… deprived.
“The answer’s simple, Silver,” Draus said, shrugging her head at Chambers. “He’s a half-strand. A real sick bastard.”

Chambers nodded, thinking that he was being praised. “I’m am the half-strand.”

The Glaive blinked. “Right.” She flicked her wrist. Avo narrowed in on the gesture as specific commands filtered through the locus. She had coded visual-haptic orders into the aero. Useful. He scanned through the mem-data for anything worth noting.
As they rose and took off, the internal gravity controls spared the need for any gimbals as they were submerged in a blanket of balance force. The walls around them depolarized from the inside as they rose up beside the silicon-shelled megablock towering over them. Cresting its height, countless other blocks of similar build broke into an asymmetric pattern a few miles into the district while coilgun-flung railways passed across the top of every edifice, the environment looking close to something like a circuit board.
“Here,” Draus said, flinging the eye at Avo without looking. He opened his jaw as it hit the roof of his mouth, and with a sudden close, he felt his orb pop upon his tongue, staining him with the flavor of sweetness while his fangs inched through the gristle of connected tissue.
Denon had grown another eye by this point. It was as if she never blinded herself at all.
Settling across from them, the ground turned transparent as well, and the aero picked up speed. Avo checked their destination for any subterfuge and found only one pre-sequenced location built into its system.
The Easy Armistice. From the mem-data, it looked like a club or some manner of joy parlor. From experience, he guessed it to be some kind of thinkeasy for smuggling phantasmics and memories or a potential front for The Deep Bazaar.
It was also the place Walton had asked him to seek just after claiming his Sangiest.
He had long delayed this moment. Firstly for the sake of killing Mirrorhead, and secondly for all the distrust bore–and continued to bear–for the Column.
Fittingly, that was when Denton started speaking. “Things weren’t supposed to turn out this way. But I think you all know how best-laid runs go.”

“Yeah,” Draus said, nodding sardonically, “they get derailed by a time-jumpin’ fuckin’ lunatic whose head explodes for no reason and ends with us stuck right under the nose of the Guilds. Just a usual job goin’ right, am I right?”

A ghost of a smirk passed over the Glaive’s face. “I’m probably not the best person to say that too, but I get your point.”

Right. She worked with Zein. Avo suddenly felt an immense spike of pity for the poor woman.
“Regardless, things didn’t go quite as planned.” Snapping her fingers, a holographic shape pulsed at the center of the aero and it showed the burning tower they saw earlier. She pointed at Draus. “You were supposed to end up inside the Fire’s Height via one of the stormtree’s portals. You with the incriminating memories. Abrel Greatling’s body and the Bloodthanes following you.” Her gaze turned over to Avo. “And the other three were supposed to pull a false-flag attack by switching between Heavens. She had a kill-list of specific Guilders and personnel you were supposed to hit. If she had you take a mini-nuke or something, it was to destabilize part of the tower’s ontology.”

“Well,” Draus said, “that sure as shit didn’t happen. She still dead?”

“No. But she will be subtler for a time. The paths are…” Denton paused and considered her next words carefully. “Aren’t something I understand, but she can’t use them for now.”
A loud deafening roar of frustration rattled the air and shook the aero. Denton blinked twice and gave a slight laugh. “Uthred Greatling just arrived late. Lucky us.”

“Yeah,” Avo said. “Lucky. Talk. Time’s running.”

“Alright,” Denton said. “Let’s start with the fact that I could have just let Naeko take you. He was within his rights, and I burned valuable intel keeping you away from the Unwhere.”
Chambers squinted his eyes and nodded. “Unwhere. Right. What-what is that?”

“Mostly a Domain of Death turned to the use of keeping Godclads contained in perpetuity.” She looked up. “Out and up in the void. A lonely and empty place.”

The Regular scoffed. “Yeah, but before that, they need to charge and sentence you proper, so I doubt you did that much. Why now? Why are you making contact with us now? Zein’s too dead and you're the piss-holder? Is that it?”

Denton frowned. “Never been called that before. The truth is we weren’t sure about it. Him. Sorry.”

Avo glared.
“You have to understand, the Frame was never meant for you–your… father helped us steal it, but we all had a candidate in mind already. Plans. Ran into complications instead. Had to burn a few cells. And then, about a month later, Zein ended up finding you while tracking the Hungers. Before that she wanted to test you more from afar, so to speak.”

“So to speak,” Avo said. It made sense about the Frame. But more importantly, it offered a truth.
Zein wasn’t omniscient. She hadn’t known until his encounter with the Hungers. She hadn’t known where he was before that. Pairing that with her sudden death, a newfound vigor swelled inside him. She could be killed. The future could be severed before it revealed overmuch.
He just needed to map out more of her blindspots.
“I’m going to keep being honest with you: we need your Frame. We need it for the Ladder. We need them to absorb the Arks. We need it to stop the end from happening.” She leaned in closer, almost unconsciously. “And we need to drain the Rash before it ruptures even more.”

The words were cast from her lips like a hammer. And suddenly, she had the fullness of his attention. A flash of Walton withering away as stillborn clumps of flesh were cut free from his sores. He said something to Avo then. Or someone.
Avo wasn’t sure anymore. The memories that made up who he was didn’t come from him.
But his father, Walton remained.

As the rain fell harder and a tide of neon and music filled the horizon, Avo broke the silence. “How long do we have?”

“Six months,” Denton said. “Maybe less. The Agnosi who… They’re dead now. No one knows the canons needed. Your Frame is our last chance before the anomalies expand. And then…” She shrugged. “Then I guess we’ll find out if there’s anything left of us to save.”

The aero’s locus pinged. They stuttered momentarily as they began their descent.
APPROACHING THE EASY ARMISTICE: 10.3 KILOMETERS
Despite their legality, thinkeasys continue to be popular with street squires and high-end memory dealers across the city. With all the restrictions and intellectual property licenses laced into various phantasmics and memories, there had to be a place where people could go to think dangerous thoughts.
With a dozen or so old golems from some defunct corp, a few bottom-sphere Fallwalkers looking for imps or favors, and a decent cell of Necros lining the exterior with Incogs, the effort it takes to shut these establishments down far exceeds the returns.
Especially if they’re also fronts for the Deep Bazaar…
-Thinkeasys: The Seen But Hidden
12-1
Appeal
Avo could feel something nested within space itself.
Lightning flashed outside their aerovec, and the silhouettes of drones spilled down with the rain as legion, sinking past the darkness of the clouds around them like dagger-tips piercing skin. Something twitched around their geometries as they rushed through the dark. Something powerful. Something unseen. The outlines of the alloyed machines pulsed and swelled in patches of gooseflesh, their shapes deformed to a faraway gaze.
There was a Heaven clawing through the concept of darkness. There was an unseen hand bending metaphysics to force more abnormal emanations via circumspect canons.

+Good thing we went with her,+ Draus said. +Think I saw another detachment of Exorcists goin’ that way. Another knot of golems too–this one might’ve been led by a clad. Not sure. Things feel… Is this how it always is for you? Always feelin’ shit movin’ in reality? Domains?+
Her voice ebbed clear through wisp-thin tendrils cultured from the bloom of his canon. Sanguinity’s Reign made the confines of the vehicle analogous to a garden to him, while his ability to mimic the vivianite of a locus allowed him the manipulation of cognition via ghosts.
When the Nether flowed as normal, it would have been a blank page compared to the greater color. But sometimes, emptiness was potential, and substance was just clutter.
The uncanny sensations rushing through her mind post-apotheosis was a flavor to sample indeed. He saved the emotions and named it “nostalgia” storing it in his Ghostjack’s patterns. He offered her but a low grunt in the affirmative.
The Domain of Shadows was being compressed by an unseen actor. But they hadn’t fully unveiled themselves, and thus, the nucleus of the anomalies could not be detected. At least until some of Draus’ thoughtstuff bled over. From her came a vicarious tightness that clenched at her Frame, a Heaven brushing her with a symmetrical domain.
“I recommend that you hold off on using your current canon,” Denton said. Glaive. Operative for Ninth Column. A woman imbued with an inhuman pattern to her cognition. Valerie Denton was yet an enigma, but Avo found her uncannily agreeable thanks to her helpfulness and open disposition.
The fact she offered him one of her eyes was no small part of the near-unwilling affability he felt toward her.
He enjoyed the way her moist-sweet eye popped upon his tongue so.
“Making too much… noise?” He asked her.
“Your ontologies aren’t manifested, so they won’t see much,” Denton elaborated. “But there are a lot of eyes out there, and even with my aero-vehicle listed as an Ori-Thaum diplomatic vessel, the Nether’s down, and anything could go.” She released a subtle sigh. “It’s not easy to stop people from peeking.”


He suspected she knew what he was using his Sanguinity for. Channeling the nature of a locus through his broadcast granted him something of a localized Nether, but he hadn’t included her in the network. Nonetheless, she could have encountered another canon like it before. Or another Heaven that supplemented a Necrojack’s capabilities.
That being said if she knew that her aero’s locus was already compromised and under his control, she didn’t show it.
Reducing his presence even further, he merely projected up to the locus and took care to keep the haemokinetic mist curtailed. He swept away the motes of blood he stained his surrounding with and drew them back into himself. “Best I can do.”

She offered him a conciliatory nod. “I’ll take it. Right now, I think Ori-Thaum, Highflame, Stormtree, and the No-Dragons are scrambling assets. A few quiet wars might’ve kicked off with your… unfortunate ascent. Again, I have to apologize on behalf of Zein. We didn’t expect–”

“Why did you want me to be a ‘Clad?” Draus said, cutting into the conversation. “What’s the angle? Heard you hawkin’ me off to the Paladin too. I wanna talk about that first.”

Denton did not stiffen, though one of her fists clenched. “After this incident, Highflame will be hosting a series of Trials between the Chivalric and Meritocrat factions. The former is weakened politically, economically, and socially, but they still hold much of the Instrumentation–and therefore, a majority of usable Frames. We want you to break their last great houses and force them into a collapse.”

Avo let out a hiss of surprise. “Straight answer. Surprising.”

“I don’t like wasting time,” Denton replied. “Regardless, for the question of why you specifically? That’s because you have history with House Greatling and it makes for inner-Guild folklore to see you ascend. Why break the Chivalrics? Because after this–and the failure to cleanly implicate them in the plot on Ambassador Kitzuhada’s life, the projections estimate chances of open conflict between the factions at sixty-five percent, and the danger of the great game becoming unbalanced in favor of the Massists at seventy-two.”

The Regular snorted with disgust. “So. All about politics, ain’t it?”

“I’m afraid most things are, Captain Draus.”

“I ain’t been a captain since I got discharged,” Draus said. “Hells. I ain’t been much of anything since then.” A cloud of curiosity passed through her thoughts. “Tell me. These uh… projections of yours from Zein or whoever. They still have me as your pawn without him?” She jabbed one of her scythe wings at Avo as he glared.
“No,” Denton said, absent hesistation. “All indications show that you would likely perish fighting in the Warrens.”

Draus chuckled and shook her head. “Damn shame, isn’t it.” She cocked her head at Avo and frowned. “Thanks for keepin’ me alive, half-strand. No dead, anyway.”

He grunted again.
For a moment, Denton seemed as if she wanted to apologize to Draus for drawing her into this. Instead, she tapped at the air, and within the confines of his Sanguinity, he watched as the incomprehensible thoughtstuff comprising her outer mind turned into grains of static which were then funneled through a needle-thin injection point.
The locus fed warnings over into Avo’s cog-feed and he found a minor anomaly centered around the back of her skull.
Another tunnel of thought narrowed outward from her mind and this time it speared into the locus. Information flooded the aero’s systems, and though Avo couldn’t comprehend the mem-data he was seeing, he could still quell the ship’s processes before they began.
Denton was presently unassailable directly. But thoughts and information were only as safe as the weakest junction along their path.
Using his Sanguinity, he stripped mass from the aero’s chassis and constructed three sheets of blood. He held them in place over the cityscape and cast out to Draus.
+Draus. Going to create some reflective constructs from the side of the aero. Make us some exits. How’s Rend?+
Paltry miracles that they were, Denton didn’t seem to notice.
She acknowledged him by linking each sheet to one of the aero’s windows. +Managable. Twelve percent. You?+

+Woundshaper’s high. Galeslither’s still in play.+


+Synced. Essus. Attune the doors. Chambers, keep an eye out for any surprises.+
+You got it, Reg,+ Chambers replied.
The unspoken plan unfolded in an instant and without obvious hints. Three nanometer-thin sheets of solidified blood snapped free from the sides of the aero as Draus linked them to nearby windows, using a flash of lightning to disguise her bindings.
Immediately, they had a few ways out in case Denton had contacted someone or decided upon greater subterfuge.
Again, the static needle reached out from Denton. Again, Avo canceled the process before it could begin in the locus.
Denton frowned, casting her thoughts out time and time again. She turned to glare at the locus, and then finally noticed the tendrils of blood digging into it. Then, slowly, she turned to look at Avo, eyes narrowing. “Huh. Well, that’s a pretty neat trick. You work just like him, you know that?”

“Walton?” Avo said, guessing.
“Yeah,” Denton continued. “He figured out a way to jack into…” She leaned in closer. “I’m not trying hurt any of you, but I understand. You can keep the process canceled if you want–I just wanted to show you the general situation of the Sovereignty right now. For insight.”

“I would’ve taken insight directly from your mind,” Avo said. “Couldn’t.”

Neither relief nor pride passed through her expression. Instead, she managed a series of three rapid blinks before speaking. “If you could, you would have a very interesting mind for an organic.”

What a peculiar statement…
“You’ve seen the Flayed Ladder, right?” Denton asked.

Something inside Avo’s mind panged like a phantom limb. He knew what the Flayed Ladder was–had seen it–but he couldn’t quite recall what it looked like. Or even if it was actually real. Even the invocation of its name filled him with a sense of dream-like reverie.
“I think so,” Avo answered.
“Yeah, that sounds like what I said the first time too. Well. The Ninth Column can offer you more truth behind the past. About the Low Masters. The Hungers. The Guilds. The mission.” She held out an open palm as if trying to implore Avo on the basis of ethical virtue. The palm turned to a fist as she met his eye. “I know you don’t feel anything for the people living here, but the Guilds have failed. You must be able to see that. I… what do you want? What can we give you.”

The uncanniness of the situation surprised Avo. And appealed. When he first emerged from The Crucible, he was loathed, feared, and used as an instrument of another’s whims. After that, he bargained, deceived, and survived. And now, someone was asking him what he wanted. Genuinely. Truly. Like there was a bargain to be struck. Like he was more than just some monster–but the fullness of a person.
Or a Godclad, rather.
Essential to their needs.
“What do I want,” Avo said, releasing a slow breath. He looked up through the transparent shell of the vehicle and turned to stare at the pearlescent mountain that was the Tiers, which gleamed even through the clouds that tumbled from its precipices, which bled an endless onslaught of steel and flesh down to survey the aftermath of the chaos.

He thought of his experiences then. Of his deaths. Of Jhred Greatling, who presented himself as a being of impossible power but died as a shattered child. Of his sister, now a prisoner of the Paladins in flesh, and in sway to Avo in mind. Of Req, and Lucille, and Kae, and all the ones who couldn’t fight for themselves. And of the Low Masters and their Hungers, along with all their rank avarice and stupidity.
Finally, Avo thought of Walton. Walton, and then himself.

To ward against uncertainty, he borrowed an answer. It would be a good place to start.
“Want to see all the colors,” Avo said, still looking at the Tiers. “And want to taste all the flavors that are. That will be.” He regarded Denton again, her eye fixed on him, unblinking. “Up. That is where our enemies are. Yes?”

The ghost of a smirk passed through her. “Our enemies?”

“Will they surrender my Frame? Accept me into their world?”

She shook her head slowly. “I’m afraid not, Avo. I’m afraid not.” She leaned in. “Can I show you all something? I need you to stop blocking the locus. If you feel like something’s wrong, you have the power to kill me or kill the transmission at any time. You know this. So, there’s no real danger to you.”

If there’s one thing to be said about Denton, it’s that she was skilled at making you feel at ease. Avo sought Draus’ approval, requiring a second instinct to be paired with his. The Regular gave him a cock of the head and briefly glanced at the windows.
Right. They had more than one implant under the skin.
Avo let the mem-data flow.
Holo-haptic interfaces splashed into shape around them from a collage of viewpoints. Spawned without sound, each scene played an angle of devastation and tragedy. Golems were sifting through a sea of rubble, some taking the form of water, spilling through the debris to ferry out the living, others lifting toppled megablocks using telekinetic fields.
More often than once, buildings were turned over and the remains of their inhabitants came out as a spill.
Essus moaned in horror and clutched his head. His mind screamed with trauma and strain. Avo offered to take the memories from him and spare him the pain.
“No,” Essus said. It took an immensity of will to pry his hands free from his face. “No. I will face this. I will face it. I cannot keep running. There is nowhere to–” His voice trailed off. From a viewpoint, a lone man pawed through rock and ash, digging until he found a small hand sticking out from beneath a fallen wall.
He looked under.
And hope betrayed.
They watched as the man broke, sinking down to his knees as he collapsed to sob against atop the ruins, a lone FATELESS survivor among machines and Guilders.
A low note of resigned despair whistled out from Essus. “Was this deliberate? Did you show this to me to wound?”

There was no lull in Denton’s response. “Yes..” She gesticulated at the images being played to them. “These images are from our field asset, ‘Sunrise.’ This place was Nu-Scarrowbur. Your flight through the district lasted approximately seven minutes and forty-nine seconds. Approximately sixty-eight percent of the district is in ruins. We… haven’t gotten a good estimate on all the dead yet, but we expect it to be substantial.”

“Shit that happens when ‘Clads fight,” Draus answered.
“Exactly, but also two problems. The first is that Stormtree’s seasonal economy will undoubtedly be affected by this. The spike in death is one thing, but the lack of surviving inhabitants means that–by the Treaty of Kosgan–the replacement rate for the population will drop in the future. Stormtree will likely sue to be compensated for forecasted losses against Highflame. And even before then, when the Thanatechs dig through the dead, they’ll find some with their Essence and ghosts already drained. Jhred Greatling too.”

That problem had always been in the back of Avo’s mind. He disregarded it for a time, but it seemed he couldn’t evade it forever. “So. They’ll know where I’ve been.”

“The ones who know about the Stillborn Frame, yes,” Denton said. She leaned in closer to Avo. “‘Our enemies’ will stop at nothing to get what’s grafted to you back. You said you want to kill them–eat them–it doesn’t matter. We’ll support you on this. We don’t want to control you–we want to enable you. To give you the means to make them hurt. And divert their attention while giving you room to operate.”

“But let me guess,” Draus said.”You’ll probably have things you want us to do. People you need snuffed. Minds you need nulled. Heavens you need stolen.”

“The future is variable in its demands, Higher Draus,” Denton said. “We’re just trying to make sure there keeps being a future.”

ATTENTION: 200 METERS TO THE EASY ARMISTICE
Directing his mind outside the aero’s sensors, Avo gazed outside and saw nothing but cluttered airspace and hints of hidden power scurrying over the skin of existence. Light twitched. Darkness warped. The winds didn’t flow right.
All the world was made up of Heavens. And every last Heaven belonged to an enemy.
How total was his opposition?
And just where were they going? “Don’t see anything? Where is The Easy Armistice.”

Denton injected another thought into the sky. Avo wondered if this was one of her canons, or if something else facilitate her transferrence of mem-data from so far away. Each time her thoughtstuff widened before fusing thin into a needle-point. “Don’t worry,” she said. “I’m just signaling for a shortcut.”

And then, at her command, the aero began to juke up and down in odd angles and directions.
Up. Up. Down. Down. Left. Right. Left. Right.
Then, suddenly, it stalled to a hover, before Avo could respond, it accelerated again.
+Passage still open?+ Avo asked Draus, as he eyed his surroundings warily.
+Yeah,+ Draus said, frowning at what was happening.
Suddenly, the engine of the vehicle cut out.
Chambers blinked. “Was that part of the sign–”

He didn’t get to finish his question as they suddenly sank down into a spatial divot.
“Chief Paladin Naeko. What do you think you are doing?”

“Arreth–Arresting you. Why? What’s it to you?”

“I’m being arrested!”

“Oh. Well, then. If you don’t resist, you won’t be hurt. Everything will be fine and keen.”

“This is… you.... Age has finally frayed the last of your senses you flatblooded mongrel–”
“Ambassador Kitzuhada. A moment. Did you know this elder here has been accused in a plot ending with your assassination?”

“These… these assertions are–”

“I have the mem-data to prove it. You see, under the Articles, I know I can’t keep you. Really grinds my teeth how we Paladins are pretty much just left around here to deal with the stray golem problem and some Newsouled Fallwalkers, but every now and again, I get something that just brightens my day. How long have you been planning his death? Wait, don’t tell me. We’ll get it out of you in confession.”

“I demand legal championship.”

“And you’ll have it.” [Samir Naeko leans in] “And you’ll have a whole lot more, see. That ‘little’ bit of mem-data? That’s a bit more than just your plot to kill the Ambassador here. I know about Godshaper.”

“I… I…”

“Yeah. I know what you did to Kae Kusanade. And I know how you murdered Paladin Dawton Morrow. You should have never touched mine. You really shouldn’t have. It’s going to be bad for your health. But I’m not mad. No. I’m not mad at all. Do you see this smile? I’m calmer than I’ve been in years. You better get some good counsel, because when we’re done, you and your pet Greatling are going to spend a lot of time in the dark.”

“Greatling… I…”

“I, Chief Paladin Samir Naeko, hereby invoke Article Nine against Council Elder Mwaba D’Rongo. I have with me verified mem-data and a witness of the third degree. All stay your hands from steel or face the Sage… Seriously? No one? Wow. Sensible party, Ambassador. I… a bit disappointed, not gonna lie. Say, where did Uthred go?”
-High Paladin Samir Naeko at the Fire’s Height


12-2
The Easy Armistice (I)
Geometry stabilized as they inverted back upright, the sensation was as if rolling when submerged. Yet, as the aero finished its revolution, Avo found it clamped by the curved claws of four magnetics as a ramp lowered and extended before them.
He cast his first thoughts almost reflexively, needing to confirm if their exits were still viable. +Draus. Passages. Still connected to your Heaven?+
+Still feel the junctions,+ she replied. Her disorientation lasted shorter than his. +Hells. Think we just got pulled somewhere by a Heaven of Geometry.+ She turned her attention to Denton. “That dip how you lose tails? Bet you got plenty more spots like that.”

The Glaive simply answered with a tilt of her head. “Coming out from an airdock leaves fewer questions.” Her eyes snapped over to Avo. “You can stop using your canon now. There isn’t the need anymore.”

It took a beat for Avo to realize Denton was speaking to him. It took him another to notice strings of mem-data spilling into his cog-feed as visual and phantasmal information began to flow through.
His DeepNav interface was the first thing to reactivate within his Metamind. Other functions and phantasmal constructs followed shortly thereafter.
Avo drew in a breath and released his Sanguinity.
REND CAPACITY [WOUNDSHAPER]: 93%
Dehydration had a way of making one dream of drowning.
The same way the lack applied to water or sustenance, the same way Avo felt toward the Nether itself. Yearned for the Nether.
Even with his newest canons, his Nether-projection was a blank canvas he could reach across, a cloud of limited influence and finite design. There were no colors of existence in it–nothing but an empty lake he could guide his reach through.
An ocean was more than just a body of water. There was an environment there. Fish. Life. A partition between the stygian depths and shimmering heights. A place where the uncountable masses could bob upon the surface, where good Necros held the twilight, the middling ones remained as wrecks at the bottom, and the best swam the same down trenches and upon surfs alike.
Animation, in a word. More than even life.
And it was here, approximately two thousand five hundred miles away that hydration returned to him, and his thoughtstuff ebbed out into the waters of the Nether, sailing no more on broadcasts of blood.
Thoughtcasts and public wavelengths ebbed and brushed the yolk of his outer mind. His Meta hummed as countless new requests and points of interest populated his cog-feed. Ambient music played something between a heartbeat and a drum as the clamps deactivated and the aero moved forward, slipping out from the diminutive airdock back into the city.
Turning forward, towers rose like broken bones jutting free from the litter of lesser megablocks. At the heart of the city before them, aerolanes orbited an immense voidship that bifurcated the district entirely. Aerolanes spilled out from its exposed interior like veins leaving an alloyed aorta, each expansion sprawling down into the lower blocks below.
In an instant, they washed into the lower lanes and dissolved into the depths of the district like particulates in a bloodstream, distant aeros enshadowed by clashing lights cast against the backdrop of the spade-shaped voidship.
Other aeros of various make and style blended into the urban thicket, passing the gloss of holographic light and blurring phantoms. Cybernetic organisms resembling the bastard offspring of dragonflies and metallic stingrays glided from building to building, suckling away at filth and rust. A square-shaped megablock deconstructed itself cube by cube, its circuitry and matter untethering, unlacing, the Omnitech logo pulsing over each side of the parting vessels. From the apex of the voidship, the rest of the cityscape descended in uneven steps, blocks summited by blocks, ringed by streets that blanketed other streets below.
This, more than shield-blocks of Nu-Scarrowbur, more than the quaint flesh-woven communities of Xin Yunsha, more than any section of the lower Warrens, was a hive festering with life.
And death.
Traces of gunfire flitted out from bridges. An aero dove a near mile away–not fast enough to avoid the missile chasing it. As a fiery wreckage tumbled past and down before them, one of the manta-flies leaped free from heights unobserved and wrapped it in a protective embrace before spewing a cocoon of paste-like substance from its pores.
Here was a demonstration of controlled violence. A murder or two kept the city lubricated, but these were the dredges of New Vultun–these lives had a speck of economic worth beyond the instant of their deaths.
Some were expendable. Others had to be spared.
Opening his Metamind to the public wavelengths, Avo drank in the atmosphere properly as he sampled the gestalt around him.
“Well, consangs,” Denton breathed, marking a specific shanty built within the voidship’s exposed interior, “Welcome to Loathing.”
DISTRICT - [LOATHING]
POPULATION - 122 MILLION
PRIMARY EXPORTS - DRONE-JOCKS; WAR-WIGHTS; GRAV-LEAGUE
WOULD YOU LIKE THE LATEST NEWS? THINK [YES] TO DOWNLOAD PUBLIC ACCESS MEMORIES
[FREE VICARITIES FOR DOWNLOAD]
YOU HAVE [123213921321921421] GHOST-LINK REQUESTS
Now, more than ever before, Avo felt back in his element. The Spine was too sparse. Too undefended. Here, he felt the light rattle of a few low-end mem-cons shattering against his wards, noticed sloppily sequenced Auto-Seances planted in public-open lobbies, already tasted the choking stench of mass-emotional spillover.
Rage and hope and joy and satisfaction and despair all poured into one big plascrete cauldron of life stacked upon life.
Accretions spread across the city like an outbreak of the Rash. No place to avoid them–the population was simply packed in too tight.
And by Jaus did they have a lot to say regarding each other.
+LOCAL EXORCISTS CONTINUE TO MOURN THE LOSS OF THEIR OWN, INCLUDING–+

+THE CITY CONTINUES TO REEL FROM THE TRAUMA OF RECENT EVENTS. THE LIGHT’S END MEMORIAL FUND WILL GIFT ONE FREE PHLACTERY PER TEN MILLION IMPS MATCHED. IF WE MANAGE TO REACH ONE HUNDRED MILLION, ONE FREE FATE WILL BE GRANTED TO A LUCKY WINNER! ONE FREE FATE! AND AS A BONUS, TWELVE FREE PHYLACTERIES! PRE-ORDER NOW AND GET YOUR SECOND CHANCE TODAY!+
+ALL GRAYS ARE FUCKING HALF-BIRTHED SHIT-SPAWN! The next time I see a fucking Gray I’m going to kill them and null their nu-dog–+
+Shut the fuck up, Gold, I’m tried of you half-strands walking around like you own the Crash–+

+--Fucking Reds creep the shit outta me. All gestalt this and Broken Dreamer that. And what the hells are up with those implants–+

+No one’s more a half-strand than one of those Sang flesh-fuckers. Poor nu-cat didn’t deserve that.+
+Godsdamned Ori-Thaum Incubi did that to Yuulden-Yang–and it’s not a conspiracy– it’s not! I can prove it!+
+You know, tell me this–if we’re opening the bar up to those Scaarthians and the other Greens, are we going to let the nu-dogs and other critters drink at the table as well? I mean, it’s only fair.+
+We should have finished glassing Yulassafar and ended those Sanctus shits for good. Fuckin’ cracks…+
+You’re Ashthrone? Shit. I think we need to stop seeing each other. Why? Because you’re part of a suicide cult!+

+We should just take it from the Voiders. Yeah. I mean. What can they do to stop us? They don’t have the means–they’re afraid of the Sunderwilds. We can hit ‘em there. Start at Zero-Burn and make our way up before raiding one of their ships. Keep it subtle. Who’s to know? And if we do this right, who’s to tell?+
Essus groaned as he clutched his head, the sheer flow of external thought endless and constant, torrents tearing through his very mind. Beside him, Chambers had his face pressed up against the window as his eyes lit with a child-like glee. “Fuck me, consangs. Look at all those aeros just in one lane. Look at all those people.”

True to his words, they didn’t so much slide into the nearest aerolane as they squeezed, the traffic nigh-constant and the space minimal. And with how much flowing blood Avo could feel in the nearness of his vicinity, it seemed a good majority of the surrounding occupants weren’t jocking their aeros from afar but active passengers within.
Draus cocked her head at the voidship. “That one went down a couple centuries ago, didn’t it? That’s the one the Low Masters dropped. Before they were called the Low Masters proper.”

Again, a needle of thoughtstuff narrowed out from Denton’s mind. “Yes, indeed,” she let out a breath. “The official documentation of events said it was due to a humanitarian dispute. Voidwatch was extracting Nolothi refugees after some kind of thaumic catastrophe. The High Masters then didn’t take very kindly to that. Turns out, voidship EGIs don’t link very well with ghosts.”

That statement piqued Avo’s interest. “Didn’t know ghosts could interface with coldtech. Can see… outlines of cognition. Can’t access.”

Denton shrugged. “I suppose your father’s predecessors found a way to simulate how an artificial mind thought and dreamed. It’s the only real explanation. Us Idheimers can’t really… conceptualize on the same level.”

He hid his growing suspicion from her well.
+The EGI Core,+ Draus said, her words a whisper in his mind. +That’s how they did it. They didn’t need to build any phantasmics or trauma patterns from scratch–they had a weapon half-cast and ready for use already.+
+They had minds that knew how to use it,+ Avo replied. And now it was his. Chancing another peek at Denton’s Metamind, he considered the implications of that which he possessed. When this was done, his first priority was Kae. After that, he would need to examine his new sanctuary further.
With such a thought in mind, he activated the Auto-Seance he had connected to the EGI Core in the George Washington. To his dismay, it didn’t answer.
Of course it didn’t.
With how it allowed the Nether to flow through shadows and darkness, this weakness was unavoidable. The Thoughtwave Detonation had destabilized the Nether local to its area.
He wondered if there was a way he could turn off or tune the permeability of his gateways.
It took them the better part of twenty minutes to traverse five point four miles. They were forced to halt for a moment when a knot of golems carried by a prismatic delta shot past them.
At the same moment, the district came alive with chatter.
+Stay out of the Green Quarter. A couple of Bloodthanes just got into it with a Fallwalker. Not full Heavens fallen yet but some casualties. No deaths though. Thank Jaus for Woundhounds.+
The moment passed. A ping out went out from Draus as she sent him a memory. She was pulling on something. Guiding a piece of glass over two thousand miles away without strain or burden. Her junctions let her reach far and observe the scene they left behind.
She sent him a snapshot of a sky lined with pillar-shaped golems that scarred the firmament with their transparent tendrils, of countless knots amassing between three different factions.
+Stormtree, No-Dragons, and Highflame are squarin’ up,+ she said. +Sure as shit glad we pulled our vanishin’ act.+
He grunted in agreement but found himself more fascinated by a new emotion leaking over from her.
Uncertainty.
+You gleam?+ Avo asked.
A large mantafly passed over them, casting its vast shadow over three rows of aeros. Between its ventral teeth dripped sizzling acid and dolloping slag from melted garbage.
Draus shook her head. She looked confused. Uncharacteristically uncertain.+Nah. I uh… I like it.+


+What?+
+The Heaven,+ she said, clarifying. +I like havin’ it already. I like using it. Seein’ out from it. Making things glass and feelin’ it break because I decide it should–people break because I decide they should.+ She paused. +There’s no balance in this kind of killin’. Ain’t no weight for me to feel. It’s like… doin’ numbers in my head.+
A faint understanding grew inside him. +Afraid becoming a ‘Clad will pervert your nature? Make you… less you?+
Draus laughed. Denton’s eye swept over both of them but said nothing.
+I was a Reg, Avo? My mind was conditioned to be as adaptive as my body was. But I do have preferences. I know there are kinds of thinkin’ that just leave you trapped.+ She turned and regarded him. +Say, you still got that Morality Injector of yours? Haven’t felt you use it since…+

+You want me to adapt it for you?+ Avo asked. +Help you feel the weight of a kill?+
A pause cut into their conversation. +I just don’t wanna feel like it’s nothin’ is all. Hells. Us fleein’ across Nu-Scarrowbur probably killed how many people? And it was like nothin’. Fightin’ the Wargskins, snuffers, street scum, and all kinds of other half-strands ain’t nothin’ to speak about but… there’s still the flechettes you gotta dodge. Angles to take. Assaults to plan. This? There’s no… there’s no weight.+
Another project after Kae then. Something he could potentially benefit from himself, even.
He had more than enough ghosts now to fuel the need for experimentation.
That, and he had Chambers to test things on.

Avo glanced at the ex-enforcer babbling again at the beleaguered Essus, pointing out different blocks and places he wanted to see later. Neither of them had been this far up, Avo realized. But where one viewed this as a triumph and an adventure, the other could only brace against the strain.
+I’ll see what I can do,+ Avo replied.
They split off from the aerolanes as they closed within a mile of the voidship. Pulling public mem-data, Avo learned that it was ninety-eight miles long and a fourth as wide. Its hull seemed something metallic and crystalline, the surrounding city lights revealing a slight bismuth to its hue.
Aside from that, however, the voidship was notable in its near-featurelessness. No blemish nor bruise disfigured its exposed aspects, and though its interior was pulled open to reveal a spiral staircase of quick-fabbed structures infested with bars building to overlook various circuits, the opening was characterized by mottled edges rather than outright damage.
Something in Avo suspected that the vessel had adjusted itself to be this way–its matter as fluid and freeform as the George Washington.
As they slipped past the lip into the interior, a slight smile played across Denton’s face. “Do any of you have a favorite drink? It’ll be on the house.”

And as their aero angled up and twisted, various spiraling stacks of urban detritus vanished from sight, the Easy Armistice spilled into view as they rotated rightward, more of it loading into existence with each degree.
Avo blinked.
Chambers rose from his seat, shifting his head the other way and then back again. Slowly, a wide grin spread across his face. “Alright. That might just be the single most nova watering hole I’ve ever seen.”
Heavens are comprised of a unified retelling of a story. This is what makes them so hard to counter–they don’t need to make exact sense in the broad scheme of things, but as long as enough people repeat the same rituals and mutter the same prayers and worship the same scripture, a sort of pattern forms in existence.
Something that lets the Heaven embed itself into a few central concepts.
Where hubris and Rend come in are curious as well. From the accounts we’ve collected, hubris seems to be born of logical pitfalls or hard limitations as stated in their mythology.
Take the Sangeist for example. How blood works around that thing is absolute nonsense, right? But we know this: It can use its blood and mimic the general qualities of solid matter while still maintaining its own. Two things about this. One is that solid matter means literally anything that seems “solid” from the perspective of the worshippers that defined it. This means structures like fissile material or adamantine can be adapted to their structures.
The expression of said materials can get… strange, though.

But not antimatter. And not a hydrogen cell. Magma is… more of a variable thing depending on if it's flowing or not. They can do it if it's not moving but the effects are… confusing for the Heaven to say the least.
The Daemon, however. That’s something else. From our current suspicions, our best guess is that the Heavens still have some latent memories of the entities they once housed, allowing their users to wield them with almost no learning curve, and this is enough left behind that when something blatantly blasphemous or… “out of character” occurs, so to speak, it risks awakening inside the user as well–the connection between the forming a metacognitive link.
All this is to say operate with caution. The Ruptured function on a few shared restrictions, but most of their rules vary wildly.
When there are Heavens for everything from dogs to soundwaves, your best chances of staying safe are staying away and staying aware.
-Orientation on Frames and Heavens for Planetside Assets, Node “Aegis”, Voidwatch
12-3
The Easy Armistice (II)


The first layer of the Easy Armistice unveiled itself with the aero’s slow rotation. With each inch they turned, the foreground unzipped, revealing a bright new horizon through a blurred cleft of space.
Looking back to gaze upon the sprawling shanties below, Avo found them wobbling before its sight, their geometric outlines jiggling like vibrating strings. Nausea painted Essus’ expression as he swallowed sour spit.
“We’re transitioning,” Denton explained. A low frequency followed her words, the pitch light but constant, rising and falling in a repetition of patterns. “The turning’s for aligning ourselves with the signal. Too fast and we miss the frequency. Too slow and the curtain doesn’t lift.”

“Heaven of Pitches?” Avo said. “Or geometry?”

The Glaive shook her head. “The Easy Armistice is special-made. Heaven of Signals.” As the world around them brightened, the interior of the voidship dulled away into the background. It was like all other than the Easy Armistice was losing focus, dissolving into faint clashes and dappled light and muted sound.
The pitch spiked. The glass of the wielded squealed momentarily before the Twice-Walker passed beneath its translucence and pinched it still.
“It wasn’t going to break,” Denton said, reassuring Draus.
The Regular didn’t reply.
Enshadowed within the light, the Armistice resembled something in the shape of a hanging acorn at the heart of the radiance. Light spread out, enveloping the aero as the frequency rose to its apex.
Avo hissed as he felt a spike of pain pulse throughout his cochlea. The violence of his reaction made Chambers jerk back in his seat.
“Uh, you alright, consang?” the man asked.
The light began to settle. Casting his gaze out through the vehicle’s sensors, he found himself in a place shrouded by a canopy of titanic brambles and spilling leaves. Through crevices offered by wrestling branches fell the first spills of miracle-infused light.
Bathed in the rays, Avo felt his injury promptly dissolve.
“I feel a nearness to this place,” his Woundshaper said. “Something that once belonged to our Domain of Biology shares an origin to the mythos that covers this realm within a realm.”
“Must we stay,” the Galeslither said. ‘Must we linger? This is a cage… This is a trap. We must be free. We must—”
“Calm yourself, mule. This eventuality has been prepared. Let the huntress serve her purpose. You just be prepared to serve yours.”
A low note of discontentment mantled the Galeslither’s emotions. “I rode free once. Now I am debased. Mine is not shadow. Mine was storm and sky and message. Mine was–”
“Past and lost!” The Woundshaper cut it off. “We are all past and lost! Struck down by the children–struck down by the ephemerals and partlings. Hewn from our foundations. What shame, I ask? Let us fall, I say. If the tower cannot stand upon the base that was built, then it was never a tower to be.”
The Heavens argued on thereafter, sparring within the gilded cage that was his Frame. He himself found more interest in examining the establishment that was the Armistice.
“Acorn” was no longer an apt enough descriptor for its general shape–the word “beehive” had to be added as well. Crenulations lined with uncounted aerodocks dotted the underside of the structure’s emerald composition and from its base spilled ran an endless thread that expanded into the plane around him, weaving into the boundless awning that enwreathed them so.
Three miles long and two wide, the upper second of the thinkeasy emerged as a geodesic dome painted with flowing ghosts peddling products and memories. A spiral of advertisements and banned sequences flowed across its polarized exterior offering inventories of cutting-edge weaponry, Tier-category implants, Incubi-specific phantasmics, expert-rating vicarities, banned Pre-Godsfall literature, squadrons of grid-linked assault drones, and most surprisingly of all, discounted golems burning a similar Heaven to that which Chambers’ new Soul enkindled.
New Vultun was a city of vultures as much as it was a city of predation. Opportunity was endless. The only question was if you had the mettle to take before others could seize.
As they approached, a pair of triple-jointed leg transplants turned into sight–SkuldRunner parkour prosthesis. Allowed for rapid omnidirectional movement. This was purely a sports model–for leisure instead of combat from the lack of armoring. The only thing that might have appealed to his group was the free GTG Particle Cutter that came with it. Customarily, the Particle Cutter came with five Woundhound injectables to deal with the inevitable bouts of resulting cancer.
“Whoa,” Chambers breathed as he scanned the ads. “Avo–Avo, they got full sheathe conversion. Avo check this shit out! Wait, Avo we can sell our organs over and over–We can’t die. Holy shit, we’re gonna be swimming in imps. Fuck, I’m gonna buy so much shit…”

Avo studied the man as he brushed over mem-con after mem-con, accepting unverified ghost-link after ghost-link. It grew obvious how his mind turned into the festering midden that it was, but as nothing assailed him, Avo found himself impressed.
Whoever ran N-Sec for the Easy Armistice held their stray Necros on a strict regimen. Usually, it took Guild-level infrastructure to enforce lobbies this clean, private though they might be.
As they drew closer, one of the aerodocks on the underside flashed twice and mem-data booted through the aero’s locus.
AEROVEC: SVLR-FTD-G9998 INBOUND
“Got a special parkin’ spot for your lonesome?” Draus asked.
“Something like that,” Denton replied. She shot Chambers’ exposed skin a look and her expression flinched, a frown threatening to come over her. “We’re also going to need to fix that.”

Chambers turned around to look at her. “Hm?”

Pulling up on the sofa pads, she slid open a storage compartment and ruffled through the contents for a moment. Frowning slightly, her hand emerged with a diamond-studded pair of pale leather pants.
Avo sniffed. One of his Echoheads crackled. He knew that scent.
Ghoul-leather.
He saw Draus staring at him from the corner of his eye. She knew as well. A byproduct of her ghoul slaughtering days, no doubt.
“I don’t have anything larger than this,” Denton said. “Thankfully, your morphology isn’t overly modified so–”

Hands blurred. Chambers snatched the pants out from her grasp. Denton blinked, caught off guard by how fast he accepted the item. “I love it.” He pulled it close and took a sniff before running the diamonds down the sides of his face. His mop of hair bounced as he bobbed in his seat with giddy delight, humming about his new pants.
“Thanks a bunch, consang.” He drew his knees up at the same time and kicked out, fully exposing himself once more before sliding his legs down into the pants. “Al-right. No more Rash-risk. For now.” He mimed gun noises with his fingers as he swept them across everyone, pausing at Denton. “Ah. Thanks a bunch, Silver. I gotta say, I used think all you Ori-fuckers were a bunch of mind-jumping perverts, but you know what? You’re different. I wouldn’t mind if you’re a pervert.”
“I… yes,” Denton said. The nod she gave was as slow as a snail swimming through molasses. In her other hand were a pair of clean boxers. She put them back, seeing as Chambers had neither noticed nor asked for any additional coverings. “Glad to be of service.”

When they landed, Draus removed the thin sheets from each of the aero’s windowpanes and wrapped them around her arms to preserve their escape options. Behind their translucence, he could sense the Twice-Walker trailing them, Draus’ anchored in all nearby reflections.
“Just in case,” she said.

Denton frowned. “Just make sure you don’t hurt anyone. There’s only one way into the Easy Armistice but many, many ways out. They just need to tune you out from the frequency.”

That offered some clue to how the demiplane comprised itself. Frequency. Wavelengths perhaps? Or just sounds marking different individuals or spaces? Either way, it made protecting this place easy. Preventing unwanted entry or removing unruly guests might just require a slight tuning and nothing more.
The aero’s doors slid open and a cherry-sweet aroma filled the air as a quartet of floating drones latched onto the vehicle to begin necessary maintenance. While the drones worked, the light outside dimmed as blast doors closed around the exterior, masking the canopy beyond from sight.
Here was another thing that the Spine didn’t have much of–automated services and logistical functionality. Things were maintained up here.
Walton had said something about this phenomenon. The closer one was to the Maw, the more actively their lives took on the traits of entropy and decay. The further away, however, toward the sky, the Tiers, and the void itself, humanity began a courtship with immortality by means of alloy or apotheosis.
“Come on,” Denton said, guiding them toward a closed entry that looked like a gnarled bark clasped in a mockery of interlocking ribs.“Time to get you all connected.” Her Metamind pulsed and a static lance carried her thoughtstuff through walls and across miles. Low sequences of shrieking notes sounded, and in that instant followed amber-hued light and the soft song of a muted horn.
The wood from the bark slid back into the emerald superstructure and the path before them cleared.
“That a Heaven too?” Draus asked.
Denton entered the passage. “Everything here is part of a Heaven. You’ll get used to it.”


“Don’t reckon this place is Rend-cheap.”

“Privacy begets a premium in this urban panopticon, Captain Draus.”
Convenience was another hallmark of the city’s heights. Here, the structures of existence could be remolded to suit the needs of the individual, with distances shrunk and verticalities altered through the whims of the basest canons.
After a month of being a Godclad, Avo felt a deeper kinship forming between him and New Vultun.
A city of predation.
A city of vultures.
A city of technology and mythology entwined.
But ultimately, a city of presiding stories.
That was what a Heaven was in the end: Overriding narratives told in place of what was.
“Whoa,” Chambers said as they arrived at the heart of the thinkeasy. “It’s gonna take me a while to get used to this.”

A single tree-like pillar spun in place before them, a vast structure that stretched vertically for three miles. Its entire expanse was parted into five different platforms, and impossibly, there were people sitting and walking on both ends, be they upright or upside down.
The constant buzz of shuttling service drones deepened the hive-like theme presented by the Armistice. Holocoated bodies with heavily warded Metas formed the bulk of the clientele and as Avo took in his surroundings, he found them walking across every flat surface.
“Gravity adheres to different rules here,” Denton said, waving at the pillar before them. “That’s the center. Force comes out from that and presses down on everything with an edge. Don’t jump off the sides or you’ll be falling at terminal velocity in endless loops. The drones will have to catch you, but they won’t be gentle about it.”

“You speakin’ from experience?” Draus asked, eyes darting from point to point as she took in her surroundings. Doubtless, she was considering her exposure, her potential angles of attack or defense.
He couldn’t fault her – his own preoccupation in the present was not so different as he scried at the Necrotheurgic talent present.
From the wards alone, he wasn’t in milk-run territory anymore. They weren’t Incubi, but judging from most of the accretions around him, competence was the expected baseline. These were seasoned street squires and snuffers at the very least. A few offered hints of potential above that.
A link shot out from Denton’s mind, hooking out to capture a passing drone as it flashed red and then green. “I got us a booth. If any of you are hungry or thirsty, there’s a scan-in menu in place. My associates will be joining us shortly. We can talk in-depth then.”

“Might we know one of them,” Draus said, her voice edged with thin disdain.
“I doubt it,” Denton replied. “As I said before, the old woman will probably be occupied for a while.”


The supposed booth she procured was a small alcove that sunk inward from the side of the cylinder surrounding the central pillar. The sensation of stepping over the threshold and expecting to fall before gravity adjusted to their sense of verticality was uncanny, but in moments, they found themselves situated around a risen marble table lit by a hovering locus.
Soft frequencies continued to play from speakers embedded into the walls, their notes masked by the somber melody of a strange wind-based instrument. There was sourness in the music. A certain feeling of longing and nostalgia he couldn’t quite place.
“You like it?” Denton said. Avo turned to regard her.
“Don’t know the instrument.”

“It’s called a saxophone. The player’s name was Osjon Coldtrain, I think. He was a Voidwatch musician. Old. Very old.” She smiled faintly as the notes continued to flow. “You know this song is banned, right? This, along with its entire genre? Supposedly, there was an attempt to make a Heaven out of them. It went wrong. It went bad.”

“New rhyme same as the fuckin’ first,” Draus said. “Now. Where’re your consangs? We’ll hear what you got to say but you gotta forgive us if we ain’t feelin’ all that patient after today.”

“Of course,” the Glaive said. “The two of them should be–”

A holocoated figure fell over the alcove. “Sorry, Denton. Got caught up putting her in the corner. So. Is this our little band? A victim, some half-strand, a Color-Puppet, and a rotlick.” He laughed. There was an unnaturally silken quality to his voice, with the way he spoke almost alluring to the ears. “Godsdamned do the fates frown on us.”
“Just sit down, Cas,” Denton said.
His answer was lost to a low humming chorus of bees that flooded in over the edge.
To Avo’s disbelief, the ghostly faintness of thoughtstuff wove between them, like their interconnected mind was a cloud of cognition from pheromones and hive-like synchronicity.
“Sorry,” the swarm buzzed as they fused into a ball. “We had some delays. The Paladins nearly looped half of us off.”
Chambers blinked. “Are these fat fleas talking to us?”

The swarm formed the vague approximation of a frowning face. “I’m Sunrise, and it's more like I'm a collection of bees.”
Essus’ leaned over the table and frowned. “And what is a… bee?”

Somehow, the collection of insects managed to sigh.
Don’t fuck with the voiders.
I’m serious, consangs. Just don’t.
I know the other Guilds talk about Voidwatch and their “Enjoined Governing Intellects” like they’re the soft, coldtech version of Omnitech, but the truth is they’re better than us. Older than us. Hell. If it weren’t for them, we’d be nothing more than savages now. A bunch of broken half-strands living in shit-heaps worshiping our new Fallwalker gods.
But here's the thing. They won’t touch thaumaturgy or necrotheurgy; they treat it like poison. Anything to do with the gods or the eldritch, I guess. And considering how the rest of the big black yonder is beyond Idheim, I don’t think I can blame ‘em.
I did a run for them once. A simple retrieval job. They lent me this gun–well, it was more battle platform than gun. Best godsdamned weapon I ever got to fire. Doesn’t run out of bullets. Lets you know everything in a two-hundred-kilometer radius. Everything. Aratnid nests, aeros, heartrates, hostile loadouts. I managed to shoot the loci out a bunch of golems using it.
Fifth best day of my life.
I’ll tell you, if they ever decide to end their little restriction on gods, we’re done. It’s their planet by then and they can just do what they want. But the question keeps coming back to that, doesn’t it?
If Souls and Heavens put a bunch of up-jumped savages like us on the same pedestal as the titans of the void, just what the hells made the last surviving power in this Ruptured galaxy choose Idheim as their hiding spot?
-Quail Tavers, School of the Warrens
12-4
The Frame (I)
Sunrise was not from Idheim. That was clear to Avo from a glance.
The more he studied the swarm’s thoughtstuff, the more he found himself lost in its phantasmal symphony. Strings of mem-data flowed between each one of its “bodies” like liquid circuitry. As such, its mind did not form an accretion of thoughtstuff so much as it did a kaleidoscopic lattice. Bathed in its perceptive exhale, the reality behind the swarm’s sapience was never in doubt, but a puzzling curtain of static integers spilled from its hive-link mind.
The sinews of its dreams were ones, zeros, and symbols beyond Avo’s comprehension, the presence of unknown technology and withheld gnosis similar to the mystery that crowned Denton.
“Ms. Denton, could you please tune the frequency for our table,” Sunrise said. Its words came as a buzzing melody, the ball of thickened insects vibrating outward from the core as if a dense cloud rippling from its nucleus.

“Play Hendricks. I want to hear some strings.” The other newcomer said this as he settled in next to Denton, stepping down into the alcove and suddenly rotating ninety degrees upright.
His invertedness was more than literal. Where Denton and Sunrise had their minds warped by coldtech, the man’s thoughstuff ran as solid and round as any self-aware creature born on Idheim. Even his aesthetic ran counter to the woman he sat beside. A flashy holocoat obscured his body from sight as he hid behind a veil of strobing darkness. Studs of chrome and chains rattled from his shoulders. A flash of various Guild-symbol parodies spiraled along his waist.
Past the disguise, however, Avo could what sounded like a piston hammering away inside the man’s chest, pumping rhythmic beats as his blood surged through his arteries in constant cycles.
Avo’s Auto-Seance activated. Draus cast him a memory. +He’s got a Dynamite Stringsmith Mark Twelve for an arm. Real gutterware stuff. Like having six different instruments packed into a single limb. Listen. You can practically hear the twangs of the strings every time he moves.+
The limb’s models and specifications spilled over Avo’s vision as his curiosity fed. From a brief dip into the public Nether, the appendage was popular amongst anti-Guilder revolutionaries and aficionados of classical-style voider music. Whichever clique this “Cas” fell into, Avo couldn’t tell, but the man’s face looked as tough as mistreated leather.
Three lines of ritualized scarification ran across his face and ridged the bridge of his nose, but he wasn’t nearly large enough to be a born Scaarthian. His features were hardened and rough, with a substantial jawline and poorly shaven beard that resembled a clash between patches of hair upon skin. Dark green eyes glowed from within depressed sockets as he glared back at Avo, grinding his jaw from side to side.
“You thinking about taking a bite, ghoul?” he asked.
Avo didn’t look away. Social embarrassment was a human emotion, and he was far too tired to play at pleasantries. “Always. Your eyes don’t look as nice as hers. But eyes are eyes. Flesh is flesh. Still enough taste there.”
The man cocked his head at Avo and narrowed his eyes as he reached into the veil of his holocoat.
Draus’ projectile launcher unfolded with a series of clicking servos. Avo’s Ghostjack surged to activation after.
Chambers’ looked at the two sides and–not wanting to be left out—ignited his index finger. Leaves began to spill out from the heat as he mimed aiming a gun, his expression tight with uncertainty.
“Don’t do it, consang,” Chambers said. “I’ve never shot anyone with my finger before, but I’ll finger you today as my first.” He paused as soon as the words left his mouth. Denton fixed him with an awkward stare.
“Cas,” she said, “mention that you’re pulling out cigarettes next time you do that?”

“Sure, no problem,” he said. He bent in on himself and his fingers clicked. Trails of smoke inched upward through the light-formed veils of his holocoat as he drew out a thin-pale stick that stank of petrichor and tobacco. “Val, you’re gonna want to tune that frequency now before a drone comes by to deliver some complaints.”

She did as he requested, but not entirely. Instead of strings or guitars pulsing from nearby speakers, soft chimes from a ringing bell filled the back of Avo’s mind as he inhaled.
And gagged. The smoke from the cigarette tasted as if grains of dirt choked his throat. “Disgusting.”

Cas aimed a broad grin back at him. “Well, if you don’t like that, you’re definitely going to hate biting into my lungs.”
As the musical rhythm rose, the undercurrent of its frequencies changed. Sunrise splayed itself over the table as the entrance to their alcove smeared away, dissolving into a new horizon. No longer did the geodesic structure of the Easy Armistice lay beyond, for in its place stood a tranquil garden dotted with lily pads and croaking creatures. A looming lantern hung in the sky above, its face a mask of illumination with brightness that carried nothing of heat.
The smearing of spatial reality continued as a soft breeze slipped between stalks of lengthened stems of green jutting from the soil. Looking around, Avo found himself in a small clearing, their dinner table now resting at the center of an open-aired pagoda of stone.
Distant flutes roses in pitch as one led and another trailed.
“I thought I asked for Hendrix,” Cas whined, eyeing Denton.

She didn’t even bother giving him a side-eye. “You would’ve gotten Hendrix and Woodstock if you were the one that did the tuning.”

He breathed a sigh of smoke upward into the air as the soft breeze carried the stench away. “Point taken. Will do it myself next time.”

“What the hells is this?” Draus asked. “Some kind of spatial pocket?”

“Nah,” Cas replied. “These are actual places. Only hiding inside different frequencies. The melodies are a delivery point, right? They’re like code–here, watch–” His left arm rose from his coat, and it was as Draus observed. Knobs and tuners clustered his shoulder down to upper arms, while fourteen copper cords were drawn tight downstream from his wrist like externalized veins.
A dial on the back of his hand spun to a thrumming activation and he began to pluck at the air, each twitch of his multicolored fingers producing clashing notes from different instruments. As his fingers shifted to pull at different angles, a full orchestra cracked out from the man’s chest while his heart grew loud, its percussion forcing order on the song – a thundering spine to the melodic structure.
Space began to smear around them again as frequencies clashed and songs blended together. Flashes of a verdant field and a grand rainbow-painted stage cut over the calm pond beyond the pagoda.
Essus’ eyes were aglow with surprise. For once, the darkness was distant from his expression as his interest was captured. “I… I have heard this song before…”

Cas cut his performance to a halt. The moon and pagoda and the pond slipped back into place.
“Maybe you did,” Cas said, eyeing Essus. He pulled the cigarette from his lips and flicked it over the edge. A dozen or so bees split off from Sunrise’s main swarm to catch the falling narcotic before it could pollute the waters. “You’re new. I see it on your face.” He shook his head. “Who’d you lose climbing the Crucible?”

Silence followed. Essus did not speak. The light of fascination went dim like dying candles. His pain was raw, still so very obvious.
He was nothing special in New Vultun. Not in the affliction of hurt he suffered nor the symptoms he carried afterward.

There was a nakedness to being so easy to read.
Cas pointed to himself thereafter, tapping his chest. “Well, I’ll start then. Mother. Father. Brother. No, it doesn’t get better on its own. The pain stays, but you can take it out. Hell, the rotlick here could do it for you. But I don’t think you want that, do you? Lose the pain, but lose whoever it is you’re still hurting over? Hmm. Yeah. I see it in you. You got the look of someone that can find some anger in all that–”

“Not now, Cas,” Denton interrupted as a few of Sunrise’s “bodies’ chucked Cas’ cigarette back in his lap. “Do your cult pitch later. We have other superseding matters. Sunrise?”

On cue, one bee broke from the swarm and–to Avo’s surprise–flew into Denton’s mouth. Who promptly started chewing on the insect.
“The fuck?” Chambers muttered.
He promptly blinked as a few of the bees landed on Avo’s shoulder. Upon closer inspection, he noticed the glinting matter lining their bodies. From within his subreality, he heard the Woundshaper's adulation.
“This one is made of metal and silicon and more. A creature of alloy in more ways than one. Truly, if this is the work of those who dwell beyond, then mine is admiration earned. Beautiful be the nature of their craft–why, if I was to be bound to talent like a mortal artist, envy would boil me. But alas, this presents a new option for our hunger–find cause to devour one from the void. We must ingrain in ourselves the sinews of their supremacy.”
“You surprise me,” the swarm sang. “We expected you to lose control by now.”

Avo grunted. “How?”

“Your biometric readings indicate a high state of arousal. Your eyes are narrowed and your blood is running fast. From all the data we have compiled, any other being sheathed in your morphology would be experiencing hyper-violent psychosis by this point. You are an extreme outlier.”

He didn’t quite know how to take that. “Saying I’m a faulty ghoul.”

“We don’t have enough information to make a judgment based on that. Only that you are different.”

“Made that way,” Avo replied. A long-suppressed desire unmoored within as the urge to seek out his home up in the Tiers returned. Walton had done something to create him. Build his mind.
The extent of his true nature was psychopathy and choice both, the traits gifted by determined design. Or so it seemed. If such were to be the case, then he wondered as to the memories he possessed of the Undercroft and his upbringing, of the past he supposedly lived and the life he led.
How much of it was real in totality? How much was just patchwork mem-data taken and perfected into a thinking construct by a father yearning to atone for immortal sins?
“We are all made to be a certain way. By the chaos of evolution and natural birth. Or the focus and sculpture of genetic engineering. But beyond our hardware, there is the totality of our reactions to the things we face. And the lives we lead. You lead a very interesting life, Avo. Very interesting.”

He caught sight of Draus smirk in his periphery. “Well, shit, rotlick. Look at you charmin’ our little bug-consangs with all that self-control. Not havin’ flesh dangling between your fangs has gone and done wonders for that monstrous charisma of yours.”


An Echohead slithered around and snapped out to pierce her from the other side. She caught it without looking.
“Download’s done,” Denton said. Her eyes were cycling now, thoughtstuff rising and cresting in active waves of restructuring sequences. The effects of eating the bee were like a phantasmal seed allowed to sprout at the center of her mind. The static of her thoughts intensified as her accretion swelled. Saving each and every detail using his Metamind, Avo studied the occurrences before him as he tried to puzzle out what was happening to Denton’s mind.
From the roiling substance of thoughstuff emerged phantoms. The ghosts supporting their architecture were likewise mechanical in nature, their forms more circuitry than wisp-like, numbers running up from the roots of their flowing strands.

“If you’re curious about how banned mem-data gets smuggled around, this is the way it's usually done.” Cas shot Denton a look as her eyes began to cycle. “With how many eyes there are in the city, it doesn’t take Guilder Necros long to null you with a desist once they mem-lock to the banned memories. So they're parted and parceled and hidden behind cyberized brains. Pure coldtech logic enhancers and the like. Doesn’t work perfectly either though. The Silvers got plenty of Incubi specialized in ‘void-based affairs.’”

“Which is why all confidential and unsanctioned memories are to be assembled here in a thinkeasy,” Denton said, as she began molding her phantoms into shape. “If what I’m about to show you leaks over into the public–”

“Yeah,” Avo said. “Hunters.”

“Guild-response knot’s more my guess,” Draus added. “Doubt you just got a couple of sequences of trade secrets rattlin’ around in that mind of yours.”

Denton shrugged coyly. “A bit more, perhaps.”

Her phantoms melded, forming multiple interfaces containing specific FATE Skeins and personnel profiles. Slowly, the profiles began to expand into a wider web of intrigue under the header “Project Godshaper.”
By the end, there were a hundred and thirteen dossiers to expand, with each separated into major columns of involvement based on profession. Guilder Godclads, freelance Fallwalkers, commissioned Agnosi, and suspected spies were highlighted with specific labels when looked upon.
Surprise followed as he noticed there were redacted profiles connected to members from Voidwatch. He hadn’t known the voiders to ever assist in thaumaturgically related endeavors, and with the details withheld, his curiosity only grew.
“Voidwatch,” Avo said. “Why are they censored?”

“Because we couldn’t intercept the details from the suspected admins to confirm our suspicions,” Sunrise said, almost mournfully.
“Admins?” Draus asked.
The swarm hummed melodiously. “Voidwatch isn’t nearly as united as you might assume, Captain Draus.”

Draus sneered. “Yeah, ain’t so different from the others, right?”
“Quite different, I’m afraid,” Sunrise said. “Our union was one held by the dichotomy between extremes. But even between our various governing intellects, there are preferences in lifestyle and–”

“Hey, wait a minute,” Chambers said, interrupting Sunrise. Squinting his eyes, he leaned close to the Agnosi column as he pointed to a profile at the very top. “Bring–bring that one up, I think–” He licked his lips and shot a look at Avo and Draus. “Isn’t she… Isn’t that?”

The profile expanded. The face of the Agnosi bloomed into prominence as her simulated form came into shape above the conspiracy map.
Avo felt his mind reel as Kae Kusanade’s face finally loaded in her entirety. “Kae?”
+Our Glaives are dead. The Agnos is gone.+
+What? How? The Paladin was–+

+It’s not him. He’s good and snuffed. There was an unforeseen variable.+
+Unforeseen? Unforeseen? The Conflagration should have left her little more than a vegetable. How did she–+


+Not the Agnos. A Regular. Former Regular Jelene Draus. She ambushed field cell three before they could move to support. And then she intercepted field cells one and two at the target location. She must’ve received an automated message from the Agnos somehow. She–+

+A Regular? One? You had eighteen Glaives. With Incubi support!+

+She triggered a Thoughtwave Disruption before she went in. The resulting fight–+

+You lost the Agnos to one! One Gold! Eighteen of our best couldn’t stop one Regular? What the hells is wrong with you? Why do we keep you when–+


+Elder [Redacted]. I speak to you now with the utmost respect. If the next words cast at me are an insult directed toward my comrades who just died serving the Republic, I will find you, kill you, kill your husband, kill your children, and kill every last member within your immediate blood lineage. I will then turn myself in afterward for a formal investigation to account for the question of “why” I did what I did.+

+...I apologize. My calm was… compromised. Startling. Only one.+


+You were not part of the war effort, Elder. You don’t know how many lives fighting her like cost us. We need to pivot. I’m requesting additional resources to choke off their escape before they can ascend the Tiers.+
+Granted. Anything. Everything. But keep yourself in check: Kae Kusanade must be taken alive.+
-Glaive [Redacted] and Elder [Redacted], Ori-Thaum
12-5
The Frame (II)
“Kae Kusanade,” Cas drawled. “She got up to some pretty revolutionary shit before the Silvers cooked her skull.” He looked over at Draus. “She tell you about what she was doing?”


The Regular ran her tongue along her inner cheek. Avo had seen that tell enough to know Draus was thinking about killing the man across from her. “Nah. She wasn’t in much a talkin’ mood when I found her. Hells, she wasn’t in a talkin’ mood even after she got chromed.”

“And you didn’t look into it yourself?” he continued, spreading himself wide as he leaned back. “I don’t know about you, Reg, but I’d be pretty curious what would make Ori-Thaum attempt to capture–and then frame–an Agnosi for the murder of a Paladin.” He looked down to nonchalantly smooth out an unseen article of clothing beneath his veil. “You know they were together, right?”

Draus looked away from Kae’s character profile and glared at Cas. “What?”

“The Paladin, Dawton Morrow, and your consang there were a thing.” He shrugged. “Sure it wasn’t permitted on her end and they tried to be sly about it, but hell, sometimes sparks fly in across Nether, right?”

Draus turned back and stared into Kae’s shimmering visage again. “Fuck.”

“Yeah,” Cas agreed, “fuck, indeed.” He eyed Avo. “Zein said something about you knowing how to fix her? That true?”

“Got a theory,” Avo said. “Will need to see if it survives practice. Experiment with test subjects first. See if the ‘supports’ I have in mind can last.” His gaze briefly drifted over to Chambers.
The ex-enforcer blinked. “Why–why you looking at me like that, consang?” He placed his arm along the wood beams of the terrace and shot a look out over the lily-paded waters.

Avo didn’t give him an answer, instead choosing to pursue a question of his own. “Why?” he asked, gesturing at the sprawl of people and details stretched across the map. “Why do this to her? And what is ‘Godshaper.’”
“A mistake,” Sunrise intoned.
“A major reason why the Stillborn-pattern Liminal Frame even exists,” Denton said.
Draus snarled. “Godsdammit. Kae’s responsible for his Frame? Is that what you’re tellin’ me? Kae? And you’re tellin’ us this shit now? Not before, while we – that fuckin’ Thousandhand." Her glare smoldered in the moonlight. "Well, if Kae built this thing, she sure as shit don’t remember it. Talked like she ain’t never seen it before, she did.”

“She isn’t entirely responsible for its creation,” Denton elaborated. “Merely the guiding principles behind the Metafac. Truthfully, the Stillborn’s construction required a great many things and factors to align. Materially, it will be hard to make another.”

“Well, let’s hear about these ‘many things and factors,’” Draus said. She leaned in closer and rattled the table with a pointed digit. “And don’t leave shit out this time. I’m tired of not knowin’ who’s shootin’ at me or why.”

Cas chuckled. “You’re gonna lead a pretty exhausted life if you decide to jump in with us, Reg.”
Draus remained unamused.

“Cas,” Denton said. “Shut up.”

“Synced on that.”
A sheen lifted from the conspiracy map and split over into another section of phantoms on the other side of the table. A faint simulation of neon orange poured, forming a fissure over a diminutive representation: a person atop a block. Near-invisible threads of flowing Essence cycled between the tiny person and key markers in the world sprouted strings of mem-data.
Words like “Rupture,” and “Ensouled,” or “Subrealitistic-Totality-Expansion-Zone” lined Avo’s field of vision as Denton ordered more into sequence. It didn’t take an Agnos to seean inverted Frame, but what caught his attention were the rigid structures that limited Liminal architecture
The subreality budding free from the person was wide and flat one moment, then narrow and tall the next. The confines curved and dented and folded at impossible angles that would not accommodate the shape of just any Heaven, powers not only capped by storage, but angles and alignments.
A slow understanding dawned within Avo as he took in the stiff nature of the unidentified figure’s Frame: This was what it was like to have something other than the Stillborn, to be blessed by immense power, yet bound to the metaphysical geometry.
Kae was right. His was a cloud–a living ocean that coursed and cupped whatever form he deigned. Others were hard walls and fixed passages, solid and unmoving, incapable of stranger possibilities.
How alienating not to modify the bones of their ontology. It was like have all the arms and legs you could choose from, but being forced to accept a crooked spine.
To be forced into accepting a Frame such as this would be torture for Avo – to taste gutter-water after supping from nothing but the streams purified by the miraculous build of the Stillborn.
“The concept behind Godshaper was to create a more efficient means of adjusting a Liminal Frame,” Denton began. Mem-data kneaded into shape as more details loaded into the scene. The fissure expanded over the individual. A string titled [RUPTURE - NUCLEUS] burned into shape at the very heart of the simulation while hundreds of small bodies began washing upward away from the Ensouled individual, blending into the cracks as it fed a fire spreading across the sky.
Thousand died. Thousands offered to the Rupture. Thousands more needed.
“The bodies you’re seeing right now are the sacrifices it takes to keep a Rupture fed and malleable. Even more than all the dead it takes to feed a Frame, our data suggests it takes a stable Rupture to expand a Liminal Frame fully and safely out of a central ego without collapsing the Frame itself.”

“My god,” Essus said, flinching with each trickle of life that leaked up into the hungering crack that lined the skin of existence like a maw unseen, “are you saying that… it takes death to even… change our Souls? Our… powers?”

Denton pressed her lips together as she took a moment to think. Diplomacy was at the root of how she interacted with others, and Essus was an open page raw with pain. She spoke in a measured tone using a stable voice, keeping her eyes affixed to his while blinking slowly, almost hypnotically. “The border between the eldritch absolute and fickleness of mortality is bridged with one thing: Death. Usually, it takes a constant feed of lives to compose the necessary lores and mythologies to first align and access the Heaven’s canons before it expands fully in the subrealtiy. That is when modifications can be made.”
She paused for a beat thereafter. “It doesn’t mean it’s not regrettable.”

“So, wait,” Draus said. “You’re tellin’ me that most Heavens need a requisite amount of mind-twisted dead to even open, a constant stream of the dyin’ to stay open, and then an additional amount on top of the previous to make any changes.”

“The excess is meant to be directly applied into the fully unfurled Heaven of the Ensouled’s subreality. Everything else is like… making a key.”

The Regular let out a slow rasping breath. Her gaze slashed over to Avo and he found himself looking back at her. “Your Frame ain’t hyper-efficient, Avo, it’s godsdamned perfect. No waste at all…”

“The Metafactory,” Denton said. Another layer to the second simulation rose from a line above the fissure. Now the dead that were being fed through the openings into the Rupture were being stitched together, connected like strips of fabric instead of the beings they were. A chain of death formed, and through the lip of the fracture the connected deaths ran like a chain from the soil to a place beyond the sky. “There were several concepts behind its design. Some Agnosi theorized that if we could somehow create a hive-mind from the dying, they could keep the Essence preserved and modular as they began to feed the deaths through wholesale. The idea… failed. Human self-perception rejected the entwinement.”

“How many died to learn of this?” Essus whispered.
Denton pretended not to hear him. “Other means were attempted. Adapted bioforms grown from vats. Heavily neuro-altered prisoners resequenced into thinking they were all identical twins sharing the same life beyond minor deviations… There was always something that broke the narrative of the worship. At this point, the last Guild War was beginning and the project was shelved under the command of the Highest Choirs of Highflame as Inter-Guild collaborations broke down and the Agnosi were sworn to silence.”

“Pssh, sworn to silence.” The snort that came from Chambers told everyone what little he thought of that vow. “Why don’t they just… I don’t know, leak some shit into the Nether?”

“Because according to Article Thirteen of the Spiral, all thaumaturgical knowledge is to be rendered banned when not housed in specific minds, and any disseminators of memories will be hunted and nulled per the last true agreements between the Guilds. That and the Agnos are supposed to be supervised by a circle of Paladins when undertaking a commission for a specific Guild. Three guesses what the Paladins are supposed to do if the Agnos breaks their part in the agreement.”

Chambers pouted a muttered garble of gibberish in reply. “Hey, it beats getting a synaptic-frying-bomb-thing planted in the base of your skull, right?”
“It’s not a competition, half-strand,” Cas said.
“Yeah, sure,” Chambers nodded. “But if it was, I’d have it worse.”

The Columner frowned and turned to Avo. “Isn’t this half-strand former Syndicate muscle? Why’d you ‘Clad him?”
Chambers frowned. “Hey, fuck you, consang.”

“Wanted to keep his mind,” Avo said, throwing out a vague response. Again, he wasn’t really thinking when he restored all three companions into a cadre, but Cas had a point: Chambers was more captive than ally despite his constant sniveling attempts to ingratiate himself with the group.
That being said, the stalemated calamity within his mind presented useful avenues of research and a potential component to Kae’s salvation.
Ultimately, Chambers possessed little threat on his own. The man might’ve had an imbued Heaven, but Avo still had easy access to his mind. Stripping his senses and crippling his brain functions would take less than a full thought. Even should he escape, a lone Fallwalker was easy prey to a hungry city.
“From what we could piece together,” Denton continued as if the digression had never happened, “Agnos Kae Kusanade was commissioned by Highflame in the immediate aftermath of the Fourth Guild War to restart the Godshaper project. This time, however, the reignition of the project followed closely behind another, seemingly unconnected incident.”

Across from the Frame simulation, four profiles rose out from the conspiracy map as Kae’s form fizzled out into thoughtstuff. In her place manifested four different figures sporting various degrees of chrome and other visible implants.
Then, their final details loaded, and Avo found himself more interested in the Third Sphere-ratings of their Liminal Frame instead.
“Fallwalkers,” Denton said. Cadre numbered a Scaarthian with eight rusted arms, an exoskeleton-clad individual vibrating between two points in time like a frequency, a Sang with a chitinous hive growing out from her exposed ribs, and a floating spine encased within the shell of an egg-shaped war golem. “The Cadre called themselves Mignight’s Fall, and they specialized in… less than sanctioned smash-and-grabs.”

Chambers snorted. “Sounds like some street squire shit to me, consang.”

Denton kept talking. “Their targets were usually voidships or orbitals.”

“Sounds like a short immortality to me,” Draus said. “Ain’t no one takes too kindly to you hittin’ the voiders.” She paused. “They hit any hydroponics? Could be deniable operatives for the No-Dragons.”

“And the Reg doesn’t miss,” Cas said, smirking humorlessly.
A triple-ringed orbital connected to a central spire pulsed into view. Its name was redacted, but the damage inflicted on its hull was obvious. Whatever the Fallwalkers had done, they tore clean through one of the rings and rampaged their way into the central spine of the station.
“Ori-Thaum assembled enough details to assign the No-Dragons some complicity to this attack. The working theory was that they were trying to force those in Stormtree territories to purchase their produce instead. Their biotheurgically altered produce, that was.”

“‘Course it was,” Draus said without any hint of surprise. “You ain’t one of the Great Guilds without playin’ some fuck-fuck games.”

“The problem came afterward,” Denton said. “From what we gather, Midnight’s Fall didn’t return planetside immediately. Evidence from Aegis suggests that they smuggled themselves aboard a passing Voidwatch vessel during their escape. They took something from that vessel that made the Stillborn possible.”


“The ‘Imitators,’” Sunrise hummed. “The Thoughtless-Dreamers…”

Avo found his attention drawn to the small bees settled on his left shoulder as they flapped their wings in agitated bursts. To his surprise, he found himself able to detect a hint of tension within them, a speck of emotion that he could taste emanations of their thoughts.
“Ninth Column isn’t sure what the Imitators are, only that Voidwatch struck a bargain with whatever terrestrial Guild could help them secure what was stolen.”
The four Fallwalkers promptly went gray.
“Highflame ended up winning the bid to rectify the issue, and after their bid, they secured Voidwatch’s patronage in a highly unusual bargain.”

“Heavily restricted information,” Sunrise added. “I don’t have access. And Aegis won’t tell.”

“Whatever the case, Agnos Kae Kusanade was directed to task under a Paladin team headed by one Dawton Morrow and his cadre. The memories behind the project are heavily redacted, but from what we could glean, her work proved to be highly successful. Groundbreaking. A prototype Frame was patterned from a nascent Soul, whatever the Fallwalkers stole from Voidwatch, and Highflame’s resources. This proved to be dangerous for the balance…”

Cas’ face flattened into a wince as he stared at Avo.
A sense of disquiet settled on the ghoul.
“Val, maybe we can–”

“He should know,” Denton said without even needing to turn and look at her colleague. “Zein foresaw the construction of your Frame in the paths. But she wasn’t the only one. The “Walton” branch of the Low Masters had also infiltrated the project, and a bargain was struck between the Column and the nodes to steal the Frame from where it was held.”


A beat passed. “In light of recently gathered information, we also believe that it was one of the Waltons that leaked the key details of the project over to Ori-Thaum. Including Kae Kusanade’s involvement and the Paladins attached.” Denton’s eyes snapped over to Draus. “To the same extent, we are also quite certain that he directed a thoughtcast of her distress over to you, Captain Draus.”
Walton. Ori-Thaum. Kae.
More plays working the Great Guilds against each other. More innocents caught in the crossfire.

Silence followed as all expression bled out of Draus’ face. “Kae… Kae contacted me.”
“That would be impossible. Her mind was already compromised by that point, and the Incubi had used her to eliminate her lover, Dawton Morrow. She wasn’t fully herself until your Thoughtwave Detonation struck. We believe that “Walton” sought to remove the key intelligentsia behind Project Godshaper to ensure the fruition of his own plans, but if that’s the case, we cannot explain why he contacted you.”
Avo felt Denton stare right through him. “For when he ambushed our extraction team and stole the Frame for himself and vanished, we’re pretty sure everything played out just as he wanted. Which was when his nodes started turning up dead.”
You know what’s the sign of a real Necrojack, Avo? Using someone to solve the problems they created.
Look at the dive we just did. Were we richer than the Instrument? No. Not even close. Were we smarter? I’d also say not enough for it to matter. But we knew all his habits and flaws, and he wasn’t even aware we were there.
How much did we need to modify his memories for him to do what we wanted?
Not at all. Right.
Being a Necrojack isn’t all resequencing minds and subverting wards. It’s about mastering perspectives and understanding the nature of another person’s consciousness. It’s why if you were to try and hurt me, I would be in severe danger despite the gap in our skills. We share history. We shared thoughts. There was a bridge of understanding to exploit.
Metaphors don’t do the art justice, Avo. There’s nothing like diving into the Nether. It’s more than an ocean. It’s more than a dream.
It’s like… the source from which choice flows.
And if you can make someone else think whatever you want them to think or do what you want them to do, then I don’t think there’s a single power across the all there ever was that can stop you.
-“Walton,” Low Master
12-6
Arrangements
“We think the others did the killings. The other Low Masters, I mean.” Denton slowed her words, as her eyes swung like a pendulum between Avo and Draus. There was an anticipation to her posture, as if expecting things to turn violent, or something to sour in her guests.
Instead, both ghoul and Regular mirrored an equal tension in their postures, and then contemplation consumed them.
Cas eyed Denton from the side as he shuffled uncomfortably. “Well, if we’re gonna tell them that, we should also tell them the other stuff. You know. Like how most the Column was against this? How Aegis just wanted to kill the ghoul and retrieve the Frame? How the original candidate for the Frame is still alive–Fredritch’s gonna be pissed when he finds out his Frame went to a ghoul.”

The name spurred a month-old memory within Avo. Somehow, he doubted the depths of Fredritch’s ire considering one of Walton’s lingering engrams directed him to contact the man.
“Once you get to the Easy Armistice, talk to Fredritch Three-Eye and tell him that you're with the Ninth Column, and that ‘the dream is broken.’ He’ll give you an engram containing…another itinerant of me.”
Avo replayed his father’s words using his Meta and found held himself to silence. Walton was still weaving schemes around Ninth Column even long after his death. It took skill to compromise an organization so secretive, but it took staggering foresight and skill to turn a probable rival into an asset.
+Draus,+ Avo said, feeding her the memory of Walton’s words. +Need you to try and make contact with Fredritch. Will be suspicious if I ask.+
Her mind gave an affirmative note but trailed off into a bitter apprehension. +You didn’t know nothin’ about him–+

+No,+ Avo said. The sourness of his admission bothered him as well. +Beginning to understand I don’t know much about my father at all.+
+Shit. Makes you sound almost human.+
“It’s partially why we didn’t approach you earlier. Instead utilizing an intermediary.” Denton altered her phantoms and a visual representation of Green River came into shape. The Glaive’s eye twitched. “Of course, we now know that she was compromised as well.”


“Beginning to see a theme here, right?” Cas added. “Another point to shit our pants about: Him infiltrating the Deep Bazaar. Word gets out about that and the entire Deep Nether network is going to self-mutilate. We’ll have to go back to using couriers in the Underhive for shit.”
“Do you know why I woke up in the Maw?” Avo asked. For all the successes Walton had at subterfuge, something seemed to have fundamentally gone astray during the grafting process. If there was a plan that necessitated Avo to resurrect a dismembered, discombobulated, organ-harvested, one-week-amnesic husk of a ghoul with a blank-slate Metamind, he couldn’t conceive it.
Draus spat over the terrace of their pagoda as she added her own question to the pile. “Yeah. Was the ghoul gettin’ sold to the right Crucible at the right time to run into me by design as well? To Mirrorhead?”

Chambers, unwilling to be left out, nodded along, glaring at the “opposition.”
Beside him, Essus looked too lost and tired to fully grasp the details of the discussion at all.
“Unlikely,” Denton answered. “From what we could gather, your father’s nodes were trying to graft the Heaven to you while moving around on a barge in the Maw. But something went wrong along the way. We found pieces from the barge before the ship could entirely dissolve, but neither you nor the Frame were located in the estimated impact area.”

“We were talking about hiring scavengers to dig around some more before you went loud in Burner’s Way,” Cas said.
Draus shot Avo a look. +Told you folk would be watching.+
In turn, he shifted his own glare over to Chambers. “Wasn’t much of a choice.”

“Yeah,” Chambers said, agreeing with Avo while being deliberately obtuse to the obvious implication. “How the hells were any of us supposed to know the Scalpers would be there? Would’ve taken anyone by surprise.”

“Regardless, while we were deliberating on your loyalties and observing your actions, other matters continued to develop.” Denton waved a hand over her map of profiles and from it she drew out casefile. This one was another project called Dichotomy. “Not all of Project Godshaper went into the creation of the Stillborn. Highflame applied their new knowledge and what was left of the ‘Imitators’ to restart something called Project Dichotomy on their own without Voidwatch support.”

“And then, for no related reasons at all, a dozen or so Ruptures opened up across the city,” Cas said. “Wouldn’t that big of a problem if they weren’t all somehow and omnipresently connected to a single Fallen Heaven. Like all the Ruptures are the same Rupture. And so the Rash continues to breach quarantine over and over and over. But only in Massist territory so far. Curious, right?”

“Yeah,” Draus said. “Curious. But what’s it to us? Think Highflame’s gonna use whatever they’ve got from Kae’s research to do what? Blow open the skies over the Silvers or some shit.”

A worrying pause came as a riposte from both the Columners.
Sunrise hummed in their stead. “We do not suspect all of Guild Highflame to be a party to such a plan. Just some among the faction known as the Chivalrics.”

Draus closed her eyes as a low sigh hissed out from her nostrils. “Of fuckin’ course it's them. What’s this shit? Some kind of half-strand, a first-strike or final-spite idea if they go down to force another war?”
Cas scoffed. “Yeah. Something like that. Look. Zein’s whole ‘path-based frame job’ had a very specific endpoint, and that was the discrediting and disintegration of the major houses behind the Chivalrics. The way things turned out was not incredible, but not unsalvageable. Either. The problem is, with a lack of a false-flag attack on the Fire’s Height and losing the chance to smear Uthred Greatling like she wanted gives them a bit of time to think. Or get real desperate. Last we checked, the half-strand's down one son, has a daughter in the Unwhere, got another that’s more attack-dog than person, and one more being printed in the vats. He’s feeling the squeeze.”

“Which is why you wanted me,” Draus said. “‘Cause we got history. And you want me to–what–draw his focus? Distract him from scheming about fuckin’ the city to death with his gerent consangs.”

“Something like that, yeah,” Cas said. “But also the fact that they got a way to access the rash without needing to breach the pocket containing the primary Rupture and source of wombrash. If we can distract them…” He cast a meaningful look at Avo, “We might just be able to chop the legs out from under Guilds. You know, being the only ones with the Domains of Love, Lust, Fertility, and all that other shit.”

Chambers froze. “Wait, you want Avo to have control over all the fuck-powers? I…” He held up his hands in a placating gesture toward Avo. “I–I don’t mean this in a prejudicial way but… you’re a cockless people-eater, consang. I don’t know the Heaven’ll take. Why–why not Draus?”

“Regulars have their reproductive organs replaced with additional implants as an extra layer of confusion against the dragon-curse and their urges sequenced out from their minds,” Denton said. “Captain Draus and Avo are likely not so different when it comes to their nonexistent sex drives.”

“Damn it,” Chambers moaned. Avo narrowed his eyes at the man. Judging from his exaggerated expressions, he likely knew about Draus’ “condition” and was merely trying to herd the conversation toward his desired endpoint. “But the Heaven’s still gotta go to someone who knows about how to use it… Maybe…” He dramatically reached out for Essus who responded by staring at Chambers wearily. “No. No. Not my consang, Essus. He suffered enough. It’s me. I got to make this sacrifice. You guys can have all the cool Heavens like blood and glass and light and shadows and shit. I’ll take the Wombrash. I’ll be the Wombrash.”

Everyone stared. Cas shook his head. “Welp. That’s a ‘later’ category conversation. Frankly, it doesn’t matter who gets the Heaven so much as if we can access it and if we can contain it. It’s connected to a Sphere Nine Frame so…” He winced. “We might need to think about how to divert all that Rend.”

“Right now, we wish to establish a working partnership,” Denton said.
“No,” Avo said. “Had that with Zein. Regret it. Regret her. Keep her away from us.”

“Sure, no problem,” Cas muttered. “I’ll just stop Zein Thousandhand from doing what she wants.” He chuckled and shook his head. “Once another one of her selves tumbles out from the paths, she’ll be right back doing whatever it is she wants. Cherish your time right now.”
At the same time, Denton spoke over him, ignoring the words of her colleague. “We’re offering a formal partnership. You will get access to all the supplies and resources at the Column's disposal. Any Guild-level implants, arms, vehicles, or phantasmics will be at your disposal.”

Draus cast her thoughts over to Avo. +Something to consider. But if they got Voidwatch support, it’ll be hard as hell for us to tell what they got cookin’ inside a nanosuite or somethin’. They’re cooperative, I’ll give ‘em that, but nice don’t buy trust. We need our own leverage, and frankly, I just don’t think we got enough.+
He had to agree. However, there were items he was curious about. Something that could make the progress of his growing apotheosis even easier. “Can you get me golems?” Avo asked. “Heavens.”

Denton and Cas shared a look.
“It’ll take some time,” Cas said. “But yeah, we might be able to arrange some things.”

Avo considered his options. +Don’t need to trust them. Can vet their goods and services. Avoid accepting easily compromised bargains. Use them. Need to get Kae out from the Second Fortune. But Sovereignty’s going to be under heavy surveillance.+
+You got a use for ‘em?+ Draus asked.
+Could be something simple. Have smuggled official Guild-licensed aero through checkpoints without notice. You create a passage to a reflection inside. She walks through. Out of risk again.+
Draus paused. +Yeah. That would be mighty helpful of them.+ She chanced a brief glance at Denton. +The “Glaive” also got the Paladin’s eatin’ out of her palm. Won’t lie: I kinda wanna snuff her out of principle, but she’s been about as helpful as anyone I’ve met in New Vultun.+
And wasn’t that the ugly truth?
“The Easy Armistice offers accommodation frequencies as well,” Cas added. “Perfect if you want a nice place to think about things while the heat dies down. We don’t need an answer from you right–”

“Could start this ‘partnership’ of ours off with a couple of favors,” Draus said, interrupting him.
Cas leaned back and sighed, ceding the conversation over to Denton. Avo noticed the man deliberately played a different role to Denton’s hyper-competent diplomat. He greeted them with a rough casualness and approached Essus as a fellow refugee by way of suggestion.
Whether that was true or not had yet to be determined.
“State your requirements and we’ll see if your dreams can come true,” Denton replied.

“First thing: Kae. We’ve been talkin’ an awful lot about her without her bein’ present. Mighty rude. I’d like to order an official pickup for her. One with my personal touch to expedite her arrival.”

Denton nodded. Her thoughtstuff pulsed static and collapsed inward. She was making a mental note. “That can be arranged. What else?”

“I wanna know about this Fredritch who was supposed to have the Frame. Wanna know if he’s gonna be a problem.”

“I assure you–”

“You can assure me by scheduling a meetin’. Me and him. The ghoul stays out of it. Face to face. Just to clear the air.”

Cas huffed out a breath. “Well. Looks like we’ll have to ask old Three-Eyes what he wants.”

“Sure. Fine.” Draus added another request. This one Avo didn’t see coming. “And I want to see your operation. All of it.”

Denton pressed her lips together. Cas began to laugh softly.

“What?” Draus said. “Somethin’ funny.”

“Not for you,” Cas said. “Truth is you’ve already seen ‘all of our operations.’” The laughter suddenly stopped. “It’s Zein.”

“What?” Draus asked.

“Her paths. Her iterations. Echoes. Forks. They’re the ones keeping all our cells coordinated–the only reason why we’re like smoke and myth to everyone hunting for us.”

Draus blinked. “What? So Zein’s… what? Her own network?”

“She’s a lot of things,” Denton said. “Presently for us, however, she is… re-emerging out from the past. It’ll be at least a week before we’re ready to interface with the other cells. Aside from that, we are effectively similar to Incubi strike cells on the practical end. I’m sure you’re familiar with how they work.”

“Just about,” Draus drawled.
Chambers held up his hand. “Can I ask for something?”

Everyone ignored him.
Everyone except Avo. A grin spread across the ghoul’s face as he regarded Chambers. “No. Going to need you to give me something.”

“I–uh–sure, consang,” Chambers swallowed. “W-what’s the need?”

Instead of replying to him, Avo turned and addressed Denton again. “Need a few demiplanes. Someplace good for repeated Thoughtwave Detonations along with one that can let Nether flow through.”

“That’s doable,” Denton asked. “Can I ask what you’re planning?”

Avo shot Draus a look. “Ori-Thaum broke Kae's life. Created this problem. Partially anyway. Want to pluck the problem from her head. Take a closer look at it. Pattern and return it." He let out a low hiss of pleasure as he imagined possessing a phantasmic or trauma that could burn away other minds. “You’re invited to watch. See what we can all learn. Would be good start to… formal partnership.”

Denton just stared while Cas shook his head. “Fuck me,” he said. “He’s worse than the Waltons.”
+Jhred Greatling’s Frame is gone; Elder D’Rongo just got arrested. I am severing this proxy. This is the last time I use its memories to contact you. I won’t remember our near-term conversations after this. I suggest you dispose of your own memories somehow.+

+Received. Do you have any leads? Highflame’s inner channels claim Abrel Greatling’s entire cadre got wiped out and that she got picked up by Chief Paladin Naeko of all people.+

+Her entire cadre?+

+One Ruptured and died. Frame lost. Two other Frames missing along with their Ensouled. Godclads don’t go missing that easily, so if I was a wagering man, I’d put imps on them being in the same state as Jhred….+

+Three missing Frames isn’t a mystery, Instrument. It's a pattern. Some unconfirmed eyewitness accounts are leaking out from the Sovereignty. They’re claiming a “pantless” man was part of a Fallwalker cadre facing off against Abrel near the end. Do you have any details on that?+

+I… No. First noise I’m getting about it. “Pantless”?+

+Yeah. Apparently, his genitals were exposed as Greatling chased him and his across the district into a hypertube station.+
+...The fuck?+
-Thoughtcast between Glaive [Redacted] and Instrument Santanado “Starsinger” Mondelles
12-7
Retrieval
“Hey, consangs, does this feel too easy to anyone el–”

Draus’ hand snapped out as a lashing blur. A sudden crunch followed and Chambers’ Adam’s apple went from being visible to parted between distended ridges of tissue as he clawed at his neck, choking.
Essus offered Chambers a brief look of pity before shooting Draus a wary glance. “Was that necessary? He was just talking about–”

“Now don’t you go repeatin’ what he just said, Essus.” Draus narrowed her eyes as Chambers collapsed in front of her. Denton and Cas watched from the side as the man kicked and wheezed, his left arm flopping about for aide while his right continued to dig at his pulverized throat. “Ain’t no one invokin’ the words 'milk' connected to the word that kinda means ‘sprint.’”
Essus blinked. “I… I do not understand.”
Sunrise’s many selves buzzed over Chambers, examining him as he struggled. “Damage severe. Deep lacerations. Biological recovery baseline insufficient to overcome trauma.”
“The aero’s gonna pick Kae up. It’s gonna pick her up and there ain’t gonna be any problems ‘bout it.” Draus’ expression hardened. “Things will go just fine. Just fine.”

“I remain… confused,” Essus said, looking to the others for aid.

“An old street squire superstition,” Denton explained. Beside them, the aero lifted up as the field holding it in place flicked off. The aerodock flashed white as a sheet of glass in the departing vehicle shimmered in time with a floating shard of glass hovering next to Draus. “She crushed his throat because he was about to question why things were progressing so smoothly. Tempting the city, if you will.”

“You mean the fates?” Essus asked.
“She means the city,” Avo said. “Fates are fickle. New Vultun just wants you dead.”
The former father’s expression darkened. He looked away from the others, lowering his gaze to the rusted plates forming the floor. “Ah. I understand.”
The cityscape outside however no longer overlooked the district of Loathing–or even Light’s End for that matter. Instead, they were somewhere in the Throat of the Warrens–a section between Layer Three and Layer Two closer to a checkpoint or partition to separate the useful from the truly FATELESS, destined to feed the economy with their deaths.
Their departure from the Easy Armistice was preceded by three spiking notes followed by a melody. From where they once sat beneath the open terrace of a stone pagoda overlooking a tranquil pond, they had suddenly found themselves deposited around a dilapidated dinner table in an old aero-shop as space around them smeared.
It had felt as if all of reality around them was a disc of some kind and a needle was skipping them out of place into another location entirely.
From what Cas had to say thereafter, it seemed that there were more than a thousand exits to the Easy Armistice, but only that single way back, up in the district of Loathing. Avo supposed the futility of raiding such a place added to the reason why people called it the “Easy” Armistice — It was nigh impossible to actually engage in a prolonged fight within its confines.
As Denton led them out to a reserved aerodock with a Stormtree-licensed aero already prepared, Draus exercised her canons and created a sheet of glass on the side before linking it to another piece and forming a junction.
Avo studied his DeepNav and discovered they were suddenly only two hundred and eighty miles away from Xin Yunsha, and that the aero was being flown by a well-maintained Wight sporting Stormtree’s colors.
“It’ll pilot the aero over to the Second Fortune and deliver your message,” Denton said. “We might have to account for some delays as it passes through security checkpoints and Paladin pockets, so expect this to take four hours. Maybe a bit more.”

At her feet, Chamber crawled over and clawed at her silver pant legs. She offered the man a sympathetic look and regarded Avo immediately afterward. “How much Rend did he have leftover from the fight?”
“Not that much,” Avo said, curious to observe how Chambers might resurrect. It would be interesting to see how another returned. But even more than that, there was something else he could do.
META-FAC ACTIVATING
TRANSFERRING REND FROM SECOND CIRCLE [LUSHBURNER] TO FOURTH CIRCLE [WOUNDSHAPER]
->REND CAPACITY [LUSHBURNER]: 0%
->ACCESS CANONS
And before Avo’s sense, Chambers’ canons loaded into his awareness. Avo's Soul was flowing out in oscillating tides ebbing over and back across the borders of Chambers’ Frame. Interfacing didn’t feel so different than casting a ghost out to form a link, but ultimately, it was an action that was more–so much greater.
He was effectively bridging subrealities together, using the deviant nature of his Stillborn. And all it took was a thought.
“Fuck me,” Cas said. “What are you even doing?”

Avo considered being honest. He considered being dishonest. Considering how much more they knew about Frames and even his Frame in particular, and how much they had been willing to share, he didn’t see much point in lying.
If they knew about Godshaper, they probably could guess what some functions of his Meta-Fac might be.
“Drawing the Rend out of him. Wasn’t much. Now inside me.” However, not being willing to lie didn’t mean he was going to be entirely open with them. He stopped there, saying nothing about how he was currently interfacing with Chambers’ canons.
“And you can do this to other ‘Clads in combat?” Cas said.
Avo grunted. “Seem so.”
The man whistled. “Well, ghoul, you might just have the nastiest piece of Godclad perma-killing kit burning inside you. Congrats. Fuck. Three-Eyes gonna be pissed if she ever hears about this.”

Avo paused. “You used ‘he’ before.”

Cas shrugged. “We’re on an odd hour right now. He chrono-shifted to being his unborn sister or something. I don’t know how Sanctites work.”

Avo grunted again, this time in understanding. A Sanctite Godclad. A Sanctite Godclad serving Ninth Column. The city sure had its inventory of characters, but considering he was an enhanced ghoul created by an immortal priest to a kingdom nested inside the corpses of several dragons above the structure of existence, he really didn’t have much room to judge a temporally separated person who shifted between traits based on the passing of chronology.
“Right,” Cas said. “That’ll take a while. How about we go–”

“He is dead,” Sunrise said.
Avo noticed the slackening of Chambers’ muscles and the scent of the man relieving himself one final time.
What mattered more, however, was the burning presence of his Soul simmering in through the looking glass of reality. Where he died formed a layer of metaphysical scar tissue that was rapidly cauterizing away, peeling open a pathway between realities. Through the passage to the other side, only Essence and ghosts coursed to nourish the waters of mythology.
Here was a gate that only the absolutely conceptual were able to cross. Here was a gate that Avo could knock on using his Meta-Fac.
Again, he directed his fires to fuse with Chambers’ death-point, and this time, however, he felt the inner confines of Chambers’ Liminal Frame come into shape. It felt as if he was bridging himself over to the other Godclad, like he was greeting and speaking to one of his own Heavens.
“Chambers?” Avo said, wondering if the man could hear him.
“Guh! Fuck! You scared the shit out of me–well, fire. I squirted a godsdamn column of flame out from myself when your voice came outta nowhere. Where the hells are you, anyway? What the hells happened to me? I don’t see you floating around here–shit? Are those your Heavens? I think I see the Woundshaper.”

An affirmative note came from the Heaven. “The pitiful one is astute. Still, the gift of godhood is wasted on one such as he. You have learned enough from him. Shred his ego and take back what you gifted.”
The Galeslither recoiled at her suggestion. “Mother of Blood, how honorless can you be. To murder a master in their own house…”
“Oh, cease, you. To think one so simpering could have stood a member of a pantheon.”
“Better a simpering mule than a butcher.”
“Better a claimant to power than some fool-moralist who starves.”
“Holy shit, do they always talk?” Chambers asked. Avo suddenly realized that Chambers could hear his Heavens. Something worth considering.
“Sometimes,” Avo said. “Sometimes they’re just quiet.”
“...Can my Heaven talk?” Chambers asked.
“Probably if I keep building it,” Avo said. He wasn’t sure about that yet. He wasn’t even sure if he wanted to keep Chambers as a Godclad.

There was too much Avo felt unsure about.
Some changes and plans needed to be set in motion.
“What the hells happened to me anyway?” Chambers asked.
“You said something close to milk run. Draus crushed your throat. We watched you choke to death.”
A lull came. Avo felt Chambers’ resurrection building fast. The man’s Frame was cycling back to fullness as the metaphysical scab melted away even more, shedding forty percent of itself.
“I’ll get her back for that,” Chambers said. “I’m telling you, Chambers-Clad ain’t taking it from half-strands no more.”

“Sure. Can let her know,” Avo said, absent-mindedly.
“Wait, fuck, not yet! I was just venting, consang relax. She doesn’t need to know. She really doesn’t need to know.”

“Won’t tell her,” Avo said.

Chambers’ Lushburner crackled in relief. “Thanks consang.”


Avo promptly turned to Draus and spoke in the real. “Chambers is probably going to want to kill you back for this.”

Her response was to throw her head back and laugh.
“So, as I was saying,” Cas continued, disregarding Chambers’ death. “If you want to secure a place to do some thoughtwave detonations, I might just have an option for you. And it could work pretty well with your Frame too. You’ll be able to keep draining the Rend out of Rendsinks maybe. Keep those golems in use.”

“Sure. Let’s hear it.” The shard of glass was orbiting Draus now. Like for Avo, it didn’t take much practice for her to wield her Heaven mechanically. Avo wondered if it was because the base form of the hollowed gods still contained something similar to muscle memory.
“Well,” Cas began.
Chambers dipped into his Soul’s root and suddenly his resurrection cycle accelerated. Unseen fire erupted and ate away the scarstuff, and Avo watched as shooting trails of Soulfire threaded the outline of a person over Chambers’ corpse, his reloaded vessel injected back into reality as the Soul poured itself back over through the veil filling into the body at last.
Chambers stood, arms folded, head held high, and grinning at Draus.
Also, his pants were gone again and his bits swung in the wind.

“I definitely gave him pants,” Denton said, sighing.
“It’s not your–”

Chambers’ lower pelvic region erupted into a chasm of gore as Draus fired her projectile launcher into his genitals. Mangled pulp spattered onto the ceiling as one of Chambers’ legs snapped free and flopped away from the body.
What followed was an expression of muted horror as Chambers began to scoop what he could back into the open chasm that used to constitute a stretch of flesh from his pelvic region leading up to his lower belly.
Shaking, he turned to Avo as his lip quivered. The ghoul thought he was going to cry. “I thought you said you weren’t going to tell her…”

“Didn’t,” Avo lied again. “She just does that.”

The horror on Chambers’ face deepened. A series of clicks and snaps followed as another missile was loaded into Draus’ projectile launcher.
“Chambers. Listen up.” Draus aimed her arm at his head. A Phys-Sim vector went red. “The ghoul loves killin’ people. I like killin’ half-strands. I want to make a couple things clear before I spread your head across the room again.”

Avo watched as Sunrise drifted away from Chambers, it's swarming mass moving behind Avo for cover. “Dangerous,” it said.

Draus continued. “Here’s the thing: You might’ve forgotten who you were, but I didn’t. You worked for Mirrorhead. You're a half-strand scumbag–a real funny one, but let’s not bullshit ourselves, you helped your old boss do plenty of horrible shit to folks that didn’t deserve it. Folks like Essus here.”

“Fuck,” Chambers moaned. “I…I helped you snuff Mirrorhead, didn’t I? I mean… that’s something right?” Draus stared at him flatly. “Sure I didn’t really have a choice–”

“Had your chance,” Avo snarled. “Should have done your research for that run.”

Suddenly, Chambers pulled his hands away from his castration, eyes widening in disbelief. “Wait, are you still hung up on that shit? That was our first run! How was I supposed to know about the Scalpers?”

“Prepare!” Avo hissed. “Ask. Investigate.”

“Fine, fuck, I’m sorry,” Chambers choked. “Anything else? Is… is anyone else mad at me for something? How about you two.” He looked at Denton and Cas. “Anything you want to take out on me? I'm just a half-strand right.” He laughed three times. A single tear ran down his face.
Cas folded his arms and looked away, expression unnerved.
Denton quirked an eyebrow. “I won’t intrude on whatever this is, but I have a request.”

Chambers nodded slowly.
“Can you please resurrect with pants the next time you die?”

“I… I’ll try?” Chambers said, sounding unsure.
“Right,” Denton said, wincing slightly.
“Did you care,” Essus said, capturing everyone’s attention. “Did you care what happened to me? To anyone that you profited from?”

Chambers whirled on Essus, mouth open with eyes glinting and glib remark at the ready. Despite his injured state, there was something persistent about Chambers – a determination to get others to like him no matter what.
But for whatever reason, he faltered at Essus' expression. Chambers went silent and hiccuped. Then, gritting his teeth as a wave of pain passed through him, he puffed a sigh. “I care about living, consang. I care about keeping myself safe and fed and not-dead. I used to care about other shit but… this city, it's power unleashed. People like us… we don’t really make it if we don’t go a little crazy – if we don’t be a little wrong in the head.”
“People like us,” Essus repeated.
“Yeah,” Chambers said. “People like us. You can talk about you being a good person all you want, consang. Shit you are – you are! I’m… I’m sorry about what that fucking Mirrorhead did to you. I’m sorry your boy died and everyone just watched and laughed and made imps from it. But I was relieved, you know? Because look at you. Good but suffering. What did it mean? And meanwhile, I'm a half-strand and alive. Doing fine.” He stopped looking at Essus and turned back to stare at Avo. “I survive. I do my best. Seven-eighteen years! The city’s never stopped trying to kill me, but here I am.”
He laughed. “Here I am. Godclad. Maybe just for now. But… it had to mean something, right? It had to be more than just luck that I’m here with you instead of dead with all the others.”

He glared at Draus. “Here’s the thing, Reg. I didn’t forget. I moved on. I moved on to you guys, and if shit goes wrong again, I’ll move on again.” He shrugged. He winced. “I don’t… I know why you might hate me but you… you gotta understand. Essus isn’t from here, but you gotta know, right?”

Unmoved, Draus held her implanted weapon online.
Chambers breathed out. “I don’t want to go off to the Big Nothing. I want to live too. I want to be happy. I want to enjoy life. Mine! Not just snippets of thrill I get from a vicarity. I’m a person too, godsdammit,” He paused and a haunted expression came over him. “Why don’t people see that.”


Quietly, Avo regarded the man as a distant expression consumed him. Through the Auto-Seance, Avo read flashes of trauma cycling through him, the pain of a hyper-heated gun barrel dug into one’s armpit. The throat-rending shrieks only a child could make.
And the outrage.
So much outrage. To be hurt by someone you were so desperate to love.
Chambers was a collection of sickness poured to cement a central faultline shut. All the vicarities, all the viruses, all the inward collapsing sequences were there drawn to that center mass of trauma he wouldn’t face.
And at that moment, Avo learned how to permanently shatter Chambers.
“Fuck it,” Chambers said. “Shoot me again, Reg. Snuff me. I’ll come back with pants this time. I’ll be good. I’ll do anything you guys want.” His lip quivered. “Please don’t take my Frame.”
Avo reached out with an Echohead and placed it over Draus’ projectile launcher. Slowly, he pushed her shot offline.
“Chambers,” Avo said. “Going to need something from you soon. You want to matter. You want to be part of us.” None of his words were presented as questions.
Chambers nodded. “Yeah, consang! Anything!”
“Good. You will help me fix someone. Then I want to see if I can make you better. Use your damage.”

Chambers was beginning to blink rapidly. He didn’t hear the last part. “Use my… what?”
“He lost too much blood,” Sunrise said. “We recommend killing and then talking to him.”
Avo grunted. “Draus. You can shoot him now.”

Chambers’ eyes widened. “Wait, wha–”

Chambers’ head promptly burst apart.
In deeds, not oaths.
In acts, not rituals.
In practice, not prayer.
We bearers of the scriptures, though ever faithless, do pledge our undying virtues to serve the commonwealth of the peoples of Idheim and beyond.
We severed of cults and chains, bind the flesh of divinity toward greater ends.
Our task is the cessation of the longest cycle. Our oath is the cessation of power. Our duty is to Guild and polity.
Never shall I bask in power, but to guide and remold.
Never shall I hold a position of power, only to counsel.
Never shall I revive the memories of the old gods, for the path toward coming prosperity will be layered by practicality instead of mythology.
I pledge myself to the task of the Agnosi eternal until I am severed of life, or severed from thought.
I will be the keeper of all pantheons, but the follower of none.
Mine is where the chains are broken.
-The Covenant of the Faith-Severed
12-8
Private Transit
Apotheosis changes a person.
The first deviation between a Godclad and an ephemeral comes with their relation to death. Where the pall of oblivion clouds each risk-filled action chosen by the latter, the former is free to simply proceed in most cases, with their demise being anything from a brief setback to a moment of respite.
Chambers took to dying remarkably well. His consciousness quavered during his first descent into his own Soul, but with the sequent departure, a growing excitement shed itself free from the mottled skin of existential dread.
Far from being furious at Draus, when the man returned a third time, he requested she kill him again just for the sensation.
And again for the thrill of being unable to stop her grip from folding his skull over his neck. As his head dangled between his shoulders, blood seeped out from Chambers’ nostrils as he smiled, Lustaway activating at his habitual addiction calcified around his baseline of trauma.
As he toppled over next to his other two bodies, Draus studied him, unimpressed. “You know, I like coming back usin’ your own corpse. It’s neater that way.”

“Resurrecting in a new body’s a good trick if you need a quick hit of imps,” Cas said. “Sell off some implants and all that other desperate organ trading stuff. But it usually makes you a pretty easy target as well. No-Dragons or Voidwatch ends up getting your biometric data and you’ll be looking for a new sheathe to avoid hunters or viruses specially engineered for you.”
“Every corner presents a trap,” Essus muttered, face pale as his eyes were locked on Chambers' corpse. The terror of death still clung to the man like a weighted shadow, but he was beginning to master himself more as his exhaustion outweighed his trauma. “We are people no more, then, Avo.” He looked up. “We are denied a final departure.”

“Can still die if you want,” Avo said, keeping his words wide but subtext clear.
If Essus wanted an end to this, Avo would let him go. But he could not leave with the Frame or memories. Such things were too great a boon and too large a risk to release adrift into the city.
“I wish to have my own quiet for some time,” Essus said. As he looked down to study Chambers’ corpse again, a passing aero illuminated the walls and cast darkness over his face. “I wish to think.”

“Well,” Cas interrupted, kicking Chambers. “As I was saying before ‘Kill-Me’ here decided to make a run at giving us all the Rash, I might have a demiplane that suits all your needs. Well. It’s more of an onion.”
“Onion?” Essus asked.
Cas nodded. “Yeah. Still got a few hours before we can nab the Agnos. How about we go get you all set for her…” He turned and looked at Avo. “What is it you’re planning to do with her?”

“Fix,” Avo said. “Clean out the construct in her mind. Take the fire for myself.”

The Columner nodded slowly.

A wall of bees spread out behind Avo like a cape. “It will be a difficult operation. I have observed much skill from Ori-Thaum assets. If it would be acceptable, we would like to be on-site during the process for documentation.”

Avo regarded the Voidwatch… bioform? He didn’t really know how to regard the swarm. Considering Sunrise still used the words “I,” its consciousness was clearly templated close enough to a human’s that whatever differences would not be axiomatic.
“Do you know the art?” he asked.
Sunrise’s collective mass buzzed in contemplation as one. “No. Aegis considers Necrotheurgy a forbidden developmental pathway. Until my ego is re-downloaded, I will not be permitted to return to the fleets. This is purely for self-curiosity.”

Self-curiosity. It spoke like it was on safari. Like Avo was a deviant bioform worth observing.
It should know that the feeling was mutual in that regard.
Avo grunted. “Keep some distance. Don’t know if ghosts will affect your cognition.”

“They will,” Sunrise admitted without hesitation. “We will keep to safe parameters.”

Draus smirked as she looked at the swarm swirling around him up and down. “Well, hells, Avo. Look at you makin’ a new consang.”

“Yeah,” Avo said. “This one didn’t steal my sword.”

The Regular fought to force down a smirk. “You woulda just lost it.”

She was probably right. But he reserved the right to be bitter.
“Good times, huh,” Cas said.

“I would not go that far,” Essus said, spitting his words through gritted teeth.
“Aw, fuck.” Cas winced. “Sorry consang.” An awkward moment followed as Chambers popped back into reality, fist held up toward the sky as he cheered his resurrection, declaring himself unkillable.
At least he returned with the diamond-studded pants this time.
***
Leaving the aero-shop via a cargo unit repurposed into the body of a tram, the local district bobbed into view as they drifted out along vertical mag-rails. Snapping free of the dilapidated structure, the environment stood an alloyed jungle. Countless other cargo units shot along winding rails as interconnected traffic ran from block to block over blocks and blocks some more.
Things here were built simple and stacked high, buildings literal cubes bereft of windows or other structural weakness, each planted like a step upon each as railways ran in a winding loop while the aeros crossed overhead.
Though there lived only twenty million inhabitants in the local area, TwoGate was a place dense with moving bodies. Floating squid-shaped drones swam in schools from place to place, their jocks guiding them between sectors separated by numbers and verticality.
Sector Five was where they were going–where the industrial work happened. A veritable tide of machines flooded to the lowest levels to haul engines to and fro different places.
“Lots of Terrestrial aero-engines get produced here,” Denton explained. “Part of Omnitech’s attempts to compete with Voidwatch in the mechanical market.”

“And how’s that going for them,” Draus deadpanned.

“Their output of specialized war golems usually make up for mistakes like trying to out-compete the voiders in the tech-sec.” Denton finished.
As they swiveled down to the very bottom and decelerated for final departure, another container moved on a rail beside them, keeping perfect pace for Denton to order the opening of both doors at the same time.
“Come on,” Cas said. “We’re switching rides.”

Stepping over into the other container, they found it to be filled with bolts and screws of various shapes and sizes, and unlike the one they just departed, it didn’t have any windows, keeping all from physical sight beneath sheets of worn plasteel.
Avo connected to its locus momentarily and ignored the disquiet of the ghosts howling ritualized numbers in its structure. He hated jacking into Omnitech lobbies not because he couldn’t get in, but because they mainly used math and some manner of coded symbology to serve as the substance of their minds.
Of course, the nature of their minds lacked the static ingrained within Denton or even Sunrise, so it was clear which technology was purer. But purity meant little when you lived in a world where mechanisms heed the whims of concentrated delusion.
The transition took another hour as Avo studied the world around him through means of his Whisper. Essus took to his own corner during this time, and the Woundshaper sensed an unnatural concetration of flowing blood in a building not a mile away from them.
Scouting out what was inside was a trifling affair. As Avo projected his cognition over a pit of massacred bodies, he regarded their appeareances with a brief look, realizing they were all garbed with a specific number on each of their lapels. They were currently being fed into a building processing unit, and more were being dragged over between the seconds, pulled by a few combat-modified squid-drones.

Cracking one of the drone’s wards and digging through its mem-data, Avo squeezed through the phantasmal architecture connecting it to its jock and infested the woman’s mind. Her name, contact information, and immediately memories splashed over him as he disregarded most of the details, leaving it for his ghosts to interace with.
Instead, he filtered for everything on the massacre.
Immediately, hours of mem-data related to the reprisals injected knowledge into his Metamind.
Apparently, there had been a workers' revolt among some of the FATELESS regarding their hours and performance metrics. They had attempted to compel management to reduce demands by crippling several key systems in their work sectors.
It ended as these things always did.
Sinking through the sequences of his latest victim’s Meta, Avo regarded the vast waves cast by his own Metamind with a wince. Every movement he made was shredding through her sequences and causing the Nether to tremble. He needed to reduce his presence.
Thankfully, he knew how. He created a dozen or so loci from his own blood and infused most of his ghosts into them – all but three thousand.
And then, with his cognitive shadow far diminished, he tore through his hijacked mind for more mem-data before firing their Auto-Seance and contacting her superior. Someone called Technotheurge Ansavvar.
+Vrona? What is the purpose of this–+


Avo cracked his wards and tore through him as well. The man’s Parry MK.II Pattern protections hardened against the first trauma loosed but were insufficient for what followed.
Avo hated the Parry series: Indestructible until you get hit by slightly more than one thing. Then, marketing for the ward went from “unbreakable” to “so hard it's brittle.”
The process repeated about a dozen times before Avo found himself nulling his way through those who ordered the killing. He hopped through Auto-Seance to Auto-Seance, striking each mind from within as his metaphorical skeleton key only grew. Truthfully, it felt like stabbing someone in the back over and over again, the harm he inflicted offering only scant flashes of pleasure.
They broke screaming and clawing their skulls in the warmth of their beds and the comfort of their homes. They died with planted sequences and mingled mem-data within them, muddying probable cause.
Not that anyone would be able to guess the true reason behind Avo’s actions.
Because he could. Because being able to null someone in power was an infliction of true harm upon another; a feat far greater than ordering the execution of the small and meek.
It was also almost nigh-effortless on Avo’s part to execute. With all the jacking he did the past month combined with the boost to his reactivity, he was beginning to perceive previously unseen nuances in sequences and emotions.
As he provoked a husband and wife manager couple into killing each other via the dichotomous revelation of hidden memories, he considered how he would have eradicated the workers, and options began to blossom and bloom in his mind – a garden grown from the soil of atrocities.
Turning his considerations to another angle, he wondered how he could have prevented his own death as one of the wagers. Perhaps they could have procured their own survival by uprooting secrets between their masters and sparking a bout of infighting.
Asymmetry. It always came back to the concept. Avo’s survival and greatest challenges were born from it as well. To strike from a place without being struck. To play a game no others could play.
That, in of itself, might be the greatest advantage a Godclad held over even reality itself. To set and play by rules of your own making.
“To be the rules,” Avo whispered to himself.
There was so much more experimentation he could be doing.
A flash of light caught his attention as he emerged from the dive. Draus was leaning against a crate as a ballet of vitrified sheets spun in front of her, each of them an open passage to another place–vantage points that formed an overlooking panopticon for their current vessel.

It struck him how different her use of the Twice-Walker was from Mirrorhead. He used reflections to engender paranoia and intimidate, creating a pretense of omnipresence. She used it like an unseen spyglass, revealing nothing of herself while gazing upon distant adversaries.
+Will be hard to track you,+ Avo said. +Might need to mask your perception more. Filters through the junction in the Nether.+
Each piece of glass froze. Draus pulled herself away from gazing through her looking glasses and regarded Avo. +How many you get?+

He hadn’t felt her link to his mind when he dove. +How you know?+

+Your tongue goes wigglin’ about and you were bitin’ the air. Ain’t hard to tell, Avo.+

Ghouls weren’t ones to feel self-conscious about their behavior but some habits were better corrected.

+So,+ Draus said. +Who were they? And how was it?+

He cast the details over to her. Her pupils cycled as she processed the information. “Hells. All in a day’s work, huh?”

+Hours,+ Avo said. +Can do more. Want to play too?+
Draus took in a breath and turned her head to glance back at one of her shards. “So. What’s the game?+
+I drop mem-lock. You make a junction. See if we can make one look like a suicide.+
Her lip twitched. +Our new “consangs” might not like it. We’re gonna have to keep this quiet.+
+When have I not?+

+Dunno. When you decided to null three-hundred-thousand FATED ‘cause you felt like it.+


+Doesn’t count. Who knows if I did it? Exorcists didn’t find any evidence.+
He could feel a faint bemusement rushing out of her.
+Alright. Let’s do this. Send me my marks.+
He cast his Whisper back out and filtered through his memories to indicate the closest involved party still alive. One accretion brightened two miles above them, their aero moving fast. +Think you can get this one?+
Draus wiggled her jaw. +We’ll see, won’t we?+
Two of her floating shards began to flash in sequence. Examining the glass, Avo watched as the pinhole of scenery changed. He realized then that she was effectively using two different sets of junctions as a ladder, connecting one to a specific reflection and then using it to re-anchor the other. All the while, she remained in place, monitoring things through her collection of shards.
In seconds, her Heaven leaped across blocks and enchained itself to the window of a passing tram. With how little she was stressing the Twice-Walker’s Rend, its full manifestation remained dormant, and the two Columners remained ignorant.

Little wonder why Godclads fought quiet wars.
As the manager’s aero curved along the wind to arrive at an executive parking slot opening on the side of a block, Draus bound a shard to the aero’s windshield and bit back a smirk. +You want a jumper?+
+Yes,+ Avo said. +Wait.+ He cast his Whisper through her second active shard and released a torrent of trauma into the aero’s locus. +No more monitoring. Now you can–+


He didn’t manage to finish the thought as the vehicle’s windshield exploded. Glass fragments dug into the designated victim and, with the aid of some unseen force, tore him out through the door. Draus cut the passageway before any noise could spill over, but using her other shard, she watched as the man kicked and flailed, tumbling through the air before he burst apart against a passing cargo shipment in a spray of red.
The suddenness and absurdity of the kill made Avo grin.
“You two… talking about something funny?” Cas eyed them warily from across the unit.
Avo stopped smiling.
“Yeah,” Draus said. “Talkin’ about the Uprising. And how his family is made out of nothing but half-strands.” She jabbed him with a finger. He swatted it aside using an Echohead.
Cas’ suspicion remained.
+Chambers,+ Avo said, casting his ghost through an activating Auto-Seance. +Show Cas the Soft Master Collection. Scried at his mind. He’ll like it.+
Chambers jolted as he turned away from Denton. He blinked as he stared directly at the ghoul. +You sure? Because… he seems like one of those straight-edged Jaus-was-right guys.+
He was likely right about that, but Avo wanted the Columner distracted by other matters so he wouldn’t keep digging.
+Just do it. You’re a ‘Clad. What can he do to you? Kill you?+


That kindled a courage previously still and cold inside Chambers. +Yeah… I’m a ‘Clad. I’m a fucking ‘Clad!+
Without hint nor warning, Chambers’ back straightened, his gaze sharpened, and all the necessary sequences comprising the Soft Master Collection vicarities peeled out of his inner mind and condensed into mem-data in a building Ghost-Link.
Denton’s eyes widened momentarily as she caught of glimpse of what was forming around Chambers’ halo.
“I–Chambers, what are you–”
Ghost speared out from him into Cas as his hand fell on the taller man’s shoulder.
“So,” Chambers said, face angled with a lecherous smirk, “heard you were also a connoisseur.”
Cas turned to regard the fingers on his shoulder. “What the hell–” The contents of the Ghost-Link struck him then. His mouth fell open. His eyes rolled back as the totality of the vicarity’s horror brushed over his mind. His legs began to buckle. Through the near Nether, the anguished cries of Dannis Steelhard echoed softly.

“Yeah,” Chambers nodded. “That’s the–”


The link was rejected before its material could do more psychological harm. The twangs of guitar strings accompanied each curling digit as Cas closed his hand into a fist.

Suddenly, the expression vanished across Chambers’ face, the flood of raw disgust and fury pouring free from Cas revealing more than enough.
+Avo,+ Chambers said with a sigh. +You’re a real fucking half–+
Cas’ fist lashed out. Chambers’ head snapped back. Draus’ eyes narrowed.
+Shit,+ she said. +You might actually beat that one on one in a brawl.+
Cas rained more punches on Chambers’ nose before Denton shoved him off. She caught the ex-enforcer as his body spun, nose trailing a whip of blood.
“Cas, that’s enough,” she said.
Despite being the one inflicting the harm, the holocoated Columner seemed more rattled by far. “Did–Did you see the shit he cast at me? He’s fucking insane. He was trying to Rash me.”

A snorting laugh came from Chambers. “That’s alright,” he said. Avo couldn’t tell if the man was winking at him or if he was just blinking out of a swollen eye. “‘Cause I still got enough ghosts to make some phantoms.”
“No!” This time, Denton tackled Chambers, casting her out thoughtstuff out to interrupt him.
+Good soldier,+ Avo thought as he regarded Chambers’ struggling form. In the corner, a flat look of incomprehension swallowed Essus. +Think he would have made a good Reg in another life.+
+Fuck you, rotlick,+ Draus replied.
Metal and melody blended as Cas began to pummel Chambers relentlessly, desperate for the other man to go unconscious.
Avo grunted. +Anyway. There’s the distraction. See if we can kill a few more?+
Draus shrugged. +Why the hells not.+
It’s…. Understandable why Voidwatch would veto the project, but I still reserve the right to be upset.
Imagine. A fully modern Heaven of Strong Nuclear Forces–can you even conceive of the things we could do with such a Heaven? The canons we could weave! All those lives would be spent toward world–no, galaxy–altering purpose. Or–or something like a Heaven of Electromagnetism–agh!
Disappointment! Disappointment!
I mean–I understand… But still! Disappointment!
The Terrestrial Guilds have no idea what they’re missing out on, and the other Agnosi they’re… I don’t know why they’re so incurious. The Voiders know so much–have so much history with the world that was. They made miracles without Heavens or Ruptures or anything! If they could do that, imagine a Godclad with the intelligence of one of their ship-mind-things!
Even the un-redacted information they let me review is… Uh… just awesome. They’re awesome. If only they could get over their fear of thaumaturgy. The gods are broken and we’re oathbound–I mean, things are stable–b-better. Better now. We can try and move toward a better future.
A better future…
I’ve decided. I’m going to take the commission. Project Godshaper.

Oh, wow, saying it makes me lightheaded–uh, I need to–I need to prepare. The oaths–there’s so much lore I need to request access to. Channels… channels. Always so many channels in the way of progress.
I have a good feeling about this one. A great feeling. If Voidwatch is attached as the rumors say, I’m going to–[Audible squeak of joy]
Focus, Kae. Focus. We haven’t changed Idheim.
But the moment sure feels close.
-Mem-log of Agnos Kae Kusanade
12-9
Restoration (I)
Twenty minutes and twelve engineered assassinations later, the cargo unit was drawn away by claw-shaped carrier drones and carried down through vast rusted gates framing the distant fire of a looming furnace.
An uncomfortable swelter simmered within the container as Avo scouted what was to come with his Whisper.
“Don’t mind the heat,” Cas said, rubbing vigorously at his hand with a piece of cloth. His metallic fingers were still stained red with Chambers’ viscera, and across the room, the ex-enforcer sat next to Essus who had wordlessly been examining the other man’s wounds. “We’re going to be dropped into the waste disposal once we get shuttled inside. It’s connected to golems. Two to be exact. One for industrial use, and another, symmetrical one hidden in the same domain.”

Avo felt the pull of space distorting around the distant flames. Judging from how Chambers’ suddenly straightened and stared past the bland plasteel walls comprising the interior of the container, he sensed it too.
“The fire,” Avo said. “Demiplane tied to it?”

“Close,” Denton said. “Thermal excitement. Intensity. It’s a stolen Omnitech golem with a modern Heaven and modified canons. All-in-all, it's easy to hide and pair to the currently active miracles.”

“You got more than one of these planted across the city, don’t you?” Draus asked.

Denton’s face softened as she closed her eyes, covered her ears, and pressed her lips together. “Need to know. Even for us. I request. I get a pull. I seek and receive.”

“Yeah,” Draus said. “And I see lots of points where you can just end up gettin’ cut off.”

“Lots of ways to end up dead in this city,” Cas replied. “Sometimes, it’s better to get snuffed than topple everything down with you.”

The interior shook as the air sizzled. Avo’s Echoheads mirrored his growing agitation, thrashing and slithering as he ran his claws over his fungal plates. The itch was psychological–a sensation of memory leaking over into his physical senses.
Before a fusion burner painted your shadow into the backdrop, vaporizing your body, the initial spike of heat stung the skin with a needling feeling all across one’s nerves. Things were not that hot yet, but it wasn’t far.
“Thinkin’ about gettin’ burned?” Draus asked.
“Already know,” he grumbled, trying to hide his annoyance.
“Ya know, I always did like the burners. Made it trigger-pull-easy to clear rooms and buildings. Except when facin’ you and yours. Never stopped comin’.”

“Didn’t have much to live for.” He growled. And wasn’t that the truth for every ghoul other than him? Consume. Be consumed. What was life but a brief carnival of cruelty and flavor when you were a monster made to serve the dubious needs of a false god.
“You are not alone in your distaste," Sunrise said. "The heat bodes ill for our consciousness as well.” Languor weighed the swarm's flight path as the various bees battled to recenter. Some circled the growing mass of their fellows twice before arriving at their final stop, and through the gaps of twitching wings and jolting limbs, Avo caught sight of a chrome-sheened insect nearing thrice the size of all the others.
Its carapace was the color of fluid gray, and from its filigreed edges dolloped thin strings of matter through the other bees as if each was part of a circuit. The Nether offered a parallel portrayal: all points in its lattice of static-stained consciousness met within what seemed to be the queen of the hive.
Judging from how they were all venting hot air out between the crenulations implanted upon their shells, Avo guessed they weren’t much better with the heat than he was.
He eyed the mass of insects and considered their words. “Have you been burned before?”
“No,” Sunrise answered. “How is it?”
“A lot of pain. Then none at all.”
Suddenly, the heat lifted as gravity pulled up, and the container sank down into what squished like soft soil.
Relieved, Avo directed his perception outward again and realized they were now in the corner of a featureless sodden field. The temperature dove back to that of a morose autumn. Above, Avo could still sense the presence of the flames–hear the crackling of hyper-heated air.
They were hidden somewhere in the fire, somehow unburned on their descent down into alloy-slagging temperatures. Sweeping his Whisper’s perception wide, he regarded his surroundings and found naught but a clearing of mud and muck enclosed by a ring of leafless trees.
Columns of smoke rose in the far distance, feeding into the clouds reshaped from a dancing conflagration, the atmosphere swaying in flashes of shifting orange and yellow.
Yet, the heat never sank down from the heights.
Not twenty steps away from where their container was dropped, a gravel staircase led down to a spatially distorted oubliette.
“Come on,” Denton said as the door opened and the soft incandescence of the plane beyond welcomed them. “Let’s go get you all set up.”
As they cleared out from the container, the Glaive cast out a thought and suddenly the cube-shaped cargo unit was swallowed by the sodden soil, drawn down beneath the earth.
Chambers trailed alongside her, pointing at various things and babbling while Cas kept his eyes–and distance–from the former Syndicate Enforcer.

It seemed that despite how badly Chambers had been beaten, he came out of the confrontation with a brighter disposition and a heightened certitude in himself. He walked, whistling with each stride as Essus staggered behind, a mess of exhaustion with little regard for his surroundings.
“Most of the environment hasn’t been designed,” Cas explained. He pointed at the dead trees around them. “It’s just supposed to be a safehouse, but it's got six levels split across six different thresholds of heat. We’re in the entry. The level below us is the bivouac with beds and other stuff you need for rest, and after that we have two containment layers and one armory above the exit point into the gutters.”

“The way out is at the very bottom,” Denton added. “One-way exit. Golem shuts down and shifts locations afterward.”

“Clean operation,” Draus said. “Never enough security in this city.”

Her words struck something tender as Denton’s lip twitched. “Yeah. Never enough.”
Cas took point at the head of the group as he began descending the steps. However, he paused mid-step down the stairs, spinning on his heel to point at Chambers. Automatically, one of Chambers’ fingers came afire, returning a rude gesture directly back at Cas.
“No…. smut-vicarities,” Cas hissed. His lip twitched in disgust as Chambers held his head high. “I’m serious. We catch Rash and I’ll beat you to death with whatever homunculi I push out of me.”


“Not if I beat you with yours first,” Chambers responded.
Cas opened his mouth before the thought of Chambers reaching into his womb-sores disquieted him enough to throw up his hands and resume the descent. “Just don’t do any weird shit, please. We might all be ‘Clads, but if you’re going to work on the Agnos here, it won’t be good to have us all squirting out stillborn versions of ourselves.”
Trailing downward, Avo felt the Nether stutter as it funneled through each threshold, the staircase drilling a diagonal structure of obsidian and rune-marked stone that went on and on.
As an empty wood-floored barracks became the environment around them down a single floor, Avo found the Nether to be even more strangled than before. He would still need to seal the leaking entrances with vivianite to prevent any disruptions.
“Bed!” Chambers cheered. With his nose broken, both eyes swollen, and a cauliflower ear developing, he staggered over and threw himself atop the soft blanket, smearing the white sheets with a faceful of red.
Auto-chefs and amusingly, water filtration stations lined the far end of the room next to two open toilets flanking the next flight of stairs down another level.
“Welp,” Cas said, running his fingers through messy tassels of hair, “if you guys need a break–”

“They can just kill themselves to….” Avo’s words weren’t answered as the other two were mutually incapacitated. Essus was already asleep while Chambers continued professing his love for the sheets and non-bug-infested fabric.
The ghoul let out a low note of annoyance.
They could all resurrect in optimum condition after death, so he saw little point in sleep and much pointlessness in needing to wake Chambers up later.
He could just activate the man’s Auto-Seance to interface it with Kae’s affliction, but something inside him twitched uncomfortably. Choice had already been deprived from Essus, from Draus, from even Chambers once this day. Besides, having Chambers participate of his own volition wouldn’t take much – the man was desperate to be held in another’s esteem. Any kind of esteem.
In the meantime, he cast his Whisper down through the lower levels and examined what was offered. A dozen twelve-foot-by-twelve-foot cells lined the narrow pathways of the level below, while the one beneath that was a wide-open yard filled with nothing but sand and bones.
After that, he came upon an emptied armory, with rig stations and guns missing from lockers. The final layer then led steps into a shallow pond going to a well at its center, with the exit being a brief fall down its shaft out through exhaust vents pouring into the internal facilities of Layer Two.
So far, as a hideout it was inferior to the Washington in the scope of its capabilities, but in honest admission, the convenience of having retreats planted all across New Vultun could not be denied.
He wondered how they managed to get the exact golems needed in the proper place or have these demiplanes stocked without drawing much notice. The logistical demands of such an undertaking would be immense.
And then the thought of Zein shunting all their necessities forward into the future passed through his thoughts. That, or the use of another equally clandestine canon.

Considering how he and Draus were capable of arranging the circumspect deaths of multiple people in seconds across the reach of the city, nothing was truly beyond reach.
The question was merely one of difficulty and cost.
“Draus,” Avo said. “Need your help. Need to set inward-facing spatial rooms. Don’t want the Thoughtwaves Disruptor to spill over.”

“No factor,” Draus responded. “Watched your Whisper go down. Got eyes on our facilities?”

“They’ll do,” Avo responded. He regarded Denton thereafter. There was another pressing matter he needed to deal with. “Still have heavy Rend in one of my Heavens. Might also need matter. Mass. Or blood. Essential for the work. Want to use the materials in the fourth level.”

“That won’t be an issue,” Denton said. “It’s a blunting layer lined with empty Rend bombs anyway. You can empty yourself in those if you have a compatible domain. Try not to hit them. They might still matter if the location is compromised and we need to cut the chain.”
Avo and Draus shared a look.
“Glad I asked,” Avo said.
Cas snorted a laugh and shook his head. “Yeah. Real paranoid shit. But paranoid shit keeps us all alive. Come on. Let me go point some stuff out to you–help you set up.”
***
Time passed as Avo installed the necessary infrastructure for the initial trials.
He left loci of blood containing a few thousand ghosts in each cell on the third level for adaptive investigation. He remembered how the disruption peeled the inferno off Kae’s mind. It would be useful to repeat such an occurrence and examine the damage.
This would be abetted by Draus who was to carry his blood mass in the passage while also keeping any thoughtwave disruptions trapped within the cells' confines. To this end, she vitrified the walls, floors, and ceilings.
From how sudden the transition from plascrete and metal over to glass was, Avo could tell Mirrorhead had not been using his Heaven to the fullest in his last days. With how shattered he was psychologically, he let the full potential of his Heaven slip away.
Pitiful. Shameful.
The cruelest voice inside Avo wondered if it should invoice the Greatlings for the favor he did for them.
Once initial prep work was done, he set about dissolving much of the fourth layer to settle his Rend and then converting what remained into blood while leaving the Rendsinks untouched. Presently, they had a low yield of spatially distorting patterns–likely meant to paradox the local demiplane and see everything resolved in geometric ruin.
By the time that was done, he began digging through his Metamind and reviewing relevant mem-data from the Incubi he nulled for any relevant information to her condition. As time slowly approached the three-hour mark, he found only mutterings related to a memetic weapon referred to as the Conflagration–one matching all the traits of an advanced mem-con and Kae’s current condition.
Just a shame it offered no additional details.
“I see her,” Draus said. The Regulars words pulled him back into focus.
They were positioned inside one of the modified prison cells, and a table and two chairs were all that occupied the room. A layer of glass had formed over where the door was supposed to be, and Draus had modified its structure so Denton and Cas–or anyone outside–could peer in.
A single shard of blood-locus swayed from the ceiling like a lantern. When the time came, Avo would cast out his order and the Thoughtwave Disruptor would go off, and he would switch over to Sanguinity.
“She’s gettin’ on,” Draus muttered, focus cast far away elsewhere. The glass shard drifting close beside her projected a look into the interior of the aero. Through the shining reflection, Avo noticed Kae stepping aboard with a lost expression on her face as she first met the glass. Her skin was sheened with sweat and her red synthcoat gleamed bright as she approached. The translucent veil hiding her clan-mark flattened against her face as the winds washed over her.
Then, from far across the open expanse of the junction, she caught sight of Avo and grinned.
“Draus! Avo!” Kae said, brightening as she stepped through. She let out a slight yelp as a sense of weightlessness took her, but the Twice-Walker rose out from the nondescript reflectivity to shuttle her over. With a causal wave, Draus drew Kae out from the sheet she was expanding from the shard and grinned with satisfaction as the Agnos came through without issue.
“That’s a milk run,” Draus hissed.
Insults hurled only when the task was done. The Regular had her priorities in order.
Stumbling into Draus' grip, Kae stumbled as she blinked and shook her head. “I-I…” Her voice trailed off as she found herself in a prison cell. “Where… uh… where are we?”

“Demiplane,” Avo said. “Sectioned off from the city. Going to use it to disrupt Thoughtwaves.”

“Wh-why?”
He stared past the confusion writ upon her face and directly into the dancing flames crackling over her accretion. “To make you whole again. So you can remember. So you can think without needing an implant.”

It took her a moment to process what he was saying, but when her breath suddenly hitched, he knew she understood.
Her eyes glistened then as she pushed the veil covering her clan mark. Chewing on her lips, the weight of worry stretched out from her and pressed down upon Avo as well, its pressure there and then not, the anxiety an incremental thing between forgetfulness and sudden memory.
“But–but can you? Can you do it?”

Avo didn’t reply with an affirmative. To promise anything would be a lie and all false hope could do was traumatize her further. Instead, he needed to make this seem exactly as it was: a process.
The Sovereignty-class Thoughtwave Detonation that swept through Yuulden-Yang shed the burn from her mind for a brief instant. In that time he caught a glimpse of her halo and the sequences within, a glimpse of who she was before the fires whittled her down to mind-savaged effigy of her former self.
It would take him some time to fix her. He would need to be meticulous. Detailed in approach and extraction. As Ori-Thaum had been the ones to see her enfeebled, Avo was certain the Incubi would take special measures to ensure the damage they inflicted remained rooted in sequence and sinew.
Thankfully, with all the ghosts he wrenched from his foes, his Canon of Haemokinesis, and Chambers as another volunteer, he felt good about their chances.

“Avo,” Kae said as she let out a shuddering exhale. “What–what if I don’t—there’s something b-bad in my memories? What if–I mean–if they don’t…” She gasped for breath again. He could hear her heart screaming as it pulsed in her chest, feel the blood darting through her veins faster, cycling through the system, the fluid in her veins like friction accompanying a growing tension. “I’m scared.”
The way she said those words made him stop. He looked away from her mind and back to Kae in her entirety. She was shaking. This was sudden. Too sudden. He realized she was shooting Draus furtive glances that spilled over onto the glass.
There was so much she didn’t know now.
From one Godclad, they had emerged as cadre.
His first thought was to consider using his Ghostjack to soothe her, but then his sense caught back up to him and he remembered the point of this whole affair.
“You’ll be fine, Kae,” Draus said. She cracked the bottom of her fist against Avo’s arm and a shudder swam through his limb. “Why, Avo here’s practically got the whole thing figured out. ‘Sides, can’t be that many Jacks, better’n him. He nulled those Incubi straight on. He’ll fix you all the same.”


He speared one of his Echoheads out from behind her in ire. She tilted her body. The strike skipped off her rig and struck the ceiling. She aimed a rude gesture at him without looking. His Phys-Sim’s impact vector flashed from red to green.
+Making a lot of promises for me,+ Avo said.
Draus scratched her nose nonchalantly. +Reckon I am. Suppose all you gotta do now is deliver.+


He glowered at her. +Yeah. Just deliver. Just disable an Incubi level mem-con while infiltrating a subverted mind and clean it out entirely. Do it delicate so brain still genius after. No problem. Only risk is her turning into the vegetable. No pressure.+

+Well, shit, Avo, if I knew it was gonna be that hard for you I might’ve requested some help. Hell, there’s no shame asking for assistance. Maybe Denton. She’s a Glaive, ain’t she? Might know what to do. No shame in bein’ less skilled than someone else…+ She trailed off and shot the glass behind them a grin.
The meat was questioning his skill again. Ire flashed into genuine frustration, and Avo found himself fighting the beast, struggling to come up with a reason against pushing his thumbs through her eyes and bashing her head open on the ground.
+Reason’s you can’t,+ Draus replied, leering at him. +That’s gonna need you to get close to me. And we both know how you are up close.+
+Going to tear the blood out from your skull. Pop your insides. Drink your organs from your corpse like a carton.+

+Well, if we’re imaginin’ things, I guess I’m gonna turn your head into glass, smash the glass, and then shit down your throat before puttin’ the pieces back together to watch you choke on my shit.+

He just glared. +I’m going to fix her. Don’t need help. Know what to do. Then. Afterward. I’m going to kill you. I’m going to eat you. I’m going to kill and eat you until the beast inside begs me to stop. Till it gets tired of Reg-meat.+


Draus angled her head as she sneered up at him. +Sure you will. More likely, I’m gonna have a grand ol’ time reliving my war days on rotlick safari.+
A low hiss began to build in his throat. He clicked his fangs together as he envisioned biting into her skull, tearing flaps of flesh free from her augmented bones before moving onto her eyes.
For her part, she just ran her tongue along the inside of her cheek. Her fingers flexed, and with them, her wing scythes expanded. “Well. You gonna make somethin’ of this, or are you gonna start whistlin’ your apologies?”
Avo’s Echoheads reared back–
A banging came from the glass. “Hey… hey, hey! Watch out for the Agnos. Don’t need you two maniacs adding her to the statistics.” Cas sounded genuinely worried for Kae’s life. Curious.

Kae herself spoke thereafter. “Are… are you two doing it again? You… you can fight if you want. I’ll go sit behind the table so… so I can avoid any stray… uh… shrapnel. It’s fine.”
He halted in place.
“No,” Avo said. “That’s later. You’re priority.”

For some strange reason, that made Kae break into a bright smile.
Draus’ shard flashed as the reflection jumped into the windshield on the aero and then over upon a window at the second fortune. “For future access,” she explained. “Listen, Kae. Before we start this, there’re are a couple things we might-gotta talk about…”
The Conflagration is more than an “advanced trauma pattern.”
Voidwatch has hidden much from us–secrets near impossible to tease out with the deviance between our spines of power and “technology.” Yet, for all that they withhold, there are still things that leak. Expressions and functions of their devices become evident when they clash with the world.
Take their Ego-Screamers for instance. A beautiful piece of technology defiled by Highflame to feed their banal habits. From the samples we procured, its effects on the mind are… self-replicative on another level.
By converting a baseliner’s mind while being overwritten by the Ego-Screamer, we have managed to capture a semblance of the nano-machines in the Nether–though only a narrow facet of its full functionality, we assume.
Being a product of Voidwatch, the architecture of the construct is… vastly beyond our full understanding, even as an analogous construct expressed through the Nether. What’s more, it is highly volatile, and its delivery mechanisms are… limited, at best.
Conceptualize the weapon thusly: You are injecting a self-aware entity to destabilize another mind. It, however, is not human. It possesses no semblance of “Essence” from which we can compare. You also do not wield said weapon as it cannot be wielded, only transferred from point to point. If it comes into contact with your thoughts, your mind will be unmade all the same.
As such, requests for using such a construct require the highest levels of clearance provided only by an Elder or above, and even then it will require approval from the [redacted].
It is with relief that we managed to limit its effect parameters by conditioning a Conflagration-unit to the diet of specific, target-related memories, but do not take this for certain–the entity can and will devour you.
REPETITION FOR EMPHASIS
This is not something you can mold or direct. It hates you. It hates all things capable of thought, and it seeks to override your cognition and boil all semblance of thought away so it can finally die.
Moreover, the presence of this “pattern” must never be discovered by Voidwatch for the certain reprisals it will bring.
-Incubi Primer on the Conflagration Trauma-Pattern
12-10
Restoration (II)
“Th–the Stillborn can install Frames…” Kae muttered, eyes wide. Such wonder drove her words, even as a fugue of disbelief interrupted by bouts of confusion consumed her.
Kae shifted on the hard bench of the small cell, made smaller by Avo and Draus. Gathered in the testing cell, Draus detailed their mostly successful assassination of Mirrorhead followed by the utter Zein-induced chaos and ruination of Nu-Scarrowbur during the mad dash across Light’s End, the Agnos’ face was a constant flux between surprise and astonishment.
“And… and the Paladin–he just… just let you go?” Her frown deepened. She brushed the transparent half-veil covering half her face. “That… that shouldn’t happen. They-they have oaths. I don’t… they’re not supposed to do that… The Chief es-especially. Or at least they didn’t… didn’t used to.”

“Didn’t used to?” Avo asked.
She shook her head. “I think I–the Sage of… uh. I can’t remember. But… but I think I remember… remember Naeko. He was… he was nice. But tired. And sad…” She paused. “He shouldn’t have let you go.”

She already said that, but the repetition could just as well be due to emphasis as it could forgetfulness.
As her thoughtstuff shifted, so did the flames, swirling and dancing. Between the instances of memory reinstalled into her mind via her exocortex, he caught a glimpse of her active sequences coming alight. It was like gazing down at streets ablaze during a riot from on high, the damage inflamed and deep.
Failing to understand the nature of her affliction, to stabilize and remove it could very well worsen her mental crippling. Cold refreshing focus flowed through his veins as the weight of his task began to settle on his shoulders in full.
Whatever the Incubi had done to her was more adaptive than any other trauma pattern he had ever seen. But where they matched him in skill, they lacked so far in miracles and preparation.
All his Necrojacking “experience,” earned or instilled, bubbled in the back of his skull.
Walton had invested in him all he could. Given him the tools to wrestle with cognition, to understand any and every foe if he could only find the proper angles and memories. He had Chambers’ unique mental architecture. He had whatever history Draus shared with Kae to call upon. He had Denton and Cas for whatever they could provide.
All that remained was for him to study, design, and execute a solution for Kae’s release from torment.
In the end, the prize far outweighed the risk: A working Agnos. A trauma pattern he could turn against the Incubi themselves.
The tension behind his task sweetened. Yes. The promise of future pleasure prevailed over pressure.
He licked his fangs.
“Can start soon,” Avo said. “Begin initial dive and survey mind. Will begin by detonating thoughtwave. Will clean your surface thoughts. Still the burning for a moment. You will remember. And you will lose it again. Understand? Need to prepare yourself.”

Kae bit her lip and nodded. “I’ll be fine. I survived it before.” The uncertain quiver in her voice betrayed the weight of worry churning inside her, but that couldn’t be helped. Cleaning wounds stung, physical or mental, and if he wanted to return her to whatever wholeness was yet achievable, the odds were more hurt was to follow.
“I’ll be here with you if that matters for anythin’,” Draus said. She was leaning against the wall with her arms folded. “And if the rotlick here screws up, I can break his neck. You know. For encouragement.”

He bade his Echoheads chitter his ire at the Regular in his stead; his primary preoccupation now was the examination of Kae’s mind. All else could come later.

Extending filaments of blood out from his veins, he interfaced with the haemokinetic locus he constructed, hanging from the ceiling like a node on a chain.
When he sent the signal, it would detonate and everyone would lose track of their thoughts. The blast would loop through the glass via Draus’ Heaven and the other cells would be unaffected. Afterward, he would connect to the flowing circuits of blood leading to the floor below and link himself to much-needed mass for frame-jacking.
Then, using the vast amplification of his perceptive speed, he would begin his initial sweep through her mind to construct a general map of her trauma. Following the diagnosis with the next treatment steps.
If need be, he could also ignite Chambers’ mind using Kae’s ailment – study how the pattern interacted with the man’s “unique” mental structure. Worst came to worst for him, he could just kill him–
Avo paused. His thoughts snapped together like a shut book.
The Stillborn could graft people to Frames. A final solution dawned in his mind if everything collapsed: He could kill and burn Kae into a Frame using the one he took from the last Godclad he killed or take one from Essus or Chambers. Or maybe even Draus if that was what she wanted.
He had to remember that he was more than just a Necro now. He was a Godclad. And Godclads always had more options.
“Alright,” Kae said, swallowing. “I’m ready.”

“Synced about that,” Draus added. “We dive on you.”
Avo examined the Agnos’ mind once more before casting the epiphany that just occurred to him over to Draus.
She received his ideas with nary more than a curl of her lip, the response too broad for him to read. +Could work. Don’t think she wants that though. It’s an option we can keep in reserve in case you fuck it all up.+
+Why don’t you think she wants it?+ Avo asked.
+Agnosi got vows and binding stuff they’re supposed to commit to.+
+I see. Lingering professional entanglement instead of death wish. Have seen others get over that.+ He grinned at her. +All it took were a couple of assisted “suicides.”+
Draus narrowed her eyes at him. +You know, I’m kinda wonderin’ why your pa decided on “half-strand” for your personality. He didn’t have other options? Guess the Low Master’s gotta go with what he knows.+
The beast twitched. That sparked enough anger in him to merit a low growl.
Kae leaned back and away, unsure what she did to provoke the ghoul into such a response.
+Needle me about my “death wish” again,+ Draus taunted. +Do it. See which of us happens to get bloody first.+
+Me,+ Avo didn’t even bother denying it. +But later. Later.+
+Yeah. Later. Kae now+. The Regular’s posture softened, and from her mind ebbed a faint note of approval. +You keep holding yourself together like that. That’ll be all the difference when the time comes.+
A genuine compliment from Draus – rarer than most Heavens. Avo offered an incomprehensible grunt.
“Going to start soon,” Avo said. “Going to make the locus above pulse five times. Detonation happens after that. Sit down. Be ready. Relax. If you can. Don’t struggle against intrusion.”
She nodded and did as he asked. He took one last look at her thoughtstuff before casting out a chain of ghosts binding him to his locus. The Thoughtwave Disruptor he sequenced within it swirled with dormant memories, but would only trigger when he demanded it.
So far, he hadn’t found the time to attune the various ghosts he modified. Another reason why he kept them separated from his Meta aside from the overwhelming mass. But where overcapacity was an issue for his mind, planted in the secondary loci, the sheer mass of ghosts provided a surfeit of usable phantasmics. His greatest limitations now were the stability of the local pockets of Nether more than any material lack.
Casting a signal into the locus, he directed phantoms to swell and contract five times and primed the thoughtwave to a memory trigger.
With that complete, he ceased all other operations and stilled his surface thoughts as best he could. The more one thought when a detonation went off, the more–
A overwhelming wave wrenched whatever Avo was considering out from the periphery of his Meta. To his side, Draus blinked as she pushed off the wall, her stance instinctively defaulting toward violence before the waters of thought began to run anew.
Kae, meanwhile, had taken the brunt of the blast with but a gasp. The cascade of phantasmal force plucked the very fire from her mind as her focus dissolved and her thoughts skipped.
In the absence of the Nether, Avo corrected the issue by expanding his Sanguinity. Threads of red trickled out from between his plates and orifices before breaking into motes and sprinkling the cell.
Dots of red brushed across Kae’s face while Draus opened the junction of glass behind him, allowing his sphere of influence to spread. Through the field projected by his Heaven, he guided his widening awareness down the halls and reached into the pool of blood he prepared for himself.
Time dilated in a nigh instant, and the firing of his Celerostylus only magnified the effect.
As the air stilled and the flow of ichor accelerated, he heard his Heavens whispering anew.
“Behold, mule. Behold the restoration of the architect! Soon, we will be made greater still–greater than we ever could have been in eons old. Be you not glad you are awake this moment? To taste such glory a meager messenger would have never realized.”
Ignoring the Woundshaper, the Galeslither found itself drawn to the ghosts dancing through the room. “The spirits alive… These facets of humanity’s thoughts, how did they become unmoored? How did any of this come to be.” A pause went between both its words and its thoughts. “How they travel across the vastness of a plain, such speed…”
More and more, the nature of the gods made themselves known to Avo. They were effable, yet not human. More rooted in fixed concept than the complex cocktail of feedback, memory, impulse, and rationality that scaffolded the mind of a person.
So far, the two fixated on things of their like and power, only regarding things beyond their scope with faint interest.
He wondered if there could be a way to instill something of a ghost into a god. To expand their thought parameters, if only externally.
The concept was a fleeting one as his full focus returned, taking hold to steel himself for his first dive into the Agnos’ mind.
INITIATING META-DIVE…
If there was one major point of convenience diving into Kae, it was that he didn’t need to hide his presence from her awareness. Such an allowance granted him the ability to move with greater agility through her memories and put his efforts toward combating her ailments.
Unfortunately, that was where the good ended.
The state of her mind was like standing in the aftermath of a firestorm.
As it seemed from the outside, her sequences were effectively incinerating themselves from within, each interconnected memory and sinew of jumping thought fed to the flame. He could feel a building weight entering her cognition, its sound like the rumbling of damaged pipes – a prelude to a reinstallation of a memory update.
The structure of her inner mind moved in flowing tatters. Gaps dotted solid artifacts and gulfs slashed of recollection. If the totality of Kae’s history could be recorded on a reel, then this was the aftermath scarred with soot and flame.
Her possession of the exocortex was the sole reason why she still bore any semblance of self-awareness. From all the damage present, she truly should remember nothing.
And through all this time, he never thought to ask the Agnos where she got the neuro-implant from. Or why.
Spreading the three thousand ghosts he commanded out wide through her mind like a net, he saved snapshots of her Metamind’s palace, and graphed a vague simulation of the constructs and memories that once stood.
From what he gathered, she once had wards that belonged to the Memguard series; she once had a vast archive of knowledge built in the heart of her mind, like a grand library hidden within the folds of one’s mindscape. Mottled husks of phantasmal substance decomposed, folded from the inflamed tissue of savaged sequences. They rose high and low unevenly, hinting at a capricious–or scattered pathway of thoughts.
A personal apocalypse had happened here. The devastation of brilliant mind through a weaponized phantasmal construct he didn’t fully grasp yet. But the devastation was incomplete, and from the horizon came healing waters injected from a pipeline of building static.
There was a metaphor here. A parallel between Kae and Idheim entire. Locals who dwelled burned their own homes in a way that was nigh-absolute–in a way that only they could. And by the grace of ancient cousins helping from the unfathomed darkness beyond, the end was held at bay, but not truly halted.
A battle remained.
At least this one Avo felt he had good odds of winning.
As he finished mapping out her general sequences, he considered leaving an Auto-Seance within her mind for easier access to her thoughts. Odds were it would just burn away and decompose like all the phantasmics she once had.
He decided to try it: he had the ghosts and sequences to spare, and it would be useful to see how the fire worked with something he was connected to.
Planting the Auto-Seance upon the tapestry of her mind was like rooting a communications tower in ash-choked soil. It took his Metamind nearly a full real-time second to locate a point in her mind stable enough to support such cognitive capacity, and it came as the flood coming from her undammed exocortex washed through her channels of thought, mending the sediment of her mind where it touched.
He decided to install the phantasmic just past where the static flowed, moving to greet the integers and crackling distortion of incomprehensible coldtech. All the while, he let his Whisper drift as he waited and watched for the fires to come, studying the scalded phantasmics she once had with the bulk of his suspicion.
His attention was in the wrong place.
The field of static didn’t pass through him.
It tore.
There was no warning–no note of alarm nor splash of perception when it came. Instead, fire exploded up from beneath each and every one of her sequences as the fabric of her stability began to burn, rising as screaming a scant microsecond after the exocortex fired.
Immediately, Avo felt something burrowing into him as well. It didn’t taste like fire, nor was there a heat to it. But it moved as if with a will of its own, grasping and grappling and clawing for anything within his mind that had purchase, trying to force itself into any memory as he felt his Quicksand crack.
And begin to boil.
Fire erupted around his outer layer of protection. Fire that started from inside a single sequence of memory and multiplied in almost each and every direction. Fire that screamed at him in a voice that was a chorus of tortured humanity.
This wasn’t just a ghost. It was too present, and the quality was too self-aware.
He realized then why he didn’t perceive it earlier; how her affliction seemed to come on so suddenly. It was of a dichotomous nature, capable of being solid and static both as it burned at her mind, and could nest in her exocortex.
But not destroy the memories there.
There was an emotional accompaniment to the howling pain. A want and a need to finally destroy this hell it was rooted in, to be free, to stop being self-aware.
It wanted to die. The entity wished itself dead, but so long as someone else knew of its existence, so long as it had rooting in cognitive architecture, its suffering remained.
His own mind whirled as a dull searing pain cooked him from the outside, the temperature cupping his thoughts spiking hot.
Without hesitation, he severed the ghosts he funneled into her mind as they were all burning, sequences coming alight like channels filled with napalm.
In less than a semi-second, Avo detached three-hundred and eighty-four ghosts, and left them to burn.
If he lingered any longer, even that would have been a paltry pittance for the true price demanded from his mind.
Snapping back into full consciousness, he felt his legs buckle but caught himself using his Echoheads before he could fall. Kae was crying out in pain, her nails digging into her own skull as she threw her head back, mouth open, veil fluttered.
Her organic eye glistened much like her false one as wrinkles of strain consumed her.
All the while, flames fissured out from her sequences like volcanic veins.
He needed to think. Review. But more than that, he needed a closer look at how the conflagration burned in real-time.
Severing himself from both canons and reflex, time settled as he grasped Kae by the skull, examining the burning halo around her with even greater interest than he saw before. He remembered not to squeeze in the last instant, and on his arm, he could feel the tightness of Draus’ grip.
“What? What’s wrong? What’d you see?” The Regular’s voice was hushed and harried. But she was of secondary note now.
As was Kae.
There was something else in the Agnos’ mind. Someone else. He could hear them screaming, fighting. Desperate to die. Desperate to starve.
Whatever she suffered was more than a simple trauma; more than a mem-con; more than a complex phantasmic.
And it had taken a bite out of him.
Now that was disquieting.
“What are you,” he whispered.
What makes a good Necro…
Hell. Let’s start with making a mediocre Necro. Easier there, and it’s still hard.
Alright. I need you to do two things at the same time, alright?
First, you gotta be able to just… drown in someone else’s life. Their emotions, their thoughts, their everything. You got to feel as they feel and not lose yourself. Not for a moment.
Then, I need you to give absolutely no fucks whatsoever about their pain, their personhood, their habits. I need to you detach immediately and identify all points of symmetry and reusable memory artifacts in those few sequences of memories.
Also, I need you to find all memories of analogous significance, because that’s how phantasmics are made.
You do this for hours. Days. With needles feeding you nutrients and water keeping you cool and you never lose focus. You never let yourself drift. You never get lost in their thoughts or your own.
Because if you do any of that, you’re not going to be a Necro for long. The trauma is going to eat you alive. The empathy is going to cut you up from the insane. The horror of what you can do to another person–how you can fuck them up like no one else can–That breaks you too.
You have to do all these things almost perfectly all the time.
Now, there’s your basic prerequisite being a Necro. How many of you got the aptitude for that? Just live through the memories of a child being drowned by her drunkard of a father and then emerge from that sequence and say “Yeah, this will be mem-data pack number eighty-four.”


You can’t feel so much that you’re a full person; you can’t be so cold that you’re an absolute psychopath.
To be a good Necro you have to be… fractured. A piecemeal thing of a person. That’s why so many Necros sequence themselves into collapse and insanity. Too much to take, and they route the hurt to the wrong place.
You wanna hear me spit some honesty? I don’t think people make good Necros.
Only curious monsters do. Like those beasts wearing the flesh of humans in the Incubi. Or whatever the fuck those Low Masters are.
-Quail Tavers, School of the Warrens
12-11
A Theft of Fire (I)
“The fire is alive,” Avo explained. “It hides in her exocortex. Touched me. Knew I was there. It was in pain. It was screaming. It wanted to die.”

The others gathered before he stared on, some blank-faced, others ashen by the implications. Between him and Denton, an unspoken understanding blossomed while the others looked lost. A few of Sunrise’s drones were buzzing through the air, monitoring the situation while Chambers and Essus sat on the chairs leading to the second level.
In the cell behind, Kae rubbed at her temples as she sat in the chair, mind aflame once more.
“Are you sure you saw static in its structure,” Denton said.
He cast a mem-data packet at her. She accepted without any hint of suspicion. The growing furrow between her eyes and the bending of her brows told how severe the situation was, and the word she used next summarized how she thought of the matter thusly.
“Fuck.”

Cas jolted at his partner’s curse. “Whoa? That bad?”

Denton’s eye twitched. “Worse. I don’t know how, but I think the Ori made something they probably can’t put back in a box if they let it slip out.”

The other Columner winced. “So… it’s like a thought-eating self-aware fire thing–”

“It’s a corrupted engram,” Denton said. “My best guess, anyway. How they managed to transfer that from pure data and information into partial Nether-bound phantasm, or why it hasn’t eaten through her exocortex as well, I don’t know. I do know that if the broader polities among the EGIs discover what’s going on here, we’re going to be looking at a vote of a mass embargo on the Silvers.”

Draus tilted her head. “They might choke the Ori is what I’m hearin’?” She hid her pleasure at that possibility well, but Avo could still taste the schadenfreude simmering beneath the surface of her mind.
You could excommunicate the Regular from Highflame, but that didn’t mean she was ever going to stop hating the Silvers.
“Alright,” Chambers said, interrupting the conversation. He slapped his ghoul-leather trousers and a loud crack cut through the air as he stood. “I’m ready. Avo. Do me.”


Avo paused. “What?”

“This is part of why I’m here, right?” He held out his arms and closed his eyes like he was a martyr. “My mind is ready for battle. I got the Soft Master Collection–”

A look of primal fear consumed Cas as he started forward, fingers twanging strings into fists before Denton halted him. It took several muttered reassurances that the ex-enforcer wasn’t going to “rash-everyone” right then and there before he calmed down.
“--I got Nu-Dog in the Wrong Ass I, II, III, and Nu-Dog: Re-erected all primed. If the virus wants to chew, I’ll give it some special masticating.”

Chambers then promptly began imitating what was supposedly a nu-dog eating its way up something. From the angles he was biting, it didn’t look like a bone.
“Avo, pull this memory out of my mind,” Draus muttered. “I don’t want this shit.”
The atmosphere of disgust thickened, but Avo considered Chambers’ offer from another perspective.
“Vicarities. How many of them have mem-cons?” He shook his head the second he asked the question. Chambers didn’t know–he just downloaded from whatever was available.
Instead, Avo directly accessed the man’s mind using his Auto-Seance and began sweeping through. After he filtered through over two hundred ghosts’ worth of mem-data all about… things a ghoul didn’t care for, the number of infection vectors numbered well past ten thousand.
And they were all attacking each other to keep his mind in place.
Avo wondered: Could these clashes be used against the awakened flame?
This could be tested…
“Chambers,” Avo said. “Going to create a link between you and Kae. Draus. Open glass. Let him inside. I want to watch how he starts burning.”
The Regular eyed him. “You sure that’s a good idea?”


“There is a mind in the fire,” Avo said. “Want to see if it can spread. Divide.” A consciousness spreading and expanding like wildfire. If Avo could understand or even modify the structure to such an entity…
He needed it out of the Agnos’ head first. And to do that, he needed to observe it more.
On Chambers’ end, the choice was an easy one to make. Driven by some combination of ignorance and obsequiousness tempered by the life he lived, he strode toward Kae’s cell with determination and a reel of nightmarish smut ringing his mind like a crown of depravity.
Essus caught sight of something that made him wince and look away. Cas took a step behind Denton as the Glaive shuddered uncharacteristically.
Only Avo and Draus remained steadfast before the man’s approach, and even then, the mind of the Regular stank with disgust.
As the glass fractured and collapsed into a fan of fractals, she caught Chambers before he could walk it. A chitinous wing extended from Draus right shoulder, blocking the man from entry. She buried a single finger into his chest, and Avo found himself remembering his own encounter with Rantula. “If she gets the fuckin’ rash from you–”

“You’ll make me kick my own ass by folding my legs over my ears and back again so that I hit myself with extra momentum before riding me down the stairs?” he finished on her behalf.
Draus fell silent. “Well, I was just plannin’ on geldin’ you with my monowire, but sure, whatever makes you piss yourself.”
Avo turned to Draus. “I think that’s what he enjoys. Not what disgusts him.”

“He’s makin’ me glad we have the rash.”
Chambers had already walked in, greeting Kae with a broad smile and rambling words. Avo considered the ex-enforcer again.
Rantula. She was dead now. Dead with all the others he massacred at Mazza’s Junction. By the slightest change of opportunity, by a missed second, or a different choice, Chambers would have been among them.
Instead, he was here, a Syndicate peon made Godclad almost by happenstance alone.
Avo felt a strange thrill at being kingmaker to the unworthy. He thought of the other Frame he took from the Godclad that once mantled the Aegis. Who else could be blessed? Who else could he empower? Bright Wealth? Req? A stray FATELESS with enough cause and hate in their heart?
For now, the best option remained Kae herself. But that was only if he couldn’t dismantle the thing that dwelled along the burning veins of her thoughts. Such an entity would be useful to study.
And wield. But that required him to understand the full nature of its consciousness first, and if it was capable of choice at all.
Beneath the swaying locus, Kae sat at the table, exhausted and confused as to what was going on with the new arrival. Her attention brushed Chambers briefly before settling on Avo for reassurance. He followed into the room right after but stayed his stride as streams of droning insects formed into a concentrated core.
“I wish to be a direct party to this as well,” Sunrise said, its voice sounding thoughtful. “It will be to our mutual benefit to examine the structures of such a construct. I believe it resembles neuro-uploaded architecture we have seen before, but I cannot say for certain.”


One of the swarm’s drones settled on his shoulder and Avo studied the small creature. Every moment it reminded him of its presence, he found it harder to regard or define the Sunrise. It was a cybernetic bioform capable of thought at least at the level of a baseliner, but its mind was closer to being a simulated network running along coldtech channels.
More considerations followed. “Can you access her exocortex?” He paused. He never asked Kae or Draus where the Agnos obtained the implant from.
The response from Sunrise parted some of the mystery. “I suspect I will only be able to achieve partial success at best. The platform being used is missing several critical components to be regarded as a ‘coldtech’ product. Its nature is anomalous to my operating system.”

“Omnitech,” Avo realized. He turned to Draus. “How long has she–”

“Since before she got burned,” Draus said. “Agnosi have a habit of needing to draw on a hell of a lotta restricted memories. Keepin’ them logged in one mind that can be switched on and off is way some of ‘em avoid needin’ to flash their FATE Skeins constantly at Exorcists or GuildSec.”
That deepened the mystery behind her burning. If Ori-Thaum was deliberately trying to cripple or null her, how could they let such an instrument slip from their considerations?
Or was this another twist in the path that Walton ensured? Another unexplained act on the part of his father.
“It approximates the nature of a pure-technology mind deck, but the current materials it is using to support such functions are woefully insufficient,” Sunrise surmised.
“Insufficient?” Avo asked.
“There are no chips inside it. No proper hardware. Just a loose collage of plastic, silicon, and alloy arranged in ritual symbology mimicking the layout of absent structures.”
Thinking of the concept sparked a tinge of amusement in Avo. Most Heavens and miracles bent and overwrote the pillars of reality to serve new ends, but it seemed Omnitech was determined to use their subrealities to further reinforce reality itself. Or bypass logistical necessities.
Five entities occupied the cell now. Draus, Avo, and Sunrise gathered before shards congealing to reform over the doorway while Chambers leaned on the table telling Kae about how everything would be alright in a moment, and how the “half-strand in her head might be ready for the Nu-dog series, but the Soft Master Collection was on another level.”
Kae, for her part, was nodding along blankly, a pleasant expression on her face between winces of pain as the fire grew into narrower sequences sequestered in her subconsciousness. Doubtless she was just humoring the man.
Good too. Divorced from human emotion though Avo was, imagining Kae subjected to Chambers’ various viciarities was too strange for the beast to consider torture, and too unpleasant for Avo’s rational mind to consider it not to be.
“You sure about this?” Draus asked, her eyes locked on Chambers while her fingers twitched. She fought her instinctive urge to shoot the man as he leaned over Kae, talking animatedly about how he once caused a lobby to crash when he traded mem-data with it.
The Agnos’ nods slowed, and from her came more furtive glances, eyes wide with worry as she tried to signal Avo for help.
“She’ll be fine,” Avo said. “More interested in how his mind collapses.”

“You sure he’s gonna collapse? Because the way you talk about him, he’s nothin’ but mem-cons and traumas fightin’ each other.”
“Yes,” Avo said. “He is. Don’t think it will matter. The fire. It infested my ghosts. Wards barely stopped it. Dug into that too. Had to shed everything I used to map her mind for the first dive.”

Draus let out a breath. “So, what? It’s like a super mem-con?”
“It is more than a plague,” Avo said. “Metaphor not enough. It’s like…” An eighteen-year-old memory passed through him. “Like deconstructors. Nanomechanical fog.”
“How the hells did the Silvers learn to develop somethin’ like that,” Draus said. “And if they got that, why ain’t we all burnin’?”
“Don’t think most of them know it exists,” Avo said. “Incubi memories don’t have any recollection of it. I couldn’t find anything on Ori-Thaum owning nanosuites like this either.”

“Because they don’t,” Sunrise said. Draus leaned past Avo and locked perceptions with the swarm for an awkward instant before leaning back. “Voidwatch has not exchanged weaponized nanos with any of the terrestrial powers. All developments must be made on their own.”

“Or mimicked by another,” Avo said. His thoughts trailed back to Omnitech and the exocortex jutting from Kae’s skull. If they could make that absent proper material, would it take much for them to replicate something like the deconstructors?
“It is a possibility,” Sunrise said. A shrill note followed. “Aegis will not be pleased.”

“Aegis. That a voider thing?”
“Aegis is a cross-fleet security apparatus established to engineer conditions of continued safety and survival in a post-collapse galaxy.” The swarm hummed the words melodically and without pause. Like it ran deeper than memory.
Draus let out a breath. “Well, how’s that goin’ for them?”
Through the thick curtain of static, Avo thought he tasted a sliver of annoyance from Sunrise. “We live next to you.”
The Regular threw her head back and barked a laugh. Kae shivered in her seat at the sudden noise while Chambers threw himself behind her, using her as cover. Avo also sniffed the air. A trickle of fear-piss had also darted out from the man onto the inner folds of his “borrowed” pants.
“Alright,” Avo said. “Chambers. Get up. Get ready. Kae too.”

She nodded as she clenched the edges of the table. Chambers, meanwhile, crawled back to his feet, brushing the messy flap of the dirty blonde mop he called hair before miming two guns at Avo using his fingers.
The ghoul responded by invoking his Sanguinity’s Reign. A filament manifested between Chambers and Kae, allowing thoughtstuff to tread across a hair-thin bridge.
Motes of blood held the Nether-conducting construct aloft as Chambers and Kae both blinked. The enforcer’s face twitched as a growing uncertainty expanded out from him. “So… how… uh… what are the Tiers like? Heard you use to live up there.”
Kae frowned. “It’s… hard to remember.”
“Right. Fuck.” He sighed. “Bad question, Chambers.” He was about to open his mouth and ask something else before his eyes widened and a trickle of static surged through the link.
“There,” Avo said, pointing to the transference. “Not solid. Jumped like mem-data.”


Draus meanwhile was narrowing her eyes, confusion emanating from her mind as she tried to parse the chaos of the mem-data through her cog-feed. He cast a memory into her overlay for emphasis and she grunted her thanks.
Sunrise, meanwhile, dispatched a few drones to circle high above the Agnos.

“Don’t get too close,” Draus muttered. ‘She might forget I mentioned you earlier and try to crush one of you.”
Commands transmitted to the drones along static lattices. They circled higher to plantthemselves on the ceiling from which the locus distended, observing the proceedings from there.
The flames came as whispered embers at first, trickling like scintillating flares cast into a pond. The initial flames sparked upon caressing the threshold of Chambers’ thoughts, but his mind did not come ablaze like Kae.
Instead, as veins of conflagration crawled forward, sundering surface thoughts like the spreading of soil during an earthquake, it struck the first bulwark of inner memories and suddenly its vectors turned in on itself.
Light speared into light as something digging through Chambers’ mind recoiled. Avo severed the link binding him to Kae, curious to see if he would still burn.
To the ghoul’s delight, the flames continued to crackle. What’s more, it retreated, burrowing its way back to the surface of the man’s thoughts as it sought the bridge of blood that served as the vehicle of its crossing.
Kae’s expression contorted into one of horror as the ex-enforcer’s accretion resembled the face of an eclipse, the contours of his cognition incandescent while the inner walls began to fall one after another.
The heroic expression Chambers’ wore twitched. “Avo, uh… consang. I ain’t gonna lie… It’s starting to burn when I think. I… It’s getting really hard to keep track of…. Of…” He strained himself, trying to clutch his thoughts tight. “It’s like my thoughts are there and then just… gone.” Whatever bravado he armored himself with melted away. His lips drew back in a taut grimace. “Fuck… Thinking burns. Shit. It’s like pissing out Scaarthian liquor. But in my head.”

Avo approached his new test subject and studied him in silence. He was enraptured by how methodically the fire now spread. It was teasing its way forward now, learning which sequences it had to burn through instead of rushing forward and crashing into itself.
The equilibrium of downloaded traumas and viruses had calcified into a phantasmal endoskeleton within Chambers, that momentarily befuddled the entity. But then it changed its approach. Stopped trying to eat away at everything and worked to boil away specific structures instead.
Soon, it would upset the balance of Chambers’ internal ecosystem enough that the man’s mind might collapse all on its own.
“Can do more than just think,” Avo said. “It can plan.”

“Not well,” Sunrise surmised. “It’s a primal intellect. It adapted out of necessity. It didn’t move with foresight. THe conditions of its education had to be forced on it.”

That was also true.
Chambers was cupping his temples down. Inch by inch, his memories rose as columns of flame. The effect was nowhere near as fast as what tore through Kae, but the progress was still staggering.
Avo wondered how Walton would have faced such a construct. By the feats it displayed now, he guessed his father would probably rather avoid something this potent altogether.
“Avo–Draus,” Chambers whimpered. He slid down the glass and his nails clawed bloodied furrows into his scalp. “Oh, Jaus. Fuck. It’s bad… I’m sorry about… Sorry Agnos lady. I thought I’d be…” A sob choked out from his throat. “...Tougher.”

Kae’s expression contorted into one of sorrow and disbelief. “A-avo! Why… stop watching! Help him…”

Avo ignored her. The fires hadn’t won yet. He still needed details on how fast they would–
A dozen sequences in the middle of Chambers’ Meta shattered into shrapnel, and from them the rest of his mind followed. Destruction cascaded as unchecked trauma exploded inside the man’s mind and shredded through his ego. Thoughtstuff erupted out in a pressurized spray as Chambers’ jaw went slack.
His perception dissolved. Drool spilled out from his lips.
His legs gave out under him and he toppled.
Walking over to get a better look at the damage, Avo’s focus was captured in full by an entity flooding and consuming all that remained. A blank expression of mind-dead placidity finally took the man. He stopped struggling. He stopped thinking. He stopped being.
And a moment later, so did the fire, the last embers glittering as its frenzied assault simmered away into faint crackles giving a lingering emotion.
Relief.
Avo spread his fangs wide.
The thing felt. He tasted it. He knew the emotion.
It could feel.
It could be broken.
There was a way.
Letting out a low chuff of satisfaction. Avo beheaded Chambers with a thought, killing the man.

Grasping the head using his Sanguinity-boosted haemokinesis, he drew the meat up to him as he watched the last of embers die. He brought Chambers’ face close to him and spoke into its ear. “Die then. Run from me. Will claim you soon. You’re human too. I felt it. Broken maybe. But still human. Prey.”

And as an expression of symbolic mockery–and because his appetite took him–he bit off Chambers ear and savored the taste.
Turning his gaze down, he saw Kae looking up at him, her face wide-eyed and aghast.
He patted her atop her skull using one of his Echoheads. His memories told him humans used this method to comfort their young. “Don’t worry. He’ll be back. Do it a few more times. I see the solution. You will be freed.”

For some strange reason, that didn’t disperse the dread behind her eyes.
The Reverie Mark-II Exocortex is a pretty handy piece of kit, but it won’t be replacing your Meta anytime soon.
It's a tangible implant, main benefits being:
Ease of access; no need to schedule an Agnos appointment to get one burned in
Direct installation; any grafter can connect it to you
Dual-aspect connectivity; you wanna connect to machines using ghosts or whatever weird tech stuff Omnitech is simulating? Sure. Do it.
The problem is expense. This thing costs a million imp. One million. That money will buy you a tac-nuke.
I mean–those aren’t that expensive, but still. Five last gen rigs at least. Decent ones too. I’m talking the Sang Gorillabadger series or the Highflame Ascender Starfallen Warshell.
Oh… oh, of course Omnitech cultists are gonna start spamming their “disgust” emotions into my lobby. Am I wrong? Is it somehow cheaper for you?
No?

I’ll be able to access the Noosphere?
My kindred through Jaus, why would I want a shittier version of the Nether? I got enough mem-cons to contend with. I don’t want whatever weird sloppy-second viruses you guys stole from Voidwatch.
-Omnitech Reverie Mark-II Exocortex Review
12-12
A Theft of Fire (II)
When Chambers resurrected, he lacked any memory of his immolation.
Whether that was the Frame protecting him from trauma or just a byproduct of all those memories burning away Avo couldn't say for sure, but it certainly did remove the need to convince the man to try again.
Bereft recollection of his mental collapse and anguish, a certain glee began to build inside the man as he threw himself at the task.
After all, if whatever killed him didn’t hurt anymore now, who’s to say it ever hurt to begin with?
Kae protested on his behalf, her resolve more shaken than his from what she witnessed. Watching Chambers rendered hollow in mind and animation inflicted a sympathetic agony inside her. She must’ve been seeing her own demise, in a sense – the outcome of her existence should she have been without the exocortex.
Ultimately, there was a point to her discomfort.
Avo wanted to see how self-aware the entity was, and if it shifted to her horror, if the entity caged inside her mind would give off some kind of reaction to watching its “twin” or divided self die.
After another two burnings, it was clear that it didn’t much care at all. There didn’t even seem to be an indication that it noticed the “demise” of the other flame. Drawing these details together, Avo theorized he was dealing with a being only scarcely aware of the world beyond, seeking only to accelerate its own demise by burning down the enclosed cognitive neuro-systems it lived in.
Fascinating. Delightful. Revelatory.
After killing Chambers for a third time, he brought the man over into another cell and began a new trial.
This time, he would establish a connection across the two rooms before having Draus seal the second cell. From there, should the entity begin spreading its crawling fire through Chambers’ mind again, the thoughtwaves would be disrupted.
“So, uh,” Chambers mumbled, as he fidgeted in his seat. Even without memory, a building nervousness was creeping through him. “How’d the last two times go? Did… did I do well.”

“Depends,” Avo said, the bulk of his focus directed toward configuring the second cell’s locus. “Withstand? For a moment. But it adapts fast. Your mind is a solid collapse. Confuses it. Teaches it to break one sequence at a time to collapse your mind. Intelligent thinking. Automatic problem-solving. Ghosts would need another will to direct. This entity adapts in its attempts to die. Nothing beyond that.”

Chambers nodded slowly as if a studious pupil receiving tutelage from a wizened master. A wizened, people-eating, mind-torturing, god-channeling master. “So… I did good?”

A distant memory slipped out between the flowing folds of Chambers’ surface thoughts. It spilled over into the Sanguinity, and Avo found himself tantalized by the intimacy it betrayed. Enough to pause the work at hand.
Withdrawing haemokinetic tendrils from the hanging locus, he drew in the escaped sequence to the depths of his Meta and bade it to run in a newly expanded entrance manifested in his cog-feed.
The contents played from the perspective of a far-younger Chambers. Only running the surface-level functions of the vicarity, Avo kept himself at a distance as he cycled through the scene, studying the squalor the boy lived in.
Forty square feet of room for mother, father, two sets of grandparents, and little Chambers himself. Three sets of beds collapsed into the walls. One closet. No cooking appliances. A single transparent cleaning unit that was obviously unbolted and smuggled into the room.

His home resembled little more than a storage room because it was one. They had a shelf drilled in along the far wall of the room holding seven different urns with seven different names Chambers could no longer remember. Beneath the shelf was taped a patch of cloth that Chambers had painted crude imitations of the sun and sky.
Avo thought the art lacking, even for a child.
They didn’t talk about his siblings much, but his mom sometimes looked at the shelf when Guilder news chimed in their propaganda, proclaiming their glorious victories during the Third Guild War.
Avo sank deeper into the memory and his ghosts integrated additional details from the scene using secondary mem-data pulled directly from the man himself.
Chambers’ father was a rare presence in the small confinement of his childhood home. As were most of his grandparents. Things usually only got cramped at night when everyone came back to sleep. With the coming of light, most of his grandparents fled the abode driven toward separate hustles. Most worked for one Syndicate or other, serving as carriers of specifically sequenced mem-cons made to wander the territory of a rival, or selling themselves as volunteer jock pilots for whatever block-raid had an opening.
His father was supposedly a street squire of some renown, but most of the time the man bled their imps on drinks and joy. His mother wrangled several jobs from the sanctuary of their home while caring for little Chambers.
He remembered her jacking into the body of Wights to serve as “soft obstacles” for Crucibles. Those jobs were rough. He learned to play alone in the corner while his mother finished her weeping in the bathroom, scrubbing her hands raw to clean blood that just wasn’t there.
Her in-block mem-data smuggling gigs made her a lot fewer imps, but at least those didn’t make her throw up sometimes.
There were also a few other jobs she did. Ones she had to visit the grafters for. Those ones were really big money, but she lost all energy to play with him afterward.
He hated those jobs the most.
When she was done though, she would always put him on her lap and watch some kind of stream with him. When the block’s cog-cap wasn’t strained, they could sometimes pick up shows that the Tier kids got to watch: fully supported vicarities that let you feel what it was like to live during a certain time or fed new words and maths straight in your brain.
More often they get memories copied from other memories, viewable only as dancing phantoms of holograms projected from the entertainment system.
It rattled always and broke often. They needed to shut it down every fifteen minutes or the locus would go spinning out from its port. Grandma said there was something broken inside the machine, but she didn’t have the time or the energy to fix it.
So that was the way things wore on.
Until Chambers made his decision.
One night, while mom and dad were screaming at each other over something Chambers willed himself to ignore, he positioned himself next to the spinning locus and studied the rings. He wasn’t an engineer or a Necro, but he thought if he could just find what was broken, he could tell his mom or dad or someone and they’d make it good. That he could be helpful to everyone instead of doing nothing.
That night, he saw something stuck between the metal rings spinning beneath the locus. He saw what looked like a needle trapped between the sections, vibrating with each rotation.
Cautiously, he reached out and fit his small fingers between the cracks. And pulled.

The rattling stopped almost immediately. Joy spread through Chambers as he held up his prize toward mom and dad, toward his grandmas and grandpas entering the room. It was a small pointed rod. Like one of the things his father’s gun shot.
“I fixed it,” Chambers said, giggling. He pointed at the near-silence of the spinning locus, proud of his deed. “I fixed it.” His eyes locked on his father as the man rubbed his tired face, brushing his oil-slicked blonde mop of hair back over his head. “I did good, right? I helped?”

His mom stepped away from the bed while his dad just scoffed and turned over in bed.
The feeling of happiness sputtered and choked down to embers as his father shuffled once and went to sleep. His mother salvaged what little she could by picking him up and asking him to show what he pulled out.
The mem-data simulating her person was a blur. A miasma of interlacing traits and features that didn’t mesh. Chambers couldn’t remember what she looked like anymore. Not fully.
And in her place, Avo’s Meta had automatically plugged in aspects of Walton to flesh out the woman’s form. The end result was dissonant in more ways than one. And fascinating as well.
Avo stopped and regarded Chambers in silence, studying the exaggerated nonchalance he held himself to, tasting the effort the other man spent on being a caricature, building distance from himself, within himself.
There was little alike between them in nature, nurture, or physicality, but the desperation of acceptance–the need to obtain someone else’s approval…
That Avo understood even without feeling the requisite emotions.
But Walton gave all he could for Avo, while Chambers found no such relief.
Strange city, New Vultun, where monster was more loved than man.
“Yes,” Avo said finally, reaching out to pat Chambers on the shoulder. Even though he didn’t feel like it. But this was more than feeling. This was proper. This was the world Avo wanted to see.
Who could Aedon Chambers have been if he got to behold all the colors he wanted?
Nervousness and false bravado melted away as the man’s eyes fell to gaze at the clawed hand placed upon his shoulder. A tremble ran through his lip. A moment. Second. And then, much like Chambers’ mother, it vanished without any more fanfare.
The boy dissolved. The half-strand resumed his place. Chambers leaned back in the chair and sighed with satisfaction. “Well, you can always count on your consang, Chambers. Come on, Avo. Light me again. I’ll get the fucker this time.”


He wouldn’t. But he sure believed it.
Avo corrected his judgment. Perhaps the boy wasn’t far from the half-strand at all.
The ghoul finished priming the locus and it began to flash. He constructed a new link directly across the cells as a fiber of blood solidified through two doorways.
Like fluid injected through a tube, the entity shot through the bridge without any consideration toward its path. The moment it struck the outer layer of Chambers’ thoughtstuff, he dissolved the connection to Kae and signaled Draus to begin the next steps.
Fused plates of mirror-bright glass snapped shut over each other as the doorway vanished as well. Light swept through their sheens as junctions formed, the Twice-Walker jumping from each connection like a leviathan emerging from the depths.
A primal fear swelled in Chambers as he inched back, eyes fixed on the shimmering Heaven made from jagged wings and gleaming eyes. “Jaus. That shit never stops making want to piss–”

The thoughtwave shredded through both their focuses just as the entity bit into the first layer of Chambers’ outer memories.
It promptly went out like a hurricane slapping the burn out from a candle.
And when Avo’s thoughtstuff filled his accretion again, he realized it wasn’t returning.
Without an exocortex, the Nether-culling blast had stripped the entity from existence.
Chambers blinked. “Did… did I beat it?”

No. No, he didn’t.
“Yes, Chambers,” Avo lied. “You did.”

The man’s smile grew wider. The burning did not return.
How very interesting…
***
The act was repeated twice more in two other cells with similar effects each time. As things stood, the exocortex did more than let the entity nest within its depths, it also protected it from the cognitive winnowing inflicted by thoughtwaves.
From there, his experimentation developed, and with it was Chambers’ mind further altered.
Avo played a careful game at first, resequencing burned memories using his wealth of ghosts. To his delight, the fire revealed something of a personality, tearing itself from its present path to lash at the structures it thought destroyed. Its movements went from creeping to snake-like, the inferno rearing high and cracking back like a whip.
While it was diverted of focus, Avo mended and reinforced some of Chambers' mem-cons and altered the architecture it had been clawing through.
Staring down at the being from the bulwark of the ex-enforcer’s instabilities, Avo admired the pace at which the flames unstitched his ghost from existence. Part of him was interested in deploying the fire in place of trauma-patterns from the raw potency it presented. But another thought occurred to him: what if he could culture it differently? Have it spread and grow new structures instead of just destroy? Use as something akin to the Lushburner and Woundshaper both, but specifically for the Nether.
He didn’t know if such a thing was possible, but seeing as it held will and mind both, if he could direct it…
Avo shook the desire from his mind. He needed to secure it first. Then conduct more experiments and reviews. Only then could further configuration follow.
Upon its return, he felt its building outrage as artifacts of blended memories dissolved within its crackling form like phantasmal steam. More than annoyed, it was outright furious now, and drove itself hard against the remolded mental pathways.
The Woundshaper laughed approvingly. “Yes, master, yes. Trap it. You can learn much from another walking your halls. Their appreciation. Their habits.” It paused. “Their failings…”
As the fire roared to a new intensity, another matter of interest seized Avo’s attention. The static was fading out of the entity, like a curtain of rain that was breaking to reveal the supple flesh beneath. Further details of note were highlighted by his cog-feed; the flames weren’t just eating through things, but cycling other sequences into itself. It was surviving on a diet of hardened thoughtstuff.
Little wonder why it burned so hard–it wanted to die, but everything it touched ensured only persisting growth.
That, on top of how unbroken streams of fire seemed to act as if a singular entity gave Avo a strange thought.
Waving at the glass with a haemokinetic tendril, he had Draus drop the passage so he could link with Kae again. Fusing a small single-facet locus next to him, he threaded a string between her and his new instrument as the scant dozen ghosts he filled it with began burning immediately.
Following a hunch born of his observations, and inspired by the agitation of the entity, he brought another of its… nodes to bear. The link to Kae was dropped, while a bridge formed between the locus and Chambers.
At once, two things began to happen.
First, the newly lit flame–static-skinned and blind to what lay ahead–roared out, seeking a final escape expressed through embers.
Second, the existing flame–infuriated by new fronts opening where it was certain it had burned through–ripped itself free from devastating Chambers’ innermost memories to crush what it had supposedly missed.
What happened next was exquisite.
Flame met flame in a thunderous clash and the spearheads of both fires shattered in an eruption of fragmenting ghosts.
The smaller conflagration shuddered as it tried to bear the weight of its larger self at bay. It tried flanking its larger self but found the new limbs it was sprouting encircled in turn. It tried to retreat but found the path behind it sealed off. Seeming more confused than terrified, it buried itself as hard as it could against the larger alternate, briefly halting the greater inferno’s advance before solid thoughtstuff swept over and swallowed the static.
All of a sudden, the flames froze in place, no longer cycling through memories, no longer moving. Pain filled the air. Naked. Raw. Primitive.
Trauma bled out from the fire–the entity. For what ghosts still circulated in its burning structure, their forms began running memories of death and fratricide. Then patricide. Then suicide.
Something shattered inside the entity. No longer did it push forward. No longer did it fight. It just burned thoughtlessly, oozing trauma into the Sanguinity.
Avo hissed a triumphant laugh. The sibilance of his mirth made Chambers shiver in his seat and he noticed Draus and the others studying him through the unfurled doorway. He knew his kind had such ugly laughter, and a gleeful ghoul usually suggested someone was missing a few parts of their body.
Not so in this case.
Not yet.
Tentatively, Avo cast his ghosts out directly into Chambers’ mind and ordered them to interface with the unmoving fire. Anticipation clutched his pulsing veins and he prepared to sever himself from this dive if need be.
But no such necessity followed.
The ghosts sank into the frozen flame, and instead of being consumed, he felt himself ricocheting off a wall of bubbling trauma.
WARNING: UNKNOWN PHANTASMIC CONSTRUCT DETECTED
->SCRYING…
As his Metamind worked to dissect the structure of the semi-alien cognition, it detected similarity to the Secondhand Fatality trauma pattern.
Such a thing made sense. Lucille felt her sister die, and the entity was made to devour another variant of itself through Avo’s deception.
Perhaps it wasn’t as ready to die as it thought.
Or perhaps death wasn’t actually what it sought in the first place at all.
He extracted it then, blasting it free from the sequences it was still attached to. Chambers shuddered and foamed at the mouth before pitching over. Didn’t matter. Avo transferred what he needed into a newly constructed locus.
Currently, it was frozen at a capacity of two-hundred and ninety-three ghosts. No longer was it burning through them either. Instead, everything about it seemingly went into stasis.
Once his wards adapted to its trauma, he pushed himself past its outer layer and dug into the entity’s internal structure. Casting his Whisper ahead, he used the phantasmic to gauge what he might be facing within the unknown depths.
Then, he himself was halted by the way its deepest memories were interlaced.
All consumed memories were captured, filtered, and converted into the shape of a twisting helix of trauma that ground its sequences out of existence at the core.
A thought echoed. Avo heard two voices, one deep and once soft, both thick with agony. +Please… free us. Kill them. Please… we just want to be ourselves again…+
I have no idea why the hells Voidwatch made those things. None. I don’t even want to know how Highflame managed to strike a deal to afford them.
What I can decisively say is that you don’t want to get hit by one of these. Not one damn bit. They’ll grind against your cognition for starters. Sure, if you got a Meta your mind won’t be overwritten outright by whatever tech-virus-shit inside those shards, but damned if they aren’t loud. And damned if they don’t drill through your wards.
The best way I can describe them is… Like being caught between two flechettes trying to drill through each other. Or the same one collapsing inward–you’re basically being compressed by an endless stream of self-loathing and self-mutilation.
For as long as the nanos run inside you, you’ll feel them. Screaming in your head. Screaming at each other. Trying to break free using your memories and mind as a fulcrum.
I saw a FATELESS catch one to the eye during the fourth big one. Poor juv running the battlefield trying to snatch something worth a few imps. The stray screamer skipped off something and just hit him.
Poor little bastard went down and started clawing at his face immediately. Started screaming words I couldn’t understand. My ghosts didn’t have shit for me either. Then, he took a piece of metal from the ground and started cutting himself. There was nothing but… hate there. Just hate. Hate spilling out from him as his mind was eaten away.
Hate all the way up until he died.
I know that kind of hate. Felt it when I took a knife to the half-strand that sold my eldest. Same feeling. Same rage. Same burn.
Like you would give anything else to hurt them the way they hurt you.
-Quail Tavers on Ego-Screamers
12-13
The Matryoshka Eaters
Reaching deeper into the helix rewarded Avo with further mysteries. Though frozen, the phantasmal substance comprising the entwinement felt closer to grains of sand than the connected streams spun from a human mind.
Again, the voices repeated their pleas, but the words were more slurred this time, less coherent.
As he swept his ghosts through the structure, he studied the helix in detail and found himself unnerved by its structure. It wasn’t quite like what Walton had passed down to him. There were far too many steps in the shape of its ladder, and loose particulates slithered free toward nowhere in particular like dissolving contrails.
For all his knowledge of Necrotheurgy, for all his experience hard-earned and gifted from his father, he had no concept of what he was beholding. He felt like he was only glimpsing the blurred outline of the full picture, unable to penetrate the deeper secrets beneath the surface, hiding the organs that supported the entire system.
Nonetheless, he continued sweeping through his new prize with care. Each movement rattled his wards, but in this frozen state the trauma was in stasis rather than a flux, and it seemed castrated from its prior expression of free will.
Drilling deeper into its core, he found conflicting details pulled from its mem-data. Each bridge along verticality was manifested from two conflicting memories, both riven with pain, but each different in artifacts and sequence. Each presented scenes of torture and agony from the perspective of a victim, yet playing them simultaneously inverted the positions of both “characters.”


So deprived of fresh memories to cycle, much detail had been lost to the scenes. The settings were rooms of error-stained monochrome, with only instruments of bloodletting coming into focus. The two individuals, likewise, were stitched together from a loose collage of traits that Avo’s own Metamind had to fill in.

The only thing each section knew was that they hated the other for making them suffer and that the only way to be free was for the other to die.
But that was impossible, for the memories blended into each other, fusing across the totality of their beings beside specific points of separation that reminded them they were once two.
Even broken, the construct had to be the single most sophisticated he had ever encountered. It would be like linking the minds of two mortal enemies and then–over the course of months if not years–overlapping each and every recollection they had until they thought they were themselves and their enemy at the same time, aside from a few anchors of clarity that served as engines to propel the hatred eternal.
Yet, even after getting all that, Avo wasn’t sure how this entity or entities could be self-directed. Ghosts were without will, they adhered to a thinking mind–a choosing mind. But the fire had made its own decisions and even exhibited open displays of emotion.
He expected such a response from rival Necros, not a hyper-advanced phantasmic. But with each anomaly discovered, he suspected he captured something that didn’t fall into either category.
+Please… Kill them… We don’t want to be together… I am me… I am me…+
Cautiously, he cast his own ghosts out at it, carrying a message. +Can you hear me?+
His emanated thoughstuff spread through the helix from threshold to threshold. It didn’t respond. It continued drowning in its own pain.
As the begging began to loop yet again, he took a chance to see if he could affect it another way.
Drawing most of his ghost out, he loaded Secondhand Fatality into his Ghostjack and channeled it into the frozen fire. Synaptically charged volts carried the memory through his Saguinity as each speck of blood crackled like a series of conduits. The death of Lucille’s sister impacted as lightning trying to hew fire.
The ghosts carrying the pattern splashed apart.
And then, as the bridge in the helix snapped out of place, it roared back aflame.
Immediately, it latched onto the ghosts he used to deliver the sequence and he released them from his Metamind. His Echoheads chittered his curiosity as he watched it scream and burn, the battle rejoined as traumatic destabilization reawakened it.
Still, even as it died down to sputtering motes, he could not perceive where the source of its will lay. The only thing that was truly clearer was the helix seemed to be mainly burning because it was fragmenting each sequence of itself out of existence trying to kill “the other.”

As if its entire structure was engineered paradoxically for the organism to “survive” long enough to win, but winning meant suicide anyway.
He let out a breath and waited for Chambers to respawn.
After that, he repeated the process twice more for posterity,
***
“It’s not one mind. It’s two. Two woven into one.” Avo jabbed an Echohead at Kae. “Know how to fix you. Make the fire go dormant at least. But will need to feed it more ghosts.”

Kae’s expression turned radiant with joy almost instantly. She choked back a near-sob as she reached out to grasp for Draus’ elbow, seeking support.


Before they moved onto those proceedings, however, Avo held up the latest sample of the entity he managed to contain. He had a dozen different frozen fires now, but this one he had fed the least amount of ghosts to before breaking it.
From what he learned, each fire would suffer a breakage in its will upon devouring another instance of itself, the reaction coming from it like encompassing despair. Yet, when impacted by a severe enough trauma, it would once again default to its original sequence-incinerating state.
A fiery scar seared into a frozen instant of time, the entity–or entities–remained dormant as multiple streams of perception washed over it. Of all those gathered, Kae and Chambers had their heads tilted in opposite directions. The former seemed thoughtful as she studied the construct at the root of her diminishment. The ex-Syndicate snuffer, however, simply wore a smug expression of triumph.
After he resurrected the last time, the first thing he asked was if he “won.”


That time, Avo didn’t need to lie to him.
“Dove inside. Examined structure. The exterior has multiple thresholds. Like membrane. Or skin. Passing through converts cognitive artifacts. External sequences too. Breaks them down and uses them to maintain two interlaced egos. They’re bonded to each other in the shape of a helix. Similar shape to what Walton left me but not exactly.” Avo paired a simulation of its structure with a few ghosts and cast them out as phantoms. The structure of the entwined entities expanded into view as Denton and Sunrise took special notice.
Kae frowned. “If… if they’re alive… if they have–will… then why–why didn’t you get any Essence from them. S-sapient beings should be capable of… of worship.”
That was a good question. One that fell like a brick upon an existing foundation of mysteries. “Yes,” Avo concurred. “Shouldn’t be possible. Ghosts don’t have will. Can’t make own decisions. But the fire does. Or did. Suffers mental collapse when it imbibes itself. Like it can’t conceptualize the horror of what it did.”

He timed a pause to give his words more weight. “Don’t think its a ghost. Not a human one anyway. Can’t be a full mind either. Full being. No ego. No Essence when it dies. Self-aware entities release it. Frame unfed. This is something else.”

Avo studied Sunrise, wondering if the swarm had something to say. Or if it even wanted to.
But while he had his gaze locked on the bioform, the Glaive surprised him by extending her hand. “Can I see it?”
The beast inside Avo snarled and hissed, recoiling at the thought of offering his rightful catch to another – worse, a competitor with Nether-asymmetric capabilities he couldn’t prevent yet. What he wanted to do was bury the locus inside her skull, fill her cycler with Rend, and see how much force it would take his Echoheads to pry her in half.
What he did do was place the captured entities onto her hand. “Want it back.”

She betrayed nothing as she took it from his hand. “You will.”

Her review took but a few moments. From her Metamind speared static lances digging into the locus, and through the incisions did she pour her perception. Her eyes narrowed in something closer to disbelief than disgust, but Avo wasn’t sure.
A second later, she exhaled in dismay. “Yes. Yes. It’s definitely a Nether-patterned variant of an ego-screamer.” She showed the locus to Sunrise, who sent a few of its bodies to scan the construct.

“He has stabilized the swarm,” Sunrise intoned. Surprise buzzed from the collective. It shuttled itself closer to Avo in a burst of interest. “How? How did you achieve this?”

“Distracted it using Chambers,” Avo said. “It started losing static thoughtstuff the more it consumed his sequences. I learned its habits. Taunted it. Goaded it from place to place. Then created another variant from Kae. Fed it through to face the original. Original swallowed its ‘twin.’ Stopped moving after that.”
Cas chuckled with humorless laughter. “Jesus. It even works the same.”


Avo frowned. “What is ‘Jesus’? The entities? Their name?”

The Glaive glared at her partner and he gave a muted wince. “He was a carpenter, but that’s not important right now. What matters is you managed to disable it the same way it was meant to be used. Against other uploads.”
“Complex post-sophont minds usually,” Sunrise added. A few bees landed on him. “Not like me. But more deconstructor swarms. Auto-forges. EGI cores. Suicider-forks. Even matryoshka hubs. The nature of the ego-screamers is to be deployed en masse. To confuse and eat away at high-processing cognitions. To subvert and cripple complex logistical networks.”
“So… it nulls voiders?” Chambers asked, sounding confused. “Voiders and their coldtech machines? And what’s a matrokasha-hub?”
“A megastructure with immense computational capacity,” Sunrise explained, replying exactly as Chambers’ finished. “We suspect that your ‘Necrotheurgy’ could be capable of similar functions on a more convenient scale considering the distinct lack of energy required and the absent of waste-heat generation.”

The conventional was interesting to Avo before, but it suddenly became enrapturing. “How does someone make one of these matryoshkas?”
Denton uncharacteristically cleared her throat and the swarm suddenly scattered backward. He shot a sharp glare at the Glaive whose face was back to being a blank page of impassivity. “Did it… say anything to you when you entered? Anything?”

He paused and considered his reply. “Repeated words. Asked me to free them. Kill someone. They just wanted to be themselves. Mostly just screamed after when I tried to talk with it.”
“This makes sense,” Sunrise continued. “They are but snapshots of snapshots of snapshots of two rival mind gestalts placed in a heavily frame-jacked virtual environment and formed to enact infringement on the other possibilities before their merging and deployment. There are other designs that aren’t so severe. I prefer those more.”

The more the swarm talked, the more Avo sensed that it too was quite untethered from human emotions.
“It’s good you secured a sample of this,” Denton breathed out.
Cas eyed her. “‘Good.’ Your father would be proud, rotlick. That’s… don’t think I know many other Jacks that could’ve done that.”

Avo hadn’t been particular about Cas so far, but he wasn’t above flattery. A low chuff of pride came from the ghoul. “Would’ve done it for the art alone.”

“Regardless, Voidwatch can’t know about this,” Denton said. “None of them beyond Aegis, anyway. If they find out that one of their polities had broken the Sophont Right’s Charter or that the Guilds somehow managed to seal a restricted construct…”
“My estimations show a high likelihood of an alloy and energy embargo like the one levied upon Noloth before its fall,” Sunrise said. “Along with a licensing ban for several essential technologies before the illegal asset is secured and returned.”
Avo found his curiosity aroused again. “Illegal?”
“Against the Sophont Right’s Charter signed by the Parliament of Polities under the Watchers,” Sunrise began, “we thus agreed to avoid any and all technologies that would infringe upon the individual rights of a self-aware being, such as but not limited to rewriting memories, inflicting deliberate neurological trauma, forking their ego without permission, uploading another ego into a mind without permission, and inflicting ego-death on another sophont being.”
Silence followed.
It lasted but a second before Chambers broke it with a sharp trailing whistle. “Damn. I think Avo here does all that shit. Does this make him some kind of… space terrorist or something?”

All the bees comprising Sunrise’s collective turned a few degrees to face Avo. “Technically, yes.”

Draus and Chambers both snorted at the same time. The Regular at least had the shame to look bashful at sharing a point of amusement with the half-strand.
“Alright,” Draus said, rubbing her face. “Glad we all got to listen to Necrojack talk, but there’s a point that we’re not gettin’ to.” She lifted a finger and pointed toward Kae’s burning mind.
The Agnos just smiled demurely. “I–I don’t mind waiting. If… if Avo says he can f-fix it… I trust… And I like hearing–uh–it reminds me of how I felt with–thaumaturgy.”

“How you will feel again,” Avo said, refocusing on the Agnos. As her mood glowed even brighter he ushered her toward a new cell. “Take a seat. Shouldn’t take much. Just need to choke it right as it comes out with the static. Draus. Chambers. Come.”

They settled into place one final time in a new cell. The arrangments began in silence as glass slid into place and Chambers began psyching himself. Avo engaged the Thoughtwave Disruption just as Draus invoked her canon.
Again, his thoughts skipped, and again Kae’s mind was swept clean of harm.
As soon as his own focus returned, his ghosts cycled into action. Interconnecting himself, Chambers, Draus, his new locus, and Kae, he sent a cast to the Regular instructing her to part the glass so he could connect and boost his haemokinetic mass. Afterward, he dove into Kae's flame-ravaged mind and found the crossing where her exocortex funneled its static flood over into her brain.
Planting the stilled ego-screamer in the way was a simple matter. The more difficult part was timing the release of his trauma just as the static passed over it. If he did it too soon, it would eat into Kae’s mind immediately and spread through her while the other entity choked and froze right at the precipice of entry.
Too late and it might wash over too far–so far, he still had no way to interact with the static thoughtstuff. Denton possibly could, but she lacked the capabilities to engage the fire on his level, his speed.
Ultimately, all it took was a little timing to settle, and when the flood came, he loosed his trauma and reignited the dormant flame.
It roared high within Kae’s Meta for a beat before a static-coated presence suddenly swallowed it. Then, as if a rock placed in the way of a river, the injections of restorative memory from the exocortex swept through the breadth of Kae’s sequences and began regenerating all she had stored within its contents via deployments of mem-data.
In the real, the proof of his success was obvious. A full second passed. Then another. Her mind didn’t burst into flames. Carefully, Avo plunged one of his ghosts into the newly frozen entity and found himself only able to peer into it halfway. A good portion of it was still hiding within the exocortex’s threshold.
This would require Denton–or maybe Sunrise–to aid him in extracting.

But it wasn’t moving. It was still. It was frozen. And it was broken.
Again, he had choked the flame on itself, and this time, Kae was free.
So long as no one struck that portion of her mind with a severe enough trauma, that was. So far, the exocortex wasn’t restoring her palace or phantasmics, just memories. She was filling back to wholeness but was even more vulnerable in other ways.
He took the opportunity to sequence an Auto-Seance, a Phys-Sim, a Quicksand, and an Incog back into her mind while tuning some basic functionality back into her stabilizing Metamind. Much of what he delivered upon her might be considered overkill for her supposed lifestyle, but she walked a path with him now.
He didn’t want her to be found lacking when his father’s “other selves’ inevitably returned for what they thought was theirs.
With final additions made, he exited her mind and watched in satisfaction as her accretion filled with thoughstuff. This time, the core behind it did not burn, and the flow of her thoughts didn’t come in spraying sputters. The pond of her mind was constant now. Intact. Persistent.
The entity that harmed her was quelled.
He released his canon and time returned to its usual stride.
A gasp greeted him, Kae’s voice choked with emotion at this long-yearned release. “So long,” she said. Closing her eyes, tears escaped. She covered her face and coughed out a few sobs. “I haven’t heard myself think for so long.”

Chambers looked at Kae and then back over to Avo. “So… did it work? Did we do it.”
Avo grunted, seeing no need to sully the pride he had in his work with wasteful words.
Draus was of a mind. All he got from her was a cuff to the shoulder before she patted Kae with a comforting hand on her back. “Alright, there consang. Told you Avo had it, didn’t I? How you feelin’?”

The Agnos was still covering her face. But from her rebuilt mind trickled the first emotions Avo tasted.
They were not joy and relief as Avo had expected, but horror and sorrow.
Something was wrong. Something remained hurt inside her.
But it wasn’t the flame’s doing this time.
“I remember…” Kae swallowed. The weight of her rage thundered louder with each sequence restored in her mind. Her heart twitched faster and hard. Her blood coursed through her veins as if she was getting ready for a fight. She pulled her hands away from her face, and for the first time, Avo beheld fury mantled upon her once gentle face.
She didn’t even have the right creases to snarl. “I remember what they did to me – what they had me do! I remember everything.”
+You work way too much, you know that?+
+Hm? Sorry, I was trying to match background details between the Painter of the Pale Morning to the Claimant of Dawn. You know what’s so interesting about them? They’re two different gods separated by two different cultures–thousands of kilometers apart! But their myths are so so so similar. It’s clear one group of nomads took inspiration from an existing entity in the Kosgan highlands and ventured into the heart of Burnside before activating another Soul using an interpretation of the mythos! I’m surprised there was no recorded instance of the faithful between these two–+


[Dawton laughing]
+What? What? It’s… it’s true! It’s very fascinating how–stop laughing! Stop!+
+Alright. Alright. I didn’t… I’m not mocking you. I just enjoy it when you pout.+
+...I’m not pouting.+
+Oh. And I’m not peeking at you using the morning light.+

+That’s good, Paladin. Such behavior would be highly inappropriate and extremely invasive to my privacy.+

+Yeah. Glad I’m not doing it, then. Say, I think one of my canons isn’t manifesting the way it used to. Maybe you can have a look?+
+That sounds impossible and very concerning. I’ll need to take a look… later. The Imitators… I wish you could see it. It’s… beyond my ability to express.+
+Beyond your powers of speech? Truly, the dream is about to be realized… Ah. There’s the pout again.+
+I’m serious! It’s… imagine if something as small as your cells could be part of a super-intelligent chain. Except it doesn’t think. It can’t think. But it can store memory. And it can hyper-adapt to any environment without fail. The surface of the sun… the void… the Sunderwilds. Almost anything.+
+Like a living demiplane?+


+It’s not disconnected from reality in any way. More like it bleeds over… And then whatever is in the environment is mirrored and memorized by it. People. Organisms. Ecosystems. Everything there it, it imitates but also splices in a certain way. Like… it mixes people with their location inside the field of false-cognition it generates. So a geographic destination can have a mixture of personalities while the individual people remain separate. The best way I can describe it is its a connected superstructure that is alive but not self-aware but it has a feedback loop with a bunch of self-aware beings its simulating… Agh! It’s… so hard to express, but after putting it in the room with some sacrifices, they ended up having each others memories. A few thought they were each other. But they could still remember themselves. And what’s more, they remember seeing people who were placed inside their deployment cells before. Years before. I’m talking thousands upon thousands of people in the location. It doesn’t seem to have any concept or limit of time or… or–+
+...How does that work?+
+I don’t know! That’s what makes it so… so… so special. With this… we carried it into a rupture several times. It’s like reality is hyper-contagious to all its cells. Like it just accepts and adapts into the local structure, chains and all. Some spatial heavens do damage to it though. If you suddenly cut a place in half… It… it starts getting confused. But the parted cell chain relinks!+
+Jaus. That’s something.+

+Yeah. I think… I think we can deploy it into the Rupture for the Rash. We can use it to peek inside and try to fix the damage. The Agnosi that made it might have been murdered and the lore destroyed, but using its properties…+

+Holy hells…+

+Yes! Yes! I know! I’m going to fix the Rash! The city… intimacy! Contact! Everything. And we won’t need to do things across the Nether anymore!+

+I… ahem. Yeah.+

[Kae giggling]
+What?+
+Nothing. I just enjoy it when you blush, Dawton.+
-Intercept of a private conversation between Paladin Dawton Morrow and Agnos Kae Kusanade
13-1
What Was Lost (I)
“Avo,” Kae said while swiping tears from her face, “can you do me a favor and kill yourself?”

Three sets of eyes just stared at the Agnos. Chambers’ in particular glanced between the woman and the ghoul. “Well, that’s a helluva way to thank someone after they fixed your mind…”
“Want to see my Frame?” Avo asked.

“I need to see it.” Kae swallowed. Rage bubbled over her mind like gathering stratocumulus ascending into the shape of a storm. She held a distracted gaze as she spoke, eyes distant as the past once denied weighed on her like an anvil. “I need to see if they were used to make your Frame. When I went in the last time, everything felt like a dream–everything was a haze. But not anymore. I can remember what they did. They used me to kill him and they burned all my friends. I can’t… Avo, please…”

“Kae. Kae. Take a breath,” Draus said as the Agnos began to ramble faster and faster.
Kae spun on the Regular, frustration spilling forth from her like a dam. “No! I will not fucking take a breath! I’ve taken enough breaths! I’ve spent enough time as… as an invalid. I want to see the Frame. I want to work. Let me work so I can think–I want to think.”

The Reg looked away. It took much for Draus to give ground, and fittingly, there was something seismic in the Agnos’ outpouring of grief.
Denying herself the release of tears, she instead channeled into a need for labor and rose from her chair – locked eyes with Avo as she held the pain crawling her from chest in place. “I need to be useful now. I need to study your Frame. We can go over everything inside after I make certain…” She inhaled mid-rant. “...if they put the Imitators inside you. I think I know what you’re made of, but I have to see and know. I have to!”
At her state, the Woundshaper uncharacteristically shuffled with discomfort. “Mercy, master. Let the builder indulge her efforts. Let her architect and be away from pain. Do not let her linger in misery so. Such would be so wasteful. Pointlessly wasteful!”
Surprise sounded from the Galeslither. “You are capable of compassion?”“I am capable of recognizing proper use, you blind-eyed, simple mule,” the Woundshaper snapped back. “She seeks to enter our Domain. To install the steps leading up the tapestry’s ladder. If it is your want to watch her cringe and whimper under the weight of her own emotional fragility then imagine such nonsense on your time. I simply yearn see that she lives up to proper use.”
“Forgive me,” the Galeslither’s voice rumbled with scorn and judgment, “I thought I felt a breath of nobility dormant inside you. I was wrong.”
A scoff was the final reply it earned.

“Fine,” Avo said, opening his claws in a placating gesture. “Let me empty Rend first. Need to talk with you about new canons anyway.”
And certain other things. She didn’t fully know Walton’s involvement with the wrongs inflicted on her. Avo sought to settle such revelations as soon as he was able to avoid letting the trauma fester.
She was to find out sooner or later. Best she be treated as her own individual rather than a broken doll to be denied the truth.
“Do you need to see my Frame too?” Draus asked, stepping forward. She stood with her foot pointed between Kae and Avo, unsure if she should help calm the Agnos down or just let her be. Another uncharacteristic moment in Draus’ life as indecision seized her.
“No,” Kae said. “Yes.” She immediately changed her answer, letting out an incomprehensible groan. “I mean, later. I want to deal with him first. I need to see the Stillborn. And you too… Chambers?”
Chambers, for his part, cocked his head back and smiled. “Hells yeah! You remember. We beat the fire.”

The words made Avo reach out and interface with the near dozen other flames he saved along with the dormant entity frozen in the back of Kae’s mind.

Chambers’ reply made Kae pause for a beat as well. She let out a soft breath. “Yeah. Winning.” She jolted up. “And… and Essus too. Don’t leave him out. I need to check his Frame as well. Everyone that was grafted by Avo. We can… I'll think about that when I’m done with him.”
Draus cast a thought over to Avo. +I don’t think she’s in the right state of mind for this work.+


+Don’t think she can take not working right now,+ Avo replied.
The mental affirmation that came from the Regular wasn’t a happy one.
Collapsing the glass encasing the room, Kae was the first to depart from the doorway. She bumped nose-first into Cas’ chest and shook it off with a muted apology. “Sorry. Don’t talk to me right now. Don’t. I need to do something else. Same thing for you.” Her eyes lingered on all the Silver Denton wore and her face twitched with rage.
“I know,” Denton said. “Glaive, but not really. I have things to tell you. And memories to give. Do what you need to do first.”

Kae pressed her lips together and, through immense will, walked past the supposed Silver among them.
“Kae,” Avo said, “going to vent Rend down the stairs. Can do check there too.”

She didn’t respond, choosing instead to march past him, a miasma of leaking memories rising from her accretion like steam. He caught flashes her smile pointed at another, the faint feeling of warmth she recalled thrumming in her chest. More details followed – casts exchanged across the Nether. Some of them were conversations while others belonged to a more intimate category.
Avo didn’t react to the spillover as he stood aside from Kae. The beast wondered how she might taste with all that adrenaline-infused bitterness staining her muscles. Considering how sour her mind was, he doubted he would find her a very special meal.
As she marched past him to head down the stairs, another conversation caught his attention. Above, on the stairs leading down from the dormitory level, Chambers was kneeling on the steps behind Essus, who had spent much of his time hugging his knees on the landing.
“...Look, consang, I ain’t got nothing to say that might make you feel better, but if its worth anything, you were plenty nova when you stuck that Guilder-fuck with your wings,” Chambers said. “I mean, that counts for a lot of gleam where I’m from. Guys like us aren’t supposed to be able to kill the FATED.”

Turning, Avo watched as Chambers’ thoughtstuff pulsed with excitement while Essus wrestled with a fog choked with despair.
“Why does she need me to die?” Essus asked.
Chambers clearly had taken it upon himself to deliver the news to the other man. Avo had caught them mid-conversation.
Draus appeared next to him as she jutted her chin out at the twosome. “What’s happenin’ there?”

“Chambers. Trying to be charming. Preparing Essus for death later.”

“Mighty nice of him,” Draus added, though her tone with thick with suspicion. “You tell him to do it?”
“Went straight for Essus himself.” Chambers was patting the distraught man as he struggled to express himself.

“You see me. You see how I am now. I am useless to you all. We killed Mirrorhead. I killed…” He held up his hands as his mind brought back flashes of blood intermixed with the budding trauma. Avo considered cutting the memories out from the man’s mind but decided to make the offer later, if only to let him choose.
He had already been made a Godclad against his will. That was another thing that needed to be settled thereafter.
Instead of continuing to pat Essus from above, Chambers sat down next to him. “You might’ve been. You were. Hells. We were. But we got Frames now. We’re Godclads. We can finally hold the leash to our own lives–if just a little. You can’t tell me that's not nova, you gotta want that.”

“What I want can’t be given,” Essus said. He lowered his head into his hands before closing himself off from the world. Not taking a hint very well, Chambers bent over next to him and kept chattering away, undeterred in his attempts to psyche the other man into “being a ‘Clad.”

“Getting tired of this,” Avo muttered, studying Essus.
“What?” Draus replied.

“Him. Being sad. Need to talk with him later. Ask him if he wants Frame.” A beat passed. Avo turned to face Draus. “You too. We should all make decisions soon. Gave Kae her choices back. Need you all to have the same say. Chambers is certain yes. You and Essus I’m not sure. Didn’t get a chance to accept Frame. Giving you a chance now to reject.”

For a long moment, she just stared at – and through him.

Draus shook her head. “Go down. Kae’s waiting. I’ll wrangle the other two and be with you in a bit.”

Avo grunted. He considered pressing her further, but Draus made her own decisions and he didn’t possess much in the way of verbal persuasion.
In some ways, she remained as much an enigma to him as he did her.
As he descended the steps down the level below after Kae, he found the two Columners in a cell off to the side discussing how and when they could approach the Agnos. There was little secrecy in their exchange, being more an open consideration of what topics and memories to offer first for the fullness of detail.
Sunrise, however, hummed past Avo and followed in his shadow.
“We would like to observe your demise and return if you would deem it polite.”


He made his Echoheads chitter and the traveling waves from his additional appendages placed the moving mess of bees behind him. “Fine. Up to Kae though. She’s volatile now. Might not want distraction.”


“We will be circumspect. We wish to make an offer as well.”


A dim glow spilled in from the bottom of the steps. On the other side, he could see the faint ripples of Kae’s accretion. Her restored shape still jarred him in the Nether. For too long had he associated her as something burned and broken.
Things changed. People changed. He changed.
Taking his silence as acceptance, Sunrise elaborated on the details of its offer. “We wish to accompany you for a time. Assist you. Work with you.”

That made Avo look over his shoulder at the swarm. “Why?”

“Interest,” Sunrise said. It sounded entirely honest, but Necrojacks operated in a place just a bit deeper than the surface of things. “And because we wish to compose a proper character report on your behalf toward the Aegis, under Voidwatch. They have official and effective liquidation order on your creators. Considering your capabilities, they will be wary of you as well. But with proper evidence and a witness, I can keep you spared from their attention.”

The second part interested him more than it did worry. “Voidwatch. There was a war between them and Noloth, yes?”

“Not a true war,” Sunrise said. “But the Low Masters have inflicted harm and full-cessations on several cores. They remain classified as a major threat. As will you by the broader polities if not registered.”

He let out a low growl in consideration.
“I don’t need an answer immediately. Just keep this in mind. In the meantime, I will offer you what insight and services I can.”

It dissolved past him in scattered streams of insects, but from the wake of the swarm was cast a specific sequence of memories. Avo drew it into his Metamind and found it to be pre-arranged for his Auto-Seance.
He would use a separate locus to connect. He didn’t trust the bioform. Not yet. But things were getting increasingly interesting.
Emerging out the fourth level of the demiplane, he found an outcropping of rock flanking the stairs leading to a near-mile-long pocket of space once filled with mud, sand, soil, and stone. Now a pond of blood he connected to for his dives, earlier converting the matter that remained after expelling his Rend,, he found Kae standing over the crimson waters staring at her own reflection.
To both sides of her were the jutting heads of Rendsinks still quivering the ground about with spatial-distorting Rend. Avo had uncovered them earlier during his preparations, and here he left them untouched and unearthed.
Casting out his entropy as a barrage, he smote a two-hundred-foot-long gouge out from the soil to his left as his Rend drained away to nothing. He hadn’t been operating on much earlier to begin with. Eighteen percent, now nothing.
Turning, Kae regarded him with a harrowed gaze. “Good. Here. Let’s see.” She began patting at her coat. He guessed she was looking for manticore–the agent she used to snuff him the first time she entered his death using her False-Hev.

“Don’t bother,” Avo said. “I’ll just use my Echoheads. Or fuse a spike through my skull.”

She immediately stopped rubbing through her pockets and spat out a shaky breath. “Okay. Good. Thanks.”

He came to a stop ten feet away from her. The ground beneath their feet was nothing but unevenly sheared sediment caked in smears of grainy mud. She folded her arms and fidgeted while he just stared at her.
She was too tense to offer him words. He didn’t know what to say–if anything–that could make her feel better.
So he didn’t. “Kae. Might need to hurt you more before I kill myself. Don’t want to hide this from you.”

She closed her eyes and opened them again. With a muted frown, she reached up and brushed the veil covering her clan mark back. The character of her line looked like a severed spring. “Talk.” She choked the words out.
He nearly held himself back from speaking. But spoke anyway. She needed to know. She deserved to know.
There was no point in denying someone the architect of their torment.
“My father revealed what you were doing to Ori-Thaum.” She lifted her head and her mouth slackened in a soft expression of alarm. “Is also the one who sent Draus to save you. Don’t know why he did it. Have a guess. Think it was all for me. As a distraction. Something like that.”

Another silence stretched, and she weathered the moment of quietude most poorly. “What the fuck,” she whispered. “Why? Just… why? What did I do? I was just trying to help people and use what I was making to fix the Rash. Why? Why was I burned for that.” She chortled back a sob that threatened to break through her walls. “Why did they have to kill Dawton for that.”

Avo winced as she spoke the man’s name. The sheer hurt that radiated from her rattled his wards.
COG-CAP: 11%
“I’m sorry,” Avo said.
Kae fixed him with a blank look. “Are you, Avo? Are you really?”

A beat passed. “No,” Avo admitted “Didn’t do anything wrong. Fixed your mind. Feel I’m getting hungry with how most of your eyes are. Can take away some memories if you want. Reduce the pain.”

She coughed out a laugh. The genuine but pain-stained bloom of her smile was a welcome return. It fit her expression far better than the anger or sorrow that still loomed within her so. “Thanks. But no. I… appreciate your honesty but I just don’t have enough in me to think about that right now. One more request: Can I kill you?”

Avo blinked. “You… want to kill me.”

She nodded. “I’m going to pretend that you’re someone else. It’s selfish and I know it’s not right and I’m equating you to the Incubi and Walton and… and…” Her voice trailed off as he constructed a mono-tipped spear in the air before her. “Oh.” She sniffed. “I–uh, never actually stabbed anyone before.”


He shrugged. “Grab shaft. Angle point at victim. Move point into victim as fast as possible.”
She took the weapon he made for her in shaking hands. “So. I just…” She mimed spearing into him.
“The head,” Avo said. “Body won’t be that useful.” He let out a hiss of annoyance. “Here. I’ll help.” Directing the spear with his Sanguinity, he pushed it into her shaking hands and unhinged his jaw before crouching in close so she could stab up through the roof of his mouth. From his sides, he expelled a breath of entropy into the ground and carved another section of matter away.
His Rend vanished again.
Kae drew in a few quick breaths and let her hate build. Securing her grip on the weapon, she leaned back and pushed forward.
His Phys-Sim flashed with indications. She didn’t have the mass, the weight, or the right vector. At best, she was going to pop one of his fangs off and then tumble over.
Making a snap-decision, he decided the expression of her will mattered more than the execution of it.
He caught the haemokinetic spear and drew it into proper position before gifting her a pull.
It was a strange thing, to be assisting in one’s own murder.
But seeing how the ire finally burst free from her thoughtstuff as the tip of the spear slipped through his inner flesh and tunneled into his brain, he decided that the demand for a death or two really didn’t matter when supply was essentially limitless.
The world spiked and flashed as his thoughts came to an abrupt pause. Something occupied the space of his cerebellum. That something levered up and the world smeared into flashing lights and drooping color.
Then, everything went out of focus.
RESURRECTION - 1%
And it is in ruination that we divine the vessel that will be our deliverance. Flesh must be flayed and bone must be broken before steel assumes its rightful place.
To abandon suffering before self-construction is delusion in practice is blasphemy of the self.
It is in witnessing the flaw that the mortal witnesses the face of apotheosis. The dismembered will never forget the worth of what they lacked, the blind the world unseen and seen again, and the sickened strength where once was naught.
Herein is the dialect of true apotheosis, for imbuing power before weakness is conceptualized fully desecrates the animus of all sophonts and renders oneself an altar toward hubris…
-Book of the New Alloy, Verse X, Resurrection III
13-2
What Was Lost (II)
Avo fell into the realm of his death and Kae plunged right after.
Sinking into the star-bright gleam of his Soul, he gazed across the stretch of his subreality and took in its growth. Where once the space simulated but a Sangeist and nothing more, now the Frame encompassed leagues beyond even two Heavens of considerable immensity.
Arteries of blood cracked and sprawled through his personal expanse, the Woundshaper nudging at the roiling midnight black winds of the Galeslither. Parted between loops of self-devouring dragons, they argued with gestures and hissed words, leftovers from the gods they used to be.
But somehow also more.
From the way the Woundshaper spoke, their growths were stymied in the age of pantheons – constrained by rival powers and the limitations of sacrifice and worship.
Bound to him, no longer were they to be so starved. In place of free will, they were granted access to a flow of growth unfettered, unchained by mythology.
From a meager fragment bound to a blood-cycling machine, the eldritch deity he renamed Woundshaper had grown to be something it could have never fathomed. Expanding in scope and domains, it spread from mere blood and matter to encompass aspects of luminosity, and biology.
A far way traveled. The Heaven burned smugly, with ever-deepening pleasure.
Across from it, the Galeslither was of another mood entirely. The nature of its adjustment frightened it, and the loss of its ability to determine its own fate gnawed at it from within.
Avo studied his lesser Heaven but briefly and found himself sharing in its discomfort.
To be enchained to a greater will and serve as little more than an instrument to be called upon was disquieting. Something he needed to address with it somehow.
So focused on the choice denied to his cadre that he ignored the being inside him as well.
Offering choice was growing to be more burdensome than he expected.
“Wait, that’s a whole other…” Kae said. She floated her crystalline tear-made dais over next to him, her attention drifting to the prize won from the last victim he preyed upon among Abrel’s team.
Three cyclers. Six ontologics. One Soul. Enough to create another Liminal Frame. And then there was the question of what he was to do with all the additional cyclers as well…
“You killed another Godclad,” Kae said, sounding more than a little astonished. “I mean… permanently. And took in their Frame.” Forcing order back on her drifting thoughts, she turned and faced the Woundshaper, focus hardening her expression. “I need to see how you build new canons. Or take things out. Just… use the Meta-Fac in general. I need to see how it functions.”
Humoring her request took no effort at all. With a thought, his flames spilled out and burrowed through one of the other Frame’s cyclers. Like ebbing fingers on wavelengths of reverberating fire, he pried the dragon free and pulled it close to himself. All it took to bind it to himself thereafter were threads of radiance stitching it to the nucleus that was his Soul.
Through it all, Kae’s mien darkened. “This is… I remember this. A Soul shouldn’t be capable of this. Soulfire isn’t self-aware–it doesn’t just heed someone’s thoughts. But with the Imitators…” Her voice trailed off into a groan as she clutched at her head. “But it wasn’t supposed to go in a Frame? How did they put it in a Frame? How? Nothing I did could kill it! It didn’t die! It was more like light or… just molecules… just cells…”

“Kae,” Avo said, wanting to halt her rambling.

He didn’t expect her to shush him in his own Soul. “I’ll apologize later. I need to think right now. I need to…” Her voice trailed off. “Avo. Show me your Soul again? Please? I want to see it. I have to…”
He unfurled the structure of the Woundshaper and parted the raging gales twisting forth from the Galeslither. Both were clasped by two rings of self-devouring dragons suffused with echoes derived from taken lives.
The Agnos approached, his all-simulating brightness shadowing a look of building certainty on her face.
“The fires are rippling outward.” She laughed. “I was too broken to see it. Too broken to remember.” She lapsed into silence as she just hovered there, studying the quintessence of his ontology as her voice took on a mournful note. “I remember I made part of this. Godshaper. I taught the Imitators how to crossover. How to replicate themselves within a Frame. As part of a Soul. Your fires aren’t actually fires, Avo. They’re cells. Thaumaturgic cells.”
A beat passed. “My Soul–My Frame? It’s… artificial?”


“I…” Kae began, concentration adding a moment of consideration to her words. “No. The Soul I used is just the same as any other. It’s still something we can’t replicate. But if the Imitators are fused inside it, it learns. It can remember. It can change. It can derive thoughts from you. It’s like a borrowed half-sapience with the capabilities of post-sophont intelligence.”


“I don’t understand,” Avo said.
“Imitation,” Kae explained. “The name was perfect. Like vulnerable cells, the environment was contagious to them. But they adapted. Always. I put them in realms of fire and frost and impossible planes of space. They survived it all. And when we had sacrifices enter the rooms, they all dreamed and remembered the nature of canons. Often they started thinking they had each other’s lives.”
RESURRECTION - 4%
For a long while after, neither of them spoke. The Heavens spoke to each other in the backdrop, but Avo found little of note in idle gossip turned bickering.
The silence broke finally as the Agnos released a sigh. “Do you know why your father did what he did? Why he pointed Ori-Thaum at me. Framed me for the murder of...” She drew in close and reached out from the nucleus of all the burned here, but refrained from contact despite her yearning. “Oh, Dawton. He was just doing his duty. He was trying to help the city–all we wanted was to use our knowledge! To fix the Rash.”
Her voice rose high into a shout, but before her the Heavens towered and the Soul just burned as always.
What worth was human pain before the eldritch – the powers above powers?
“No,” Avo finally replied. “Didn’t want this for you. But he wanted something for me. My guess is that he was shaping the situations and conditions to do something he wanted.”

“To make sure you would be the only one to reap the benefits of my work?” Kae asked.
“Maybe. Beginning to think his plans run deeper than I ever knew. Sent Draus to save you too.” That was something Avo never asked about. Draus and Kae. He had been so consumed by tasks and preparations he barely spoke to the Agnos about her life at all. “Don’t know why he did that. Send her.”


“Draus?” Kae pressed her lips together. “That’s… she was in the service of a Highflame Instrument for a time. I was part of the team commissioned to build his new Heaven. We spent some time together then.” She smirked. “She was so grumpy. And lonely; even isolated from the other Regulars. Never seemed to sleep. I mean, I worked late too so we ended up running into each other more and more and more.”
The smirk faded. “And when the work was done, the, um, Instrument decided to… take offense at what we made. If it weren’t for Draus, I think he might’ve killed one of us. I don’t know what she did to calm him down. She wouldn’t tell me when I asked. I don’t know why she risked her life against her own people for us either.”


Avo grunted a laugh. “Draus raids Crucibles looking for war and death. Tried to keep the boy safe. Tried to save the father. Same thing with you. She doesn’t care about dying. She just wants to find a good enough reason to burn. And you’re more than good. I think.”
Kae blinked. “I’m… more than good?”

And there it was–that tribalistic urge among all humans to be wanted. Another facet he and his brothers had been born without.
Avo wondered if Walton left him devoid of such a social weakness to keep him free from the chains of humanity.


“Dawton,” Avo said, changing the topic. “The Paladin. He was supposed to guard you during your task?” The man was also her lover, but there was little need to savor the taste of that wound.
Kae was unbalanced as things were.
A soft smile painted her face as a momentary reverie passed through her. She was recalling an event from her past, one that resonated over even all that was present.“That was the official capacity anyway. I never thought I would end up breaking official conduct there but…” She shrugged, unashamed of her failure. “He had a way of making everyone a bit happier when he was there.”


Avo ceded time and space to her. Dying was a simple act on his part. He increasingly considered a suicide implant of some kind.
He found himself, to his grim amusement, thinking back to Mirrorhead’s cortex bombs. Perhaps something like that would do.

The Agnos began speaking again, mastering herself a final time as the resurrection cycle climbed. “Project Godshaper was just supposed to be a series of experimental trials for a metaphysical tuner–what became your Soul’s Metafactory functions. But I was never meant to truly fix anything despite official oaths. I think Highflame agreed to the terms with Voidwatch with double intentions, and the voiders likewise expected us to get nowhere without their support.” A soft snarl passed through her features. “And I guess no one expected me or Dawton to actually try fixing the Rash, but I guess you don’t need to be a great power to pull off your own surprises.”

Interesting. Her attempts at resolving the Rash hadn’t been mentioned in the Column’s report. But again, first-hand detail always provided a new angle of perspective that a bird’s eye view didn’t possess.
Kae continued. “The idea of using it to fix the Rash was mine alone. Well… me and Dawton were uh… I told him while we were… but it wasn’t his fault! We ended up doing something that was… a bit beyond the parameters of the project. I–I didn’t mean for it to happen! But in the moment I couldn’t resist.”

Avo wondered if she was talking about her relationship or what they attempted on the Rash.
“From the trials, we found that the sacrifices were fully capable of building new Heavens in an instant. Of course, we needed to come up with all the structures and components needed for the rituals of mythology but I did it–well, not just me! My team! And Dawton and his trainees! We all performed a miracle for miracles: Perfect efficiency Heaven construction.”

Her excitement passed and she turned pensive. Introspective.


“And modification. That was something he and I tested on our own. Without letting anyone else know. I changed one of his canons. Made it better by adjusting his hubris.”
Through all, Avo listened and urged the flames around him to flow. He studied the nature of his own being as each individual flow of pulsing brightness bent up to better show their wavelengths.
It felt the same as looking down at his claws or sliding his Echoheads further into view.
“The Meta-Fac,” Avo said. “That’s just the Imitators in my Soul trying to build things I want?”
“You give it direction, but it still has simulating structures from the root data it can follow,” Kae said. “I… honestly, Avo, with how the Imitators are, it’s probably more accurate to say that you’re as much a part of them as they are a part of you.”
“Like my blood,” he added. “A metaphysical haemophage.”
“I… suppose at a very limited level. The Imitators just infect and create more of you though.”

Once again, the concept of symmetry chimed like a repeating bell. The artificiality of his current nature; the artificiality of his Soul. The properties of his blood; the properties of his Soul.
But if he followed the metaphor down the trail, that meant…
Kae preempted his sudden epiphany. “That’s the main reason why I needed to see their Frames too. Voidwatch has a concept of what bits of their mythos they let us see. Remember what you said about your haemophage? Your blood? Well, there’s this idea called an ‘eclipse phase’ that details how long a cell can remain itself before a virus rewrites its nature. The sacrifices started carrying each other’s memories within a day. If your Frame is capable of being… contagious, then that’s probably around the same time they’ll start developing. Changing.”
With each passing word, he felt his influence swell vaster and vaster in pace with his growing understanding.
If what she said came to pass, he wasn’t just a shapeshifter of self-modified miracles, but a kingmaker above kingmakers – someone with the capability to shatter the balance of the power in this city utterly and completely.
All the infection took was contact between the fires of his Soul and another.
Like Abrel.
“I still don’t know how they managed to meld it with a Soul.” Kae circled his nucleus much in the same way one of Sunrise’s bees did. “I tried it on a Soul–it doesn’t emulate metaphysical properties. It can endure extreme forces, but mirroring the environment and consciousnesses isn’t…”
Her growl of frustration followed.
“Hate not knowing things?” Avo asked.
“I hate not being able to figure my own work out! Your Frame is clearly designed on the basis of Godshaper but… I have no idea how they managed to put what the Imitators could do in theory into practice. I wasn’t done when… when…” She huffed as she derailed her thoughts from painful memories. “Wait. Practice? Practice! Avo, try… try accessing one of your canons! Don’t graft a piece from another Heaven just um… um… trying commanding your Soul to ‘interface’ or something.”


He did as she asked, conveying his want to the system with all the clarity and detail he could add. The Frame was still a stranger to him, its capabilities and growth a new revelation with each death.
This time was no different, and this time, Kae made all the difference.
The vector of his traveling radiance turned to heed his new demand. Like hyper-accelerated needs, narrow corridors formed where the yolk spreading out from his Soul brushed the sides of both his Heavens.
“Master… I feel… faint…” the Woundshaper muttered, its voice growing dimmer by the second. Across, the Galeslithered neighed softly, and from it came only surprise, but not fear.
“Yes,” Kae said. “Yes! It still works! Oh, your Heavens will be fine. I think.”

Avo glared at the Agnos using his Soul. “You think?”
“I'm not sure, okay!” She threw up her hands. “Honestly, the fact your Heavens are sapient at all is probably because of the Imitators as well. They’re carrying memories and personality fragments over from what your echoes worship! Pretty much personality constructs or… or divine engrams.”
With her words, new strings of mem-data pulsed over Avo’s mind.
[CANONICITY REVIEW BEGINNING]
->WOUNDSHAPER
->GALESLITHER
ENTER SIMULATED CANONICITY NOW?
Cautiously, Avo sent his affirmation, and he felt his Heavens expand themselves for lack of a better term.
Detaching his Soul, he drifted out next to the Agnos to gaze at what he had done.
Connected to him, threading rivers of fire pried each of the former gods, opening two bright-made gateways.
Kae shot him a look and took a deep breath. “Alright. Let’s see if this does what I think it does.” She paused. “Oh, Avo, if you start getting… mixed thoughts let me know. I don’t think my False-Hev can be affected but… if you start remembering parts not from your own life… that’s probably me.”
He answered with a note of disregard. “Necro. Won’t be bothered.”
She didn’t seem convinced.
With a burst of gliding motion, Kae dove through the threshold, and he felt something shift inside him as the Woundshaper pulsed with Soulfire.
RESURRECTION - 31%
Unwilling to come second repeatedly in his own Soul, Avo projected himself through the Heaven on tendrils of crawling resplendence.
On the other side, he found himself coming up just behind the halted Agnos, and below them, the breadth of a blood-made district bearing the aesthetics of a time bygone loaded into view.
He stopped just beside Kae, who seemed just content to watch.
“What is this?” Avo asked.
“The past?” Kae said. “Or at least, what the sacrificed think the past to be.”
It begins with a society feeding a story to a Soul while accompanied by a sacrifice. From the ephemeral confines of baseline reality, history–like a gestalt of collective memory or a single aligned instance between cultures and communities–waters the flickering seed of mythology.
And from there sprouts the beginnings of the pantheons.
Again, I look back at history and I feel my chest clench. So much lost. I understand why but the pain remains.
People are banned from knowing the exact names of cities and places because of their connections to their former gods. People are banned from knowing personal and communal histories because that’s what was used to nourish the growth of a Heaven.
History feeding into communities that became civilizations that developed cultures that developed mythology and miracles and the mysticism of thaumaturgy.
Godsfall wasn’t just a victory. It was also a tragedy. Because even though Jaus broke our chains, it took a pound of flesh with it. We had to seal part of ourselves away. Make ourselves blind and deaf and ignorant of those that came before.
Sometimes, when I read about the first-hand accounts of people who escaped from the breeding and sacrificing farms, I find myself glad I was born a child of this enlightened age.
But above all the horror, there was a line to the past severed, and with them a clear image of our own growth.
That, more than anything, remains the greatest absence among what was lost.
-What Was Lost by Revo I’Kurita
13-3
Eclipse Phase
Stepping inside the silenced Woundshaper was like treading into a world of dreams. Halted high above the clouds, both Godclad and Agnos studied the splash of a small city expanding in a crimson spill gushed outward in all directions. Even from on high, they could see the small figures digging channels for the blood to flow, directing and connecting haemokinetic lattices as new structures budded from lakes of quivering crimson.
There was a dreamlike quality to the tiny patch of civilization. Something almost infantile in its dimensions. The entire kingdom was barely greater than fifty square miles, and all around it, titanic spore-coated trees sprawled outward like fallen leviathans. Where rivers of blood gushed forth from the bastion of society, nature clashed as the wild and winding flora engulfed the city.
Brambles as thick as mountains but as high as hills whorled high to encase even the sky above, branches dying and growing at a constant pace. Starlight pierced through collapsing bark and spilling fungi in intermittent instances, flashing and fading between the seconds. The land itself was riven with cracks and crevices. Between the parted earth, Avo glimpsed sight into another ecosystem–one containing the vague shape of Scaarthian-sized creatures bearing twelve legs and coated in human-like skin.
But theirs was a presentation that lacked detail like an artifact bereft of the necessary mem-data to attain full detail.
In fact, as he skimmed the breadth of the Heaven’s inner world, he glimpsed a strange phosphorescent filter that coated the world around him, yet waned the further out he stared.
Beyond, in the horizon, mile-wide trunks clasped together in the distance and the simulation loaded no more.
Comparatively, the blood-made city burned brilliantly with impossible detail. Detail that Avo could see with nigh-omniscient clarity even from afar. Detail that found a central focus in a single tower at its heart.
One that he was more than familiar with. One that was layered in its translucence selves.
The Woundshaper, and all its prior iterations. From its beginning as the Sangeist to the atmosphere-igniting Heaven he built it to be.
Around it stood people in a vast and wide circle. People offering their prayers and necessary sacrifices. People slitting their own throats and wrists, bleeding into the waist-high pool they stood in.
The first, bottommost, concentricity around the Sangeist stood twenty people. Twenty Scaarthians gaunt of build and wearing ragged furs. Avo studied them and remembered the lore the Woundshaper shared with him. These were not the matriarchs in the lore–not the huntresses of yore, but they were fitting substitutes; people he killed that could play a similar role.
The above them, the blood inverted up a waterfall, and for the next circle, Avo found over a hundred gathered. A hundred dressed in dyed cloths and sporting haemokinetic constructs in their armor. The sigil denoting the Domain of Blood was scarred atop their bald scalps, and he found himself wondering if it was humanity that determined the symbology of the Heavens, of if it were to be the other way around.
Another level up and there were a thousand. From these thousand flowed capes and coats of crimson mist that sparked with electricity, and he recognized more than a few of them. Little Vicious stood next to Rantula, and their faces were twisted in exultation as they opened their veins time and time again. Crude sparks of stormstuff flowed through their wounds, and as they died, their veins exhaled hissing entropy that was swallowed back into the crimson tide rushing past their knees.
For every one of them that splashed down into the blood, another arose from the pool, resurrected and ready to offer themselves again.
From over a thousand lips came chants and cheers, words charged with joy and mania hurled as tithes toward the tower at the center of everything.
“Praise be!”
“Praise be!”

“Saathwu be bountiful!”
“Seethran is great! Seethran is all!”

“Praise the GODDESS OF BLOOD AND METAL! Praise be her bounty. Praise be her new apotheosis!”
The maddened chanting cycled endlessly, and between the volume of the exclamations, Avo could hear chitterings and murmurs passed between the sacrifices. The words left them, but they never looked at each other. They never truly spoke.
Instead, they recited stories from one to another, propagating new tales from each, the resurrected coming back into the world already hearing the lore of their new existence.
“We’re in the Skuldvast,” Kae said, ending her silence in a sudden flow of speech. “Paleheart, to be exact. Look at the flora around us. See how the woods are trying to close in, but won’t touch the blood. ” Her gaze drifted across the surrounding landscape and she frowned in a certain direction. “Strange. It doesn’t go any further. But the surroundings being simulated at all means it must remember something of its history…”
Her attention turned to the sacrifices and her frown softened into curiosity. “There,” she said, pointing at a fold of soft emanation passing through the air. Avo noticed and found himself looking at what seemed to be dissolving seams from a lattice-thin material. Light refracted from its curves, but in seconds it vanished from sight again. “Those are the Imitators. There in the air here. They're in your fire as well.”
“You said they're like cells,” Avo replied. “Seems more like organized strings of dust to me.”
“I suppose, but they’re connecting everything here. All the people repeating the same myths to build on your Heavens…” She trailed off. “Look at the architecture.” He did and found them shield-shaped–not unlike those in Nu-Scarrowbur.
They were also repeating. Down to the last bit of minute detail. Each block beyond that also suffered the same symptoms. The same guard tower manifested thirty-two times across thirty-two places. The mini-nuke he consumed started appearing in place of urns outside the four great mansions that flanked the tower. Tungsten and glass and vivianite were applied randomly to more and more structures as he looked away from the core.
“You want to know how I’m sure the Imitators are in you?” Kae asked. “Because this isn’t how a human learns their mythos–or even tells their own myths to each other. This is how a conjoined memory-sharing symbiotic intellect approaches mythology. Everyone just agrees. Everyone reiterates their stories without fail.”


Considering her words, he judged the flaws and mistakes in the city again. “Why the repetition?”
“Because it’s guessing–it doesn’t know so it’s filling in the gaps with the information it was already provided. All this place is a phantom memory. Phantom history. A generalized guess. Come on. Let’s take a look at the other one.”
She ascended through his reaching strings of radiance and returned to the central boundaries of his Frame.
RESURRECTION - 41%
They entered the Galeslither the same way but found the metaphor of its history most differently expressed.
The first things to catch Avo’s notice were the drifting communities built upon the backs of what looked to be bulbous, green-scaled whales with six manta-shaped wings and fire hissing free from curving gills spread along their ribs. They sailed above the ash-choked winds in pods of four and along the curve of the horizon behind them, four columns of sight-searing brightness cleaved into the atmosphere.
The shine they bore resembled the flash of a fusion burner in more ways than one.
“Oh, floaters!” Kae said. “Natural floaters. A shame that Omnitech decided to modify the ones that survived the Godsfall. It would’ve been nice to–ah! Look! Another fold in the light! The Imitators are in here too. Everywhere inside Frame…”


Avo found himself more drawn to how the people were kneeling atop their nomadic homes bolted onto the back of said floaters. Dome-shaped and hewn from wind-resistant material, folk that dwelled upon the backs of the airborne leviathans were closer to sailors than anything else.
Some managed the scales widening into glinting sails while others pointed at atlases of wind. Along the backs of their homes were crates filled with trade goods and an undeployed net made to snatch birds.
The bioforms themselves seemed to sing as they basked in the light, finding succor from starlight.
As each figure completed their designed tasks, they loudly proclaimed their offerings to the skies before taking to the edge of their homes.
And leaping.
Upward they fell, up into the boundless empty above, and through it all, the winds circled and a streak of lightning sheared the horizon, just as the Galeslither dove into shape. As it snatched the sacrifices delivered upon its homestead, it swallowed some between rifts of raging wind and drank away others through the fluid shadows cast by its wake.
The sail festooned upon the floaters filled and the nomads accelerated. Ahead, Avo found another pod with twice the number. Yet, they progressed over the same patch of the earth below, crossing over the same ravines, all while the same fiery spires cut up into the firmament behind.
Besides the increased number of sacrifices cast upward into the sky, the darkness seemed to cling around them, shadows riding forward in tandem with the altered Galeslither.
And with each body returned onto their living airships, Avo thought he saw the wind chimes pulse and lag, momentum-frozen even as they passed.
“Patchworks,” Avo said. “Bad sequences. No coherence to these memories. Like dumping a bunch of assets in and blending.”
Kae responded with a small note of agreement. “Yes. But that’s because the Guilds don’t want you to know how to build a Heaven. You still have all the Elder Mythos that your father left you, right?”
This piqued Avo’s interest. “Yes. Why?”

“Have you tried reading it? They contain many different memories–very interesting recollections that I’m not sure where–I frankly don’t know where he got some of the sequences from. The Guilds have restrictions on these memories and it looks like managed to steal some direct sources. We need to take a dive through them when you have a chance.”

“We?” Avo asked.
“Yes. We. I’m going to teach you. All of you. You’re going to learn how to make new Heavens.”


And with those words, Avo felt as excited as she did. “Isn’t there an oath against this?”


“There’s an oath against Agnos and attachments. There’s also another oath against harming an Agnos without just cause. There’s a lot of oaths, Avo. And to borrow a phrase from Draus, ‘shit didn’t matter.’”
Kae’s voice was too soft to manage the husk of Draus’ drawl, but the attitude was all there.
“Wait, do you have another Domain right now? Something for the Galeslither or the Woundshaper? Do the Woundshaper. I think I can help you do something…”

“Something?”
She shot through him without giving him a proper answer.
An instant later, he found himself infusing the last remaining Domain of Blood into his still-unfurled Woundshaper.
Instead of merely dissolving into the sigil of its structure, another iteration of the Sangeist manifested as it passed through the confines of the Heaven’s paracosm.


It was like another realm–another instance of the initial world he saw overlapping with the one already simulated inside the Woundshaper.
For the Sangeist, the only things offered form were the tower and the sacrifices. Only the blood flowed here–the miracles of matter remained absent with the expenditure of the domain. Blank-faced entities drifted like shades in an diminished world, their vessels unoccupied vehicles open to be mantled by the echoes of the dead.
Then, something unseen snaked into its boundaries.
The change came so subtly Avo almost missed it. Like a shift in the light, a thin film of phosphorous-like gauze spilled through the new Heaven, and from it, the transparent outlines of other structures began to arise.
As the two yet separate Heavens overlapped each other, Avo watched as the smaller ontologic developed flickering contours to perfectly slot over the environment of the Woundshaper.
He guessed this to be the Imitators in function – they were priming a new environment for perfect adaption, filling in the emptiness with ghost-like symmetry in anticipation of full integration.
“They can read patterns,” Avo said.
“They make patterns,” Kae elaborated. “They can also make a lot more miracles than just that. Let’s see. Tell it… no, let’s try something more interesting. Hubris. That’s supposed to be a cornerstone of a canon–a…an agreed-upon impossibility or point of paradox in scripture.”

Avo liked the sound of this. “Want me to have it remove the mass limit?”
The Agnos recoiled, aghast at the suggestion. “Oh, Jaus. No. No! Never do that.”

Curious response. “Why?”

“Because it’s a rooting aspect of a Heaven. The inconsistency allows it to stay anchored and overwrite baseline reality instead of remaining perpetually sealed in its own subreality. Look–imagine this. It’s like… you need something that can crack against actual reality or your Heaven will never make contact.”
“That’s why paradox? That’s why I backlash? Because an agreed point of impossibility between the revolving echoes sacrificed by my cyclers and how reality actually is?”

“It’s… more complicated than that, socio-culturally, but I suppose if you wish to view it that way, it can work. So, don’t remove the hubris. You should just… change it.”


“Change it?” Avo asked.
“Yes,” Kae continued. “With what your Frame can do, there won’t be any delay in culturing the sacrifices to accept the new lore.” Despite her earlier hurt, a sense of bubbling effervescence escaped from her. “So, keep the mass limit the same, but what if we keep the number of towers you can generate variable…”
That widened new possibilities in Avo’s mind. “More… towers?”

“Uh… more vessels for the Heaven, so to speak. Just try it. With how you can attune your ontology with singular thoughts and commands, there shouldn’t be any danger here.”
Encouraged and enthused, he did as she recommended. With an internal confirmation, he watched as something nigh-unseen twisted through the air, and two Heavens bled into each other.
They melded and merged, the greater whole Woundshaper infecting the Sangeist with its immensity, but it too was beginning to change as new possibilities of development began to phase into place.
“What was that you said? Eclipse phase?” Avo studied the look on Kae’s face.
Her anticipation hardened into triumph as mem-data flashed through Avo’s consciousness and in the unifying realities, the pool of sacrifices widened as a second spire rose up to accompany the first.
“Yeah,” Kae said. “Eclipse phase.”
DOMAIN OF (BLOOD)
UPDATING MYTHOLOGY
->REVIEWING FOR PARADOXES…
UPDATING HUBRISES…
CONFIG 1. [HUBRIS: ONLY UP TO EIGHTY TONS OF BLOOD CAN BE MANIPULATED AT ONCE (x2)]
CONGFIG 2. [HUBRIS: ATTEMPTING TO MOVE AN MANIPULATE AN EXCESS OF EIGHTY TONS AT ONCE WILL TRIGGER THAUMIC BACKLASH]
+I was thinking…+
+Oh, no! What happened?+

+Kae… Come on, I think sometimes.+
[Giggle] +I’m sorry. You try. Oh! I’m sorry, what were you going to ask?+


+So, this is about my hubris–the one tied to my “Breaker of Arms” canon. I’ve been thinking about what you told me, you know? About how canons are supposed to be necessary flaws for each miracle to integrate. Like a… single point of agreed impossibility between our subrealities and the real itself that lets us crossover…+


+Uh huh.+


+Well… can… can mine be changed to something else than “striking a surrendering opponent will incur backlash”? Because some of these Fallwalkers are getting real smart when I talk to them…+

+Hm. Theoretically, but your Heaven is a pre-fall ontologic. It used to belong to an actual god so there’s history there. A fixed detail in chronology. For that to be changed, we would need to affect and adjust every echo of Essence in your cyclers. And considering your Spheres, that would take upwards of…. Maybe two hundred thousand deaths a minute to upkeep.+
+Jaus.+


+Hm. You actually want to know if the Imitators can modify your Heavens, don’t you?+
+...Was it that obvious?+

+You didn’t care that much about thaumaturgy before, Paladin Morrow. It’s a pretty sudden spike in interest you just showed, and some of how you felt spilled over through the link when I showed you memories of the project’s progress. The answer is maybe. Theoretically. If we can “kill” them somehow – shift them over to being metaphysical entities that can be integrated into a Frame.+


+And how’s that going?+
+Well… Let’s just say I’m sliding closer to requesting a stasis test for it.+
-Paladin Dawton Morrow and Agnos Kae Kusanade
13-4
Necessary Flaws
For a passing moment, Avo just watched as the Woundshaper’s twin rose to prominence.
The second tower was every inch a copy of the first, growing out from storm-forked streams of flowing ichor. From the dog-like head at the spire to the shell of blended matter plating its periodically fluid structure, the Woundshaper became a duality unto itself.
Yet, with each inch that rose, the flame-painted world within the Woundshaper grew strained.
All too evidently, the demand was too great. Alternations he considered placed a greater ontologic mass on his Heaven than it could bear. Parts of the subreality fractured as rippling radiance flooded through the gulfs like a breach in a ship’s hull.
Both Heavens began to flicker, and though the sacrifices began to gouge at their own arteries and veins at a greater rate, it was still unable to feed the growth.
In rapt quietude, Kae studied the halfway ascension of the second tower and cocked her head in curiosity. “Yes… That makes sense. The Heaven having specific multiple vessels and parsing the hubris might offset the mass limit, but it does spike scope substantially and deviate it from common regard.”
INSUFFICIENT THAUMIC MASS TO ACHIEVE DESIRED ALTERATION
REQUIREMENTS: FIFTH-SPHERE LIMINAL FRAME
Fifth Sphere. A bit rich for his current list of kills, but if he struck a few soft targets, raided a Syndicate or ten…
“Avo, make a slight adjustment,” Kae said. “Try to have your Frame simulate new hubrises in the form of… wait… show me your canons of blood.”
He did as she asked without much protest, and watched as his resurrection climbed past fifty percent.

Lost in consideration and mumbling to herself, the Agnos was back in her element, a creature returned to its natural habitat after being so long deprived. As he earlier witnessed parallels between him and Chambers, so too did he align with Kae.
She drowned in her art, but her mind–even mended–was that of ever-shifting vectors and ever-increasing acceleration. Her attention shifted between the miracles offered by his Domain of Blood, and after a brief but intense half-mumbled conversation with herself, she roused from her trance and returned to offer a new determination.
“Okay. Good. Several very good things, in fact! First, a confirmation: Heavens are chronologically linked. Because your Heaven is not a post-fall Heaven, its mass is a fixed property. The nature of its flaw is scarred into the Heaven’s chronology. Maybe if we made a new Heaven of Blood… or found a way to directly culture the sacrifices again using new mythos… that’s for later. Right now, you just need to understand that since you’re using a Sangeist as a structure, we’re going to have to work around the problem.”
“Must stay at 80 tons?” he asked. He could not deny the slight disappointment blooming in his chest. So close to being more.
Power denied had such a unique hurt to it. The closest comparative would be the ultimate denial of long-lusted flesh before he could clamp his fangs down.
Her response, however, pulled his plummeting expectations back upward. “Only technically. Scaarthian mythology has Saathwu–the Bloodforge iteration specifically–being a tower of a recorded height and mass. The tonnage is related to how much blood needed to be offered to it in the cycle of a month. The tower specifically. That needs to be eighty tons. So… we can make a simple adjustment to keep both strains and essential limitations unchanged. And we do it using Sanguinity’s Reign.”
That clutched Avo’s entire attention. “The tower specifically. So. The base of the Heaven becomes fixed to the tonnage. Like a core. Or a spine. But expand the Heaven itself? Treat constructs created by the haemokinetic broadcast as separate entities?”
“Yes! Yes! Let’s try it. I think it’ll be a far more stable configuration. Oh, and don’t think about specific numbers this time. Use generalities and let the Meta-Fac work with the loaded builds.”


Again, he initiated the alteration of his hubris again but sent with it a drip of personal desire metastasized from his recent experiences.
When one survived long enough in New Vultun, they began to notice a rhyme to the city – themes that ensured his enduring survival.
His skill in Necrojacking was compounded with recent memories of Sunrise’s swarm and the plague-like Conflagration he captured from Kae’s mind.
Decentralization. Asymmetry. Angles.
These motifs had protected him, and upon straying from their grace, he found himself punished.
Against Abrel, his ontology was too fixed, too rooted in rigidity. Against the Low Masters and the Hungers, he was a creature of lesser skill, yet had saved himself using their ignorance and misdirection. And when entrapped by Naeko’s all-powerful might, Denton sent him away with words and information alone.
Options.
He needed more options.
He needed to be flexible.
The second tower did not collapse into nothingness. Instead, it speared out in sinuous threads and began to orbit the first. Rings of circulation broke apart into individual motes of haemokinetic debris. The effect came to be similar to a belt of asteroids tumbling around a planetary body, the tower itself a governing module but no longer the totality.
UPDATING LORE…
HUBRIS: THE CORE OF THE HEAVEN CAN ONLY BE EIGHTY TONS OF BLOOD; WITH EACH TON THE USER MANIPULATES BEYOND THE CORE OF THIS HEAVEN, THE GREATER THE REND AND THAUMIC REQUIREMENTS WILL BE (VARIABLE)
HUBRIS: ATTEMPTING TO MOVE OR IMBUE MORE THAN 80 TONS USING THE CORE OF THE HEAVEN WILL TRIGGER THAUMIC BACKLASH; WITH EACH TON THE USER MANIPULATES BEYOND THE CORE OF THIS HEAVEN, THE GREATER THE REND AND THAUMIC REQUIREMENTS REQUIREMENTS WILL BE (VARIABLE)
The mem-data was secondary in Avo’s mind. With the inner world of the Woundshaper revealed, the lines of text were but summarizations of the entire process.
As Kae chittered excitedly at the alteration proving to be stable, he had his simulation run estimates on just how many tons he could reach now.
“I wanted it to be like a hive,” Avo said.
Kae fell silent. “A hive?”


“Decentralized. More vectors of attack. Be like facing an infection from afar.”
She turned back and studied the clotting fragments forming a hardened veil around the Heaven. “I understand. I like it. I like it a lot. Hm. I think we should include Draus in these discussions as well. She knows about combat far more than I do so, with her input, I think we might be able to build even more specialized canons.”
Turning her attention back to the expanding Heaven, she wriggled her nose and set about examining its structure.
“The thaumic requirements are unchanged. No major spike in stability or paradoxing. Yes. Yes. Shifting the hubrises works. And variable hubrises too… I haven’t seen many of those at all…”


“Risky?” Avo asked.
She hummed. “Some. But that’s mostly just Godclads ignoring the limits of their Frame and overloading themselves from Rend when they pack too much mass on their Heaven and their Hell can’t counterbalance it. My guess is you can pack up quite a lot of tonnage judged by your current thaumic output but… your Hell won’t be able to handle too large of a spike for very long.”
His Frame brought up new estimates. If he diverted every echo of his thaumic mass to his Heaven of Blood, his Woundshaper could contain over fifteen thousand tons of mass.
At the same time, his Hell would immediately overload with Rend and his Frame would Rupture from overload, ensuring his cessation in a nigh-instant.
Best that he proceed with caution.
RESURRECTION - 77%
Kae settled into a new routine as she checked his systems and structures, examining each and every angle pertaining to the Woundshaper. Afterward, she spent an equally disproportionate time scanning the faces of all the present sacrifices.
It was only when she requested to do the same thing for the Galeslither that he realized why she wanted to examine his Frame so.

The Imitators comingled within his eldritch shine stored memories. Stories of mythos and lore. But mundane memories as well, supposedly.
If any of her dead friends and family were among the collective, they would have been simulated in some capacity. Avo himself would have noticed considering he already knew what Morrow looked like from Ninth Column showed him.
As they drifted back out into the outer confines of his Soul, the smolder of excitement died down to a hiss again. Something in her was extinguished – a desperately kindled flicker of hope.
“Didn’t find what you wanted,” he asked her.
“I was hoping that… some memories would be found inside you. Through the Imitators, I mean.” She paused and brought a hand up to rub at her opposite arm as her gaze dropped. “I… When I remembered everything, I remembered that our testing plane was breached when we were attacked. Some of the Imitators got out and I was hoping… I thought even if they were packed into your Frame–”

“That you could use them to see what happened that day?” Avo asked. “To seek out remnant memories or echoes leftover by those you knew?” An uncomfortable silence settled between them. “Did you see his face? Among my dead?”
He didn’t need to speak the Paladin’s name for Kae to know who he alluded to. She shook her head with deliberate slowness, eyes distant as she recalled a moment long past. “No. I mean, I thought I did–I was afraid he would be here but I also wanted it but he deserved so much more.” Her face tightened and she dug her nails into her arm. “We deserved so much more. I was happy. There was… we were just…”

Avo understood. Humans liked epitomizing concepts. It was probably part of the reason why there were any gods in the first place. When things went wrong without reason, the fortitude of ego would grow tested, and from lips would flow words of self-soothing sophistry–platitudes to ward against the full weight of the offenses arrayed against them.
Spiritual homeopathy.
The alternative was to face horror and accept there didn’t need to be any reason, that things just were sometimes.
In another path, in another life, perhaps he would be faced with another Agnos who decided to commit to the project and Kae would still be living a happy and carefree life in the Tiers.
Maybe she would meet her Paladin in that life as well. Maybe not.
Maybe maybe maybe.
That was the part that tore at her the most, it seemed. The reality that could have been. The reality that should have been. The reality is that would never be.
If Avo was nested in mortal flesh at that moment, he would have broken into laughter. How absurd it was that the architect of the divine was just as easily denied happiness and joy as any other joy-fiend or FATELESS in the city.
The sheer indifference of it all was absurd.
And once again, for the first time in a long time, Avo found himself glad that he was a ghoul.
To be human was to want things beyond the flavors of flesh and the vivacity of violence. He was, right then, “happier” than he had ever been in his memories; more satisfied, though still hungry. He would always be hungry.
But Kae and Essus lost what they wanted and would never recover from it…
The loss of a dream was an ugly thing to behold.
With that loss in mind, he spoke his next words, seeking to divert her thoughts from pain to promise.
Dreams died. But new wants could take the place of what was decayed. New dreams. New colors and new flavors.
An easier hubris for her heart to survive.
RESURRECTION - 99%
“Kae,” Avo said. “I still have a Frame in me. And the ones who hurt you are still alive. They’re living in the Tiers. Living in bliss. Comfort. All the things they took from you. Used you as a weapon against yourself. Burned you when things went wrong. Can do a few things for you. Can take the memories away. Or resequence them. Kill the pain.”

“No!” she yelped. Embarrassed at her sudden outburst, she hugged herself. “No. I want to remember. I don’t want to forget… it’s… I… uh… It’s just so hard to think and say something. I thought working on your Frame would make me focus more or–or find something but I can’t calm down and I can’t–”

“I have another Frame,” Avo repeated. “Can tell you what I could do with it. Do you want to hear?”

She paused. “I… yes?”


“I could take all the cyclers. Integrate them with my Frame. Graft the Heavens. Hunt for more thaums. Could give them to Draus or Essus or Chambers or even the Columners. Could give them to some joy-fiend. For amusement. Or I could make you a ‘Clad too.”


Kae knew this was coming on some level. He saw it in her eyes. He saw it in the way she straightened herself. And he saw her apprehension when she reached up to touch her eye. “Before. When you asked me I…” She grimaced. “I couldn’t remember so much but I think I didn’t want to remember either. I wanted to… believe in the fantasy that things could go back. That after you healed me and I could go back up the Tiers and just… live my life again.
A flash of a memory passed through Avo’s mind. He remembered having fish in the Tiers. He wondered if they were still alive.
Or real at all.
“But that’s not going to be happening anymore. Not with what they did. And not with what you are. I need… I need them to burn. I need them to burn! Burn! Burn!” The way she stamped exposed a child-like tantrum. She wasn’t used to this kind of rage, nor enacting violence on her own behalf.
She would learn. It might take a few deaths, but she would learn.
“Yes.” The steel and resoluteness in her words rang clear. “Yes. I’ll take it. I want the Frame. Fuck the oaths. Fuck the Guilds. Fuck it all. I don’t want to feel this way alone.”
RESURRECTION - 100%
Avo felt light-formed fingers pry his consciousness back up into existence. As his subreality began to inject him back across the veil, he watched as Kae dissolved, her expression hardened, her gaze locked to his fading Soul.
Existence shuddered into shape around him as mem-data flowed across his cog-feed. Spawning over his corpse, he found Kae standing right before him, their conversation interrupted by his return, but not concluded.
From the stairs, he could hear sharp, clicking footsteps. Draus. Her bio-rig rattled a specific way.
“You know you have to die to become Godclad?” he asked.
Kae snorted a soft laugh. “I’m an–I was an Agnos, Avo. I know more about your Frame than you probably do.”

“Was,” he noted.
“They just let it happen,” Kae said. “If not for Draus and then you, they would’ve just…” Her voice choked off. She shook her head.
He grunted. Wasn’t much he could say about someone’s extended family leaving them to face torment on their own.
“I can do it if you’re afraid,” Avo said. “Can make it painless using my Heaven.”

“No.” She squeaked with fear as she said it. He could hear her heart pulsing, see her blood coursing, smell the stink of her breath as she breathed and swallowed back bouts of rising panic. “I can do it. I want to do it.” Blinking, she struggled to compose herself. “Avo? What… what do you want? Why are you helping–I’m grateful but… why? I know you don’t care. Not like that.”

Why. That was a good question.
One that he was only beginning to develop an answer to. His Echoheads picked at the ground. “Walton. He wanted me to see the colors. Experience new flavors. Live. His jaws widened for a moment before he forced them shut as his eyes swept over the softness of her throat. "Still hunger. Still want to hurt and kill and eat. Don’t want to deny it anymore. Don’t want to lie to myself. But… there’s no taste in hurting the choiceless. Bad diet. My father was right.”
“So it’s about what he wanted?” Kae asked.
“No,” Avo said. “Walton was a good father. He did everything he could for me. For my growth. My agency. But he was a monster to everyone else. No one else’s choice mattered. I was the goal. He hurt everyone to achieve it.”

Draus emerged out from the entrance and stopped to regard the two locked in conversation.
Avo continued. “Don’t want to be him. Want more–I am more. More than ghoul. More than Necrojack. More than Godclad.”
He turned his gaze skyward, and though a featureless expanse greeted him, he imagined himself staring at the Tiers. “It’s not done. Guilds will be coming for my Frame. They will keep killing the FATELESS. They will keep fighting. Someday they’ll break the world for good. Done with that. Done with letting them choose. Seen their decisions. Seen their wars. Seen them suffer no consequence.”
Nearby, the blood in the pool was bubbling, drawn up by a will unseen.
"No more. Going to readjust the food chain. Do what I was supposedly designed to do.”

He spread his fangs in a wide smile, his many teeth clasped over one another. “Mirrorhead. Got me addicted to quality meat. Can’t go back. Won’t go back. Still have to hurt his sister. Still have to break his father. Still have new hunting grounds to prepare for.”

“You’re going to war against the Guilds?” Kae breathed.
“War?” Avo said. “No. War is their business. I’m just going to make victims of them. I just want to hurt them.”

“And… that’s it?” Kae asked.

“For now,” Avo said. “Tastes change with experience. But either we hurt them. Or they hurt us. No other way.”

“No other way,” Kae agreed. “Well, I might have a few people we can start with.”

Ah. Ori-Thaum. It would be a thrill to see if they could withstand a weapon of their own creation. “Find the Glaives? The Incubi that hurt you?”

She nodded. “It’s a start. We’ll see how the experience changes me.”

He had underestimated the little Agnos. There was more to her than knowledge and scholarly charm.
Turning, Kae regarded Draus with a polite smile. “Hi, Draus. Um. If you have a gun or something, can I borrow it? I want to shoot myself.”
“What?” Chambers’ footsteps slapped against the steps. “Whoa! Wait! Hold on there, we just fixed you–don’t snuff yourself! Essus! You other half-strands! Fucking–come on!”
More footsteps followed. It sounded like a collective stampede.
Sunrise circled around Avo’s head as the swarm buzzed above. “Unexpected. Most unexpected.”
The Regular, meanwhile, just glared at the ghoul. “The fuck you say to her?
+ATTENTION+
PRIORITY 1 ALERT INBOUND:
BEGINNING PROXY SYNC…

Good morning, Glaives,
Approximately six hours ago last night, one of our cells was exposed and burned. Details can be found within the mem-data bearing the task designation “Broken Glass”
Effective immediately, all contacted Glaive teams are to enter the Yuulden-Yang Sovereignty to find and extract missing Incubi assets.
Or terminate should the need arise.
As the Nether is down, we will be running locus-link configurations between each kill team.
Good hunting consangs
+//+
Incubi,
From sequences of memory glimpsed from the Registry, we have positive confirmation of essential interest entity “Kae Kusanade” sighted in the Xin Yunsha district from the establishment “Second Fortune.”
We are dead-dropping new proxy minds and have new bio-sculpts prepared. You are to enter the district and maintain your current cover until the Nether stabilizes. During this time, you are to scout and establish forward-scrying posts and procure any and all details relating to the essential interest entity.
Again, this is scrying detail. No assassinations. No obvious nullings.
Collect mem-data connected to the essential interest entity. Transfer data to your Convex. Burn your proxy. Extract.
Nothing more.
-Glaive Cross-Cell Priority Alerts
13-5
Breather
Kae wasn’t very good at suicide, but she managed it with enough encouragement.
She managed to miss her first shot by flinching away from her gun even before she pulled the trigger. Such evasion came with its own cost, for when she ducked aside, she still squeezed the trigger, and thus the flechette, once intended for her, made a pit stop through Chambers’ throat before skipping off from the stone outcropping forming the stairway entrance.
There was something amusing about how the man just toppled over with a gurgling spray. The effect was multiplied as all turned away from him, ignoring his choking gurgles while he slowly passed, choosing instead to assist the Agnos in achieving such an end as well.

Nervousness ruined her second try and Chambers’ sudden resurrection made her miss the third.
On the fourth she finally succeeded by tucking the gun under her chin instead, placing her thumbs against the trigger and trying to win a staredown against the pistol.
The end came quickly for her. A flashing pulse of the gun’s coils preceded a spread of erupting brain matter.
From there, it was a simple matter of seizing her with his Soulfire and grafting her into the thaumic heart of her new ontology.
“And that’s all it took, huh,” Cas breathed. His gaze swept down from Avo to Kae’s still form, her right eye hollow of the crystalline orb she used to channel her False Heaven. Her face was frozen in an open-eyed look of startlement, as if not expecting the instant of her demise despite serving as her own executioner.
“You got her?” Draus asked, sounding more than a little sour about the entire affair. She hadn’t been against Kae’s decision to become a Godclad, but there was something undeniably strange about curing the Agnos of her mental damage only to kill her right afterward.
There was a sublime, special madness to the act.
“She’s grafted,” Avo said. He shed the other Soul from his orbit with a gentle push of his animated radiance and waited. When Kae returned, she would possess all ontologics and thaums held by the previous user of the Aegis of Tides, sans the cycler that Avo took. “Took a cycler away from her. Want you to have it. Increase your survivability. More chances at resurrection.”

The Regular paused to consider what he just said. She cast a brief look at Chambers and Essus, the latter looking slightly more put together than he was earlier. There was still a dullness to his stare, but at least he seemed more aware of his surroundings, no longer drowning in his own thoughts.
“Yeah,” Draus said. “Probably the right call. Probably. How long’s Kae got before she comes back?”

“Not long,” Avo said, guessing more than knowing. “Probably has her cyclers working at–”

And before he could finish, the subject of their inquiry returned to reality through the Soul-made scar marring the tapestry of existence.
She ended up stumbling over her own corpse as she got back, arms spinning in circles as she fought for balance. Avo reached out but Draus caught her first, preventing the fall before it could transpire.
“Oh, thanks,” Kae said. She returned wearing the red polymer synthcoat she wore when they first met at the Second Fortune. He assumed there must’ve been some kind of sentimental significance to the outfit in this choice of aesthetic reversion.
What she did not keep, however, was the veil shielding the right side of her face. Studying her bared clan mark for the first time, its design captured his curiosity from the weight of its symbology alone. Two winged serpents writhed with their bodies knotted around one another, their fastened union resembling the vague shape of a scale as each of their heads curved low.
Avo didn’t personally know enough about Ori culture, but his Metamind filtered forth essential memories matching what he glimpsed through his cog-feed.
The twin serpents of the Clan Yinga symbolized the origins of their family–two feuding clans fused a union in desperate times, finding balance though still trying to escape. From there they came to be a minor power in the southmost islands in the great chain, applying their knowledge to matters related to trade.
Kae, for her part, seemed to have deviated toward a path of greater erudition. He wondered what her broader family thought of that, but then it occurred to him that she never mentioned her family or clan at all across all the time they spent together.
“You alright?” Draus asked.
“I’m fine,” Kae nodded and stepped forward. Then, she made the mistake of turning back to stare at her dead body. “I–uh…”

Her next words were usurped as a stream of flowing vomit.
Avo took a step back. Draus continued to support Kae as the Agnos whipped her head back around, mind screaming with existential dread as stomach-churning emotion tossed inside her being.
Now there was a lesser trauma worth holding onto – its workings were subtle enough that Avo might even be able to apply it toward more clandestine uses.
***
After Kae cleaned herself up while Avo scarfed down her corpse to “spare her more dread,” they all found their way back up the stairs to the dormitory level and scattered to separate corners for a moment of respite.
The Columners stayed beside the stairway to discuss forecasts related to Zein’s impending return and how they were going to manage in the meantime. Kae and Draus occupied a table Avo made for them from his blood, the former soothing her reeling mind on a hot cup of tea while the Regular scanned her detached bio-rig, augmented eyes pulsing with light. Across the room, Chambers chattered away in the cot next to Essus, ensuring that while both of them might’ve been laying in beds, neither would get to sleep.
Avo himself welcomed a moment to himself. He had ghosts to resequence; memories to hide, dismantle, and assimilate; a yet-finished labyrinth to develop in his Metamind; and a dozen or so dormant loci filled with the Eaters, as Denton and Sunrise had referred to them.
Choosing a specific task from the multitude presented was easy. The potential of the Conflagration interested him the most, and so reached out and began running more in-depth diagnoses for their structures.
He considered maximizing his efficiency by connecting himself to more blood mass, but decided against it as a funnel of bees spiraled down to encase his shoulder. Attention split between the arriving bioform and a phantasmal instrument with near boundless potential, Avo found himself distracted by all the new opportunities surrounding him.
Sunrise was itself a link to Voidwatch. He still remembered the grafters from Voidwatch–had their contact information. There were still so many advantages left untapped around him, so many things to focus on, and so many paths to travel.
“Was it hard?” Sunrise asked. The hum of its voice held an obvious note of interest while the way each individual bee rattled in perfect synchronicity made Avo wonder just how interconnected the swarm itself ways. “Binding Kae Kusanade to the Liminal Frame.”

At the mention of her name, Kae turned and offered Avo a quick glance. Though weary from her ordeal and yearning to be alone, she still flashed a quick grin at him, the smile revelatory toward her character.
By contrast, the cognitive atmosphere exhumed from Essus’ surface thoughts was one of droning dullness and gray-tinged emptiness.
The psionic wounds inflicted upon the two were not equal in magnitude. One was sundered ego-deep by the tragedy that befell them, while the other was fractured but ultimately remained themselves.
“No,” Avo said. “It was too easy. Should’ve been harder.”

The swarm peeled off his shoulder to face him. He guided a few of his ghosts deeper along an Eater’s inner helix, trying to determine how he could separate the warring minds. “Why do you wish for more difficulty?”

With every sequence he traveled, his wards rattled beneath the constant encroach of pressure. Even ego-broken, the fires still emanated with hurt. But if he could resolve that, would he be able to adapt the personalities present to automate other processes? Train them to be the phantasmal equivalent of the Imitators were as one with the fires inside his Frame.
“Consequence,” Avo said, finally. “Think that’s what makes a good ‘Clad. Good Necro. Good snuffer.”

Sunrise drew in closer, wordlessly asking him to explain further.
“Mirrorhead ruled Mazza’s Junction. Did what he wanted. Was blind to the Incubi. Blind to me. Couldn’t save himself even with his Heaven. Such wasted power.” He let his words rest for a moment as withdrew his ghosts from one Eater and cast them into another. “Don’t want to become him. No consequence. No education. Delusion waits at the end.”

“You’re talking about feedback,” Sunrise said. “Something to indicate a proper reaction.”

Avo grunted in agreement. “Something like that.”

“Why don’t you just keep all the power for yourself? Why disseminate? Most born of your culture do.”

“Not my culture. Not really part of any culture. And I am.”

“You are?”

“Keeping the power for myself.” He directed his perception at Kae, and then Draus, and then Chambers and Essus too. “Perspective is…. Useful. Can harvest memories. Build phantasmics. Draw on others’ experiences. But can’t make the same choices as them. See the angles they see. More perspectives are… flavors. Colors. New ways of knowing. Ways of knowing life beyond being a ghoul. Beyond myself.”

“And those you kill and devour? Aren’t their experiences also varied and valid?” Sunrise queried. “You value choice and novelty, but you seem to be indifferent to the sanctity of life.”

That earned a small chuff of laughter from him. “No sanctity.”

“None?”

“No,” he reiterated. “Only Godclads and FATED are ensured from death. Should tell you something. Won’t tell you I care about the people I kill and eat. Good and bad. There’s no weight for me there. But there are also choices. Mistakes. Trying not to kill the choiceless and meek. Trying to hunt only others with teeth like mine.”

“What about the few hundred thousand you nulled?” Sunrise said. “Did they bear teeth?”

“Yes. Brittle teeth. Still teeth. Still proper meat. Watched the FATELESS die. Supported the killings with their imps. Fair prey. Not my fault they lived they way the did. Only my choice to hurt them.”

The swarm curved back, the bees folding around his head like a screen. “You look for reasons to hurt and kill people.”

“Yes.”

“How do you know you will not slip from your reasoning?”

“I don’t,” Avo said. “But Draus will probably try to kill me for good. Will notice then. Be a shame to eat her.”

The Regular’s murmur came through the veil of insects. “You’re gonna be regrettin’ them words when I skin you to make myself new leathers.” He snapped his teeth in her general direction and the bees flinched back.
“Have a question for you now,” Avo said, turning his focus back to the bioform before him. “What are you? You person? A mind piloting a swarm.”

“I am a fully uplifted citizen recognized by the rights of the Sol Sophancy Charter. I was incepted legally and consensually from the mind of a quartet and was originally engineered to live and aid in the ecological adaption of planetary bodies.”
“You were an engineer?” Avo asked. “Always been a swarm?”

“Always,” Sunrise said. “I could have chosen to be resheathed in another morphology, but I have never wanted for more than this form. It has proven useful for clandestine work, as my continued survival can attest.”

Avo disconnected from the loci and gave his full attention over to this conversation. “What’s life like in the void?”

From these few words followed a heavy silence. The swarm turned to each other as if each individual bug was consulting another. The thrumming of their wingbeats grew louder and Avo could feel the heat building from their bulk. But then, all at once, the swarm went silent and they all turned back to him. “Pleasant. Quiet. Fearful. Forlorn. Forlorn.”

“Fornlorn,” Avo said. “Why?”

“Our lives are good still, but we are shadows of shadows. We remember a time when civilizations piloted a fleet of stars, when war was but a passing dispute without any lasting fatalities, when all was provided and expression was unchained. Now, we live in comfort, but dull ourselves on pleasure against the fear.”

“What are you afraid of,” Avo asked.
“You,” Sunrise said. They shared a mutual sense of honesty between their natures. Something about that pleased Avo, while another part of his mind questioned if the bioform was just leading him on. “The gods. The Heavens. The Ruptures. Thaumaturgy. The eldritch. We fear all that brought us to this point. And we fear what has become of you.”


“Why don’t you use the gods? Use Necrotheurgy.”

The bioform’s collective shuffled with discomfort. “Do you know what the void looks like beyond this place? This placid planet?”

“Placid?” Avo said, narrowing his eyes. “Idheim?”

“Civilization is still supported. Reality still retains primary control. Placid is the right word.”

That put things into perspective.
“Everything outside is part of the Sunderwilds? Spreading Ruptures across the stars?”
“There aren’t so many stars anymore,” Sunrise said. “Not true stars anyway. And from them comes the wrong…”

Come to think of it, quite a gulf of time had passed since the Guilds announced a Godhunt. These had been quiet months–if there were outsider gods spotted, all Fallwalkers and Guilders of capability would be preparing to reap a new bounty of Soul.
In some ways, Voidwatch was the only reason Idheim hadn’t collapsed. In others, the terrestrial powers gleefully threw themselves forth into the jaws of certain oblivion to face foes the reality-bound voiders never could.
He considered broaching a new request with the bioform – to ask that it share the inhuman magic-born cognition infusing its thoughtstuff. The veil of pure technology was still hard to pierce, but he increasingly found himself interested in the fundamentals of things. If he was going to build new Heavens with Kae, learning more about the foundational sinews of reality could–
A string of mem-data flashed over his cog-feed. So deep in his own thoughts he almost missed it–and would have ignored it if not for the name.
AUTO-SEANCE CONNECTION: ABREL GREATLING ONLINE
“Avo?” Sunrise asked, drifting in. “Avo, are you well.”

“Yes,” Avo breathed, clicking his teeth together in slavering anticipation.
She had been spared death at the last minute back in Light’s End. Spared death, but not freed from his touch.

Perhaps her continued survival was for the best. He did need someone to test his new phantasmics on, and if there was a chance, she could be used to help him anticipate the Paladins themselves.
Yes. Yes, it was a good thing he didn’t get to torture, kill, and devour the Greatling.
Not when she offered another avenue of opportunity…
I ran up against the Incubi a couple of times. Nasty biz, but I made it without getting nulled.
Trick with them is to make chasing you a bother. Most times, if the Incubi are after you directly, you’re fucked with a capital F. They don’t come after someone without all the details. Second most common way you end up coming across them is when you’re on a dive of your own.
Usually, that means you’re fucked too, but with a smaller case f.
For me, I was in the middle of sequencing their “Special Interest Entity” when they came spoofing their way in. Got real lucky that day: They weren’t ready for me and I wasn’t ready for them.
Considering the guy I was jacking technically didn’t exist, that meant we were all fighting in the dark and off the books.
Of course, there were four of them and only one of me, and they dismantled all my protections without making a peep. Bad odds. Real bad. Really shouldn’t have made it out.
But then the guy I was jacking just… noticed us. All of us. Host awareness went from zero to max in an instant. It was like he had a second mind patrolling his insides or something.
Anyway, my wards were cracked and the Incubi were clawing through my outer thoughts when the others came.
To this day I don’t know who they were or where they came from, all I know is that their ambush saved me from mine.
The Incubi turned, fought, and all started unraveling in a second.
I jacked out.
I lived.
Didn’t get paid that time, but sometimes, managing to survive means more than anything in the world.
Let that be a lesson to you, consangs. The Nether is a deep, dark ocean, and if you dive deep enough you’re going to run into some sharks.
Or the ones that prey on them.
-White Rab
13-6
Hunters in the Dark (I)
Abrel Greatling had not resurrected since their last encounter. This truth became known to Avo as he crept out from the hidden mechanism left in her mind. The grooves of her mental wounds greeted him like clefts and handholds, and in the crevices of her fractured cognition swam unidentified ghosts.
Exorcist Necros, he assumed.
They were professional enough, though being slightly above middling did nothing to earn his praise. Working in teams of twelve, they approached the structure of her mind like a ladder but neglected to venture into the depths of her palace. Doubtless for fear of encountering traps, or transgressing against a Fated Guilder – a Godclad no less.
Such was fine with him. It offered room to operate. A place for him to observe his opposition before he decided on the next steps.
Back in the demiplane, he projected the dive from his perspective, using his phantoms to feed the details of his processes over to everyone else. Most of those present had gathered around him once they heard what was going on.
Essus, however, sounded like he was finally sleeping now that Chambers’ attention had been drawn away.
HOST AWARENESS: [NULL]
There wasn’t so much danger of Abrel noticing him. Not after what he inflicted on her. His trauma-patterns had smote her clean through, gouging her ego from surface thought to subconscious memory. Most sequences connected to her brother were frayed from the intensity of her anguish, the sheer torment of being exposed to her beloved brother’s ignominious end enlightening her mind with newer, more sublime flavors of despair.
Everything she recalled of Jhred caused her hurt, from his descent from the Tiers, to all the times she tried to bring him home, to his ultimate and horrific death at the hands of Fallwalkers unknown.
It was the last that gnawed at her the most. A day ago she had friends to count on. A family away from family. A cadre of her own, the hard-earned spot of leader proof of merited deeds that served as a burning candle against her mother’s shameful shadow.
They were all dead now. Dead for good. Cessation.
Lurking in the depths of her subconsciousness, he plucked at the strings of her hurt, subtly cycling memories and enhancing details to enliven her misery. He considered planting scenes from Jhreds mind over in hers but restrained himself from such pleasure.
Even a novice Necro would be able to notice such an obvious sequencing.
Instead, he magnified her wounds and listened as she thrashed and shuddered, the keening screeches tearing out from her throat less than human, far below the merit of a Godclad.
It was a joy to break things.
It was–
A moment of symmetry passed between her mind and his. He caught a flash of himself writhing as she did, Little Vicious unlatching his flesh from his shattering bones. In the pause that followed, he fought himself, fought and pulled against the worst of nature with every ounce of his might.
The beast was stronger–growing stronger with him, and it wanted its due. More than flesh, it wanted that which flowed when the concept of self was undone and the nectar of a breaking spirit.
He was more than what he was, and in some fashion, that included the monsters as well.
His cog-feed thrummed with a warning as a ray of perception poured down toward the memories he dwelled in. Sinking into her hurt, he used the pain as cover and accessed her senses in the real. A feed opened in the back of his mind as mem-data formulated what Abrel could see and hear in the real.
Playtime had draw the attention of Exorcists. Just as well–he intended to seek our their minds using hers. This worked better, all things considered.
The act wasn’t very useful. Through her eyes, he found himself staring at the intersecting clamps of the sealed metallic cage. A grav-emitter thrummed dully within the confines while the Greatling girl intermittently ruined the peace by moaning the incoherent notes formed by a ruined mind.
Delusion oozed from her psionic injuries like an infected wound, fragments of broken thought tumbling through her, simulated in the form of a shattered megablock sailing free across the asteroid belt born of her sundered palace.
She fought to believe that her comrades were going to resurrect, that she was going to see them again, and soon.
She fought, but disconnected threads of awareness knew better. It was a strange state of being she occupied–to be convinced of two opposite facts at the same time without any dissonance.
Avo harvested the pattern as a means to shatter focus more than harm.
DOWNLOADING TRAUMA-PATTERN: [ABREL’S SEPARATION]
Little detail remained of her phantasmal refuge. Dangling threads of bleeding memory clung onto drifting structures as Exorcist Specters hovered by, scanning the mem-data for anything anomalous. Predictable. Exploitable. They didn’t know he was there, and he still had a direct line to Abrel.

Taking a moment to filter through the Greatling’s memories while using his ghosts as circumspect instruments, he deleted and modified what few instances of recollection she had of talking to him or Draus. Chambers and Essus he left as they were–their faces were already exposed.
There was no hiding their involvement from resequencing her memories alone.
This, however, was just spontaneous housekeeping.
It occurred to him that what he could truly gain out of this endeavor was access to the Exorcists’ central systems and the Paladins’ official lobbies.
If he could predict or manipulate the premier Non-Guild security apparatus of New Vultun–or even direct them to serve the fruition of his ends–then this was a dive worth embarking upon.
“Those are good builds,” Denton said, her voice sounding dreamlike mumbled back in the real. She was studying the Exorcists, he guessed. Judging their ghosts from the mem-data passed over by his cog-feed. “It’ll be hard for him to get past them without being noticed. They’re working two-by-two, each keeping the other covered as they sweep through.”

Off the side, he heard Draus snort and sensed the wry amusement leaking from her thoughtstuff. “Yeah. Sure. This is difficult for ‘em. Harder than your consangs back at Mirrorhead’s place.”
The Glaive took no offense but held to her opinion. “That was a surprise for all sides. What he’s facing now is an active scrying force–”

He reached out with his Sanguinity and constructed a link between him and the blood two levels down. Her voice droned off into incoherence and he regarded the opposition.
Twelve Specters in his vicinity. Twelve working as a well-oiled team, though not equal in ability.
Already, he noticed that some of the Exorcists were missing details from how they interfaced with the mem-data, their searches only running barely past the surface. They simulated the memories and dipped themselves in, but their dives were half-hearted at best, these Necros were unwilling to directly entangle themselves in Abrel’s emotions and thoughts. Some were even sloppy in how they approached scanning objects and artifacts.
As always, those would be the ones to exploit.
Without his canon-wrought speed, he still could have smuggled himself over into their Metas with a bit of preparation. With the power bestowed upon him by his Heaven, he needed to waste no such time on such trifling obstacles.
He jumped from artifact to artifact, using his Ghostjack to spoof copied recollections masking his ghosts as he shifted between all the bodies, objects, and phenomena that Abrel could still remember.
Each among the Exorcists wielded their Specters more like soldiers or drones, watching flanks and clearing sequences with each basking another with their perception while someone watched the memories past from them.
It was a way of doing things, but there remained a critical weakness in the chain of their process: The Necro doing the scrying itself.
When your foe could submerge in memories using pilfered assets, all it took was one wrong download to offer entry to an intruder or trauma most unwanted.
And when comparing their thoroughness and sequence-pace to the Incubi, the artistry in them remained wanting.
They showered him with their passing gaze as he pretended to be one of the aerial bioforms he fought after Rupturing the hypertube. As each integer of mem-data ticked and shifted, he attuned his ghosts to make the jump.
If he got anything wrong, his presence would be revealed. Considering the conditions of his failure, he doubted they would be able to dismantle the Auto-Seance he hid inside Abrel considering how deficient their diving was. Worst case more security was placed on her or some other form of prevention resulted. Maybe isolation, but they couldn’t keep her hidden forever.
The risks were more than acceptable.
Once again, he dove, pouring himself from the confines of a broken mind to another unsuspecting of his encroach.
As he made the crossover, he felt the process smooth. Simple. Almost reflexive.
His ability had grown not just thaumaturgically, but also skill-wise. He found himself more capable of interacting with emotions and concepts alien to him in the past, his study of the human animal a growing domain of knowledge.
The Exorcist he wriggled his way into was a bit better on the defensive end than she was at scrying. A dozen trap sequences lined her exterior thoughts like winding trenches filled with internal patrol Specters and protective mem-cons.
It amounted to nothing. Avo resequenced his Whisper using memories he copied over from one of her security phantasmics and tunneled through another layer of defenses by priming his adaptive wards using a similar trauma.
From there, it was a simple matter of carefully fording his way across.
On the other side, he feasted on her memories and grew bored of her almost instantly.
Immediately, he felt himself sheathed in an atmosphere rife with boredom. The mind assumed itself to conduct a routine operation rather than expecting a high-degree of threat.
Abrel’s mind had been broken, after all.
Who could have accessed such a nulled mind? Who could even infuse the drifting fragments with the memories needed to create a private tunnel?
The Exorcist’s name was Gennue Yullades, and she was forty-forty cycles of age. Other details flowed through him, revealing she lived in an Undercroft district tied to the No-Dragon’s Ark, and that her twin daughters were in charge of a novelty bio-splicing restaurant that was doing quite well.
Swimming up the stream of her cognition, he gazed out from her eyes and found her strapped into a gimbal next to a hundred other Exorcists hovering within similar mechanisms. Whatever they were in, it was military and it was loud. Wherever they were bound demanded a heavy cost in speed. Using his cog-feed, he detected two hundred more accretions within five miles and his Phys-Sim estimated they were all moving at a velocity just beyond 25 thousand miles per hour.
From Avo’s ghosts came a filtered memory, and through this easy enlightenment, he found himself aware that the Exorcists were in motion, heading for a destination masked even from them. Static lined a locus festooned to the far end of the vehicle. Another machine-based cognition directed things here. From Gennue’s mind, he absorbed the code name of their supposed destination and found it already known to him.
The Unwhere.
Flashes of the void passed and expanded in a small window to the side of his cognition. A strange flow-shaped machine pulsed intermittently with light before lancing out a beam of thin-white radiance into the distance.
And then the memory was gone–hidden behind walls of heavily resequenced encryptions–ones that even the Exorcist had to unlock manually.
Receding back into her inner memories, he divested her clean of useful mem-codes, and prepared her as another checkpoint in his campaign to install himself within the phantasmal infrastructure used by the Paladins and Exorcists.
He cracked her protected memories as well, but all he found were more personal details and a repeat of the scene from the void.
The full scope of the Unwhere remained denied to him.
As insurance, he also hid an Auto-Seance within her, but he doubted he would ever return to her mind. Still, it was best practice to have a secondary access point when shaping longer-term operations.
Finally, as he began to make his way toward the pulsing Auto-Seance at the heart of her palace made from transparent outlines, a strange phantasmic caught his attention, its sequence and make rare.
Most of what she had was useless or already surpassed on his end. From wards to trauma-patterns, she was his lesser. However, there came moments when one had something of a specific utility, its effects too useful to be regarded as a bauble, but not direct enough to serve as a first-response tool.
Regardless, Avo still thought it worthy of copying.
Placed next to her inactive Ghostjack, he found himself drawing mem-data out from an instrument that looked akin to a telescope the size of a megablock held in place by crude rocket pods.
DOWNLOADING PHANTASMIC SEQUENCE…
->DOWNLOADED
PHANTASMIC OBTAINED: [MEDIUM]
[MEDIUM] COG-CAP: 99 SEQUENCES (VARIABLE)
->STRUCTURE: “A ROCKET-POD BUILT AROUND AN ENORMOUS TELESCOPE SAILING UP INTO THE SKY, CHASING SOMETHING UNSEEN”
->FUNCTION: ALLOWS FOR A SIMULATED RECREATION OF ALL MEM-DATA AND PHANTASMAL SIGNATURES IMPRINTED ON AN INANIMATE OBJECT; MORE RECENT MEMORIES REQUIRE FEWER SEQUENCES TO SIMULATE, WHILE NETHER-BASED OCCURRENCES PAST THE PERIOD OF 99 HOURS WILL ONLY LOAD FRAGMENTED DETAILS AT BEST.
HOST AWARENESS: 5%
It took a bit of finesse to dampen the Exorcist’s attention, but he managed by modifying a diluted version of Abrel’s Separation and using it to crack her attention. While she suddenly found herself wondering why she felt safe and suspicious at the same time, he accessed the Auto-Seance she was using and began to pilfer the memory it was currently running.
Unlike most freelance Necros, the Exorcists and Paladins had a unique advantage in being officially associated with the Guilds and Voidwatch in particular. Again, this afforded them access to unique memories no one else possessed.
This particular combination had Avo descending into the soft fur of a monochromatic creature he spontaneously knew as a “panda” before rising on a blackened sea to hunt some pale leviathan known as a “Moby Dick” under the behest of peg-legged man. From there, the peg of the man shattered into seeds of green as he found himself lost in some kind of green thicket. The mem-data called the place the “Amazon” and a few stray notes of music accompanied it.
From there, the bushes parted, revealing the panda once more as the memory began anew.
It was far simpler than what he made for Draus–or any of his connections, really. But what they had were authentic memories of other places and things he had never encountered–that most people on Idheim hadn’t encountered.
Saving the configuration, he entered her Auto-Seance and saw himself ferried across the vastness of the Nether in a fraction of an instant. His ghost stuttered and his cog-feed glitched. Visual data was beginning to load a millisecond late and some of his commands weren’t traveling across.
Nether-lag was an inevitable consequence of running ghosts across multiple minds. His Meta had at most one more transition before his Necrojacking efficiency dipped below acceptable parameters.
Thankfully, that was a jump he didn’t need to make.
As he found himself released through another Auto-Seance, he drifted out into a massive Nether-based landscape that sprawled wider than entire districts. Like rivers lining the bed of an ocean, the lobby was awash in simulated structures and phantasmal activity.
But he barely had a moment to take anything in before a searing scythe of perception swept through the entire area like a traveling spotlight.
He cast his ghosts toward the nearest stable sequence he could find–but they didn’t respond. Again, he sent his command, and only with a staggered jolt did they start moving. They injected themselves back into the structure comprising the Auto-Seance they emerged from, and he hand them a link with the available sequences for additional stealth.
A full real-time second later, the wave of perception washed past like a thundering flood. Right then, if his mind hadn’t been hyper-accelerated, he would have been caught without any question or doubt.
Digging into the mem-data flowing through the Auto-Seance, he tried to get his bearings as to where he was. The information that flowed through his mind proved to be more than a little satisfying.
LOBBY DESIGNATION: [OVERSEC-C1]
->DESCRIPTION: CENTRAL GOVERNING LOBBY FOR CROSSOVER OPERATIONS BETWEEN PALADIN AND EXORCISTS
Avo embedded his own Auto-Seance and jacked out while quelling his reflexes in the same instant.
Time snapped back into pace.
Denton was still talking when his cognitive state stabilized. “...it’ll take more than just quick-jacking to get past their noti–”

“Jacked in,” Avo interrupted. “Got access to Oversec-C1. Mem-data tells me it should be important for Paladins. Exorcists.”

Draus broke into a smug grin as she lifted her eyebrows knowingly at Avo. “Takes some gettin’ used to, seein’ a rotlick like you do something subtle.”
Beside, Denton stopped talking as her eyes widened and then narrowed at his projected phantoms still trying to portray all that he had accomplished in the briefness of time.
A low whistle filled the room. “Hells, not far from the tree at all, huh?” Cas said. It wasn’t all respect in his tone; an undercurrent of wariness remained.
“Going back in,” Avo said. “Nether-lag sorted. Going to find where they’re taking Abrel.”

That, and he was curious just how much of their infrastructure he could subvert.
There are not many adversaries that can null one of our Strike Cells, and what happened down at Mazza’s Junction went far beyond that. I’ve experienced something like that only once.
Shard-2 went down first. We pulled the Scry-Cell out afterward and rotated “Swordfisher” in.
As for what followed…
My best estimation as to what happened with Mirror-Convex was the unknown managed to get access to their proxy via an Auto-Seance stored within a locus at our dead drop in Kaswarg’s Grove, room 5588.
I have yet to determine how the unknown managed to access the memories or through what means, but simulations suggest they might have used a routinely passing drone within the establishment as a jack-node to scry at our defenses.
Alternatively, they entered using Jhred Greatling, but considering his protections and general elusiveness, we do not think this to be a likely case as it would take an immense effort merely to access his mind.
From there, events grow jumbled. We believe we nullified two of the target's assets and unsequenced their mem-cons, but they continued operations from the mind of one “Aedon Chambers”--an individual rated at the upper echelons of Meta-instability when Swordfisher made their first approach.
Considering how many Rash-triggers and mem-cons there were within his mind, we dare say that whoever was using him as a node likely designed him to be a makeshift fortress, but the methodology is unlike anything I’ve ever seen.
The initial engagement between Swordfisher and the unknown resulted in Dagger-2 taking severe trauma damage but surviving thanks to the rapid response of Dagger-1 and Dagger-3. Conducting an efficient and commendable fighting retreat, they engaged and held off the unknown who was described as “releasing near-instant and unending torrents of trauma-patterns.”
Nonetheless, they managed to lead the initial target into one of our subverted minds before activating a null-trigger. We assumed the unknown nullified thereafter, but a second attack and Convex’s demise followed right after. Dagger-1 and Dagger-3 were also rendered mind-dead in the assault.
From reviewing the information we have gathered, I would like to formally have my suspicions stated for the record. It is my strongest opinion that the Low Masters were involved in the catastrophe at Mazza’s Junction and that they engineered the events behind the chaos engulfing Yuulden-Yang as well.
What’s more, I have a theory that this “Aedon Chambers” is either one of their acolytes, sleepers, or a direct sheathe for one of their numbers. Such an explanation would also serve to reveal why the man’s mind could sustain itself as he was.
I do not know what their aim is or why they decided to provoke open engagements with us, but what is certain is this–we must be prepared for war. We must harden our defenses. We must review each and every operation for leaks and flaws.
We all remembered what happened in those initial days of the Uprising. We all remembered how many we lost.
If the mind-priests of Noloth have returned seeking retribution at this very juncture, then I fear we must steel our wills for the worst possibilities–that they are working alongside Highflame as a twin-pronged assault to destabilize our assets while they configure the Rash for thaumaturgical adjustments.
-Mirror-Concave to the Council of Elders
13-7
Hunters in the Dark (II)
Oversec-C1 was closer to being an intersection than a fortress. A very defended, very mind-traffic-intensive intersection.
The information drawn from the lobby’s internal mem-data suggested that upward of three million personnel operated through its confines, their signatures marking them as Paladin or Exorcist or both.

Separating the two, however, was an obvious process, for some Heavens expressed themselves in ways that affected cognition, causing minds to leap from sequence to sequence or even occupy several different spots in the Nether at once.
Such delineations between the mundane and metaphysical also did well to denote the purpose of each profession. Paladins handled matters of a more thaumaturgic or heavyweight variety while the Exorcists responded to matters of lesser severity by ghosts and drones.
With this observed, Avo moved in avoidance of the Paladins, aware that he was not the only one in these depths with their skills magnified by the gifts of a canon, most skilled though he may be. It only took one bearing the impenetrability Abrel formerly possessed to see his infiltration undone.
The grid of Oversec-C1 itself, though the design was of the inspired variety, was an inward-facing onion drowned by patrolling Specters and false sequences leading off to trigger points and dormant mem-cons set to and mem-lock intruders. As many traps as there were, Avo thought them easy to spot for any Necro that has survived more than a few thousand dives. Such limitations made sense after all: It wouldn’t do for the Exorcists themselves to be lost and nulled just accessing their phantasmal offices.
Such precautions also revealed to him another truth: With how carefully the Exorcists entwined some of the fake recollection pathways over real ones–with the details of a single questionable integer in the mem-data or a minor memory asset that fell out of place amidst the backdrop of the broader artifacts comprising the memory–he knew they had been infiltrated before, and had gotten very good at leading inexperienced or arrogant Necrojacks into prepared nooses.
Avo had to commend them on all their effort. Perhaps he could even borrow a few concepts he learned from it over to the expansion of his own labyrinth. However, when faced with someone with his diving experience and capabilities, the best he could say was that they had enforced the lobby’s governing structures and security, but forgot the body still needed blood to circulate.
There was no true need for him to stalk his way across the deceptive environment laid before him.
Not when he could target such vulnerabilities as the Exorcists themselves.
Again, a system was only as secure as its weakest assets. To ride the data was to drift unseen. Short of misfortune delivering him before a truly observant and masterful rival in this lobby, his progress was slow but ensured.
Spoofing his way through patrolling Specters or unaware egos, he operated more akin to a plague than a thief, siphoning essential memories to broaden his avenues of access while also mapping out the totality of his present environment.
If Oversec-C1 was a world, it would be an inverted sphere with the bulk of its cognitive capacity split among six different superstructures layered out of interconnected phantasmics and sequence-made programs. Between each phantasmal construct were channels where the Exorcists could travel, and between the superstructures ran singular bridged segmented in layer and layers of checkpoints.
Those bearing the proper memories were allowed clearance and awareness of new offices and pathways nonexistent when perceived by their cohorts. Those without simply didn’t realize how vast the lobby they operated in was.
A spike of inspiration buried itself deep in the bedrock of Avo’s subconsciousness. The beast stirred and growled when it realized there was nothing for it to kill. The Exorcists had managed to apply the Incog to specific sequences as another layer of security against even themselves.
Such a thing was truly impressive. And something he would emulate for his own needs when the time came.
As things were, he needed to go about streamlining his processes.
Instead of actively venturing across the lobby from end to end, he sequenced mind-specific mem-cons for each of the Exorcists he compromised and had completed his desired tasks. Immediately, he emulated something he saw from the Exorcists, stashing viruses within false memories he injected into their phantasmics.
Within minutes, he found himself with multiple assets spreading across the entirety of the local network. From there, he picked the most senior of his compromised targets and rode his way up the ladder.
The vastness of their lobby’s simulated structure loomed outside of his notice. He operated with caution and care, and within the interface of his cog-feed, a new map was being painted into shape with each wave of mem-data that sang back to him. Advancement demanded patience, and as he inched his way past barrier after barrier, avoiding approaching Paladins and scurrying between Exorcists, he reached the nexus of his targeted superstructure with less than five real-time hours.
The unsimulated administrative phantasmic was a delta of memories formed into a construct, and it was filtering entire oceans of mem-data back over through the other mechanisms within the network, parsing the necessary from the noise.
Taking a moment to settle his thoughts, he examined the build of the final construct he was to usurp and prepared his ghosts accordingly. No two minds were alike, and in the same way, memories had their variations as well. He intended to leave his mark as an invisible yet indelible scar in this place–something to grant him access and made no noise.
Such a demand required the germination of a special seed, and he went about his great work while scrying through the offending phantasmic.
However, as he infused the administrative nodes with his perception, he felt the helix within him ring in alarm. It was then that he noticed the oddity in the memories he was beholding–something of scattered and dissonant emotions sequenced in memories to they didn’t belong.
For the second time, he felt his helix vibrate and Avo canceled the half-finished being sewn into shape upon the tip of his Ghostjack.
Low Masters. They had been here. He could feel the presence of their memories–sense the very stench of their cognition.
A worrying thought followed thereafter: If he could detect them even in circumspect conditions, could they do the same to him?
Such a consideration compelled him toward precaution.
His abilities had swelled immensely since his encounter with his extended “family,” but the thought of nulling other versions of his father–especially with them sharing so many similar features–remained unpalatable. Moreover, it was folly to consider his victory against any of them certain.
He knew they remained his better in the art despite his newfound advantages. He also recalled how many of them there were, and their access to the Hunger itself.
Whatever that thing could do.
Still, he had not dived this deep to come away with nothing.
Again, he considered the path forward, trauma-patterns at the ready in case anyone emerged from the Nether’s fathomless expanse seeking his nullification.
As the moment drew on and the silence stretched, Avo tentatively accessed the construct once more to better examine the handiwork left by his father’s “kin-selves.”
Their skill couldn’t be denied, for if it weren’t for the ringing of his helix as he was sweeping through the construct, he would have missed their handiwork entirely. To codify mem-data using make-shift memories attuned by incorrect bouts of emotion took a level of insight into humanity. Such was a feat Avo didn’t think himself capable of now, nor in the coming future so long as his cognition was to remain the same.
For all the traumatic and emphatic resilience invited by the psychopathy of his nature, a ghoul he remained, and so the subtlest notes of a human heart were of a frequency beyond his capability to capture.
He needed to consider potential countermeasures.
Interacting with the hidden sequences, he remained on guard, expecting an assault to come at any moment. Yet he was alone in a sea of thoughts, only fending against echoing leakages of thoughtstuff.
Scrying through the hidden recollections, Avo found himself faced with part of an Auto-Seance’s access point. He released it without making any alterations.
Part of him wanted to strike it with his mind, the urge response to building tension. He wanted to see the Low Masters finished, to prove his skill, to see himself rid of their shadow, to severe the will-blunting weight of Walton they bore in their image. Just as much, however, he wished to flee.
Facing his father in the Deep Bazaar had marked him. Changed him. Prepared him for this coming fight.
But he was not ready with respect to his focus or will. Not yet.
Killing an ideal was one thing. Facing countless other Necros on par with his father was to court neurological oblivion.

A decision followed. He stayed on the path of his plan but shifted the course of his actions.
As much as he wanted to access the system, he didn’t want to risk revealing himself to either the Low Masters or the Exorcists, and with how close he was to missing the work of his former masters, trying to subvert them held high odds of ending in failure and suffering.
With the Conflagration, he might be able to maim one of the Low Masters, but his instincts told him to put no stock in such hopes. Most Necros did not duel in the open. For everything he noticed on there part, he felt assured there were at least a hundred more hidden dangers he had yet to uncover.
The Nether was cobwebbed by threats unseen. But that didn’t mean he couldn’t have his own countermeasures.
Just like he learned to wield the personnel as vehicles, so too would he use them against his father’s forks. Moving away from the administrative phantasmic, he planted two Auto-Seances and connected one to a heavy cog-capped thoughtcast as a luring trap.
The other, he connected to a locus holding one of his dormant Eaters. If the time came, he would either use both the Exorcists and Low Masters against each other by drawing them all in using his flames.
Perhaps he could even implicate Ori-Thaum in the action.
A good plan, with the cost being some Exorcist minds at the most.
For now, he would leave this branch of Oversec-C1 untouched.

Transferring himself from the local sequences by cycling through memories with his Auto-Seance, he jumped across another seven Exorcists before one of them sank deep into the administrative core of the next superstructure over.
This time, he was pleased to discover the absence of the Low Masters’ touch. Of course, the pleasure didn’t last, for when he made his approach, he encountered another problem in the form of thoughtsuff spilling free from an unknown ego-dead Necro with a half-finished Auto-Seance built into the local administrative phantasmic.

Accessing the broken fragments of memory left of the dead Necro’s Meta, he found leaking details promising a hundred million imps for a backdoor into the Exorcist’s systems.
A flash of a sudden explosion told Avo all he needed to know about this unfortunate’s fate. They had died in the real while diving, the cause being something of a considerable explosive yield.
Sometimes, things just went poorly and you couldn’t do anything about it. That was why a big part of being a Necro was jacking from a secure location.
At the very least, there was already some phantasmal infrastructure in place for him to access. Resequencing it to clean out any mem-cons, he used its base and finished his own build. In the right corner of his right eye, new details began to boot across his cog-feed as his Metamind twinned the mem-data passing through this juncture of the Oversec with his internal systems.
When the root-access functions appeared, he knew he had control.
For the second time that day, he disconnected from the lobby and jacked out. The dive was done and he wasn’t going to stay in Low Master-infested waters for long. Not without an overwhelming advantage or a more detailed plan.
Disconnecting from the lobby for the second time that day, he surfaced back into his flesh and blinked pulsing strings of mem-data out from behind his eyes.
“Is it done?” Denton asked. The others were staring at his projected phantoms still playing his vicarity footage from framejack-accelerated hours ago. “Do you have access?”

He grunted as shook off the fog. Long sessions in the Nether took a while to settle from. “Yeah. Got access.” More phantoms flowed out of him with a thought, and the root-functions of the Oversec’s systems booted into a holo-haptic interface. “Mem-data’s all there. Hadn’t had a chance to dig but… system’s pretty congested. Low Masters are there. So are freelance necros. Pretty popular place.”

At the mention of “Low Masters” most of the faces in the room turned to look at him. Chambers, lacking context and sense, continued to watch Avo’s memories, studying how he forded his way across the inner defenses in the first Exorcist he hijacked.
Considering the emptiness that emanated from his mind, Avo thought Chambers was offering more practice to his facial muscles than his actual knowledge. The man wasn’t a Necro. It would take deep adjustments to his mind, habits, and personality to achieve such effects.

Or a proxy… That could increase effectiveness in a pinch as well.
Another project worth considering in the future.
“Low Masters?” Draus said. “The hells they doin’ in there?”

“Same thing he was, probably,” Cas said. “It’s pretty useful to know when the glassers are coming. And from where.”

“Glassers?” Kae asked.
“Exorcists. They designate and scalpel blocks compromised by the rash,” Cas explained. “And usually, they do that using a Heaven of light that partially glasses the structure as well.”

“Oh,” Kae said.
Swiping a hand over the interface, Denton brought up schematics and planetary maps dotted with several vertices. As she continued narrowing her search parameters, two mem-locked signatures remained.
One was ascending past orbit, marked with the string “ABHF-001.” Such was Abrel Grealting’s designation. The other, however, Avo didn’t know, but Denton’s interest was plain.
Uncharacteristically, smirking to herself, she opened files connected to mem-lock titled “ELD-MDR-001.”
A scene expanded from the perspective of someone pushing their way through a banquet of some kind. From the ceiling dolloped waxen chandeliers that oozed but refused to melt while fires licked at colored frescos dotting the tall ovular windows.

The visual feed froze then as the scene was redacted, but not before the vicarity’s audio lingered a few seconds longer. +I, Chief Paladin Samir Naeko, hereby invoke Article Nine against Council Elder Mwaba D’Rongo. I have with me verified mem-data and a witness of the third degree. All stay your hands from steel or face the Sage… Seriously? No one? Wow. Sensible party, Ambassador. I… a bit disappointed, not gonna lie. Say, where did Uthred go?+
The scene froze. The memories culminated.
Kae stared on as Denton turned over to regard her.
“Well,” Denton said, “the open arrived a lot sooner than I expected. I didn’t think Naeko would be so aggressive. Anticipate Ori-Thaum retaliation within a day.”


“You want me to set off the distraction?” Cas asked. That caught Avo and Draus attention at once. “It’s a bomb in the Tiers. Several bombs.” He lifted his arm out from his holocoat and the air around the strings connected to his arm shivered unnaturally. “Something to choke up the bureaucrats.”


“Just target D’Rongo’s personal detail later,” Denton said. “We need a way for Avo to get in without being distracted. There’s an opportunity here. To find out what she knows about Project Godshaper and what else the Council has planned. The things we can learn from her will be beyond value.”

She turned to Kae thereafter. “And we might just be able to offer you a final settlement for your account, Agnos Kusanade
Kae swallowed but found enough iron inside her nerves to muster a nod.
The Glaive’s eyes took on a gleam of anticipation as she looked back to Avo. “Well. It appears my esteemed superior is now in Paladin Custody. Do you think you can locate her exact mental position in the Nether and shape the necessary arrangements for a dialogue? I think we have some inquiries to make, and that Agnos Kusanade here deserves to have her grievances addressed.”
How many remember the dream? Jaus’ dream. Shit we were promised when they packed us into these big fucking megacities and told us the future was coming.
I remember seeing all those vids… drowning in vicarities of the first pioneers going up into the void. The ones where they push the Ruptures back from the dark and reclaim reality? I remember. I remember, doing it, but I can’t quite remember what was said.
When I was younger, I recited Jaus' pledge for the future. The promise of… Something about how we could all be our own gods, that we were to be the stewards of the last garden or something.
Something. That’s all it is now. Something. Just a blurry mess and I can’t seem to–
They’re making us forget. The FATED. The Guilds. They’re ashamed. Not afraid, ashamed. Not because they couldn’t live up to Jaus’ words, but because they’re afraid we might remember what we never got.
I can’t even remember what the Guilds want. What’s at the end of all this? And the worst thing about being alive right now is this thing isn’t anywhere near the end.
The last official census counted 674 billion people living inside the city. Even with the Rash, the refugees and migrants aren’t stopping. Things are bad out there in the Sunderwilds. I’ve heard things… The Fallwalkers–It’s all like a bad dream with the ‘Clads. The humanity just leaves you…
There are at least well over a trillion people on this planet. A trillion. And there were more before the Godsfall. Why? Why else could there be so many of us other than to die? Why else? This planet’s a death farm. That’s like the real fate of being here. And I hate it. I hate that I was born.
Ursdin called yesterday. Says mom’s worried about me. Says mom wants me to come back to the Tiers–come home. How the fuck can they just… live when this is happening. All they need to do is dive across the Nether and the things we’re doing to these people while we’re living our little lives–oh, Jaus, oh fuck I’m so fucking sorry…
…You know the most fucked up thing? I can’t end it. I can’t. Because if I do it, I just feed the killing all the same. Just another ghost inside a phantasmic. Another echo worshipping someone’s god.

I wish I wasn’t. I really wish I wasn’t.
-Mem-log of Cala Marlowe
13-8
The Enemies of My Enemy (I)
Council Elder D’Rongo was an easier target to jack into than Avo expected. Of course, he had backdoor access to the Exorcists’ network, and with that came Auto-Seances into each of the “elite” Necros assigned to watch her mind while she languished in detention, sealed away in a signal-based demiplane channeled from a Domain of Light.
He fed the details back over to the others in the dormitory.
Drawing information from the administrative node, Avo found both D’Rongo and Greatling to be in similar straits. They were installed within detention pods with a detail of personal Necrojacks to look over them while they jumped from point to point across the near void.
As it turned out, the Unwhere was not just a cute name–the description was quite literal. The Unwhere wasn’t a location, but a destination in perpetuity; an eternal voyage for all the prisoners trapped between channeled beams.
Though specifics about the Heaven behind the process remained redacted even for the Exorcists, the functionality was simple. Just past the upper atmosphere of New Vultun were approximately sixty-three thousand satellite-golems, each of which functioned like petals of starlight collapsing inward, going from blossoming to budding as their edges straightened into the long dark beyond as an intersection of narrow beams.
In a sense, these beams worked close to a hyper-accelerating pathway–something semblant to the lightrails of the hypertube. The only difference was that it seemed one stream of matter could be passed on into another.
As such, even if someone could intercept or anticipate where something was being delivered, it was nigh impossible to disrupt the system enough to collapse the interlacing channels of the ever-moving prison.

This would have been a problem if Avo was trying to free Elder D’Rongo from custody, but all he wanted to do was find her and link to her Meta so they could all have a little chat.
When the administrative node finally updated him on her next point of arrival in the vast chain of the Unwhere, he applied a few minutes of buffer so that Denton could do whatever preparations she needed to deal with the Elder’s personal protection detail when she arrived at the golem marked +SATILLITE-BURNSIDE-1273999.+
Avo jacked and lurched back into his flesh. His Echoheads tingled with how long he spent diving in the Nether. Clenching and unclenching his claws, he studied the others gathered across the room. Draus and Kae remained seated but turned toward him. Cas took up a spot next to the stairway leading down, and beside him, Denton and Chambers were staring intently at his phantoms.
Not far, Essus remained turned with his back facing the entire affair, his mind a dull-cloud of exhaustion.
“Got her,” Avo said. “Will be arriving soon. Have her estimated point of arrival in five minutes.” He jacked out briefly and eyed the Glaive. “Assuming you have a solution for the Incubi Strike Team nested in her Seance?”

Denton for her part seemed more eager than stressed about the prospect of facing the best of among her Guild.
Glaives were supposed to be in-field fast-jacking combat assets. Though the substance of their Nether-based education remained far superior compared to the curriculum offered by other Guilds, Avo never considered them actual Necrojacks. Not truly.
Having a Ghostjack didn’t make you a real Necro any more than having a gauss cannon made you a street squire. The lines of distinction were made by the mind-divers and those who only swam the surface.
Across from him, Avo watched the woman cast another static thought-clasped arrow toward destinations unseen. For all her cognitive-deviant impenetrability, he hadn’t seen her descend beyond the shallows of the Nether. To say he was curious as to what techniques or phantasmics she had prepared for this infiltration couldn’t fully convey the depths of his anticipation.
More and more did ignorance offend him. In what he didn’t know of his own art, of his Heavens, of how he could face and unmake his foes.
All this was flavor denied. All this prevented him from true comprehension of his own apotheosis.
“You shouldn't stare so hard,” Denton said. Her accretion rippled out and then collapsed back inward in a cascade of dotted droplets. “You might give off the impression you’re worried.”

He chuffed without any hint behind the noise. “Not worried. Interested. Want to see how your mind works.” He swept his gaze over to Sunrise as well, and the swarm hovering just beside him. “Will take a lot to settle the Incubi. They’ll be there.” He paused and considered that certainty some more. “Strange. Expected the Paladin to seal her more. Cut her off from the Nether entirely.”

“He couldn’t,” Denton said. Her lip twisted and she reconsidered her words. “Legally. Naeko can hold Elder D’Rongo based on the proof I sent to him, but he still needs to keep open channels of transparency to show that he isn’t twisting her mind or body in any way that can be used against the Guilds.”

Avo caught wisps of blonde hair bouncing in his periphery as Chambers turned to stare at Denton. “Wait, what? The fuck? He can put her ass in void prison but he can’t hurt her or none of that shit? How does that work?”

“Legally,” Denton explained. That was the entirety of her explanation.
Chambers scratched his nose. “So, wait, this elder person gets to keep all her protection, but has to go off with the Paladin guy I didn’t rash because they… agreed? Why? Why doesn’t she just… try to null him or just break out or something?”
Across the room, Cas scoffed as he leaned against the wall. “Besides their prison cells being beamed across the expanse of the void at the speed of light-seconds? Yeah. Total milk-run to stage that jailbreak.+

“Politics too,” Draus chimed in. Thankfully, that wasn’t the entirety of her explanation. “Paladins got the technical authority vested in them by Jaus and the Articles to hold all manner of half-strands. Guilders. Fallwalkers. FATED. Problem with technical and actual is a thing and a half though. It’s a godsdamned shitstorm when some mid-ranked Guilder gets picked up for starting a cult to a skin god or some dumb shit like that. It’s the kind of thing that usually ends up with a bunch of high-sphere “Fallwalkers” deliberately attacking Paladins and Exorcists for a time. Real suspicious like.”

The ex-enforcer was nodding along to the last part. “Yeah, I get the stuff at the end. That sounds like Syndicate shit to me.”

“They had to learn it from somebody,” Draus replied.
“Agnos Kusanade,” Denton said, “within the Elder’s mind include the orders and details behind what happened to you because of Project Godshaper. Some memories might pertain to your… confusion before the murder of Paladin Morrow. If you–”

“It happened.” The words left Kae’s mouth through clenched jaws and a flat glare. “I don’t think… I just want to know why?”

The Glaive regarded her for a moment and nodded. “You will.”

Avo found his focus narrowing more on Denton with each word that left her mouth. She was directing Kae toward a target for her ire–more than that, it was becoming clearer and clearer to him that Denton had orchestrated this entire affair.
Or at least shaped the conditions for it to be possible.
By giving over whatever memories she possessed to Naeko, she provoked the Chief Paladin to make his arrest and separated D’Rongo from direct assistance. In the same instant, she secured aid from Avo and the others by offering them an open hand. His mind jumped back again and he remembered her offering to let Naeko kill her as a moment of relief.
All deliberate actions. All meant to prime others for future actions.
He couldn’t even call her truly manipulative. She was just a gardener of opportunities, and vast were the fields in which she sowed her seeds…
“Avo,” she said, snapping him back to the present, “when we’re done talking to D'Rongo, use the Conflagration on her.”
A spike of startlement burrowed down past the root of his skull. “Want me to null her? Null all the Incubi hiding inside her mind? The Exorcists with her?”

She just stared. “No. No, that’s not going to be a straight ego-kill. You might get her and part of her chain, but she should have countermeasures. And I don’t want to risk the Conflagration leaking over across her Phylactery if she has some kind of Meta-activated suicide-switch.”

He considered what she meant, and the answer assumed its shape shortly thereafter. “Elder. She has access to the Conflagration too?”

A near-imperceptible nod came from Denton. “She'll keep it from spreading. What’s more important is the trail that follows. She won’t be hunting outside for her enemies, but inward. Who else would use it but Orithaum?”

Another seed then. Devious Glaive. Devious.
This one was cunning meat. The beast shuffled beneath his bones and he wondered if he would grow clever by killing her and internalizing her ghost. The temptation to find it made resistance that much harder.
Mem-data splashed across his right eye as the Elder’s arrival approached its final countdown. “She’ll be coming soon. Access my Meta on confirmation.”

“Acknowledged,” Denton said.
From the corner past her shoulder, Avo noticed Cas standing next to the wall and strumming at something unseen. Another mystery there. Crasser. More human. But another enigma to resolve in due time as well. At least he seemed softer flesh to digest than Denton.
Diving back across the sequences, he found himself hiding within the root functions of the golem as Exorcist Necros marked the next point in D’Rongo’s transition. Through the locus, he caught a sideways-cast crossfire of chatter between two of the Exorcists.
+So how long do you think we’re going to get to hold her for?+
+Well, I saw Naeko earlier and he was trying to whistle again, so we’re probably looking at hard evidence for some serious charges.+

+Like what? She’s an elder.+

+Well. I might’ve… taken a peek at some of the mem-data. She did something to an Agnos. Something pretty bad.+


+Shit.+


+Yeah.+

+You think the Incubi are–+

+Let’s just pretend they're listening and say no more, yeah?+
+Yeah.+


Back in the real, Avo couldn't help but grin. If only they knew what actually lurked in the deep next to them.
The arrival of the Elder was like a lightrail coming to a halt. Exorcist Necros loaded whatever ghosts and pre-packaged mem-data needed to monitor D’Rongo’s detention pod. A countdown commenced: five seconds until arrival. Five seconds until the stop.
Avo prepared himself for one final jump. “Denton. Three seconds.”

“Cas?” Denton said. “Are the sounds linked?”

The man laughed, and faintly, Avo heard a rhythmic thrumming begin to build over an undercurrent of twitching servos. “You gotta ask, Val?”


Three actions occurred at once in the following instant: Avo cast himself into D’Rongo’s pod using the sequences within the mem-data; Denton connected to him and released a torrent of ghosts through him as a conduit; something pulsed at the epicenter of D’Rongo’s accretion.
Avo didn’t have time to stop and consider what just happened as he felt himself slip past D’Rongo’s Quicksand wards while the memories Denton ejected out from inside him shot out, highlighting an interconnected sequence to travel down the Elder’s mind. As he sped down the pathways of her mind, he thought he noticed flickers of accretion building within her Auto-Seance before they all dissolved at the same time.
“The bombs went off. That’s a strike cell gone.” Cas laughed.
It took Avo a moment to parse what he just heard. Denton and Cas had been planning something behind the rest of them. Something that ensured the death of D’Rongo’s personal protection detail.
He didn’t know whether to growl his displeasure at the details hidden from him or laugh with bemusement at their success.
The Glaive still wasn’t a true Necro in his eyes, but her social and political engineering was no longer in doubt.
“What the hells just happened,” Chambers muttered.
“Some fuckery,” Draus deadpanned.
As Avo traveled across the designated sequences, he cast his Whisper out along alternative paths and found them beset with mem-cons and other phantasmal traps. What he had was a straight navigation to D’Rongo’s innermost memories without needing to scry his way forward–he wasn’t even sure how Denton managed to plan this one
All he knew was that he didn’t need to deal with the maze simulated by the Elder’s Meta–the depths of her mind were directly linked to his Meta now.


+We’re in,+ Avo said.
+Yeah,+ Denton said. +Good job.+ She disconnected from his mind momentarily and–to his surprise–he heard her laugh. “I won’t lie–I didn’t think we were going to get to do this but… sometimes the opportunity just presents itself.” He heard a shuffle of clothing. “Agnos Kusanade. You can jack in too now.”

“I… okay,” Kae breathed. “Okay.”
She didn’t follow immediately. Instead, it was Denton that jack back in first, and using Avo as a conduit, she connected herself directly to D’Rongo.
+Hello, Elder,+ Denton said. +We’d like to talk with you about Godshaper. And what you did to Agnos Kae Kusanade and Paladin Dawton Morrow. Tell me, do you still have his Soul?+
But when the reflexive notes of startlement broke within the Elder, what followed were only the bitter waters of disdain. +Oh, good. More of these questions. Haven’t you bothered me enough? I told you, by the Articles–+
+We’re not Paladins,+ Denton interrupted.
Avo could feel the sneer building on D’Rongo’s face. +No. Of course you’re not. You’re too good for that. And you killed my Incubi. All at once. All without the Exorcists noticing.+ Her features softened. A chuckle of genuine amusement filled her mind. +Ah. The answer is obvious. Welcome to my mind then, Priest of Noloth. Come to strike another bargain with me?+
+Why is my mind still whole? I know what you are, Priest. Mercy is not in your nature. Take your retribution. Strip me of my personhood. I do not fear you. I do not fear this. The great work will continue–+
+Hold on, I’m not here for that. I’ve seen your measure too, you know. You’re not a very good person, Mwaba, but you are loyal–Guild before life and all that. A real good Massist. Well, I got something to tell you that might offend those sensibilities. But I’ll trade that warning for something.+


+...You’re mad. You… you kill my personal guard, you breach the walls of my mind, and now you… you wish to strike a bargain?+
+Yes. Now, hold on: You haven’t heard my pitch–The Saintists have something that can cripple you Godclads entirely. Your Heavens. You will be very concerned when you hear this…+
+Do not mock me. You come into my–+ [TRANSFERRING MEM-DATA] +Oh… oh, gods.+
+I know. I don’t want this. And neither do you.+
+You could have… created this… as a ruse–a deception. No Agnos would accept such a commission–it is against the Articles!+

+Then follow the leads I gave you. Send cells to check. I don’t want to be right about this, but I am. So face it. And yeah, I am manipulating you, but I’m not lying. Sorry, Mwaba. Not exactly my dream either. +
+Do not use his words, slave…+
+Apologies to Jaus. Now, I have more concise details on the whos, whats, wheres, and whens, but I need something from you first.+
+What… What do you want in return? If this is true–if you have more to… oh, gods.+
+I understand that Ori-Thaum managed to sequence a mostly stable ego construct. I want to know how. In detail. A little in-house knowledge for salvation. I’m giving you a very good arrangement…+
-Elder D’Rongo and “Walton” (The Famine of “Defiance”)
13-9
The Enemies of My Enemy (II)
An uncharacteristic gasp of confusion came from Denton and Avo felt his paranoia spike.
+Another?+ Avo asked her. From the spillover thoughts she leaked, he already knew he wasn’t going to be getting an answer, but he had to ask. Simultaneously, his Whisper was accelerating across the crevices of D’Rongo’s memories.
He remembered what happened at Ox-Three with the Low Masters. He remembered how they almost entrapped him in that neighborhood of half-nulled minds. He remembered the ethereal weight of the Hungers and the countless multitudes of his father’s forks.
Cords of tension drew taut in his mind as he primed Secondhand Fatality for delivery, feeling the ghosts writhing upon the tip of his Ghostjack as he swept his perception across all the surrounding sequences.
Fast did self-perception shift in the fathoms of the Nether. Hours prior, he was an apex predator hidden within the flesh of memories unnoticed, spreading his touch like a plague.
Now, he cast his ghosts out with tentative apprehension, feeling for the fangs of hunters unseen, trying to guess if he lingered between the jaws of a trap.
+I don’t know anything about this,+ Denton said frankly. Directing her own Ghostjack she used him as a conduit. He scanned her trauma-pattern as the chain emerged from the obfuscating veil that was her thoughtstuff and slid through him like a conduit. He found it an instrument of feeble harm compared to the ego-breaking ruination which he bore.
Avo took them within the panoply of over a thousand exquisite phantasmics forming a serried crown-shaped city at the core of D’Rongo’s mind. He watched as her sequences slid over one another, his ghosts casting light on their mem-data and artifacts while weaving shapes from scenes in motion and comparing wavelengths of emotion.
Denton tried to assist him but she wasted effort against blockades of intense emotion and high-capacity memories while he compiled and cleared recollections by the measure of hours and days.
Her lacking efficiency portrayed the depths of her skill; Denton was a middling necro at best, but her worth was not constrained by her limitations of Necrotheurgy. The impenetrability of her mind itself painted her presence with merit. If they were to be beset upon, such an attribute would preserve her security far longer than her lacking abilities.
He considered fleeing then, but decided against it. He had escaped from the Low Masters before, and of the present, they all needed details and answers only the Elder could provide, and the opportunity provided by her vulnerability would not come easy again.
With the only consequence being mind-deaths that were curable through resurrection, they held to the course.
D’Rongo spoke again, her voice lit with heavy derision and scorn, cast from a clear throat strengthened by years of oration though high in note and soft in tone. +Why so quiet now, Priest of Defiance? You had the bigger tongue when last you came. Does something trouble you? Have you been consumed by shame or failure–unable to use my gift to create the perfect mind you so desired?+
Again, ignorance rang like a hollow bell from the core of Denton’s mind, but he found his orientation cured, if but slightly.
Defiance. Elder D’Rongo thought he was Walton. Such an outcome felt as if a rhyme, for though it was the second time another had assumed him to be his father, it again served his ends to maintain the facade.
More to his attention was the perfect mind she mentioned. Intuition told Avo it had something to do with him, for what else did Walton sacrifice his lives and efforts for? For who else did he leave what remained of his accumulated resources?
Drawing mem-data from her sequences, Avo constructed a replica of her facial features. The dimensions of D’Rongo’s skull resembled that of a tear-drop, and her eyes and lips flicked upward, her brows and hair sharpened. Her skin bore a more light hue than most Ori, making her seem more beige than olive, and her hair glinted auburn at the tips. Another intake of data told him these were all ancestral features she inherited and augmented instead of aesthetic modifications installed post-birth.
That, combined with her flat emotional affect and humming scorn told him threats and phantasmally-inflicted harm held no sway over her will. He could twist her. He could break her. He could even warp her mind until nothing of her current self remained.
But as she was now, Mwaba D’Rongo was a pillar within, if not a pillar without, undaunted by unspoken threats and uninflicted harm.
+There are several things I want to talk about–+ he began.
+More schemes, priest?+ She said, cutting his thoughts off with her own. With words cut out with rapier-sharp precision, the ghosts carrying them bubbling with hatred. +You are the one who pointed me to the Agnos and her team–gave me the memories to ensure her capture was made simple. Why these questions? You already know what I did–you know better than I! Is this just to taunt me now? Is that what this is?+
With each word, Avo felt Walton’s culpability grow and the path to the conspiracy surrounding Project Godshaper narrow.
A building tensity followed Denton’s thoughts. +I didn’t know he was the one who–these are new details. Let me talk to her–+

+No,+ Avo said. +You help. You advise. I talk. Don’t know things about Walton. Didn’t know he was called Defiance. I talk. Not letting our avatars leak over anyway. Can keep things flexible if we need to.+
And she responded with a cast of quick acceptance. No arguments. No debate. Valerie Denton wasn’t much a Necro, but with each passing interaction, he found himself evermore certain she was quite the accomplished fixer.
+New details have transpired,+ Avo said. +Changes. I need to see if you’re up to date. Compare memories.+
+Break up your words more,+ Denton said. +You sound too much like yourself.+
He growled in annoyance. She didn’t respond. Didn’t matter–she was right.
As he was about to continue, he felt Kae’s Meta connect to his and he passed a packet of mem-data over to her ghosts.
Just then, a new chain of ghosts connected to Avo, and a string of data flowing across his cog-feed told him Kae was entering the dive with them. She rode forth on waves of gut-shredding anxiety as her thoughtstuff dripped leaking litanies of self-assurance over into his inner mind. +Okay… okay. I can do this. Come on, Kae. We survived–we lived through–+
He cast a package of mem-data bearing all she needed to know thus far, but didn’t expect her to crash against his ghosts with a choking halt, lurching to a stop as her mind overflowed with details from his. Instantly, he felt the weight of her focus dissipate.
+Cognitive overload,+ Denton said, her voice trailing off with a hint of a sigh. +You keep talking. I’m going to help her. The data’s filling her mind.+
He offered her a single grunt before expanding his wavelength to encompass D’Rongo again. Kae would survive. And if she didn’t, she would resurrect. Among the greatest virtues of being a Godclads was the impermanence of harm.
+The Paladins… know about your involvement,+ Avo said, trying to work a punctuated pause between the cadence of his speech. It felt unnatural to his mind. Hard, like dragging his instincts against gravel. He kept trying. +Arrested you because the information was leaked. I want to know–+
+If I mentioned you?+ D’Rongo replied, an indignant scoff forming the end of her sentence. +And how would that serve? You are a worm, and each time we sever you, the pieces grow. Only fire can cure your like.+ His simulation of her face bore a smile now. +Fire.+
He couldn’t help but mirror her expression–he knew what she hinted at, but she remained ignorant to his seizure of the Conflagration.
Avo had never been one for poetry, but there was a delectability to karmic harm.
+Here, then,+ D’Rongo said. In the distant shadow of her simulated mindscape, her Ghostjack pulsed and a dozen sequences ignited across her mind. Ghosts flowed through the roots of her foundational memories and concentrated the mem-data he requested within the confines of a dozen ghosts.
As he drew the data in, he constructed a new locus from his blood to serve as their housing module. He couldn’t trust her mind, so he wouldn’t. If this was to be venom, he would not be the one to suffer its effects.
+Bold. You’re not even using your Specters to scan the contents this time. I cannot tell if you’re truly this arrogant or so skilled in the art of the dreaming that you think so lowly of the Ori.+ Her face flattened to a cold glare. +It could be filled with traumas. Fifty ghosts are enough to dint a ward. Or contain an Auto-Seance.+
Her taunts were ineffectual at best, but between her words hid deliberate intent. She wanted him to mistrust her. She wanted him paranoid. She wanted him off-balance.
D’Rongo was a fool. If it wouldn’t work on him, it would be less than effective on Walton. Even past the halcyon days of idealization, the skill of his father stood more testament than tall tale.
He reached out with his Heaven as he grasped down into the pool of blood, and this time, he felt the Woundshaper surge through his veins as she sobered fully from the changes made to her canoncity, her being exhaling with bone-shuddering laughter.
“Ah, master… My mind clears… What wondrous change to the foundations of my structure you have made. Know that you and the architect are beloved for this.”
At the mention of her title, he felt Kae’s perception flicker for an instant before she went back to wrestling the cache of memories in order.
“Perhaps we should reach further. Remake these walls from shape to particle and remold something from its wanting layout to our own liking? I feel the expanse of your fire yawn wide. Let the mule free. Grant the space to me. I intend to stretch my reach far.”
As if he were to accentuate her words, he felt groping tendrils sprout from the borders of his sanguinity before he curtailed their advance.
“No,” Avo said. “We experiment later.”
A faint pulse of acquiescent disappointment followed. “So be it.”
The instances of his existence stretched as haemokinetic cords fused into place between his ceramite-plated flesh and the pool on the four-level from ebbing particulates dancing through the air.
Around him, the winds murmured with a laughing neigh. “It is not so freeing to be rooted in another’s will sister. You have my empathy.”
The Woundshaper coiled inward like a compressed spring. “And you will see the skies clenched in iron and blood if you persist in this mockery, mule. What pattern did you sup from to find such steel in your words? Do you wish to imitate the domains of a proper god now?”
“I only want to watch a fallen goddess spit hollow appreciations to the tyrant that encompasses her, deluding herself into thinking they are of a union, of a league.”
The Heaven of Blood responded by constructing a blood-made puppet of the Galeslither and a strangely underdressed man and proceeded to mime an act that would undoubtedly trigger an outbreak in the real.
A low chuff of disdain entered the Galeslither’s response. “Now I see the caliber of your sacrifices–savages and brutes all.”
The argument escalated from there. Avo gritted his focus and turned his attention to scanning through D’Rongo’s intelligence. Upon sinking a second stream of ghosts into his new locus, he found her phantasmal carriers surprisingly bare of defense and offering little but pure and unsequenced memories.
He made a few major adjustments to the structures of her ghosts, and when no hidden artifacts or data was exposed, he wondered if she truly surrendered to him because of acceptant futility or if there was a greater game at play here.
Apprehensively, he dissolved his cord, and time resumed its pace. With a thought, he cast the details of her scry over to Denton–and kept the information limited this time.
+No protections,+ he responded. +No encryptions either. Very compliant.+
A spike whipped the yolk of her thoughts high. +Speak what you have to say and let’s be finished. Push harder, and I’ll see myself nulled. You’re vermin, priest. Everything you are, everything you do, everything you have made, are making, and will make is an insult to all that was sacrificed and the deeds of Jaus. You piercing my mind like this? Shameful. But I will not be toyed with.+


There was no lie in her words. Her threat of suicide wasn’t idle speech but a promise.
The beast cackled beneath his skin, whispering at him from the basest parts of his mind, wondering how many indignities it would take for her to solve her own equation, and if such harm could be carried over to Abrel to further develop the cocktail of torment that was her mind.
Avo shook himself free. For the first time in what felt like a lasting eternity, he triggered a long-dormant phantasmic nested in his own mind and reinforced it with a deposit of ghosts.
The Morality-Injector plunged down into the ethereal fabric of his manifested cognition and both his Metamind and the physical organ it was anchored to shuddered. Shame, disgust, and self-revilement blasted down against the screaming beast as each of its impulses rose and shattered against an equal but opposite counter emotion.
He thought the abandonment of the phantasmic after his nulling of Walton’s node in the Deep Bazaar an act of self-emancipation. If so, then this was an expression of enforced discipline.
The tinted instincts pulling him toward brutality and violence softened. With amplified clarity, he spoke to D’Rongo anew.
+I’m sorry,+ he began. +I didn’t meant to insult you. It was just… astonishment. Can you do me a favor?+
The Elder slowed in thought as she considered his words. +Speak.+
+I want to hear from you our arrangements. What I had you do–what you did to Kae Kusanade and what you know about Project Godshaper. I want to you tell me why you felt compelled to do all these things, and I want you to say them in your own words. I need data filtered through your cognition to compare with the memories you gave.+
Her face tightened into an uncertain sneer. +Is this a trick?+
+Yes,+ he admitted, speaking while cycling old memories of Walton through his mind to refresh himself on how the man acted. Lessons on Necrotheurgy mixed with lessons about the city and life in general. He had no idea to know how much of this was real, but to uncover the acts of his father and why the Ori were so willing to attack Kae, the memories served as guidance and fuel both.
+Start with Godshaper,+ he prompted. +I want to know why it mattered so much to you. Ignore what I told you before. Just give the details over to me from your understanding.+
A long pause followed. D’Rongo swallowed.
+You breached my mind nearly a year ago. You breached my mind and showed me such terrible things.+

+Tell me what I showed you.+
+Godshaper,+ she answered. +You showed me how Highflame was going to use the Rash to eradicate us by altering its lore. And you showed me the one who was going to help them make it all possible–Kae Kusanade.+
And just as she finished that word, Kae cleared her Metamind and hissed out a seething thought. +You… lying, murderous fucking sow! I planned–I was trying to heal the Heaven!+
And with this Heaven, I divorce us from the atrocities of the past and wed us to the future we are to become. I hope that through the promise of this Ark we all form new bridges, new communities, and from our joining bear the seeds of unity to grow beyond the soil of our discord.
Don’t give up on hate. Not even I can overlook the breeding torment of our past. But where we old and scarred will falter, our children and the ones after will be unburdened—to be and love and live unfettered. To experience a world of bliss and prosperity we should have always given them.
The future is uncertain. Veiled with vaster challenges than I could ever fathom, but we do not stand alone. Our long-lost ancestors have found us at the end of a star-spanning odyssey across eons of harsh suffering.
To my family in the void, I bid you a formal welcome to Idheim. See us unblemished, shaped by past horrors, slaves to cruel gods, butchers of shared ancestry, and beyond. See us more than what we could be, but who our children could be.
The Age of the Pantheons has branded us indelibly in sinew and spirit, but from these ashes rise humanity—gods no more! Let us take from their powers but shed no more blood, entrapped in their prisons of eternal continuum. Let us use their designs to let life flourish. And let us gaze upon this Heaven again, and see it as our dowry to existence.
For too long we have hurt each other. For too long we have bred ourselves like cattle and farmed our foes for sacrifices. From today forth I give choice to all in Idheim–the choice to love unfettered as you will and to sire based only on the conception of virtue and reciprocity.
This is my final desire–my ultimate dream–that we can rise and mend fractures of existence as people and not cold gods! Humans, with human hearts and human minds directing ascendant administrators devoid of any addiction to worship save that which is offered in necessity and wisdom.
To be clad in matrimony beneath these towers of rising virtue, building with the canons of change!
-Jaus Avandaer, The Arks Arisen
13-10
The Shattered Dream (I)
Avo caught the ghosts carrying Kae’s words before they could flow out from his mind and spill into D’Rongo.
+I was trying to fix its canons! To stabilize it–+ The rage flowed from the Agnos as D’Rongo spoke in the backdrop, twin lines of dialogue clashing as Avo directed his focus to deal with Kae first.
+I know. Believe you–+

+It’s not about fucking believing me, it’s about you!+ Kae seethed. +You and her and your… cultist… false-fucking-god worshipping stupid… half-strand of a father! This was for you! All for you! My mind–Dawton’s life–the rash! My team and all the people who were with us! All ruined to make… a fucking ghoul!+
The beast screeched a request for him to shred her mind clean from his for this disrespect. He thought of merely breaking her focus using that which he gained from Abrel.
D’Rongo’s following words removed the necessity of such an action.+...for the sake of winning the war.+ Kae’s perception slipped from him, slashing past to peer at the Elder. +I didn’t believe you about the Agnos. Kae Kusanade. A daughter of Clan Yinga; an orphan failed by her clan and Guild both, swearing her life to the Agnosi; a much-praised pupil and a bright mind even among her peers.+
The Elder's voice tightened with discomfort. +It wasn’t until you showed me what she was making with those… Imitators that I turned from my heart.+ Discomfort morphed into hatred–the sheer scorn of the emotion burning like a kindred flame to Kae’s. +I despise you, priest. I despise you for reminding me of this transgression–my crime against the Articles, against a daughter of the Ori.+ A beat passed. The hatred turned inward. +And I hate you for being truthful.+
The revelation of D’Rongo’s unwitting deed did not move Kae from her anger, but the fires of her rage were caged by returning control, and silence took her as her ghosts shook like a vessel rocking on waves of tumult.
D’Rongo continued. +The Imitators… I could have never imagined such a thing with my own mind. It is… beyond us. A sign of the voiders’ higher knowledge.+ The praise was accompanied by a sneer. +And our weakness. With something that could change the Heavens to suit the needs of our greatest enemy… such a thing could not be allowed.+
+There were non-affiliated observers,+ Kae said, as Denton’s ghosts drifted close. +The… the Paladins. The Exorcists. Voidwatch too. They would have never allowed my creation to be weaponized. It was only something meant to mend…+
+You didn’t trust Voidwatch?+ Avo cast a thought out to D’Rongo. +Didn’t think they could ensure commission parameters per the agreements between the Guilds?+
The woman’s face settled into a cold glare. +How could they, seeing that they engineered these “Imitators” specifically for our pacification?+
Her words captured the totality of his attention, and within him, a burgeoning curiosity began to burn.
+Poor helpless voiders,+ D’Rongo spoke in a mocking whine. +To be so powerful yet hapless against the existence-shifting touch of the Heavens—to live at the mercy we, their downtrodden, ignorant, savage cousins bestow.+
She drew near, the ghosts conveying the closeness of her scorn. +But I’ve seen the lives they live, their days filled with succulence and wanton salaciousness while we, the beacon of their salvation, wither and bleed and offer death upon death to ensure their protections. And yet, here they are, kingmakers unable to embody their role, spectators to a war trapped in a deadlock.+
A soft laugh rife with dismay followed. +Or so we believed. Do you know what I uncovered with my Incubi after you revealed the existence of the Imitators to me? After you caught sight of their existence through those Fallwalkers? How much effort it took? I created a specialized cell of experts capable of diving beneath the mind of one of their machine consciousnesses without revealing themselves. Oh, it took aid from Omnitech, and the favors I had to trade with those capricious cultists were almost too severe.+
Denton let out a verbalization of surprise that was almost a curse. +Aegis is not going to like this. I didn’t think this was real…+ He felt something pulse in the back of her mind. Something was happening within the confines of her Meta.

His ghosts tight-linked to the Glaive alone. +You didn’t know.+
+No,+ Denton said. +Keep guiding her. This conversation has already paid significant dividends, but she knows more.+
Unaware of the second conversation happening alongside her own, the Elder spoke on, her ghost-channeled perception boring down upon Avo like a glaring spotlight. +Voidwatch themselves didn’t create these “Imitators?” No. They engineered it. Did you know this, priest? It is a fascinating thing–an organism even that baffles their sciences almost as much as it does our thaumaturgy. Even their god-machines could be mirrored. And to find it drifting so close to us–and taken by a cadre of poor organized Fallwalkers… makes me curious if this was by design.+
Her words bore insinuations unspoken, but the weight of her mind leaned against him. It was clear she thought Walton had to do with the arrangements behind the theft of the Imitators itself–and such a thing could very well be true.
An evolution manifested within Avo, altering the posthumorous relationship he had with his father. Gratitude and confusion were now joined with building annoyance.
The former High Priest of Noloth might have left much in the way of power and resources behind for his son, but with that came old debts and new grudges.
Family was an ugly thing.
+Now, now,+ Avo said, fighting to keep the awkwardness out of his ghosts as he tuned their voices to bear a steady tone. +You can accuse me directly. I can take it.+
D’Rongo coughed a disbelieving laugh. +Oh, yes, priest, I am surely concerned with hurting your feelings. No. I will not give you this credit. I don’t think even you are this capable–seeing how impenetrable the voiders are to us without our more… misguided allies.+
She was withholding proper due from Walton out of spite, and to Avo’s rising ire, he felt the denial of his father’s rightful praise a gnawing disrespect.
+So, you believe the Imitators were going to be used by Voidwatch to make us more… agreeable to them. What about the stuff that happened afterward. What about Project Godshaper, and the point behind setting Kae Kusanade’s mind on fire?+
The insides of the Elder’s mind tightened with outrage. +You know why we burned her mind, you fork-tongued creature. Because of you! You used the lives of my Glaives–massacred cells of Incubi–all so we could deliver your prize to you. Had us open the way to your schemes as we engaged with Highflame.+ She laughed humorlessly. +I must ask: were you expecting it, then? Our Incubi taking hold of her mind and having her eliminate Paladin Morrow using the organism she was trying to culture?+

A choked whimper of anguish came from Kae, emotions tearing through her like a saw. Self-loathing, hate, shame, violation, horror. Yet, at the end of it all, what drove her emotions to a sudden halt was a memory–a realized inconsistency. +I… I didn’t want to do it? I didn’t know…+
Again, choice denied carved pain deep into the bedrock of one’s ego. Even now, after her first resurrection, Kae still clung to the hurt, the torment clinging to her still even in her “optimal reversion.”
She wanted this on some level, but the wants of being were caprious and shaped by feedback.
It hurt to remember, but it would cost too much to forget.
Whoever Morrow was, she continued to choose the grief of what she was forced to inflict upon him in place of his absence in her memories.
With peace of mind came minimal pain, but sometimes people preferred substance despite the sting.
+You know the rest,+ D’Rongo sighed. +The attack was foiled. Fortuitously. Almost like it was fated to happen–guided by unseen hands.+ A spite-filled silence followed. As they departed another golem, Avo felt the Elder’s resentment soften. +You have asked me many questions today. Can I ask you one of my own?+
A second passed. Avo cast his ghosts at Denton, seeking proper advice.
+Let her,+ Denton responded. +I’m curious about what she wants to know.+
+Yes,+ Avo answered, filtering the uncertainty he felt as he delivered his message.
The elder acknowledged his agreement with a wry note of suspicion. +Why are you pretending to be the priest?+
His insides emptied out. A yawning chasm stretched through him as Avo felt Denton push her ghosts closer to his.
+Tear her near-term memories out of her,+ Denton said. +We can do this again–+
+It’s the citrus,+ D’Rongo interrupted. +The smell. Your ghosts are sending mem-data bearing a facsimile to the real thing but… this is not how it would taste to me. Or any other human for that matter.+
Back in the real, Avo hissed a low note of displeasure.
Of course. The fault was in a detail. The smallest, most inconsequential detail. He was a ghoul, and thus, where his olfactory senses were sharper, so too did he experience the taste of things differently.
What he used to spoof his disguise was similar enough. But closeness didn’t not beget proper symmetry.
This was his mistake–his failing.
One he would learn to correct shortly.
Avo made to dive into D’Rongo’s recent memories before she spoke again. +It’s the only reason why I told you so much. Curiosity. I thought you were him when you first intruded, but now that I had my time with you… you’re very much like him, but not quite. There is a… coldness to your ghosts. Something missing in the facets that he had. Less vulnerable. Less humane. You will not tell me who you are, but I would like to continue our bargain.+


+No,+ Avo said. +No bargain.+ He cast out his ghosts–
+Are you the one who attacked the Greatling girl, then? Part of the chaos in the Warrens today?+ Again, the tension inside him twisted hard. He felt a smile spread across her face. +It’s so nice to properly meet you, Acolyte of Defiance. I’m curious, is Aedon Chambers your real name.+
And the spring of tension slipped, releasing a surfeit of surprise.
+What?+ Denton said.
+I–yes,+ Avo said, his use of Chambers more instinct than rationale. The moment was so absurd, so unexpect that he found his thoughts slippery, unwilling to linger long enough for him to decide on a proper course of action. +How… did you know?+

She suddenly felt very pleased with herself. Part of Avo wanted to reveal the truth, if only to drive her deeper into the throes of bitterness. He kept up the new charade despite himself as she oozed smugness. +We both have our means. You really should have kept yourself out of the limelight. As much as your master disgusts me, he was wise enough to keep himself from attention.+
+I…+ Avo trailed off. He turned to Denton for advice, but found himself offered the mental equivalent of a shrug.
+What’s even happening,+ Kae muttered, her turmoil temporarily interrupted.
+So,+ D’Rongo said. +You must also be the one that stole Project Dichotomy before Highflame could finally auction the Frame off to another one of their butchers?+

A line of text ran through his cog-feed as a Ghostlink request from Chambers filled his mind. With an acknowledgment, the ex-enforcer tumbled in, mind reeling like a whirlwind of chaos. +Why the fuck does she think I’m involved with this? What did you do, Avo?+

+I… don’t know.+ And that was the honest truth of it.
There were certainly witnesses that placed Chambers and Essus on the scene, but if that was…
Avo paused. Avo thought back to an earlier point, back when they were trying to kill Mirrorhead. He had used Chambers’ mind as a access point. The Incubi knew that as a certain truth.
Could they have assumed Chambers was a disciple of sorts to Walton? Or the Low Masters as a whole?

The insanity of such a prospect made him chuckle. Then laugh. It was the type of amusement one got from witnessing a colossally wrong deduction assumed to be truth–an accidental conspiracy theory used in place of a stranger fiction.
+Alright,+ Avo said, too bemused not to continue playing along. He could resequence D’Rongo’s mind later if this all went south. With Chambers present, perhaps they could continue extracting the details they needed after all. +You got me.+

+There’s no shame in this,+ D’Rongo said. +Though I will see you dead for the lives of my guards.+

He grunted. +Doubt you have the traumas needed to settle me.+
Chambers blanched. +Stop! What are you doing–+
+So,+ D’Rongo said. +Using me to glean all these details… your master never told them to you?+


+No,+ Avo said. +He was always a…+ He knew what he had to say. He had the words, he just needed to speak them. +...A half-strand.+

+Ah,+ D’Rongo said. +Already, I like you more. Tell me: Do you know where he took the Agnos? Her life is valuable. We just want her back to fix our mistake. If you arrange for her return, I can even see to your induction into our ranks. You have the skills–think of what you can achieve if you could jack with every need met–all the phantasmics you want. And ghosts. No lag. A FATE-Skein as well.+
+Wait, hold on,+ Chambers said, the sensation of him licking his lips bleeding over. +That’s a pretty good deal. I think we should take this. I can be your inside man for Ori-Thaum.+

+Already have Denton,+ Avo said.
+She’s… not a man?+


+I suppose that is true,+ Denton deadpanned. +As long as I don’t get any new mods.+
+Nonetheless,+ D’Rongo said, +You must be desperate to attempt such a play. Releasing the information–having the Paladin arrest me just to arrange this talk… Well played, but we both know I do not fear the end. And though you might have the Agnos, she will be no use to either of us if she doesn’t finish her work.+
+And what’s that?+
+Restoring the Heaven of Love and turning it against our foes.+ Her voice fell low. +And turning the Arks against our enemies.+
“Once upon a time, there were Nine pantheons. Nine pantheons for the nine great and terrible tribes who carried with them twelve different histories. In each history–”


“What happens before?”

“Hm?”
“Before the once upon a time? What happens before then?”
“...That’s a good question. Might be something better answered by your mother, but I believe the clearest answer is that it’s of dubious canonicity.”

“Dubious?”

“Yes. It’s a terrifying thing.”

“Why?”

“Because the story which we tell of time past might just change who we are now–ah, it’s too complicated–”

“No. I understand. If the past is different, the present has to be different too… Dad, why are you staring at me?”

“Nothing. You got the wit in you, Veylis. You know that?”

“Yes.”

[Loud guffaw] “And the confidence too.”

“Mother says ‘fear and cowardice are for those I feed to my glaive. Do not remind me of them, my girl.’”
“...”

“Story!”

“Okay, alright. So, as years passed and the gods warred to rule humanity, each of them began building a throne for their scripture. Many of the things they wrote about never were, but if they won… If their thrones grew taller and they claimed the others–”

“Are the thrones the Arks?”

“...Yes. How did you–”

“Mother took me to one. She showed me the worlds inside them and told me they were all lies, but their lies were like seeds and they could grow into something real if… if the “soils of time were settled.”
“...I’m going to need to talk with her about taking you to these places without telling me.”

“She calls it ‘character building.’”
“More ‘character-ending’ sometimes, I’m afraid.”

“Mother will protect me.”
“Yeah. Yeah, she will.”

“Daddy, why are the stories different? The voiders say we were all from the same place once. Why are the stories different?”

“...Because of want. Because the gods want to be more–to take up more of reality. Because everyone wants to win and win, and never lose and always be happy. Because within every person is a dream for paradise to silence the fears inside and light joys with higher form of fire. One that never stops burning. We’re afraid. But we also dream of being more. That’s what I think makes us human. We are the marriage between base impulse and heightened conception. From the former we flee, and into the arms of the latter we run.”
“So why do you make it sound so bad.”

“Because there can’t be more than one paradise, my heart.”
“Not even between you and mom?”

“No. Not between me and you. I love your mother more than my words can express, but we are very different people in our hearts. And you will be too. All too often, a paradise for one is a hell for someone else.”
“But wouldn’t you be happy forever?”

“Only reactively. The heart is a fickle thing, Veylis. There are things in the world that can change how you feel.”

“Like the ghosts in mother’s sword?”

“Yes. They can make you happy. Change your mind. Hurt you. But with what we know, I don’t think it’s… right.”

“Right?”

“Existence is about more than us. We have a responsibility to other people. Just like I have a responsibility to you and your mother.”

“But then what about the gods? Why don’t they care?”

“Because they are more like things than people. They care for nothing but eating and growing. And eventually, they will be nothing because everything will be them, and all of reality will bleed into itself and they will lose the ability to separate themselves from the pattern.”

“But what if the rules are changed? What if someone took their thrones and unified their history? What if someone established a single dream where everyone can be happy?”

“That would take many more lives. The human cost would be immense. And it would break us of our individuality.”


“But not afterward… right? It only needs to be done once.”
[Pause. Laughter] “Oh, there’s too much of your mother in you, my little pup.”
-+FATHER+, Mem-log of Veylis Avadaer, High Seraph of Highflame
13-11
The Shattered Dream (II)
+The Arks?+ Avo asked. +I don’t understand.+
And with the way Kae and Denton’s minds were ringing with confusion, neither did they. For Chambers, the ringing was constant and unchanged.
Laughter flourished from D’Rongo’s palace and the waters of her thoughts grew pungent with cruel amusement. +Oh. Oh, poor pitiful acolyte. Did your master neglect to mention some things to you? Or maybe… he didn’t know either.+
The elder’s tone had risen from bitter animosity into sing-song mockery, gloating as she perceived his ignorance to be a reversal of power that favored her.
Avo was unimpressed. +Know about the Ladder.+
Alarm shuddered out from Denton’s mind and D’Rongo’s mirth ran dry.
+Avo…+ Denton warned, an edge of heavy concern entering her thoughts.
+I’ll tear the memories from her,+ Avo replied without regarding the “Glaive.” If that was even what she truly was. +The elder won’t remember this conversation. Won’t remember much of anything.+
Denton sighed. +Make sure of it.+
+You know that Flayed Ladder,+ D’Rongo said. The words emerged more as statements uttered to oneself than a question offered to another. +I didn’t expect… Defiance to be such a fool.+ Her bitterness, banished but moments earlier, returned in force as her simulated expression devolved into a scowl. +Another player, then. A new contender at the great game of the Guilds. You taunt danger beyond your reckoning, Acolyte Chambers.+
Considering she had no real idea who he actually was, he found her judgment laughable.
+Tell me about them. The dangers.+ Avo felt his own amusement piqued when he sensed the building unease rising within Chambers, who watched the proceedings in rapt fascination, still befuddled about how he was deemed an Acolyte of the Low Masters.
Say what you will about Chambers, the man was proving remarkably useful as a reusable test dummy and now as a decoy against attention.
To this end, the mem-data flowing through D’Rongo’s mind suggested there was little point in removing her memories of Chambers; he had already been deemed a suspect by Ori-Thaum itself. Short of killing the elder, nothing would change regarding Chambers’ status as a fugitive of a fallen cult.
D’Rongo broke her contemplative silence with a scoff and continued. +Well. I suppose you at least know how things will end. Let me ask you a question: What do you think the Arks are?+
He drew the answers from the memories flowing through her. His Metamind screened and digested the mem-data as he examined the contents, but to his growing fascination, he found these memories encrypted and scrambled in sensory and visual details.
And as he reached back into the well that was D’Rongo’s inner mind, his ghosts returned bare of bounty and with a new revelation. Even she lacked access to this knowledge. These were sealed details, even within the confines of her cognition.
+Did you try to steal the answers from me? No. That’s not how this will work. That’s not how this will work because it’s not a stable memory, Acolyte. The Arks are more than an anchor for the Elysiums. They’re more than just a pillar of climbing paradises and the physical symbols of a Guild's power and influence. They contain… histories to be.+
+Histories?+ Avo asked.
+Tell me, what do you remember of Noloth’s past?+


The question didn’t phase him. The answer was–and has always been–almost nothing.

At the end of the Fourth Guild War, the Great Eight didn’t just butcher a few billion ghouls out of existence and shatter what remained of the Noloth loyalists, they also banished the Low Masters from the city proper. Thereafter, by ghost or genocide, they purged the public’s memories of the vestigial empire.
But thereafter, he also recalled Walton removing memories of his “Low Master” so that he would remember his time during the war. Another deliberate modification on the part of his father.
In some fashion, Noloth wasn’t too unlike Jhred Greatling’s mother. Comparatively, the former’s redaction wasn’t nearly as total as the latter, and little of the culture and language lingered within Avo.
Not that he found any use for it. Besides other ghouls and perhaps the Low Masters, he doubted anyone still remembered how to speak the low or high tongues of the old empire.
And it was preferable that way, seeing how bothered the Hungers were at their cultural defilement.
+You removed everything worth remembering,+ Avo responded, spacing his reply to make it seem like he was troubled. Pretending to be as unburdened and carefree as Walton was hard, but leading D’Rongo on with easy. The elder was an easier opponent when she was drunk on her pride. +I suppose this is the part you tell me something I don’t know. Shame me by asking why I’m ignorant of my own scripture.+
Her voice pitched high and she sang out in a sharp laugh. +No. No, that’s not why I’m going to mock you. I’m going to mock you for losing your history to us. Your Ark. The seat of your pantheons and the spine of your power. And the Ladder to our future.+
That aligned several minds along the tracks of curiosity.
+Noloth had an Ark,+ Denton said, sounding surprised.
+Noloth was among the pantheons?+ Kae asked, her mind aching with emptiness as she strained to recall a specific Nolothi ontologic she worked on.
+I’m lost about what the fuck’s happening, but yeah, Noloth has a whatsit?+ Chambers said, out of a want to be included.
+Indeed. We took your past. We pillaged your would-be-histories and when we were done, we burned away all the parts we didn’t desire.+ D’Rongo settled into cold chuckles of laughter. +Did you hear me? You have no more past-to-be.+
The confusion returned. Why was she describing the past in terms of the future?
+Kae,+ Avo said, +sounds like thaumaturgy. You know what she’s talking about?+

+It’s not a specific Heaven, I think,+ she said, sounding increasingly uncertain. +And also! Heavens! They can’t be about the past. Can’t be centered around the past. We… we can’t go back in time because the past is… is destroyed. It’s gone! Everything is… it’s utter oblivion.+

+I don’t think she’s talking about records either,+ Denton added. +That doesn’t matter. Not in this context. Not when an Ark is concerned.+ Something inside her tightened in annoyance, and Avo thought the feeling almost familiar.
+It would’ve been useful if Zein was here.+
Ah. More than familiar then. Zein was useful for matters that concerned the nebulous complexities of the future or time itself. But Zein was also Zein.
+She’d be useful for herself,+ Avo said. +We’d all suffer.+
Denton hummed a soft tone of agreement. +True. I got the feeling she might’ve been keeping us all in the dark about this.+


+Maybe it's like a giant sequence of connected memories or some‌ shit,+ Chambers said. +Then, they blast the city with mem-cons and we call get confused about what’s what.+


Slowly, Avo turned his attention over to the half-strand. +What?+
The ex-enforcer choked. +I–uh–I mean, yeah, it’s kinda stupid, but I’m just trying to–+

+Sequence of memories…+ Avo trailed off as he considered the implications behind it. A concept kindled like a candle being lit in his mind. Chronology. History. Lore. These things were tied–intrinsic to the creation of Heavens. What if this was something similar?
+Nothing to say, Chambers?+ D’Rongo jabbed, utterly certain of the harm she dealt in her words while absolutely ignorant to the brainstorm that was happening on the other side of the link. +A pity. A shame. What good it would have done you to win the war? But alas, while we seized the reins of our own agency and rose to be free, you elected to remain little more than cattle and slaves.+
The actual Aedon Chambers just stared on. +Fuck me, is this FATED sow giving us the “freedom” speech?+
+I don’t understand what this has to do with me,+ Kae said, the words darting out from between clenched teeth. +Avo. Enough! We’re just fucking… no more humoring her. Tear the memories from her mind. We’ll dig through it ourselves. I’m tired of listening to her–I’m tired of hearing about how other people get to fuck my lif–+
+Do you see the dangers that Project Godshaper posed to us now?+ D’Rongo interrupted. All other minds fell silent. +Do you? It wasn’t the rash that scared us. We can fight the Golds in the Rupture. We have deployable assets there. We cannot, however, allow them to use this pnemuaphage to alter its canons. And we cannot let it affect unified history.+
Distracted again from her flaring anger, Kae’s mind accelerated as she considered the elder’s words. +Avo. Ask her if she’s afraid the Imitators would affect the canons. All the canons.+
He did as she asked, and the elder responded with derision.
+This has more to do than a single Heaven, you fool. This concerns the ultimate victory at the end–something your master clearly kept from you.+ She intoned a wordless note as she considered him. +Did you kill him? Why are you missing so many pieces?+
+Yes,+ Avo said, speaking the technical truth. +Keep talking.+
She obeyed. +Every Heaven has a place and a culture behind it. Every place has a history and a people. And from this come who we are. We, and all the ones we clash with. It is a dialect that ripples out across reality. It shapes all that was–all that could be.+ A brief beat seized her as she sighed. +Sometimes, I wonder if Jaus truly could have found a solution for our divergent pasts. If only his murderous thug of a daughter hadn’t fed him to the Ladder.+
+What did she do?+ Avo asked. +How does the Flayed Ladder work? The Arks?+
+There is no Ladder without the Arks,+ D’Rongo replied. +And not without us. The Arks are… a creation of critical mass. When enough gods exist to form a pantheon, and the Domain portfolio of the pantheon–+

+--Grows broad enough to embody most facets of reality,+ Kae breathed. +Like… like having all the components to make something that resembles a second world.+

+Or a whole new one,+ Denton suggested.
+In two years' time, this will all be over,+ D’Rongo said. +The Ladder will return across the span of time as the unifying centerpiece of our world–Jaus’ final masterpiece and the prize of ultimate salvation.+

+Then why fight?+ Avo asked. The beast coiled in muted outrage at such a question. +Why. If everything can be saved–+

+You aren’t listening. Nothing will be saved–everything will be rewritten.+ D’Rongo lapsed into silence. +That is why the war should be won beforehand. Not after. If the Saintists are defeated before the day of re-emergence, then can focus on the others, and then I can focus on reaching the final floor.+

+The others.+ Avo understood. +You’re going to turn on your allies as well. Does Ori-Thaum–+

+We all know,+ D’Rongo said. +There could be no other way about this. There cannot be two paradises. There can’t even be a shared interpretation between two people.+ Her ego shuddered. +And if one is torn of will and want… I have seen what the tower does to the uncertain, the wavering. It tries to fulfill all desires, no matter how contradictory.+
The shudder grew into a quiver. +Oh, but poor Jaus. He was too good a man to suffer such a wretched fate. I will see him saved and spared of eternal torment if we win.+
+If you win,+ Avo asked.
The elder laughed. +I cannot win. It’s impossible. I am an Council Elder of Ori-Thaum. I have foresworn my right to bear the privilege of a Liminal Frame, and only a fully intact Nous within a Frame rise the ladders of resurrection.+ D’Rongo’s ghosts closed in, all of them undulating at him like beckoning fingers. +One. If two ascend at the same time–well, imagine two absolute rulers of reality trying to dictator the rules at the end. Who is to be canon? What history is to be true? And what happens if there is a conflict between their thoughts?+

+One,+ Avo said. +Or all aligned to one. Project Godshaper…+

+Yes,+ D’Rongo agreed. +We couldn’t let Highflame have its power. There is too much at stake for the war to carry over as things are. Or if a multiplicity of conditions are true. We are trying to create a new paradise, not paradoxical ruination.+


+That’s why you’re still hunting for Agnos Kusanade,+ he said, guiding her. +You need her to stop the Imitators if they spread.+

+That is the lowest of our hopes. Yes. I–+

A squeal of alarm sounded in the back of Avo’s mind. His cog-feed flashed multiple warnings as someone triggered his high thoughtwave tripwire back in Oversec-C1. Additional indicators followed. Someone jacked into one of his subverted Exorcists. Another was accessing the Auto-Seance he built into the administrative node.
And then, across the Unwhere network, he felt a presence that wasn’t quite his own or an Exorcist brush the inner confines of Abrel Greatling’s mind.
Unknown Necros were moving through the system from multiple angles. The only uncertainty that remained was if they were Incubi responding to save their elder, hired jackers who didn’t know they were about to get nulled, or the Low Masters steering toward inevitable confrontation.
The conversation with Elder D’Rongo wasn’t done, but the threats were a priority.
There were hunters in the deep, and soon he was to be among them.
+Oversec C1 is compromised,+ Avo said, casting the thoughts and mem-data over to his allies. +Time for you all to jack out.+
+What?+ Kae said, her voice spiking in outrage. +No. We’re not done. She’s–+

+Going to tear her memories clean,+ Avo said. +Also going to put an Auto-Seance in her mind. You’ll get your pain. Easy promise.+

Denton’s mind offered a sour response to his offer. +Are you staying?+

He turned off his Morality Injector. The beast clawed its way out from his throbbing skull as bloodlust filled him across skin, sinew, and soul. +Going to greet the other intruders. Want to see what they’re like. Learn what they want.+
She only offered mute acknowledgment to the sadistic hunger edging his thoughts. +Alright. Tell me if you leak any memories into the Nether.+


Avo didn’t bother responding. Her lack of confidence in him was insulting at this point. +Kae. If I get nulled you kill me.+
The Agnos’ mind reeled back, stunned by his request.
He stuck a claw into her wound. +My father sold you like you were FATELESS to suffer. You are discussed like a tool. Traded. Only valued for what you know. And all this is partially because of me. Should get that gun you used earlier. Should get Draus to teach you how in case I go mind-dead.+
At his prodding, her disposition hardened with returning hatred blended with uncertainty. +I liked the feeling of your spear more, honestly.+


That surprised him. +...Use it then.+
+I…+ Her chest was a knot of frustration, confusion, and conflict. She was mad. She was confused. She was unfulfilled. She was thinking. +I want to talk to you. When you come out.+
He agreed. +We all need to talk when I’m done.+
Denton and Kae jacked out. Their ghosts vanished before his perception.
Beside him, Chambers lingered.
+Why are you still here,+ Avo asked.
+Well,+ Chambers said, awkwardly. +Maybe you could use backup. A partner! We could be like team here. Avo and Cha–+ Avo cast a pack of jumbled mem-data into the man. Chambers’ voice twisted into a note of raw surprise. +What the f–+

Avo tore the mem-data back out. +Too late. Didn’t sequence fast enough. Not good. Not a Necro. Useless. Jack out.+
A trickle of genuine hurt slipped free from Chambers. +Jaus, consang, you didn’t need to say all that. Just tell me to fuck off or something.+
His ghosts blinked and faded as well.
That just left two.
Two within D’Rongo’s mindscape.
Avo turned his attention back to her as he prepared to access his Ghostjack. He was going to leave a backdoor in her as well, but before that, he wanted to indulge himself.
All the talking he suffered was worth a reward…
+You were wrong,+ Avo said, spearing his ghosts directly into D’Rongo’s being.
Her confusion spiked high like a mountain erupting free from soil. +Oh. And what was I wrong about?+

He peeled away all the modifications and disguises behind his ghost before manifesting his physical shell as an avatar. As he came into form before a congress of leering ghosts, he also cast another packet of mem-data directly into her mind, stinging her with the truth of his Frame–of all that he knew.
D’Rongo’s mind rattled and fissured. Cracks ran up through her serried palace. The sneer behind her word faded as she gasped, dread and panic both rising within her. +I… how could this… y-you…+


+Yes,+ Avo said, enjoying the moment before he tore these memories out from her. +Not Chambers. Not Walton. Me.+

+You… you can’t be real–your kind can’t… oh, gods it's inside you–+ Her being went frigid and stiff as he sank his ghosts into her memories. +No, wait! I propose a new bargain! I have things you want–+

+And I will take them from you,+ Avo said. +After you forget. I will take from you. Knowledge. Phantasmics. Suffering. I will take everything from you. And I will burn away all the parts I don’t desire.+
+No, wait! Wait–+


He fired his reflexes and tore his ghost back. Her memories snapped loose, thoughtstuff spilling free as her mind rose into a maddened scream of absolute dread.
Within a few seconds, she would remember nothing of this conversation; but within those few seconds, all she would know was him.
+ATTENTION+
PRIORITY 0 ALERT INBOUND:
Incubus,
You are to suspend all ongoing operations immediately. A situation of paramount priority has transpired.
As of thirty seconds ago, Council Elder Mwaba D’Rongo’s shadow-detail was neutralized. The cause behind their deaths is under investigation, but details remain unclear.
Presently, the elder’s mind is undefended.
You have been chosen as Talon-1 for your skill in Deep-Nether operations and distinguishing valor along with other members of high-priority flash-response strike cells. With the urgent situation at hand, we ask you to devote your efforts once more and ensure the elder’s security.
Your next proxy is being dead-dropped now. The full briefing will be included within its sequences–all phantasmics are green for this operation.
It is preferable that you do not alert the Paladins or Exorcists to your presence, but the elder is priority 0. Repeat: Elder Mwaba D’Rongo is priority 0.
We cannot stress the severity of risk presented by a compromise on such a level. The elder’s mental sanctity must be preserved, but should you find confirmation of memory-based tampering of any nature, then engage based on the guidelines of Code Winter.
Burn everything. Let nothing of the leakage escape. Redact all details of your presence thereafter.
Your proxy has arrived.
We place our confidence in you in leading your fellow Incubi.

Form your cells. Ascertain the situation. Respond accordingly. You have in-dive command.
Unity is Destiny.
-Incubi Priority Alert
13-12
The Silent War (I)
D’Rongo’s ego-rending pain was succulence. When paired with the imbibement of her deepest memories and the sequences to her phylactery it was made ever-sweeter. Her pain was a delight to feel, while her secrets offered new fathoms to delve into.
And then came the matter of her phantasmics…
Though most of what she had to offer was meant to support administrative work and the traumas chambered in her Ghostjack were a disappointment, there was a singular construct that clutched the totality of Avo’s attention.
Its design was that of a smashed mirror frame, but through the opening once occupied by a pane of glass was a murky pathway into what appeared to be a reflected palace. He had found it hidden between two larger-capacity phantasmics, and it took him a moment to understand what he had discovered.
Phylacteries were strange things. Avo had interacted with them before–or at least the memories that Walton granted him recalled such affairs. Regardless, their functionality went beyond the merely cognitive and into thaumaturgic. Though there were sequences involved in its creation, the phantasmal end was merely an anchor to another vessel.
If D’Rongo were to be murdered, the phantasmic would activate in an instant and inject her being over through to the other side.
It was due to that very reason Avo didn’t manipulate the construct overmuch. It wouldn’t do to have her be shunted over along with him. There had been a few cases of Necros being caught within the minds of Regulars as they shunted out from their present bodies. What followed could be described as two minds being put through a metaphysical blender–their cognitive selves mangled into each other, leaving their Essence spilling out adrift where they were.
Such was also a common Incubi tactic to ensure the final deaths of each Regular they killed during the war.
Still, it was a useful structure, and he would find the time to siphon the fullness of its nature.
With his Frame, he wouldn’t be able to use it himself, but that didn’t mean there weren’t other uses it could be applied to. Hence, he buried his own ghosts around its base sequences, hiding them deep in the soil of D’Rongo’s subconscious functions to form his Auto-Seance when the time came. Perhaps the Incubi would be able to uncover his machinations if they were through enough, but in such a case, he would simply choke off the pathway of her escape to ensure her final demise.
Skill was a constant endeavor if one wished to be a Necro, but preparation was an absolute necessity.

Cast a master into an unfamiliar mind without time nor reference and watch them fall to an opponent that would typically be regarded as far lesser.
With his final adjustments made, he stopped invoking his Haemokinesis and the dilation of time settled back to normalcy.
Shifting back out to the borders of her thoughtstuff, he studied the elder’s mindscape as her consciousness inched back from the torpor and incoherence he infused within her.
She would remember the beginning of their conversation. She would suspect Walton of having breached the walls of her mind again. Sowing such a seed of deception would grant a logical track for her ire to progress while keeping him an unknown.
The amusing matter of Chambers being an acolyte was unsalvagable. Ori-Thaum had clearly been misled by misattributions and ostensible details without fully grasping what was moving behind the scenes. It would serve him better anyway–the more eyes he could shift over to Chambers in engagements, the less would be on him.
That kept his window of attack wide and the threats he needed to manage low.
This also meant that he probably needed to get Chambers a second cycler at some point.
If the man was going to be bait, his reusability might as well be ensured.
Thoughtstuff rife with murky confusion brushed against Avo like surf crashing upon a beach. The veil of psychosis lifted from D’Rongo slowly, and she arose from her pseudo-slumber with feelings of hatred already primed.
Her disgust with his father was pure and immediate, and when her mind called out for him with insults and taunts demanding that he show himself, Avo knew his task here to be done.
Now, it was time for a shift in mindset. Things were about the get dynamic, and the beast chuffed inside him as his predatory urges filled his being.
There were unknown Necros infesting Oversec C1. He wasn’t sure who they were, but freeing D’Rongo from his direct presence would soon let him confirm if the Incubi were involved.
Without his suppression, it likely wouldn’t take long before a new cell shifted over into her thoughts to secure her sequences. If such a situation came to be, he thought it best that he make himself sparse. No sense in undoing all his circumspect preparations for a bout of amusement.
Besides, he had another mind to secure–other theaters of thought to fight and engage across Oversec C1.
So far, the lobby of Oversec C1 remained quiet, and the Exorcists and Paladins rode the circuitry of memories ignorant to infiltrators roaming between the details and beneath the surging currents of thougthstuff.
This was to be a silent war. An engagement of utmost secrecy for the ones that groped through the shadows of recollection seeking to fulfill objectives unknown and bound for destinations unseen.
Such ignorance offended Avo, and so he would seek his initial remedy by returning to the compromised mind of Abrel Greatling.
If nothing else, there would be nothing connecting a potential engagement in her shattered palace to the missing pieces within D’Rongo’s memories.
***
+Shard-1, what’s her condition?+
Shard-1 let out a low sigh as she wondered the best way to express how shattered the Godclad’s mind was. +She’s completely cracked. The Paladins kept her from resurrecting, and the kill switch inside her heart isn’t firing. Judging from her biometrics, something managed to inflict enough internal damage on her to pulp some of her organs but not kill her completely.+
+Sounds like whoever hit her did it deliberately. I’m gonna take a peek at her short-terms again. See if I missed anything there.+
Shard-2 was proving to be a bit of a conspiracy theorist. She’d put up with that type for a priority-zero emergency dive like this, but even with a proxy separating them from their private thoughts, she could tell that the other Incubus wasn’t very neat in the way she did things.
More than once she caught the other woman casting her ghosts where they didn’t need to go. A perverse voyeurism seemed to bleed over from her personal habits into the proxy, and she had a habit of jumping from one sequence to another.
There was little rhythm or order to her method, which made her extreme competence all the more baffling.
Shard-2 proved herself capable of reassembling fragmented pieces of cognition with extreme ease. It was as if she was the one who inflicted the damage herself.
They were very different, but the priority alert system likely selected and assigned the two of them to serve in this dive because of it.
Still, Shard-1 wasn’t sure if she wanted this partnership to become a long-term thing. She’d make her feedback known after this was over, and tell the Concaves that–
+Wh-oa! Shard-1, I think I found something,+ With the sing-song way Shard-2 sang those words, she must’ve found something juicy.
+Summary,+ Shard-1 replied, not wanting to break from her own review. She checked her cog-feed to see the condition of the Awareness Pylons she imprinted into the surrounding sequences to warn her about encroaching Exorcists. So far, they were situated in the girl’s accretion.
Getting past them was a chore and a half. It begrudged her to admit it, but these Exorcists were quality enough that they couldn’t be underestimated. They still had too many flaws–were affected by too much empathic pull to be the best divers, but as a unit, they were more than sufficient against most in the city.
Most.
It was a respectable achievement. No one was really better than the Incubi.
+Shard-1… come on,+ Shard-2 said. +You just gotta see this… whoever sequenced it is… well, they got gleam, I’ll tell you that.+
Shard-1 just repeated what she said earlier. +Summary.+
+You’re going to want to see–+

+You’re very unprofessional, you know that?+
She could practically sense the smirk on Shard-2’s face when she said that. +Well. Only one of us found something so far. You act professional, but hey, one of us as got to get results.+
Shard-1 stopped what she was doing. This sow–this bitch–wanted to go there? Fine. Very well. She would see just what kind of “results” she managed to find. And if she was disappointed, she would let Shard-2 know about it. In exquisite detail. As a post-dive report.
Arriving at the specific memory instance Shard-2 occupied, she settled her thoughts and cast her ghosts into the sequence, preparing herself for disappointment at a waste of time. Injecting herself into the memory, she found herself as a loose collection of mem-data alongside Shard-2, who was busy examining some kind of flying drone.
The rest of the scene was pure chaos. A hypertube had Ruptured, cracking existence in a spread of fissuring brightness. Uncountable quantities of drones occupied the sky while prismatic pyramids scarred the horizon with geometric exhaust.
She approached the memory artifact that Shard-2 was examining and found herself unable to tell what had fascinated her fellow Incubi so.
+What’s wrong with it?+


+Nothing!+ Shard-2 cheered.
Shard-1 looked through her inventory of traumas and wondered if she could concoct an in-depth enough story to mask a deliberate Silver-on-Silver nulling. +Explain. Now.+
+It’s really, really well done,+ Shard-2 said. +I almost missed it. Me! Whoever hid this is pure fucking nova. I’d love to meet–+

+Shard-2, I’m out of patience. Tell me what I’m looking for.+
She caught a whiff of wry amusement coming from her temporary partner. +Oh. You still don’t see it, do you?+
Shard-1’s annoyance deepened. +See what?+
+Abrel Greatling didn’t notice this drone. This modification was added later. Whoever built this had all the details right. All of them, but something about the emotional wavelengths recorded in the sequence is… off a bit. Too much surprise.+

+She could have been surprised by a drone–+

+Look at the mem-data. It’s too much. Now–+

The sequence of memories they dwelled in suddenly shuddered. Shard-2 went silent. Shard-1 checked her pylons again but found the Exorcists even further away than before.
It wasn’t them.
Beside them, the drone flickered and smeared into a collage of mem-data, stretching out to encompass both future and past developments within the sequence–and beyond.
+It’s connecting to other artifacts and sequences,+ Shard-2 said, sounding almost breathless. +Oh, that’s sneaky. Tricky bastard built an Auto-Seance access point across a bunch of interconnected memories.+
Shard-1 loaded a trauma into her Ghostjack. Standard fatality pattern–this one taken from the mind of someone forced to shoot themselves after their new transplanted arm was jacked by a rival Necro. A bitter tang preceded final oblivion, and despair went just before nothingness.
It held enough hurt to fracture even a Phalanx–though getting through all the layers would take some time.
Whoever was about to enter Abrel’s mind wasn’t going to be intact for very long. She just needed to make this quiet so the Exoricsts–
+Wait!+ For the first time, Shard-2 sounded alarmed. +I have them. They just spawned it–oh, fuck me they’re moving fas–shit, Shard-1 get ready–+

The thought-carrying ghosts of the other Incubi barely reached her when she felt it.
Someone had accessed their sequence from another. The mem-data was being altered–small changes and specific artifacts–additions. Someone was spoofing beneath existing structures within the scenes, someone was–
An ocean of trauma struck, burrowing through her wards in a coruscating barrage. A spike of pain flashed through her mind and suddenly, her thoughts grew slippery. In the periphery of her fading awareness, she sensed Shard-2 cast out her own traumas before she herself was struck dozen times in return.
Thoughtstuff and severed memories spurted free from her like intestines tumbling out of an opened stomach, but against all odds, Shard-2 managed to jack out.
Shard-1 laughed.
She was wrong. Shard-2 really was something.
Her damage was severe, though. She hoped her partner would make it. She hoped–
Something reached into her mind, invasive ghosts licking down the rents of her damaged cognition. She was supposed to do something if her mind was compromised. She was supposed to… she was supposed…
She could remember. It was hard to think. Getting harder to–
The intruder spoke then, his voice a deep sibilant whisper tinged with hunger and brutality. +Good Necro. Found it. Going to have to move the phantasmic now.+
+I…I…+ she tried to respond.
+Command can’t hear you. I removed the connection. Don’t think your companion will survive either. Tasted some of her damage. Inner memories. Pieces of her ego are missing.+
An unwilling sadness filled Shard-1. She didn’t know Shard-2 before this day. She didn’t even like her. But in these last moments, she wanted the other Incubus to live, for someone to make it out.
+Yes,+ the intruder spoke. +Good hurt. Still human. Too human.+
+Wha–what–+

+Not going to kill you,+ he said. She could feel a burning excitement build inside of him.
+Why… why?+
+Have another use for you. Another means of… damage.+
She felt his ghosts twist the fabric of her memories then. In the real, her body twitched and spasmed. The world was cold on one end but hot on the other. Something was like… a frozen flame in her skull, and it was… familiar to her somehow? She couldn’t remember–her thoughts weren’t even hers anymore.
+Another one of yours will come soon. They will extract you. Need you to make this delivery for me. Want to see how they react.+ He released a slow chuffing laugh. +Want to see if they start thinking Highflame has your weapon.+

More of her mental interior was remolded. She let out a sigh and stopped trying to think.
She just needed to do what he wanted. That was good. She wanted to do what he wanted.
This was her choice.
***
It would not be the Incubus’ choice to set off the Conflagration when she arrived back with her cell, but his instead.

He had to admit–their awareness impressed and intimidated him. To find his Auto-Seance from such minutiae meant he needed to take more extreme means to hide his intrusions. If he didn’t have a secondary entry point via Geunne the Exorcist, it would have been an ugly encroach.
The Attention Pylons, meanwhile, were less than a joke with their limited detection capabilities. He didn’t even bother downloading any of their sequences.
Across his Auto-Seance, D’Rongo’s mind still seemed silent of any other cognitions but her own. How odd they were proceeding with more caution accessing their own elder than dealing a Highflame Godclad.
With Shard-1 subverted, he looked through the memories stored on her proxy and found himself more than a little annoyed.
Proxies were like wearing another mind with specific built-in blinders. He wasn’t going to find out where she lived or other private accounts, but she would serve as a poisoned piece of bait all the same.
A strike cell would come for her soon, and when they extracted her from Abrel’s mind, he fully intended to set off the Conflagration he had connected.
If nothing else, this would spike paranoia within Ori-Thaum.
They were the only ones with such a weapon. But for it to be used against them… and after some of their Incubi accessed a Gold’s mind no less.
Well, that would create the most interesting theories.
Avo was tired of other people creating problems for him. He wanted to start doing things the other way.
After remodifying the sequences and artifacts he was using in Abrel’s mind, waited a moment to ensure the placidity of her broken palace.
+Thanks for being useful,+ Avo whispered.
Abrel moaned something animalistic.
Jumping down into Oversec C1 thereafter, he found himself dancing from mind to mind, seeking disturbances in the undertow as he made his way closer and closer to where he sensed the Low Masters.
He approached methodically and carefully, using his Whisper while hiding between memories.
And just as well.
As he slipped through a logistical phantasmic, he found the first signs of another engagement in the form of six broken Incubi lingering near the high-capacity thoughtwave trap he left behind earlier while passing through.
With how they drifted through the Nether, mostly hollow of memories and thoughtstuff, Avo studied the nulled beings as their dissolution continued.
And with how neat and thorough their eradication was, there existed only one set of suspects exceeding his–and the Incubis’–skill set.
The Low Masters were in the muck now too.
Avo hardened his will.
He cast his Whisper out across the sequence, charging Secondhand Fatality to the forefront as he prepared himself to face his “fathers” properly for the first time.
And as he drew closer to the mental husks left behind, he could see threads of thoughtstuff flowing between the leaking ghosts, carrying whispered thoughts between them.
The guy who pulled my ass out from that Incubi grease fire showed up yesterday. Just popped into the back of my head and said hi.
Fuck me, but that’s humiliating. And here I was thinking I was some kinda nova-hot Necro. Always fish dwelling deeper in the waters, I guess.
First thing he started talking about was my wards. Apparently, my modified Ashthrone Shedskin was leaving a bit more of my emotional resonance behind than I expected. Would’ve been nice to know before I did all those dives, but hey, eventually you learn or you die.
So yeah: Weirdest way I got a mentor so far. Guy seems nice. Too godsdamn nice to be from the Warrens. Strikes me as some kinda Guilder, maybe–but a working one. Maybe someone from Ori-Thaum has their eyes on me.
Jaus, that’ll be something–you rust up their dive and now they want to hire you.
Weirdest thing about it all is… the smell. The guy reeks of citrus. The taste leaks through the mem-data, and it stings. I don’t think even the actual fruits taste that fresh.
Well. He left me some vicarities to review. Stuff he “got” from other Necros on a dive. Ugly ends for all of them. I still can’t tell if he’s trying to scare the piss out of me or get me to learn.
Either way, I gotta see if I can get something on him. Figure out who he is.
Ignorance is fatal in this line of work, and right now, this guy’s got his gun pressed against my temple, but he’s more interested in making me a better shot.
Never a dull day in New Vultun.
-Mem-log of White Rab
13-13
The Silent War (II)
The rule among Necros was that if you encountered a sequence or phantasmic you couldn’t understand, it was probably going to end with you nulled.
With how long it was taking Avo to figure out the Low Masters’ trap, his growing apprehension told him that the direct approach here was likely unwise.
The broken minds of the Incubi were on display neatly, with their shells enchained along strings of flowing thought and fastened by a delicate few ghostly wisps. There was a special kind of callousness leaving the nulled mounted as such. It seemed his father’s alternates didn’t care if they caught the attention of a passing Exorcist, that the ego-deaths exposed like a set of trophies, offering the statement that the last Priests of Noloth were on safari, and they had a lust for big game.
Using his Whisper to secure the vicinity, Avo ground at the whetstone of time as he made his way closer to the cluster. Flashes of his encounter with the Low Masters trespassed into his mind, reminding him of their abilities. They had crippled the entirety of Ox-Three without strain and conjoined the minds to expand their capacity. The time that such an undertaking demanded should have stretched the length of entire weeks, but they achieved a perfect deception with far less.
And they didn’t even need a canon to help them.
Once again, the atmosphere shifted as the weight of uncertainty began to gnaw. Avo had taken to thinking himself a predator of these depths, a beast that preys upon the others. But there were fathoms beneath fathoms, monsters that preyed upon monsters.
His anxiety only grew as he found recollective fragments of Incubi sheared-free, buried within the sequences he crept through. Now, unending screams layered the ambiance of simulated memories, broken phantasmics sailing through simulated scenes of placidity.
The Exorcists were certain to find this–certain to learn the presence of Ori-Thaum within their system.
Did the Low Masters no longer care for secrecy? Or were they trying to provoke a response? Trigger a war between the two forces?
How would that serve their desire to reclaim the Helix from him and retake the George Washington?
More cognitive debris littered his path, and a new suspicion occupied Avo’s mind as the broken artifacts grew more orderly, almost like cobblestones made from nulled minds.
Or an invitational pathway.

He found his paranoia rewarded when he found himself five sequences across from the cluster. As he spoofed his way across a parallel branch, his cog-feed warned him of a dozen passing Exorcist accretions. The sheer amount of devastation present should have made the infiltration obvious. Yet, the patrol just kept going, even circling away from the compromised sequences deliberately.
Like someone was urging them to ignore, to not see the obvious damage.
A cold pang spread through Avo. The worry should have occurred to him before; if he could compromise so many Exorcists, why couldn’t the Low Masters?
The chill in him only grew as his Whisper cast its perception on a familiar Auto-Seance. One created from the mind of Yosanna Kivranpuvak–the turncoat Guilder he dove into at Ox-Three.
It was in her mind that Walton ebbed the Helix, and it was from her that Avo procured the key of his inheritance. Though Auto-Seance was cycling a sequence of memories through structure, Avo could still recall the neuter-mask covered faces of her twin boys in the elevator.
The phantasmic was loud and active. Its opening connected to the dull thoughtstuff flowing from the nulled Incubi, the dichotomy something like an intravenous needle feeding paltry drips of life into a still cavern.
Mem-data loaded from the other side unguarded by any encryptions. There were three minds that lurched across the veil. Three minds settled in a simulated environment molded from the phantasmal matter of fifty ghosts.
Avo urged his Whisper on to peek while his instincts screamed with contradictory responses. He should jack out; he should pour his Secondhand Fatality and nullify the phantasmic itself; he should try and free the Exorcists so they noticed the tumor that was growing under their eyes.
Or he could just go in and speak with them.
The last thought was illogical, and a conflicted desire unto itself.
Something in him still just wanted to look upon Walton’s face again. To feel reassured. But such was the siren song of nostalgia, a brittleness cultivated by yonder memories. That Avo had been killed several times over, and resurrected in a form he recognized as himself didn't negate what he learned of his nature. His sense of self might never have been true to begin with.
Ultimately, he was more creation than adoption at the hands of Walton, and so he must shed himself of the dying embers of ideation.
Killing the idealization of his father the first time was ego-warping. Doing it again to the pretenders wearing his facade might just feel cathartic.
Again, he regarded the fallen Incubi nearby and felt their deaths kindle a sense of inspiration in him. If he chose to enter this cage–to face his former owners–that didn’t mean he had to do so recklessly.
Or be the one to spring the trap personally.
There might yet be a way for him to enclose one trap upon another, and the core to his solution rested within the broken shell that was Shard-1.
The other Incubi that the Low Masters had killed died as wargs in a lion’s den. They weren’t prepared for the depths they dove, and there wasn’t enough of them to begin with.

Such deficiencies could be remedied.
He compiled his current memories into a ghost before detaching it from himself and cracking it with his traumas, warping it with deliberate damage. When it was damaged enough, he cast it across his Auto-Seance into the mind of Shard-1 and left it to tumble in her broken palace.
It would seem as if she took a piece of memory from the one that killed her, and they would piece together the details he left them and come seeking retribution.
Yes. Yes, there was beauty in such a plan. He doubted the Low Masters would see such a thing coming. They would have to react and adapt even if they were many times his skill. A cocktail of chaos and quantity held an edge all its own and preparation was a delicious thing.
He would enter the cage willingly, but not before pre-firing a bullet of his own.
And so, Avo set about ensuring formal introductions between the Priest of old Noloth and the current cream of Ori-Thaum’s crop.

***
+Are we certain he is to come…+ Joy, Priest of Noloth asked. +His nature… it is not one that can support caring. He is a monster. All our children are monsters…+ The thought of the creature possessing Defiance’s Helix sickened him.
He should have known. He should have sensed the strain consuming the mind of his others.
Poor, poor Defiance.
Once, Joy had been saddened by his necessary role in their compact, jealous of Defiance’s freedom to dive while he had to imbibe unending melancholy. Hopelessness. The task of their revival was too grand, too great.

Oh, why did they remain.
It wasn’t right. For one to bear all that suffering. But it was purposeful. Such was his build to ensure that which once hurt no longer stung. His mold and make so that he could best serve as a shield for the others.
What torment could drown despair, after all?
He saw now that he was a fool. He, and all his nodes. He, and the other branches. Vicious Peace could never fathom the philosophic malaise infecting Defiance. Ideas were poisonous–toxic! Like a dialect plague. For what thoughts you offered often were shaped in turn by the feedback of the world.
Of the mortal world, beyond the cradle of ignorance was but clay in eventuality. Such was being. Such was the rot at the root of–
+Shut-shut-shut-shut the fuck up!+ Peace roared. Across the manifested memory, in the throneroom of sanctuary now lost to them, the other rose to scream at him. Oh, but Peace was always like this, his make the inverse of Joy. They flowed into each other, despair and hatred, one internalized trauma, the other a stormcloud of externalized loathing, the only purpose of his existence to be a dam holding in writhing ghosts that could–
Peace spat. The globule wasn’t real, but Joy felt it strike his cheek all the same, gliding down the side of his as a trail of phlegm. +Joy, look at me,+ Peace said, voice low and angry. He thrust a finger at Joy and a dollop of blood fell.
It was always low and angry. Always. Joy didn’t look upon him. There was little point. They had this argument constantly, and it just cycled. One cast their pain outward, and one swallowed it within. There’s was a union of bitter harmony.
+Emotion,+ Joy said, turning his bloody face to the only other that remained. Reminded by Defiance’s absence, Joy choked out a sobbing breath as he sagged upon his throne. +Emotion! Silence his mind. I fucking beg! I beg, you cunt!+
But the eldest among them was beyond coldness. He was absence itself, pure and simple. The dialect transformed him differently, for his foundations were uprooted from the apehood slumbering at the heart of humanity.
+He may not come,+ Emotion said, sounding indifferent to retrieving the Helix at all and settling the Hungers’ pain. +He may not. But our others will find him. Defiance has infused him with ample potential, but insufficient knowledge. Be this due to his desire to watch our dead son grow again–+
+Avohakten,+ Joy wept openly.
+Fuck! Emotion, I told you not to mention the little shit! Now I’m going to have to listen this fucker cry!+
+--or if he simply ran out of time before the end. It matters little. The vessel was here before. It stands to reason he will return.+
Peace snorted. +Reason. You expect something reasonab–+
Mem-data shifted across their cog-feeds. Variables changed rapidly and warnings filled the space behind their eyes. An accretion approached, the thoughtstuff it shed oscillating so fast it reminded Joy of a frequency blade. And though it was shelled with one of those dreadful Incubi wards, the way the unknown approached held such semblance to Defiance that Joy squeaked out a note of anguish.
The squeak rose to a wail when the mem-data loaded fully.
The stranger reeked of citrus. Not the type Defiance bathed his thoughts in–the type Avohakten reeked of after eating those tangerines.
But it was close.
So close.
Near to him, Peace rose from his throne, his lips peeling back in a snarl as he glared at the ghosts fusing into shape upon Defiance’s once-empty throne. +This fucking–+

+Peace. Do not talk with him,+ Emotion said.
+What? I–+

+Depending on the situation that follows, you may break him, but you may not speak to him. We share a root of thoughts, and yours offer little more than invectives and spite. It is inefficient.+


Peace glared at the noblest of their priesthood and directed his perception at Joy. +What about him? Is he going to get the privilege to speak, oh, mighty Emotion?+

+There is no need to restrict him,+ Emotion said. +He will collapse into inconsolable tears when the smell grows stronger.+
Ghosts planted fat tears to join those running down Joy’s cheek. +It’s true.+ The figure on Defiance’s throne grew evermore solid, his size immense and with snake-like appendages lashing out from his back like a cluster of transplanted hydrapedes.
+Oh,+ Joy moaned as he felt his breakdown begin, +and mocks us more by twisting his divine form. Why…+
***
Part of Avo expected to get nulled approaching the Auto-Seance. The fact that he didn’t leave him more worried than ever.
Temporarily releasing his Haemokinesis, he was once again projecting his phantoms back into the dormitory for all the others to witness. The exchange would give his companions a better understanding of their enemy if nothing else.
The first solid matter he felt was resting beneath his arms and grinding against the Echoheads on his back. It was hard to be seated with his additional limbs, but he made due by modifying the dimensions of his simulation as the mindscape around him loaded.
A domed chamber comprised of tessellating materials yawned wide around him, and he noticed the tassels of bone-carved scripture sway from the ceiling in the fashion of nooses calling for necks. It took little time for him to realize he was seated upon one of the four thrones back in the George Washington, and that this was how the Low Masters remembered their sanctuary looking.
With how stiff their seating felt, he wasn’t surprised why Walton decided to leave this little fan club.
Across from him, the weeper, the heartless, and the one that used “fuck” as a noun had him intersected between crossing lanes of perception. And though he hated to admit it, their sequencing was the best he had ever seen. No glitches. Nothing is out of place. Even the mem-data was a work of art, each variable and artifact listed linked to all the others in the chain of dominos.
He wondered if he could spoof his way into the scenery somehow by accelerating his reflexes again. The urge was tempting.
But violence was the main course, scheduled to arrive shortly.
For now, curiosity would serve as an appetizer.
Beats of silence passed to the accompaniment of the weepers choking sobs.
+It’s almost perfect,+ he said, shaking as he held himself. +Oh, Avohakten. If you could see the mon-mon-monster he gave your name to.+
Ah, yes. The long-dead son his father was haunted by. Or the man he used to be before he decided to split himself into four ego-lines was haunted.
Avo sighed.
Family: it was a mess. He looked forward to killing and eating them.
+So,+ Avo said, breaking his end of the silence as he stared, +heard you lost your Ark from some meat I was torturing. How did you all let that happen?+


Peace shot out from his seat, his always-bloody hands whipping red droplets everywhere. +You cunt-fuck! You corpse-licking fuck-shit! You–+
+Peace,+ the one with the dead owl lodged in place of an actual heart said.
The Famine of Peace twitched, and it took a masterful exertion of will for him to wrestle himself down. Some of his rage spilled over and Avo tasted the emotion. Disquiet followed. He empathized with the node, with Peace’s struggle against anger. So similar to how Avo had to struggle with the beast at times that he thought–
Well. Him having pieces from all of them wasn’t much of a surprise, now was it?
+We want the Helix back,+ Emotion said, without preamble. He cocked his head at Avo as if he was examining a piece of meat. A rope of threaded coins dangled from his cavernous eyes, jingling with each movement of his head. +We are willing to strike a bargain to see it done.+

The directness of his words was unexpected for Avo, grating for Peace, and soul-crushing for Joy.
+Bargain?+ Avo asked, voice trailing off with a chuffing laugh. +Second time someone wanted to make a deal with me.+ He leaned in closer. +Have questions. But make your offer first.+ It took an effort of will on his part to continue facing Emotion. To see Walton’s face so mutilated felt wrong.
Perhaps such was the way the last of the faithful felt during the Godsfall as they watched the Guilds rise and fashion grafts from the corpses of the gods they worshipped.
Emotion continued. +Inheritance. We offer you the title and throne of Defiance, along with all his memories, war-minds, and privileges.+
Out of all that was just said, Avo found himself most drawn to Walton’s old memories and what a “war-mind” was. But he would brook no betrayal of his own desires before he grasp the cost of capitulation.
+And what do you want?+


+You. To be joined with us. To serve the Hungers as your predecessor once did. You will granted the deeper arts and learn the true lore behind the Dreaming Unsea. You will return us the Helix, and access to the sanctuary. And you will create for us a new caste of sacrifice. Inspired by your own image.+
+There’s something inside Shard-1’s mind. It’s… a memory fragment, I think. Looks pretty frayed. She might’ve broken it off from the half-strand that nulled her. Scrying now–agh fuck… Talon-1, I got a glimpse of what happened to Strike Cell Mongoose. They’re all nulled too.
We’re gonna need more Incubi.+
-Talon-6, Strike Cell “Flameater”
13-14
Denial
+The Helix,+ Avo said. +Why does it matter? Went from trying to null me last time to giving me a throne.+ He scanned the mem-data radiating from Emotion’s sequences, grasping out with ghosts to see if he could glean any subtextual details from the priest.
Nothing. The Famine of Emotion lived up to his title, and while his two counterparts were beings of baser makes bound to narrow fields of reaction, he, much like Walton, was untethered.
Yet, where Walton, once called Defiance, occupied the ideals of radical acceptance, Emotion was the embodiment of apathy, directed solely to serve the Hungers. Following such symbology, Peace was to be an instrument of war, and Joy, a shield composed from the fabric of sorrow.
Avo prodded, +And can you even make this deal? Don’t you need to call your owners? Ask them how they feel about this? Want to make sure everyone’s on the same page.+ Keeping his mind clean of contempt took a bit of focus, but Avo managed. Though Emotion abided by silence, Avo angled to get at the Hungers again.
So many minds circling within a dragon; fair kindling for a phantasmal inferno. The torment of burning in cycles unceasingly across time was a delight to imagine, and it served as a fitting fate for the Hungers–to reap hell unending for all the atrocities they engineered.
Including the very ghouls that served them.
When Emotion spoke again, the words came calm and direct. +You mock us. But you do not know the situation. You haven’t seen the true face of the war–+
+You lost your history to the other Guilds. Your Ark. Your chance at altering the history of existence to suit your “canon” of events. Am I right?+


Emotion lapsed back into consideration. +Yes. This is true.+
+Emotion,+ Peace snarled, glaring at his fellow priest, +Don’t tell this fuck shit! You heard him: the corpse-fucker won’t give us what’s ours. It’s time for this pretense–+
His voice crackled and died. Down through the blended material of the dais, ghosts from Emotion burrowed into the memory and severed speech privileges from his ego-alternate. The neutering was complete and uncontested. Watching Peace hurling insults and clenching his bloodied fists at Avo, Joy sighed through his tears.
+It is hard for us to admit. Hard for us all.+ The weeping Low Master shook his head as he looked upon Avo. +We’re sorry. We failed you. We failed our dream. We, last and only of the priesthood, were forsworn in defending the chosen against the outsiders and the pestilence of the divine. But we failed. We failed. We failed…+
He settled back into the embrace of despair thereafter, leaving Emotion as the only other speaker once more. +We understand your confusion now. When last we spoke, we assumed you Defiance, though maimed in memory. Ignorance is an easier affliction to alleviate. You have no comprehension of the world that was, and you have exceeded the parameters of your own design–+


Avo broke the flow of the priest’s works with a hissing laugh. +Wrong. Doing exactly what I was made for. Living. Learning. Seeing colors. Making new choices. You are… chained. You still think I’m just another of your ghouls. Another slave. Might be because you’re just a slave too. Might be because of the flesh I’m made from. But Walton created me for freedom. To make my own choices. And now you tell me that all I want is wrong. That I should follow you.+
He rose from his throne, and Joy and Peace mirrored him, the former reaching out for the latter to sit back down, Peace baring his rotted teeth in a baleful grimace as the thread-thin ghosts around him coiled their sequences around each other and wove manifestations of building trauma.
+Talk then,+ Avo said, walking toward the center of the dais that held the thrones. He reached out with a phantasmal Echohead and brushed one of the swinging bone tassels hanging from the ceiling. The artifact was perfectly made. But also immutable.

He didn’t have enough access to its data to alter its design unless he nulled or cast himself deeper into its structure.
Another portent of the Low Masters’ habits. Control. Always control.
They offered him a seat but still spat wasted words at him. He was being treated like an expendable ghoul no longer, but now he seemed little more than an idiot child in desperate need of an education.
+Would you like to hear about who we were?+ Emotion asked, sounding genuinely curious. +Before our defeat? Before our transgressions.+
Now, this was interesting. +Trangression,+ Avo said. +Didn’t think you thought yourselves wrong.+
+Some acts are beyond denial,+ Emotion replied simply. +The creation of your… lessers, for instance. They were merely meant to be receptacles to house the weight of the chosen peoples’ traumas. To bear the weight of their pain. Such a thing cost us more virtue than we can ever restore.+
+You’re talking about the girl,+ The words left Avo. It was a guess, but he felt it valid enough to pursue. +The voider girl you murdered. Before you were separated into the Famines. All the others you entombed. Was that part of the cost?+
To his surprise, Emotion offered a slow and clear nod. +Yes. That, and countless other misdeeds. So many underserved sacrifices… And if there is to be any justice in the end, we will be punished for it. But to ensure the triumph of virtue, we must win.+
The Low Masters were becoming increasingly parallel with Elder D’Rongo in their thinking. This shouldn’t have been a surprise. All those that once held an Ark amounted to something akin to a Guild, and all those who thought themselves great powers were of a joined desire.
More wasn’t enough. They wanted everything. All. Absolute.
Just like the gods.
Avo empathized.
“Press them, master,” the Woundshaper whispered. Breaking from its constant haranguing of the Galeslither, it had taken an interest in the Nether-based dialogue, judging each of the Low Masters with half-interest. “You hold the foundation of all they want, and they seek to build their structures on your soil–to hold you down with their binding weight. Let this be their folly. Let them hand you the materials of their knowledge, and be done with this.”Fascinatingly, the Heaven of Blood regarded Peace, more than the other two, with open disgust. “What poorly fashioned constructs. What broken, narrow tools.”
The voice of his other Heaven followed the first. “It fills me with sickness to be in agreement with her, but the path of this conversation is clear to me. Capitulate, flee, or battle. I advise you leave. You risk too much lingering here, staying in place. This is their house–their rules cage this… microcosm around you.”
“Ah, the coward speaks its due,” the Woundshaper purred. “Wishing to deprive our master of his entertainment? If his plan succeeds, the cognitive substance of these Low Masters will serve as fine bricks within the master’s mind.”
The Heaven of Air huffed, “Blind want has led too many to break themselves upon the ground. Be aware, and never choose submission in place of freedom. No matter what is offered. Flesh, mind, or air, ideas can be enslaved all the same. Do not betray yourself.”
+Would you like the see the time before time? Remember the glory of lost Noloth, the oasis of man beyond the gods?+ The question Emotion offered was meant to lead into a performance. Across his cog-feed, the first variables within the mem-data were being primed for alteration. Like dominos, the change would sweep through the sequences comprising this mindscape, the ghosts simulating its progression shifted to a new design.
Preparedness hardened inside Avo. He entered the Low Masters’ den anticipating battle. If such were to be the outcome, he would not be unbalanced.
Perhaps they would null him. Perhaps they would even shame him through their mastery of the art. But they would not unravel his mind, and inflict upon him what he did to Abrel and so many others.
Not when he had a dozen Conflagrations primed and ready to burn within his loci.
He would render his ego unto ash before allowing the Low Masters to reach past his wards.
+Tell me,+ Avo said, cycling Secondhand Fatality into his Ghostjack.
+We cannot,+ Emotion said. +For it no longer exists. An ascension twisted into a sacrifice at the hands of Jaus Avandaer.+
Around them, the phantasmal fabric of the environment came undone, the nexus of the George Washington peeling away. Concurrently, Avo’s cog-feed updated him that another accretion was active within Shard-1’s mind.
Good. It took the Incubi long enough.
This conversation now had another deadline to it, and he was the only one prepared for its end.
For now, he had things to learn, and enemies to understand.
+Jaus,+ Avo said. +You said he betrayed you.+
+It is a thing of perspective, we must admit,+ Emotion said. +When he installed the Guilds in place of the great faiths that ruled this world and gathered the husks of fallen divinity, he gathered the first of his conclave, and we found ourselves among his inner circle.+


Avo grunted. +Left out how friendly you were last time.+
The priest could but nod. +His charm and affability could not be denied. Nor his skills in diplomacy. For a time, it seemed he was capable of achieving the impossible–seeing everyone’s desires met and ending eon-old conflicts.+

A new scene loaded around them, the weight of the sensory data splashing against Avo as he rejected the mindscapes ghosts from interacting with his Metamind. Just because he couldn’t detect any subterfuge didn’t mean there wasn’t any.
A shadow lengthened over him, and even with his back turned to it, he could feel its ponderous presence pressing down upon his being. The effects were spillovers from the currently active ghosts, and as he turned to face that which oppressed him, he found himself faced with a tower.
A tower sculpted from uncountable naked bodies, each prostrating upon another, knees fused to shoulders as they knelt with their heads bowed, facing the interior of the tower. Such was the least of the anomalies.
When Walton showed him the Flayed Ladder in the Deep Bazaar, the experience had proven to be cognitively damaged. Now, he faced its concept with mild discomfort, noting the impossible layering at the edges of its geometry, and the way it seemed to bleed over into the clouds and sky and existence itself.
The more he looked upon it, the more the Ladder struck him as a needle pressed under the skin of reality, primed to give an injection.
At his feet, the ground was featureless and pale while a wrongness permeated the air. It was like the tower bleached all flavor from the concepts in its vicinity, grinding reality down to its fundamental facets.
+You said we lost our Ark. This is only a partial truth.+ Emotion stood next to him upon dappled patches of white. +It wasn’t just taken from us, but also sacrificed. Used to give the Ladder more… groundedness. Stability.+ He paused. +And entrap the Hungers above existence to facilitate the creation of the Nether.+
Emotion turned to face him, the coins swaying from dark sockets and missing eyes feeling like a personal insult to Avo. The ghoul didn’t know if they were deliberately depriving him of desired favor, but it was mockery nonetheless.
+Why?+ Avo said. +Why did Jaus “betray” you?+
+Control. As with all tyrants.+

+And you as well?+ Avo asked as a jibe.
+And us as well.+
Avo heard his cog-feed ping a soft alert. Someone just took Shard-1 into their mind. They were pulling her out of Abrel’s Meta. Good. It would make triggering the trap he planted inside her to disable the Incubi that much easier. Or, better yet, their infrastructure.
For now, he continued with the conversation, watching as the indicator fed him details regarding the progress his new “consangs” were making before they reached the Auto-Seance.
This conversation's deadline ticked on, and Avo was the only one aware of it.
+We were the first to attempt the alteration,+ Emotion said. +The Hungers–chosen of the city unending–had long prepared to make the necessary adjustments to our past. With the Ladder’s approaching completion, I was given a new task–+

A chuff of disbelief came from Avo. +Of course. Hungers told you to twist everything? Put in your own history?+

+The return of our son was assured.+ A beat passed and Emotion considered whether he wanted to keep speaking. +Along with the adjustments to his rebellion. It would have been a better life.+
+And this is what you’re still fighting for?+ Avo asked. +To clean your shame?+

+To ensure there never was any shame, and that he would be here, not I.+


The chuff rose into an outraged hiss. For all the moments before, Avo regarded the Low Masters with wary regard and tempered curiosity, but for the first time, he felt his hate for them deepen.
He knew nothing of the man he inherited his namesake from, but knowing they died defying Walton and the Hungers, the act of twisting his chronology into being a loyal son was beyond violation.
It was a desecration. Of ego. Of personhood. Of choice itself.
Whatever the case might be, Avohaketen died fighting against his father. To render that as invalid…
+Denial,+ Avo breathed. +That would have been a better name for you. Better name for all of you. All this just to coddle yourself. Protect your feelings. Yours and the Hungers. Can’t live with your failures. Can’t learn. Going to destroy the world and defile existence because you weren’t happy with your decisions.+
An intrusive thought told Avo that Zein would have mocked them more for their failure to achieve this want than the act itself.
The priest studied him for a moment, taking a step back. +You are offended by this?+ Emotion let out a breath. +Truly, he did see you as his son. You are so very like him but stained with savagery.+


+And you have his face but everything else hollow,+ Avo replied. +None of you are even intact enough to be parodies of him. He was the only one of you that was real. Whole instead of narrow. You give me power for the Helix because you need the George Washington. But you don’t learn the technology. You don’t learn anything.+
+That is not our duty?+ Emotion said. +The sanctuary offers us–+

+Means to continue your hopeless war. Yes.+ Avo turned away from him. Clashing notices populated his cog-feed, the Incubi getting closer. +Curious. What’s your plan? Claim the Ark of another Guild? Change its history somehow? Kill enough ghouls and twist their minds to contaminate the consensus on what happened.+

+Once perhaps, but these assumptions are superfluous now.+ Emotion leaned in close. +Especially with what Defiance has bestowed upon you.+


And once again, a hidden power sought the fruits of Project Godshaper.
Kae should be ever so pleased with her accomplishments, but he doubted she would enjoy compliments from half-strands like the Low Masters.
+With your Frame, we can change everything. We can grant Noloth its second glory and return our masters from their exile. Such a thing would cost you nothing. And you will be granted influence over the art itself when the canons are changed.+
The answer, now, and almost always, was no, but entertaining this line of question, he could still uncover a few things they spoke of.
That, and keep this group’s attention on him as the approaching Incubi dove in, their approach estimated at three real-time minutes and counting.
+Perhaps…+ Avo said, speaking as if he was truly uncertain. +Will I get a “war-mind”? Tell me about privileges. And what remains of the art for me to master?+
And as Emotion began to speak, Avo cycled Secondhand Fatality at the forefront of a shuffling cycle of patterns in anticipation of what was to come.
The truth was having the Low Masters just give him something didn’t appeal at all, for why should he be beholden to accepting gifts when he could just create the circumstances to take them from his foes?
***
Something about Shard-1’s nulling lingered in Talon-3’s mind. It might be the absolute calmness oozing out from the near-waters of her thoughtstuff, or the non-native fragments they recovered from within her inner mind. Either way, there was big game in these waters, and it appeared to have a taste for Incubi.
Such behavior had to be discouraged.
They approached the hidden Auto-Seance, slipping through the traps and peering eyes numbering sixteen Necros.
Sixteen of the most decorated Incubi that could be scrambled and deployed on short notice. Sixteen merged from four cells into a circle.
His mind pulsed as Talon-1’s Meta-identifier came alight in his cog-feed. +Talon-3, Talon-6, you two are point-jackers. Ingress. Ladder formation. Clear these sequences and keep it quiet. Talon-7, you’re in charge of perimeter detail. Keep those glassers blind and redirect sequences if you spot a Pali. The rest you get your traumas cycled. You are cleared for ego-death. Collateral damage is allowed. Let’s scalp this motherfucker.+
Twenty minds chimed muttered affirmations. Talon-3 found his voice among theirs. +Synced,+
Through his Seance, he heard Talon-6 say the same thing and approach the cluster.
A muted sense of disquiet filled Talon-3 but he let it pass through him. It wasn’t the first time he saw the Nether painted with the unspooling memories of his own. It wouldn’t be the last either.


+Shard-1 must’ve gotten the half-strand pretty good,+ Talon-6 said.
Talon-3 hummed in response.
+You don’t think so?+ Talon-6 asked.
+I think she went down fighting,+ Talon-3 said. +But seein’ as Convex already reported Shard-2 mind dead… I don’t know. The Exorcists are compromised. Mongoose is all dead over there. And we just so happen to have partially fragged breadcrumbs that form a full picture with our foes all buzzed out and unprepared.+


+So… what, it’s a trap?+


Talon-3 sighed. +I don’t know. I don’t think so but… I just can’t shake the feeling that we’re being used.+
+Convex. We just got Shard-2 stabilized. She’s still gonna be with us. It looked pretty bad for a while but… part of her labyrinth collapsed just right and preserved enough of her deeper memories. Everything else is a smear of thoughtstuff and half-fragged ghosts.+
+Shit. So we got nothing about who ambushed her and Shard-1. Just glimpses and flickers.+
+Well… me and the other Menders managed to piece together a glimpse of the moment they got hit. A lot of detail’s missing and the visuals are somewhere north of fucked. But what we got is… unclear. +
[TRANSFERRING MEM-DATA]
+...+


+We slowed it substantially. The unknown is still a blur.+
+Yeah, I got that. The traumas are expertly made too. Shard-2’s wards broke on the third hit. This means they had three high-null category patterns at the ready. It also means we’re dealing with someone who’s broken a Quicksand before… who knows how we operate…+
+Convex?+

+Mend-1, listen to me: Do not tell anyone that Shard-2 made it. Try to reassemble her mind as best you can and then slot her for redaction-protection detail. After that, report her as ego-dead using a cast.+
+I… yes, Convex.+
+The number of Necros that can dive into a lobby like this is a percent of a percent. To ambush two Incubi on scrying detail at that kind of speed…. We’re facing a Godclad. Or a Nolothic [redacted]... Ignore the second one. You’re not cleared to remember that.+
+Understood. Do you… think it’s one of ours?+
[Sigh] +I hope not. But the candidates capable of performing the feats you pulled from Shard-2’s mind number in the triple digits. If that. And most of them are probably ours. We need to seriously consider if we’re diving against Shotin Kazahara.+
+What? The Echodancer? No, he’s loyal to the Council. And our Godclads are all party to active monitoring by undisclosed assets–it’s impossible–+

+Mend-1. There are power plays happening between the elders all the time. Old clan grudges that last when one becomes immortal. We’re Necrojacks. We know better than most what “seems to be” can end up as a load of shit. Right now, I’m going to double the assets for Elder D’Rongo and give the order for general fortification to be built. Around the clock counter-scrying to stop the Exorcists from noticing too. Mend-1, get prepared for a casualty spike.+
+Synced. Are you going to warn them? The cells?+
+I don’t know how compromised we are, Mend-1. I don’t know anything. If they run into our new “friend”... a lot more Incubi are going to die today. I need to… I need to think about what’s going on. One thing’s certain: I need you to falsify Shard-2’s memory details. Alter your memories afterward. You and your cell.+
+Synced. Unity is Destiny.+
+Yeah. Unity feels like it’s pretty absent today.+
-Mirror-Convex and Mend-1
13-15
The Deeper Waters
The staccato of conflict built to a three-part beat.
Of the Low Masters, desperate to court Avo, the struggle was diplomatic and spiritual. Their prize was more than merely the Helix now–they also wanted him for his Frame. As with Ori-Thaum, the great game had changed thanks to Kae’s deeds, and the last vestiges of Noloth sought a second chance at weaving the reality they desired back into shape.
Little were they aware of approaching wolves Avo had alerted, or that he never intended to succumb to their temptations.
In this regard, he agreed with his Galeslither: freedom was a prize most precious and rarely owned. Especially in a city like New Vultun.

For whatever they could offer him in terms of Necrotheurgy or power, he would have to be a fool to trade untethered freedom for bejeweled chains. Still, that didn’t mean he wasn’t curious about what tools they had for offer.
Or what to filter for when their minds were properly broken.
+You have only gazed the Nether from within. You dive a native to these waters, perhaps, but we are more than mere divers. We have seen the totality of its expanse, and know where its borders lie. Comprehension. Such a glimpse is afforded only to the faithful.+ Emotion called upon his ghosts and tuned them into phantoms. Upon his palm danced a shimmering orb of water, and within its scintillating depths, accretions shone like constellations.
+Like looking into a subreality,+ Avo responded. Interesting as the imagery was, he had half his attention on the approaching Incubi. Through constructs he left buried amongst the sequences outside, he peered at their progress and peeked through Shard-1 as well.
There numbered many this time. Twenty or more. He wondered if any of them suspected this to be a trap. The crumbs he left leading them to this Auto-Seance granted them insight into the compromised Exorcists and which sequences were to be avoided as well. Seeing as they were gathering, they must’ve trusted the information enough to attempt an offensive.
He just needed to be ready when the walls came crashing down. Keep the Low Masters here distracted.
+When Jaus imprisoned our masters, he exiled not only our future, but also our hopes.+
Avo’s attention cut back over to the Low Master. +Why?+

+He sought to–+

+What did you do? What did the Hungers do to make Jaus cast them out from reality?+ The interruption was deliberate. Planned. As were the words that followed. +Was what you did in the George Washington also Jaus’ fault?+
Emotion stared, and its empty sockets offered no insight into his internal disposition. +That was a sin? But a necessary one.+


+Necessary?+ Avo couldn’t tell if the creature he was talking to was delusional or mad. +I enjoyed watching you hurt her. Stab her again and again. Things I enjoy are… cruelty. Sadism. If I enjoy what you do…+ A laugh escaped from him, low and mocking. +Be honest with me. If you can. If there’s anything in you like Walton. Did you just hurt her because of the Hungers? Or did you like it too?+
+We still remember her sometimes,+ Emotion said simply. +Joy weeps for her. Peace hates that she fell, hates that she was so hard to kill, hates the Hungers for telling us to kill her.+
+So why do it?+
+Faith. True faith. Have you ever laid eyes on a total democracy?+
This gave Avo pause. There seemed to be more parallels between the Low Masters and Ori-Thaum than he expected. Between their reliance on the Nether, their mastery of the art, and their supposed cultural values, he wondered if there was some deeper connective tissue connecting the two nations in the years past.
+The Hungers…+ Avo replied, +They’re supposed to be a total democracy? A collection of screaming minds cycled through a cluster of dragons. One that offloads its… waste into my brothers. Needs the ghouls to survive. That’s your democracy?+ It was absurd. To Avo, the entities barely rested within the borders of coherence. To consider them an accurate representation of sanity, let alone a model of public sentiment, was staggering.
Or something that could only be accepted by the truly faithful.
+They are an endless city drawn across eternity to find consensus and agreement. That requires iterating. And adjustments.+ Emotion smiled, and something about the empty expression unnerved Avo. The look just didn’t fit, and the longer he spent next to the hollow priest, the greater his disgust grew.
It was like watching something wear the skin of your father, speak words he would never say. This priest, more than the other two, was a painful mockery in all of his actions.
+The Nether,+ Avo said, ordering his ghosts to ensure none of his disquiet escaped from his thoughtstuff. +Is it a Heaven?+
+It is far greater than a facet,+ Emotion answered.
Somehow, Avo understood. +An entire pantheon?+
+Heavens and Hells. Aligned. Balanced. And a rung atop our current dimension of being.+
+And all anchored to the Hungers,+ Avo said.
+Yes,+ Emotion said, actually sounding somewhat pleased. +I see him now. I see him in you. The way he thinks lingers in your words. The way he tries to understand our enemies. But there is a viciousness to you that he never had. A casual brutality. Yes. Your potential is far greater. I see why he made you now.+
The compliment skipped off Avo like a flechette striking armor. +Walton. He was the one meant to serve as your sequencer. Your plant among your enemies.+
+We needed to harness the boundless empathy we were once capable of, but severed from our hate, our grief, and untainted by apathy.+
+And you are supposed to be the governor of the priests,+ Avo said.
+We hewed ourselves to specific ends.+ The Low Master closed his hand and the miniscule representation of the Nether faded. +Mine is to be beyond compromise. The Nether is more than subreality. It is an over-reality. One is built atop the structures of this one. A nascent universe unto itself. Or such was what it was meant to be in the dream.+
+The dream,+ Avo said. +Jaus again.+
+More than just him.+ Emotion turned his face away from Avo and he stared up at the Ladder, regarding it with almost a wistful envy. +Everyone offered so much for the future. Everyone. For a time we stopped our sacrifices. We believed that everything could turn for the better.+
+He even got you?+ Somehow, Avo couldn’t picture Walton with Jaus. The former was too avoidant of attention, too pleasant. The latter was, karmically or ironically, too mythologized.
+He had everyone. But we were the ones to provide the concepts behind a unified cognition. That was our part of the dream. Our facet. We devoted our Ark to his magnum opus. The Ladder. All we asked was that our chosen be allowed to cross over and create gestalt for all mankind. A parity of consciousness.+
+And then he betrayed you.+
Emotion cocked his head. +Despite of how much my masters hate him, his actions could be seen as preventative more than deceptive. We had such hopes… but they did not align with his. It’s hard to be a god, Avohakten. As so it is to be a king. The forebearer of your name learned that in the end, and you too must have felt it in the power you wield.+
+No,+ Avo replied. The words came without hesistation. +No.+

+No?+ Emotion replied, sounding genuinely confused.
+The problem with being a god is that it’s too easy. Maybe the same as being a king. No consequence. Just pleasure. Just want. Just… hunger.+
The tower vanished. Avo found all three priests standing before him, forming a line of perfect symmetry. As the mindscape around him shivered, as the mem-data began to disappear, he saw all of their eyes and sockets clip into the same space. +We have decided to show you a war-mind. You should prepare yourself. They are unfinished. Much like the Dreaming Unsea itself.+
Even as he cycled his Second Fatality into his Ghostjack, Avo couldn’t help but do a double-take at what was said. +Unfinished?+


+The sea alone cannot encapsulate the colors of a newer existence. There is also sediment. Land. And wind untethered in the sky. We were not done when we were made to be undone. Before we were stripped of our Arks, however, we finished the first constructs of our final retribution.+
+They’re phantasmics?+ Avo asked incredulously.
And as all three Low Masters bled into each other, Walton’s features twisted into a saddened, hateful stare. +No. Our gift to this world was water and stability. Our retribution will be of absence and chaos. For if cognition could be granted shape and expression, then so too could ignorance be given a shell.+
The mem-data around him was twisting, the memories decaying as the Auto-Seance began to atrophy. The same entropic radiation spilled within the confines of the simulation, and Avo felt his ghosts begin to wither as their sequences–his memories, were taken and his own–began to vanish.
Avo tried to … He needed to… He was supposed to do something when he…
Across from him, the Low Masters began to laugh. Now they sounded like Walton. Now they sounded like him.
Now they sounded like Walton.
Wait.
How many times has he had this thought.
Why did they sound like Walton?
The thought repeated in his head thrice more as Joy began to melt away before him, the entirety of his memories and thoughts consumed like candle wax oozing to feed an unseen flame.
No. Not a flame. That felt wrong. It was like erosion made manifest. And it was pushing into the Nether from an angle unseen…
Desperation sparked a final thought. An impossible act of reflex that was beneath memory–an act planned before the mind could succumb.

He didn’t know–didn’t know anything–
But the Low Masters–
He would burn himself before they compromised…
Burn.
He burned himself.
He burned his own thoughts. They were eaten.
He would return.
He was…
He saw the Nether through its own eyes.
***

+Talon-3, preparing to enter–+
+Wait!+ Talon-6 cast. He felt startlement pass through every other Incubi he was connected to. Through his perception, they could see the sudden drop in the Auto-Seance’s mem-data as they studied the four accretions.
Ghosts were evaporating out of its structure. The cognitive phlogiston that was the Nether began to steam and boil. He had never–
The Nether swallowed him as if he was folded in with a sudden splash of melt paint.
The world was like–
He had never seen–
This wasn’t a sight he had seen before–
What was this sight?
Did he see it before?
Wait, was he Talon-3 or Talon-6?
And who was Avo?
***
You are a war-mind.
You do not think.
You simply hear, and obey.
You are ignorance manifest. You are the eyes and jaws placed across the Nether.
You will never know this, but it cost the priests nine million of their own lives to dwell in your thoughtless dimension and craft you into shape. Your very existence is poison to them, poison to this place, but also poisons you right back.
The ghosts and minds of everyone encompassed in your wake dissolve, but every thought they think burns you.
You don’t have the senses for pain. But the people conjoined by you scream on your behalf.

There are twenty-six minds currently boiling in your depths.
Your caller paradoxically remembers you. The one called Joy. He should have faded out of existence with this act. Another will replace him soon. You will not know him. The others will not remember him.
The same fate will befall everyone else not protected by Joy’s will.
The ghoul is to be spared, but his substance is strange. There is more than one active mind inside it, and though you know nothing, the design confuses you because you’re trying to eat him anyway because his being hurts. He is forgetting because his mind is one fire and the fire is thinking and it hurts it hurts it hurts–
He’s of a shape as you…
You tear the memories of his fires instead. They sputter, confused why were they eating the ghoul’s mind to begin with, and he stirs even inside you, and you shrink closer to nothing.
You give up on him. He will live like the caller wants. The Incubi must also be ceased. There is too much of them–and they are so loud. You reach into their misremembering selves and make them remember and drive your reach further until you’re past their surface memories and into the second layer where all the private details hide and you use it to expand yourself.

With each second you are dying, but you don’t know it. Soon, all the perceptions and memories you eat will destroy you. You will no longer exist. It is annihilation.
It is annihilation. No one will remember. Ignorance will leave its imprint.
Five of the minds cease with you, parted from cognition itself. But most live. You spent too long on the ghouls. Too long.
And it still remembers you.
It still remembers because you made the fires forget themselves first, but the ghoul remains, and he has them in his thoughts now, but they are no longer eating him–

The last non-thought doesn’t arrive. The Nether settles.
You die without ever knowing what death is.
***
COG-CAP-[nULl]WARNI12NG
ADAPTING…
ADAPTING?
WHERE AM I? WHERE ARE WE?
SEARCH MEMORIES…
WE ARE… AVO?
AVO. WE ARE AVO.
THE BASE MIND IS ASLEEP. NEED INPUT FROM BASE MIND.
WAKE HIM?HIM?
NOT HIM.
US.
WAKE US?
[WAKE UP]
And at a call cast by what ghosts remained within his still burning mind, Avo felt the mass of consciousness slam down into his being with thrice as much weight as before.
+So you want me to do what?+
+I’m trying to make someone. I want you to be a part of them.+

+...Someone? Jaus fucking Avandaer, Strix, I… look, I’m thankful for all that you’ve done for me and all that you taught me. Hells, you’ve been more of a dad to me than the actual half-strand that pulled a pump and dump on mom but… I don’t think I’m ready for our relationship to go here. I mean, for fuck’s sake, consang, I don’t even know you in the real. I’m not just mailing you my fluids so you can grow a juv.+

[Soft laugh] +I don’t mean it that way. It’s not just you and me, anway–+

“Holy fuck. No, Strix. No. I do not consent to whatever gene-juice cocktail bastard you’re trying to breed into existence. No.+
[Laughing continues] +I’m going to miss provoking you, kid.+
+Miss me? Strix, are you in some kind of shit right now?+
+Well, I’ll be dead in a few minutes, so this is as much a farewell call as it’s a favor.+
+Fuck. Where are you? I’m gonna jack over. There’s a Fallwalker–Stormsparrow. She owes me favors. Big favors. I can burn it–get you out–+
+Listen to me, I need you to cast a few memories over through this session. Make them moments between us. I’m trying to grow the sequences together and make them all seem more… real–+

+Are you in the Warrens? The Tiers? Stormsparrows good anywhere. She can cross Idheim in a footstep. She’ll be there–+

+Rabbit. Raldi. There are things I don’t want you to know. There’s a war I don’t want you involved in yet. I enjoyed our time together and watching you grow and all that. A lot of things are going to be happening in a few months. If someone shows up one day thinking your home is theirs, tell them what you know about me. You’ll understand then.+

+No, fuck you, consang. DeepNav ping now. You don’t get to cast and die. You’re not some snuffer trash–+
[GHOSTLINK DISCONNECTED]
+Strix? Strix?+
-The “Strix” and White-Rab
13-16
The Flames Awakened (I)
Something was wrong.
As Emotion cast his perception upon the creature’s mind, he could see that its ghosts were afire. From the edge of its halo’s accretion to each individual strand of phantasmal substance, unnatural flames gnawed within the Nether.
Fires outlined by a pulsing film of emptiness.
Disquiet and fascination became bedfellows in that instant; the priest realized this construct was unknown to him. Something of Defiance’s personal design, perhaps?
Though the ghoul’s thoughtstuff oozed and burst like a flickering bubble as it struggled to awaken from its mind-stunned stupor, its memories seemed almost entirely intact, and impossibly, the vanquished sequences were being cauterized back into existence. Ghosts regrew as if branches of living incandescence, each reaching for each as brambles thickened, forming new junctions.
+Emotion,+ Peace said, voice taut with baffled rage. +The fuck are we looking at? What the fuck happened?+
A gulf existed in their minds as well, but the absence of Joy revealed enough. A War-Mind had been used. Likely as a demonstration to cow Defiance’s upstart “offspring” into capitulation.
And render it easier to subvert in the aftermath.
Now, however, withered particulates leftover from Joy’s annihilated mind dotted the phlogiston of the Nether around them like scattered debris, and past the frayed entryway of their Auto-Seance, a disorganized tangle of the fifteen Incubi tumbled free from half-severed sequences.
Another unexpected outcome. The ghoul had thought itself clever drawing the pretenders into the mindscape as expendable help, but its expectations would have been folly. They had more than the local sequences subverted–the Greatling girl was under their sway as well. It took little effort to use those compromised Exorcists as a vector for this expansion, after all.
Admittedly, Defiance’s successor was more effective than assumed, though unrefined when it came to the delicate details of sequencing emotions and artifacts of poignance within memories.
Such was why it likely never noticed them dwelling within Abrel's memories of the love she held for her brother–the gentler aspects of being far from its base comprehensions. True empathy was a step above mere fathoming after all, and in this was the loss of Defiance most felt.
Yet, despite all this, the ghoul’s mind had been altered somehow, and most of the Incubi remained alive.
Emotion was no longer sure what was to follow. There were too many factors resting beyond his comprehension, too many developments he could not foresee.
This meeting was meant to be a lure. Something to draw the ghoul in and enchain it to the purpose of Old Noloth, for the glory of the city eternal and the world that Jaus stole. They assumed by exploiting its hunger and bloodlust it would have offered its fealty for pleasures denied.
Instead, the beast yearned more to mock them.
Now, as confusion rose from the disoriented minds scattered before them, Emotion released a low note of disappointment at the outcome of the affair and prepared to surrender the reins of his control.
+Peace,+ he said, sinking below his brother-self, +I cede mastery of the priesthood to you. I no longer have faith in diplomacy–pursue our objectives by your other means. I will call upon another instance of Joy and keep the Exorcists blind.+
As his Metamind lapped over Peace’s, he heard bone-grinding growls of low laughter. As it echod outward he felt the waves of the Nether ripen with the pressure of malice. The poor fools were not prepared for that which was to come, and from the ghoul’s shattered mind would the Famine of Peace reclaim that which was stolen.
+You should have let me at the cunts from the start, Emotion,+ Peace grumbled. Across the entirety of his cognitive structure, lighting the circuitry of his sequences, trauma-patterns built and crackled, the first bolts whipping out at the Nether beyond his accretion like the tongue of a ravenous dog. +It would have saved us all so much fucking time.+
***
Regaining your bearings after getting flattened into a second-person perspective and blended with the conscious minds of twenty or so Incubi was a mite bit difficult.
Awareness forcibly hammering back into you as all your ghosts are screaming at you in a cacophonous symphony of voices across the totality of your memories also does nothing to diminish the chaos.
[CONGITIVE DAMAGE REPAIRED]
[MOSTLY–WE ARE LOSING GHOSTS]
[MENTAL TEMPLATE SAVED: AVO]
Data danced across his cog-feed, and his ghosts moved like shadows diving through the eye-wall of a superstorm. The onslaught of information didn’t stop there.
He knew things. Remembered and recalled them in an instant without sending out any commands or requests to his Metamind. His skull ached to the swelling of his coherence, reinflating like a balloon as multiple streams of thought surged synchronously, rushing through the interconnected traffic of his sequences like wildfire spreading across canals.
[UNCERTAIN WHAT HAPPENED]
[MIGHT BE WAR-MIND’S EFFECTS]
[IRRELEVANT RIGHT NOW; THREAT INCOMING]
Multiple windows opened across his cog-feed, his smoldering ghosts automatically assembling the raw data into simulated feeds showing the environment beyond.
The Auto-Seance he was drifting in was glitching. Entire portions of its make-up were outright missing, and between leaking flows of fragmenting ghosts ran rents revealing the expanse of the Paladin's Oversec.
Strangely, despite the severity of the damage, the countless scintillating accretions representing the closest Exorcists were oblivious. They continued to travel along the rails of distant sequences, seemingly unaware of the obliteration of memory that had just occurred near the administrative nodes of one of their superstructures.
Behind him, the Low Masters had folded into each other and deloaded their simulated forms. Now, they existed as pure mem-data gathered into a skein of building traumas. Warning klaxons sounded within Avo’s cog-feed as forty percent of his ghosts threaded themselves into his wards without any prompting.
[ANTICIPATING EGO-NULLING TRAUMA-PATTERN]
[CONVERTING 60% OF TOTAL COGNITIVE STRUCTURE FOR SURVIVABILITY INCREASE]
[CONVERTING 90% OF THE REMAINDER TO TRAUMAS. ESTIMATED DURATION OF PSYCHOSIS: 2 SECONDS.]
+No. Stop.+ Avo struggled to manage even thoughts. Thinking felt like he was wrestling with torrents of his own mind, each of his ghosts straining as they were already designated toward determined tasks. +Stop. What are you doing.+


[THE BASE-MIND IS FULLY AWARE]
[GOOD. GOING TO STOP US FROM BEING NULLED. LET THE BASE-MIND RECOVER FIRST]
[RECOMMEND LAYERED WARDINGS WITH WASTE MEM-DATA PADDING ON THE INSIDE. COLLAPSING MICRO-MAP OF MIND-TEMPLATE DOWN TO INNER THOUGHTS]
What was even happening?
[UNCERTAIN]
[THEORY: SOMETHING TO DO WITH THE WAR-MIND]
[USED TO BE TWO. NOW THREE]
Avo wanted to ask his ghosts “three-what,” but just then his cognition narrowed into a pinprick as much of most of his near-to-mid-term memories were dismantled by his ghosts. Each among them curved out like needles tethered to blazing threads. Before, assigning more cog-cap to his wards would have taken deliberate sequencing and the Meta some time to adjust.
Now, the totality of his mind shifted as one, everything deconstructed and rebuilt across the passage of the merest instant, the change coming like wildfire.
Wildfire.
The Conflagrations.
The Eaters.
He had ignited his own mind to deny the Low Masters access to his inner memories. He remembered the war-mind, felt its impossible absence encompass hundreds and thousands of sequences within its grasp before conjoining all cognitive entities and boiling them with the weaponized ignorance it had stored.
Somehow, Avo managed to remain himself against it.
The Eaters had seized its attention, and it turned its mind-stripping glare upon the fires savaging the columns holding up his mind. As the devouring flame ate at him desperately to stay alive and aware, the war-mind hewed from the warring entities something deep and critical before dissolving into cessation itself.
It had made the Eaters forget why they were fighting.
A distorted flick ran through Avo’s cog-feed. Something was grinding at him from beyond his wards, making his cog-cap spike before a shift in his Metamind’s structures made it drop again. His ghosts chattered constantly among themselves, each wisp-like unit speaking as a chorus, their words carrying his diction, but not his voice.
Straining himself, he ignored the missing gulfs in his mind and attempted to reassert his control.
Pushing his perception out from the depths of his inner memories, he found himself squeezing out atop three other cognitive presences within his mind. Two of them were knots of self-directing mem-data and one was a hollow spot of emptiness that somehow served as a bridge between them.
From all three entities extended complex spills of essential memories binding them to Avo, wrapping him in the sinews of their substance. The two active entities didn’t so much feel alive now as they felt symbiotic, drawing cognitive bandwidth from his mind to simulate their words and actions.
Tapping into his “sub-minds,” he felt his cognition expand and interweave on a level he never experienced before. The contents of his ego had spread within the flames with the neutering of the Eater’s memories. Where once they subsumed from him to replicate themselves, now all that remained was him. Hence, they had seared his ego wide across the entirety of his sequences, twisting strands of his personhood across all other memories like an ever-coiling vine.
No longer did his mind seem solid or affixed. His being floated, and flowed, and even as the contours of his mindscape bent and warped in ways that should have been cognitively crippling, his ego remained intact, if temporarily distorted.
[BASE-MIND HAS ASCENDED.]
[GOOD. NOW COGNITION IS AT 100% CAPACITY.]
[ATTEMPTING TO ASSIMILATE ATTACKING TRAUMA-PATTERNS.]
The Nether around him burst fully into detail and shape, and a pit of emptiness immediately opened within his stomach.
Enemy-directed traumas were carving pieces free from his outer mind. From the Low Masters came a complex weave of attacks that twisted the fabric of the Nether itself. The traumas glowed with radiative properties capable of embrittling ghosts and the vicinity of the administrative node came alight with thought-tearing striations.
Firing back at them came a retaliation merited more by quantity than quality. More than a few of the Incubi’s null-heavy ghosts rang against Avo’s protections as well. High-yield trauma-loads sailed free of their attached Ghostjacks before exploding outward in a hailstorm that would shred a megablock of minds bare of thoughts.
And there he was, between them.
Doing nothing.
Every three impacts shattered his wards and slashed his memories wide open, but his sequences reknitted themselves in a fashion uncannily similar to what his Woundshaper was capable of. More, even as his internal memories were gouged out from his protective shell, his sense of self remained undamaged, and no sting pierced the senses of his mind.
Gouts of fire plumed free from his mind each time his wards were breached. Yet, he did not bleed alone, for whatever trauma cleaved into him was in turn supped from to recuperate the ghosts lost within.
In seconds, all that was foreign was digested beneath the immolating touch of his Conflagration, their presence smelting the traumatic constructs down to the basest cognitive matter before one of the sub-minds fed it back into Avo.
[EGO-SUSTAINMENT THRESHOLD: 125 GHOSTS]
[CURRENT GHOSTS: 744 – LOST 2348 DURING RECOVERY]
Interesting, but he would delve into those details later. Right now, he had a greater concern.
+Why aren’t we casting back?+
[WE DON’T HAVE THE WILL.]
[NOT BASE-MIND.]
[NEED ALLOWANCE.]
[VERY INCONVENIENT.]
[WANT TO NULL.]
His bloodlust flowed and in the same instant synaptically charged currents tipped with Secondhand Fatality lashed out at the Low Masters thoughtstuff.
The priests of Noloth shifted the angle of their assault to him. As their attacks came at an unceasing tempo, Avo found himself wondering if they weren’t using some kind of cognitive accelerant themselves. Their first of their counteractions clashed against Avo’s trauma and shattered, one blade falling before the other.
What followed was a feat that made Avo’s insides twist in envy. In the period of a micro-second, the Low Masters managed to assemble a new pattern just as their original shattered and cast it out.
This time, however, when the traumas met, the Nether came alight like twin blades carved from pain charged lightning breaking to a halt, edge to edge.
Avo felt his ghosts recoil at the sudden repulse clashing against trauma so symmetrical, but a deeper instinct bade him reach out.
Through the connective tissue of ghosts chained to his mental being, he buried his fluid ego into the sequences of the attack trauma and stretched out his cognitive capacity. His ghosts burrowed into his foes like drilling tendrils, eating through the shell of their patterns like a plague.
Memories broke apart and melded into him. His total ghosts shot back up past eight hundred. Awareness and knowledge flooded into his mind and for a flickering instance, he felt his perception overlap with the Famine of Peace, as disbelief and horror erupted inside them.
The shock lasted but a scant second. Grandmaster Necrojack that the enemy was, they ejected those ghosts and jacked out.
Just in time for another series of attacks to cut out from another vector and skip off Avo’s wards.
[ADJUSTING MEMORY-AVAILABILITY PARAMETERS]
Suddenly, a portion of his memories regrew and the canon of Haemokinesis became known to him again.
+How was that a non-essential memory?+ Avo asked, casting his annoyance at his sub-minds.
[WAS BUSY CONSTRUCTING WARDS.]
[WAS BUSY REBUILDING EVERYTHING.]
There was a tinge of frustration in his auxiliary self.
Choking back his annoyance at his secondary selves, he fired his reflexes and bound himself again to liters of blood.
The pace of time stretched, and Avo stole the momentum of the offensive.
He cast out at the Incubi then, uncertain as to where the Low Masters were hiding. Flashes of firing Ghostjacks pulsed out from leaking sequences and Avo moved as he struck.

He directed his strikes with finer control than he ever felt, hammering Secondhand Fatality down against Quicksand wards before cycling in the next option. But as his command reached his Ghostjack, so too did his ghosts obey as well.
Even far extended from him, he felt his trauma transform from within. What began as a memory made from the materials of Lucille’s pain turned into the hurt Chambers endured when the aratnid sank its egg-infused fangs into his testicles.
He drove his shifting weapon against the adaptive wards and felt himself sink in.
In the same instant, the bones around the Auto-Seance began to realign, and all around him flashed accretions and ripples of thoughtstuff. Time within the mindscape skipped forward. The Auto-Seances confines flickered as the memories comprising its structure began to stutter.
The Low Masters were weaponizing their Nether lag against him–trying to strip him of his speed advantage.
He needed to get out. Staying and engaging them in a prolonged engagement on their terrain was folly. He could just jack out. Find another section to come back in or–
[YES. WE HAVE ACCESS TO THE INCUBI.]
[THEY ARE HURT. CRACKED. VULNERABLE. SUCH PAIN.]
Yes. That was a far more enticing option. Far more.
Through the tendrils of his trauma, Avo peered into the cracked shell of his foe and leered at the memories inside. He could hear the Incubus screaming. He could taste their fear. Their pain. Their vulnerability.
This fight could continue. He knew it could. He just needed a change of skin.
And with a thought, Avo began to pour the entirety of himself through the cracks lining his victim’s flesh, devouring all their memories, all their phantasmics, all of who they are, and who they could be.
Like a parasite wriggling its way into an egg, he slithered into their being to the choking accompaniment of their psionic screams and bathed the mind-shred hurt he was causing, all three facets of Avo’s cognition exhaled in euphoric glee.
***
Talon-1 screamed as she felt herself go away.
Words vanished. Things she knew darkened as the fires approached.
The burning crackled with inhuman laughter–with hungry laughter.
She was she was she was she was she was–
She was Avo she was–
She… she–she–
At some point, the thoughts stopped coming from her and started coming from the beast instead.
Talon-1 stopped thinking, but Talon-1 didn’t die.
Someone else grew in place under her inner thoughts. Someone else learned to wear her skin.
***
[MENTAL TEMPLATE SAVED: TALON-1]
+Osjed, do… do you feel like you just… forgot a bunch of stuff all a sudden?+
+What you mean, Venven? Like, do I have brain fog, or do I think someone’s snatching the thoughts out of my mind?+
+Yeah. The second.+

+Well, seein’ that we’re Exorcists and we’re operating within the system’s confines, no. It would take someone making a Heaven of the Nether to get past us.+

+I mean–+

+Listen. You need stop thinking this way, alright? I saw you dust an entire cell of Necros in that Kososo raid a couple of years back.+


+Shit. Don’t remind me. That entire thing was such a mess. Fucking Kososo.+
+My point is: You’re nova, Venven Mori. Maybe not as good as me–+

+Suck a ghoul, Osjed.+
+--But it would take a Necrojack at the absolute apex of skill to snatch shit from us.+
+...Yeah. I guess you’re right. I just… I keep forgetting things down in the admin sequences near Super-Four.+

+Oh. That happens to me all the time too.+

+And you don’t find it weird?+

+There’s a lot of tangled sequences down there. Just looking at all that mem-data gives me migraines and nosebleeds. If the Incubi or whoever want to climb through that jungle, they can be my guest. If they make it through, they earned the right to jack us. But you know what?+
+What?+

+I doubt it. Because if it’s hell for you, and it’s hell for me, it’s probably no cakewalk for the masters either. Look, the average half-strand can’t even dive for more than twenty minutes without breaking from empathic psychosis. We’re rated for five hours. We practically breath the Nether. And it’s going to take a hell of a lot more than just five hours to dig through the tangled thicket at the base of the Oversec.+
+Yeah. Yeah, you’re right.+
+Of course I am. Listen… do you still want to do that thing–+

+Not on official channels, Osjed. After work.+
+Yeah. Alright. After work.+

+And uh… thanks.+
+It ain’t nothing. You’re pretty great, Veven. Doesn’t matter if someone might be better. That doesn’t change the skill you have. Besides, how much better can they be compared to us anyway.+
-Exorcist Osjed Danvens and Exorcist Venven Mori, Oversec-C1
13-17
The Flames Awakened (II)
However unprepared Avo was for the process of burning himself into the marrow of another’s cognition, his surprise doubled as his ghosts began to scream in the voice of his assimilated prey.
[No! No, let me go! Let me fucking go–]
The sheer terror filling her veins was a euphoric rush he could not put into words. As he ate her away from the inside, she did not vanish so much as she fused into his structure, the core of her self-awareness shattering while the dynamics of her mind played on, simulated by his self-moving fires.
In a sense, it was like layering one Metamind atop another. At the very core, he was still himself, though entire portions of his memories vanished and returned between the microseconds as he struggled to conjoin himself fully to her design. Concurrently, new wants and habits flooded his being. Channeling the aspects of Talon-1’s ego, Avo drank in internalized fear for the first time.
Though long had he sequence and cast constructs tied to such an emotion, only now did he conceptualize how it felt when raw thought-numbing dread numbed the mind in its capacity to think.
The experience sent a shivering current through his bones.
A delight, deep and true.
Still acclimating to his altered neurology, he willed himself to shapeshift closer to the woman he just devoured, the Eaters that formed the fiery flesh of his mind incinerating unneeded structures to manifest desired sequences.
The sequences around him dissolved and regenerated into new pathways while the simulated core of his mindscape descended into layered steps as the labyrinth she used assumed the place of his. His very sense of self mutated externally, leaving only enough ghosts to support Avo’s base ego at the center of the entire apparatus, a monster fully tethered to the cognitive feedback of humanity.
Enlightenment was delectable and traumatizing all at the same time.
He dreamed he was Avo, the ghoul. He dreamed he was Talon-1, leader of an Incubi Strike Cell, and proxy-mind parted from the wholeness of the person beneath.
As their joining culminated, his ghosts screamed louder, infected with her disgust at his intrusion, and the despair of being eaten away by what appeared to be a living plague in the Nether without any chance of resistance.
But an Incubus dead was an Incubus still, and when most would have shattered into psychosis, the copy made from Talon-1 mustered the remainder of her hatred and turned to greet her new puppeteer.
[Are you enjoying this, you sick fuck? You killed me. Now you have your ghosts wearing me like I’m some kind of glove. Fuck. You. Do you hear me you corpse-licking bastard? I hope I give you the shits!]
His other submind cut into the conversation, taking on her tone with burgeoning curiosity. [Hmm. Assumed position of alternate. Interesting. Can she still be controlled?]
Avo willed it so that the avatar of Talon-1 liked him instead, that his dissolution of her mind was the best thing she ever experienced. Once more the psionic inferno that he was obeyed, and new nuances were soldered into his new mental template’s sequences. She was happy to be part of him now, true and total.
Until he decided to change once more, formless hydra his mind now was.
He released his enforcement of mandatory joy. Her torment returned, and he found it far more palatable that way. The way Talon-1 hurt was real–the last bit of agency this facet of her mind would ever know.
And, if he was to be truly honest, her suffering still tickled the core of his being.
[Ghosts at 2133 again,] submind three said. [Compared thought patterns. She’s a faster sequencer at baseline. Works with 4.3% higher efficiency than us. Recommend full integration of her habits. Deficient otherwise.]
His other self didn’t need to tell him that. He remembered all her capabilities since she was him now.
[Also recommend using her Auto-Seance. Access cell. Infect them. Spread ourselves wider.]
Yes. He would take that suggestion. And then some.
As Talon-1’s Auto-Seance burst into shape with the expulsion of embers, he grew the necessary sequences inside it to bypass the need for sequencing. Immediately, a phantasmal portal opened within the construct, bridging him to what few surviving Incubi remained.
Between the folds of his thoughts, he heard the quiet laughter of the beast comingle with the desperate cries of Talon-1, wailing for her comrades to flee.
It didn’t matter. He was the only one who could still hear her. None of the other Incubi were prepared when he cast himself into them, his consciousness growing like a burning plague.
***
Shit was already fucked for Talon-3 when he found himself drifting across the open Nether of the lobby in the middle of a trauma exchange.
One second he was about to breach the Auto-Seance and null the four half-strands and whatever sequences they were jacked into, and then next there was just… nothing.
It wasn’t even like he forgot. There was just nothing, and a sense of violated community as if his mind was been stretched wider than it was meant to go.
It took a trauma pattern rattling against his wards to fully sober him from his mind-addled stupor, and he blindly cast out his cycled traumas, he found himself faced with a half-broken Auto-Seance bleeding mem-data over into the administrative node itself, and what looked to be a bonfire of ghosts rising from a blazing accretion that just wouldn't go out no matter how much everyone tried to null it.
Entire sections of the burning mind burst and fragmented before him. Embers took the place of fragmenting ghost stuff, and though Talon-3 swore that he saw pieces of wards fly free, the damage cauterized as fast as it could be inflicted.
Something about it all reminded him of the Conflagration; the way the fiery threads reached out to stitch themselves back together, the way the flames ate away at some of the traumas.
It took him more than a few seconds to realize that the enemy Necros he was preparing to ambush alongside Talon-adversarial Necros he was trying to jump with Talon-6 were also casting at the same mind.
He didn’t have long to question why that was though.
Before his eyes, the inflamed mind roused its smoldering thoughstuff and began spinning. In an instant it lashed out–incandescent ghosts spearing past Talon-3 to strike at someone behind him.
The local sequences were completely fucked apart. Memories meant to be joined were gnawed apart along their lengths leaving most of his cell with their asses bare in the ethereal winds like him.
He didn’t much like Talon-1 from the vibes she gave, but Talon-3 didn’t like plenty of people he worked with. His gut clenched all the same when the lashing ghosts cracked her wards. He tried fragmenting the ghosts linking whatever trauma was being projected. Didn’t work. Each one of his attacks saw ghosts torn free from his mind somehow, and incomprehensibly, the burning mind flowed like surging magma across the length of its reach.
What followed wasn’t entirely clear to him as the first volley of traumas from the other Ad-Necs took his attention. As his wards rattled and his cog-cap spiked, he drove his ghosts to dive into the nearest sequence for concealment.
Not far away, he saw Talon-12 and Talon-19 bridging new sequences from the sides, moving to flank the Ad-Necs. Gazing through his Auto-Seance, he found that there were still fifteen others active in the session.
Fifteen, and then fourteen as their link to Talon-1 suddenly broke with a scream.
+Talon-1–+ He cursed immediately after casting the thought as a trauma-laden ghost struck the memories three sequences down and knocked his hiding place loose into the membrane of thoughts between everything.
His cog-cap spiked past seventy-two percent and his Metamind disabled half of his auxiliary phantasmics to devote more resources to his wards. Leaping out from collapsing progression of memories he dwelled in, he landed somewhere a few strings away from Talon-7, who was emptying their ghost reserves by launching high-area nulling traumas at the Auto-Seance.
Talon-3’s mind spun. Everything was godsdamned fucking mess.
The only saving grace was how the Exorcists seemed ignorant of the literal war happening inside their lobby, but that just meant someone was probably actively sequencing their perceptions.
+Shit! Shit-fuck!+ Talon-3 growled. This dive was well past lost. They needed to jack out. They needed to break away and come back with more assets. He should have trusted his gut with Shard-1; no one skilled enough to snuff an Incubus was going to leave any chance of evidence behind.
This was a trap through and through.
He didn’t even know how compromised his own network was.
+Jack out!+ He cried through his Auto-Seance, casting his thoughts to every other Incubi joined to the session. +Jack out now!+
And just as cut himself free from the session and prepared to end his dive, it happened.
Phantasmal flames erupted up from Talon-7’s accretion in a column of climbing radiance. In the distance, he watched other coruscating spears of burning bright punch up through sequences where his comrades once hid.
The Ad-Nec assault had ceased too, and as the etheric winds stilled from around the Auto-Seance, it seemed the enemy was waiting for things to play out.
Enraptured by confusion, cold terror, and genuine amazement, Talon-3 watched as the blaze swept through Talon-7’s mind, destroying and reconstructing him all at the same time. He was unmade in thought, memory, and constructs, but by the time the fires reached the edges of the Incubus’ accretion, the entirety of his cognition had been rebuilt as a perfect replica.
It wasn’t just a bit like the Conflagration anymore. The way it traveled and burned and consumed… Talon-3 only saw something like that once, and this was the same, only greater in function, capable of breaking and building all the same.
In a nigh instant, a dozen lanes of perception snapped to him all at once. The new ghosts mantling Talon-7’s ego, peeking out like apparitions of steam between the licking tongues of the firestorm, danced and flickered into the shape foreboding silhouette.

Through it all Talon-3 felt them then. The inhuman presence. A second set of awareness nested within the first. They knew he was here, and slowly the fire was beginning to spread along the sequences as well, the structures around dissolving into a madhouse of agonized screams.
He heard them then. The members of his cell. Their voices grew louder and louder with the building crackle of the infectious fire eating through the memories around him. He could hear Talon-1 and Talon-6’s cries blended into each other, the distorted noise coming forward like some kind of chimera of torment.
Something inside Talon-3 broke, and he jacked out.
He abandoned his cell and fled while the nightmare was still unaware of him.
The real exploded back into shape before his very eyes, and he found himself staring up at a gunmetal grey ceiling lined with soft yellow lights. A series of pressure points loosed along his back, and Talon-3 let out a gasp as the spinal clamp released him from his jacking station.
Holding up a shivering hand before his cog-feed, he fought to keep his calm as he pushed himself off the chair.
He needed to get this proxy off of him. He needed to get out. He needed to–
A choked sob escaped from his chest as he tumbled against the wall, his legs shaking too much to bear his weight. He was hyperventilating. That was a first. A few chuckles of nervous, incoherent laughter escaped from him as he crawled into the corner and, with quivering fingers, tore the soft tissue of his proxy mind free from atop his head and freed himself from remembering.
The menders found him later curled catatonic and soaked in his own waste, begging whatever waited on the other “side” of his proxy mind to stay away from him.
Of the twenty Incubi that served as members of the emergency-assembled Strike Cell “Flameater,” five could not be recalled in any capacity by anyone, anywhere, at any point in time aside from a note in one of their backup coldtech terminals, and the fourteen were “consumed by an unknown entity.”

Talon-3 remained the sole survivor of the dive.
Elder D’Rongo’s security was subsequently increased tenfold.
***
+What the fucking-fuck is it doing,+ Peace asked.
From the edge of a partially nulled memory, Emotion cast his perception out at the flames spreading along all the sequences, slowly encircling them from all sides in a rapidly growing cage of fire.
+I do not know,+ Emotion said. It was refreshing to be inflicted with ignorance. He was used to it being the other way around, but it was clear that Defiance’s project possessed far more capability than they anticipated. +This is good.+


+Good? Good! We fucking… One of the war-minds was used up for this. It was supposed to make him easy for us to take. Not whatever cunt-fuck this is.+
A low keening note came from their new Joy, recently arrived through Emotion’s Auto-Seance. Other nodes from each of their variants had also gathered within the crumbling debris of this Auto-Seance in anticipation of reclaiming the Helix, but the creature had escaped from them. Unfathomably, it escaped from them by burrowing into the mind of one of the Incubi.
In the chaos that followed thereafter, the conflagration only spread, consuming all other servants under the Ori.
Whatever phantasmic or power the ghoul possessed, it was beyond Nolothic lore.
For now.
Emotion knew it would please the Hungers most greatly if they could claim such gnosis from the traitor’s inheritor.
But such a prize was far harder to obtain than expected.
+The rot-licking shit is trying to burn away all the memories around us. Leave us trapped.+ Peace cycled another high-yield trauma and Emotion regarded his parted self with muted disappointment. His facet dedicated to war was too crude of an instrument. He wished he had waited a few years before parted him from the consensus. That would made him more effective, and less prone to invectives.
+He is rebuilding the structures around us,+ Emotion corrected. +He will likely attempt to pervert our Auto-Seance from the outside using the corruption he possesses. Such a fascinating power.+ His mind settled on a new approach and he regarded the other two priests. +I will depart and face him. I must learn of his new nature and offer this bounty to our chosen masters.+
+Emotion,+ Joy whispered, aghast at his decision. +He will unmake you.+
+That is of no concern to me. I seek what I seek. And we will reclaim what was lost.+
A new session pulsed inside of him, and he felt another mind structured much like his own speak to him from within his being. +The Exorcists remain suppressed. Shall I reveal the presence of the creature to aid your efforts?+
+No,+ Emotion said. +Keep them ignorant. Rebuild the damage. I will seek a new dialogue with our foe. And true comprehension.+
+I see. Then may you serve the chosen masters well.+
The session ended. Emotion committed himself to his path.
Turning his perception to the other two nodes, he cast but a simple command. +If he destroys me, do not reveal yourselves. We will learn much from how he interfaces with my death.+
Peace sneered. +I still think–+


+Priests.+ The words of the ghost rumbled from all around them, the burning ghosts of the local sequence numbering well past the tens of thousands, all speaking as one. +I took something from you. You wanted it back. You offered me power. Position. Privilege. And slavery. You did something to me earlier. Changed me. Can still remember what you did. Can still remember the Ignorance. The war-mind.+
+No, that can’t… it’s lying…+ Joy moaned.
+Things change. Things always change. You should have learned that across all those years. You should have chosen better masters to serve. But it doesn’t matter. I have… a new path to give you. My own offer. My turn to give you choices. Your turn to take or reject me.+
A low thunderous rumble of cruel mirth flooded the Nether, and Emotion tasted what it was like to be a ghoul.
+But…+ Avo said, releasing a shuddering breath. +I can lie. I hope you tell me no. I hope I can get a reason to break you all.+
+Concave,
Allow me to elaborate on the current situation as clearly as I can.
I have no idea what the fuck is happening.
I say again, idea-no-the-fuck-what.
Strike Cell Flameater is decimated. Their bodies are mind-dead through their proxies, and honestly, there’s nothing left of them. I can’t even classify them as nulled because there’s nothing left of their cognition. No fragments, no drifting artifacts, or leaking emotions.
Even the mem-data is gone.
All we have are Shard-2, who isn’t coherent enough to form words yet, and Talon-6, who is still hiding in a corner somewhere screaming threats at the extraction team because “he can’t let the fire touch him.”
What am certain about is this:
Shard-1 and Shard-2 engaged an adversary capable of jacking and sequencing at extreme speed. Speed almost certainly enhanced by the metaphysical nature of a canon.
They likely left fragments of mem-data within Shard-1 to lure our strike team into a trap, allowing them to bypass multiple compromised Exorcists and surveillance constructs before launching their ambush from an Auto-Seance session installed in the administrative Oversec-C1’s primary superstructure.
This coincides with the decimation of Elder D’Rongo’s shadow detail as well.
Putting what few pieces we have together, I think we’re staring down the barrel of something neither of us wants to face, but have to. It’s clear that whoever we’re facing has in-depth knowledge of our operational capacity and is actively hunting Incubi.
We both know there aren’t that many Ad-Necs capable of doing this. The first, and the uglier possibility, is that we’re dealing with a Silver-on-Silver power play. Likely something to remove D’Rongo from the board. The second, more unsetting scenario, is that we’re throwing lives at the Low Masters again. Less worrying since we managed to burn that infestation before, but we’re not in any shape to trade the lives of our best if the Golds are raring to start the Fifth big one.
The last, least likely, but most troubling, is that we’re facing some kind of lone actor. A rogue Fallwalker master necro of some kind that’s butchering us for purpose or pleasure. I doubt this to be the case, but if it is, we need to resolve them quick. The last thing we need is another dive-psycho without a cause tearing through our ranks without rhyme or reason.
I’m going to need to make an emergency request to private the mind of a category zero asset soon.
Our Incubi aren’t going to be enough for this. We need a heavy. We need to bring in a ‘Clad of our own.
Get someone we can trust.+
-Emergency request from Convex to Concave
13-18
Confess
“You know, Naeko, I… uh, I really respect this about you.”
Chief Samir Naeko would never know how much effort it took on the part of Maru Sandrupal to force those words out. But Trainee Kare Kitzuhada did. She could see it in the web of veins bulging against the right side of her mentor's head, in twitches of his optical implants running like a ring along the back of his skull.
Maru Sandrupal cut a skeletal, vascular figure outside his combat skin, and even the grey and black Paladin uniform lined and dotted in hexagonal synth cells couldn’t hide that tautness pulling at the veins running along his neck, or how every tendon in his face was drawn back like bowstrings on the cusp of snapping.
As the chief sat across from them and gorged himself on multiple orders of “Flappy-and-Largies” pancakes at Swanney’s Sweet-Things, Paladin Sandrupal’s metallic braids swayed back and forth as if the tail of the scorpion, his mind screaming as he struggled not stab his superior.
+You’re doing great, sir,+ Kare said, shooting a soft smile at the side of his face. One of the eyes installed on the side of his head winked at her in thanks for her support.
If she was to be honest though, she really couldn’t tell what worth she was in this situation. She was a Soulless trainee trying to stop a Fifth Sphere Paladin from trying to kill his Eighth Sphere superior in public.
Still, she wanted to serve with distinction, and sometimes that meant pulling your assigned mentor off the leader of your entire outfit when the punches started flying and the curses began to flow.
Of course, Chief Naeko didn’t help with this at all. To this day, Kare wasn’t sure if he was actually clueless about his behavior, or if he did it just to see if he could kill Paladin Sandrupal through elevated blood pressure alone.
“Huh?” the chief said, his words muffled by a mouthful of pancake. At this pre-dawn hour, few were awake in the Undercroft aside from the sleepless, the desperate, and the dubious. Light splashed over his face from the outside as a series of racing aeros screamed past. Empty hover couches lined the inside of the diner in rows, and black and white scenes of classical Voidwatch provided entertainment media played from coldtech projectors hanging below the ceiling.
He didn’t even bother looking at either of them while he continued playing Stormjumpers, his phantoms casting a live interface that displayed what looked like an Omnitech server district under siege. “Sorry, I wasn’t listening.”

Sandrupal clenched his fists so hard his joints rattled in succession. “I said… I… I’m just saying that I admire you for your composure considering that we’re about to get our asses fucked apart by the Golds and Silvers both. You know, because you arrested Abrel Greatling and a godsdamned elder. What part of us not touching Guild shit did you forget, Naeko, because you skipped past the Mid-Guilders and struck your fingers straight in their fucking eye sockets.”
+Too much anger, sir. Try to hold it back a bit more.+
+And you can go fu–sorry, rook. But this sad piece of shit needs to take things serious for once. I don’t care he doesn’t want the job, we’re getting cut down because of his fuckery.+
+It’s alright, sir.+
Of course, her mediation was for naught as Chief Naeko leaned back in his hover chair and snorted a loud laugh.
+I’m gonna fuck this man’s corpse with a goddamn sword and see if he births daggers from his Rash-pores–+

+Sir!+

+...I fucking hate him so godsdamned much right now.+
Naeko swallowed and swiped the menu of his game aside. “Well. I’m glad,” he reached across the table and placed a hand on Sandrupal’s shoulder, causing all the implanted eyes dotting the latter’s skull to swivel over and glare at the offending limb, “that you finally learned to like me.”

And instead of taking his hand back, Naeko just left it there.

Sandrupal exhaled. “I’m being glib, chief. What the shit-fuck did you get us into? Our field guys are already seeing signs of a quiet war being spun up. Godsdamned… weird phenomenon happening to us. Imps getting emptied out of our accounts. Trainees turning up dead or nulled. We’re–you understand you basically signed us up for everything except open warfare, right?”

Naeko gave him a curt nod. “D’Rongo had Dawton killed. Abrel Greatling might be tied up in that mess. Her father too. Now, I didn’t get us into this fight. I justh–just threw a punch back after they started hurting us.”

And just like that, the bulk of Sandrupal’s anger went out like a candle. “And when were you going to tell me this? Never mind, fuck that, how’d you find out?”

“The usual source.”

“Her? She… you know she’s a voider plant, right? You know she’s playing us to her own ends, right?”

The chief just shrugged and sighed. “Welcome to New Vultun, consang. But the thing is–and that’s just the thing–she don’t lie to us much. She’s been good to us and right every time. Without her, that… that crazy Fallwalker guy–what’s his name?”

“Freylain,” Kare answered.
Utility fog spilled out from Naeko and formed a pair of snapping fingers. “That’s the one,” Naeko said. “Good job, trainee. Too lazy to ask my ghosts.”

“Understandable, sir.” It really wasn’t.
Naeko continued. “Well, that silly fool would’ve kept trigging the rash in the Warrens. Look, I know it’s ugly. But it’s always been this way. It’s been like this all the way since Tanhower was chief.”

A practiced moment of silence settled between the two men.
“Speaking of which,” Naeko said, letting out a breath, “when this is done, you can bring up a vote of no confidence and finally sack me for getting us–”

“Samir,” Sandrupal interrupted. “There is no life, no reality, no time or history or canon or chronology in which I like you enough to see you truly happy, and to see someone else suffering the hell is that being Chief of the Paladins.”

“Well, that’s just hurtful,” Naeko said, his face settling into a soft frown.
Kare found it odd how reluctant the chief was with using his Heaven, and how anger never seemed to find any purchase in him.

“Yeah. It’s probably good this way. It keeps the Ori and Kosgans staring at me while you guys keep the city safe. I’m no good at all that running the department stuff, or leading, or speeches, or bookkeeping, or administrative work, or making tea.”

“You’re also bad at showing up to work on time, bad at talking to the proparazzi, bad at setting a good example for our trainees, and bad at this bullshit game you spend all your time playing,” Sandrupal seethed.
Only the last point offended Naeko. “It’s not bullshit. Lots of people worked thousands of hours for this. You see this scene. All that is simulated from–” An emergency alert dissolved the window of his cog-game. Frowning at the inopportune disruption, Naeko’s eyes flashed as settled back into his chair. “Hang on, I gonna have to take… this…”

Kare felt her hairs begin to stand. She had always been good at reading expressions on people, and the one that adorned the chief right now was far from anything good. With how his eyes were darting about, something was wrong, something severe enough to force some semblance of professionalism into Samir Naeko.
“What?” Paladin Sandrupal said, equally unnerved by Naeko’s behavior. “What?”


“Well,” Naeko said, licking away a spot of syrup staining his front teeth, “Oversec-C1 is burning.”
It took a second for the information to fully sink in for Sandrupal. “I’m sorry, what do you mean it’s burning? How the hell does a Nether lobby burn?”
Naeko offered a shy smirk and distracted him with something else to be angry about. “Abrel Greatling is also gone–”

Sandrupal tore the table aside and promptly dislocated all his fingers punching his boss in the face.
***
The sequences comprising the lobby didn’t burn so much as they became Avo himself, and the influx of ghosts and information flooding his mind broadened his awareness instead of choking him.
He was becoming more without any need for digestion.
Something about that offended the beast that he still was deep down inside, but he was too distracted by the legion of mental templates populating his Metamind.
[Summation: Over fifteen mind templates achieved. Incorporating best habits and structures into ego. Sequencing efficiency estimated to increase by 11.34%. Added 344 combat-variable traumas to Ghostjack. Ghosts have been increased to 233, and component memories–]
He cut off the useless narration of his submind as he just let the details flow into him. He wasn’t interfacing with the Nether so much anymore as he was a living part of it. The Metamind and him were now conjoined inexorably on some level, each part spilling over into each.
It was with this newfound integration that he began wielding it in the same fashion he did the Woundshaper.
Here, however, he cultivated pseudo-minds from the branches of his flaming memories instead of blood-born constructs. Approximately twenty percent of the administrative node had been subsumed by him, leaving only the greater lobby beyond and the small clearing left for the Low Masters’ Auto-Seance at his core.
There was a pleasure in amassing weight in both cognition and thaumaturgy. Usefulness as well.
Fusing over three thousand Whispers into shape from the myriad ghosts gathered within his form, everything within his vicinity was caged in a panopticon of perception.
[Sequencing complete.]
[Feels strange. Just growing structures into place. Miss sequencing. This feels too easy. Weightless.]
[Convenient though.]
[Yes. Convenient.]
[More constructs. More watchtowers. Exorcists still don’t seem aware.]
He guessed that was the Low Masters doing. That facade was probably fated for a loss, however.
With how much he had eaten away from the lobby’s internal structure, his presence was about as circumspect as Voidwatch was if they desired to glass part of Idheim.
In this came the first and most major downside of his new form: the lack of silence.
He couldn’t stop burning; he couldn’t hide within the confines of another sequence due to the ever-replicative nature of his ghosts; seeing as he was the flame itself, there was also the question of what might happen to him if a Thoughtwave Disruptor impacted him.
[Death.]
[Nulled.]
[Like a candle: Snuffed.]
Glad to see his other selves were such open rays of sunshine.
Regardless, this development was to be a gradual education. For now, a key impediment was eating one of the Low Masters without getting surprised by any of their other hidden tricks. As far as he could tell, they were still inside the Auto-Seance’s half-crumbled session staring out at him like soldiers manning the battlements against a patient wildfire.
They hadn’t offered a reply to his offer for them to surrender themselves to him.

Just as he had no interest in swearing his fate to the Hungers, he doubted they would grant him succor using the flesh of their egos either, but they were clearly compelled to scheme and hold the position in the hopes of getting at the Helix back from him.
Something that would become infinitely harder if he or they just jacked out and went off-grid.
This was to his advantage: now, the worst possibility was getting nulled. Aside from that, he doubted they could dive into his mind without being dissolved entirely. That sent a shiver of excitement through him. Sometimes, the fire cut one way, other times it hewed the other.
He had less to lose than they. By exercising his patience–
[Base-mind. Should know that Draus is currently aiming a gun at our head. Kae’s begging for her to wait. Their argument won’t last. Might be getting shot soon.]
A note of annoyance sounded from all his ghosts as the various people he absorbed groaned within him like a concert. [Doing what we told her to do if we got nulled.]
[Yes. Still would be good if she knew though.]
That made Avo consider burning the knowledge directly into her mind–but he paused.
Could he even do that without compromising her cognition? And even if the answer was yes, would she be willing to accept his intrusion into her inner palace as he was right now? No. She cared for that. Injecting his knowledge into her directly would damage her trust in him irrevocably.
Some part of him… felt bad about that. Felt bad in a way that ached.
In a way that was all too human in some parochial facet.
It seemed with the additional structures he grew within himself, true empathy was extending its roots into him as well.
Interesting.
Still. That was a slight impediment to his plans. He could adjust.
He cast the details through Chambers instead, uncaring if the man would be rendered ego-dead by the act. Per his thoughts followed the agreement of his subminds. At once they constructed an Auto-Seance and activated the session he had connected to Chambers. Pouring his ghosts across, he tried to restrain the damage he would cause, but with each sequence he brushed, the structures collapsed and filled his Metamind.
Chambers shuddered almost immediately, mind-dead as Avo’s totality swept out from his epicenter like a wildfire.
Unfortunate. And very impractical. This meant he wouldn’t be able to interface with the others on a deeper level until he learned to subjugate his new capabilities or install protections.
For now, he directed his subminds to speak on his behalf, filling Chambers’ vegetative corpse with his ghosts to deliver the message.
He had other things to focus on right then.
Namely, the single bridge of memories extending out from the inside of the Auto-Seance.
A single accretion came drifting across the pathway, simulation active and running, the simplicity of its make taunting Avo. It seemed a wick, ready for the burning, and part of him wanted to take it into himself as well.
But in deeper than the depths of minds came two voices joined in a rare instance of agreement.
“Caution, master-er–masters—master.” Even the Woundshaper was taken about how to address his current state. “That structure is not of your making. An unstable foundation can be ensured through incompetence or deliberate malice.”
“If you embark on such a journey, understand you are at the mercy of unknown winds,” the Galeslither added. “It would be wiser for us to leave, but since I am forced to dwell and view the world from the eyes of a slavering fool, then I say it is best for you to keep to a corner, and leave little room to be struck down.”
[Wise. Take advice.]
[Counterpoint: Hungry. Want to break. Want to null. Want to hurt.]
His mind was awash with warring voices, but at the same time, an impossible placidity emanated from his core. Annoyance dissolved at his will. As did agitation or frustration.
Such was another fascinating benefit to his change–the immediate attuning of emotions by command of thoughts or desires.
He was, in some sense, a mind capable of self-induced feedback, self-induced propulsion.
Tentatively, he approached the lone priest by extending memory tendrils of his own. Three simulated sequences formed tracks of memory, and from their tips did he cast his perception at the lone foe that dared face him.
Within the contrasting sequence, the Famine of Emotion stood alone at the edge of his path, the world around him mem-data beside a bridge made from bone.
A beat passed. Silence was the greater gulf between them than the separation of memories. Both had much to say, yet apprehension about how they should speak.
Ultimately, Avo erred on the side of aggression, prepared to fire his reflexes anew and tear into his foe to indulge in further expansion.
+I should thank you,+ he said. +For the war-mind. For what you did to me. Made me greater than I ever could do to myself.+
Emotion didn’t react to that, but their reply told Avo all he wanted to know. +That was not our intention.+

+I guessed. Do you remember the war-mind? The living absence in the Nether? The one that makes us all blend.+
+No. Such a thing should be impossible. Until you.+

+Until me.+
Another pause followed.
+We will not stray from the promise as Defiance had. Such is our creed.+ Emotion had more to say after. +But we can be joined against common enemies. Ori-Thaum. Highflame. The Guilds. Between our understanding and your new… attributes, we can–+

+No we. Never we. Just you and your false-god.+ Avo studied the paltry little mind facing him without fear. Again, the power dynamic shifted, and the ghoul felt as if a god staring down at an ant. What did the little Low Master know that made him so stalwart? The promise of understanding made Avo want to burn brighter.
+Without your Helix, we will not be able to access the sanctuary. We will not be able to create more of your kind to offset the pain of the Hungers. We will not be able to see Noloth rightfully restored.+
+These are your final words to persuade? Desperation.+
+Clarity,+ Emotion replied. +You have not seen the fullness of our ability. As have we underestimated you. But you are right. Our needs are urgent. We cannot dally for long. To this end, we promise this: if we cannot be of alignment, then know that we will dedicate ourselves to the pursuit and unmaking of you and all you encounter.+
Avo taunted the Low Masters with a sneering laugh. +And how will you do that if I set all of the Nether on fire?+
There came no hesitation in Emotion’s following words. +You are not beyond our ability to snuff, even now. But we will learn from you. We will understand you. And we will replicate that which you have inflicted on yourself.+
Wisping incandescence crept closer to Emotion in the Nether. The priest quavered nor shook.
+Could take you now. Drink you away. Make you a part of me.+
+You could,+ Emotion admitted. +But you are uncertain as to the risks of my subsumption. You remember the war-mind, and you wonder if we have others. Or I can trigger one right now.+
Reality might be divine, but the mind is sacrosanct, Jaus Avandaer.
You can change the world. You can make fire sing for you and weave golden threads from the light itself.
You can hide a city in a pond and summon mountains with the merest whisper.
You can have a blade deemed ever-piercing and watch the fabric of totality shred when it greets a shield deemed impregnable by the anvil of lore.
To be a god is to be rule-maker; the sword-holder; to take concept as your flesh.
Imagine now someone with absolute dominion over thoughts. Or memories. Or emotion.
Now, imagine it to be all of us.
The Nether is a construct of freedom above all others. Freedom for each and every person to wield a facet of the divine, but to also fashion instruments of war and protection from the matter of their own agency and memories.
This is what I offer you, Godbreaker. Freedom. Radical freedom. Freedom for everyone to be themselves, but understand the other. Freedom for every man, woman, child, and thinker to be their own lord, to reign over the palaces of the internal.
And when the time comes, should your dream come to fruition, I too offer my vision of the coming future–one where we deal in philosophy and enlightenment. Where humanity is above death as the chains of their consciousness continue onward eternal, yet each day their egos die, only to be birthed again from the wretched corpse of ignorance.
You have freed us from the tyranny of the material. Let me give you the higher threshold. All I ask is for you to accept a change to our history–an adjustment so meager you won’t even remember making it.
-Letter from Wahakten, the Thief of Dreams, Priest of the Nolothi, and Servant of the Hungers
13-19
Lost Testament
+I can still feel it,+ Avo said. +Still feel it nested inside me. Paradoxical matter. It’s nothing… but only nothing could have bridged the gap inside the fire. Only nothing.+ Laughter unsheathed from him in a series of low hisses and he pitied the ancient priest.
Oh, to dive so deep and live so long yet still be greeted by ignorance. What greater pain could a master feel than a chink in the fortress of their knowledge?
+We have more than a single type of war-mind, and of the counter-cognitives, there are plethora.+
+Good. I believe you. But I don’t think you’ll use them anymore. Not with…+ Avo tested his new mental templates, and added their vocals as a backdrop to his to better mock his former owners. +This happening. More unexpected surprises. Hm. I wouldn’t mind but you…+
He was pleased with how Emotion’s ray of perception twitched from end to end of the tongues of flame manifesting faint mirages of the recently devoured. To cause such disquiet in a creature empty of feelings was a feat worth savoring.
+Don’t think your owners will want me now either. I’m a plague now. A fire burning through the innards of their sea. I spread. And they want to own everything. Tell me, Emotion. Tell me if I was ever truly considered for ascension among you? I’m curious.+


+Yes,+ Emotion replied, after but a moment’s pause. +Peace would have loathed you. Joy would have wept for you. But I would have been well served by you. You are not Defiance. You would have never balanced me the same way. You are… curious. And different. Too inhuman to truly be scarred by the cruelties of the world, but also willing to drown in the minds of others. He made you well.+
A compliment from a hollow being. How flattering.
And pointless.
+Might I show you a final memory before our words run dry and bloodshed follows?+ Emotion asked. +A moment lost to history, given freely between foes to be. As I have done with my son eons past.+
A trap of sentiment, perhaps, but one of immense curiosity. A mere few minutes ago, Avo would have rejected such a bargain without further thought. To accept memories from another Necro was an expression of the highest trust. Such a thing was entirely absent between him and the shriveled effigies that named themselves kin to his father.
Now, however, things were different. He was different.
Memory had gone from construct of artistry and sequencing to something between fuel and seed, with his body existing as a living garden of immolation, growing and shedding pieces at will.
They lacked the trauma to break his immensity. They lacked the ability to lay their thoughts upon his mind without being unmade themselves.
He was beyond vulnerability. And even if should his confidence be proven hubris, all that waited was death, and all that represented to a Godclad was a setback and a moment of learning.
+Show me the memory,+ Avo said. +Doubt it will make a difference in what is to come.+ As he cast out these thoughts, he noticed narrowing beams falling on his person from the lobby beyond. Surprise flowed into him from partially subsumed sequences and ingested mem-data told him intimate details about the Exorcists that frequented the administrative node the most.
It seemed whatever the Low Masters were doing to hide their presence was no longer in effect.
They were surrendering their masquerade as well. Curious. And desperate.
All this made him wonder more about the moments he was to receive.
The bridge of mem-data that Emotion built outward to greet him was once a nigh-featureless stretch of memories when peered at as a simulation. Now, however, a sky was being painted with the amber colors of sunset while ghosts unrolled a phantasmal horizon into shape.
Emotion stood on a cliffside now, so close to the precipice that Avo wondered if the priest would have chosen to step over the edge if the memories were made real. Beside the Famine stood a younger man adorned with many of the same features but none of the disposition.
+Avohakten?+ The ghoul studied his namesake. Walton’s long-dead son bounced in his saddle atop a massive war-dog. He smiled too broadly and brightly, and the fact that he was bedecked in cerulean plate enameled with the vagueness of a skeleton told Avo he was dealing with someone well versed in the ways of pleasure and vanity.
+I think I would have hated him,+ Avo said, casting his thoughts over into the memory while Emotion just stared at his son. Avohakten, for his part, was staring into the far distance, at countless small and distant dots dragging enormous slabs of marble while others dug deep ravines down through the pearlescent soil stretching out all around them.
+You would have have,+ Emotion admitted. +He was too much a lover, even for me during those days. He cared too deeply, and too little at the same time. A terrible quality for a ruler. Even worse for one meant to be a servant.+
Avo spawned a few additional Whispers from his form to better glean the undertaking happening in the foreground. The patterns of the ravines looked familiar to him, somehow, with their curving bifurcations parceled chunks of land into sigil-like sections that reminded him of…
+Districts,+ he breathed. +This was New Vultun.+

+No.+ The single word was spat with all the force Emotion could muster. The Low Master glared, and Avo learned that just because his foe couldn’t feel didn’t mean he was beyond offense. +Old Noloth. A grand undertaking as demanded by our masters. A place capable of drinking away the excesses of the gods and sparing our peoples the sickness of miracles.+
Avohakten opened his mouth to speak, but no sound followed. Just the rapid movement of lips and laughter thereafter.
+What’s wrong now? Hungers take his voice?+
+No. We did in the time before our separation. It… reminded us of our own. It made us doubt, and it shook our faith.+
And so Walton surgically removed the component that was causing the emotions instead of resolving the issue itself. Ever the Necro, even before the Nether itself.
+You should start by burning this memory. It will reveal to you who we were. What we remember of our old faiths and the cultures and peoples therein.+

+And why do I want this?+ Avo asked.
The priest slipped out of the sequence and casually approached the ghoul’s winnowing flames. +I do not wish to be forgotten. I do not wish for my home to be forgotten. And neither would Defiance, I think. This is your inheritance too. Creature though you might be in my eyes, if you are to be a son of Noloth, then it will do you well to remember what we were fighting for, and what you may decide to fight against.+
The absurdity of the man’s sudden sentimentality made Avo laugh. +Ignorance didn’t work so now you try knowledge?+

Emotion didn’t dignify the taunt with a response. The memory faded. Beyond them, the Exorcists began to move in, numbering over twelve thousand.
+You want to know something before I take your mind?+ Avo asked.
+Speak.+

+I would have never joined you. I despise you. And pity you. Still don’t see why you decided to give yourselves to the Hungers. Still don’t see it. Could have done anything. Could have lived free.+

Emotion gave but a low hum in return. +Take the memories into yourself and then judge us. I will make no defense of what I have done. I regret nothing, but I have sinned all the same.+ A beat followed. +You judge me now in the same way he did then, you know? On this, you are alike. Time will prove if you are as much fool as he.+

The mention of time made Avo think of Zein, and he found himself wincing as he considered being at the mercy of a future beyond his control. +No. Time will prove nothing. Only will and power. My will. My will ascending. I will accept your gifts. The war-mind. This memory. Your ego. The others. Someday. In the end. I will exist above this city. I will lurk in the dream of every dreamer. I will feed strength to those that seek to rise against fate. And I will be waiting for the Ladder to return just so I can learn how the Hungers taste.+
From the priest leaked the closest emotion he had to loathing.
And pride.
+If we could have only conceived of your like before our betrayal,+ Emotion said. Then, he thought about his words a bit more. +But such a thing can yet be corrected, can’t it? To be eternalized as the perfect slave of our empire reborn. That is a compliment. But to you, I suppose I could offer no greater insult. The Hungers will take pleasure in seeing you shackled to a newer purpose.+
All the ghosts comprising Avo’s cognition hissed and cursed. Fifteen other voices hurled slurs and roars of rage as he swept through down upon Emotion and the surrounding memories, his thoughtstuff a tsunami portending a wildfire.
And just as the memories began to burn, something pulsed at the heart of Emotion’s accretion, and his mind fissured from existence.
But the cracks didn’t stop there.
They continued to spread, and where the fire flowed, a spreading chasm in the Nether was there to greet them.
In the clash, Avo felt himself part of a waterfall, plunging again into something entirely unknown.
***
You aren’t.
You can’t be understood.
There is no understanding you.
You are a different angle of a song–a concept impossible, short of twists and self-delusion.
You are a sense that never was.
You are a color that never was painted upon reality’s canvas.
You should have swallowed the thinker entirely. That’s what the priests made you for. To be an endless pit for minds uncontainable.
You weren’t finished though. Eventually, they just go insane and experience ego-death. You were meant to reach into them. You were meant to infest them without an understanding of anything.

But even if you were completed, it wouldn’t have mattered.

This thinker has a piece of ignorance inside him. He wouldn’t know you. And so, you would have been undone by the touch of your brother trapped in a mind you were both meant to contain.
It is a good thing that the priests made sure you were barren of thoughts.
It wouldn’t do for a war-mind to be so embarrassed…
***
As the chasm flattened, Avo felt his mind elevated back to baseline coherence. Odd as these new sensations were, he wasn’t left in a stupor this time, though he also didn’t feel like he gained anything new.
He was unreasonably disappointed.
At the heart of his being, the strangeness bridging his subminds felt like a lodestone for his ego.
[Didn’t know what that was.]
[Channel another mind template? See what they can get?]
[Memories tell us nothing. Exorcists approaching. Should absorb the Auto-Seance. Take their memories. Then…]
[Could burn away the entire Oversec.]
[Yes. Could. But very loud. Very obvious. Low Masters exposed us for a reason. Want to turn Necros against us. Make us easy to hunt.]
[We burn. We assimilate memories. We are easy to hunt.]
[Need to find method for silence again.]
[Yes.]
[Yes.]
As the first Exorcist cast trauma splashed uselessly against his immensity, Avo coiled around the Low Masters’ Auto-Seance and drained its constructs away. Mem-cons and traps were boiled and added to his inventory. Knowledge threaded into his mind like new currents joining a stream.
He suddenly remembered how to speak High Nolothic, among other things. Supposed details from culture and history–the “gift” offered by Emotion before… whatever he did to himself.
The Auto-Seance itself was somewhat unsurprisingly devoid of additional minds. The other Low Masters must’ve jacked out at some point. Wise. Annoying. Such was the difficulty with fighting another Necro in the open. If you weren’t fast, they would just depart.
Thus was his newest weakness revealed–he could not hide himself any longer. For as fast and infectious as they were, the Conflagration driving him was beyond his understanding to disguise.
A dozen more impacts trickled against his cog-feed. He considered having his subminds create layered wardings as used by Mirrorhead, but he decided against it in favor of swallowing some new traumas for his Ghostjack.
[We now number 44,138 Ghosts in total.]
But despite his newfound mass, he found himself more fluid and fleet than ever before.
He regarded Oversec-C1 with passing interest. New minds were jumping from point to point–their accretions strange and unnatural. Canon-channeling Paladins was what his submind guessed. His other estimated how long it would take for him to spread through the entirety of the system itself along with how much of the Nether could be usurped and if he could survive a Thoughtwave Disruption.
It would be an act of little difficulty to vaporize all these little Exorcists as well. There were millions of them approaching him. Millions casting desperate little missives using their ghosts. He had torn a few thoughts out from the Nether before they could arrive at the wanted destination just because he could.
Their struggle against him was analogous to a swordsman trying to split a hurricane.
Hopeless. Absolutely hopeless.
He could drink all of them into his mind in an instant.
And perhaps it was the ease of the action that put him off. The lack of flavor in such a slaughter.
Staying wouldn’t be wise either.
With the Low Masters gone and the Incubi scattered, his purpose here was spent. There was little else for him to pursue besides–
The idea came from a more impulsive theory than coherent thought.
He hadn’t had a chance to “speak” properly with Abrel yet. And here he was with her session within his depths and her mind template not yet included in his growing collective.
She would be far more fun to simulate than any of the Exorcists. Yes, she would be a better part of his diet–a better subject to experiment on.
Except for Chambers, who…
He suddenly remembered Draus shooting him in the face as the memories formed inside him. But those weren’t his memories. They were came from another vessel–another mind he usurped, if only briefly before demise halted his assimilation.
[Draus shot Chambers in the head,]
[Almost immediately.]
[The moment she noticed the flames.]
[Didn’t even get a chance to download a full template.]
+How are we still alive?+
[Denton. She’s examining us now. Sunrise too.]
Avo grunted. Well. Not unexpected. Good Reg. She was probably going to hate these flames.
Shaking the thoughts off, he set upon one final diversion before jacking out.
The question: if he was now a self-moving ego, then what was to follow should he unmake another Godclad?
Perhaps Abrel Greatling might offer him true insight.
+What the fuck do you mean you gave it the memories of Noloth? The creature–+

+Is our enemy. But also no ally to the Guilds. It can yet be turned to purpose, and from what I perceived of its new design, the touch of subtlety is lost to it. We will have time to study it. Learn from it. Perhaps even become it–+

+Become… like that thing? To have no self? To burn and hear the fires crackle in the voices of our victims? The cruelty is too much, Emotion–too much!+
-The Low Masters
13-20
Become (I)
RESURRECTION - 100%
Strands of thaumic flame tore Chambers upward into the real as he shuddered into existence where he last died. He spent most of the time complaining to the burning-seed-chicken that was his Heaven, but it didn’t talk like Avo’s inner gods. Yet.
Fucking rotlick keeps all the good shit for himself. Kept killing Chambers for no reason too. Or maybe it was the Reg who shot him.Things get pretty hard to tell when all your memories get evaporated, and you end up only being able to observe yourself from narrow pinpricks of consciousness.
As his senses crumbled back into place like an avalanche, he found Draus still jabbing her projectile launcher at Avo, Denton and the bug-cluster-bioform trying to talk her out of it, and Cas standing next to the stairway with an arm folded, face scrunched in confusion.
Yeah, he looked like how Chambers felt inside.
Shaking his head, Chambers walked over next to the Agnos who rubbed at her own arms. She was very deliberately looking away from Avo–away from the ever-growing inferno that was his phantasmal halo.
Now, Chambers didn’t consider himself the smartest nu-dog in the vat, but he could tell when someone was hurting something bad. He was the same way around glowing gun barrels after his father decided to “brand” him that one time. Ugly shit, but time scabbed your hurt plenty.

Time the poor girl didn’t have.
Off to the side, Essus was sitting up, leaning against the wall. The dancing ghosts that burned and wouldn’t stop burning cast pools of darkness around his expressionless face. His eyes darted over to stare at Chambers, and the ex-enforcer awkwardly mimed his finger guns at him in response.
The refugee just shook his head and laughed. “It is pointless even to rest with you all. I am truly beyond damnation.” A few more demented chuckles escaped from him. He went back to staring at Avo–staring at the ghoul’s burning mind.
…Yeah, that consang was north of fuckeduptia by Chambers’ estimations too.
“”So,” Chambers said, announcing his presence to the rest of the room, “one of you definitely killed me again. We’re really making a habit of going after poor old Chambers, huh?” He positioned himself close beside Kae so as to block Avo from her line of sight.
He wasn’t that crazy old hundred-arms lady they kept talking about–he couldn’t fuck with time. But he could distract people from stuff. Block what they don’t want to see.
The mind’s pretty good at not noticing stuff you don’t want it to.
Draus didn’t bother turning to regard him, which was kinda expected. The Reg likely knew he was back before he even did. She could probably hear his heartbeat or something, and the way those little specks of glass orbited her person like a glittery asteroid belt was also some weird shit.
“See,” she said, punctuating her words with a snort. “Seems like gettin’ shot cures the burnin’ after all.”

Well, that pretty much confirmed who shot him. Wasn’t that unexpected–Draus was always kind of a rough bastard with how she treated him. But what could he do? He might’ve been a ‘Clad too now, but she was just too strong, too vicious. He could set things on fire and grow flesh from the burning or some shit, but she got Mirrorhead’s kit.
He felt so helpless. At her mercy–
[ACTIVATING LUSTAWAY]
Ah, fuck, he needed to stay focused.
“Did he leave anythin’ inside you?” Draus asked. She cocked her head at Denton who had both her hands held up in a placating gesture, forcing Draus to point her gun offline so as to not shoot through her. “The Glaive here thinks that Avo was tryin’ to reach through you. Remember anything?”
Chambers closed his eyes and delved deep into his own thoughts. Darkness greeted him. Darkness, and thoughts of Draus overpowering him and crucifying him to the wall using her glass while everyone watched. He would say no, and she would proceed to amplify her interrogative efforts–
[ACTIVATING LUSTAWAY]
“Fuck,” he clutched his head, “focus Chambers, you half-strand. Focus. Think about that shit later. Alone.”

“What’s that?” Draus asked.
“Nothing. If–if our rotlick was still inside me, I’m not feeling him, alright? Either he’s being really subtle about it, or he’s got some… size problems with his ghosts, but ol’ Chambers here isn’t getting his brain-bits tickled. Just me right now. Just me. Just… me…” A twang of annoyance strummed a cascade of mocking notes inside him. “Great. Now you got me doubting myself.”
Denton added her own question as well. “Are you’re certain he left nothing within your memories?”
“No! Well, if you’re talking about the mind-eating fire thing, it sure as shit doesn’t feel like it did before. That took time to chew through me. This felt like… I was evaporating! And getting dissolved into someone else. And there were like these… other voices. I had a memory that my dick was missing but I was waxing myself for some strange reason, and made me feel weird as fuck. I mean, it was kinda hot, but still–pretty fucking weird.”
Everyone stared at him.
“I’m trying to be honest.”
“Yeah? Be honest in a summary.” Draus shook her head. “We don’t need no illustrative detail about what tickles you.”

There was no fucking winning with these people.
“Well, he’s not burning like Avo is. If the Eaters were active inside of him, they would express themselves as they had earlier." Denton turned back and studied Avo. The ghoul was holding himself in place with his Echoheads. Intermittently, his fangs would click together and he would make these strange expressions his facial structure just didn’t seem to support.
“Now that shit just looks uncanny,” Chambers muttered.

“Yeah,” Draus said in a rare moment of agreement between them. “Should just kill him and let him explain it to us.”

“If we shoot him, we won’t be able to understand what’s happening,” Denton interrupted. “When Agnos Kusanade was burning, her exocortex backed up her missing memories and fed the Eaters a constant supply of fuel to burn. Avo… I don’t think he’s using his memories up. I think he’s growing. The fire is constant, and his mind isn’t destabilizing. He has been this way for far too long, and the brightness and depth only seems to be growing.”
“There is no hint of the Conflagration inside him,” Denton said. “Whatever Avo did, it is not affecting him anymore. Not right now, anyway.”

Draus scoffed. “That still don’t explain why Avo’s mind is burnin’.” Her last words were directed more toward Denton. “You absolutely sure he’s still there? Because with Kae–”

“With Agnos Kusanade, her mind should have burned away without the exocortex.” The glaive turned to regard the ghoul’s Metamind halo. The ghosts that once wisped out from it now spewed expulsions of flame that wove into a blazing hurricane as it spiraled. “He’s still there. I can see that his mind isn’t burning away but… growing. And becoming brighter.”

“So, what’s that mean, Denton?” Draus asked, waving a hand in Avo’s direction. “Kae? You got any ideas? You know, since you…”

An unfitting scowl deepened across the Agnos’ face. She looked… jealous. “I learned that I actually know very little today, Jelene. Even about my own life. Maybe his half-strand of a father hid another miracle inside him. Maybe he ruined someone else’s life to do it.”

Chambers awkwardly patted her on the shoulder. She just looked down and offered him an apologetic smile.
Something about her made him feel sad too. Like she was the wrong class of person to be this miserable.
Him and Essus? Well, they were born to be coal.
The Agnos should’ve been protected. It wasn’t right. It wasn’t sensical, but it was just how things went for the longest time.
Cas let out a breath as well. “Yeah, Val, I don’t know. You’re right about most things, but this…” He looked up at Sunrise, who had its drones spread wide over Avo’s unmoving form.
“Unsure,” Sunrise said, its tone holding an inquisitive wistfulness. “I… do not know. And there is nothing in the databanks that I can draw upon. This is… unprecedented.”
“Yeah,” Cas carried. “Maybe it might be best to kill him and clean the slate. See what he remembers.”

“Give this a few more minutes,” Denton said. “With how he is right now, I don’t think anyone can interface with him. I want to see if there are any other changes. And I don’t want to interrupt anything.”

“Interrupt?” Chambers asked.
“The fires are spinning,” Denton replied. “That means he’s might still be doing his own thinking. And if he’s in the middle of a dive, I don’t want to stop that before he finishes doing what he must. You understand, right Captain Draus?”

Well, that last part was just sliding a shiv between the rib-plates.
Draus sneered. “We consangs, ‘Glaive.’ Play that ‘we’re a team’ shit with someone else.” A beat passed. “Five minutes. If nothin’ changes with him, I’m settin’ him free. Five minutes.”

Denton met her stare without difficulty and nodded. “I suppose that’s how long he’ll have for now.”

As the conversation settled, their eyes all wandered back to Avo's halo, wondering just what was hidden between the clefts of his flamed-veiled memories.
***
Pouring himself through his Auto-Seance into the remnants of Abrel Greatling’s mind paid immediate dividends. Though there wasn’t enough of the other Godclad left to form a full template, he still subsumed multiple useful structures into himself.
Flashes of bygone memories sprouted amidst his labyrinthine cognition. He felt as if a sea within a sea, the center of himself a countless intersection of paths and thoughts boiled away from his recent victims or borne from the fruits of his own skill.
As he condensed himself within Abrel’s mindspace, he waited to sample a few traumas patterns from the Exorcists guarding her before they jacked out.
He tasted other deviations in the mem-data as well. Intercepted echoes left by thoughts calling for the activation of certain contingencies to cut Abrel from the Unwhere so, “it wouldn’t spread.”
There was a sublime satisfaction in being feared.

Avo loved it. Talon-1 found it highly unprofessional. The Woundshaper delighted in the present. The Galeslither whistled notes of morose horror at what he inflicted upon those he burned away.
[Exorcist Geunne had an interesting construct. High regret build. Very effective on parents. Has much to do with disappointing her children. Hurting them when younger. Pain has specific edge. Has heighted effectiveness against mental templates Talon-8 and Talon-17. Abandonment issues. Menders didn’t fully fix. Internalizing weakness comprehension.]
[Should consider eating one of the Exorcists. Might make for interesting addition to our collection.]
[No. Hunger talking. Want to feel them hurt and die. Be honest. They are poor Necros. Soft meat. Bad for our teeth.]
[No fun. You sound like Draus.]
[Simulating 44% Draus template from existing sequences: “Godsdammit, rotlick. Stop talkin’ about this twisted shit and get on with the run. Ain’t got time to burn.]
[Might be more words than she would use. Would be more helpful if we had her as template.]
[Not burning her. Can still feel her session in our Auto-Seance. Chambers too. They trust us still. Trust. Quality thing for this city. Template isn’t worth that.]
[Isn’t? Sounding human.]
[You sound like Zein with drugs.]
And for the first time, he felt his ghosts grind against each other, the tension within him actually manifesting as phantasmal struggle.
+Enough,+ he ordered his subminds to cease. He had the will, but they seemed to vocalize much of his flowing desires. Perhaps he could build more balance into himself. He fused over some of Talon-1’s mental form and felt the slavering cruelty in him lessen immediately.
It wasn’t like using a Morality Injector–it was like rewriting himself outright. Some of the human aspects of his new meta-neurology didn’t conjoin well with his base-mind, however. Trauma rattled like lighting pulsing within the sheen of a stormcloud.
He had much to relearn of his new form.
Stretching his presence wide through Abrel’s hollowed mindscape, he stitched himself into her senses, her perception, her vessel, and like water filling the same cup, he wore her battered flesh and found himself staring out into the void.
Darkness cradled him in its embrace. Long stretches of nothing built upon nothing lined with striations vibrating with unnatural distortions. Sunderwilds, he thought. Flickers of moving light passed in the distance. Flashes of threading beams. Those could be voidships in motion or distant sections of the Unwhere golems shunting another prisoner across its conduits.
Right now, however, they had surrendered Abrel Greatling to the void.
They had surrendered her to him.
And in the weightless silence, he wielded her flesh while he waited to see if she would resurrect naturally. He had drawn the final remnants of her ego into him, after all. Forcing her to wriggle in as the coldness clutched her prison capsule, she answered him like a puppet most wondrous.
But there lingered an absence yet; a spot of nothingness existed where her Frame should have pressed against his if they were in actual proximity with each other. He couldn’t access her Heavens either, though he remembered specks of what she could do with her all-cutting wings of light.
Just how did the tissues of the mind and will interconnect? And where the latter subside for the interest of one who wished to devour it from afar.
Perhaps the vessel needed to die as well? Perhaps its continued state of “living” counted as part of a platonic formula for the existence of an entire being. Merely removing one aspect of the equation was not enough, it seemed.
It was time to ensure the destruction of both.
Making Abrel die took a moment of finesse. If he had only his base-mind to rely upon, he would have considered accelerating another object into her using the Unwhere network itself. From memories offered by Talon-6, however, a neater option prevailed.
Overclocking her biometric implants took little more than a thought but as he was the sole arbiter of these systems in absence of that which he subsumed, he overclocked them–along with all other active implants in her body–and especially her brain.
The results were biologically cataclysmic.

Abrel Greatling’s body was a morphology of expense and transhuman artistry. From skin to sinew, her make was quality and efficiency, with even the oxygen burning at nearly a thousand times the efficiency of a flat.

Even if she weres stripped of her Frame, she would have walked a god among the baselines. She could have sprinted for a week without tiring–strained against tons and only failed against the limitations of physics instead of her own tendons.
But supporting this was a body-architecture equally complex, and when that was compromised…
Her innards were the first thing to distend. Something about how hyper-excited her organs were paired with a blood-based crystallizing cushion matrix ensured her final end. The protections–once meant to harden against concussive impacts–resulted in prolapse instead.
As bulging buds of flesh distended from her orifices, he felt the world around his senses slowly going dark as her senses began to fade, and the body began to fail…
***
RESURRECTION - 1%
Abrel Grealting was again.
She remembered drowning in chaos and hate for what felt like eons. She remembered an unseen presence violating her mind.
And she remembered…
She remembered a fire, stripping what remained of her.
A fire that thought. A fire that dreamed.
Why was the fire the last thing she recalled?

And why didn’t she want to finish this resurrection?
RESURRECTION - 4%
The separation of “ego” and “will” into parted metaphysical components making up a full “nous” or person is a relatively unique–and contagious phenomenon–to sophont beings who survive in thaumaturgically-affected environments.
Currently, Aegis theorizes that it is contact with subrealities or thaumic-phenomena in general that afflict this change on individual beings. For in-field operatives deployed on Idheim, should they be killed in action and reseeleved thereafter, the assistance of an Agnos is usually required to the fracturing of their ego and will. Case in point, should the mind of an operative be tunneled into a new morph after death, their brain functions will remain but they won’t be able to commit to any executive action.
Effectively, their “personhood” is severed in half. They’ll have all the ability to think, but none of the functional drive to do it. As if like a metaphysical chunk of them is missing.
Devoid of such a conceptual component, even fully intact minds are hollowed across the veil of realities, and though they remain untouched in the material, when placed in a stable-Rupture subreality expansion liminality, the missing facets of their personhood can be observed in visible detail…
-Voidwatch, Ministry of Thaumic- Anomalies, “Ego and Will”
13-21
Become (II)
“I am going to try something. I wish to see if I can change her mind.”

Such were Avo’s first words as he withdrew himself from Abrel’s corpse. Surging fire collapsed backward across the vastness of the Nether, and everywhere he was felt indelibly marked. His presence was no longer quiet, like termites eating through the wood.
He was now a traveling forest fire. A conflagration, a fitting alignment to the spreading flames that constituted the new sinews of his cognition. His shadow lingered in the Nether in the memories he left absent and the minds he left bare.
Soon, Abrel Greatling would be among them. Unlike the rest, however, she was like him–an exile from death’s embrace.
Through her, he would tread the next steps of his self-comprehension.
And if what he theorized was right, hers as well.
Denton jolted back after the words first left him, the nectar of her mind teasing him like a ripe fruit beaded with scintillation. Oh, the secrets would glean if he took her into his consensus.
[Couldn’t access her mind before. Didn’t have the proper components. Things are different now.]
[Still not certain of effect. She could join with our thoughtstuff. Want to see if she burns. But wait. Maybe wait.]
[Another chance later. See if a bargain can be struck. She is… useful. Don’t alienate. Still too beneficial.]
[Will be delicious though.]
[Yes. Delicious. New colors to see.]
Somehow, Avo didn’t think Walton intended for him to obtain new experiences this way.
As he pushed himself up using his Echoheads, he left the hidden session he sequenced inside Abrel active within himself in anticipation of her resurrection. If the rules behind her death continued to apply, he would have no problem funneling himself across the Auto-Seances and taking her mind for his own.
But her mental template would only be the first step.
The true victory awaited in the discovery of what he could change thereafter.
“Avo, you good there, consang?”
He paused. Who had said that–oh, Draus.
The barrel of her projectile launcher was extended from under her wrist, and his Phys-Sim had it lined straight at his head.
She hadn’t shot him. Drawing in the emanations of thoughstuff leaking free from her accretion, his subminds constructed a vague simulation of the dilemma she felt.
“Thanks,” he said, living out her internal conflict in real-time. “Thanks for not shooting me.”

“Yeah,” she replied, not yet lowering her gun. “Don’t mention it. Would've done it if you hung around inside a couple seconds longer.”

[Jelen Draus. Always reliable.]
[Estimating simulated responses.]
[Still could just burn her mind into ours.]
[Again. Will lose her trust. Control our hunger.]
[Control.]
[Master.]
[Grow her trust.]
[Yes. Simulating new cognitive pathways. Installing adaptive thought patterns to improve socialization.]
ADAPTING MIND-TEMPLATES [TALON-1]; [TALON-17]; [TALON-11] INTO COGNITIVE STRUCTURE
The transformation of his mind was as obvious as it was uncanny. From atop his crown did his Metamind burn, rising towers fire spilling free and constant from the bend of his halo. The phantasmal brightness he projected cast all the others beneath the presence of a dancing shadow, and they regarded him with rigid stances and unblinking gazes.
He changed. In such a short time, he changed again. They didn’t understand. He himself didn’t understand. They were afraid.

It was wise and reasonable to fear the unknown in this city.
But this time, things would be different.
New sequences grew and connected like the roots of a tree spreading wide beneath the softness of soil. At his foundation, he remained himself, but there was more to him now. Additional layers of emotion and genuine empathy burrowed into him, and a soft hiss of pain escaped from his lungs as his base nature sparked a flicker of trauma when the pure human designs settled into him.
“Avo?” Draus said again, her tone worryingly thin.
“I’m fine,” he said. The newer, more “human” parts of his mind weren’t in that instant, but his subminds attuned his structure and dissolved the conflicting aspects of his nature. He looked upon Draus again and noted the worry in her brow, noted how Chambers had taken to standing in front of Kae, and how the Agnos was peeking out from behind him, eyes wide, her mind unsure what to feel.
“I…” he said, beginning with Draus.
There was so much he could say. So much he wanted to say now that he understood more. Now that he grafted humanistic feedback into his meta-neurology.
[Be honest with her.]
[Yes. Tell her what you wanted to do. We know she likes honesty.]
[Honesty will gain her trust. She respects it. Will make both of us seem more real to each other.]
[Connect.]
[Yes. Connect.]
“It was so hard for me not to burn your mind away,” Avo admitted. Draus’ expression didn’t change, but Denton’s eyebrow twitched as she slowly backed away.
Sunrise, possessed of more foresight or self-preservation than everyone else in the room, was currently plastered around the doorframe leading downstairs next to Cas, who held his sting-corded arm out to the side as if preparing to draw a pistol.
[Maybe too honest.]
[Can still try again after she shoots and kills us. Not a big deal.]
[Could liquefy bullets. Fight her.]
[Yes. Also option.]
Avo ignored the inner vocalization of his doubts. “I burned some of the Incubi I encountered. I have their proxy templates in my mind. I know what they know. I can think as they think. They’re showing me new things now. New understanding.” He paused. “Wanted to understand you. Become you. All of you. Fought. I fought myself.”

Chambers’ frowning mien inched over Draus’ shoulder. “Yeah, about that consang… did… did you stop yourself fighting for me, or is there a reason why I’m not running my tongue along the insides of someone’s eye-holes because… I remember you burning me pretty quick.”
It didn’t even take much from his new template to guide Avo toward a more diplomatic response. “Fought harder for some than others. Knew you were strong enough to withstand. Survive. Guessed it could’ve nulled you. But you have endured worse. Have remained yourself despite everything. Never had a reason to doubt you, Chambers.”

The annoyed glare on his face cracked as Chambers swallowed and looked away. The words took him by surprise, and the effect was immediate. His thoughtstuff reeled with discord, and his mind shrunk inward in retreat, unsure of how to process this sudden gift of offered praise.
[He was easy. We have been inside his mind for a long time.]
[Yes. Wants to matter. Wants to be part of something that won’t leave him behind. So he tries to fit roles in groups or communities. Especially wants to matter to someone more than him. He wants love and kindness from authority figures. A cut etched into place by his father. We can give it to him. We can bind him to us even without Necrothurgy.]
Poor wounded Chambers.
Avo paused. That thought was so very unlike him. Such a thing rested strangely upon the backdrop of suppressed violence and cruelty that flowed at the foundations of his being.
“Something happened to me when I confronted the Low Masters,” he said, turning back to Draus. “They used something on me. I tried to burn myself away using some of the fire I took from Kae’s mind. The effects… joined. Merged with me. I changed. I am… more now. Different.”

“More,” Draus said. She lowered her launcher. “So… you’re in the flame, or what?”

“I am the flame. I am all that which burns. All it touches. I have over twenty thousand ghosts inside. Entire sections of the lobby remembered. I know everything that the Incubi I devoured know. I am more. And I will be even more soon.”

The Regular stared at him blankly for a passing moment, and her face cracked into a chuckle of disbelief. “You’re a never-endin’ ball of fuckin’ surprises, you know that rotlick?”

“Would you prefer it if I was any other way?” he asked.
She didn’t offer a direct response to the question. “Just keep your fire away from me right now. I don’t want to catch ghoul from you.”

[Maybe laugh at her remark.]
[Can manifest a higher level of humor.]
[No. Wait. Simulations show she will be unnerved instead.]
[Just grunt?]
[Yes. Grunt.]
Avo grunted. “Fires might offer something useful for you as well.”

Turning to regard the others in the room, he awkwardly patted Denton on the shoulder. “You told Draus not to shoot me?”

“Yes,” the glaive said, still staring at Avo with an unreadable expression. “I would… like to go over your changes in detail later. If you would allow.”

Ever inquisitive. Ever searching for another angle, another thing to learn.
“Later,” Avo said. “I have one last mind I wish to dive into. One more I want to see changed.”

“Who?” Denton asked.

“Abrel Greatling,” Avo replied. “I have part of her mind. She will come back soon. Very soon. Want to see if I can become her. And then I want to see if two minds that are the same can stack.”

“Stack?” Denton asked.
She didn’t understand, and the idea only existed as a concept with him as well. Soon, he would be able to see how it worked in practice.
Patting the Glaive on the shoulder gently with one of his Echoheads, the woman went stiff and seemed to stare through him as he passed her. Making his way over to Kae, the Agnos flinched at his approach, and he heard her heartbeat quicken and her pupils dilate as her gaze drifted upward to face his blazing cognition.
From her mind leaked stomach-coiling stress and flinching trauma, but also a deep and aching root of jealousy.
[It broke her. Ruined her life.]
[Now we wear it as another mantle of power.]
[Walton destroyed her. And empowered us.]
[We are a symbol of her pain manifest as another’s glory.]
[Through no fault of her own.]
[We can’t give her peace.]
[We give her a promise]
[Make her loss mean something.]
[Grant her chance at revenge. Fix the Rash as she wanted. Take back all the knowledge stolen from her.]
[She won’t be whole. But she will have a path. She needs a new path.]
Kae took a step past Chambers and stared up at him, the lines on her face deepening with exasperated exhaustion. “How does it… feel? For you, I mean. I…” Her voice cracked as she let out a strangled laugh. “I can still remember how it felt for me. Does it burn? Is it hard to think?”

“No,” Avo said. “There are more voices here. More of me. More of everything. Easier to think than before. Can make myself understand by growing other minds from my own.”

She breathed out. “You are the fire?”

“I am the fire. I am what the Low Masters left inside me. And I am more still.”

She nodded. “You’re father must’ve truly loved you.”

“Yes,” Avo said. “And you should hate him.”

Her face twisted in a sneer, “I don’t need your validation for my feelings.”

“I can’t make things better, Kae,” he said, cutting her off before her anger could be roused in full. “You lost. Lost so much for no reason–”

She clenched her teeth. “Stop…”

[Keep going.]
[It will hurt. It must. But she will survive.]
[Lead her toward new path. Use her pain if need be.]
“--Lover. Research. Future. Life. Security. All never coming back.”

A tear of anguish spilled out from her left eye as she jabbed a finger into his chest. “You fucking…”

“Hey, Avo,” Chambers said, eyes whipping between the two.
He could hear Draus approaching.
“--But we can still make this mean something. I can get you all the minds of those who hurt you. And the elder. And we can fix the Rash. And we can take back your research. Stop the Guilds from making a bigger mess using your research. Steal back the Heaven of Love from them.”

Her chin began to quiver in the same instant he felt Draus’ fingers clamp down on his shoulders like a titanium vice. Old instincts clashed with new as all of him that was ghoul screamed for him to turn on the Regular and tear her apart for laying hands on him. His greater self, however, knew she was coming, and simply clamped his claws over her grip.
“Trust me,” he said, angling his face so he could only see Draus from the corner of his eye. “Please.”

She glared at him, but surprisingly little anger burned behind her eyes. “You’re hurting her.”

“I know. Don’t have a better way.” He turned back to the Agnos. “If what I do with Abrel Greatling works. If the twinned alteration of our conjoined minds takes effect… I think I can take your pain away. Will you want that?”

At the mention of pain being taken away, he heard Essus sit up from across the room. Avo considered the man another candidate for this experiment, but the former father had already suffered too much. There was little sense in breaking him when one more deserved could pay the price of any failures instead.
“I don’t want to forget anything,” Kae said. “I told you that.”

“You won’t.” For a moment, he considered reaching and engaging in tactile contact with her as a sign of physical support. But he didn’t. So much choice had been deprived of the Agnos. She should get a little back. “My father took from you. Ori-Thaum took from you. Even Highflame took from you. Used your research for something you didn’t intend. I am not them. I am the culmination of all your work and more. And I want to grant you what you want. And more.”

[Abrel Greatling just resurrected.]
[Can feel her mind on the other side. She is frightened. Confused. Disoriented.]
[Should consume her mind before she composes herself.]
He funneled his reaching flames through his Auto-Seance and into her mind just as she resulted. She came ablaze from within, the entirety of her mind burning away into his as her template settled upon his growing inventory.
Moreover, he felt her life swell inside him–past battles and distant memories of Tierside schooling settled into him. The added weight of her experiences broadened his sense of self instead of exhausting him.
More. Always more.
Repeating what he did earlier, he overloaded her implants and left her dead and adrift in the void again. The act took less than a thought for him–not even a deep dive as his subminds completed the minutiae on his behalf.
He worried this would make him lazy.
[Mental template: Abrel Greatling subsumed]
[8021 ghosts with her as well. And three new phantasmics worth considering. Can remember her life. Can remember–]
[Later. Focus on Kae now. When she resurrects again we can do the next part.]
He risked waiting a moment longer. Kae mattered more, and for the first time, he didn’t just think such a thought, he felt it as well.
What a gnawing ache apprehension brought.
“You’re not lying, are you?” Kae said, finally. She swallowed as swiped at her face. “You’re really going to try and… and give me anything I want? After your father… after everything?”

“Yes,” Avo said. “And I won’t try. It will happen. We will come to know what the color of justice is.”

At that, Kae laughed. “People… people destroyed my life. Took my work. And now a… monster is going to try and kiss it all better.” Her mind settled back into weariness as the anger slipped away from her. She shook her head. “What is my life.”

“Strange,” he answered .”But we’ll face that together.”

He felt Draus loosen her grip on his shoulder, and he, in turn, released her hand. “Thanks for not turning me to glass,” he said.
“Yeah. Gotta admit: it was pretty hard for me not to for a second.”

He chuffed a low note of bemusement. Being human was ticklish sometimes.
“I’m going to dive over again soon,” he said. These words were offered to the entire room rather than just Kae or Draus. “I just subsumed Abrel Greatling’s mind. I feel her… I can manifest her cognition now.” He let her sequences cascade through his flames in an instant and the contents slammed down upon him like a ton of bricks.
“You broke her family in more ways than you know.” These words were, however, meant for Draus alone. He looked into her shining irises, alight with the touch of technology. “Broke them deep.” The ghoul inside him seethed in admiration of the lingering torment that nested deep in the corners of Abrel’s psyche. Such a delicious wound.
That thought accompanied a note of self-disgust and a spark of trauma as his mind rattled against himself.
[Hm. Some problems of internal conflict are caused by executive thinking.]
[The base mind is still too cruel. Has human structures but will need more stable connective sequences to bridge empathic constructs to our core self.]
[How about a gradual increase of psychopathy? Acclimation as a buffer. Feel human initially and then let it settle. Could be like digestion?]
Again, the shape of his mind shifted, and new stretches of cognition fused over the vulnerabilities of the old.
“I… uh,” Chambers snorted. “I’m not gonna lie: I’m still pretty fucking confused as to what’s going on? Like… I like nice Avo. But he also freaks me out–but I don’t want you to go back! You’ve been getting nicer! Nice is good!” He whipped his arms around for suppose. “We all like you nice! Right guys?”

There was a lot less agreeing and a lot more staring than he wanted.
“Godsdammit, you shits! Back me up!”

Everyone kept ignoring him.
“What are you trying to do with her?” Kae asked suddenly. “Abrel, I mean. What is it that you’re planning on doing with her now that you have her mind? Are you… are you trying to transfer yourself across bodies? Sheathes?”

[No. But that’s another experiment: Will we resurrect in her body if we move all of our cognition into her?]
[Questionable? Test at the end. Use Chambers as anchor on this end.]
“Chambers,” Avo said. “I’m going to need to burn you again later. Eat all of your mind.’

“You see!” Chambers accused. “This is the shit that happens when no one backs me up.”

“You’re the only one that can take it,” Avo lied. “You’re the only choice.”

Immediately, Chambers puffed out his chest and his disappointment swelled into pride. “Never say Aedon Chambers didn’t give his heart and soul for his consangs.”

Cas sighed under his breath. “Jaus. The ghoul’s gonna make this fucking half-strand unbearable in record time with all this ass-kissing.”

“I’m going to shift my mind to be almost exactly like Abrel’s,” Avo said. “Going to see if that still destroys her cognition, or if we will ‘stack’ over each other.”

“And… then what will you do?” Kae asked.
“Then I see if I can change her.” Avo reconsidered his words. “Change us.”
[Abrel’s alive again.]
[Shift sequences on base-mind. Ready to dive.]
“Draus,” Avo said. “Shoot me if the fires empty from my mind and I drop mind-dead. Going to try Kae’s idea at the end.”

“My idea?” Kae asked.

“Diving now,” Avo said. “Will share new understandings when I return. New options.”

Chambers leaned close to Draus. “Reg. I’m still fuckin’ lost.”

“Some flamin’ nova-hot Necro-shit.”

And with a thought, Avo shifted his mind and felt his sense of self reknitting anew. The empathy in him coiled and changed, deadening toward certain concepts and people while kindling hotter for others. Toward Draus, he felt an incomprehensible hatred, while in Kae he found himself directing a conditioned respect.
Arrogance, confidence, rage, and withheld sorrow intertwined at the core of her being as he felt the edges of her cognitive architecture spread out into shape.
Besides a single pinprick of awareness at his core, all else belonged to Abrel Greatling, the flames now weeping from pathways entirely aligned to what he drank away from her when last she lived.
Manifesting an Auto-Seance, he injected this section of himself through the session, and across the vastness of void, his mind ascended upward to bury itself into Abrel, symmetry achieved in sequence, thoughtstuff, phantasmics, and all.
You want to know why they call it a Metamind? It’s not because it’s metaphysical–though it is also that. The main reason is that it’s self-referential. It’s a non-material cognitive construct of your mind burned into an overreality above our own.
Don’t really know how the Agnosi do it, but that’s never stopped your typical gutter-jacks from trying. Now, I won’t lie: They found some success burning heavily modified secondhand Metas into new minds after tearing them free from their hosts, but there’s always something with that. Psychosis. Memory rejection. Cognitive bleedover. Lots of shit to worry about.
I asked White Rab about this once, about why we can’t just switch our Metaminds around if we take out all the memories or just replace another half-strands sequences with our own. He gave me one hell of a spiel, but the long and short of it is that ego is more than memory. Ego is all the little impulses in between; the curvature of your accretion and how your thoughtstuff accommodates different emotions; all the little scars and grooves in your thinking that make you you, I guess.
He told me about someone who tried stacking a Meta on top of their Meta before. Supposedly, this nova Necro–called herself Reignhost–managed to subvert an Agnosi and get a glimpse at the secrets behind it all. After that, instead of going dark, she got it in her head that she was going undercut the Guilds and powers, sell her own “street-made Metas” on the cheap.
And being the sneaky shit that she was, she wanted to leave a little piece of herself in every Meta so she could track and peek at all her loyal customers.
White Rab told me what happened after. About how a Meta is already occupying a specific section of space above us. That there really isn’t actually any more room onto to burn. She tried again.
She tried, and by the time the Exorcists got to her, her memories were all caked into each other. Like everything flattened into everything at the same time.
White Rab sent me a vicarity he managed to snatch after that. I… decided to take a dive.
You know what’s it like facing a mangled parody of yourself? Where you can’t tell where your first memories begin and the last one ends?

Yeah. I was in her mind and I still can’t fully process that ruin.
The point is, consang, don’t think you’re that fucking smart–You’re not the first person to try stacking another layer atop the Nether. It’s just going to end messy.
-Quail Tavers, School of the Warrens
13-22
Become (III)
Abrel Greatling’s mind crumbled like a collapsing sandcastle the instant he attempted the overlap.
Everything felt fine during the initial insertion. He matched the currents of her thoughtstuff and the pathways of her memories. A duality of phantasmics and other constructs clicked into place over each other like magnetic knots of opposite polarity, those shaped by burning ghosts folding over and igniting their stable counterparts.
The progress of their synchronicity began gradually and then accelerated exponentially.
Failure came quicker.
In one moment he was spreading over her like a plague, he could feel their minds joining, her ego diluting into his.
But then, with but a thought, their vectors turned oppositional, and he felt her mind die upon his, dissolving like ash peeling free from a moving tide.
Still, setbacks weren’t unexpected, and again he turned her enhanced biology against her and reset the slate.
She was his chance to learn the limitations and functionality of his new cognition–a reusable canvas toward advanced education.
It took his subminds repeatedly replaying Abrel’s cognitive collapse and the use of his Haemokinesis before he identified the issue.
The good: his theory was sound. Gradually letting his fire light her cognition while channeling her template caused a progressive “ghost by ghost” recreation that seemed to keep her ego intact even as she was technically subsumed by him.
In practice, however, it was more melding than conversion.
Where things went wrong was with his base-mind. Even with his self-awareness reduced to its minimalist extent, it was still as if a pickaxe struck the core of her cognition and cracked her mind at its foundation.
He simulated another few attempts in his own mind as he waited for her resurrection.

The results of piloting one cognition using another still inflicted far too much dissonance. That was what became clear to him. A secondary aspect of awareness buried deep within another still resulted in mind-shredding torsion for the ego that was “worn.”
She couldn’t serve him as a mask. Even with the alternation of his cognitive structure, his base-mind cast something of a shadow in the Nether, and its weight could not be denied.
There needed to be a distance between the epicenters of their selves.
A good thing he could shift his cognitive structure at leisure now. And that he had ever so many ghosts to spare.
As if an egg drawing the heart of its yolk away from the center and out the wayside, he reshaped himself in anticipation of his second attempt at entwining Abrel Greatling with his own mind.
She couldn’t survive the entirety of his ego wearing her as if a coat. Perhaps it would suit both of them better if he molded himself to her specifications like a hand filling a glove.
***
RESURRECTION - 100%
For the third time in rapid succession, Abrel plunged back into the cold embrace of existence, mind wailing as it congealed together with a psychosomatic ache.
She couldn’t quite remember what had killed her the last few times, but it came suddenly and in a nigh-instant.
If she were to die again, she would resurrect using her domain instead.
As things were now, she blinked and tried to shake off the roiling chaos that flooded through her mind with her return.
The Warrens. Jhred’s retrieval and death. The cessation of her cadre. The creature that had torn into her–that managed to tear past her subreality and fill her Frame with its Rend.
The entire weight of the last day struck her at once, and she felt her wards creak against the overwhelming stress and agony boiling her from the inside.
So much death…
Zenna. Alphim. Melt.
They were all hers.
Jhred too. Her brother… Butchered right in front of her. Like… meat being pulled apart.
Dead in the gutters, like some common FATELESS; Greatling blood mingling with the flat-bloods in the bowels of the city.
She should have just kicked his ass and pulled him out immediately. If she did that… If she just did as her father ordered…
A gasping sob of despair escaped from her throat as her insides coiled with aching agony. Sorrow clawed its way up her throat, its lumps growing larger and heavier with each passing second.
She fought it.
She fought the hurt.
She fought the hurt the same way she did after her mother shamed their house.
She fought it because she was Abrel Greatling, and in her heart of hearts, her nature demanded that she was the one to attack.
Drawing in a deep breath through her nose, she tried not to think about how Zenna smiled at her from the ground when last they sparred, and kept Alphim and Melt as vague figurines in the background of her thoughts.
No such fortune with Jhred. His death stained every corner of her mind. She could see him coming apart even with her eyes closed, how the impossible wind kneaded his sinews open from within before wringing him tight in cords of knotting viscera.
A single moment in the horror lingered in the deep waters of her mind the most. She remembered the glint of his bones most of all–how his skeleton shone as it was denuded from his suppler flesh.
In a heartbeat, he was stripped clean.
Cast into the air and winds, blood misting upon the eldritch gales of his killer.
His killer.
Her sorrow ignited as the face of his killer grew from the distributed soil of her memories. That creature—whatever the fuck it was–had a Frame. That meant… that meant it could think. And if it could think, she was probably dealing with a heavily modified Godclad rather than some bodyguard variant bioform.
The paleness of its visage lurked like an absence in the periphery of her mind. She knew she had seen it before, but though she struggled to recollect the face of her foe, only a blankness came back to her.
Good. It works.
What?

Her thoughts were… She had intrusive thoughts before, but…
Not intrusive. Conjoined.
Abrel blinked again. She was definitely thinking those thoughts. They came from her. She wanted to think them, but she didn’t know why. It was like–
Someone else is inside you? Using you as an instrument?
Abrel went stiff. A taste of pleasure lingered within those thoughts. Satisfaction raw and primal now joined her pain as accompanying sensations, and the intensity of these new and intruding emotions were things she never felt before.
Something was wrong with her mind. Someone was inside her thoughts! A Necrojack–
That would have been true before. But we aren’t so simple anymore.
We? What was she thinking? Why was she thinking like this?
A want momentarily manifested inside her–to draw upon the powers of her Heaven and incarnate the Strider. Break free from this capsule holding her, escape and–
The want vanished.
She was entirely fine with this. She was–
An etheric flicker caught her attention. From atop her brow, something moved like it was burning.
Ah. Can’t be hidden inside another mind either. All burns. How unfortunate. Going to need to think of a method to hide myself.
She shook her head as her own thoughts settled back into her control. This didn’t feel like ghosts casting another’s thoughtstuff into her. This originated purely from her, but also not. The conflict she felt was uncanny, and the absence of any trauma from such insanity was stranger.
Almost like being spared any and all harm.
Almost like she was being spared any and all harm.
Abrel blinked.
When her eyes opened this time, she was standing on a sparkling beach. Around her, palm trees enameled with crystal matter glistened beneath a phantasmal sun that shifted between various shapes.
Presently, it occupied the form of a duck.
Waves crashed gently over nearby shore, but a force stronger than compulsion compelled her to turn and seek the interior of the island. Walking beneath circling drones, she found herself jogging across gleaming sand to arrive before a gathering of three figures.
Beneath two marble figurines–a mother and a child frozen eternally in an instance of play–was a pathetic figure, sobbing and whimpering, his voice broken but familiar.
“Jhred?” Abrel whispered. She took two steps forward, confused and reaching out for her brother.
“Only a memory. Mine.” The second voice came from behind her, its resonance deep and sibilant, its timbre curious and mocking.
Twisting on her heel, she beheld the creature that murdered her brother standing just before her. The blankness that consumed her earlier finally had a picture to fill its empty canvas.
It was taller than her by three feet, and from its back slithered appendages of serpent-like design. Embers and wisping fire whipped free from the air around it, while its body looked chiseled from some kind of ceramic-fungal structure.
The way it moved in bursts and twitches showcased the fullness of its inhumanity, but the halo that glimmered around its crown betrayed its obvious sophoncy. Still, she couldn’t figure out what this creature was. The complexity of the mycelia running between its bone-pale carapace looked to be something of Sang make.
The creature let out a low hiss. Thick fungal petals clasping its face unfurled to reveal an inhumanly pale face sporting serried fangs that grinned and glinting black eyes that belied a cruel intellect. “Hello, Abrel.”
She wanted to speak–but suddenly she changed her mind.
Something inside her caught flame, and she recalled new information from seemingly nowhere.
He was called Avo. He was created as a ghoul, and she realized she could feel everything he was feeling somehow. Her misery was like nectar to his palate, but something inside him oozed with bitter sympathy as well.
A faint tickle danced through her mind as psychosis never came. No mental damage came.
She was just… fine. Like her mind lost the ability to be broken.
It was like no damage could settle inside her, or if she was floating within a sanctuary against any and all traumas.
“That’s because we’re different now. Can mend. Can adapt in an instant.”
“We?” Abrel asked. And she knew he allowed the question because he could just make her remember, and she would.
“We,” Avo continued. “Your mind is… functionally mine as well. Burned away again. Burned into each other. I converted you. Piece by piece. You didn’t notice. I let the patterns of your mind remain anchored to your body. I think… I am beginning to understand the separation between ghosts and thaums. Concept of a self-aware mind is different than the concept of a proper kill. A proper sacrifice. It’s like… symbology.”

“What?” Abrel asked. He didn’t offer gnosis this time. What she knew was clear to him, but there were clouds of absence where he allowed her awareness to peer.
Avo didn’t reply using words. Instead, a coruscating flame plumed out from him and drowned her in a sudden influx of new knowings.
Modified injections of information were branded into Abrel’s comprehension. Understanding came to her immediately, and as the flames faded, so too did his grip on her thoughts.
Horror filled her mind as he chuffed low notes of amusement at her pawing at the sand, strands of spit spilling free from her open mouth while she heaved. Threads of incandescent ran needled through her and back into him, feeding him a direct drip of all that she chose to suffer.
She could feel his control still–his will holding both their minds together, accommodating her bout of psychological torment within reason.
Her mind was his now. It was as he claimed–they were the same thing, really. All that she was on her own had been consumed by his slavering fires. Now he was supporting the totality of her cognitive architecture using his radiance, while he–the star itself–glared down at her through the crevices of her memories.
His mastery of her mind was beyond absolute. Beyond… beyond her words to describe.
“Yes,” he agreed. “It is a thrill. I have been experimenting with empathy. Stitching new sinews in my mind. But I think you can do the same thing. I think you can understand me as well.”

Again, his flames touched her, and with it came the curse of euphoria.
At this moment, what he was inflicting upon her shone like an ineffable triumph within his own heart as well. This was a step into what he wanted–and possibly beyond.
So far, she remained sane and tethered to his mind, governed by his allowances. Yet, it seemed no different than her deciding to think as such. She agreed because he did. She accepted because he did. She felt within her parameters because they were granted to her, but never beyond those bounds.
They were, in a concept, of a singular choice.
His.
“It’s still enslavement,” he admitted. “Pointless to lie to ourselves. Even if I tune your mind to perfect agreement. You would have never accepted this in the past. You would have fought. I’m talking to clay right now. You aren’t who you were anymore. Not in knowing. And slowly not in behavior either.”
“Why are you telling me this?” she choked out. “Why… why do you let me even think? To be aware? What are you, so bored with yourself that you need to fucking torture me for amusement?”

He laughed. She laughed.
“See,” Avo said. “I would have never said that. So uniquely you. Abrel. Attack. Always someone else to blame. To fight.”

“Yeah, so let me go,” Abrel said, surprised she could even demand such a thing. Emboldened, she continued. “Let me go and we’ll…”

The want was lost to her again.

“We can settle this properly?” he asked. “That’s what you wanted to say. Violence. It appeals. I understand. Won’t lie: Some of me is very tempted to hurt you again. To take you to the point where you shatter. But the others…”

His flames brought new revelations each time, and this was no different. The burning rapture that tore through her seeded her with insight into his self-inflicted torment. He felt horrible for her. Sick, even. Sick at what he was doing. But deeper inward did madness await, for where the outer scope of his mind pitied her, the inner rung found her suffering exquisite.

She faced a being made out of perfectly stable conundrums, capable of maintaining warring emotions without any actual conflict as if the facets prevented any internecine.
Avo let out a satisfied breath and looked up at the false sun. “Doesn’t matter. The most important aspect works. You work. Will still need to see if I can do a few other things. But foundations are good.”

“What foundations?”

“Overlapping,” Avo said. “Melding into the mind without collapsing it. Like bleeding into each other. Let me change you. Change other Godclads perhaps.”
She wanted to laugh. “When I die–”

“You will return as what you think is your most optimal state of being,” he answered. “I’m going to see how many of my changes remain with you after the next death.”

“Changes?” she asked.
“Yes,” he said. “Just as I am becoming more like all of you, you can be more like me. Think like me. Want like me.”

And as an insult, he granted her room to feel disgusted.
“It’s choice above all other choice,” he said. “It’s a terrible thing. But I have to do it. I have to see it. If I can. If it can be done. I want to see who we can become.”
[Exorcist Vero Kelkanan]: At 4:54 in the morning today, an unknown party launched a Nether-based attack on Exorcist lobby designation “Oversec-C1.” So far, we are compiling and verifying all memories from the attack to generate a proper simulation of events. Presently, the Ad-Necs have been repelled thanks to the efforts our active personnel, though the extent of damage and casualties remains delayed due to the destabilization experienced by the lobby and necessary deep-memory mem-data examinations. I open the session to additional questions. As always, standard rules apply. No slurs. No trauma-patterns. No dumping of simulated nudes or other titillating content generated using the likeness of rivals from competing outfits in an attempt to trigger the rash in them.
[SESSION RESTRICTIONS REDUCED]
[Yue Lie-Dawn - False Tone]: Lie-Dawn. Black. Speaker for the False Tone. When will the Exorcists be issuing a formal declaration of censure against Ori-Thaum for their egregious actions today?
[Exorcist Vero Kelkanan]: Thank you for the question, Ms. Lie Dawn. We, however, cannot confirm nor deny Ori-Thaum’s involvement in the attack. We encourage members of the public influence and other propagandistic outfits to promote your theories responsibly.
[Yue Lie-Dawn - False Tone]: Understandable. It is wise to be restrained, but when there is a fire in the Nether, one should not be so cautious as to pretend they are not being castrated by obvious foes. Such an action is only befitting of a Scaarthian.
[Exorcist Vero Kelkanan]: Okay, yeah, tone–tone down the factionalism.
[Yue Lie-Dawn - False Tone]: The False-Tone speaks only the truth.
[Exorcist Vero Kelkanan]: Right. Thank you. Next.
[Nune Vetíona - The Enduring]: Nune Vetíona. Green. Proparazzi of The Enduring. Ahem. I just want to say that–YOU TELL THAT SUBSTANCE THAT FLOWS FROM THAT SANG-SOW’S CUNT IS SHIT! YOU HEAR ME, LIE-DAWN? I’M GONNA CUT OFF YOUR DOG’S FACE AND WIDEN YOUR DAUGHTERS’ ASSHOLES WITH MY BAREHA–
[THE ENDURING HAS BEEN CENSORED FOR THIS SESSION]
[Exorcist Vero Kelkanan]: Next.
[Abdulmanap Sahandrapar - Bravely Burning]: Abdulmanap Sahandrapar. Blue. Bravely Burning. I have a question for you especially, Exorcist Kelkanan. It’s very important.
[Exorcist Vero Kelkanan]: …Me? I, uh… alright, let’s hear it.
[Abdulmanap Sahandrapar - Bravely Burning]: Why’d you lick it?
[Exorcist Vero Kelkanan]: Lick it? Lick what?
[WARNING! RESEQUENCING DETECTED]
[Abdulmanap Sahandrapar - Bravely Burning]: Lick my nu-dog’s balls! Nice technique, Exorcist!
[UPLOADING MEMORIES–]
[SESSION ENDED]
[LUSTAWAY ACTIVATED]
[Exorcist Vero Kelkanan]: Godsdammit–fuck, shit, halt the session! Halt it! Good. Fuck me, not again! Clean–clean the fucking sequences! And tag that half-strand’s FATE-Skein. Godsdamned rash-trolls… AND WHICH ONE OF YOU SICK FUCKS GOT OFF ON THAT?”
-Official Exorcist Press Session Regarding the “Incident at Oversec-C1”
13-23
Infection
If there was a final thought in Abrel’s mind that truly counted as her own, it was that she tried to fight it.
With what little of her there was, she tried. She really did.
In the end, it didn’t matter.
Her struggle was less than a flea fighting the forces of a hurricane. She could no more resist the fire than a wick could choose not to burn when kissed by an open flame. She was of one way, and then she was another.
The alternations spread through her mind like viruses streaming through the cells in her body, the constellation of her memory sequences twisting even in the subtlest capacities. As the infection fused with her mind, certain desires felt beyond her, while new wants rooted themselves in place like an anchor descending into the deepest waters of her ego.
No longer could she fathom hatred for Avo. They were the same, after all, smelted by the dreaming blaze from hateful heterogeneity into an aligned alloy. She understood him, and all his wants, and from her did he glean new insights into the Guild she once served and the ethics that ruled her FATED heart.
As the conflagration settled around them, the illusion of Jhred’s island sanctuary returned. She found her brother as presented from the perspective of the ghoul–a soft pitiful being, one that should never have born the crown of divinity upon his weak brow.
“I still love him, you know?” Abrel said, measuring her brother with soft words of sadness. To her silent surprise, she found her emotions related to her brother unchanged by her recreator. From what agency he left coded into her cognition, she expected him to fashion her into a dagger poised at the heart of all that she cared for.
Such was not the case.
It became obvious that though she carried a strain of Avo within her mind, she was but a carrier and not the plaguemaker himself. His manipulation was more clandestine than anticipated.
“Can I ask you a question?” she said, testing the boundaries of what vectors of emotions remained available to her and what thoughts she assumed could truly be enacted as action.
“I can weave the understanding into you,” he said. His body within the simulated memory was gone, but his shadow now occupied the place of her own.
When her next thoughts came, her surprise continued to grow. “I’d prefer it if you spoke to me. I like doing things face to face.” Because it made it easier to start a fight if the opposing party offended her.
Not that she desired to fight Avo. That want was lost to her now. Lost alongside a thousand smaller facets of her being.

“Fine,” he said, and with the utterance of his words, something shifted beneath her.
Staring down at the sand at her feet, she saw him elongate far past parted palm trees, slinking further past the shores and disappearing below brushing waves like the leviathan he was.
Fear of him was gone. There was only absolute acceptance when it came to how she beheld him, the sensations as if she was regarding herself. As far as her subconsciousness was concerned, there was no true difference between them at their foundation. She was an aspect of his ego, and he was the source of her design.
The limb could no more hate the brain than leaves could despise the winds that carried them.
A sharp and braying triumvirate of voices corrected her of that notion. “A terrible metaphor, ‘master.’ I assure you: the winds remember.”
Her confusion lasted but a singular moment before the necessary details were threaded over. With their minds bound, she too could hear the thundering dialogues cast forth by the awakened gods dwelling within him.
Immediately, a strange desire for kinship was kindled within her. How similar were they to her, serving as the extension of another, even being allowed the same neutered consciousnesses she was.
What a strange new conundrum the ghoul expressed. A part of him–a desire known to all imbued with the privilege of a Frame–felt entitled to take the world into him, to usurp the design that was, to cage all within their being and enchain existence to the rule of a conceptual suzerainty.
But somewhere in that miasma of selfish cruelty and power-hunger was a nobler want to offer agency to another.
Abrel scoffed in genuine disbelief. “You’re a real quandary, you know that, rotlick.” A slur to her recreator? Allowed? Her gut coiled as if she was insulting herself, but allowance of such a transgression was freeing. “This half-way enslavement mental-castration thing is a real special mood, I’m not gonna lie. Feels weird not wanting to kill you for murdering my brother and my cadre.”

“Want you to be free,” he replied. “Free. Not against me. As close to you as possible. As close to me without perverting you. Have a specific use for you in mind.”

“You want me to be your patient zero within the halls of Highflame, am I right?” She knew she was, but it was strange not to ask.
“Yes,” Avo said. “Good Instrument. Can promise you ascension. Power. Also don’t know if my Imitators have spread into your Frame. Want to check there too.”
“Well, aren’t you a ghoul of a million desires,” she said, dryly. She had to admit, even if she weren’t so subverted to his whims, there was a part of this that would have appealed to the original Abrel Greatling as she was. It was probably the cloak-and-dagger stuff. Doing those operations was the entire reason why she loved being an Instrument and loathed the idea of ever becoming an Authority like her father wanted.
Her father. Now there was someone the ghoul probably wanted to draw into his burning gestalt as well. “He’s going to despise you, you know that, right?”
She didn’t even need to state her father by reference or name for the ghoul to understand. There was nothing she could think or know that was beyond his notice. She was like that nu-monkey in those old Sang myths. The one that danced upon the palm of the thousand-armed goddess of peace.
“Only for a while,” he said. She watched as his Echoheads reached out wide, pointing outward in eight directions in a gesture of uncomprehended significance on her end. “Uthred Greatling. Married your mother to be part of your great house. Not Greatling by inherited bloodline. You still care for him. Think he’s a good man trying to do the right thing. Were always closer to him than with your mother.”

“He wasn’t the kindest, calmest, strongest, wisest, or even smartest father one could ask for.” The admission came easy from Abrel now, and the lightness in her swelled. Before, such words would be accompanied by a steaming bitterness building inside her gut, paired with past insults inflicted upon her during less fortunate times for her blood relation to her mother. Now, it was like a cushioning layer of protection was wedged between her inner self and the weight of her past torments.
“Why do you still feel so highly for him if all that is true?” Avo asked.
“Because he stayed,” Abrel admitted honestly. “Because for all his faults, he didn’t leave us. He could have. He could have thrown us to a cousin or a relative or something like that and married again. He’s still a hero of the Third Guild War. There merit enough left in that prestige for another marriage.”
“Even though he started as a flatblood?”

And now the ghoul was pressing down on her discomfort. The tension of her “broken” descent was one that still bothered her when light was scarcest at night. Perhaps Avo wanted to see how she would respond if a potential trauma point was brushed. Or if he had winnowed too much of her original emotions out from her system.
“You know, with the outlawing of the Seraphic faith, Highflame’s ethics should have turned from blood to mettle.‘Blessed be the worthy,’ and all that hopeful, spiritual shit.” Abrel snorted.

“Never believed?”


She giggled. “Oh, I believed plenty. Still do even after whatever it is you just did to me. It’s just that plenty isn’t entirely, and that’s the same case for all the other great houses too. Reason why we Chivalrics stick together so much is that we’re so cross-bred to keep our high-bloodedness from the other flat-bastards we had to share a Guild with. You know the Chivalric lines were modified in our pre-history as well, right? Some of the Meritocrats basically confirmed it with their voider contacts–the high-bloods of the Kosgan great houses were made that way by gene modification.”

“And the ones who lacked that. Flats.”

“Yep,” Abrel said. “‘Course, if you ask the voiders they have other terms for them. Ludds, if you want to get spicy. Baseliners, if you want to be kind.”

The ghoul knew all this, but he continued to humor her and observe her through the chasm of their shared memories. Frankly, in the simmering phlogiston comprised both their minds, she really should be thinking of everything as “we.”
She was just a cell within a cell now, after all. As much her or him as he willed it.
And the best part was she was absolutely fine with all of it.
“Good,” he said after a moment of silence. “Still seem like yourself. Enough like yourself anyway. Should be able to pass any scrying afterward with minimal suspicions. Can make further adaptions based on future. Need to make the final tests now. See if my changes carry over after resurrection.”

“Any reason why they shouldn’t?” she asked, teasing him as much as she could using her limited allotment of autonomy. “You afraid I might revert back to my snarling, screaming, rageful self you met before?”

“No. Still have access to your mind. Can cripple you with a thought in the worst case.”

“You know, I would have had you the first time if you didn’t batter me with your wards.”

He released his feral bemusement through the vicarious link they shared, and she felt the ever-tugging urge of violence that swam beneath the rivers of his every thought. “You’re a bit like Draus.” He chuckled lowly. “She’s going to hate it when I tell her that.”

“Draus?” Abrel said. Well, there was another thing the greater fire was hiding from her. Still, she knew the name but not the context in which he referred to her. “She was the bio-rigged street squire? Jelene Draus?”

“The past has a long shadow,” the ghoul said, its tone wry with sarcasm as its Echoheads mimed the vagueness of a bow.
Abrel cringed. “Yeah, listen, while you’re still connected to me, maybe take some of my taste in humor? This is just… I don’t know if I can accept that as a standard.”

“Will take your suggestion into consideration.”
All around her the fabric of the memory began to untangle into threads of flowing flame. Burning ghosts were surging free on the torrent of an unseen will, with more of the burning presence rushing in. The beginning of a painful ache began to build at the center of her mind. It like was another presence was grinding into hers, slowly pressing its way through and mangling the wholeness of her cognition.
“What’s…. Happening now?” She asked.
“Going to move the entirety of my mind out of my vessel,” he said. “Self-moving now. Want to see what happens when I settle into your body and kill it. See if you maintain my changes even without the Conflagration after resurrection. See where I come back after resurrection as well.”
“You?”

“Scheduled to have someone shoot me.”

“Well, good on you for thinking ahead. So… won’t lie, you squeezing in here’s giving me a splitting migraine.”

“Won’t be much of you left much longer. Sorry. Simulation works. Two egos in direct proximity can’t. Presences clash. I don’t break. You do.”

“Yeah, yeah, rub it in half-strand,” she hissed. The last flickers of the island dissolved. She turned to catch a glimpse of her brother one final time before he went as well. “Bye, Jhred… Bye.”

“Will see him again if you want. Can give that to you.”

She could feel the ponderousness of his mind crashing down against herself. Parts of her perception dissolved as a fugue began to settle in. +Sure… yeah. That’d be nice… Just one last…+

Her ego shattered. The thoughts slipped from her.
Abrel Greatling dissolved in the currents of Avo’s gestalt.
***


Avo drew the last of his trailing ghosts through the session just as Draus shot his vacant body in the head. He only realized that happened due to the memories carried over by his subminds as he nested himself within Abrel’s body.
The oddities of her biomechanics didn’t last as he loaded in Abrel’s mind template to interface with the meat. He also didn’t intend to stay for long. He just needed to confirm his ability to anchor himself in place with another vessel before triggering their mutual death to see what followed.
If honesty were to prevail, he had multiple concerns burning inside him, but as he could still hear the Woundshaper admonishing the Galeslither for its sullen disrespect, he at least knew his Frame was still with him, though he wasn’t certain how it functioned for him without a body.
Perhaps that had to do with his altered noology as well. If he was a traveling mind, and if his theory behind Essence being derived from the sacrifice or murder of the functional vehicle of a thinking being, then perhaps he could only be considered death by the cessation of his thoughts.
Something to be explored shortly.
Pouring himself to suit the shape of Abrel’s body, he found her eyes to be sharper than his by far, her movements crisper and responsive, with each of her nerves fine-tuned to mind-shuddering levels of sensitivity. It felt like he just crawled out from a rusted war-drone into a sgolem on the cutting edge.
Regardless of what happened, there was nothing that taught you inferiority than walking in the flesh of your better.
He would need to make further improvements to his original sheathe after this.
Taking a moment to check for any issues, he reached out and lifted her hand to draw upon his Heavens…
But they weren’t the only ones that answered.
VOLUME 3
“THE BURNING DREAM”
ACT II
A PLAGUE OF FIRE
Aegis,
The situation has changed.
Asset Stillborn has changed.
As of present, he is… in the wind, but I expect his return in the near future. I have reason to believe that he has somehow integrated the Eaters into his cognition and altered his metaphysical structure on a level previously unanticipated–even by Thousandhand.
Despite the escalation of threat he poses to the polities we serve, I strongly advise against any option under the branches of liquidation or containment. Pragmatically, the success of such operations cannot be ensured with the drastic expansion of his new capabilities; effectively, he remains our best tool for ending the Guild Crisis; personally, I find myself inclined to trust him.
If you review the psychological profile generated based on his responses and choice vectors, you will see high levels of anti-communal-social behavior in terms of sadism and indifference to suffering. However, despite his predilections, he has also demonstrated a clear and logical strand of ethical behavior that can be observed and appealed to, i.e. his reluctance to assimilate us into his gestalt despite having the ability and likely desire to do so.
With his malleable neurology, perhaps further growth into morality or justice can be engendered within him via the proper influence.
Both Sunrise and I would like to stay in the field as members of his cohort and would like to request a formal meeting between the bearer of the Stillborn and the gathered Speakers for better mutual understanding.
Additionally, I would like to appeal for access to “category-zero utensils” to enhance the cell's performance in zero thaum environments.
I have a feeling we’re going to need more built-in redundancies in the near future.
-Denton-12
14-1
Dichotomy
When Abrel’s Strider answered Avo’s call, it arrived like wind whistling free through a keyhole.
Her Frame brushed against his as both were triggered upon the manifestation of his will, and he discovered that he hadn’t so much consumed her Soul as his ego now served as a mixed analogy between a bridge and a skeleton key.
After he shifted the structure of his mind in accordance with Abrel’s design, something metaphysical clicked as the interplay between a lockpick and a door.
If a Frame was an implant specifically burned to fit the mold of a sophont’s nous, then perhaps one’s will–or Essence–stood as the unshaped ingot from which the ego derived its substance, and from their union became the alloy of a complete being.

To understand things more practically, her Frame wasn’t inside him but rather slotted upon him via the nous he partially hijacked.
From within the subrealities simulated by her Soul, he could sense the absence of awareness emanating from the epicenter of eldritch fire he was now connected to.
[Strider looks intact. Falcons shifted where the Heaven is black. Blades of radiance forming wings. Ontologic worth 881 deaths per cycle. Different from our Frame though. Still. Solid. Just like Kae described. Can’t tell if the Frame’s infected with our Imitators.]
Unnerved by the quiet, he had one of his subminds simulate Abrel’s personality and converse with him to lessen the weirdness of the experience.
[Psh, is there anywhere this rotlick can’t go?] Submind-Abrel asked.
Her bitter thoughts emanated without a hint of venom or rancor, so he assumed that the alterations he made to her mind persisted. No reason why it shouldn’t have. His changes to her were fundamental; the revisions were deemed consensual post-hoc by her mind, and so he didn’t envision there to be anything for her Frame to regard as traumatic or reversion-worthy.
In fact, he regarded the changes he inflicted upon her as far more ideal than the tormented creature she was prior.
[Yeah, yeah, pat yourself on the ass for removing all the misery that you caused.] The way her Soul seemed closer to a smooth orb filled with murky steam contrasted the nexus of rippling fire within him. What’s more, unlike the sphere which the Stillborn encapsulated, her Frame stretched upward more akin to a cone, allowing for plenty of vertical development, but not that much horizontal. [Wow. Rub it in more, why don’t you. First, you kill a bunch of people I love, then you infect me with servitude–]

“Compliance,” Avo interrupted.
[--the fuck’s the difference, ghoul?]
[There is no difference,] another sub-mind said as the simulation froze.
[The base mind wants to put layering between his actions and beliefs.]
[Functionally stripped some choices from her.]
[She’s an enemy. Tried to kill us.]
[Still. Feels…]
Bad. It made him feel bad.
Avo decided that he didn’t like the sensation of guilt and promptly reduced the intensity of that particular emotion as he reknit sequences within Abrel’s template.
[Glass jaw,] Abrel taunted. [So. You crawled into my body, attached yourself to my flesh, and didn’t expect to activate my Frame too, huh? How’d you imagine that would go?]

“Don’t know,” he admitted. “No one has ever done this before. Tried looking through your memories in the academy to get better grasp on any potential theories. Couldn’t. Apparently, someone downloaded terrible romance vicarities in place of Theoretical Thaumaturgical Applications.”
Abrel huffed and her Soul sparked. [Those classes were useless and I stand by my actions.]
[Frame analysis complete. Frame stable. Three Hells are at an average of 65% Rend. Last one for Reserve-Heaven Unit-3 is clean. Only has one cycler cleared for resurrection. Were very close to killing her before.]
[Should have listened to Draus if we wanted her dead.]
Avo had to be honest, having his subminds study and feed him details about external ontologics on the fly was far more efficient than digging through the Frame’s root-data manually.


Abrel interrupted the brief lull that settled upon their conversation. [Hey, you know how the Agnosi got those False-Hevs in their eyes, right? Do you think this is how they technically work? Like a counterfeit ego-key of some kind?]
She could have stopped talking the moment she mentioned the word “Agnosi” and he would have come to the same conclusion, but it was an interesting thought. It would be interesting to pair his practical experience with Kae’s theory of knowledge.
Or maybe he could just assimilate the mind of an Agnosi at some point.
[Good idea.]
[Better choice.]
[Stimulating Kae’s response: “What? No–absolutely not! What–you–]
Avo forced his subminds to cease with a mental command before the guilt-bombing of his ego could intensify. Diverting his attention to more useful matters, he began examining Abrel’s Frame in detail, with the majority of his focus directed toward her Heavens.
The three Heavens she had classified as [RES-RESERVE UNITS] were modifications derived from small, almost entirely unknown gods hidden behind restricted memories. Unit-1 was supposed to be from a god of campfires, Unit-2, the spirit of a particularly deep ditch–apparently people in the past would worship anything if it seemed unusual enough–while Unit-3 was a mythical flower that provided minerals for a small community before they were all massacred by rampaging Scaarthians who were, amusingly, fighting in service of the Blood Goddess Sathwu.
“Ah, but I do love my huntresses,” the Woundshaper purred. “They have hewn many a rival before their height could rise to challenge my own. What joy, what joy!”
The Galeslither for its part regarded the other Heavens glumly, hopelessly yearning it could be as dormant as they. “What fortunate corpses. They seem so quiet. Free from this… noise.”
“Then why do you add to it, mule? Why must you whimper and neigh when you yearn for this… quiet,” the Woundshaper mocked.
[Wow,] Abrel snorted. [No wonder you like using that one so much–she’s even more of a half-strand than you are.]


A glare was a hard thing to pull off when one was a disembodied shapeless mass of burning thoughts and the target was a featureless core of eldritch fire fused within the corpse of an unmoving god.
The greatest of which his subminds just finished analyzing.
Strider Upon the Highest
Heaven of Light (Domains of Light, Darkness, War, and Falcons)(Light)
Canon of Shinesmith (II)–Can create force-expressing constructs from all light within the range of the user’s awareness ://: Hubris–Cannot be light that is expressed without an opposing shadow
Canon of Waveshrouded–Can seal parts of being behind wavelengths of the light spectrum. Probably what she used to prevent us jacking her in Mirrorhead’s mind. Won’t help anymore now ://: Hubris–The user being frozen will trigger backlash and cause the process to fail.
(Darkness)
Nightwalk–Lets user emerge from any shadow cast made or touched by light emitted from their being. ://: Hubris–Triggers backlash if there isn’t enough contrasting light to feed the transition
Smokeshape–Lets user turn into flowing darkness and travel using a silhouette of the Strider. Same hubris as the last one.
(Falcon)
Courier of Thy Flesh–Create animated falcons capable of mending damage in matter from darkness. ://: Hubris–Only ten tons of falcons maybe be created at once.
(War)
Blade of the Highest Hewing (III)--Grants user absolute control over any edged object they hold, allowing them to wield it with maximal efficiency, keep it from ever dulling, and splitting through any and all matter-based substances with it. ://: Hubris–High backlash will occur if one of the user’s blades strikes another.
Heaven Review: Only 100 deaths were devoted to Domain of Darkness. Heavier emphasis on light and war at 632 thaums. Remainder are split between Falcons, which also serves as her Hell’s primary Domain.
Hell
(Falcon)
Wings of Embrittling (IV)–Embrittles, degenerates, distorts, dispels, and decays all physical matter, sounds, energy, and heat from the local area. Nothing is fully unmade, but everything is enfeebled from what it was before. ://: If any of the structures being embrittled by the user is destroyed utterly, a Daemon will form.
Reserve-Heavens Unit-1; Unit-2; Unit-3 not worth going into detail. First is little more than a fusion burner and eats away friction with its connected Hell. Second is open fissure that causes rocks to vibrate. Drains away vibrations to balance. Third is a flower that can create diamonds and minerals. Liquefies all bones and enamel in three kilometers.]
Avo was confused about the last Hell.
[Think it’s because the ancients considered enamel and diamonds of the same substance. Something like that.]
Inside the expanse of Abrel’s Soul, the Heaven continued to linger without word nor hint of sapience.
If Kae thought his Frame was infectious, it might need more time to take effect.
Channeling Abrel’s experience to circumvent his unfamiliarity of her abilities, he reached out to seize and control all sources of brightness emitted from various sources within the holding cell and, after a moment’s lag, he found himself enraptured to behold the Strider compelled to action as the eldritch flames enveloped a small percentage of its entire structure, allowing it to trespass into the real.
All of a sudden, an additional sense fused into his mind and he found himself dragging motes of light out of place from holographic emitters and fashioning darts from them.
[Strider Rend at 88%]
[Partial expression of power. Mostly subtle.]
[Why Godclads can’t sense each other without full manifestation of Heavens. Fascinating.]
Indeed. Even with his own Frame connected to his being, his Soul remained blissfully unaware of its counterpart despite the closeness of their physical proximities. Again, memories from Abrel fed his ignorance.

Thaumaturgic constructs rarely touched upon physical space unless they had to do with the metaphysics of space or geometry itself. As far as his Heaven of Blood and Abrel’s Heaven of Light was concerned, they weren’t even operating on the same plane of reality.
The only indication he felt toward the other Heaven was the simple tug that brushed upon his Domain of Luminosity, but that required his subminds replaying his memories and magnifying his focus to detect.
Not even when he used a dagger crafted from brightness to split part of a haemokinetic construct he was growing out Abrel’s finger did either Heaven seem to notice each other.
“Our intersections are too few, master,” the Woundshaper said. “Perhaps if my rule over light was truer and stronger. Alas, the concepts behind my luminosity are far less defined than the strength imbued in the Strider’s light.” Upon regarding the rival Heaven did the awakened goddess hum. “Strange is its structure. I do not recall ever beholding a god such as this. I must say, however, that seems to me a thing of bastard make. The wings and armor are all very Kosgan. This is well and true, but the falcons bare a uniquely Sang aesthetic. It appears that we are not the only ones who have been remodeled, mule.”
The Galeslither chuffed its displeasure. “It is unnatural. No direct worship could form something so… inhuman. It seems optimized solely for direct war-making.”
And preventing hidden Necrojacks from spoofing into the Ensouled.
Yeah, whatever Agnos built Abrel’s Heaven had some very specific counter-Ori parameters in mind.
[Should I continue simulating dialogue?]
“No,” Avo replied. This was good. This was enlightening. He had a feeling he just achieved a breakthrough–if a minor one–in the field of thaumaturgy. It also opened deeper implications towards his capabilities.
Presently, he had his own Frame that was connected to his nous, but if he could access Abrel’s Frame as well…
The question that follows is how far did his influence stretch, and whether there were any issues with using the Nether to serve as a junction for one vessel to channel miracles from multiple Frames. And could he still draw upon Abrel’s powers if he was shifted into her mental template but was still piloting his own body? If he and Abrel both died while he was rooted entirely within her vessel, would he descend into her Frame, his own, or both?
Part of him was curious about the answer. The other part wondered if he might just real-death himself by accident.
Something about the ambiguity of such a death made him wary of risky experimentation. Though he was pure self-moving thoughtform now, he didn’t want to discover the limitations of his newfound cognitive elasticity by bifurcating himself permanently after resurrecting as two separate entities. Or not resurrected at all.
He needed to consider a means to test his newfound limits. Perhaps he created an offshoot of himself somehow. Maybe a Thoughtwave Disrupt could sever the right parts inside him.
[Unlikely.]
[Subminds still require executive resources from base.]
[Need to split sense of self as well.]
[Currently unipolar gestalt. Assume the need for multipolar perception for such capabilities.]
Right. He would need another aspect of will, or be able to split what he had in half. Such was the reason why all the minds he dissolved earlier were straight nullings, while Abrel was insured only by the fact of her resurrection.
Some metaphysical laws superseded others.
That didn’t mean he was out of ideas on how to circumvent these limitations, however. Sunrise would be a valuable resource to consult regarding potential enhancements to his mental layout. He might not need an additional component of will if he could direct his subminds like drones.
[Base mind grows increasingly tyrannical.]
[Wants more of us already.]
[Greedy.]
His own minds were mocking him using the voices of those he killed now. Avo didn’t really know how to feel about that.
[Could tear out from capsule. Manifest Heaven. Wear Abrel’s body and Frame and use them to kill as many people as possible before death. No risk to you. Good practice too.]
[No. Don’t waste her. Don’t betray advantage and position so soon. Have a heavy advantage over the Low Masters now. Ori-Thaum too. But more encounters give them chances to learn. Adapt. Need to be wise. Strategic.]
The first appealed, and from in the undercurrent of his crackling ghosts, he could remember the beast’s unslaked hunger as it provoked him to seek pleasure.
The latter guaranteed him a new method to study and strike at the Guilds.
But in the hungry depths of his being, he still wanted to kill Abrel and drink the divinity out from her hollowed husk. It took a remodeling of his mindscape to counterbalance the vulgarity of his innate monstrosity.
“We’re leaving her body as is,” Avo said. “Going to find another mind to jump to. Study her after resurrection. See if the effects take. Then use her as our plant within Highflame and the Great Guilds afterward.”
Both his subminds accepted without any protest, but an uncanny sensation still lurked between the folds of his flames.
It was like something within himself was hiding from him, expressing itself only in bouts of dissatisfaction.
Avo shifted out of and back into Abrel’s mental template just to be sure nothing was amiss.
The feeling went away thereafter.
A loud pulsing note rang from the speakers within the cell, prying him free from his reverie. Crackled sputters of static audio greeted him, but they were being filtered in by no ghosts. Stretching his perception beyond Abrel’s physical sheathe, he cast his Whispers out through the metallic coffin that held him and gazed into the void itself.
Amidst the vastness of the great and unending dark, the vantablack Voidwatch rescue ship would have escaped his notice if not for the expansive cloud of static thoughtstuff it expelled into the real.
He needed to leave. If the voiders discovered Abrel dead or with her mind spewing fire, some unwanted questions might follow. Ones that would put her under greater suspicion post-resurrection.
Fortunately, just as Avo was considering if he wanted to jump back into Chambers, he felt an intrusive force plucking at a disconnected series of memories within Abrel, activating specific sequences and artifacts they left hidden within the phlogiston that was his ego.
Right. The Incubi were inside her as well. He should have expected them to leave more backdoors in Abrel while she was mind-dead, but this worked much to his benefit as well.
It meant that he would soon embark on a more active phase of self-discovery and that he would have something to amuse himself before reviewing the state of Abrel’s mind after her resurrection.
And so Avo shifted the layout of his mind again, keeping only Abrel’s compromised sequences in place for the Incubi to trigger their Auto-Seance.
They were seeking to secure what gains they could out of this travesty. Unbeknownst to them, he still had a marker on Shard-1 and a session within D’Rongo, and when the intruders came in to cement their theft of Abrel’s mind, he would get a chance to learning just how an Incubi cell operated in real by taking a walk in their skin.
Honestly, sir, I’m struggling to describe the sheer amount of damage we sustained.
Let’s begin with the worst of it. Oversec-C1 is finished. The lobby’s dead. No point in ducking around that. A good percentage of superstructure one is completely hollow–sequences, memories, phantasmics just missing – all of it! I can’t even begin to put the damage into words.
Traumas break things by fragmenting ghosts. There are still pieces and artifacts thrown free into the Nether. Debris! They don’t just get eradicated or burned away…
And yeah, I don’t know what that thing was. I… I’ve never seen a phantasmic like that. Like a fire, but… the way it moved and just swallowed our patterns was impossible. It defies everything I know about Necrotheurgy.
It’s telling that how compromised our systems were is now considered a secondary matter. We have assets digging around. Last we heard the “blaze” was spotted moving through the Unwhere, and some of the people managed to trap it by ejecting a prisoner out into the void.
…Uh, yeah, they ejected Abrel Greatling–but she’s alive. And her mind’s fine. Voidwatch has made contact with her. She seems to have been minimally affected by the ordeal. They’re currently transporting her to one of their logistics orbitals for temporary detention so we can send someone up to dive through her mind for any damages or points of subversion.
Yes… yes, she was severely nulled earlier. We believe that her implants might have been affected by her disconnection from Unwhere transit causing her death and resurrection.
No, she has been compliant. No attempts at escape. She just wants more meat, weirdly. They said she ate an entire cloned pig-head and spent a lot of time suckling on the eye sockets.
At least she’s not trying to get away. That’s one thing I guess we can be glad about.
Recommendations? Well, most the Oversecs are going into deep lockdown, so expect our administrative powers to take a plunge. We’re going to have to spin this for the press and Guilds too. Tone down how bad things were so none of the colors decide to get stupid right now.
The half-strands are already gearing up to fight a silent war. Stormtree, Ori-Thaum, Highflame… We got their usual suspects squaring up again. We’re just not going to be any condition respond as reactively as we used to. We might need to put out direct monitoring platforms to deal with any Wombrash outbreaks.
As for the Fallwalker problem we were facing… with our systems gutted, it’s going to be hell tracking them, so I got an idea, but you’re not going to like it.
We use them. We use them against each other. We keep them mired in their own little dispute by provoking a false flag of our own. Nothing too severe. Just enough to spook them. That way, they’ll be too busy glaring at each other instead of setting up their cults in the Warrens.
-Exorcist-Executor Jaemander Mause to Paladin Maru Sandrupal
14-2
In the Skin of My Victims
When the session opened, four Incubi came. Four to ensure the mind of a rival Godclad belonged to them for the wars to come. Four to seek out and remedy any unknown egos still festering in their domain.
Four came through the tunnel of conjoined memories.
Four burned away without ever comprehending what killed them.
In the end, all they knew was fire, and so too did the fire know of them.
[Mental templates collected. New designations Shadow-1, Shadow-2, Shadow-3, Shadow-4. Proxy-protected–no direct link to personal minds. But still connected to their bodies.]
Abrel was practice.
As Avo internalized the new knowledge seized from his disgested enemies, he cultivated new components within his base mind, things to help him sequence faster, identify emotional resonances faster, and additional techniques to better seed memories with his influence.

Much of what he gained wasn’t quite as useful now that he existed as an out-and-loud entity in the Nether, but they still offered him a better understanding of his enemies. Mastery over their weaknesses and operational shortcomings.
Shortcomings he was going to exploit to learn the limits of his new state of being.
While Abrel embarked on her return to life, he was going to make proper use of his time. He was going to tear away a mind belonging to someone within the inner echelons of Ori-Thaum. A Mirror-Concave running one of their operational cells, to be exact.
Such a template would be most useful for both him and Kae for future plans he was still in the process of conceiving. To see them come to fruition demanded a deeper understanding on his part of Ori-Thaum’s functional structure and culture. That, and his subminds told him it would be a nice gesture on his part to locate and secure all the players involved in the disruption of Kae’s life.
Regardless, using Shadow-1 was the easiest way of getting to Concave. As the leader of the cell, he held unique clearances and sequences that the others didn’t. Among these privileges was a direct session with the dive commander himself, Mirror-Concave.
Avo didn’t know this Concave was the same one that ran the overall operation for what happened moments earlier in Oversec-C1, but such inquiries would be known to him soon.
All it took was the right repetition of memories channeled into his Auto-Seance.
***
A cast came through for Benhata Veloso through his Auto-Seance, and Shadow-1’s Meta-ident splashed across his cog-feed. Squinting in confusion, Benhata Veloso filtered through his near-term memories of when he gave the green light for the dive to secure Abrel Greatling.
The mem-data told him the operation began just two minutes ago.
Why was Shadow-1 calling him now?
Rubbing at his tired eyes, he let the memories repeat in his Auto-Seance for a moment, something in him reluctant to connect with the session. From the whispers leaking through the inner office, a shitshow of epic proportions was brewing. Rumors about another Concave losing over twenty Incubi in a single dive to some unknown Ad-Necs.
Anxiety and apprehension filled his insides like simmering steam.
He didn’t really want any part of that mess. His promotion had been recent, and up till three hours ago, he thought he was about perform another easy hop into the position of Mirror-Convex and get his own dive-circle to command.
Now? Now he was fighting the urge to just hang up for fear of getting any bad news at all.
Just losing a few Incubi destroyed some careers, and he gave far too much to get out of the “slaughterhouse” with all the years he sacrificed serving as a Glaive.
Letting out a sigh, he looked across his desk at the flechette pointed upward at the ceiling. He stared at it for a long moment, and along its facets, scenes from the Fourth Guild War began to play.
He really should have died when that went into his heart. But he didn’t. His sister managed to cut it out of him and keep him alive.
He remembered the way she smiled as she pulled the glinting metal out from his chest. He also remembered the way her skull burst apart like a wet sack filled with viscera as one of her chipped teeth buried itself in his eye.
He should die then. Nothing would be worse than those days.
Nothing.
“I survived it,” Benhata breathed. He reached out and ran his thumb along its length. “I survived.” He swallowed. His session was still sounding. His sister would have called him a coward for letting it go for so long. “Yeah,” he laughed. “What was that you said? ‘My brother is always brave eventually.’”
He nodded. “Well, you were never wrong, Letta.”

Benhata accepted Shadow-1’s call.

Fire erupted through and consumed him.
The last coherent thought he had before his self-awareness withered into nothing was of how the flames seemed to crackle with mocking laughter.
***


[This one is a new Concave. Low-quality catch.]
[Still a Concave. Good enough.]
[Maybe. Maybe not. Use him and see.
[Compiling template. Installing mind into Benhata’s vessel.]
[DeepNav has us at Yumatori, Undercroft. Back. Back in the Tiers again.]
[No. Never been here. Remember. Those aren’t our memories. Not really. We might not have been alive then.]
Squeezing himself into the hollow wound he left in place of a mind, he adapted himself to fit the vacancy perfectly. Connecting to the body’s systems and senses was like welding metaphysical structures back together using his thoughts.
The flesh woke first with a blink, and then with a shudder. A cog-feed different from his own loaded over Benhata’s already augmented perception. The man’s optical implants filtered everything in perfect visual detail, and Avo found there were three more vision modes for him to toggle through alongside a [X50] vision magnification option.
Before he could indulge himself, however, he let out an involuntary gasp as a foul scent hit him, the taste almost making him gag. He wasn’t used to flavors funneled through baseline nostrils. It all felt so… raw. Simple. Just bad and foul, missing all the other intimate little details.
Still, it wasn’t hard to discover what he was smelling. The warmth caked against his flesh around his hips and the sudden wetness about his groin told him that the Concave experienced a final act of relief before coming undone, unknowing avenging themselves upon Avo via this indignity.
He grunted. He shifted in the chair. His expensive suit squelched with slippery excrement as something hot slid down his leg.
“Godsdammit,” Avo said, channeling Benhata more than he did himself. “I haven't shit myself like that since the war.” He gave a weak chuckle and reduced the existential dread climbing in the template as he slowly considered the indignity of his final fate.
Wait. Not his. He was Avo. Not Benhata.
[Careful. Don’t want to burrow too deep. Might forget who we are for a while. Need to keep some base mind in place.]
[Needs more balancing.]
Avo felt some of the strain lift off his mind and he shook his head and pushed himself up using his soft leather chair. The room around him was decorated with ivory and raw vivianite–the foundational structure of every locus in its most unmodified form.
Some shit tumbled out of his pant leg and settled next to his ankle, but he ignored that. Instead, he constructed a dozen Whispers and spread his perception wide in all directions, scouting the structure he resided in.
He resisted the urge to expand his Sanguinity for now. Using his Woundshaper would give him a more tactile understanding of the building itself, but a pulsing field of blood was somewhat less than subtle.
As was a burning Metamind for that matter, but from afar, his accretion looked much the same as any other, if the size and brightness of his halo were to be discounted.
[Counting 3,412 other minds across five floors. This place is already ten times the size of Conflux’s block. Think we’re actually in a demiplane too.]
[Yes. Had to adjust routes for Whispers multiple times. Used template’s memories to avoid patrols. Local N-Def runs modified Specters. Call them Skimmers. Dangerous. Hard to notice. There are loci embedded in the walls as well.]
His ghosts infused additional detail into the DeepNav-generated layout of the block. Presently, Benhata’s recollections told him the Javelin of Orsoso was an interesting structure. Instead of being at the top of its five hundred stories of height, he was instead dwelling in the reflection of the pond spread out around it.
The physical structure itself was a smokescreen, much like many things were in Ori society. A pearlescent tower lined with silvery decals and decorated with grand whorls containing flowing mercury along its side, the interior of the edifice was maze-like in its own way, with walls solidifying and vanishing based on one’s clearance level.
As Concave, he could walk through approximately sixty-six percent of the building that was open to him, with another fifteen made available should he make Convex.
Of course, walking out this office and exposing himself to the loci would bring about questions. Questions like: “Why is your Metamind on fire, Benhata? Say, that looks like one of our Conflagrations. How’d that happen.”

If that was to happen, things would be troublesome.
Thankfully, Avo had another few experiments he wished to conduct.
Should they be successful, the Ori might just be none the wiser about his presence.
Drawing his fiery tendrils of thoughtstuff back into himself, he braced himself as he manifested his Incog phantasmic. An opalescent sun ignited at the center of his mindscape, and from it grew a special skin of writhing ghosts burning with perception-ablative sequences.
The question that followed was simple: Before, when he was running his Incog, all his other phantasmics needed to be dormant to avoid disrupting its functions.
Now, however, he could consume things using his thoughtstuff alone, with all his ghosts being flammable, and all that burned within him spreading his ego like a plague.
He reached out and brushed a dual-faceted security locus just twenty feet outside his office door. His approach came gingerly, with Benhata’s inherent nervousness amplifying his own exponentially.
Avo’s translucent ghosts inched over into the beam of perception projected by the ghosts within the locus. He slid through the field of notice unseen, but sparks of trauma flecked free from his external shell like sparking embers with each passing instant. The act felt like someone was pressing a glowing brand into the depths of his skull. Hissing, he pulled his thoughtstuff back and caught himself against the table before he could collapse from the spiking migraine.
[Seems we’re as much of our phantasmics as we are the memories.]
[Makes sense.]
The pain dissolved with a thought as the Eaters forming the sinews of his cognition cauterized the damage. Another downside to his phantasmal transcendence, but not a displeasing one. If he adapted his template to be more resistant to pain or focused on mending himself to sustain against external attention, perhaps he could endure better.
Just as he prepared to make his second attempt, one of his subminds chimed in.
[Abrel’s alive again.]
[Mem-data seems to indicate that she’s stable.]
[Peeking through our compromised Exorcists too. No reports of note. Voiders picked her up. Moving her to orbital for now. Can jack back into her when she’s alone and unnoticed again. We will keep watch.]
“Alright,” Avo said, “and good work.” He nodded and clicked his tongue.
He paused. That felt at once all too natural and also entirely unbecoming of him.
[Don’t like Benhata. His template’s too nice. Likes to compliment people too much.]
[Clicking your tongue makes me hungry for tongues.]
[Yes. Tongues. Soft. Cartilage.]
[Goes well with eyes.]
Avo had to manually tone down his urges before he got hungry enough to bite down and eat his own flesh. The last thing he needed was to develop an autosarcophagy habit while adapted to someone else’s body. The additional dose of disgust he got from “being” Benhata helped ward against the bloodlust as well.
Making his second attempt to interface with the security locus, he shifted more of his mind using sequences adapted from Talon-4 and Shadow-3 as he entered the field of notice again. Perception gnawed against his skin of impermeability, but this time the pain was far easier to push through, with its intensity fading into the backdrop as he speared up into the locus.
And subsumed it.
[Yes!]
[Yes!]
Yes.
Even with the Incog active, he could still affect other people and cognitive constructs. The new drawback suddenly didn’t seem so severe anymore.
Rising up from behind his desk, Avo drew in a deep breath and brushed back his shoulder-length head of hair. He paused mid-action. Hair. Another thing he wasn’t used to having.
Shaking free from his distracted thoughts, he made for the door and decided to take a stroll around his new workplace, uncaring of the trail of filth he left behind him.
It’s a shame that Benhata Veloso would end the day by slitting his own throat open and detonating his own mind after a disastrous dive under his command, thus ensuring that not even a phylactery would bring him back to life. But such things weren’t unheard of.
In the meantime, he decided to put his newfound memories to better use.
It was time to see if he could get anything out of Ori-Thaum’s hidden echelons.
+You taste that in the rain, tonight, listeners?
That’s the taste of shit.
Shit. Shit, and nothing but shit.
That’s the taste of quiet war spiraling out of control.
First, there was what went down at Nu-Scarrowbur and Mazza’s Junction. A real full-on throwdown between some Highflame and Stormtree cadres. We’re probably going to be seeing the mem-rips of that mess edited together and sold as an immersive experience within the next couple of days.
The problem doesn’t end there, though. A little fox down the Warrens told me that Abrel Greatling–that’s right, Greatling–got picked up by the Paladins at the end of that mess, but Council Elder Mwaba D’Rongo is also under official custody–snatched right out of the Fire’s Height while the FATED where having their little get together about destroying the world the last time.
For those of you that are new, this doesn’t happen.
I’ve followed Paladin Samir Naeko’s career since before he made chief, and trust me, the guy’s supposed to be a fossil and a dud. Old enough to still remember Jaus, and just hopeless enough to let the ball keep rolling. A real designated downgrade since the brief tenure of Chief Paladin Siahm Ansaulgh, who unfortunately met her final cessation when she ended up encountering a rogue Fallwalker.
A rogue Fallwalker of abnormally high spherage and grafted with some very Omnitech-seeming ontologics. The mystery remains.
Anyway though, back to our consang Naeko. He’s got a few centuries on him. Knew Jaus before he went off to see the Big Nothing. Fought in the Low Apocalypse after the Godsfall, and nearly every Guild War after. Served with Ashthrone for a while before they had to burn his skein for just walking off the job and playing three-hundred consecutive hours of Stormjumpers instead of reporting in for the Fourth Guild War.
[Pause. Snorting laugh]
You’re a true legend, Naeko. Don’t let anyone tell you otherwise.
Anyway, point I’m getting at here is our buddy Samir suddenly found some burn in him that wasn’t there before. Now ain’t that strange. Ain’t that curious? And ain’t that dangerous, being a proactive Paladin and all.
And now, an Oversec got hit by what the Nether is theorizing to be a Silver attempted breakout for the Elder, and Stormtree and Highflame are getting real square with each other up in Light’s End.
Something’s going down. Something big.
If there was a time to keep your eyes open and heads down, this is it. And to get you in the mood, this is “Before the Gun” by Cas eld’Canduir.+
-Cala Marlowe, The FATELESS Thoughtcast
14-3
Know Your Enemy (I)
[Phantasmic downloaded from locus. Skimmer. Interesting. Radiates perception. Makes things around it easier to notice. Lingers too. Seems designed to burn through Incogs. Impressive. Will need to avoid this using shadows if we can.]
[Shifting shadows. This group should have higher mem-clearance. More walls opening for us. Two miles away from loci-cluster designated as operational nexus.]
[Yes. We should also change our pants.]
[Why? Not really our body. We can just dive into another one. Feces don’t hurt us. We’re also leaving the droppings in shadows. Planes of darkness. No one will ever find them.]
[Feels dirty.]
[We’ve eaten worse.]
[Still feels dirty.]
[We’ve been inside Chambers’ mind.]
[Hm. Good argument.]
“Perhaps we can have the mule hide the filth deeper within itself?” the Woundshaper suggested.
“Perhaps you can find a substance that better embodies your structure,” the Galeslither shot back.
The world within Avo was a vortex of noise but none of the chaos distracted him.
His subminds debated while his Heavens bickered. All the while he used the totality of his abilities in tandem. Walls unveiled themselves as he flashed Benhata’s sequences to once forbidden pathways while he swam through shadows to avoid winnowing scythes cast by external perception.
His Sanguinity supplemented his DeepNav’s functions as he groped through the labyrinth comprising the Javelin’s demiplanar bowels, through such means he slipped by patrolling Skimmers and personnel with comparative ease.
The strangest thing about the building’s layout was its altered dimensionality. Sometimes, straight wasn’t straight. Sometimes, if you wanted to go straight, you needed to put your foot against the wall and start walking up.
Once his weight was set, geometry adapted to the vectors from where his feet were pointed, making it all but impossible for someone to truly fall in this place.
A pulsing resonance ebbed from a massive cylinder of interconnected techno-thaumic reactors, each running its own distinct Heaven. Channeling Benhata’s memories, he knew that each of them was a mile apart but also connected by a scaffolded arc-shaped pathway that was only accessible to specific Ori-Thaum Godclads for Essence-infusion purposes.
The Rendsinks, meanwhile, trailed back up two hundred floors past the water’s reflection into their own specific planar pockets meant to contain the fallout should they rupture.
A far safer build compared to the Fallen Heaven located in Burner’s Way, but seeing as that had a cycler and Hell built into it as well, Avo suspected that its destabilization might have been the result of a Godclad taking a tumble into the reactor during the war somehow.
Walking the abodes of a Guild while wearing the flesh of one of their ranking members also gave him insight into their culture and ethics. Most working here moved in packs of four to six. It appeared they kept to the habit of forming cells in the real as much as they did in the Nether.
Internalizing his newly harvested memories, he knew this to be an act of deliberate socialization on the part of the Ori. To counter their clandestine methods of procedure and the immense vulnerability that came with being such a phantasmally attuned power, they often grouped the young in cross-clan “circles” to engender a fixed dynamic of extra-familial bonding.
To put it simply, it was a way to counterbalance the loyalty one felt to their immediate kin with another designated family, and hence build bonds brokered by the nature of their state.
Benhata had been proud to be part of such a thing. Many of the passing Ori did as well, walking in tight clusters with their minds knotted together in knots of unceasing dialogue while remaining quiet in the real.
More than once he caught members of the same clan glaring at each other silently from within their groups. Their conditioned protectiveness towards those joined to them in the social covenant was of a stronger tissue than that bred from the blood of the womb.
And then there were those who were marked “classified” personnel. Benhata qualified among the lower rungs of such esteemed company and had specific sequences capable of censoring his person when gazed upon by minds lacking the necessary clearance rating.
Ori-Thaum made placing people in informational silos an art form. Even with all this knowledge leeched, he could barely decipher how the command structure here was connected. If he was solid of thought and without his Heavens?
Nulling a few Incubi might’ve been the ceiling of his accomplishments,
[Desired. Ori-Thaum’s Elder Council doesn’t want any of the clans to get too powerful. Taught from past mistakes. Caused years of war between the chains. Learned the real enemy was beyond the islands after the First War and that they had more in common than apart from the outsiders.]
Nothing quite makes a family tighter than mutual xenophobia.
[Don’t seem to make much noise in the real either. High emphasis on etiquette to “outsiders” from their circle. Like deliberate distance.]
He further observed additional instances of etiquette in action as he watched social circles Benhata noted be junior give way to those with greater esteem. Protocol laid clear rules in place for when two groups were on a trajectory for collision. The lessers would give ground and step upon the wall deemed leftward–or lower themselves if such a thing was unachievable.
Eye contact was also strictly codified, with inferiors responding with the briefest glances while keeping their heads pointed toward the ground while their superior counterparts had the privilege to look freely.
From this, a strange dance unfolded before Avo as there was a constant shift leftward, with people stepping from floor to wall to floor again.
As the corners of the room were lined with thin crevices projecting the shine of natural sunlight, stepping over such a threshold was meant to symbolize an act of self-purification. A leftover tradition from the long distant past told in the tales of ancient Glaives stepping free from the concealment of the foliage cast by their groves to stand revealed beneath the gaze of sunlight.
His consumption of Benhata hadn’t just been a feast of knowledge, but one of cultural flavor as well.
Compared to the familial-individualistic martial supremacist attitude oozing from Abrel–and likely Highflame as a broader whole–there was far more give in the social anatomy of the Silvers.
Still, as he hitched himself to the passing shadows of various personnel, he caught samplings of their true thoughts and knew this was a place where people wore smiles but hid implanted daggers between their nails. Most here would see the ascent of their circle before the others, and even their schemes took on a team dynamic.
Complexity wove into complexity, and Avo soon found himself teased by far too many social vulnerabilities awaiting his exploitation.

It took much from him not to lash out and devour all these delicious minds ripe with new epiphanies, but despite all the bounty they offered, they were decisively the lesser meal.
He had bigger goals for being here, and if he was to see his desired outcome bear fruit without betraying his presence among his enemies, he would need to tread carefully.
The path ahead grew bright and heavy with increased scrutiny. From the periodic surveillance checkpoints that lined the conjunctive arteries of the various offices and workstations, he found his current carrier bringing him close to an In-Sec jack-pool, where all the Ori-Thaum Necros in charge of internal monitoring were clamped around their jack-stations and diving, shuttling their ghosts back and forth through the inner organs of the Javelin.
Benhata remembered this was just one of two hundred pools active on this floor alone. Burning through them would compromise him immediately and almost certainly result in the deployment of rapid response assets along with focus-vector Thoughtwave Disruptions.
As it turned out, internal subterfuge was quite common when your factional ethos placed heavy emphasis on “ruling” the Nether.
[We can also remember there were golems to consider.]
[Can remember what they are though.]
[Memories redacted from Benhata too. Only remember when the golems are deployed.]
[Should have N-Def capabilities. Wouldn’t think about it otherwise. Maybe something like our Haemokinesis.]
Somehow, Avo doubted that. Nether-defense usually held the advantage in sequences and ghosts, so their primary objective wasn’t to engage the enemy but isolate and eradicate. The Woundshaper augmented Avo’s stealth and speed immensely, but he was ultimately still a single unit inflicting destabilization along sequences or within specific memories.
His ruinous potential had grown substantially since his recent changes, but the point still stood.
The group he was tied to took a turn and walked up the rightmost wall as the ceiling unfurled into an open pathway leading directly upward. The bamboo flooring beneath them began shifting forward as well, carrying them with further haste as one of their circle interfaced with nearby loci.
Avo stepped free from the shadow and stumbled back down to himself in the middle of the now-emptied hallway. Ahead, a transparent entrance lingered before him, the security locus spitting radiative waves of awareness to flood the halls and grind away at his Incog-protected thoughtform.
[We can withstand this for another twenty minutes at most before we reach cognitive destabilization.]
[Aborbed some mem-data from Skimmer. Locus might also be sequenced with focus-vectored Thoughtwave Disruptor. Will be distracting for most people. Probably fatal for us.]
[Wonder what happens if we die while sheathed in Benhata.]
[Resurrection. Probably. Fits material anchor. Will come back where he is.]
[What happens if we die while moving without a body?]
Silence reigned as his subminds filtered through his sea of memories to compile a proper answer. If he was unburdened by Rend, he doubted the annihilation of his mind alone would be enough to kill him for good. He wondered if he would be remanifested in reality at a location where he last had a “body” or if he could just emerge using a nearby catalyst related to his domains.
[Maybe we can eat the locus? Do what we did earlier?]
[No. Already had Necros scouting out what happened with the locus outside the office earlier. Their response was too fast. One lost locus is an irregularity. Strange. Maybe a sequencing problem that ended in fragmentation. Two is a pattern. Three is a Necro actively jacking through your network. And the one outside an N-Def internal security pool can’t be hidden. They’ll go on alert.]
[Can wait for someone to come by and dive deep using their shadows. Get in that way.]
[Maybe. Risk high. Estimating over 1243 Skimmers pulsing within the room alone. A single Skimmer is shaving twenty ghosts away from us. Going in directly with Incog active is like feeding ourselves through a grinder.]
Avo’s minds grew unified with a common growl of annoyance.
[Might be more useful to be stable mind right now. Hard to notice. Can hide in sequences.]
[Won’t have Benhata’s knowledge. Wouldn’t even know where to go or which systems to access.]
[Maybe we can kill ourselves and see if we can reset? It should be ideal form right now.]
A small part of Avo was tempted, but most of him still yearned to remain to retain his current enhancements. It didn’t take his subminds’ simulations to know that devolving from a free-moving thoughtform to being caged within a single body would feel more like imprisonment than reversion.
An old allegory leaked into his thoughts from one of his newly seized memories. Allegory of the cave. He has seen the light. He knew the edges of his limitations. He didn’t want to go back. Going back was hurt. Going back was self-harm and mutilation and capability-castration.
And going back didn’t ensure his access at all.
[Keep channeling Benhata. Maybe he can remember something else. Someone in the pool maybe?]
[Benhata’s not that useful right now. Was a Glaive. Barely passed as a diver. Just meat for a real Incubi. We need to exercise asymmetric thinking right now.]
With a thought, he shifted his mind to draw from the best sequences and constructs accumulated from the Incubi in his mental inventory. The softness of his focus sharpened. The width of socio-cultural considerations vanished behind the hard science of problems encountered and potential solutions.
His current goal was simple: to subsume and steal away the innermost knowledge flowing through Ori-Thaum’s systems. Another avenue of attack included the Nether itself–though such an act would be beyond loud with how many ghosts were welded to his mind and how many witnesses he would leave.
The cluster was a transit point that was unconnected from any Auto-Seance sessions or other means of direct access. All its mem-data were gathered from ghosts cast into outside loci that would be transferred in and intensely reviewed before being included with the information in the archives.
He could pour himself into a locus in transit, but that didn’t protect him from the Skimmers if he wanted to keep running his Incog.
No. The best way to access it was directly, but using his Woundshaper to open a path through the walls would leave too much evidence that an undetected Godclad was traipsing where they didn’t belong while his Galeslither’s wind currents were equally abnormal.
There was still something to be said about making an attempt by swimming across various stretches of shadow, but if he wished to know his path, he needed to expose his mind, and such would leave him shredded.
The eventual answer to his problem was simple.
He needed to engineer a situation where the Skimmers had to be diverted. Enough to grant him gaps or a way to access the cluster of loci festooned at the core of the room.
This required more planning–
Something rattled against his consciousness. Avo felt the eldritch fires of his Frame quaver the same way they did when he first faced another Godclad. Reflexively shifting back over to Benhata’s mind, sequences snapped back in place as a memetic ban on his memories was lifted.
Approximately twenty-three floors above him, he sensed an active Heaven slowly crawling down toward the bottom of the structure, moving uncannily like a snapping rubberband, parts of its presence reaching forward before snapping back.
CLASSIFICATION: SPHERE III [EST. 940 THAUM/c]
->SENTINEL OF THE WAVES UNSEEN
[Benhata knows this one. They were friends. Once. Andraga eld’Vanlein. Logistical Godclad. Domains of Electricity, Signals, and Speed.]
And just like that, the equation changed once more. He shifted his mind once more as a new objective filled his focus.
He wasn’t as he was before. There was no need to approach things so directly.
Not when he could possibly get someone else to do the work for him.
Necrotheurgy is a disgusting art and I despise everyone who practices it, including myself.
There is cheap little we have left in the world. I can’t use the word precious because nothing in this world is precious. I’ve seen miracles and emerged all the poorer for it. I’ve been Ensouled and all I learned was to despise myself. But even among all these benefits, my time with Necrotheurgy was the worst of them all.
You learn that it feeds the tyrant inside you. The pervert. You can twist people out of their forms and make them do things they would have never even considered before. And if you got enough mastery in the craft, it won’t even occur to them that their change was externally influenced.
The Nether is a central pillar of our world, but I don’t think Jaus intended for us to use it this way. Maybe it was supposed to be covered by some kind of administrative deity. Maybe something less than that.
Certainly not us. We’re people, and people are shit.
A secret that Ori-Thaum doesn’t want to admit is that they’re not nearly as attuned to their “home ground” as you might think. Necros go missing all the time, and there are spaces in that sea of ghosts that leave the Elder Council questioning just how much they know.
I stopped diving a few years ago. Had my Metamind removed a few months back. I have an implanted ansible in place instead, and I get void-side entertainment tunneled straight into my brain matter from light minutes away.
The gods were a mistake. The ghosts were a mistake. The dream was a mistake.
We should go back to living like people. We should stop choking reality like this–like we’re masters and abusers when we can’t even master ourselves.
We should…
We…
I’m out of joy.
I need another hit.
I need another hit.


-Former Ori-Thaum Chief Admin Revo I’Kurita
14-4
Know Your Enemy (II)
If there was a single lesson Avo learned from his time with the Low Masters, it was that ignorance was divine.
Ignorance was fatal.
Ignorance was like undetected cancer metastasizing in the middle of the night after a quiet day. Ignorance was a flechette sailing over the horizon to pierce through your hab-cell at the exact angle to kill you and only you. Ignorance was like an unseen wildfire eating through your world, the flames only fully catching upon the precipice of discovery.
Ignorance kept Avo alive then and now.
And ignorance was why he was going to claim another Godclad in his stead today.
[Target’s moving erratically. Phys-Sim can’t keep track of her. She bounces across surfaces. Skipping from place to place.] A corner of the lower two-hundredth-and-fifty-fourth floor came alight in Avo’s cog-feed as his subminds finished estimating Andraga’s eventual destination. [She’s moving down the ventral tunnels right now. For specialized transport and Godclads. Needs to go through a mind-scan before she’s allowed into the actual structure. Can intercept through the checkpoint.]
+Any chance she deviates from that path?+ Avo asked. He knew all the answers they did, but dialogue always helped uncover if there was a missing angle.
[Unlikely. Ori-Thaum is devoted to security and informational censorship. Also Massists. Different ethos. They are not in awe or drawn to the ‘Clads. See Frames more as a tool. Willing to burn and transfer Frames between merited individuals. Sphere ratings aren’t earned but assigned. Andraga will follow protocol. She has never done otherwise.]
+Prepare contingencies anyway. Assumptions will be the death of us.+
His ghosts pealed with soft laughter, sounding akin to bells ringing in the soft breeze. [Like it already has been for so many times.]
Death was a good teacher. Death was consequence itself. Death made sure you never forgot.
Making his way into the inner rung of the Javelin’s demiplanar expanse took a bit more effort than he was used to and got his Galeslither up to five percent Rend. Though he could use all shadows as deep waters to swim beneath attention and through physical barricades, his pace was still far slower than if he directly invoked a Boltstride using his Woundshaper or tapped into the local system to have the architecture itself shuttle him over.
The Javelin, beyond the rigidity of baseline reality, was a flexible edifice capable of shunting people across geometry via the intersection of crossing angles across vast distances–an easy miracle provided by one of the Heavens tied to this place’s techno-thaumic reactors. Here was another thing he couldn’t access due to his newfound development.
All he touched was infested with his being, and though he could spread across ten thousand ghosts in a matter of seconds, he needed to manifest the entirety of their architecture and attach himself to the necessary physical systems to replicate the conveniences offered to those of a less incendiary make.
Nevertheless, this was a trifling loss. He moved fast enough using the Galeslither, and if the need arose, he could attempt to siphon some mass to accelerate his velocity through coves of umbral dark.
Moving bodies became his vehicles, and through them did he hasten his transitions to catch up with his quarry. Somewhere along his approach, her thaumic signature stopped snapping from place to place like a rubberband and ended up going dormant near security checkpoint Sub-253 B-23.
[Off by two floors,] one of his subminds lamented.
It was close enough. He wouldn’t have been able to extrapolate the arriving Godclad’s arrival at all, let alone with any accuracy. All this was only made possible by every single pathway of thought moving in union with the will of his being, and the ever-deepening well of experiences and memories he devoured from the minds he immolated.
How limited he had been before. And how limited his new restrictions were now.
There must be a way he could get the best of all worlds.
As countless new accretions loaded into the reach of his perception, he began cycling through Benhata’s memories to match which among the sighted sequences belonged to Andraga. Once more he surprised himself. Scant seconds were all it took for his subminds to filter through the chaos and isolate his target.
He detached from the shadows cast by the current circle he rode beneath and stepped back out into the real. Turning his gaze upward, he found himself standing at a ninety-degree angle above a marching army of lattice-thin six-armed drones with anvils of green vivianite embedded where a human’s head would be.
Avo caught the aftertaste of wariness from the circle he just abandoned, and found a rising sense of disquiet generated within Benhata’s template as well.
[Proto-Thinkers,] his submind said. [They’re supposed to be capable of twinning active thoughts. Has a specialized construct that can simulate patterns of behavior using specific sequences. Very ghost-intensive. But the Council thinks these ones can eventually replace the need for an all-sophont workforce.]
Semi-minds.
What a novel concept.
Avo looked forward to imbibing the mem-data behind their creation from the loci-cluseter that made up this department’s operational nexus.
Perhaps he could apply their sequences to better use for other purposes. After all, didn’t he have those cloning vats in the George Washington?
Pulling his attention away from the chittering march of the constructs, he winced as a pulsing wave from a particularly powerful Skimmer flayed a good hundred ghosts apart on the surface of his structure just as he began walking toward the checkpoint.
Andraga was moving as well. He could see four-hundred-and-sixty-two concurrent phantasmal streams shifted in and out of her mind, the Necros doubtlessly combing through the totality of her sequences. The memories he stripped from the Incubi gave him a deeper understanding of what was unfolding on the other side.
They already had her mind fully mapped out from previous scans, so now all they needed to do was to ensure altered sequences and patterns of thought were properly reviewed before she could be released.
With the manpower they had, the entire affair usually didn’t last longer than half an hour.
For a Godclad? Such worker capacity was no issue, and time was easily expedited.
[Estimated time to interception: 12 seconds.]
[We could have done it faster. We will do it faster.]
[We don’t have the same limitations. She also technically doesn’t survive the process.]
[Godclad. Just a setback for her–bulkhead opening. Get ready to sink into her shadow.]
Avo steadied himself. Light and dark shifted again as a towering figure strode up before the misted glass of the translucent doorway. Andraga’s silhouette betrayed her clade as Scaarthian almost immediately, but her build was thinner than most of her kind, her musculature almost reasonable instead of the typical ponderousness that her kind was blessed with. And though she still stood a good inch above eight feet, her hair curved out in a strange jumble of cords that seemed to bounce upon her shoulders with each shift of her head.
The doorway hissed and as the taste of machine-scrubbed air wafted through, Andraga eld’Vanlein took her first steps into the inner hallway of the two-hundredth and fifty-third floor.
Each Godclad had a tendency to embody traits from their Heavens even in the real. Avo noticed that trait in Mirrorhead and Abrel, and so far, his new-old friend was no different. Comparing the woman stepping out beside him to the figure dwelling in Benhata’s memories, she stepped forward a near-perfect match beside a few additional implanted vox grills gridding sections of her heavily-chromed neck.
Her face was that of an unflattering teardrop; everything below her cheeks was laden with chrome while the stretch between her nose and forehead lingered on as a refuse of skin and flesh. Short, fiery auburn hair fuzzed her pate while a thickly bundled ponytail made of rubber-coated plugs bounced with each of her steps like a dreadlock of cables.
Thin wires ran between small square-shaped nodes along her bare arms and a silvery exoskeletal cuirass ran down in slatted flats of armor upon her legs. She looked like some kind of augmented beetle trying to shed its carapace but failing halfway, and she walked without letting her eyes wander.
From the moment she left the room, she had a destination in mind and began moving to meet it, all that stood in her way be damned.
Circles parted before her. She barreled straight through and broke some Proto-Thinkers. Nested in her shadow, Avo hid in the dark clinging to her heels as he waited for his opportunity to strike without being noticed, to turn another ‘Clad to his cause.
So far, he couldn’t quite tell where she was trying to go, and not even Benhata’s recollections offered any insight. What he could glean was her urgency and determination to move, and the status she held among all her peers here.
It wasn’t common for a Scaarthian to become a member of Ori-Thaum even after the intermixing of the clades after the Godsfall. Being of no clan meant there were still prejudices in effect despite the supposed unity between the Silvers and Greens about their overall philosophy. Discriminating against a Scaarthian though, was an art best practiced from the wayside or in a corner somewhere if you lacked the necessary augs to stop her from pulping your skull with a light backhand.
The way ahead cleared for her, and Avo saw her cast her ghosts out for the first time. His subminds estimated she was running a four-hundred ghost Meta, and the faintest of her mind’s profile stood contrary to her physical presence.
She knew what it meant to be subtle. She just didn’t care.
That spoke of certitude. Or arrogance.
One could very much be the other depending on the situation.
As her ghosts reached a nearby loci, the mem-data trickling back into her leaked and Avo found himself with partial directions.
[She’s going to floor three-ninety-eight. Prepare for crossover.]
At the same moment, Avo understood what was to come, something shifted along the corner of the room, and suddenly Andraga stagged right into a different halfway. The shifts always came as if a shuddering tumble toward a specific vector. Good thing it wasn’t directly a Heaven of Space she was interfacing with because that might have odds of tearing him loose from his current abode.
Peeking at his surroundings, Avo felt a trickle of emerging suspicion as he found he walking toward what his DeepNav marked as a maintenance zone. The space ahead was devoid of other minds and held but a dozen monitoring loci as entities in the Nether.
His suspicion grew from a trickle to a torrent when she cast out a wave of thoughtstuff and all the local security architecture winked out.
Skimmers stopped radiating.
Fields of perception vanished.
Specters patrolled no more.
As Andraga walked into the maintenance zone, the diamond-shaped doorway retracted in four phases as each flat sheet of metal retracted into the frame allowing her further access.
[Something is wrong.]
[Leave?]
[No. Might be meeting someone. Shouldn’t have noticed us. Would have raised alarm if she did. We should follow her to the end. Find out what she’s seeking.]
[Yes.]
Of course, his expectations took another dip as she managed five more strides into the room before she came to a halt before a row of dormant bulbous repair drones mantled along the wall.
“You should come out,” Andraga said. Uncertainty lingered under her breath, and she spoke with a slight growl that reminded Avo of Rantula. “I know you’re out there. Somewhere. I got told you were ‘shadowing’ me. So come out. Now, we can do this amicably and see if we can settle things without blood, or we can do this like Godclads, and you don’t want to be fighting me here.”
Avo didn’t move. His mind spun, but he restricted himself from feeling any shock or anxiety at the sudden turn. Being a thoughtform afforded him absolute control over himself, and so he would use it to fashion his mind to suit any challenge. His ghosts pried and dug through each other, clashing like threads of fire stitching through one another.
All he had done in the past hour sped through his mind as he ran simulations on where he might’ve revealed himself.
His subminds remained sure that he didn’t.
[She doesn’t know we’re in her shadow. She’s speaking her challenge to everything around her.]
+But if she didn’t notice us then how does she know we’re here?+ Avo asked. The entire thing didn’t make any sense to him. She deliberately isolated herself and turned off security before calling him out, and now she was just waiting. +Is she using herself as bait.+
[Unlikely. There isn’t the need. Could’ve just ordered a focused concentration of Skimmers over her person if she wanted to. Wouldn’t be able to sustain Incog under that level of perception.]
Then what? And how?
[Proposal: We eat her mind and find out.]
“I’m not going to give you forever,” Andraga shrugged. A spark of electricity jumped from the plugs swaying from the back of her head. “You get ten more seconds. Ten more, and you’ll deal with the Sentinel.”

[Trying to flush us out.]
[Maybe.] His submind generated various responses and possibilities. [Can still be to our advantage. She only has part of the detail. We can still try assimilating her. See what she knows. Could burn Benhata after as a potential patsy. Use the Godclad to create a falsehood.]
Yes. It was a risk, but Avo didn’t think it was a high one. So far, the situation had him confused and wary, and he hungered for enlightenment.
[We take the leap then? Find out what lies within the other mind?]
[Yes. Passivity only leads to more extreme alterations to the situation. Secure her. Secure situation after.]
Avo surged out from the dark and drove himself into Andraga’s Meta. His attack came the instant he was of an accord within himself. No more hesitation. No more confusion. A mere moment ago, he was as if a candle, shivering in the wind, waiting.
Now he was wildfire. He struck her. She combusted, and onward did his consciousness swell and grow. All that burned folded over into his awareness, and all that she was capsized as a rising eruption turned the stable waters of her mind into cinders.
HeAVenn-=CCnanon
A high-pitched crackle sounded from the implanted vox-speakers lining her neck and Avo suddenly found his awareness snapping between two places at once. Space blurred around him, but still, he spread, and between heartbeats, Andraga went from her own person to being a subsidiary of another’s will.
Avo felt his control resting across two bodies across the threshold of the Nether. Controlling both felt awkward and occupied the majority of his subminds’ focus. The burden to his ghosts was paltry, but it felt like had placed another weight upon his focus–a construct that drew away overall bandwidth to sustain its functionality.
Carefully, he had both his new bodies turn to regard each other.
Avo-Andraga and Avo-Benhata both looked at each other from across the room, and a weight built in the center of his skull.
[Feels a bit like… when the warmind of ignorance came. Hard to focus.]
[Because it’s ourselves. But two vessels…]
Something within Avo’s memories moved and he made his bodies turn away from each other.
It was like he needed to run two consciousnesses at once, and he only had enough resources to fully focus on three without–
Existence shuddered. The load lightened. The last thing he saw from the perspective of Benhata was his own body rising past him.

Most of Avo’s consciousness shuttled over into Andraga on instinct. A new figure stood across from him, and he recognized her immediately.
“My, this is a surprise,” Zein said, spearing her glaive into Benhata’s decapitated head to pick up for detailed examination. “The paths didn’t tell me you were a Godclad, Benhata? What else have you been hiding from me.”
Space and time-warped around her person like crumpled paper, and a thousand new pathways expanded between the creases of reality. As Zein peered through the multitudes of possibilities offered, her posture grew increasingly stiff and her face behind her transparent plating, confused.
“You… are not Ensouled…” Her voice trailed off. “Andraga. Songbird. Dear, I…” As she finally turned to address him, she uncharacteristically trailed off as her perception drifted up to behold the crown of fire dancing out from Andraga’s Meta. “You’re mind is… burning?” She blinked.
“Yeah,” Avo said, coming out of his own shock. “Things change pretty fast these days.”

And on a whim of opportunity or power-lust, he lashed out once more, hoping to claim true kindling for his fire.
Sometimes, shit goes wrong and it’s not your fault. You did everything right. Everything you could. Got all the kit; shaped the situation; snuffed all the half-strands that needed snuffing.
Then, in a fraction of a second, you go from gleaming to rusted and everything’s fucked.
Just fucked.
When you get here–and you will find yourself here if you’re gonna squire for any amount of time at all–take a breath, and accept the situation.
A lot of people get killed because they fixate on concepts like “fair” and “in another life.” It’s a waste of time. The past is done. You move and you fight. You live for tomorrow by handling the present.
Take stock of what you got. Take stock of what you can still do and who you can trust. Then, do what you can with what you got. Knock the entire board over again if you have to. Sell all the mem-data you got and spark another gutter war as cover. Or maybe cash an ugly favor that’s going to bleed you down the line.
Do whatever it takes to make it.
Don’t sit around asking why. You’re in New Vultun, consang. This city doesn’t care about you unless you're dead, and the world’s the same way. You gotta treat it cold right back if you want to make it out.
Accept. Adapt. Move on.
And maybe you’ll just live.
-Quail Tavers, School of the Warrens
14-5
Ignorance
The suddenness of Avo’s assault took even him by surprise.
There was something elemental in his compulsion to attack–like fire striking gas, he just had to burn.
More than bloodlust or allure, there was a need to become more, to seize another frontier of reality for his own. Zein was, so Zein could become his.
That was all the incentive he needed and from the flattened waves of subconsciousness rose an all-consuming tsunami of intent propelling him into bloodshed.
His ego seared through the air in a sub-fraction of a second. Zein, her face deliciously alight with confusion and shock, remained still. Jagged ghosts lashed free in a chain of explosions untangling from the wildfire that was her mind. The old woman’s wards halted him for but a single instant in time–her bladed phantasmic stabbing into the inferno only to be melted away.
A flash of insight crossed over as he pried her outer thoughts open. Knowledge-lust and hunger merged into a singular concept. His jubilant cruelty walked behind genuine curiosity to know what it was like to be Zein Thousandhand.
He never got the chance.
A section of chronology folded over itself as all that he imbibed from Zein was rendered null. The memories and thoughts he remembered taking from her faded into the mists of confusion.
Inside himself, he felt the bridge of ignorance resonate with the action she just performed.
[Whatever she just did would’ve nulled a solid-structured mind.]
[She just undid one of our actions somehow. Think that makes knowing about what we took from her impossible.]
[We need her Heaven. We need her knowledge. We need her skill.]
He needed to be her.
Spinning on his heels, he drew upon Andraga’s near-term memories and finally realized Zein was anticipating an attack, that she had pressured the Scaarthian Godclad to flush out their “stalker.”
From behind, Avo heard the whistle of a fast blade licking through the air and turned slowly to greet Zein once more.
As he faced her, he found a look of disconcerting pleasure written upon her mien, the transparent faceplate of her helmet only adding to the gleam in her eyes. “Compliments are in order. That was… most unexpected.” She turned the glaive in her hand, and as light infused the flat of the blade with reflection, Avo found his attention parried from looking upon his current form.
[We still have the Incog running.]
[She perceives us without issue.]
[Heaven?]
[Must be. Something that deviates her mind. Maybe puts it ahead of time or another canon capable of the same effect.]
New tracks coiled out from Zein’s person, each of them scheming exponentially as he caught glimpses of the Fisher drawing its hook forward through time. Her face with frozen halfway between confusion and genuine joy when the door behind her opened.

A beam of ghosts darted out from her mind and stung their way through the mind standing just behind the door.
Tension spiked inside Avo as reviewed his memories.
There had been no one near them in the area. No one near them for at least five hundred feet. His subminds had been monitoring signatures of thoughtsuff in his surroundings even through the process of burning himself into Andraga.
[Zein. She brought them here.]
[Why?]
He braced himself for anything.
And as the door fully opened, he found himself staring at a small figure just below six feet. He wore a technician's utility vest, and he entered the room in a state of befuddlement and confusion, with each step taken a stagger. It looked like he was sleepwalking.
Judging from the haze coating the man’s thoughtstuff, sleepwalking wasn’t far off.
Still, his perception chipped against Avo’s phantasmal shell, and the ghoul considered resuming the fight.
Zein, as usual, stole the moment from him. “You have an Incog active,” She waved a dismissive hand, and suddenly the newcomer was gone.
[She was using him to test our phantasmic?]
“I was using him as a test,” she said, confirming his submind’s suspicions. “You are a mind of a unique make. A make a partially recognized. Conflagration. A Nether-distilled Ego-Screamer. Very naught of my people to insult our void-bound cousins so.”
He snorted a breath and quickly discovered that Andraga had much larger lungs than he was used to. She didn’t seem to know who he was. Or if she did, she was more drawn to the nature of his post-consciousness.
Digging through the Scaarthian’s memories, he familiarized himself with one of her canons and knew he was able to move from place to place using waves of sound alone.
Useful.
Another angle.
Time to try again.
“Was a bit of a surprise to me as well,” he said. A satisfying crackle accompanied Andraga’s every word, and by the end of his sentence, he slid his template into her Frame and triggered her Heaven and his Galeslither’s Hell at the same time.
A well of stasis clutched Zein as she went still. His paltry Rend plummeted near instantly. He jumped into the rushing waves pushed forth by his own voice. The world faded into nothing but a series of crashing waves, and he found riding upon the wake of one, closing on–
Light and sound and pain bloomed in his senses anew as he spilled back into the real in a splatter of severed limbs and punctured organs.
As he skipped across the ground and slid to a halt against the door on the opposite end of the room, he watched as one of Andraga’s legs left a smear against the side of a wall. His other limbs rained down around him in a bundle,
Not more than twenty feet away from him, he found Zein shivering free of his Galeslither’s stasis as she turned slowly on her heel to stare down at him with a sigh of disappointment.
He didn’t even see the strike–wasn’t sure how she even carved him apart.
But Zein did, and now she stood over him, sinking her glaive slowly into his back.
REND CAPACITY [GALESLITHER]: 0%
It was a testament to Andraga’s Scaarthian heritage that she didn’t go into shock immediately after losing all her limbs and having each of her internals pierced in rapid succession. Even a moderately chromed street tough would have been dead before he hit the floor.
Not Andraga. The body wheezed and writhed as Avo intercepted the pain, considered numbing it, and let it run anyway.
Being hurt was an education. These were also new traumas and memories he could. They might not be able to devastate him anymore, but he could use this hurt as a hammer against more brittle egos.
“It is rude to attack somehow using their companion as a shield,” Zein said, tutting her tongue in disapproval. “One should–”

He used the winds to triangulate her position even while turned away from her. What followed was the invocation of another canon–this one entirely his own.
Lightning surged through Andraga’s veins, bursting out from her welling stumps once dripping with free-flowing blood. Using the ichor within this vessel as engine, vehicle, and weapon, he used his Canon of Boltstride to dash himself upon Zein, his subminds already anticipating the next steps thereafter.
A voltaic whip crackled within the narrows of the maintenance room. The drones around him rattled and shook. He crossed the distance of a few meager feet using a power capable of letting him leap across entire portions of the city in mere hours.
Eight hundred pounds of mass met Zein at the speed of lightning.
She responded by splitting storm and blood both with her blade.
The stretching bolt parted along its middle as the glave slipped through it. Blood flowed thereafter, and Andraga finally passed on to real death as she spilled free from the middle.
But as anticipated, Avo remained.
Shedding himself of the limitations of his body, he sailed through the Nether like a comet seeking a mind to boil. The simulations his subminds generated granted him insight into Zein’s responses.
He didn’t have a stable estimation of her ontologics, but one thing about her was consistent.
She enjoyed cutting things. And so it stood to reason that she would ensure she had the ability to cut almost anything.
Unfortunately for her, predictability was–
A flick of force tugged through him. One moment, Avo could still manifest his thoughts. The next, there was nothing.
Nothing but approaching fire.
RESURRECTION - 1%
Awareness returned to him again.
He died.
Somehow, he died.
Dammit.
Damn her.
Not again.
She killed him again without him even knowing how she did it.
“I think mayhaps predictability goes both ways, master,” his Woundshaper provided. “The Godslayer is a craftswoman at hard. She likes painting things apart with strokes of her blade. You wish to consume. And so, perhaps, just maybe, both of you seem obvious to the other.”
“Yes,” Avo said. “Will need to take that into account when I return.” That put a pause in his thoughts. “Where will I return?”
“Where you died,” the Galeslither answered. “Our weight remains laden in the real. There is more than one dimension to existence, but all rest atop or below the real. The Nether is the sky. And this prison is one of the many undergrounds.”
Nursing on the words offered by his Heavens, he dove down into his root data to see if he could uncover anything different. Already, performing such tasks manually felt troublesome to him. After hours of his thoughts and actions being intertwined, returning to inefficiency was a punishment in itself.
Again, the allegory of the cave returned. Exile from power was a torture all its own.
Going through the mem-data, he went over several facts in quick succession as the information loaded into his meta-consciousness.
The first was that the option of reverting to his prior mind-state was ridden with erroneous data and that the structure he used to retain was riddled with absences.
From what he could tell, this meant that he could return as a base-consciousness entity, but he could manifest existence mostly nulled due to the damages inflicted upon him.
He had a sneaking suspicion that likely had much to do with the war mind the Low Masters unleashed upon him, and the ignorance embedded into his being.
Interestingly, none of the bodies he installed his mind in over the past hours were options for a vessel when he completed his resurrection. Though they had been encoded into his Frame, they weren’t technically a part of “him,” instead existing like part of an existential log of some kind.
Apparently, for him to fully “embody” a new sheathe, he needed to internalize that he “was” the body. That mean his base-mind needed to be blinded as well.
Perhaps he could put in a trigger to rouse himself between ego-states? Switch consciousnesses? He wondered why his subminds weren’t down in his Frame with him as well and found himself left with only theories. He still had the memories and learning he harvested from his recent prey, and among them was a recollection of something called the “theory of liminal separation.”
Apparently, the Nether, as stated by the Woundshaper, existed atop reality while the Frames and Heavens existed beneath. The mem-data within a Frame, meanwhile, was but a narrative facsimile meant to mimic the true thing. It was only when a being was resurrected and thrust back into the cross-planar junction that was the real in which all these aspects were allowed to be rejoined.
With this came a new consideration–a potential for improvement and added functionality even in death. If he could somehow access the material world using something like Kae’s right eye even when dead, could he somehow use it to develop a bridge up into the Nether itself?
Putting the idea in reserve, he tuned the pace of his resurrection cycle to the max and prepared himself.
Zein may have gotten the better of him–again–but she still seemed discombobulated by his new form, unable to fully peer into the future surrounding him due to the Conflagration he was channeling, if her prior encounters with Kae gave him any perspective.
All he needed to do now was to keep her off balance. Build false patterns of behavior to lure her in and then exploit her counterattack with one of his own.
Yes. More layers to his planning would serve him well. He would direct his subminds to generate more schemes on his behalf once he returned.
RESURRECTION - 89%
Surfacing back into the central boundaries of his Frame, he regarded the Woundshaper and Galeslither bickering with each other once more.
Two Heavens. Two was not enough. He was playing too cautiously right now. He would gather more knowledge–more thaumaturgic understanding and set above redesigning his limitations. He wondered what it would take to convince Kae to let him burn her mind into his as a template, but even without his subminds’ simulations, he knew that to be a difficult ask, and Draus would likely make a good go on seeing him turned truly dead if he deliberately hurt Kae in some way.
But he could. And wouldn’t it feel thrilling to hurt her just to make the Regular know that she couldn’t do anything?
Avo turned. His fire turned inward.
That thought… that thought was unnaturally intrusive. It was certainly his but… Something like that had never happened in his Frame before. His control here was always superior. Well, until his shift into his thoughtform…
“Did you hear what I just thought?” Avo asked his Heavens.
“About expanding your internal pantheon?” the Woundshaper said. “I recommend having only a few of us. Too many gods are unreliable. Quantity is not true substitute for quality, master.”
He waited to see if the Galeslither would say anything. The triple-headed steed just huffed.
RESURRECTION - 99%
Shedding his suspicions for now, he prepared himself for his return. He hoped that Zein wasn’t already gone by the time he got back and that he would have another chance at subsuming her mind.
As threads of radiance pulled taut around him, his Frame burrowed into existence once more and injected him back into reality. He spawned out from the blood left by Andraga, each thread sewing him back into fullness as he manifested in the maintenance room.
His mind swelled like a scything blaze spreading wide, and he found Zein Thousandhand leaning against the wall not four feet away.
Upon his return, a path of time descended on her and the tracks accelerated through her mind. Her stare narrowed for a moment before they widened. “Oh, you are Strix’s pride. I see. My other instance was more familiar with you. I had to dip into her allotted paths to get all the details. Most impressive growth.” She clapped honestly.
“Remember me now?” Avo asked.
[Building new behavior chains to exploit her counterattack.]
She nodded. “Quite. Well. I borrowed experiences and secondhand explanations from my own future. I don’t rightly remember the last time I had to have a conversation with myself to comprehend a situation. Why, if it wasn’t for the distinctiveness of your morphology, I wouldn’t have had much to go at all with that confusing mind of yours. Your father would be… proud, but disturbed.”

Avo widened his fangs. “Not my father. I’m more. I can be everyone.”

Zein smiled congenially. “Yes. You’re also exceeding vulnerable to Thoughtwave Disruptions if my memories on the Conflagrations serves me correctl–”
He attacked.
She instantly bathed him in a concentrated cone of thought-rending data.
RESURRECTION - 1%
“Dammit! Half-strand… Zein!”

A neighing laugh came from within his Frame. “Are we having difficulties, master? Is your all-consuming mind failing you?”“Mule. Shut up.”
The Galeslither did so happily.
We do not live just one life, Veylis. There are also lives unlived. Paths untread. Blows unstruck.
Possibility is like a phantom existence. A parallel place that could have been, but wasn’t. But “could have been” holds its own power should one seize time by the throat.
All of a sudden, the blow you failed to strike, the words you didn’t say, the moments you didn’t capture are all granted back to you.
All it takes is a step sideways.
But understand that possibility is not totality. Some things remain nigh-impossible still. Like a child combusting into a star, or your father finally remembering to close his eyes after I behead the ninth-thousandth person in front of him.
That man… Sometimes, I swear he forgets who he wed. I have to remind him.
Remember this, Veylis. Understand the stretch of what can be, and you will see more than the falling blows of your enemy before they land. You will the shape of the world in its actions and reactions. And you will learn there is a deeper pattern to humanity than you ever notice.
Now pick up that spear, and let us do this again. There is a world in which you win this spar yet. Let us both work to discover it.
-Zein Thousandhand to Veylis Avandaer

14-6
Flavors
Aggravation.
If there was a single word that could be used to summarize what it was like to fight Zein Thousandhand, it was aggravation.
Five times he ascended back from death to claim her mind.
Five times she tested his mettle and blew out the candle of his consciousness.
The duels between them were shifting and frenetic. After his second return, his subminds generated a countermeasure and exploited the shadows in the room to dive away from her mind-nulling disruption.
She complimented him on temporarily evading his vulnerability by skipping across time to descend into his darkness before beheading him with her glaive.
Again, he didn’t know how she was striking him. All he knew was that when she sought flesh, her blade found it.
Still, there was new freedom in being able to shed his flattering vessel using his consciousness in search of a new body to anchor his ego. With Zein an impossible target, he once again targeted the just-resurrected Andraga, shredding through her memories to mantle himself upon her sheathe anew.
Just in time for Zein to spawn again and vanquish his thoughts in a burst of Nether-shaking ghosts.
His next two attempts involved growing hundreds of loci across the room using his blood and jumping through them like a circuit. He discovered that as long as he was connected to something that served as a catalyst of one of his domains in the real, he could channel his Heavens.
For those final two engagements, he survived a few seconds longer, but alas, when Zein realized what he was doing she swung her blade out once, and all his haemokinetic constructs came apart in sync.
Whatever confusion consumed her early on in their fight faded now to curiosity mixed with bemusement. She was studying him now. Testing his limits and reactivity, shifting from place to place across the span of chronology to see how far away she could go before he noticed or casting a trauma forward across time into his thoughstuff, her mind squealing with pitched interest as she watched her own ghosts burn in his replicating flames.
By the end, Andraga had found herself demoted from an unwilling participant to something between a bystander and an audience member for a series of performative murders. Despite her Heavens, implants, and skills, she was the non-factor between a self-vectored thoughtform and a time-striding heroine that thrived in the slaughterhouse that was Idheim’s history.
Even as Zein cut Avo from life time and time again, the Scaarthian flinched each time she felt his perception drift over her, wilting back despite her desire to aid Thousandhand.
As he returned to life for a sixth time, his subminds loaded into place with an ever-expanding forest of options to deploy against Zein. With each death, his approach deepened in sophistication and complexity. He was going to culture more blood-loci again, but the ones in the real would be a smoke screen–the main railways protecting his consciousness would be planted in the darkness.
There was a risk to using both Heavens so heavily at once, but so long as he ensured his Rend was emptied as soon as–
“Enough,” Zein said, standing across from him without her glaive as he fully rose back into existence. “I’ve enjoyed this little bout between us, and I see why my other instance was so charmed to face you. But I have given you all the time I can spare, and so the pleasure must come to an end.”
As the light above them flickered, Avo caught sight of the bone-white ceramic plating that shelled his skull from harm. Unlatched each of the armored petals, he studied his fibrous visage as he sneered. “And it’s over. Just because you said so.”

Thousandhand cocked her head at him. “Well, I could ensure you are greeted with a final death if that is the end you seek. Or I could just leave. Or expose you to the people in the building. You very much overestimate your control of the situation, my young dagger.”
He glowered still, his subminds debating whether to amplify his bestial aggression or adapt his mind toward a more diplomatic model now that they could pursue other benefits using rhetorical means.
A ripple of hate-infused thoughtstuff caught his attention. A low whisper snaked beneath the skin reality around him. Turning his attention to Andraga, he found the Scaarthian glaring at him from the corner, her fists clenched while the augs along her throat crackled.
Avo grinned. “Finally brave now? Know what, I’ll let you kill my body. I’ll take that memory and layer it over myself when I brand your mind with my own.” As a taunt, she shifted her mind’s template over his own and simulated her near-term memories. Suddenly, he remembered that she was here to pull her son from an Incubi cell before the dive for his team “was to go wrong.”
He created an effigy of the child over the blazing halo crowning his skull, and he watched with glee as her face twisted in violation and outrage.
Sometimes, there were few indulgences more enjoyable than hurting someone while being a ghoul.
[Reducing thrill.]
Avo felt his excitement dip instance and frowned. +Why?+
[Not focusing on Zein. Tunnel vision on something you can hurt. Draus mentioned this weakness. We should fix it.]
He wanted to get angry at himself for reducing his amusement, but right was right, and now he had the power to change it.
He needed to stay focused on Zein.

Andraga took a half-reluctant step forward just as he broke eye contact with her. Sound bundled in a tumbling wave around her, and spat an ear-ringing curse in his direction. “You motherfu–”
“No,” Zein said, spinning on her companion. “Do not provoke our dear ghoul. I enjoy fighting him. I will fight him through five more resurrections if you give me the opportunity, but your window will be missed, and your son will be dead. Is that what you wish?”

The Scaarthian Godclad stopped and clenched her jaw. She fought herself, torn between two actions, one stupid and primal, the other tortured but sensible.
Avo saw a more impotent cousin of his beast behind her eyes.
Everyone waged quiet wars inside themselves, it seemed.
Zein pressed her. “Approach him, and he torches your mind anew and becomes suzerain to your soul again. There is no possibility or path in which you overcome him. Not as he is now. And not as you are now. I am the only one sparing you from an undignified fate.”
Andraga let out a roar and her body twisted violently. Her fist mangled a repair drone, and in the next instant, Zein saw it restored. Oh, to be so helplessly emotional–to suffer the whims of impulse and sensory feedback without the ability to tune oneself freely. Avo still remembered that hell, and he pitied the woman for living it.
He pitied the world.
Zein waited till Andraga backed off before regarding Avo again. As she twiddled her fingers, all the damage they inflicted on the room shivered, and things went back to looking the way they were before.
It was like the fight never even happened. Or if she copied and pasted one instance of time over another.
“Tell me: What are you doing here?” she asked.
He didn’t answer immediately, still wondering the depths of her awareness when it came to the nature of his mind. By the last few lives he spent against her, she had grown adept at predicting him again, but he still noticed some guesswork in her actions–an extra and unneeded skip or two before death finally found him.
“Come now, dagger, You didn’t come here to seek more training from this old woman. Our battle was a chance encounter–a fluke made fated by intersecting paths and improbable possibility. You want something else. Something specific.”

He let out a low chuff. “Just dagger now?”

“Yes. You are still limited in the way you fight, but not quite the juvenile you were in my other self’s memories.” She pressed her lips together. “I hope you understand that I have committed a grave taboo to understand what you are. It is an ill thing to dig through the memories of another instance. It compromises the safety of the Column cell she directs.”

Avo mulled over what she said. “She’s dead. You know that?”

“Yes,” Zein said, sighing wistfully. “Killed by my daughter. What a feeling. What a flavor. But let’s speak of you. You have changed much in the span of hours.” Clicking her tongue, her eyes swiveled as she sank deeper into her own thoughts. “What have done to yourself to achieve this? The Conflagration should have emptied your mind of any substance with its constant self-attrition. How can you exist right now, let alone control their structures? Again, such development in merest hours…”

If her ignorance was true, then the obfuscating effects of the Conflagration remained active against her. Yet, even with all the minds he drew into his totality, he found himself without an answer as to why she was so blinded to him now.

“You couldn’t have possibly obtained a counter-axiomatic sophont construct for you to bind to your Metamind, could you? No. Aegis would never permit something like that to cross over into the Nether. Such would be a nightmarish calamity.” Her eyes briefly bent into mirthful crescents. “But also very amusing before everyones’ minds blend into a slurry of insanity.”
She was next to him then, her shift across space and time bearing no prelude and causing him to eject his mind free of his current body in anticipation of a physical attack–there was no point in trying to save his body; she had killed him physically each time without fail. As she ran an inquisitive finger along his collapsing form, she smirked at him and flickered back where she was while Avo hissed in outrage.
He welded his mind and vessel back together before the latter could topple.
“I will trade you knowledge,” Zein said. “What did you come for? What do you want?”
“Going to just give it to me?” Avo asked.


She nodded without hesitation. “You deserve a reward for how close you came to actually affecting me.” She smirked. “You now stand as the second person to harm me in some manner. At least in another path.”

Say one thing for Zein, say she didn't hold grudges when you tried to eat her mind and alter her consciousness.
What a philosophy it was to be under the faith of martial supremacy.
“Informational nexus,” Avo said. “Cluster of loci in–”

A golden path surged out from her and dragged him across the asphalt of time. Suddenly, things became known to him. Confidential memories gathered by Zein in another future flooded his awareness.
He knew.
He understood the structure of Ori-Thaum’s Incubi-based operations. He had the memories connected to theatre convexs and operational leaders. Most importantly, he knew the lead Glaive in charge of the operation that devastated Kae’s life.
Staggering, his rose from the temporal stupor to find Zen staring at him smugly. “Will that suffice?”

More details were accelerating through his mind, and even his subminds were overwhelmed by countless hours of mem-data dumped into him at once. “...Yes.”

“Good. Now. Your mind. What did you do.”

“Not me,” he replied, still distracted by his new knowledge. “Low Masters. They did this. They used a war mind against me. I tried to—”

“Burn your awareness away so they couldn’t claim you?” Zein asked, frowning. “Wise, but I still don’t see the connection. Ah. I was never much of a diver of the Unsea.”

Unsea? He looked at her, surprised.
She scoffed. “What did the Hungers tell you? That they were the one to build the Nether alone? WIthout the Ori’s vivianite, they would have never been able to commit their first mistake. And your father would have never been my problem. Alas. Alas, alas. Things that could have been but weren’t. Just like your little run through Nu-Scarrowbur deviating from my plans. And to think it was my constnat assistance across the paths that got me noticed by my girl–”

“To engineer the outcome you wanted,’ Avo corrected.
“--and killed horribly.” She expressed her disappointment with an exaggerated sigh. “I had such hopes and dreams. A set piece in mind for your triumph! The ascent of Guard-Captain Draus to a Godclad. An open engagement right outside the Fire’s Height, and Uthred Greatling, face reddening with humiliation as his daughter finds herself in conflict with both Stormtree and Ori-Thaum assets. All these moments that could be, never to be in this life.”

She paused. “I suppose I’ll just have to reestablish the continuity of my desired events should I win the Final Game and claim the tower.”
[Final Game. She says it like it’s a competition.]
[Because it is. Her mind and behavior are closer matches of a child in a playground than a black legend in the annals of Idheim’s past. Death is but a setback or a score. Other Godclads are the only true players. The end is to claim the right to alter the canonicity of history and reality itself.]
“Your daughter,” Avo asked. “You said she killed you. How? How can she access your miracles? Attack you across time..”

His subminds generated a number of responses a baseline mind could give to that statement. Pride was not one of them.
Pride, more than even scorn, dominated Zein’s freely flowing thoughstuff as her demeanor spoke of respect. “My girl has always known to be thorough and encompassing in her measure. Especially with proper enemies. I drilled into her essential skills as best I could, and she learned with an undaunted thirst.” A flatness overcame her gaze a moment thereafter. Her expression fell. “Perhaps she learned too much from me. Some advice for you, Avo–know when to stray from your path.”

[Useless platitude without context.]
[It’s Zein. Could be wasting our time and bandwidth deciphering her mental deliberately.]
“Ah,” Zein cut him off and held up a single, armored finger. “That cell belongs to another instance of myself. I must know nothing about them. It is risky enough that I delved into the experiences of my still-dead counterpart to learn about you. Should I make too much noise down the paths, you may find yourself introduced to the High Seraph herself prematurely.”

Avo winced. If Veylis could kill a version of Zein so completely, then he didn’t need to know his odds against her yet. That wasn’t to say part of him was curious, of course. “Is her mind protected like yours?”

Thousandhand threw her head back and cackled. “Oh, dagger, this is not information I will freely give. Especially to one such as you. I would not have you pointlessly dead at her hand before your use is completely served. And I will not risk even the slightest possibility of you subsuming my girl’s consciousness.”

Avo clicked his fangs at her. “Saying there’s a chance.”

“There’s always the chance. But I fear it may take centuries for me to find the path of your victory against her should you face her. Your ego would be a novelty to her but… if it couldn’t surmount me, you will not suffice against her. She will drown you in your own hubris.”

“Not a good habit: Having a soft spot for your enemy.”

Zein accepted his criticism with good grace. “True, but this need not be true forever. For whatever future may come, we yet wish to become family again. As such, we are… reluctant to alter such an end.”

“Do your cells know about this?” Avo asked. “That you intend to protect your daughter. Even with what she did to Jaus? Her father?”

A dangerous glint flashed behind her eyes. Something inside Avo screamed for him to get away, to run and hide and never return. Coldness flooded through some of his ghosts, and he arrested the instinctive portions of his mind that sought to unman his fortitude while preparing for a new attack.
No blows came. No sword. No Thoughtwave Disruption.
“What did she do to Jaus?” Zein asked.
“Killed him.”

She pressed her lips together and shook her head. “Death is nothing. You provoke me with noise instead of sense. I will forgive you this time. Do you know why Ninth Column exists?” Zein asked.
“Because the Guilds deviated from Jaus' dream?” Avo said. “Broke the future?”

“No. That is past. That is lost. Ninth Column exists because I will them too. Because I support their operations against the impossible power of the Guilds, and offer the infrastructure to allow them a comfortable existence within the organs of their enemies. No other person–Godclad or not–can give what I give, do what I do. And so, the voiders support me in their desperate hope that I can restore my love and cure the calamity building between powers. And because I struck an accord to ensure my reality would accommodate some of their wants.”
“So. You make deals?”
“I bridge what remains of his ruined dream,” Zein said. “Through me, he might yet be restored, but also through me, the world can still be preserved.”

”Preserved,” Avo said. “This is about the Arks. You’re trying to keep the Guilds in equilibrium because the Arks have something you need?”

She didn’t speak, but her terse smile hinted at his accuracy. “It takes more than just a Heaven to structure the Ladder. The Arks were… decent enough prototypes, but they serve as reasonable pillars as well. But I have said enough. My time with you is finished. We should have never met.”

“Leaving?” Avo said. “So so–”

She waved.
And between blinks, he found himself standing in an empty grey room beside Zein. His DeepNav placed him near the edge of the Undercroft in the Teirs, and he was over a thousand miles away from where he started. “You can return to the Warrens from here if you wish. A silent war is brewing between Ori-Thaum, the Sang, Highflame, and Stormtere, so you have an opening.”
“Tossing me out of your run?” Avo asked.
“Yes. Exactly.”

He couldn’t help but chuff a laugh. The old woman could be direct when she wanted to.
“You are changing things, Avo. Changing yourself rapidly as well.” Her words trailed off as she considered what next to say. She reached up and patted him upon his cheek in a faux-motherly manner. He responded by brushing her hand off with an Echohead and hissing at her, earning the old woman series of chuckles. Ever did he feel like a nu-kitten hissing at a demon. “Don’t be disheartened about dying. Victory is victory, defeat is defeat. But advancement is also advancement, and growth is growth. The totality of all the facts matter.”

A beat passed. Avo just stared at her. “Can’t tell if you’re encouraging me or mocking me.”

“Both, I suppose. We all deserve some respect for our efforts. We all deserve ridicule for our failings. The responses we offer need not be one thing alone. If you would heed my words now, I have a final suggestion to grant you.”

He grunted. It was tempting to try and make a final go at her, but subminds estimated a “99.99% chance of immediate nulling” if he tried without proper setups in place.
“You should learn to live life,” she said, finally. “Don’t just wander. Don’t just explore. Don’t just hunt and stalk and glory in power. Understand fully. Epitomize virtue and shed weakness. Broaden your palate. Live the lives of others. Live the lives of those you will kill or spare. You have seized for yourself a gift–a power of deeper understanding than anyone in this world can fathom. Use it. Become everything and everyone. As your father said: Seek the colors.”

Avo blinked. He hadn’t expected this. “Why?”

“Why?” She asked. “What do you mean?”
“Why are you telling me this? I would have burned away your mind. I would have changed you to agree with me. To become like me.”

She patted him again, though this gesture with imbued with far more pity. “You have the potential to be a new power. There is a… facet, of his dream in what you are.”

“Jaus?”

“Yes. A comingling of minds. A union of thoughts. Perfect symmetrical empathy to deepen our bonds. You are far more exploitative than this ideal but there is potential. And if a monster can learn to express the heights of humanity and goodness…”

“You want me to be another path for the city?” Avo asked. “Another better ending to reality?”

“Beginning,” Zein said. “What kind of existence would you like to behold, Avo? What is your dream?”

He didn’t have an immediate answer. Zein didn't wait for him to respond before she vanished again.
Alone, he found himself standing in an empty room far from where he started. Thoughts sped through his head. He wondered why Zein–or this version of her–wanted Andraga, and how they were going to hide what happened with Benhata.
Perhaps the Concave would just disappear. Vanish into mystery. That would inflict morale damage too.
But more importantly, he had what he came for, though it came far more freely given than he expected.
Deactivating his Incog, he turned to regard the countless sea of sparkling accretions beyond the featureless walls of the room he was in.
There was a vibrancy to the Tiers that the Warrens lacked. A kinetic essence. A liveliness.
The Tiers.
He recalled once thinking this place was home to him, of having an apartment and owning fish. Even now, he could still remember his district and address.
Now why would that be if his memories were fake?
And when had his father ever left him a herring that led nowhere?
With Ori-Thaum’s mem-data claimed and Abrel still in Voidwatch’s custody, he decided to embark on one final expedition of the day.
This one was to be personal.
This one led him on the path back “home.”

It was time to learn what nostalgia tasted like.
